Authors
Mark R. Leeper
Number of Reviews
918

Title
Review for Cruise, The (1998/I)
     CAPSULE: Black and white documentary about Timothy Speed Levitch,
free soul and tour guide on the Gray Line.  This is a 76-minute
portrait of a very strange person, advocate of the existential "The
Cruise" and enemy of the Anti-Cruise. Levitch seems to have strong
opinions about nearly everything.  Rating: 6 (0 to 10), high +1 (-4 to
+4)
   - Bennett Miller directs and edits footage a film about Timothy
     Levitch, a $200/week tour guide from New York City who is a
     genuine original.
   - Levitch talks in similes, opaque metaphors, literary references,
     and just plain strange comments.
   - Levitch seems incredibly overqualified for his job on occasion.
   - Other times he seems little more coherent than some of the
     homeless.
   - Recently Levitch was certain that the city was angry at him for
     some wrong it imagined he committed.  Manhattan has now forgiven
     him, also for no obvious reason.  He sees this anger in the
     shortness of the lower buildings.
   - His customers on the Gray Line are flooded with literary allusions
     and quotes.
   - Levitch sees the grid street plan of Manhattan as being stifling.
   - He took great offense when someone told him, "Everybody likes the
     grid plan."  He also took great offense when the Gray Line told
     him he had to wear a red T-shirt as part of his uniform.  These
     restrictions are part of the "anti-cruise" and he is "in love with
     the frantic chaos of the limitless universe."
   - His favorite diversions include going to the plaza between the
     World Trade Center towers, spinning himself dizzy, then lying on
     his back and looking up at the towers.

Title
Review for Moonstruck (1987)
     The children of the post-war baby boom are edging their way up around
forty and it has been a while since filmmakers have targeted the forty-and-
up crowd.  Then the final months of 1987 saw two good comedies that did not
taste of bubble gum.  One was BROADCAST NEWS and the other, only now getting
a wide release, is MOONSTRUCK.  Norman Jewison, who is still on a career-
long roll, directed this delightful and endearing comedy about many kinds of
love.
     MOONSTRUCK is set in a never-never land where the moon stays completely
full three days in a row and everyone is Italian-American and good at heart.
Loretta (played by Cher) is engaged to Johnny (played by Danny Aiello).
But Johnny wants to hold off on the marriage for a month until his ailing
mother in Sicily dies.  He is going to Sicily to be by his mother but leaves
a request that Loretta invite his brother Ronny (played by Nicholas Cage).
If you can't figure out what kind of problems that can cause, you ought to
hang it up.  But the plot is not as important as the beautiful yet
economical characterizations.  Jewison has a talent like Louis Malle for
creating a feeling that the viewer knows a character after just moments of
screen time.  In one scene a woman is telling Loretta about the fickleness
of men.  The woman tells her husband she sees a wolf in him.  He responds
that he can still see the girl he married in her.  He has spoken one
sentence on the screen and already he has won over the audience.
     Jewison can charm magical performances from his actors.  He did it in
FIDDLER ON THE ROOF and he does it here.  I personally have never been fond
of Cher as an actress but if this were the only film I had ever seen her in,
I would anxiously be awaiting her next performance.  Vincent Gardenia, on
the other hand, is a good actor and he too turns in one of his best
performances.  And one more touch adding to the effect: Like THE KILLING
FIELDS, A ROOM WITH A VIEW, FATAL ATTRACTION, and several other recent
films, MOONSTRUCK makes good use of the transcendentally beautiful opera
music of Giacomo Puccini.  In this case, the film is filled with the music
of LA BOHEME.

Title
Review for Serpent and the Rainbow, The (1988)
          Capsule review:  American anthropologist is pulled into
     the world of voodoo and politics in Haiti during the fall of
     Duvalier.  Only in Haiti could a zombie story and a political
     thriller fit so well together.  The storyline gets muddled at
     times and cliched at others, but this could have been a very
     good and a powerful film and just barely missed it.
     Surprisingly solid effort from Wes Craven.  Rating: +1.
     It has been a while since we have seen a real zombie film being made.
I do not mean the various imitations of NIGHT OF THE LIVING DEAD.  The
creatures in those films are usually called "zombies" or "ghouls," though
they certainly are not zombies and they are just the opposite of ghouls.
But films about the voodoo-reanimated dead have not been around much since
the 1950s.  Now Wes Craven, whose stock and trade used to be low-budget
films with weak stories, and more recently has struck paydirt with the "Elm
Street" films, has made a true zombie film with the genuine gloss of a big-
budget production.  Big-budget in this cases means actually filming in Haiti
(and the Dominican Republic) and filling in at least the supporting roles
with some impressive names: names like Cathy Tyson (of MONA LISA), Broadway
actor Zakes Mokae (of MASTER HAROLD AND THE BOYS), Paul Winfield, and, like
a blast from the past, Michael Gough.
     A much less familiar Bill Pullman plays Dennis Alan, a Harvard-bred
anthropologist who goes to Haiti to try and find a mysterious drug that
makes people appear dead enough to be buried, but leaves them alive.  (Okay,
so maybe these are not true zombies either, but the idea of a zombie-fying
drug has been around since the classic zombie film WHITE ZOMBIE, perhaps
even back to ROMEO AND JULIET.)  In Haiti during the fall of Baby Doc
Duvalier, Alan finds himself enmeshed in a web of politics as well as
voodoo.  In fact, one of the points made by the script is that in Haiti
religion, politics, and voodoo are inextricably intertwined.  As
psychiatrist Marielle (played by Tyson) tells Alan, Haiti is 80% Catholic
and 110% voodoo.  As well as being a horror film, THE SERPENT AND THE
RAINBOW is in no small part a political thriller also.  Haiti is portrayed
as being a sort of voodocracy in which most public officials practice the
arts.
     While the story is ultimately simplistic and disappointing, it does
paint a powerful portrait of a society in which public officials can
threaten not only the body but also the soul.  Mixing church and state is
bad enough; when the mixture also includes a potent dose of destructive
magic, you have real trouble.  While this is a fantasy in which magic works,
the film's most frightening sequences depend only on people believing the
voodoo, not on the actual efficacy of the art.  And because voodoo really is
believed in in Haiti, these scenes may not be far from true.  For confused
narrative and for the letdown of the cliched last five minutes, I rate this
film only a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale, but I think somewhere deep down these
really is some of the film that actors like Tyson and Mokae must have
thought they were making.

Title
Review for Avengers, The (1998)
     Starting in January 1961, the British were treated to a sort of
tongue-in-cheek crime and spy series on television.  THE AVENGERS was
about secret agent John Steed and his various partners who changed over
the years.  The original concept for Steed was to have the personality
of a George Sanders--sort of worldly and a little sarcastic.  I cannot
help believing part of the inspiration was also Ralph Richardson's
brawley-toting and bowler-hatted secret agent Major Charles Hammond
from the 1939 film Q PLANES (retitled in the U.S. CLOUDS OVER EUROPE).
Initially the partner was Dr. David Keel (played by Ian Hendry).  Later
for four years it was Catherine Gale (Honor Blackman).  When she left
the producers looked for a replacement that would have the same "man-
appeal" as Ms. Blackman did.  "Man appeal" was abbreviated "M-appeal"
and when actress Diana Rigg was hired "M-appeal" or rather Emma Peel
became her character's name.  She was not with the series even as long
as Blackman but hers were the years that the series got its widest
viewership.  She is the best remembered of Steed's partners, though
there were others before and after her.  The episodes of the Emma Peel
years were noted for a sort of 60s mod surrealism that became the
hallmark of the series.  That was a trademark and so was making the
characters veddy, veddy sophisticated and stylish.  So when in the late
90s, the film industry is making a feature film based on the popular
series, these are the years they choose to copy.
     And remake the series they really did.  The recent film MISSION
IMPOSSIBLE took place in the same world as the MISSION IMPOSSIBLE TV
series and had some of the same characters, but the writers clearly did
not know or did not care what a MISSION IMPOSSIBLE story was all about.
They told their own kind of story with characters from the series.  THE
AVENGERS on the other hand have authentically told an AVENGERS sort of
story and they have told it in the style of THE AVENGERS.  For the most
part, the faults of the film are actually cases where the original
formula did not age well.  As Mike Myers shows us in AUSTIN POWERS:
INTERNATIONAL MAN OF MYSTERY, much of the 60s mod style looks pretty
silly today.  The story of THE AVENGERS is trivial and comic-bookish,
but that was the series.  The 60s mod surrealism comes through loud and
clear.  Suffice it to say that there are scenes in this film that are
sufficiently visually weird and unexpected to bring a smile to any
viewer's face.  Toward the end of each episode there usually was a
fight under outlandish circumstances and the circumstances in this film
are about as outlandish as any.  The only place where the formula was
not quite followed was that in the series any romantic feelings between
Steed and Peel were strictly between the lines of the script.  There
was a sexual tension, but the characters never acknowledged it.  In
this version is not much romance, but it is much more clearly spelled
out for the viewer.  The Michael Kamen and Joel McNeely musical score I
think should have made more use of the original music. The opening
title music is something of a letdown only because I had hoped to hear
a good version of the original theme.  This is one aspect where MISSION
IMPOSSIBLE was better.  In fact, the music could have done a lot more
to create the feel of the film.  In the final analysis it does little
to enhance the atmosphere.  Even if it was not trying to re-create the
60s feel, it should have been able to add to the excitement better than
it did.  There is one minor plot variation on the canon I would like to
add.  In the film, Steed and Peel meet for the first time, yet the
story also features Mother.  In the series, the very last episode with
Peel introduced Mother for the first time.  And to the best of my
knowledge the character of Father was invented for the film.
     Bon vivant and crack secret agent John Steed (Ralph Fiennes) is
called in after an attack on the British government's secret weather
project Prospero.  Oddly enough the attacker seems to be there very
founder of the project, the beautiful and leggy scientist Dr. Emma Peel
(Uma Thurman).  In spite of actual film of Peel committing the crime,
Peel claims to be innocent.  Steed's suspicion falls on the aptly named
August de Wynter (Sean Connery), a flamboyant Scotsman who is doing
funny things to weather in a project that seems related to Peel's
Prospero.
     How are Fiennes and Thurman at re-creating the characters of John
Steed and Emma Peel?  Not too shabby.  The real danger is that a well-
cast Mrs. Peel will upstage the more quietly conservative John Steed.
However Steed holds his own and never becomes second banana to Mrs.
Peel.  Both seem physically up to the challenges of the role.  Both
seem to ooze charm and class.  Their interpretations are really fairly
close to the originals.  They have one minor change in style, they seem
to smile a lot less and are more serious about their work.  But they do
seem to be the same people the originals played.  And they are helped
along by Don MacPherson's script, which has a very AVENGERS feel.  I
kept picturing Patrick Macnee and Diana Rigg delivering the same lines
and in almost the same way.  Patrick Macnee does not appear in THE
AVENGERS, by the way, while Diana Rigg is not in the film at all.  Sean
Connery is Sean Connery is Sean Connery.
     A little fine-tuning could have made this a perfect 90s
representation of the 60s TV series.  That might not have raised the
rating, but it would not have hurt either.  I give this one a 6 on the
0 to 10 scale and a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Mansfield Park (1999)
     Let me start by identifying my attitudes on Jane Austen so the
reader knows if to continue or not.  I consider these stories an
excellent view into the minds of a certain class of woman in the early
19th century.  Austen novels are at the high-end of what we have come
to call the romance novel.  Jane Austen heroines, if one may call them
heroines, seem to aspire mostly only to achieve comfort.  This they
accomplish via the institution of marriage.  The choice of whom they
will marry is usually obvious to every reader, if not to the heroine
herself, from the early pages of the novel.  Her heroines are people
with no ambition to be known fifty years after their death or indeed
fifty miles from home during their lives.  Usually the reader has more
interest and certainly better knowledge of the events of their times
than they appear to have themselves.  They are living during the
Napoleaonic Wars, a fascinating period, but to all appearances are
ignorant of the fact.  This does not say that great literature cannot
be written about minor and narrowly absorbed people, but the greatness
of some other authors is more readily apparent.
     Fanny Price in the new MANSFIELD PARK is a little more aware of
the world than most Austen heroines, though not by the intention of
Jane Austen herself.  Patricia Rozema who adapted the navel for the
screen and then directed it has revised and corrected Austen for
current audiences.  To spice up Fanny's personality she now is a
budding writer.  The amusing melodramatic stories that Fanny writes are
stories that really did exist.  They are stories that Jane Austen
herself wrote as a young teen.  Fanny's knowledge of the world, her
social conscience, and most of the anti-slavery subplot is all Rozema's
revision.  There is some but very little mention of slavery in the
Austen novel, though by a coincidence that perhaps Austen herself was
not aware of, Mansfield Park was named after Lord Mansfield who in 1772
ruled that any slave brought to England was legally free.  The film's
implications of open sex and even lesbianism are pulled from Rozema's
fertile imagination.  Still it is hard to be too harsh on a film with
this much historic charm.  It may not be what Austen intended, but it
is still enjoyable.
     Fanny Price (Frances O'Connor) was taken from her poor parents in
Portsmouth at age ten and brought to Mansfield Park to be raised by the
Bertram family who live in a huge mansion called Mansfield Park.  The
masters of Mansfield Park are her aunt and uncle and she is to have a
status somewhere between a family member and a servant.  She will get
to know the Bertram children but everyone will be constantly aware that
she is not their equal.  She is treated at best insensitively by the
family except for young Edmund Bertram who from the very start shows
her compassion.
     As the years pass Fanny is accepted at arm's length by the four
Bertram children Tom, Edmund, Maria, and Julia.  Into their lives come
brother and sister Henry and Mary Crawford (Alessandro Nivola, Embeth
Davidtz), neighbors.  Henry and Mary are close and share a tendency to
flirt, an attraction to the opposite sex, a sense of style, an interest
in the Bertrams, and both are attracted to women.  Fanny who secretly
loves Edmund sees him attracted to Mary Crawford and Maria and Julia
attracted to Henry.  But Henry is more interested in Fanny.  This is
Jane Austen so we know from the start that things will sort themselves
out and that the heroine will get the right man and in doing so get to
live on the big estate. "It could have ended differently, I suppose,
but it didn't," Fanny muses at the end of the film.  But then she does
not know Jane Austen as well as we do.
     Frances O'Connor's Fanny Price is perky and free-spirited, but
just a little too attractive for the Jane Eyre-like heroine.  Sir
Thomas Bertram is played by none other than Harold Pinter.  Alessandro
Nivola does bring enough charm to the role of Henry that the audience
is almost rooting for him.  Michael Coulter's camera captures a usually
bright and sunny view of early 19th century England created by
production designer Christopher Hobbs and art director Andrew Munro.
The historical detail is questionable with details like lipstick and
eye makeup on a ten-year-old child, but it is nice to look at.
     This is perhaps not Jane Austen's MANSFIELD PARK, but Jane Austen
would have probably recognized most of it and would have been amused by
the rest.  I rate it a 6 on the 0 to 10 scale and a +1 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Quiet Earth, The (1985)
[This film has recently been released to cable. -ecl]
     In 1951 Arch Oboler made the film FIVE about a limited number of people
who had survived a nuclear war.  Every so often Hollywood makes another film
about the last handful of people in a post-holocaust world.  Notable was THE
WORLD, THE FLESH, AND THE DEVIL, a 1958 film with Harry Belafonte and Mel
Ferrer as the last people on Earth and of course in a love triangle.  The same
situation arose in THE LAST WOMAN ON EARTH, a Roger Corman quickie made in
1960.  In the '58 film an experimental super-bomb apparently dissolved
everyone; in the '60 film something in the air did the same.  In a TV movie
called WHERE HAVE ALL THE PEOPLE GONE? a solar flare does the honors.
     Most recently it was New Zealand doing the three- survivor film.  THE
QUIET EARTH is a film that very much resembles THE WORLD, THE FLESH, AND THE
DEVIL.  Once again we have white man/white woman/black man as the last people
on Earth with the two men competing for the affections of the last woman.  If
this plot had to be done again, at least it was done with quality filmmaking
and some style.  The characters are better than the 50's stereotypes of the
previous film versions.
     What sets this film apart is the force that de-populated the world.  Since
the explanation is the most intriguing part of the film I will avoid spoiling
it here.  I came out of the film saying 1) the cause could not have happened,
2) given that it did happen there could not have been *any* survivors, 3) given
that there were survivors what made the difference between who survived and who
didn't is absurd, and 4) given that what decides who survives really decides it
is an absurd coincidence that someone who could figure out what happened was
also a survivor.  A friend defended the film on all four points.  By my
figuring he bested me on (1) and (2), tied on (3), and lost on (4).  I still
think the idea is impossible, but it does bear some thinking about.
     I do have a philosophical complaint about the film.  One of the characters
feels terrible remorse for having worked on a scientific project whose results
could have been used for evil.  I guess this is a natural outgrowth of a
pacifist sentiment growing in New Zealand.  My question to the filmmaker would
be just how much human progress could have ever taken place without anyone
working science that could have been used for evil.  Most of my career I worked
on a data network that could have been used by a repressive government for
keeping tabs on its citizens.  The knowledge of how to immunize against
smallpox makes it possible to infect your enemies at no risk to yourself.  Find
ways to increase food production and you find ways to control others with the
surplus.  No field of scientific research is entirely harmless; it is just that
most are less risky than stagnation.

Title
Review for Home Fries (1998)
     CAPSULE: Black comedy set in part in and around a burger
restaurant that serves French fries not Home Fries.  So the title
doesn't really work and neither does the film.  Drew Barrymore and
Catherine O'Hara star.  Rating: 5 (0 to 10), high 0 (-4 to +4) Minor
spoilers in this review.
   - Dean Parisot directs a screenplay by Vince Gilligan.
   - Sally Jackson (Drew Barrymore) does not know what will become of
     her.  She will soon be having the baby and the father Henry is
     telling her he will soon be leaving his wife, but he clearly has
     little intention of doing so.  Then when driving home one night he
     turns up a back road and is attacked by an army battle helicopter.
     The surprise kills him.  The helicopter it turns out was operated
     by his two stepsons angry about Henry's philandering.  But due to
     radio interference, somebody at the local Burger-matic overheard
     the attack and may or may not have understood what they were
     hearing.  One of the stepsons (Luke Wilson) gets a job at Burger-
     matic to find out what people know.
   - Sally's father holds whole restaurant hostage.  He is overpowered,
     but nothing ever comes of it.  He is not punished.
   - Catherine O'Hara manipulative character makes suggestion that her
     children kill people and then claims to have been misinterpreted.
   - Luke Wilson perpetually has a pained facial expression that looks
     like someone is stepping on his toe.  Drew Barrymore is too much
     like a baby doll.  There just is no chemistry between them.
   - Exaggerated and overdone chase scene.
   - Plot has not much to do with Home Fries, or even the burger
     restaurant.
   - A black comedy needs funny ideas.  This one seems strained.  The
     timing was off or something else intangible, but the film just did
     not work.

Title
Review for Winslow Boy, The (1999)
     Every medium has its own constraints that pull it away from being
realistic.  Silent film acting is very much pantomime that must convey
much more than photo-realism would.  A three-act stage play must tell
an entire story from three points in time.  Each must have a single or
perhaps two locations.  This is why plays adapted to film often seem
claustrophobic and stagebound.  There is an entire art to adapting
stage plays to the screen without making them unbearable.  Connecting
scenes set in the out of doors will frequently be inserted.
     The play THE WINSLOW BOY by Terence Rattigan is an old favorite in
England.  Supposedly every little English hamlet with a theater company
has performed it one time or another.  It is a David and Goliath story
or one small boy against the British Admiralty.  A young naval cadet is
accused of stealing a five-shilling postal order.  The boy maintains
his innocence but is expelled from school nonetheless.  The Admiralty
insists they need only satisfy themselves of his guilt.  The Winslow
family supports the boy and resolutely demands a trial.  Meanwhile
somehow the case gets national attention and the country is torn on the
issue.
     David Mamet has adapted the play for the screen and has added some
generally inconsequential short scenes around the original major
scenes.  The major scenes all take place in the Winslow mansion, which
means they are divorced from the action.  In a more standard film
format, the storyteller would have the choice of showing or not showing
the stealing of the postal order and the resulting trial.  A three-act
stage play has too much territory to cover to have a scene at the
school or in a courtroom.  After the first scene in which we find the
boy has been accused of the crime, suddenly and jarringly we jump
forward months and the issue is already a national controversy.  How
such a minor issue could have become so important is totally lost.
Most films would have many scenes covering the interim.  And perhaps in
Britain what happened might also be common knowledge.  Here it appears
like there is a great whopping chunk of missing narrative.  One woman
near me in the audience was convinced for a while that reels were being
shown out of order because we had missed so much of the narrative.
     The actors are all playing people of the British upper crust.
They are people who have been trained to be dry and detached, even
among their own family.  This makes the film seem rather dry and
bloodless though one has a good idea what emotions are going on just
under the surface.
     Guy Edwards plays the accused Ronnie Winslow and Nigel Hawthorne
plays the father who is so standoffish to the boy but is willing to let
his family be destroyed rather than allowing what he accepts as a false
accusation stand.  Much like Dr. Stockmann in Ibsen's AN ENEMY OF THE
PEOPLE, he clearly loves his family but is willing to let his health be
ruined and his family be destroyed over a principle.  The central
characters however become Rebecca Pidgeon (of Mamet's THE SPANISH
PRISONER) as Catherine Winslow, Ronnie's older sister, and Jeremy
Northam as Sir Robert Morton, whom the family has defend Ronnie.  There
is a definite romantic tension between them on the screen.  Both seem
to recognize an attraction between each other but being oh-so-veddy-
proper it always remains frustratingly just below the surface.
     That seems to be the problem with THE WINSLOW BOY.  There is just
too much following of rules.  The two main characters cannot get
together; Mamet cannot show us the most dramatic scenes of the Winslow
case.  The whole thing is so correct and reserved that the viewer feels
a little cheated when all is said and done (with too much on the screen
said and not enough done).  Mamet is to be commended for setting
frustrating constraints on himself and for sticking with them at the
expense of dramatic impact.  But he probably should have cheated a
little to make this a better narrative.  I rate THE WINSLOW BOY 6 on
the 0 to 10 scale and a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Four Weddings and a Funeral (1994)

Title
Review for Mitt liv som hund (1985)
     This is one of those statements that get me into trouble, but I think
that Bergman has given a sort of image to Swedish film that Swedish film
might be better off without.  When people think of Swedish film what comes
to mind is dry intellectual exercises, with a lot of symbolism, that if you
could understand would only give you a multitude of reasons why the
characters are depressed.  This may not be fair in general--even of just
Bergman films--but it is the impression much of the public has gotten.
Friends of mine have to be coerced to go see even a subtitled film.  Well,
MY LIFE AS A DOG is subtitled, but it is worth the effort to see, and then
some.
     The main character, a young boy, is not having a very good childhood.
He is fatherless, his mother is dying of tuberculosis, and he gets into a
lot of trouble, mostly due to the coercion of other children.  But everybody
knows he is a bad boy.  He doesn't fit in with other children or his family.
Finally he gets packed off to live with an uncle.  Suddenly everything
clicks into place.  His uncle's family loves life and accepts people for
what they are.  They are eccentric, but likably so.  The eccentricity is
done believably, not exaggerated as the family was in Capra's YOU CAN'T TAKE
IT WITH YOU.
     MY LIFE AS A DOG is not just a fine portrait of childhood and how
children react to life's problems; it is a comparison of philosophies of
life.  The main character's mother wants to change him to make him a more
convenient child to deal with.  The closer he is to the ideal of being seen
and not heard, the better.  The uncle's family accepts him as a human
instead of a machine-tooled component.  They revel in human diversity.
Under their influence he blooms as a human being rather than dwelling on
morbid thoughts.  As a portrait of the world from a child's eyes, a sort of
child's testament, MY LIFE AS A DOG is a better film than Bergman's FANNY
AND ALEXANDER, but is a cut below Boorman's HOPE AND GLORY.  Rate it a low
+2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Freejack (1992)
          Capsule review:  JACKASS is more like it.  Violent,
     ugly, stupid, and boring sci-fi chase film, purported based
     on Robert Sheckley's IMMORTALITY, INC., though actually
     borrowing just an idea or two.  FREEJACK exemplifies
     everything that is going wrong with current big-budget
     science fiction films.  Rating: low -2 (-4 to +4).
     Robert Sheckley, already known for short stories in 1958 when he
published his first novel.  IMMORTALITY, INC. had a science fiction
style but was actually a fantasy story based on the idea that in some
cases the soul does survive when a  person dies and that souls can be
transplanted to new bodies.  In the novel Thomas Blaine crashes his car
on the New Jersey Turnpike late one night in the year 1958 and finds his
soul transplanted into an unfamiliar body in the year 2110.  If all this
sounds familiar, you did *not* get it from seeing the new supposed film
version FREEJACK.  In fact, there is only an idea or two that Freejack
may have borrowed from IMMORTALITY, INC. and a few more borrowed,
uncredited, from John Varley's MILLENNIUM (or perhaps the film version
of that story).  But, okay, so FREEJACK is not a good adaptation.  Is it
at least a good movie?  And the answer is "No, FREEJACK is a *terrible*
movie."  Cut off about ten minutes at each end and the film is one long
chase story set on a futuristic background that makes no sense for any
year as near as its 2009.
     Emelio Estevez plays Alex Furlong, a race car driver who is plucked
from a fiery crash and thrown into the super-violent and incredibly
run-down world of 2009.  It seems that there is a huge corporation that
wants Furlong's body.  His mind they have no use for.  And for about the
next ninety minutes you won't need your mind either.  Of course, there
is something of a mystery going on in this future world.  But it is the
sort of mystery intended to give the audience the cheap thrill of
saying, "Aha!  I knew it all along!"  If you are surprised at who is
pulling all the strings, perhaps you deserve this film.
     The set direction at best looks like a cheap-jack version of
BLADERUNNER, and at times looks as if they had just filmed in any slum
they could find.  This view of the world eighteen years hence is neither
original nor imaginative.  BLADERUNNER's art director would look at
every object in a scene and redesign just enough to give you the feeling
time had passed.  The parking meters would be completely redesigned, for
example.  The closer you looked, the more interesting detail you saw.
Not so here.  There is no quality in the set design.  The equivalent
here is redesigning a delivery truck to make a product placement more
evident.  Most of the cars of the future look either like cars of the
1980s, cars of the 1980s with big fiberglass shells over them to
disguise them.  One of my pet peeves is a script that makes calendar
mistakes.  (There is a number trick for figuring what days dates fall
on.)  And any almanac should have told a scriptwriter who cared that
November 23, 2009, falls on a Monday, not a Thursday.  In another scene
we meet what is apparently a homeless man who must eat river rat.  It
would not be a bad little detail but for the fact that inside the grungy
clothing he has a neatly trimmed beard and smooth, shaved cheeks.
     Casting is another place where the film falls flat.  Emelio
Estevez, who has not had a decent film since THE BREAKFAST CLUB, just
looks too young and does not have the acting power for this role.  Mick
Jagger plays Vacendak, a hired killer and the head of a private security
army.  There is absolutely nothing about him that adds anything to
Vacendak that was not in the script.  The best that can be said is that
he does not detract from the role.  We might expect that, since Jagger
has little acting experience.  But what is surprising is that Anthony
Hopkins apparently chose just to act his role as a corporate executive
and to put nothing extra in it.  Either director Geoff Murphy did not
let Hopkins do much or Hopkins was just simply uninspired.
     Overall, we have a film with no characters and no core.  In their
place we have chases and gunfights.  The producers didn't even have the
sense to borrow what was good about the novel it claims to be based on.
I give FREEJACK a low -2 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     (The novel has been published as IMMORTALITY, INC. and earlier in
a shorter form as IMMORTALITY DELIVERED.  It was serialized in GALAXY
magazine October 1958 to February 1959 under the title TIME KILLER.  It
is currently available in a movie tie-in edition as FREEJACK, though the
novel itself has no reference to the term "freejack" nor to jacks of any
kind.)

Title
Review for Cutthroat Island (1995)
     What is wrong with this action scene?  A woman is standing on a
coach speeding under a low awning on a building that overhangs the
road.  Rather than be knocked off she jumps onto the awning, runs
through the building, pushing aside obstacles and dives out the window
on the far side landing back on the coach.  Well, there are two things
wrong.  First, the architecture has to be very contrived to set up the
scene in the first place.  17th Century Jamaica could not have had many
buildings with a second story that extends over a road.  But secondly
someone running an obstacle course will not go faster than speeding
horses that have no obstacles.  It makes for a nice action scene, but
given some thought, it just does not make sense.  That in a nutshell is
what is wrong with CUTTHROAT ISLAND.  It has too many good sequences
ruined by touches that do not bear close scrutiny.  This is a film that
fools you.  Just when you start warming up to it and get pulled into
the story, it does something stupid or poorly thought out and it loses
you again.  In the end it is the silly mistakes, the anachronisms, the
scenes that don't make sense, the sexual double entendres, and the
Bond-like wisecracks that sink a film that otherwise has a good action
plot and some impressive visuals.
     The year is 1668.  Pirates like Black Harry (played by Harris
Yulin), his infamous brother Dawg (played by Frank Langella), and his
daughter Morgan (played by Geena Davis) rule the blue waves of the
Caribbean (played by the blue waves off Thailand).  Harry, Dawg, and a
third brother each have a piece of a map to a fabulous treasure hidden
on Cutthroat Island.  Their father wanted them to share but that is not
what the brothers plan.  This is the basis for what would have been a
good fast-paced adventure film if the script by Robert King and Marc
Norman had not tried too hard to be cute.  But the credits are not over
before Morgan's lover is holding a musket on her and she is telling him
it won't fire because she "stole his balls."  Big yucks here, folks.
Too bad it totally ruins the period feel.  It is not long before Morgan
has inherited her father's crew and the companionship of an erudite
thief (Matthew Modine) who join Morgan on her.  Together they go off to
try to find the treasure.  And thereby hangs what could have been a
good tale.
     Perhaps the biggest blunder was to think that Geena Davis could
play a convincing pirate queen and a terrific swordswoman.  That just
is not her kind of role and even the best stunt doubles cannot fix
that.  Frank Langella is a bit better as the villainous Dawg, but then
he has some experience in swashbucklers.  And then just as you are
getting used to Davis in the role the film introduces Maury Chaykin of
UNSTRUNG HEROES as a writer who is a guest on the pirate ships getting
material for "a bestseller."  That was the word they used,
"bestseller."  (Boy, that 17th Century culture was a lot like ours,
wasn't it?  Now was that before or after the Kennedy assassination?)
Of course not all of the problems have to do with period feel.  There
is the over-trained monkey who apparently understands English, but just
enough to make very human gestures.  For one painful example Morgan
tells the monkey that she is the captain and the monkey salutes her.
And once again the viewer is reminded that this is all just a movie.
     Director Renny Harlin understands action scenes and does not worry
too much about the logic of his scripts.  He has explosive action
scenes of terrific sea battles and dramatic helicopter shots with
birds' eye views of magnificent pirate ships.  But he will also have
Morgan ready to make love to her doctor just moments after he removesa
musket ball from her lower abdomen.  Somebody desperately needed to go
through this film scene-by-scene and ask, "Does this sequence really
makes sense?"  With some films you could cannot take out the silly
ideas or you would not have a story left.  That is definitely not true
of CUTTHROAT ISLAND.  This is one film that you could tighten up scene
after scene and still have a good story and, in fact, a much better
piece of entertainment.
     This is a mediocre film with a really good old tyme swashbuckler
inside fighting to get out.  It needed a sharper cutlass.  Rate this
one a high 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Amantes del Círculo Polar, Los (1998)
     CAPSULE: A tender love about love, fate, and the power of
coincidence.  This is the story of Ana and Otto who love each other
from childhood, become foster brother and sister, lovers, and finally
have linked fates within the Arctic Circle.  Rating: 7 (0 to 10), low
+2 (-4 to +4)
   - Written and directed by Julio Medem.
   - Arctic plane crash under the credits, a teaser for what will
     happen in the final reel.
   - Story is told in chapters, usually alternating between "Otto" and
     "Ana."
   - Otto as a child loves paper airplanes.  He flies dozens over the
     school playground setting several plot lines in motion.  Otto's
     father meets Ana's mother and leaves Otto's mother for her.  Otto
     and Ana fall in love even though they are living like brother and
     sister.  They have a secret love affair in their parents' house.
   - Stories and flashbacks keep interconnecting with each other.
   - Otto who has left his mother's house to live with his father and
     Ana then blames himself for his mother's death.  Theme of guilt
     and shame.
   - There is some nudity in some nicely filmed love scenes.  Spanish
     films usually seem to have interesting approaches to their
     frequent nude scenes.
   - Supposedly story is told from one character's point of view or the
     other's.  Yet scenes in which they come close but do not see each
     other cannot be from either's point of view, or how would they
     have known?
   - Characters believe very heavily in power of coincidence and
     coincidence is what drives the story.  Some of the coincidences
     are extremely far-fetched.
   - End of film seems very contrived.

Title
Review for Ghost and the Darkness, The (1996)
     The story is basically true.  At the turn of the century the
British were anxious to consolidate their holdings in Africa and
connect Kenya and Uganda together strategically with a railway that
would allow them to move freight, probably ivory, and perhaps even
troops easily.  The rail was intended to get permanent lines of
communication into Uganda and get it there ahead of the German rail
line moving up north from the south.  This was to be the Uganda Railway
and Britain was racing with Germany and to a lesser extent France to
complete it.  In 1896, 32,000 workers were brought to Africa from
India, principally from Gujarat and the Punjab, just to work on the
railroad.  In Kenya one river that blocked the way and that the British
rail would have to cross was the Tsavo.  Col. John Henry Patterson was
selected to build the Tsavo Bridge.  His experience told him that it
would be a difficult task, but he did not know how difficult.
     Patterson's biggest problem turned out to be not from workers but
from the animal population.  There were frequent attacks of at least
two lions who would come at night and drag workers out of their tents.
It fell to Patterson to kill the lions, and he had a hard time of it.
Between understandable problems with his workers and the efforts to
hunt the lions, building the bridge turned into something of a fiasco.
However, Patterson was able to collect in his diaries information never
available before on just how lions attack and even how they eat humans
in the wild.  (The sensitive may want to skip to the next paragraph at
this point.)  The screams and the crunching of bones frequently could
be heard from the camps. The victim would be dragged off by the head,
often mercifully breaking the neck in the process.  The clothing and
skin would be licked off by the lion's rough tongue and the blood
sucked out.  The trunk and legs, being meaty, were eaten next, and then
the arms.  The head and feet are not thought by lions to be worth the
effort to eat.
     Unarmed humans are extremely vulnerable to lions, but are usually
safe from such attacks.  That is because lions just do not want to
bother with this unfamiliar prey that walks on two legs and behaves in
ways unpredictable to lions.  The Tsavo attacks could have been just an
incident of elderly lions forced to attack easy prey in spite of the
unfamiliarity.  Or perhaps it may have been that the railroad workers
had hunted out the lions' usual prey.  While this film makes the lions
out to be extremely large and powerful, doing the killing for the pure
enjoyment, it is unlikely that they would have chosen human prey as
anything but an act of desperation and a last resort.  The lion attacks
in the region lasted for ten months, though by some accounts there were
several lions involved.  Twenty-eight of the workers were killed and it
is estimated that over a hundred other people were also killed.  One
lion even got so bold as to pull human victims off of trains.  The
lions were eventually killed in ambush and the Tsavo Bridge was finally
completed under Patterson's direction.  His later book about his
experiences, THE MAN EATERS OF TSAVO, was a best- seller.  (I have not
read the book, incidentally and know only very little of its content
from another reference.  It is, however, still in print.)  Now a
somewhat fictionalized version of Patterson's adventures has been made
into a movie.  Early in the film Patterson, played by Val Kilmer, is
given five months to complete the bridge.  His employer is John
Beaumont (Tom Wilkinson), characterized here as the world's worst
manager.  Patterson is experienced with what appear to be similar tasks
in India, but has never been to Africa.  He has, however, always
dreamed of a job that would take him to that mysterious continent, so
he takes the position.  He and the audience are treated to the breath-
taking East African landscape and animals as he travels to the Tsavo.
Almost immediately there is a crisis with a man-eating lion.
Patterson, however, makes short work of the lion and makes himself a
hero in the eyes of the workers.  But there are more lion problems to
come.  Also to come is Charles Remington, a Great White Hunter in the
classic tradition, played by Michael Douglas.  Remington will be hired
to solve the lion problem.  The screenplay for the story is by William
Goldman who certainly knows how to write action from films like
MARATHON MAN.
     This is Val Kilmer's second role this year with intelligent
animals.  His performance is slightly more restrained than the one in
THE ISLAND OF DR. MOREAU.  It is an odd piece of casting, but one that
works reasonably well.  Not so successful is Michael Douglas whose
American Southern accent seems to come and go.  He seems to take to his
acting a little more casually than the role really called for.  The
producers clearly were going for something of a horror film feel for
this historical film as director Stephen Hopkins is known for horror
films like NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREET 5 and PREDATOR 2 and action films
like JUDGMENT NIGHT and BLOWN AWAY.  Vilmos Zsigmond does as much for
the film as any of the actors with his beautiful images of Kenya.
Though the photography is generally straightforward, it is not really
clear why he uses repeated images of brambles.  Also slightly cliched
is the use of a distorting lens to show the lions' point of view.
There are a few other little cliches that the film could have done
without, but to mention them would be spoiler.  Jerry Goldsmith's score
is decent, though one tends to expect more from his scores.
     In general this is a good, old-fashioned African adventure with a
fair amount of suspense.  I give it a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Phantasm II (1988)
          Capsule review:  PHANTASM II is a parasite of a film
     that does nothing to advance the director's planned trilogy
     and only exploits the popularity of its predecessor.  It
     panders to a teenage audience by making a teenager the only
     thinking character and by throwing in bits of other recent
     successful films.  The parts of the film that are coherent
     enough to make sense don't; it's all spectacle and no
     characters or logic.  Rating: -2.
     Nine years ago there was a revolution of sorts in horror films brought
about by advances in makeup technology.  The idea of prosthetic makeup meant
that you could show things on screen that could only be shown poorly on
screen--if at all--in the past.  If you wanted to show a man turn into a
werewolf-monster on screen, you did not have to resort to pieced-together
double exposures that had been the best way to handle the effect since the
1940s.  Pneumatic air bladders and mechanical effects allowed realistic-
looking transformation effects on screen.  With a concentration on new
effects technology many low-budget horror films were made in a race to show
the public new sights and effects.  Artistically it was a disaster, as many
of the films had little to offer but visual effects, many of which were
intended to gross out the audience.  For every CAT PEOPLE or THE HOWLING,
there were a dozen films that were purely a waste of time with no concepts
behind them, no artistry, and a generally weak script.  Somewhat above
average was Don Coscarelli's PHANTASM.  It sold itself on a gross-out
special effect (a sort of flying drill best not described), but all the
strange things happening at the film's mortuary--some not frightening, but
very strange for a horror film--turned out to make sense in terms of a more
interesting science fantasy premise.  Coscarelli has said that PHANTASM was
only the first part of a trilogy that would expand on the initial premise.
PHANTASM II is the second film.  By the looks of it, it may be the last.
     Thematically, it is hard to believe Coscarelli is planning a trilogy
because PHANTASM II does not advance the story at all.  There is virtually
nothing, certainly nothing of value,that is in the sequel that was not in
the first film.  Mike, who was a boy in the first film and is nineteen in
this film (now he is played by James Le Gros) returns with his adult
sidekick Reggie (played by Reggie Bannister) to play Rambo at whatever
mortuary the Tall Man (still played by Angus Scrimm) has currently set up
shop in.  Since Mike is now nineteen, they have to add a sex interest for
him and so they crudely add Liz (played by Paula Irvine) by claiming that
for years she has been psychically linked to Mike and now they are finally
meeting.  Clever plotting!
     PHANTASM II is a very poor piece of storytelling.  It assumes the
viewer has seen the first *and* remembers it.  After nine years, it was not
easy.  Even with a liberal piece of re-used footage, much of the film is
incoherent and does not explain what is going on.
     Unlike the first film, PHANTASM II very consciously attempts to appeal
to a teenage audience.  All the good ideas come from the teenager, who
apparently is the only character who thinks.  There is a conscious effort to
infuse the plot with heavy handweapons--sawed-off shotguns and flame
throwers--popular with a teenage audience.  There are also more visceral
special effects.  The first film pretty much contented itself with showing
mustard-colored blood.  PHANTASM II's effects of showing creatures coming
out of human bodies and machines burrowing in are state-of-the-art in an
effects technology that has really taken a wrong and regrettable turn.  That
these effects should change so much, yet the scenes connected with the
premise of the film are so unchanged, leads one to really question
Coscarelli's values.
     The script for PHANTASM II contains a wide variety of logic flaws. The
characters get their high-tech weaponry by building it themselves one night
when they break into what is apparently a hardware store.  For reasons
unexplained no alarms go off.  Among the goods they apparently get in the
raid are shotguns and hand grenades.  I guess you really *can* get all your
hardware needs at your True Value Store!  When they are all done, being
basically honest, they drop a wad of money in the till.  That leads one to
wonder about the need to break in at all.
     We have all seen in swashbucklers the classic tense swordfight scene in
which the bad guy has the good guy down and raises his sword over his head
for the last stroke and while the sword is up, the good guy uses the opening
to go for the stomach and win.  PHANTASM II has the identical scene with
chainsaws.  Only one problem: the scene makes no sense with chainsaws.  A
broadsword needs some momentum to cut; a chainsaw does not.  There is no
reason to pull back a chainsaw so that your last stroke has more momentum.
     One of the characters is in a villain's control at one point.  The
villain is about to pop her into a crematorium oven.  For no reason other
than to build tension, he starts doing other crematorium chores instead.
Then when her turn comes, he puts her on the roller track leading to the
oven and walks away.  He then is surprised to find out she just rolled
herself off the track to avoid the oven.
     There is more, and worse, to say about PHANTASM II.  But suffice it to
say that Coscarelli probably ruined his chances at a trilogy, and certainly
a lot of public interest in that trilogy, by turning out such a bad excuse
for a film.  The biggest horror fan I know fell asleep on PHANTASM II and
later said she was glad she had.  But if you have a nice comfortable bed at
home, there's no reason to go and see this film at all. Thinking about the
film I am tempted to lower it to a -3 on the -4 to +4 scale, but I will
settle for the -2 I gave it in the theater.  The only reason I said so much
about a film I would rather forget is that I had a boring car ride from
Massachusetts to New Jersey and I had to fill the time somehow.

Title
Review for Prospero's Books (1991)
     This has been a year for some unusually visual films.  We have seen a
man made from liquid metal in TERMINATOR 2.  We have seen a beautiful
animated fairy tale with BEAUTY AND THE BEAST.  But you haven't seen
anything like PROSPERO'S BOOKS.  Not this year.  Probably not any year.
Peter Greenaway retells the story of Shakespeare's TEMPEST.  Well, in a
manner of speaking, that is what Greenaway does.  It also, as the title
suggests is a tour of Prospero's books.  When the scholar and wizard
Prospero was ousted as the Duke of Milan and set adrift in a small boat, a
friend gave him his twenty-four magical books so that Prospero should not
die.  Shakespeare does not tell us what the twenty-four books are; Greenaway
walks us through the books and shows us the texture of the medieval magic.
     Now Prospero knows that the air, the ground, and the sea are thick with
spirits.  Knowing his books, he is able to see the spirits.  Once we start
the books, we also see the spirits all around.  Spirits generally do not
wear clothing and because of the overwhelming number of spirits we see, this
film has the most nudity from the greatest number of angles of any film that
comes to mind.  At almost any given time humans are a tiny minority in the
midst of a host of spirits that surround us--at least to the mind of
Prospero.  And that is what Greenaway has filmed, thumbing his nose at
conventions of no or limited nudity.  There is a nearly constant ballet of
naked spirits of both sexes cavorting around and visually overpowering all
humans but Prospero.
     Nothing overpowers Prospero.  We do not know if the story is happening
entirely in Prospero's head or if Prospero has made himself an all-powerful
deity playing with mortals as a child might with dolls.  Like the child
playing, Prospero gives the voices to all his characters, occasionally with
the actor providing a shadow voice speaking in near-unison.  So while
Caliban speaks in gruff Gielgud, Miranda speaks in a dual voice of John
Gielgud and Isabel Pasco.
     Greenaway's script is almost as daring as his staging.  Yes, it does
tell the story of THE TEMPEST eventually, using Shakespeare's own lines.
But it also describes the great books of Prospero in Shakespearean prose, a
writing task the Bard never attempted.  Starting with the Book of Water,
whose pages were once colorful and are now faded from dampness, each new
book is a pleasure if not a total delight.  The Book of Mirrors is lined
with mirrors.  The Book of Architecture has pop-up buildings, some of which
become sets.  Prospero's whole world can be found in his books.  No wonder
he prized them over his dukedom!
     Greenaway's visual style overpowers his story after slowing it to a
halt as dancing and singing spirits get in the way of the plot.  The sets
are like fanciful intricate paintings with beautiful images.  Not content
even there, Greenaway overlays and composes images in mattes and multiple
exposures.  The film is made in high-definition video and takes full
advantage of the electronic effects that medium provides.
     For more than two hours the viewer is bombarded (with the accent on
"bard") with visual image after visual image after visual image (although
when he tires of the intellectual content he can take a few minutes of
vacation from it watching the naked bodies).  The film is challenging and
taxing at times.  It probably requires a good knowledge of the original
play.  Recognizing this limitation for United States audiences, Miramax has
provided an 8-1/2- by 11-inch cheat sheet card to tell us Yanks what the
plot of THE TEMPEST was.  I suppose it is a nice gesture, but I am impressed
by anyone who can so fast read and remember even this short summary.  One
rather wonders what Shakespeare would have made of the film.
     Greenaway has made yet one more film that will appeal to only a very
narrow range of tastes.  But as with his COOK, THE THIEF, HIS WIFE, AND HER
LOVER (and unlike THE DRAUGHTSMAN'S CONTRACT), I find myself in that
splinter.  This is a fantasy film that does a great deal that is new but one
I cannot recommend without strong reservations.  For those with my odd
tastes I rate it a low +3 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Dogma (1999)
     One of my favorite comedies of all time is Stanley Donan's
BEDAZZLED featuring the writing and acting of Peter Cook and Dudley
Moore.  It is a retelling of the story of Faust in modern terms.  But
what makes it funny is are the often hilarious discussions of theology
and religious dogma between the Devil and a nebbish Wimpy Burger grill
man selling his soul.  Films rarely get into humorous examinations of
anything so abstract as religious belief and in the deft hands of Cook
and Moore it made for a really original comedy.  I hardly expected a
film along these lines from relative newcomer Kevin Smith, with only
the films CLERKS, MALL RATS, and CHASING AMY under his belt.  None of
these films indicated any inclination toward a far-out fantasy with a
humorous take on religious belief, one along the lines of BEDAZZLED.
When I heard that was what he had done I came hoping for a lot and I
got a lot, but not the same lot.  Smith wrote himself a script that a
many-year veteran director might have found overly ambitious.  There is
just too much in the film for it to all hang together.  One has the
feeling that any fleeting idea Smith had stuck to the script like
flypaper.  Somehow feces monsters, heavy violence, deep theological
discussion, fantasy, and an action thriller plot just do not all fit
comfortably in the same film.
     The plot is convoluted and often the viewer has to listen quick to
get the concepts.  Apparently two fallen angels Loki and Bartleby
(played by Matt Damon and Ben Affleck) have found a loophole in God's
rules so that they can get back into heaven, though they may have to
destroy the world to do it.  An abortion clinic worker Bethany (Linda
Fiorentino) is chosen by the archangel Metatron (Alan Rickman) to stop
the two angels.  Soon she is traveling with Kevin Smiths repeating
characters Jay and Silent Bob.  In DOGMA we learn they are prophets of
the Lord.  This may limit their usefulness to Smith in future films.
They are also joined by Rufus (Chris Rock), the 13th Apostle whom we
never heard about in the New Testament because he was black.  The fact
that the film also suggests that Christ was also black requires some
fancy explaining.  What Smith should have done was drop one idea of the
other and not was screen time reconciling the two ideas.  There is
enough explaining that has to be done in this film as it is.  George
Carlin has a small role as a Catholic Cardinal with a concept for
popularizing religion.  It is possible that the ideas for this sequence
were all Smith's or perhaps he was writing a pastiche in the style of
George Carlin.  But the whole George Carlin Buddy Jesus sequence is
very, very much in the style of Carlin and it would hardly surprise me
to find out that the long-time iconoclastic comedian had a lot of input
on his sequence or even wrote it himself.  Tiny roles go to Bud Cort
and Janeane Garofalo.  It is not clear why name actors were needed in
such tiny roles.
     With CHASING AMY Kevin Smith showed that he could write characters
with some emotional complexity.  Unfortunately DOGMA does not take the
time for developing characters in a meaningful way.  The acting and
seems much cruder in this film than in CHASING AMY.  Some surprisingly
crude production values betray the low budget this film must have had.
Particularly noticeable early in the film words seem to fit lips very
poorly as if the in studio dubbing were not competently done.  The plot
calls for special effects but they range from adequate to crude.
     The script is full of interesting ideas but frequently they go by
at lightning speed and such basic concepts as why the action is taking
place now rather than at some other point of the past or future seem
too quickly glossed over.  Consideration should have been given how to
convey the ideas better.  Inconsistencies mix into Christian theology
in the form of a muse from Greek mythology and the Norse god Loki.
Humor is always subjective and there were members of the audience
laughing, but for me much of the levity for me fell flat and was not
even germane to the subject matter (e.g. Wisconsin cheese hats).  Smith
needs to be more selective in the humor included.  Smith might well
have considered letting less be more.
     DOGMA comes close to subject matter I would have greatly enjoyed.
A little refinement of the script could have made this like BEDAZZLED,
an intelligent comedy to be savored for years.  It still has a lot to
offer, but I rat it only a 5 on the 0 to 10 scale and a low +1 on the
-4 to +4 scale.  DOGMA's reinterpretation of theology is causing the
same protest that Milton or Dante might face if they were around today.
The upside is that the protests appear for now to be low-key and
generally ignored.

Title
Review for Hellraiser (1987)
          Capsule review:  Non-stop slam-bang action creepshow
     makes writer-director Clive Barker seem sicker than he
     actually is.  Lots of sex and violence, full of sound and
     fury, signifying nothing.
     Clive Barker is the new *wunderkind* of horror fiction.  While Stephen
King writes pretty much in the well-trodden areas of horror--clairvoyance,
psi powers, vampires, etc.--Clive Barker seems to create startlingly new
ideas that are usually totally off the wall.  You cannot be sure what
territory a Barker story will take you to, but you can be pretty sure it
won't have anything as familiar and reassuring as a blood-sucking vampire.
You may encounter a malevolent talking pig, or a haunted burial shroud; one
of his more horrific stories involved a giant.  It was perhaps the first
horror story with a giant in two centuries.  Now following in the footsteps
of Stephen King, who wrote and directed his own horror film MAXIMUM
OVERDRIVE, Barker has written and directed HELLRAISER.
     Well,.... I heard someone in the audience echo almost word for word the
thoughts I had watching the film: "The guy who made this film is one sick
son of a bitch."  Take RE-ANIMATOR, remove the humor, than add more gore,
more graphic violence, and more imagination, and you have something
approaching HELLRAISER.  The story deals with a man who bought an ornate
puzzle box.  The box seems to be the key to a universe of sex and torture.
At least I think that was what it was.  Things are just not very clear.
Barker, who is usually a good story-teller, just fails to do a very good job
of story-telling.  Instead the film devolves into a sequence of imaginative
gross-out scenes with some very spare connective tissue.  Nothing makes a
whole lot of sense and there is little point in asking, "If that guy is
really the king of the dead, or whatever he is, why does he have his head
marked up like a Rand McNally globe and why has he driven all those nails in
his head?  Does he just think it looks 'punk'?"
     HELLRAISER must be the ultimate of some kind of film.  Whatever it is,
it certainly is very much what it is.  If you like the sort of thing that
HELLRAISER is, you're sure going to love this film.  And you might want to
get some therapy while you are at it.  I guess I'd give HELLRAISER a 0 on
the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Ladri di saponette (1989)
          Capsule review:  A satire on how films are treated on
     television becomes a weird fantasy, not totally original but
     surprisingly creative.  Rating: high +1 (-4 to +4).  (Note:
     heavy spoilers follow the first paragraph.)
     Italian actor, screenwriter, and director Maurizio Nichetti is probably
more recognizable by sight than by name to most American audiences.
Nichetti plays a little artists with a big (false) moustache in the
international hit ALLEGRO NON TROPPO.  That film was directed by Bruno
Bozetto, but now Nichetti is very much an auteur, writing and directing THE
ICICLE THIEF in which he himself plays the two main roles.  The subject of
the film, at least for a while, is what commercial television does to a
film.  The title is a reference to Vittorio De Sica's BICYCLE THIEF with
part missing, just as films are shown on television with part missing.  The
title, of course, works only once it has been translated into English,
indicating the film is aimed for an international market, which indeed it
has gotten.  As the film opens, Nichetti, playing himself, arrives at a
television station to host his own film, THE ICICLE THIEF.  We see the chaos
at the station, we see a typical family watching the film, and in black and
white we see the film itself.  What the television station does to the film
is the springboard (but only a springboard) for the pandemonium that is to
follow.  This is an innovative and at times very funny film.  I rate it a
high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     While it is not entirely a new idea, Nichetti very cleverly mixes the
three levels of the film with a fourth level, the commercials.  At one time
it was very common to have cross-over elements between the text of a radio
or television play and the commercials.  The FCC decided this was a
deceptive practice and made it illegal, though radio disk jockeys commonly
violate the rule.  There have been many times when usually disjoint planes
such as audience and actors interact in live plays and in fantasy films such
as THE PURPLE ROSE OF CAIRO.  In this case of the film characters, the
director, the people in the commercials, and the audience, five of the six
pairings of planes do take place.  Characters from the film at some point
find themselves in commercials, talking to the director, and even once
looking out from the television to see what the audience is doing.  The
missing pairing is that at no point does there seem to be any sort of
unexpected meeting between the audience and the characters in the
commercials.
     The use of color is singularly impressive, perhaps more so than the
script itself.  This is true not just in the amazing scene in which a
scantily-clad commercial actress breaks into the film world and has her
color wiped off by Antonio as her dries her off.  There is also use of
subtle color shifts throughout the black-and-white sequences to simulate the
variable film stock available in post-war Italy when THE BICYCLE THIEF was
made.
     Where Nichetti falls down most is in his acting of Antonio, the poor
laborer in the internal film.  Had Nichetti captured some of the tragic
desperation of Lamberto Maggiorani's performance in THE BICYCLE THIEF, it
would have strengthened the humor by contrast.  It would also have
demonstrated some depth in Nichetti's acting ability.  He may have felt such
a somber note had no place in a light comedy, but if so, it was a serious
lack of vision.  His failure to put any meat in his performance of Antonio
is the weakest point of an otherwise creative film.

Title
Review for Schindler's List (1993)
     The people who are most revered by the Jewish religion are the great
rabbis and the righteous non-Jews who have risked their lives to save the
lives of Jews.  Unfortunately, history provides ample opportunity for people
to enter the latter category.  One of the greatest of that category was
Oskar Schindler.  He was a real person made famous, or more famous, as the
main character of Thomas Keneally's novel SCHINDLER'S LIST, now adapted for
the screen by Steven Zaillian and directed by Steven Spielberg.
     The Austrian-born Schindler (his home town of Zwittau became part of
Czechoslovakia in 1918) was a self-styled tycoon, a playboy, and an
aristocrat who early in World War II had a scheme to make money in the
recently conquered Poland using Jewish slave labor leased to him by the SS.
The Jews would be willing to work for him, he reasoned, because it really
was in their best interest to be paid off in tradable goods.  Later the
reason became that work is preferable to extermination.  These Jews are
rounded up and sent to Plaszow Forced Labor Camp, so Schindler moves his
operation closer to the camp, actually creating a sub-camp to save lives
within a camp intended to destroy them.  His manufacturing is able to save
most the "Schindler Jews" from being ground up in the worst excesses of the
Holocaust, but not from witnessing them.  So from their point of view we can
see both the best and the worst in people of that time.  And with
Spielberg's startling camera work making extensive use of hand-held cameras
for a feel of immediacy, we witness the excesses also--admittedly toned down
but still shocking.
     At first Schindler's motives are callous exploitation of the condition
of the Jews.  As he explains, if he is going to get labor he would rather
pay the SS for Jewish slaves than hire Poles.  "Poles cost more," he says
simply.  Though Schindler's motives are part selfishness and part humanity,
the audience and probably Schindler himself never know just how much of
each.  And often just when the audience thinks it knows, the rug will be
pulled out.  After a last-instant rescue of his Jewish accountant, Schindler
turns angrily on the poor man asking him "If I were five minutes later, then
where would I be?"
     I think not even the mammoth documentary SHOAH has more vividly shown
the real horror of the Holocaust.  Documentaries do not have the latitude to
expand on people's personalities and involve the viewer in the lives of the
characters to the degree a drama does.  We see in the film a situation in
which people who want to live have no formula, no possible strategy, that
will save them.  In our own times even those who claim to know God's will
give you a formula for salvation.  Nazis would murder people because they
were uncooperative and they would murder people because they were too
cooperative.  There is no way to act or behave that could reliably increase
your chances of survival.  Schindler sees all this and as one of the few
people who can influence Goeth, the commandant of Plaszow, he cleverly
manipulates him to save a few lives.  Schindler treads a dangerous tightrope
always appearing to be acting in his own selfish interest and hiding an
ulterior motive of doing good, apparently often hiding it even from himself.
He is a living contraction to his own philosophy that war never brings out
the good in men, only the bad.
     Spielberg's style has been criticized for getting in the way of the
storytelling, but I did not find myself at all bothered by stylistic
touches.  At times he is even fairly inventive.  During moments of chaos he
will show a montage of apparently random scenes, yet the viewer can pick out
scenes to form small sub-stories.  Spielberg plays with shadow and light
throughout the film.  He focuses in on the smoke from a Shabbos candle and
later on the smoke and ash of the chimney at Auschwitz.  Most of the film is
black and white and that helps to build the atmosphere and gives his visual
images a sharper edge.  When there is violence it really is more shocking in
black and white in part because it does not compete with any number of gory
color films.  Blood is still disturbing when seen in black and white.  The
use of monochrome also allows Spielberg to highlight a point of attention in
a scene much as color was used in ZENTROPA.  In a scene of chaos Schindler's
eye follows one little girl and so does ours because her red coat is the
only piece of color in the scenes.  Unfortunately the film stocks are not
quite matched and one can always tell when Spielberg is about to use a color
effect.
     In some ways the script of the film is more subtle than the novel.  In
an early scene we overhear a small part of a conversation.  "They always
weather the storm," someone says.  In the novel the same phrase is used
saying to whom the word "they" refers.  However, the meaning still comes
across in the film without spelling it out for the viewer.  Small details of
people's reaction to what was happening and details of what people had to do
to survive have never been better depicted in a film.
     Liam Neeson's performance certainly will be noticed as the aristocratic
and enigmatic altruist, Schindler.  But in 195 minutes there is not one
single bad performance.  Ralph Fiennes's Goeth is a vicious child, killing
people like a little boy shoots down plastic Indians.  Ben Kingsley as
Itzhak Stern is small and mousey, constantly on edge.  He is no stranger to
stories of the Holocaust having played Simon Weisenthal on HBO's film THE
MURDERERS AMONG US.  Apparently this gave him the opportunity to begin a
relationship with Weisenthal and Holocaust survivors allowing him to prepare
for this role.
     In the English language words get deflated from over-use.  The word
"genocide" gets applied to many political situations that fall far short of
true genocide.  And the word "searing" applied to a drama is also overused.
If you want to see a genuinely searing drama or to understand the true
meaning of genocide, this is the film to experience.  For twenty-one years I
have considered A MAN FOR ALL SEASONS to be the best film I had ever seen.
I have never said any other film was better in all that time.  I do not
change that choice lightly, but I now think that SCHINDLER'S LIST is the
best film I have ever seen.

Title
Review for Shakespeare in Love (1998)
     It is 1593 and London has two competing theaters, each with a
favorite playwright.  The Curtain features the plays of Christopher
Marlowe, acknowledged to be the greatest playwright of the day.  The
Rose had a once promising young man who after about ten plays was
coming to the end of his creativity.  This is William Shakespeare
(Joseph Fiennes).  As we join the film Shakespeare's love life is in a
shambles as he is totally blocked from writing.  Not that it matters
because the theaters have been closed due to the plague. That may be
for the best as Shakespeare has promised his new play to both theaters.
That play, barely begun, being "Romeo and Ethel, the Pirate's
Daughter."
     Shakespeare cannot write, having had only the minimal experience
at love he got from a loveless marriage. But a woman is about to come
into his life.  Shakespeare sees Viola De Lesseps  (Gwyneth Paltrow)
and falls in love with her beauty.  Meanwhile it turns out that Viola
is a great fan of Shakespeare and the theater in general.  When the
theaters are reopened, due to only the most venal of reasons, Viola
gives in to temptation, defies the conventions of her time, disguises
herself as a man, and becomes an actor. Shakespeare finds the woman he
loves and begins an affair with her, ignoring the fact that she is
betrothed. When Viola auditions disguised as a man she is promptly cast
not as Juliet, but as Romeo in the play that seems to be written scene
by scene only one day, or often only hours, before it is rehearsed.
Shakespeare finds can write again now that he has something to write
about, his love of Viola, and his wild lovemaking during off moments of
the rehearsals.  The play Romeo and Ethel, the Pirate's Daughter begins
to take shape and is transformed from the comedy everybody has been
expecting into the Romeo and Juliet we know.  Of course the creative
process is not without some help from Shakespeare's friends.  We see
Shakespeare's talent for pumping Christopher Marlowe and others for
ideas and character names.
     It should be noted that many of the fine details of this story are
carefully researched and there are references to real people and
events.  In fact, it is mainly the plot as a whole that is completely
absurd.  The story of Romeo and Juliet was popular long before
Shakespeare's time.  And it did not involve Ethel, the Pirate's
daughter.  Shakespeare's plays are almost exclusively adaptations of
pre-existing tales.  Scholars tell us that "The Tempest" was
Shakespeare's only original story.  (I am not sure how much
consideration they have given to "The Merry Wives of Windsor,"
essentially a sitcom written solely to reuse the popular character
Falstaff.)  This story of how Shakespeare's version of Romeo and Juliet
came to be written is obviously a complete fiction.  Unfortunately,
this means that any facts that one does glean about the period or about
Shakespeare from this film should be regarded as being highly suspect.
John Webster, seen here as a boy with rather gruesome tastes in drama,
is probably the playwright who went on to write plays like "The Duchess
of Malfi."  I do not know if there is any evidence that he knew
Shakespeare.  There clearly are Flintstone-esque anachronisms in the
play like the odd proto-psychiatrist that Shakespeare sees.
     The screenplay for SHAKESPEARE IN LOVE is by Marc Norman and Tom
Stoppard.  Much of the screenplay shows Stoppard's sense of humor as
shown in other Stoppard plays like "Rosenkrantz and Guildenstern are
Dead."  The writers even have the audacity to write a little of its own
Shakespearean prose and wordplay.
     Fiennes and Paltrow are supported by a prestige cast including
Geoffrey Rush of SHINE, Ben Affleck of GOOD WILL HUNTING, Judi Dench of
MRS. BROWN (who is also the new M in the James Bond series), Colin
Firth of THE ENGLISH PATIENT, Simon Callow of FOUR WEDDINGS AND A
FUNERAL, Jim Carter of RICHARD III, and Tom Wilkinson of THE FULL
MONTY.  Director John Madden is the veteran of MRS. BROWN and episodes
of the BBC adaptations of SHERLOCK HOLMES (with Jeremy Brett as
Holmes).
     SHAKESPEARE IN LOVE is a frothy and fun look at the bard and his
times, but is not to be taken too seriously.  One does not have to be a
fan of Shakespeare to enjoy it, but bardophiles will get more out of
it. It gets 8 on the 0 to 10 scale and a high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for I.Q. (1994)
     If you enjoyed seeing a Tyrannosaurus Rex turned into a big purple
plush toy named Barney, you have what it takes to appreciate seeing
another giant of bygone science, Albert Einstein, turned into a big,
lovable, avuncular pushover in I.Q.  In fact, you will see not just
Einstein, but Godel and Podolsky as lovable old gentlemen who play
Cupid for Einstein's mathematician niece Catherine Boyd (played by Meg
Ryan) and an auto mechanic Ed Walters (Tim Robbins).  Ed is the last
side in a love triangle.  Boyd is already planning to marry James
Morland (Stephen Fry, who currently plays Jeeves on PBS).  Morland isa
psychologist who performs sadistic experiments on animal and human
subjects and his lab is rarely without the sound of some moaning
subject of his experimentation.  I think the viewer is not supposed to
like Morland.  Walters falls in love with Boyd in a chance meeting with
her.  He begins courting her, and as an experiment, Einstein and some
of his cronies decide to help him.  They decide they have to make an
expert in auto mechanics seem on a par with the experts in quantum
mechanics.
     The first step is to convince Boyd that Walters is more
intelligent than your average auto repairman.  This goes disastrously
awry and it is not long before Walters is presenting papers on "cold
fusion" and interstellar drives to the Princeton Institute of Advanced
Studies.  Soon the joke has taken on national political significance.
     Ryan was an interesting choice to play a mathematician and
Einstein's niece.  While she does not look Jewish as presumably
Einstein's niece would, her quirky acting style, somewhat toned down in
this performance, could easily be attributable to a sort of nervous
energy that someone of high intelligence might have.  Robbins, on the
other hand, always seems a little snide and at the best of times is
never particularly likable in his films.  He and Ryan just do not play
well off of each other.  Surprisingly, Walter Matthau is not too
unbelievable as Albert Einstein.  Some of his dialogue could be more
believable, but the real Einstein apparently did have a child-like,
fun-loving nature as exemplified by famous photos of him riding a small
bicycle and of him sticking his tongue out to make faces for news
cameras.  Walter Matthau's brand of sly humor is not an unreasonable
depiction.
     The real problem with I.Q. is that the script was not ready to
film.  Particularly late in the story, the storytelling becomes a
little cryptic.  Ryan's character makes a deduction that is supposedly
explained by a comment she makes, but it is not clear how.  There are
notable anachronisms.  The film supposedly takes place prior to
Einstein's death, making it April 1955 at the latest, yet the dialogue
uses terms like "mind-meld," "cold fusion," and "space race" that were
not coined while Einstein was alive.  In one sequence we see Walters
and Boyd looking at a perfectly clear sky full of stars, yet less than
three minutes later the script calls for a pouring rain that lasts the
rest of the evening.  A sequence at the very end of the film is
incredibly contrived.  These are all very amateurish script problems
that seem to indicate a rush job.
     On the other hand, where one would expect the script to most fall
down--its depiction of scientists talking shop--is not as bad as it
might have been.  It is not easy for a non-genius to write dialogue
supposedly spoken by a genius.  It could be better here, but some of
the dialogue does deal with the right sorts of issues.  Godel gives an
argument that time does not exist that is easily countered and unworthy
of the real Godel.  But generally the issues discussed are not too
unrealistic.
     I.Q. is directed by Australian Fred Schepisi, who most recently
directed SIX DEGREES OF SEPARATION.  The film has a nice look with the
camera work by Ian Baker, but not a look that bears close examination.
Princeton in late March and early April seems unseasonably pleasant.
Meg Ryan wears mostly sun dresses at a time of year when most of the
rest of us in New Jersey would still be dressing warmly.  The cars on
the road seem mostly large and with prominent fins.  Even if the film
is set as late as 1955 this seems unlikely.  (As a side note, Fred
Schepisi apparently always uses Baker for cinematography.  This is
their eleventh film together of the eleven that Schepisi has directed
and the twelve that Baker has filmed.)
     In short, this is a film with some pretty sloppy filmmaking, a
romance with little chemistry, and a few pieces of reasonable humor.
Mostly it is on the level of a TV situation comedy.  I rate it a flat 0
on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for State and Main (2000)
     David Mamet originally came to the public's attention by
writing stories of hucksters and con men and corporate crime.  He
wrote stories like his mysterious play "The Water Engine," HOUSE OF
GAMES, and the Runyonesque THINGS CHANGE.  The man is a writer and a
director, and he wrote about crime as a personal interest.  Now he
has written a film about con men he really knows.  His STATE AND
MAIN in a large part about a con man a director and a nearly honest
and innocent writer coming to conflict over an adaptation of the
writer's play.  Mamet has sprinkled in a number of other characters
from film-making but he has written about things close to his own
experience.  The result is a sort of madcap comedy in which Mamet
the director gets to argue with Mamet the writer in the middle of
the chaos of making a film.
     Mamet gives us a view of the film-making process as being one
large, crazy circus.  The film the film company has come to town to
shoot is THE OLD MILL.  They had already been ready to film it in
New Hampshire and had a great mill set they actually built, but
something happened and, well, now they are filming in Waterford,
Vermont, instead.  Waterford was chosen because of its classic old
mill.  Unfortunately, they are not going to be able to use the mill
because, well, something else happened.  Now they are madly trying
to make things fit.
     At the center of the chaos, and few films make the film-making
process such a storm of chaos, is Walt Price (played by William H.
Macy) the Machiavellian director who will do absolutely whatever is
necessary to have a film all shot when the storm dies down.  Part
con man, part genius he jumps from one crisis to the next in
seconds, frequently changing his personality to fit the
circumstance.  The writer, Joseph Turner White (at last a starring
role for Philip Seymour Hoffman), would like to have Price's film be
at least reminiscent of the script he had written for it and the
play it was based on.  Meanwhile White finds himself attracted to
Ann Black (Mamet regular Rebecca Pidgeon), a townie who had read his
play and actually seems to understand it better than he does
himself.
     Meanwhile in the background the other cast and crew members are
adding to the confusion.  Adding to the confusion is a lead actress
(Sarah Jessica Parker) who has found religion and refuses to shoot
her nude scene and a heartthrob lead actor (Alec Baldwin) with a
predilection for strong drink and under-age girls.  Add to the mix a
totally unscrupulous producer (David Paymer) with a goal to save
money wherever he can and nearly as clever at getting what he wants
as Price is.  But the film has a large cast and several stories are
working themselves out at the same time.
     As is frequently the case, Mamet has carefully crafted a script
with a plethora of clever touches.  The film being made is based on
a play of pretentious claptrap, yet most of the themes of that play
are exemplified, and probably better, in the film STATE AND MAIN
itself.  The issues that the play is about are also the issues that
the filmmakers have to face.  Several of the decisions about the
film being made seem to be mirrored in the outer film.  Mamet
demonstrates a flair for one-liners that few of his previous films
have demonstrated.  The film is a treasure chest of running gags and
self-referential jokes.  Mamet's dialog is well-delivered if not
entirely realistic and believable.
     STATE AND MAIN covers territory previously covered by films
about shooting films like DAY FOR NIGHT and LIVING IN OBLIVION and
to a lessor extent films about the industry like THE BIG PICTURE and
THE PLAYER.  Still the script is one of the better ones of the pack.
I rate it 8 on the 0 to 10 scale and a high +2 on the -4 to +4
scale.  And trust me on this one: you want to stay through the end
credits.
     Now I have done it.  I am going to get a bunch of people
writing me saying they walked out on the credits and asking what
they missed.  Do not read the following until you have seen the
film.  Here are jokes in the credits rotated 13 letters (rot13):
     1. Gur pybfvat perqvgf fbat vf "Gur Byq Zvyy."  Jura vg vf bire
lbh urne n ibvpr pbzr ba vasbezvat gur fvatre gurl ryvzvangrq gur
zvyy sebz gur svyz naq unir gb guebj bhg gur fbat.
     2. N zrffntr fnlf "N yvfg bs gur Nffbpvngr Cebqhpref sbe guvf
svyz vf ninvynoyr ba erdhrfg."
     3. Na bssvpvny ybbxvat pregvsvpngr sebz gur uhznar fbpvrgl
nffherf hf gung bayl *2* navznyf jrer unezrq va gur znxvat bs guvf
cvpgher.  (N yngre fgngrzrag fnlf gung npghnyyl abar jrer unezrq.)

Title
Review for Fallen (1998)
     Things are indeed rather dangerous for police homicide detective
John Hobbes, played by Denzel Washington, who begins the film saying
"Let me tell you about the time I almost died."  Hobbes is the
detective who caught the serial killer Edgar Reese (played by Elia
Koteas).  Reese seems mightily unconcerned to be heading into the gas
chamber.  Besides merrily singing "Time Is On My Side," he wildly
shakes Washington's hand and babbles in some gibberish language.  He
may be the most cheerful soul who was ever strapped into this gas
chamber and executed.  Then in an unexplained shot we seem to see
Reese's viewpoint rise from the body and settle into a guard.  Reese's
murder spree should be over.  Unfortunately the killings stubbornly
refuse to stop complete with Reese's particular trademarks.  Hobbes and
his partner Jonesy (John Goodman) have to figure out why.  At the
murder scenes now there start appearing for Hobbes clues left in the
form of riddles.  The clues seem to point at a previous case involving
a policeman named Milano who turned murderer and eventually committed
suicide.  Hobbes wants to find out more about this case and questions
the dead officer's daughter (Embeth Davidtz) who has since become a
religious fanatic, surrounding herself with images of angels.  Hobbes
investigates the cabin that was the site of the Milano suicide and
finds the name of a demon painted on the wall.
     Some aspects of this film are done very nicely.  Tom Sigel's
photography creates a nice somber mood of doom and dread.  His previous
work includes THE USUAL SUSPECTS and BLOOD AND WINE.  Sigel creates a
tone to his photography effectively.  Nicholas Kazan has a good ear for
dialog which director Gregory Hoblit brings out, most noticeable as
Hobbes and Jonesy discuss the case.  But the story is really a patching
together of familiar ideas from other police thrillers and even some
science fiction films.  As is all too frequent in films, the real
killer is much to anxious to strut his stuff and reveals much too much
to the police.  Presumably the killer wants to give the police a
handicap to make the game more interesting for himself, rubbing their
noses in the fact that they cannot stop him, but it is too common a
device to advance the plot.  Also too common are "false alarm" scenes
intended to make the viewer jump.  These touches in the script are
signs of weak writing.
     Denzel Washington does a competent job here, but he brings nothing
to his part any other capable actor could not have.  On the positive
side, there in nothing in the script that draws attention to the fact
that the character is black.  It is simply cast with a black man; it is
not a black role.  But Washington could have done a lot more with it.
The real acting honors in this film go to John Goodman who takes the
role of partner and invests it with real personality.  Donald
Sutherland is there being officious and just slightly sinister, a role
that he can manage in his sleep.  Embeth Davidtz gives her character a
certain vulnerable courage.  Davidtz formerly played Helen Hirsch in
SCHINDLER'S LIST and has understandably not found a role of such
substance since.
     FALLEN is something of a hybrid film which probably falls more
into the camp of the horror film than that of the police drama, though
it rarely approaches anything really frightening.  One very nice
sequence has the killer demonstrating his abilities to Hobbes through
the use of innocent bystanders.  It is perhaps the most effective scene
of the film, giving the homicide detective and the viewer a feel for
how difficult the killer will be to catch.  Not everything in this film
works as well as it might, but FALLEN does build to a nice keep-em-
guessing finale.  I rate this film a 6 on the 0 to 10 scale and a high
+1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Mac (1992)
          Capsule review:  John Turturro plays a character based
     on his own father in a film he directs and also co-wrote.
     Turturro proves that the lives of a family of carpenters is
     no less interesting than the lives of a family of criminals.
     Surprisingly entertaining.  Rating: low +2 (-4 to +4).
     The vast majority of employed people in this country have rarely, if
ever, seen someone in the same occupation portrayed in the movies.  There
are maybe fifty or so professions that show up in films and fewer that have
a major part in the plot of the film.  Presumably from the filmmakers'
viewpoint, other professions just are not dramatic.  But, in fact, many
people's stories are dramatic and they do take risks, have dreams, and in
general have stories worth telling.  John Turturro's father, Nicholas
Turturro, built houses.  In the family his adventures in that profession
made interesting conversation, but could the story be transferred to film in
a way that would make anyone want to come to see the film?  John Turturro
apparently thought so, and proves his point with MAC.
     John Turturro plays Niccolo "Mac" Vitelli, a carpenter and brother to
two carpenters and the son of a third.  Mac's father is a genuine craftsman,
but the three brothers work for a Polish builder who takes no pride in work
and who looks for shortcuts to cheat the customer.  Mac gets fed up and,
together with his brothers Vito (played by Michael Badalucco) and Bruno
(played by Carl Capotorto), forms a partnership to compete with his old
boss.  Mac has an eye for detail and assembles a team of quality builders,
but financial problems follow and haunt him.  Even worse, Mac's explosive
temper more than once nearly ruins the family's dreams.  The film also
focuses on the private lives of the brothers.  Mac finds a wife (played by
Katherine Borowitz), but Vito and Bruno both like an attractive beatnik
(played by Ellen Barkin).
     While the screenplay by Turturro and Branden Cole is episodic, it is
nevertheless surprisingly intriguing.  In fact, for interest value MAC holds
it own against films about men building their dreams like BUGSY or TUCKER,
even though the main character has nowhere near the notoriety that Bugsy
Siegel or even Preston Tucker had.  The film has a nice portrait of an
Italian-American family in the 1940 and 1950s.  Turturro plays his role with
an intensity bordering on over-acting at times.  Still, this is an
intelligent treatment of a story unlikely to be made into a film.  I give
this one a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Scenes from a Mall (1991)
     Somebody once told me they thought they could listen to and watch Woody
Allen reading white pages out of the phone book and it would be funny.  His
facial expressions are just so funny that anything he does is just naturally
hilarious.  Bette Midler can also be very funny.  So the question is, how
long can this couple play a loving and quarreling couple walking around a
mall and still carry the film on their innate cuteness.  Well, based on the
results in Paul Mazursky's SCENES FROM A MALL, the two of them might be able
to carry the premise for up to about ten minutes.  After that, they
definitely need an assist from a script and the script in SCENES FROM A MALL
by Roger Simon and director Mazursky does little to help.  At least it does
little unless you think that everything connected with Beverly Hills is
really cute.  If your idea of a good joke is seeing a line of cars with each
driver talking on a cellular phone, perhaps you will enjoy this film, but I
would bet you will find far more on-target and funny in L.A. STORY.
     On their sixteenth wedding anniversary, lovey-dovey couple Nick (played
by Woody Allen) and Deborah (played by Bette Midler) go to a mall on an
errand.  There they get into a fight over fidelity and decide to break up.
They reconcile and decide they still love each other.  They fight again and
break up.  Then they get together again.  Can you figure the plot from that
point on?  Yes, I thought you could.  All this fighting and loving is done
in front of random strangers.  That's what there is.  It is a film with a
beginning and a middle, but no end.  It is just arbitrarily cut off at the
end of a cycle.  It would be one thing if these people were at least great
conversationalists.  But this is no MY DINNER WITH ANDRE.  About all you
learn from the conversation is that these are two very ordinary and
superficial people.  Do you really care where they got their roll-top desk
and which of them is going to get it in the divorce settlement?  I know I do
not.  You could easily save the admission price by going to your local mall
and eavesdropping on the people there.
     There are some things that Mazursky is more anxious to show us than
others.  We do get to see the names of a lot of stores at the mall, many of
which--surprise! surprise!--are chains that you might find at your own local
mall.  How fortuitous for the financing of the film!  Considerably less care
is taken to show us what the characters are doing with their packages.  At
one point each has bought a complete change of clothes which they are
wearing.  No explanation is given for what happened to the clothes they had
been wearing.  I guess in Beverly Hills, everything you own is considered
disposable.
     If you genuinely find great humor in the awkward situation of seeing
adults argue in public, this predominantly one-joke comedy might be for you.
If not, it offers you surprisingly little considering the names involved.  I
give it a -1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Hear My Song (1991)
     ear My Song is the first film directed by Peter Chelsom.  It is based
on a screenplay Chelsom co-authored with Adrian Dunbar, the actor who plays
the film's main character.  It is a spectacular start for two major talents.
British Chelsom is starting out with more talent than 90% of American
directors and with a skill that it took Bill Forsyth two or three films to
attain.  I choose Forsyth because Chelsom and Forsyth are both British and
each has a loving feel for the personalities of minor characters and local
color.  HEAR MY SONG is constantly doing the unexpected.  Only in the last
ten minutes does the film get a bit sugary.
     Mickey O'Neill (played by Dunbar) is a thirty-year-old concert promoter
in an Irish neighborhood in England.  He wants little more from life than to
put on successful concerts and to woo his girlfriend Nancy.  Tara
Fitzgerald, who plays Nancy, has the sort of pristine beauty that Grace
Kelly had.  There is absolutely no need for the film to explain why Mickey
is anxious to win Nancy.  Mickey, however, is having problems, both with
Nancy and with his promotions.  He finds himself promoting sleazier and
sleazier singers to ever-shrinking audiences.  Then he manages to book a
legendary Irish singer who has been a tax exile from England since 1958.
That sparks unexpected events and a quest in Ireland.
     Chelsom's style of story-telling is brisk and usually intelligent.
Plot details are not overly explained.  Some concentration is required and
there is the feeling that the plot could take a right-angle turn at any
moment.  Unusual camera angles abound.  Chelsom and Dunbar pack the film
with comic situations and dialogue.  Some mention should be made of the
films only two recognizable stars.  Top billing goes to Ned Beatty as a
reclusive Irishman who could be the key to Mickey's success.  His singing is
one of the few negative touches as his singing voice--dubbed by Vernon
Midgley--just does not seem to go with his speaking voice.  David McCallum
is largely wasted as a police inspector and as a heavy.

Title
Review for Mr. Holland's Opus (1995)
     I greatly respect for the teaching profession, though I cannot say
the same of all films made about teaching.  We see a lot of films about
the teaching profession and with a few notable exceptions (much notably
THE PRIME OF MISS JEAN BRODIE), they generally make the teacher a hero.
Teacher-hero stories fall into two different categories.  One is the
"flashbulb" sort of story, the other is the "candle."  Flashbulb
teacher films generally cover one semester.  They have a new teacher
come in and be faced with a nearly impossible situation.  Either the
students are totally establishment thinkers, the classroom is in total
anarchy, or the students are treated by school officials as if they
have the intelligence of water fowl.  The teacher comes in, bringing
with him or her the word that there is a world out there of knowledge
and culture.  Then in one quick semester the new erudition transforms
the lives of the students.  Example of this sort of film include DEAD
POETS SOCIETY, RENAISSANCE MAN, TO SIR WITH LOVE, and STAND AND
DELIVER.  The teacher has brought enlightenment in one quick flash.
This is rarely how the teaching profession operates.
     Not as common, because they are generally less dramatic, are the
films in which the teacher deals with many classes of students over a
long period of time.  This sort of film is much more realistic.  Rather
than as a flash of enlightenment, the teacher has been there as a
source of culture for generations of students and, like the candle, the
more that is given the less there is left for the teacher himself.
Often the teacher has wondered if it has all mattered or not and his or
her efforts have made a difference.  But in the end the teacher who may
even consider himself or herself as a failure comes to realize the deep
respect that the effort has brought.  This sort of film is a little
more realistic.  It includes GOODBYE, MR. CHIPS; GOOD MORNING, MISS
DOVE; and the latest along these lines, MR. HOLLAND'S OPUS.  In 1964
Richard Dreyfuss is a young musician and would-be composer who, in
order to keep food on the table, takes a job as the high school music
teacher of the newly-renamed John F. Kennedy High School.  He finds the
faculty unfriendly and unwelcoming and the students completely
indifferent to the history of music.  The school band makes a noise
about as pleasant as the sound of a dentist's drill.  He also has to
admit his teaching is uninspired and unsuccessful.  Eventually Holland
decides that if his students cannot relate to Bach, he should try rock
and roll and from there slowly he makes headway.  The film follows
Mr. Holland's life in and out of school.  What he first thought of asa
temporary teaching job that would give him the leisure to compose his
own music instead soaks up all of his time for more than three decades
of his life.  He is able to overcome most obstacles by being well-
meaning and being willing to put in the effort.  The film concentrates
on Holland's relationship with his wife, with his deaf son, with the
buzz-cut assistant principal (William H. Macy), with legions of
talentless students and one very talented singer, and especially with
himself and his dream of composing.  The story of his career for more
than three decades of teaching are shown in about two and a half hours
as a diverse and diffuse mosaic.  Some of the scenes are overly
emotional, but for the most part the film retains an air of
authenticity until the last ten minutes.   The film tries too hard to
have a big finish and spoils much of its credibility.
     Dreyfuss is an accomplished actor, but a lot of accomplished
actors have played teachers.  However, one thing that set Dreyfuss
apart is that he really looked like a high school teacher.  Instead of
handsome and dynamic, he looks very average, the model of what viewers
will remember their teachers looked like.  Because there are a lot of
different relationships in this film, we see considerably less of any
of the other characters.  Glenne Headly is believable but not memorable
as the long suffering Mrs. Holland who only occasionally shows a
resentment that her husband allows himself to be consumed by his job.
The film was written by Patrick Duncan, who wrote and directed 84
CHARLIE MOPIC and wrote A HOME OF OUR OWN.  Director Stephen Herek
seems to have learned a lot about how schools run since he directed
BILL AND TED'S EXCELLENT ADVENTURE.  More recently he directed THE
MIGHTY DUCKS and THE THREE MUSKETEERS.  The film is a little on the
manipulative side, but it should be an audience pleaser.  I give it a
low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Gojira (1954)
     With the release of GODZILLA 2000, there have been a number of
reviewers mentioning the first Godzilla film, both the Japanese
version GOJIRA and the re-cut American version GODZILLA, KING OF THE
MONSTERS.  The web has, however, very few reviews of the original
film.
     GODZILLA really has to be seen as two very different films.
You have to see the film as it was released in the United States,
and you have to see through that to the original Japanese film.  The
Japanese film, made as an imitation of THE BEAST FROM 20,000
FATHOMS, turned into a fairly serious allegory of the close of the
Second World War and the fear of nuclear weapons.  This was in part
because of timing.  The film was made just after a Japanese fishing
boat had strayed into the waters where the hydrogen bomb had been
tested.  The fish they caught were radioactive but were still
allowed to be sold in Japan.  When the Japanese found out that
dangerous radioactive fish had been sold to unsuspecting citizens
they blamed the United States and they called the incident Americas
third atomic attack on Japan.  The script is also is an exploration
of the theme of the responsibility of the scientist to the world and
an indictment of the developers of the atomic bomb.  So the plot of
BEAST FROM 20,000 FATHOMS, the indignity over the fishing incident,
and festering anger over the use of nuclear weapons in the war all
came together into a story of a primordial evil coming out of the
sea.
     The American version crudely interpolates American reporter
Steve Martin (played by Raymond Burr) into the story.  The scenes
with Burr are obviously of a different film stock and have no
overlapping characters whose faces are seen.  Actually the
characters of Emiko Yamane is both in scenes with Martin and
without, but when she is with Martin her back is to the camera and
her blouse is a different plaid.  Clearly another woman stood in and
the filmmakers could not quite match the blouse material.  Martin
appears to be in several of the key points of activity as the
Japanese react to the attack of the monster, without ever really
participating much in the action except to throw in occasional
comments like "I can't believe what just happened."
     For the plot here I will describe the American version, though
there are some differences in order of events.  (For example, the
Japanese version is not told in flashback like the American version
is.)  The film opens looking at the destruction that has been
wrought on Tokyo.  It looks like it was intended to suggest that a
nuclear blast has taken place.  That was probably not the intent of
the original film, since it does not have this opening sequence.
Journalist Martin was on his way by plane to cover another story.
During a layover in Japan to visit a school friend, Dr. Serizawa, he
is called in and questioned if he saw any anything unusual from his
plane.  Ships from the Japanese fishing fleet have been
disappearing.  Sometimes they get off distress calls that say
mysterious things like the "ocean has exploded."  (That is actually
a very powerful image, by the way.)
     Soon the mystery seems to be centering around Odo Island, near
to all the disasters.  There the natives have worshiped a terrible
god who has lived in the sea.  They call him Godzilla.  Scientists
go to Odo Island to discover if there could be some connection
between the island and the disasters.  While they are there
something very like a storm destroys half the island.  But it is a
funny kind of a storm that is oddly destructive.  It destroys their
helicopter as if it were a toy (which with the low-budget special
effects is exactly what it looks like).  The natives think the
island was attacked by their deity.
     A ship full of scientists, headed by Emiko's father,
paleontologist Dr. Yamane (Takashi Shimura), comes to investigate
the island and discover radioactive remains from the storm.  Finally
the island deity shows himself in clear weather, a four-hundred-foot
dinosaur, a survivor from two million [sic] years ago.  (The
Japanese version says he is two hundred feet.)  He has lived in the
sea for all human memory, but now nuclear testing has goosed him up,
made him radioactive, and he wants to wreak revenge on the world.
     Godzilla dodges the depth charges of the Japanese fleet and
makes his way to Tokyo harbor.  Then he comes ashore twice, laying
waste to the city in two very nicely filmed sequences.  Up to these
sequences we have seen little of the monster and after we will see
little, but these two sequences are supremely powerfully filmed.
     Meanwhile we learn that Emiko has been promised to Dr. Serizawa
but is actually in love with Ogata, a young navy officer.  Serizawa
has his own problems and is not very interested in Emiko.  He has
developed a powerful weapon that could kill Godzilla, but to use it
would mean revealing it to the world.  Being a moral Japanese,
unlike immoral American scientists, he believes that the discoverer
has responsibility to be certain that his discoveries are not used
for evil purposes.  Serizawa has revealed the weapon to Emiko and
she has told Ogata.  Serizawa must weigh his fears against what
Godzilla is already doing to Tokyo.  (Ogata argues that Serizawa
should use the weapon.  You have your fears, which may become
reality.  And you have Godzilla, which is reality.)  Serizawa must
resolve his moral dilemma.
     Sometimes the lack of a budget can work in the favor of a film.
GODZILLA certainly benefits from the low budget of some of its
production.  The scenes of the attacks on Tokyo have a sort of
crudeness that in black and white, a little fuzzy, gives them an
almost documentary quality.  Scenes of the great beast are almost
always shot from a low angle, looking upward.  Why this approach was
abandoned in later Godzilla films is unclear, but the size of the
creature is emphasized in a way that would be difficult in a color
film.  Filming in color at eye level just does not convey the threat
and no other film has ever made a giant monster as frightening.
     Some of the best effects were found by chance.  The model steel
towers melted under the hot studio lights.  They were remade and the
effect of their melting was combined with an aerosol spray in
Godzilla's mouth to create the effect that his fiery breath was
causing the damage.  The sound of the great beast's heavy footfalls
were created by a drum.  I personally never associated the drumbeats
as being anything but mood music, but the sound works that way.  On
the other hand, the sound of stroking the strings of a large cello-
like instrument with a leather glove, then slowing it down and
playing it backwards, acts as the groans of Godzilla.  It sounds
like steel girders giving way in hell.  The effect is just about
perfect.  The musical score is crude with its military marches, but
somehow they seem to work.
     When the effects work they are terrific, when they do not work,
they do not work.  All too often the effects are just a bit on the
cheesy side.  There are scenes when we are obviously looking at a
hand-puppet.  Even that would not be so bad, but we then see what is
supposedly a photograph of what we had just seen and it looks
nothing like the puppet version.  There was a similar problem in THE
BEAST FROM 20,000 FATHOMS.  Another problem is with the Godzilla
suit itself.  Godzilla has what can best be described as an A-line
figure.  He has very heavy massive legs and gargantuan feet, but his
trunk is not commensurately large.  His legs also have and
unfortunate tendency to have folds on a way that a jacket might but
an arm would not.  The crudeness of the filming conceals the fact
that Godzilla has external ears in a way that reptiles do not.  The
producers at Toho thought that people would assume Godzilla was deaf
if they did not give him obvious external ears.  Of course a parrot
has no external ears and hears well enough to repeat sounds he
hears.  The film also features a traveling matte of a view directly
into the face of the beast as seen from Tokyo tower.  It is one of
the worst jobs of matting I ever remember seeing.  Some of Bert I.
Gordon's matte jobs look good by comparison.  In most scenes the
beast is shown moving in slow motion to accentuate his size, but
when he bats away missiles, he moves at normal speed and spoils much
of the illusion.  However, it should be remembered many of
Universal's classic films have their moments when they do not show
consummate visual craftsmanship.  DRACULA, for example, has some
very silly scenes including a silly scene of a bee coming out of a
bee-size coffin.  In some ways we cannot be really sure where some
of the errors crept in.  We are told a disaster at sea occurred at
3:30 AM, but when we saw it earlier the crew was on the deck and the
sun was shining.
     Where THE BEAST FROM 20,000 FATHOMS had just showed its monster
in the streets and people running from it, GOJIRA looks more at the
emotional effect on people.  What made it to the American version is
fairly effective, but what was cut out are some very impressive
scenes.  In one scene of the Japanese film only, a mother sits at
the base of a building near where the monster is rampaging.  She
sadly tells her children that they will all be with their father
soon.  This tone is surprisingly bleak for a monster movie.  The
whole population of Tokyo seems to mourn the great losses wrought by
Godzilla.  Themes of sacrifice, honor, and suicide seem to accent
the bleak tone of this film.  Other imaginative scenes include a
view of the monster ravaging Tokyo with a cage of birds seen in
silhouette in the foreground.  In other scenes we see Godzilla
walking and the dust his huge feet kick up.
     It is never easy to judge acting ability of someone who is
speaking in a language you do not know.  This film does have the
second-best-known international actor from Japanese film.  Dr.
Yamane is played by Takashi Shimura, the star of films like IKIRU
and THE SEVEN SAMURAI.  Unfortunately the actor who dubs his lines
in the American version is not very good.  Particularly noticeable
is his inability to pronounce the word "phenomenon" which he says
"phenonemon."  To have such an educated man making that silly
mistake is unintentionally humorous.
     This is a film with some very nice visual imagery and it has
become a favorite film.  It is not so much a good film as a weak
film with some very good moments.  The American version I would have
to give only a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.  The Japanese version
is probably a high +2 film.
     It should be noted that also that this is the most influential
film ever made in Japan.  It was Japan's first international
cinematic success.  It spawned the Japanese genre of "kaiju" films.
"Kaiju" is Japanese for "monster" and the continuing Godzilla
series, Japanese anime, and even Pokemon are direct descendents of
this film.

Title
Review for Baby of Macon, The (1993)
     I think I always have one of two reactions to Peter Greenaway
films.  Either I dislike the film or I like it but feel it is un-
recommendable.  In the latter category were THE COOK, THE THIEF, HIS
WIFE, AND HER LOVER and PROSPERO'S BOOKS.  His BABY OF MACON [there is
a circumflex over the "a" in "Macon"] also falls into that category,
but I do not have to worry about people not liking it as much as I did,
at least in the United States.  It was considered either so
controversial, so revolting, or both, that it just never found a United
States distributor.
     More than usual with a Greenaway film, it is difficult to tell
exactly what is going on.  Presumably the story is of a play being
performed and/or set at the 17th Century Court of the Medici--it is
hard to tell which since events in and out of the play seem to blend
together.  As would have pleased Philip K. Dick, how many levels of
play-within-play there are is impossible to determine.  The story is a
sort of burlesque of the birth of a new Messiah, twisting as many of
the traditional Catholic symbols as possible.  It is a time of multiple
pestilence's and all the women of the region are sterile.  When an
obese old hag actually succeeds in giving birth to a beautiful baby,
the local women see it as a miraculous birth, even to the point of
asking for the baby's spit to use as an elixir.  The baby's sister
(played by Julia Ormond), sees a good thing and claims the baby as her
own child and "proves" the birth to be miraculous by proving she is
still a virgin.  The son of the Bishop (Ralph Fiennes) is a scientist
and a skeptic who does not believe in the purported new Messiah and in
trying to disprove the ersatz Virgin Mary is pulled into the symbolism
as a latter-day Joseph.  As Ormand's character tells him, "Too many
proofs spoil the truth."
     Somehow all this does not convey the throat-biting viciousness of
this satire.  By any objective measure, THE LAST TEMPTATION OF CHRIST
was by comparison a gentle and reverent jibe.  Greenaway is a Howard
Stern for intellectuals and he keeps revealing that he has stores of
untapped acid and bile still in him.  While he has a right to express
himself as he wishes, I think if I were Catholic I would be very
uncomfortable with this film.  As interesting as THE BABY OF MACON is,
Greenaway makes it a real trial to sit through.  He uses a stodgy,
mock-neo-classical, dry style that sucks the interest out of a scene
like fluids out of a baby.  It is hard to imagine another director who
could make so dull a scene that features full- frontal nudity from both
Ormond and Fiennes.  Perhaps the reason Greenaway gets away putting so
much nudity in is films is that in doing so he completely sidesteps
eroticism.
     The production design skillfully makes each frame fascinating
while at the same time making so many full scenes seem endless.  This
film had four reasonable endings and gave the impression of finishing
all afternoon.  Greenaway often tries to build to a sort of twist
ending, but here the twist is much more expected than it was in THE
COOK, THE THIEF, HIS WIFE, AND HER LOVER.  Fans of Masterpiece Theater
in the 1960s will no doubt recognize the main musical theme as well as
an unsurprising plot twist near the end.
     Julia Ormond could well prove herself the Ingrid Bergman of her
generation.  Like Bergman she is a B+ actress with an A+ screen charm,
even in what is in this case a rather detestable role.  Ralph Fiennes,
on the other hand, completely submerges his ENGLISH PATIENT charm and
plays the rather pasty-faced son of the Bishop.  The Bishop,
incidentally, is played by veteran actor Philip Stone.  I first noticed
Stone in UNEARTHLY STRANGER, a great (but sadly now very rare) science
fiction film from 1963.  It is good to see him still acting.
     The best Greenaway film is really a mixed bag of quality, and this
one is more mixed than most.  I would give THE BABY OF MACON a low +2
on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Perfect Murder, A (1998)
     I did not care much for Alfred Hitchcock's DIAL M FOR MURDER when
I saw it as a child.  It seemed a set-bound and a rather dry exercise.
Seeing it as an adult was an entirely different experience.  It clearly
is a stage play, but it has to be one of the most brilliant stage
thrillers ever written.  The entire play works like a well-oiled
machine of surprising complexity.  It was *the classic* stage murder
thriller.  Compared to DIAL M FOR MURDER, SLEUTH and DEATHTRAP are
merely gimmicky.  For DIAL M FOR MURDER, the playwright really sat down
and sweated all the details.  The one unrealistic touch is that main
character Tony Wendes is just too brilliant to be fully believed.  He
has a mind like a computer, thinking out all possibilities and
reconstructing his plans instant by instant.  The play must have been
rewritten over and over as Frederick Knott rethought the possibilities.
The remake A PERFECT MURDER has some of the plot, but it loses a lot in
the transition.
     In A PERFECT MURDER, the Taylors are probably one of the top 100
prominent couples in the country. Steven Taylor (played by Michael
Douglas) is an international commodities dealer who makes deals in the
hundreds of millions of dollars every day.  Emily Bradford Taylor
(played by Gwyneth Paltrow) is an heiress to one of the richest
families in America.  She has a position working as translator at the
United Nations General Assembly and as an aide to the Unite States
ambassador.  But Emily has other positions she likes more, fooling
around on the side with promising new artist David Shaw (Viggo
Mortensen).  Shaw has a future as an artist, but he also has a past,
and that he would like to keep quiet.  Unfortunately Steven Taylor
knows all about Shaw's past and has his own plans for Shaw's future.
The plans include killing Emily Taylor.  Saying any more about the new
and somewhat cluttered plot would really be telling too much.
     Michael Douglas is something of a master at portraying quiet
smoldering anger on the screen.  He is a good choice to show rage, but
he cannot bring to the role the kind of passionless thinking machine
quality that Ray Milland had in the original.  Luckily this script does
not call for Steven Taylor to make the sort of quick rethinking of
problems that Tony Wendes did in the original film.  Paltrow really
does have the sort of pristine good looks that are reminiscent of Grace
Kelly in the first film.  There are even scenes where she looks a bit
like Grace Kelly.  The problem is that the film insists on showing her
in bed with her lover. 1990s audiences demand to see some flesh, I
suppose.  There clearly is passion going on though nothing is seen that
really counts as nudity.  But what we do see of the sex is enough that
she no longer appears to the viewer to be an innocent.  And that loses
her the audience's sympathy.  We are left with several cold and
unsympathetic characters wandering around on the dark sets of this
film.  I should mention that Dariusz Wolski shot the film and if that
name is unfamiliar, he also filmed THE CROW and DARK CITY.  That should
tell you that he likes under-lit sets to create a cold and dark feel.
And this film certainly has that. Viggo Mortensen plays the third leg
of the romantic triangle.  He does not have much screen presence, but
he does have a very realistic look.  Rounding out the cast, but
appallingly under-used, is David Suchet as Detective Mohamed Karaman.
I suspect he had a bigger role in the original script.  It is his
character in the original play who does the real detective work.  But
rumors say that the end of the film was re-shot and presumably his role
was cut down in size.  Perhaps test audiences thought him solving the
crime was a little too close to what he does in his TV persona as
Hercule Poirot.  But for whatever the reason Suchet had only a small
part, and it was a serious waste to have such a good character actor in
so tiny a role.
     If you have seen the original film, there will still be plot
twists to keep you guessing, but you will also get an appreciation of
how good material can sour in the wrong hands.  It takes a remake like
A PERFECT MURDER to show the viewer how much has changed in the 1990s
conventions of films and to appreciate the genius of an Alfred
Hitchcock.  This cold and dark remake gets a 5 on the 0 to 10 scale and
a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Election (1999)
     The time is coming for student council elections at Carver High
School. Unopposed for president is Tracy Flick (played by Reese
Witherspoon) the school's smug and snotty over-achiever.  This is the
girl who seems to be in every school club, on every school committee.
Everyone knows that she is the best and nobody tries to compete with
her.  What few people know is that she also was instrumental in the
firing of a teacher for a sexual misconduct in which she was
considerably more than a willing victim.  Jim McAllister (Matthew
Broderick) is the star teacher of the school, having won the Teacher of
the Year Award a record three years in a row.  He also was a friend of
the fired teacher. Partially because he knows that the indiscretion was
not all the teacher's fault, and partially as a lesson in democratic
principles to his students, Mr. McAllister decides to try to see if he
can whip up some competition for Tracy. The idealistic civics teacher
convinces Paul Metzler, a likeable jock sidelined by a broken leg, to
run against Tracy.  He is the exact opposite of Tracy.  Less than
bright in his studies he is nevertheless a nice person with lots of
friends.  Soon there is a surprise third counter-culture candidate
running for reasons of her own and collecting the vote of all the
disaffected of the school. This small beginning leads to chaos that
engulfs several people's lives, not the least of which is Mr.
McAllister's.
     ELECTION is a film that looks like it was shot in 16 millimeter
and blown up for the full sized screen.  The production values overall
seem to have been designed for economy.  About the only place it excels
is that it has a really good script.  I call that a pretty good
tradeoff.  In spite of the modest production budget co-writer and
director Alexander Payne has managed to do some things extraordinarily
well.  The lower-middle class is rarely shown in other films.
Character's homes shown in films tend to be wither upscale or on the
level of trailer parks.  Yet the housing developments with their sparse
vegetation strike a really believable note.  In fact the whole set of
inexpensive production values tend to make this film seem all the more
realistic.  Payne's only previous feature film was CITIZEN RUTH, itself
not a bad social satire.  But ELECTION shows a considerable
improvement.
     With the exception of the two leads, most of the cast has little
film experience, yet the acting in the film seems perfectly
professional.  Matthew Broderick seems a little young for the role of
the teacher, but that could be just because he himself seems boyish.
Reese Witherspoon may well find that this is a defining role in her
early career.  While she did not seem to bring any special talents to
her role in PLEASANTVILLE she is just perfect as the smug and totally
self-absorbed, over-achieving, Monica-Lewinsky-in-training.  ELECTION
is a satire of the caliber of Michael Ritchie's SMILE.  That puts it
miles ahead of recent entries like WAG THE DOG.  SMILE and ELECTION
would, in fact, make an excellent double feature.  I give ELECTION an8
on the 0 to 10 scale and a high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Hanoi Hilton, The (1987)
     The film industry seems unsure how to show the Vietnam War in film.
They want so desperately to please, but they are not sure what the buying
public thinks of the war.  When they think the public wants to see films
that say the war was terrible, they make films like APOCALYPSE NOW.  On the
other hand, the audience that is into beefcake stars wants to feel we could
have smeared the enemy, so they get films of macho stars either breaking out
of POW  camps or back in to rescue Americans still there.  The poor film
industry is aiming at a fragmented target of public opinion.  But they sure
know that it is public opinion they have to match.  If they don't show the
war exactly the way the public thinks of the war, it will cost them big
bucks at the boxoffice.  Hey, "if you want to deliver a message, send a
telegram."  That's the old adage of the film industry.  No film about the
war has shot so far wide of the public opinion mark as HANOI HILTON.  You
may remember it--it may have played a week at a theater near you.
     HANOI HILTON is the story of the men interred in a POW camp in Hanoi.
Most of the men believed in what they were doing.  Perhaps they did not
believe in the war, but they did believe in not being broken by their
captors.  The films paints the POWs as heroic, the captors as cruel, and the
news and movie media as being dupes used by the Vietcong.  None of that is
too great a leap of imagination.  There is nothing particularly hard to
believe in the entire film.  My understanding is that POWs endorse the film
as being fairly realistic.  The plot is not unusual or particularly new.  It
just shows how prisoners found ways to communicate with each other and
support each other under interrogations that sometimes included torture.
Again, nothing new for the cinema--there were similar films about World War
II--but then POW camps probably have not changed that much either.
     There has been some comment about how unfairly a visiting celebrity--
obviously intended to be Jane Fonda--is treated by the film.  My personal
belief is that Ms. Fonda was at this point a woman very committed to her
ideals who had already been shown some of the destruction that air bombing
had done in North Vietnam.  That would have meant she had reason to be
unsympathetic to the downed airmen and unsympathetic is all the film accuses
her of being.  A journalist earlier in the film is portrayed as much worse.
     HANOI HILTON certainly appears to be a reasonably accurate portrayal of
one aspect of the Vietnam War.  In spite of a lot of unfavorable comment by
other reviewers, I think it deserves a +2.

Title
Review for Awakenings (1990)
     With the possible exception of THE GODFATHER PART III, the most avidly
awaited film of the winter season is probably Penny Marshall's AWAKENINGS.
Robin Williams stars in the fictionalized telling of a modern medical
miracle performed by neurologist Oliver Sacks.  In the role of Dr. Sacks--
whose name has been changed to Dr. Malcolm Sayer--is Robin Williams.
Whatever Williams is doing to improve his acting, it is working very well;
his acting noticeably improves with each succeeding film he makes.  His
Malcolm Sayer is a real departure.  Rather than his usual self-assured
characters, Sayer is painfully introverted but caught up in an idea that
becomes a dream and then a reality.
     The film begins with a prologue in 1932.  Young Leonard Lowe is having
occasional fits of shaking in his right arm.  As time passes, the fits are
getting worse and Leonard is becoming seriously frightened by them.  Flash
forward thirty-seven years to 1969.  Malcolm Sayer, a researcher in
neurology, has spent the last five years working with earthworms in a
project that failed.  Now he is looking for work and is hired to care for
the incurably ill at a Bronx hospital, a job he finds unnerving until his
curiosity is aroused by several patients who appear to be living vegetables
but who show odd signs of consciousness.  The common belief is that there
cannot be any mental activity but only because the alternative is too
agonizing to contemplate.  Sayer thinks that the symptoms he is seeing may
be an extreme form of the same symptoms caused by an unrelated disease,
Parkinson's disease.  The drug L-DOPA alleviates Parkinson's symptoms and
Sayer thinks it may work on these patients.  The guess turns out to be
correct and people who have been mental vegetables for three decades or more
begin to wake up.  The film then becomes the dual story of Dr. Sayer and the
awakening patients, particularly Leonard Lowe (now played by Robert DeNiro).
     Rarely does a film really bring home the value of being free to do what
most of the world takes for granted.  In YENTL it was the right to learn.
CHARLY was a paean to the ability to think.  AWAKENINGS is about the ability
to experience life at all, to see the world around us.  DeNiro does a fine
job playing the afflicted Lowe grasping for life when he can.  Julie Kavner
is also notable as a nurse with faith in Sayer.  She is a fine character
actress.  Disappointingly, however, the film never explores the question it
raised so fervently.  How conscious are Sayer's patients?  What was their
consciousness like in their vegetable state?  These questions are never
satisfactorily answered.
     AWAKENINGS is not a great film.  At times it is too pat.  At 121
minutes it is too short to do justice to the story of both the doctor and
the patients.  My rating then is +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Timecop (1994)
     It is 1863 and a shipment of gold for the Confederacy is stolen by
a highwayman sporting a laser-guided machine gun.  This is a time
travel crime and that makes it particularly dangerous since even a
small change to the past could completely change the future.  That is
why the government has created the Time Enforcement Commission or TEC.
And one of its chief operatives is Max Walker (Jean-Claude Van Damme).
The TEC is watched over by Senator McComb (Ron Silver).  But McComb has
been seduced by the power time travel gives and is hatching his own
illegal plans to make himself President.  Walker knows his chief enemy
is the Senator who controls his agency.  But his efforts are sabotaged
by widespread corruption in the TEC going back to McComb.  Complicating
things, now he is saddled with an inexperienced partner, Fielding
(played by Gloria Reuben), and he would rather be working alone.  (Gee,
what an original plot complication!)  Walker must go back with Fielding
to 1994, that pivotal year when i) the TEC was founded, ii) mysterious
thugs killed Walker's wife (Mia Sara), and iii) McComb got control ofa
major high-TEC and high-tech corporation.  That 1994 must have been a
pretty exciting year to live!
     Like a lot of current films the look of TIMECOP seems to take
precedence over the acting or plot.  The film is directed by Peter
Hyams who proved in films like OUTLAND that he is much more into the
look of science fiction than the thought behind it.  In fact, he wears
an unusual pairing of hats on this film.  He is not just the director
of the film, he is also the director of photography and some of the
effects are effective.  Hyams uses a nice effect of warping space to
show people's arrival in a new time, though it looks related to the
invisibility effect in PREDATOR.  The rocket sled that launches time
travel is a bit melodramatic and the reason why this acceleration is
needed is never explained, unless it is some sort of tribute to BACK TO
THE FUTURE.  It does contribute to the effect of a film that is
generally fairly slickly mounted.  Not all of the visuals are as good,
however.  One false move is the production design of the 2004 cars,
which apparently have evolved to look almost like DAMNATION ALLEY
armored vehicles by 2004.  Certainly the look of cars is intended to
change more in the next ten years than it did in the last ten.
     Other script touches are about what one could expect.  There was
entirely too many fights for my taste, but after all, this is a Jean-
Claude Van Damme movie.  One could complain about the Bondisms--the
wisecracks after violent fights--but it seems that they have become
inseparable from action films.  There is some reasonable wit in the
film.  There is a nice bit connected with a piece of advice that that
McComb gives his younger self.  But the nicest quip is the choice of
end-title music.
     As an actor Jean-Claude Van Damme has playing an expert Belgian
kick-boxer down very well.  I suppose that is better than him not being
able to play an expert Belgian kick-boxer, but it still does not amount
to breadth.  For once he has co-stars who have previously been in films
that do not feature fighting.  Ron Silver is an actual actor in the
non-exploitation film sense.  He may not have a lot of real acting to
do here other than to seem sinister, but he at least does his villain
with dignified restraint.  Gloria Reuben and Mia Sara are along as co-
stars but neither of them have anything special to do in their roles.
Mia Sara has been around in films at least since FERRIS BEULLER'S DAY
OFF, Reuben is a relative newcomer, and each seems to do what the
script requires and avoids walking into furniture, but neither shows
any real flash.
     This is a film with too little science fictional thought and too
much karate kicking.  But parts are undeniably fun.  I give it a low +1
on the -4 to +4 scale.
     Some of the concepts of TIMECOP should be discussed in an
evaluation of the film and I hope I don't come off like the film
reviewer (I think from the New York Times) whose review of DESTINATION
MOON said that it was absurd and that even the children in the audience
could tell the producers that in space rockets don't work because there
is nothing to push against.  Don't trust a film reviewer's knowledge,
including mine.
     Time enforcement is an old idea in science fiction harkening back
at least to Jack Williamson's LEGION OF TIME and Poul Anderson's TIME
PATROL.  Generally a feature of time travel stories are time paradoxes,
most of which hark from the paradox that a time traveler could go back
in time and kill his parents before they bear him.  Then he would never
have existed, so there would have been nobody to kill his parents.
Also often a feature of time travel stories are extra rules supposedly
fall out of the physics of time travel.  These may or may not bear
close scrutiny.  One that might make sense might be that an equal mass
has to be sent in the opposite direction in time or that you are
limited in the amount of magnetic metal that can go through time.
Rules often make less sense.  THE TERMINATOR assumed only living matter
can be sent.  No other physical phenomenon can detect living from non-
living matter, but I would be willing to give them the benefit of the
doubt if they just followed that rule.  But, of course various parts of
the human body like hair are not really living matter either.  If only
living matter went through time portals, a time traveler would arrive
at best bald.  THE TERMINATOR seemed to miss that detail and did not
shave Michael Biehn.
     TIMECOP shows signs that the authors thought about *having* rules
and paradoxes, but not much about the rules and paradoxes themselves.
The special rules include this concept that "the same object cannot
occupy the same place at the same time."  I think that the principle is
that different objects cannot do that.  But what generally happens
there is that they rebound off each other.  Technically speaking, the
same object ALWAYS occupies the same place at the same time.  Actually
the rule as applied in the film seems to be that is a time traveler
comes in contact with his previous self the two annihilated each other.
But you have very little matter in common with yourself of ten years
ago.  Nearly all (or is it actually all?) of the living matter in your
body from ten years ago has been replaced.  Even if that was not true
and there was some point on the surface that had not changed, you would
have to get those two points to come in contact.  It would not suffice
that your left hand from 1994 and your right shoulder from 2004 came in
contact.  This whole rule of annihilation is more a plot contrivance
than having anything much to do with logic.  It is like having vampires
killed by sunlight.
     Mike Richardson and Mark Verheiden don't actually seem to
understand what makes time paradoxes work.  In the film Fielding@2004
(if I may coin a notation) is killed in 1994.  Back in 2004 there is no
sign that Fielding lived that last decade from 1994 to 2004.  That
would be true if Fielding@1994 had been killed, but there seems not to
make sense as a result of Fielding@2004 being killed.  At the end of
the film Walker has nullified his whole reason to have gone to 1994 and
nobody remembers that he went.  But he obviously is returning from some
place.  Where do people think he is returning from?  And while I am
asking questions, how do you carbon-date gold?  And what does it even
mean to carbon-date gold?

Title
Review for Sphere (1998)
     Michael Crichton has had a long career of writing novels, many of
which are science fiction.  The most profitable film adaptation of any
novel was an adaptation of a Michael Crichton science fiction novel.
So in the logic of the film industry a good way to make a profitable
film would be to make a big-budget adaptation of another Crichton
science fiction novel.  CONGO failed, and I am afraid that SPHERE is
probably not going to fare a whole lot better.  It a little better than
just okay novel and it makes a film that is not even that good.  The
film is expensive, over one hundred million dollars; is long, 133
minutes; has a terrific cast, including Dustin Hoffman, Samuel L.
Jackson, and Sharon Stone; but has little that is really original and
less that is exciting.
     Several years ago Dr. Norman Goodman (played by Dustin Hoffman)
was asked to write up a set of procedures for the government to
follow if an alien entity was actually encountered.  The plan he
wrote was only semi-serious, but did explicitly define a team of
experts who should investigate the alien.  Now that team has been
assembled by a mysterious team leader named Barnes (Peter Coyote) to
study a spacecraft almost a half mile in length that apparently
dropped into the Pacific Ocean in the early 1700s.  Suddenly Norman's
less than serious procedure has become an action plan for dealing
with a real alien spacecraft.  Included in the team to investigate
are mathematician Harry Adams (Samuel L. Jackson), biologist Beth
Halperin (Sharon Stone), and astrophysicist Ted Fielding (Liev
Schreiber).  Together they travel to the deep Pacific spaceship to
understand its secrets.  One major secret is the meaning of the huge
sphere of gold-toned liquid metal at the heart of this spaceship.
     What is disappointing about this film is that it does not have
really effective performances.  Director Barry Levinson is at his best
with good actors rather than good special effects.  The problem here is
he is making a big-budget science fiction film.  It has some effects,
but the most intriguing effect he shows only as an outline on a radar
screen.  The technique is to suggest rather than to show and let the
actors and the viewer's imagination carry the film as Robert Wise did
with THE HAUNTING.  That could be a reasonable approach in a low-budget
film.  But that requires creating much more atmosphere than Levinson
can manage to muster.  It requires the actors to give really compelling
performances and simply put, they don't.  Hoffman's acting seems muted.
Jackson seems to laid back.  We do not feel for these characters and
do not get inside their heads.  Levinson paid big bucks for his actors
and does not really get price performance.  And why we have Queen
Latifah as a minor functionary on the expedition is anybody's guess.A
cast of unknowns could have delivered as much emotional impact at a
fraction of the price.  Look how much more powerful a film like ALIEN
was with only moderate actors.
     Most science fiction spectaculars these days have second-tier
actors and first-tier special effects.  Levinson tries second-tier
effects, and first-tier actors, but never makes that exchange pay off
for the viewer.  Perhaps sci-fi spectaculars are just not an actor's
medium.  The result gets a 4 on the 0 to 10 scale and 0 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Kansas City (1996)
     KANSAS CITY is something of a departure from Robert Altman's
recent style of telling many different stories simultaneously, then
letting them all come together at the end.  In KANSAS CITY he is really
back to telling a single story, though it takes a little while for one
of the plot threads to be tied into the mainline of the story.  In the
screenplay which he co-authored with Frank Barhydt, Altman returns to
the city of his youth to direct a story about crime, race, class, and
politics.
     The setting is Kansas City, Missouri, in 1934.  Blondie O'Hara
(played by Jennifer Jason Leigh) is in a real fix.  Her husband Johnny
(Dermot Mulroney) has robbed a taxicab, using burnt cork to make
himself look black.  Now the oddly-named Seldom Seen (Harry Belafonte),
the local crime boss, has Johnny and is going to kill him.  Blondie
realizes that that she cannot get Seldom to let the man she loves go.
Faced with an immovable object she decides to unleash the only
irresistible force she knows.  She has to convince the local Democratic
political machine to go in with its hired muscle to do the job of
freeing her husband.  And how is she going to convince them to do that?
She has a weird scheme to kidnap Carolyn Stilton (Miranda Richardson)
the socialite wife of a Democrat high muckimuck (Michael Murphy) and
force him to unleash the muscle of the political machine to save her
husband.  Much of the film is the interplay between Blondie O'Hara and
Carolyn Stilton.  Meanwhile Johnny O'Hara is a prisoner at the Hey-Hey
Club as Seldom Seen plays a cat and mouse game with him.
     All this happens to the background strains of the music at the
Hey-Hey Club, except when the music is dragged to the foreground and
the story-telling drags to a halt.  Altman obviously expected that a
big part of the show would be to hear the music of current jazz greats
playing anachronistically in 1934.  His heart was clearly in the right
place, but even his telling of the mainline plot is a little slow and
deliberate and people who are not fans of jazz may find his use of it
in longish interludes excessive.  As with many Altman films, the story
cannot be fully assessed until the film is over and much of what the
film is saying is encompassed in the last five minutes.  This is a
story of insular people who think they understand each other but who
actually have gulfs of race and class separating them more than they
realize.
     It has taken me a long time to come around on Jennifer Jason
Leigh.  For a while I have noted that she has done a good job with this
role and with that one and never thought much about it.   But I really
think now I think she is just about the best character actress of her
generation.  Although it is said more visually than verbally, it is
clear that Blondie is a woman absolutely obsessed with films and in
particular with Jean Harlow films, since it is suggested that with
bleached blond hair she resembles Harlow.  From the first moment we see
her she is dressed and made up in the style of women of 1930s films.
We learn a great deal about Blondie, but Carolyn remains a cipher
through much of the film.  We are never really sure what she is
thinking or if she is thinking under the laudanum haze into which she
sinks at every opportunity.  It is, of course, good to see Harry
Belafonte acting and for much of the film he seems in control of his
character.  At one point the character seems to run away with him and
as he goes off into a babbling tirade about what he is doing, about
racism, and about why he disagrees with Marcus Garvey's Back-to-Africa
movement.  One feels that the plot intended this speech to be more
coherent and cogent than it actually came out.
     Altman does not so much put period feel into the film as saturate
the film in a bath of rich period atmosphere.  Though the viewer has to
look quick to place the film's exact year, every scene seems to have an
exaggerated 1930s feel.  Everything looks very 1930s.  Whether or not
people dressed in real life like Blondie does, she certainly looks like
women in 1930s films.  Altman slightly disorients his viewers with a
non-chronological telling of the story in the early parts of the film.
Perhaps he thinks that the early part of his films should be
disorienting.  In any case, the story-telling becomes much more
straightforward once he gets into the meat of the story.  While not a
perfect film, 1930s Kansas City certainly does a lot more to keep the
film interesting than 1990s Los Angeles did for SHORT CUTS.  This is
the most intriguing Altman film in quite a while.  I rate it a +2 on
the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Shining Through (1992)
     During World War II the sort of spy film that was made had generally
normal sorts of people with normal sorts of goals.  People like James Cagney
would be normal, everyday Americans shocked by what they saw in Germany or
Japan.  The sort of thing we got was FOREIGN CORRESPONDENT or BLOOD ON THE
SUN.  When the war was over, Hitchcock added some gloss and star power with
films like NOTORIOUS.  By the early 1960s, however, the personal sort of
behind-the-lines spy story, such as THE COUNTERFEIT TRAITOR or TORN CURTAIN,
was rare and the spy film was giving way to the more spectacular sabotage
films such as THE GUNS OF NAVARONE.  When James Bond came along, there was
much more gloss and in addition, the spy had become the infallible super-
spy.  Even then the stakes could be as small as a decoder.  But that was not
true for long.  Soon Bond had to fight bigger and bigger threats.  The
villains threatened Fort Knox, Miami, the space program.  The stories got
more and more tongue-in-cheek.  In MOONRAKER the plot was to destroy the
whole world.  Then our agents started being people like John Rambo, who
knows that you don't need brain power--you need fire power.  THE HUNT FOR
RED OCTOBER restored some of the need for brain power, but it was brain
power together with fire power.  Now there is SHINING THROUGH and it is a
story that Hitchcock might have done in 1946.  We have relatively normal
people who make mistakes and get hurt and feel.  Producer/director/writer
David Seltzer seems to have forgotten everything we have learned about the
spy film since 1950.  Gee, I hope he makes a bundle.
     We are told the entire story from a regrettable framing sequence (more
on that later).  Linda Voss (played by Melanie Griffith) is being
interviewed by the BBC about her experiences in World War II.  In flashback
we see the young Linda as a romantic who loves movies, particularly about
Germany.  Her father is a German Jew who fled because of the oppression.
But Voss still dreams of visiting Germany to bring the rest of her family
out.  With her quick mind and a general high efficiency she becomes a legal
secretary and is assigned to lawyer Ed Leland (played by Michael Douglas).
There seems to be more to Leland than meets the eye, however.  He seems to
disappear on mysterious missions for the government.  Voss is intrigued by
both the man and his job.  In the first hour there is a romance between the
two, but the film takes off in the second hour when Voss gets her
opportunity to go to Germany to rescue her family and at the same time do
some spying for the government.
     The technical aspects of SHINING THROUGH are for the most part well-
executed.  The recreation of the streets of Berlin during the war feels
particularly realistic.  David Seltzer was both executive producer and
director; as director, he could see what was needed to make a street look
authentic and then as holder of the purse strings he could allot himself the
budget to create the effect he wanted.  The script is witty and suspenseful
though occasionally it stretches credulity a bit.  There are some far-
fetched coincidences (Hitchcock films often have the same problem).  But the
biggest flaw is a framing sequence which robs the story of much of its
suspense.  As the story is related by Voss years after the war, there is no
doubt that Voss will survive all the events.  The old age makeup,
incidentally, is not nearly as good as it is in FOR THE BOYS.  Perhaps that
is the only area where that film is better than this.  The framing sequence
does give Seltzer a very clever excuse to have the German sequences shot in
English.  Michael Kamen provides a score including an interesting piano
theme under the opening credits.
     Besides Douglas and Griffith, SHINING THROUGH features Sir John
Gielgud, generally considered to be one of the greatest living actors.  This
film does not sufficiently show off his talents, though it is hard to
imagine any film that would.  Liam Neeson, best known for the title role in
DARKMAN, plays a Nazi officer and Joely Richardson plays an attractive high-
born German woman who befriends Voss.  (Richardson is the daughter of
director Tony Richardson and actress Vanessa Redgrave.)  Overall a very
enjoyable--I would rate it a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     Very mild spoiler:  Seltzer might have done well to study his history a
little better.  Peenemunde is not a town in central Germany as it appears on
the map in the film.  It is an island at the north-east tip of Germany at
the mouth of the Peene River.  I could be wrong about this, but I do not
believe that there were factories at Peenemunde.  The V-1 and A-4 (a.k.a.
the V-2) were launched from Peenemunde but the A-4 (at least) was built at
Nordhausen, which may well be the place Seltzer called "Peenemunde."
Nordhausen was at least inland some distance and might have been in that
position on the map Voss saw.  One more comment about the framing sequence:
it almost certainly was an after-thought to make the film more commercial
and to give it a much happier but less realistic ending.

Title
Review for Short Cuts (1993)
          Capsule review:  Several unrelated stories by Raymond
     Carver are braided together into one overly-long telling.
     Carver's Pacific Northwest tales are moved to Los Angeles.
     Unfortunately none of the individual stories is particularly
     interesting and the whole is little more than the sum of
     those parts.  Rating low +1 (-4 to +4).
     By all accounts the stories of Raymond Carver are strong on describing
the texture of life in the Pacific Northwest, but plotwise have been
described as "minimalist."  In SHORT CUTS, Robert Altman relocates those
stories to give a feeling for the texture of life in Los Angeles.  In fact,
they probably could have been moved to Massachusetts, Texas, or Wisconsin
without doing much harm.  The narrative approach is a lot like that of
1980's SERIAL, though the end result is neither so cohesive nor so humorous.
     There is no single unifying element to the stories tied together in
SHORT CUTS, though many of the plotlines do involve men who act selfishly
and in unfeeling ways.  A philandering traffic cop secretly rids himself of
the family's obnoxious but loved dog.  Some friends on a fishing trip put
off reporting the discovery of a body in order to get in more fishing.  An
alcoholic keeps pestering his long-suffering wife who seems unaccountably to
love him in spite of his personality.  Another man executes a painstaking
revenge against his former wife.  Revenge is also on the mind of another man
who terrorizes a woman over what seems like a trivial offense.  This film is
over three hours long to tell all these stories simultaneously, yet none of
the stories is particularly enthralling in itself.  What becomes more
interesting is the manner in which these minor stories are tied together
with each story touching nearly all the others.  However, that also strains
the credibility a bit since all these people have dramatic stories which
start within hours of each other and end the same way.  The main story line
is of Ann and Howard Finnigan (played by Andie McDowell and Bruce Davison)
facing a crisis when their son is hit by a car.  Ralph and Marian Wyman
(Matthew Modine and Julianne Moore) have unfinished business about and
incident in Marian's past.  Jerry Kaiser (Chris Penn) can't quite come to
terms with his wife's (Jennifer Jason Leigh) phone sex business.  And the
list of plots could go on and on.
     Robert Altman directs and co-authored the screenplay with Frank
Barhydt.  The style is remiscent of NASHVILLE with its set of intertwined
stories, but without nearly so much a sense of why tell this particular set
of stories.  Perhaps one advantage to this manner of story-telling is to
allow the viewer to see the diversity of lifestyles that can be found in one
small community.  The stories include liberal amounts of female nudity,
often with no more necessity than to dress up (or undress) a scene.  There
are several scenes of light comedy, warm humanity, or cold tragedy.  One
sequence will seem very timely but at the same time the flaws of the
sequence will be more obvious than when the film was made.
     SHORT CUTS is yet another film this year that did not quite come up to
most critic's estimation.  My rating is low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     The Raymond Carver stories adapted in SHORT CUTS as reported in VARIETY
are "Jerry and Molly and Sam," "Will You Please Be Quiet, Please?,"
"Collectors," "Neighbors," "A Small Good Thing," "So Much Water So Close to
Home," "They're Not Your Husband," "Vitamins," "Tell the Women We're Going,"
and the poem "Lemonade."

Title
Review for Married to the Mob (1988)
          Capsule review:  Dull, unfunny comedy about the families
     of mobsters without a single believable characterization or
     situation.  I was not fond of Demme's SOMETHING WILD, but it
     was four times the film this is.  Rating: low 0.
     I guess it is really hard to describe what makes something funny or not
funny.  There is something about delivery where the same joke told by two
different people will be funny told by only one and perhaps one person will
find it funny and one will not.  I can see that a lot of the humor in
MARRIED TO THE MOB was supposed to be funny but I cannot remember a single
joke that was actually funny in the entire film.  You just have a film with
a lot of silly situations and none of them make it to being funny.  Jonathan
Demme has a real ear for how people don't talk and a real feeling for how
people don't behave.
     Angela De Marco (Michelle Pfeiffer) is a CLAP (that's a Crime Lord
American Princess) who likes her luxurious lifestyle but does not like the
thought that it was provided entirely by crime.  When her husband is
murdered and a big Mafiosi--Tony ("The Tiger") Russo, played by Dean
Stockwell)--tries to make her his mistress, she gives her entire house and
its contents to charity and goes penniless with her son to live in New York
City and start a new life.  Ah, but the ties to the old life are harder to
cut than that. The FBI wants to use DeMarco to catch Russo.  Part of the
task goes to Agent Mike Downey (Matthew Modine playing the part looking and
behaving like a high school student pretending to be an FBI agent).  Downey
incompetently not only gets spotted by DeMarco, but starts dating her.
     Now all of this could have been a funny set of circumstances.  There
are a lot of odd scenes, but none ever get even near to funny.  Or Demme's
film could have been whimsical if he had given some real depth to his
characters.  that was the approach of John Huston's PRIZZI'S HONOR.  But
there characters are all flat stereotypes of little intrinsic warmth or
interest.  They are mostly hoods with room temperature IQs; rich, spoiled,
screaming wives of hoods; and FBI agents whom you would not trust to be
crossing guards.  This is a flat, uninteresting, totally insight-free look
behind the headlines at the families of crime figures.  The characters are
better forgotten; the humor is not forgettable because it is almost
impossible to find in the first place.  This film is to PRIZZI'S HONOR what
HOGAN'S HEROES is to STALAG 17.  Rate MARRIED TO THE MOB a low 0 on the -4
to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Spanish Prisoner, The (1997)
     In David Mamet's THE SPANISH PRISONER, Campbell Scott stars as
mathematical genius Joe Ross who has developed some unspecified
industrial process that will allow whatever company has it to rule some
very lucrative market.  He is presenting his process and his estimate
of its probable value at a special meeting with his company's
executives.  The setting for this meeting is a luxurious Caribbean
island.  As part of his reward he is told to enjoy the resources of the
island for a couple of days at his company's expense.  While there he
strikes up a friendship with Susan Ricci (played by Rebecca Pidgeon), a
company secretary who shared his plane to the island.  Photographing
her he also accidentally photographs Jimmy Dell (played by Steve
Martin), a well-to-do man of mystery.  Dell has the odd talent of being
irritating one moment and ingratiating the next.  Jimmy asks Joe to
deliver a package to his sister on his return and the twisty plot is
off and rolling.
     This is a fun film, one that ties up the viewer in many mysteries
of who is doing what to whom.  Just what is going on is different
depending on who really is Joe's friend and who is only pretending to
be.  This could be a clever story with a little rewriting to the
script, but it is not a script whose plot bears too close scrutiny.
There are holes and there are some very unlikely assumptions on the
part of the plotters in this film.  If one does not absolutely insist
on a plot credibility of story, the film is a reasonably tangled
puzzle.
     Scott and Pidgeon are sufficient in the main roles, but neither
has a lot of screen charisma.  As is often the case, the interesting
characters in a Mamet film are in the peripheral roles.  Steve Martin
is a surprisingly good actor given that he started his career as a
counter-culture stand-up comedian and his film career as the star of
the dim-witted THE JERK.  He has long since proven that he can do much
better than that.  Here he has the suavity of a Cary Grant and
tremendous personal magnetism.  He is magnetic even when he says things
like "Always do business as if the person you're doing business with is
trying to screw you, because he probably is.  And if he's not, you can
be pleasantly surprised."  The rest of the cast is just fine.  It is
particularly good to see Ricky Jay, sleight-of-hand artist and sometime
actor.  He is extremely natural on the screen and is almost the
trademark of a David Mamet film.  Speaking of Mamet trademarks, with
David Mamet directing there is nearly always a few scenes in which the
actors deliver their lines in a total deadpan in an extremely affected
style. I am not sure why Mamet does this, but you can almost always
find a few such scenes.
     While none of the plot twists should be entirely unexpected for
the viewer, this is as much a game as a film to see and to pick apart.
I would give it a 6 on the 0 to 10 scale, and a high +1 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Batman Returns (1992)
          Capsule review:  Three angry costumed neurotics battle
     in a big, silly, lovable comic book on the screen.  Two
     lesser villains from the comic turn out to be much more
     intriguing than the Joker on the wide screen.  This is a
     terrific, surrealist film.  Rating: high +2 (-4 to +4).
     Warning: minor plot spoilers in this review, almost all taken
     from the film's publicity.
     In 1983, for the 50th anniversary of KING KONG, engineers tried to
inflate a fifty-foot gorilla balloon on the Empire State Building.  It was a
real fiasco.  It never got more than half inflated, looked absurd, and
became a real embarrassment.  When asked what he thought of it, a Japanese
tourist said, "I love it!  It's so American!  It's big, it's silly, and it
doesn't work."  BATMAN RETURNS is a film that could be made only in America.
It's big; it's silly; it doesn't work.  And above all it is lovable.  It is
a mammoth King Kong balloon of a film that is nearly as endearing for what
doesn't work as for what does.  It is one of those rare films that could end
up appealing to art film fans and to Friday-night fun-seekers.  It is
genuinely one of the most bizarre films ever made.  Its explosions of
surrealism and its warped characters make its predecessor BATMAN seem pale
and lukewarm.  Rather than one villain, this film offers three and manages
to make two of them much more interesting than Jack Nicholson was as The
Joker.  In BATMAN film the viewer knew how the Joker became the Joker.  In
this film the viewer goes the additional step of saying, "Yeah, if that
happened to me, I think I'd become like the Penguin or Catwoman."
     The film opens with a monster child being born to a rich household.
Rather than keep this horrible little creature, his parents set him adrift
in a basket in a sewer.  There he is adopted by the penguins living in the
sewer.  ("What penguins in the sewer?" you ask.  Shhh!  Let Mr. Burton tell
his story!  Just accept it that there are a lot of intelligent penguins
living in the sewer ... with the clowns.)
     Meanwhile, a big industrialist who pollutes the same sewer and is
planning to steal a giant electrical charge from the city.  (No, don't ask
about that one either.)  Max Shreck (played by Christopher Walken) is the
industrialist and he is *really* nasty to his mousey, frumpy secretary
Selina Kyle (played by Michelle Pfeiffer). Between him and her lackluster
lifestyle, she is getting ready to explode.  Selina comes home each night to
her lonely apartment, calls, "Honey, I'm home," reminds herself that she is
not married, feeds her cat, and listens to her mother's brow-beating phone
messages.  Eventually when circumstances make Shreck see Selina as a threat
he throws her out a very high window.  Miraculously she is not killed and in
some mysterious way is rescued by alley cats.  (Hey, look, if the sewer
penguins can save a monster baby....)  Selina completely makes herself over
as the super-feminist, militant Catwoman, complete with skintight vinyl cat
suit.  ("Life's a bitch; now so am I!" she says.)  Suddenly she is wreaking
havoc with a bullwhip and doing amazing athletic flips.  ("How come she can
do that now?" you asked.  Shhh!  Now I've warned you.)  VARIETY aptly calls
her "a kitten with a whip." About this time the adult version of our monster
baby emerges from the sewer with his army of clowns to make himself loved
and to find his parents.  He is nicknamed the Penguin (and played by Danny
DeVito).  Shreck decides to use the Penguin in a plan to discredit Batman
and to have the Mayor ousted and replace him with the Penguin.  He is going
to create a crime wave and make the Mayor look so bad that the people will
replace him with the Penguin.  ("If that scheme works, how come Dinkins is
still Mayor of New York?" you ask.  Shhh!  Now I'm not going to warn you
again.)  Catwoman and the Penguin team up, knowing that with the Mayor thrown
out they will be sitting in the catbird seat.  After that the plot gets
strange and a little hard to believe.
     To say there are gaps in the plotting of BATMAN RETURNS is a gross
understatement.  This is a film that somehow survives major lapses in logic.
You never know what is going to turn up in the sewer next without rhyme or
reason.  There seem to be whole rooms of furniture, troops of clowns, and
colonies of penguins.  Also in this world anyone who dons a weird suit
suddenly becomes an athlete ready for the Beijing Circus.  We see Batman,
the self-appointed vigilante, use lethal force on criminals in the street.
Then later he lectures Catwoman on the importance of letting the law punish
the bad.  In another inconsistency Batman berates Alfred for revealing his
identity to Vicki Vale, but carelessly allows Catwoman to learn who he is,
and later intentionally reveals his identity to Max Shreck.  (It is
interesting that the film does go back and explain a plot hole from the
previous film.)  Other places the plot assumes impossible capabilities for
the Batmobile (it can be wider on the inside than it is on the outside).
Then it assumes that every family in Gotham would make the same mistake of
leaving the same valuable unguarded.
     And with all these gaffes there is a lot to like in the new Batman film.
The late Anton Furst's set designs from the first film have been made more
dreamlike and often given an EDWARD SCISSORHANDS feel by the new production
designer Bo Welch.  There are numerous allusions and touches in the film.
The Batman character was initially inspired, at least in part, by the idea
of a crime-fighter as stealthy, dark, and mysterious as Dracula, the
original bat-man.  The first screen adaptation of the novel DRACULA was the
1922 German classic NOSFERATU, in which the actor who played the animal-like
vampire was Max Schreck (whose name was slightly modified for the allusion,
but is still noticeable).
     A rather nifty but probably nearly unnoticed allusion is a woman clown
dressed in 18th Century French attire who delivers her lines in a sleepy
monotone.  Could this be an allusion to Glenda Jackson playing a manic-
depressive playing Charlotte Corday in MARAT/SADE?  There are multiple
allusions to Burton's best previous film, EDWARD SCISSORHANDS.  Much of the
photography has very similar visual images.  Statues in the snow, such as
are shown at the old zoo, look a lot like Edward's topiary.  The opening
logo is over snow, not unlike the snow of the opening of EDWARD
SCISSORHANDS.  Danny Elfman, who scored all three films, in BATMAN RETURNS
has borrowed themes from BATMAN, but also style from his EDWARD SCISSORHANDS
score.  Choral voices under the snow scenes show up a lot in this film as
they did in EDWARD SCISSORHANDS.  One almost wonders, incidentally, with all
the Christmas imagery if this film was really intended for a summer release.
One nice visual touch is that what looks like a line of virile Batmen
standing in line in one scene is a closet of costumes.  The only thing
missing from the Batmen are chins.  If Batman is a dramatic-looking figure
in costume, it is the costume that looks so impressive, not him.  You could
put Rick Moranis in that costume and he would look dangerous.
     Indeed, after all the discussion prior to the first film as to whether
Michael Keaton could really play Batman, the role has once again turned out
to be surprisingly undemanding.  The suit gives Batman his stature, the
script gives him a little complexity, and Keaton steps through the role
fulfilling its demands without contributing anything extra.  While that made
him the best thing in the first installment, this time it just did not hack
it.  This is Pfeiffer's and DeVito's film.  Living secretly in the sewers,
hatching his plans, the Penguin clearly borrows heavily from THE PHANTOM OF
THE OPERA.  Yet at the same time he can turn hot and angry in seconds, like
Joe Pesci's character in GOODFELLAS.  He has not in my memory had a role
that allows him such rage or such range.
     Until now I have always considered Michelle Pfeiffer to be a
marvelously sexy woman who wears a lot of make-up and who does not have a
whole lot of talent.  Sex appeal and make-up pulled her through DANGEROUS
LIAISONS and THE FABULOUS BAKER BOYS, but not for one moment of her acting
have I ever considered her impressive.  However, I can no longer imagine
anyone else being better as the Catwoman.  Her uncompromising fury makes her
a male chauvinists' worst nightmare.  One moment she is pretending to be
shocked that Batman would dare hit a woman, the next striking out at him for
so much as daring to hesitate.  Forget chivalry--this woman wants blood and
will do whatever it takes!
     As a side note: it is good to see Tim Burton taking a risk for a
friend: Paul Reubens is back working again in spite of what is now rumored
to be a rather unfair rap.
     There is a surprising richness of themes in this film.  Batman's own
story is distorted and reflected in the two colorful villains.  All three
have their origins in pain.  All three have donned their costumes to work
out their own personal neuroses.  All three characters seem to live by the
motto that in rage and solitude there is strength. Even animals are
compassionate compared to the brutal humans. The two tortured villains are
each save in their moments of weakness by animals. The Penguin, like Edward
Scissorhands, longs to be normal instead of a freak.  Does Batman wear the
animal costume to set himself apart from humanity and to make himself a
freak?
     To extent the sentiment of the Japanese tourist, BATMAN RETURNS could
have been made only in the United States.  Only in the United States could
$80M be spent bringing a comic book story to the screen, unembarrassed.  One
need only look at BARBARELLA or the Perry Rhodan film MISSION STARDUST to
see how it could have gone wrong.  I think America still leads the world in
big, brash, silly films.  That may not be much, but it still something in
which to take some pride.
     While I thought the first Batman film rated only a 0, I'd give this one
a high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.  You ain't seen nothing like this film.

Title
Review for Taking Sides (2001)
    CAPSULE: This is a film that avoids easy answers.  Wilhelm 
    Furtwangler, then the world's greatest orchestra conductor 
    stayed in Germany and cooperated with the Nazis.  What were 
    his views, was he a war criminal or a secret resistance 
    fighter?  How much did he know about crimes against humanity?  
    The US government investigated him after the war and this 
    film is a dramatization of that investigation.  Rating: 
    8 (0 to 10), high +2 (-4 to +4)
In my opinion one of the best films of the last few years is 
Istvan Szabo's SUNSHINE, a film that covers the fortunes of a 
Jewish Hungarian family under the reigns of three different 
regimes, Hungarian aristocrats, Nazis, and Communists.  Szabo's 
follow-up film, a German production, is much more limited in 
scope.  It is about the post-war investigation of who criminally 
supported the Nazis and who opposed them.  Ronald Harwood's 
screenplay ambiguously looks at the investigation of a great 
classical music conductor who stayed on in Germany when the Nazis 
took power and became the most popular conductor of the Third 
Reich.
Maj. Steve Arnold (played by Harvey Keitel) has been assigned by 
his superiors to investigate Wilhelm Furtwangler (Stellan 
Skarsgard), perhaps Europe's greatest classical music conductor.  
When other artists fled Germany, Furtwangler remained behind and 
conducted for the Hitler and his henchmen.  After the war is over 
Arnold assigned to interview Furtwangler and members of his 
orchestra and if appropriate to prosecute him for war crimes.  He 
secretly is told by his commanding officer to find Furtwangler 
guilty.  From there we follow him and learn a little about Arnold 
and something about Furtwangler and his orchestra.  As he 
interviews members of the wartime orchestra Arnold starts noticing 
odd peculiarities that may or may not point to a conspiracy 
against his investigation.  There is a certain sameness to the 
responses that he is getting.  Perhaps any cooperation he is 
getting has been in some ways managed.  If so, perhaps he can 
never come to the truth.
In large part the film is about mind games that Arnold uses to 
manipulate his interviewees and especially Furtwangler.  Where the 
script has problems is that in the end it is so ambiguous.  It has 
no obvious resolution and not much of a final act.  When it is 
over whether anything has been established is open to 
interpretation.  Perhaps that is better than so many films that 
make it all to obvious what the audience should believe, but it is 
like watching a murder mystery and never finding out who the 
killer is.  We are given clues to something but they are never 
tied up.  In the end we just know more about both Arnold and 
Furtwangler.
The film is basically a stage play.  The visual is not very 
important.  Corners are cut visually including touches like 
filling windows with photographs to avoid having to shoot on 
location.  As with a stage play, what this film centers on the 
dialog, and that is intriguing.  I rate the film an 8 on the 0 to 
10 scale and a high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.  [There is one piece 
of sloppiness few people but me would notice.  At one point we 
clearly see Arnold's desk calendar say "Jan 16 Tues."  A quick 
mental calculation told me that combination could occur in 1945 
and then not again until 1951.  The events had to take place in 
1946 or 1947.  A possible date could be obtained from any World 
Almanac.] 

Title
Review for Defending Your Life (1991)
          Capsule review:  Find out where Southern Californians go
     when they die.  Albert Brooks's life-after-death comedy is
     charming and fun, but sidesteps substance.  Rating: low +1.
     Albert Brooks writes, directs, and stars in subtle little comedies
about human foibles.  He has a good feel for small characters and a good ear
for dialogue.  His MODERN ROMANCE has him wooing a beautiful woman with whom
he is unable to get along.  His LOST IN AMERICA has him quitting a good job
in a fit of pique and then going out in an RV to discover a real America
that is not what he thought it was.  Each gives a hint what he thinks life
is about, but it is open to some interpretation.  In DEFENDING YOUR LIFE he
turns to fantasy so instead of hinting he can come right out and state his
values.
     A Brooksian character, Daniel, dies on his birthday and finds himself
in a very Californian view of an afterlife.  In Judgment City he is given a
hearing to defend his life and the way that he has led it.  At stake is
whether he will attain a higher plane in the next life or not.  Rather than
just hint at his values, the way Brooks as screenwriter did in previous
films, he now can posit a heavenly host who can say, "This is the standard
by which you will be judged."  And his standard comes down to "Be brave."
If you do not insist on the salary you think you deserve, if you do not take
a chance on your investments, if you do not have sex with someone when you
want it, it will be held against you in Brooks's afterlife.  Ethics count
for nothing.  Helping others if not done in a spectacular feat of courage
counts for nothing.  Courage is what counts.  What could have been a view
into Brooks's personal philosophy suffers greatly from the apparent
shallowness of that philosophy.
     At heart then, the film misses a chance to be about something profound
and instead is just another film like L. A. STORY and SCENES FROM A MALL
about California values.  This particular vision of Limbo-adjusted-for-
Californians is a vision of what Brooks thinks his contemporaries would like
in an afterlife.  It is garish hotels and gourmet food.  You can eat as much
as you like without worrying about calories, cholesterol, or capacity.
During the day you have hearings on your integrity as a person, then at
night you can go hear a comic or see what you were in previous lives in a
sort of upscale convention center.
     Brooks's character meets and falls in love with the perfect woman,
Julia (played by Meryl Streep).  She is easy-going and affable and was a
hero in her previous life.  Julia is not so much a woman as a walking good
example.  She is sailing through judgment while Daniel is having serious
problems with a strident prosecutor (played by Lee Grant) and an enigmatic
and strange attorney played by Rip Torn.
     DEFENDING YOUR LIFE is diverting, but the ending is weak and the
philosophy is shallow.  I rate it a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Back to the Beach (1987)
     Twenty-five to twenty years ago, American International Pictures had
targeted a teen-age audience and was churning out cheap films for a ready
market.  Their main staples were quickly-thrown-together horror films and
their "Beach Party" series.  That series included BEACH PARTY (1963), MUSCLE
BEACH PARTY (1964), BIKINI BEACH (1964), PAJAMA PARTY (1964), BEACH BLANKET
BINGO (1965), HOW TO STUFF A WILD BIKINI (1965), and GHOST IN THE INVISIBLE
BIKINI (1966).  Annette Funicello starred in the first six and Frankie
Avalon in the first five.  (Only Harvey Lembeck as Eric Von Zipper was in
all seven.)  Inspired, perhaps, by the trend to take 50s and 60s TV programs
and do 80s sequels, Paramount is this year telling the story of what
happened after Annette and Frankie grew up and got married.  They are a
generation older and returning to the haunts of their youth.
     Today, Annette is a perky peanut-butter pusher and Frankie owns a Ford
dealership in Ohio.  They take their would-be punk son to visit their
daughter on the old beach in California.  Their daughter (played by Lori
Loughlin, who seems to be the only one in the film who knows how to act) is
shacking up with a fiance about whom she has not told her parents, and
Frankie reacts just like any of the fathers in the old series.  Also along
for the ride is Connie Stevens as Annette's "bad girl" rival in the earlier
films.  This is something of a trick on the audience, of course.  Connie
Stevens never appeared in the original series.
     BACK TO THE BEACH is enjoyable for about half an hour.  Then the
premise starts wearing thin and the comedy gets very uneven.  The producers
have assembled a dozen or so TV characters from the 50s and 60s plus a
somewhat out-of-place Pee-Wee Herman.  The best line of the film, delivered
by an aging Bob Denver, is a wry comment on the logic of GILLIGAN'S ISLAND.
On the whole, BACK TO THE BEACH is better than might have been expected, but
it is still only a high 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Lone Star (1996)
     It is not easy to pigeon-hole what John Sayles's new film LONE
STAR is about.  At least superficially it is a murder mystery, but
there is a lot more to this film.  Sayles has written a complex and
textured look at life in a border town wracked with ethnic tension from
the volatile combination of Whites, Blacks, Mexican immigrants (both
legal and illegal), and even some Indians.  This is a story of
corruption and of strained parent/offspring relationships.  There are
three father/son pairs and one mother/daughter pair and in each case
the parent has caused his offspring to resent him by some behavior or
action.
     The story takes place in the generally peaceful border town of
Frontera, Texas.  The plot is set in motion when the remains of a man
killed in the early 1970s are found.  A sheriff's badge is found among
the bones, and so current sheriff Sam Deeds (played by Chris Cooper)
assumes that the dead body belongs to a former sheriff of Frontera,
Charlie Wade (played in flashbacks by Kris Kristofferson).  Murdering
Wade was almost a public service since he was a corrupt sheriff and
vicious bully who had been seen murdering suspects.  Sam immediately
starts to suspect his own father Buddy (played in flashbacks by Matthew
McConaughey).  Buddy is something of a local hero for having kicked out
Charlie Wade and becoming sheriff himself.  The town remembers Buddy as
ending corruption and bringing integrity to the office of sheriff, but
this hero-worship does not quite square with Sam's remembrances of his
father.  Sam remembers his father as being a bad sheriff, only
appearing good by contrast to his predecessor.  The young sheriff has
unfinished business with his dead father and whom he remembers with no
little hatred.  Sam has to dig into his father's reputation and the
incidents of more than two decades ago to try to understand this new
case.  At the same time he is courting Pilar Cruz (Elizabeth Pena), the
daughter of Mexican immigrants, whom he loved at the age of fourteen
but from whom he was separated by his father and Pilar's mother.  Cruz
is a local history teacher who finds herself embroiled in ethnic
tension at her school, a new romance with Sam Deeds, and a touchy
relationship with her mother (Miriam Colon).  There is also a subplot
with the Black community.
     Sayles wrote, directed, and even edited the film.  He does a
reasonable job of weaving together several complex threads of plot into
a single story that very much give a three-dimensional view of life in
Frontera.  One weakness of the script is that the is an almost
completely disjoint plot of an Army base in the town and a Black bar
that George Wade would shake down for protection money.  This forms a
second whole line of plot sewn to the main line in only one or two
superficial stitches.  Some of the same themes appear in each story,
but neither story really depends on the other.  Together they do give a
better view of this small Texas town.  In each story the view includes
life not just at it is now, but also how it was when it was controlled
by sadistic Charlie Wade.  In the main story Sam needs to reconstruct
this past to find the facts behind the old killing.  In the other the
basis for the current trouble is also in the past of about the same
time.
     Chris Cooper is probably best remembered for his film debut as the
young union organizer from MATEWAN.  While the script calls for him to
make some of the hardest decisions of his life, he does not convey very
deep emotion beyond a sort of sad wisdom.  It is much more interesting
to watch Elizabeth Pena whose eyes seem to convey more of the sorrow
and pain of her life.  The role that will get noticed, though it is
much smaller, is that of Kris Kristofferson as the malignant corrupt
sheriff.  Kristofferson is not known for tough-guy roles, but here he
can be easily believed as the evil that hangs over the whole town, even
after his removal from the scene.  Good character performances come
from Joe Morton, Ron Canada, and Miriam Colon.
     Sayles has managed to turn a not-too-promising ethnic-tension plot
into a film that may well rank with MATEWAN as the best enjoyed of his
films.  The film is intelligent and at the same time clever.  I rate it
a low +3 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Godfather: Part III, The (1990)
     In these days of making popular films into series, by far the most
respected series is the now three-part "Godfather" saga.  Both THE GODFATHER
and THE GODFATHER PART II won the Best Picture Academy Award and it is very
likely we will be seeing a campaign to get THE GODFATHER PART III the same
award.  No sequel other than THE GODFATHER PART II has ever won Best
Picture.  The series has even outlived the accuracy of the title, since
Michael Corleone was certainly not the Godfather in PART I, and seems only
rarely to use the title of "Godfather."  In many ways this is also the most
deserving of being a series since the stories really do build on each other
and lose a great deal if viewed out of order.  There is now authenticity
from the fact that when a character remembers an event from years earlier,
the audience also remembers it from a point in time that is genuinely years
earlier for them.  If Michael remembers the death of his first wife many
years ago, I also remember it from eighteen years ago.
     It is not that there is really such original writing.  In many ways we
are repeatedly seeing the same story.  (For fear of spoilers I can list only
some superficial parallels here and will say more in the afterward.)  Each
film starts with a long sequence that is a celebration of an important
family event: a wedding, a confirmation, an award from the Pope.  Each also
concludes with a family event.  One thinks of the films as being about the
family business but, in fact, the subject is very rarely even mentioned.
There is very little about how the Corleones acquire their money.  Instead,
these films are almost exclusively about meta-business issues such as the
politics of dealing with the competition; the issue arises in each film.
Perhaps the reason for the chosen concentration is that the Corleones would
be much less sympathetic if the films were about their day-to-day business.
Even visual touches are repeated.  There is always a scene in the Corleone
kitchen with a big pot on the stove.
     As the film opens Michael Corleone--do I really have to say he is
played by Al Pacino?--is still trying to whitewash the family name and to
live up to the nobility of the name Corleone (Lionheart).  He has
contributed vast sums of money to charitable works.  At one point we see a
hospital named for Vito Corleone and probably not because Vito provided them
with patients.  At the opening Michael is contributing $100,000,000 for
poverty relief for Sicily and receiving the order of San Sebastian from the
Pope.  Of note is that there is far less of the ethnic Italian feel to this
event than there was at Connie's wedding.  The Corleones are apparently
assimilating American styles.  Michael feels that he is finally achieving
legitimacy and respectability.
     But there is a problem with Vincent Mancini (played by Andy Garcia)
who, despite the surname, is the son of Sonny Corleone (played by James Caan
in Parts I and II).  Vincent is the most likely heir to the family business,
but he is also something of a loose cannon.  He is as temperamental and
power-hungry as his father was.  Vincent has a feud with his current boss, a
hood named Joey Zasa (played by Joe Mantegna).
     Vincent is attracted to Michael's daughter, Mary.  In fact, the choice
of the plain-looking Sofia Coppola, the director's daughter, for Mary
instead of the originally cast attractive Winona Ryder may actually work for
the film.  Coppola is not a great actress but putting a less attractive
woman in the role creates interesting speculation as to Vincent's motives.
There is no great mystery as to why Vincent would be interested in a woman
as attractive as Winona Ryder.  But Vincent has an eye for good-looking
women and the power-hungry nephew's interest in Mary could well be power
rather than physical attraction.  In any case, Michael is dead set against a
relationship between these two grandchildren of Vito Corleone.  It is
Vincent's feud and Michael's relation with the Vatican that are the
springboard for this third story.
     Michael's other child is Anthony who, like the young Michael, wants no
part of the family business and wants instead to sing grand opera.  In fact,
his debut performance at La Scala, in the lead no less, becomes an important
event in the film.  The choice of opera, Pietro Mascagni's "Cavalleria
Rusticana," is of course highly appropriate.  The title literally translates
to "Rustic Chivalry" and refers to the code of honor of the poor Sicilians
of the story.  The concept of this Sicilian code of honor pervades the
"Godfather" films as well as the opera.  The emphasis on this-favor-for-
that-favor, how one treats the Don, and symbolic gestures such as "the Kiss
of Death" are equally  important in the series and in this opera of the
hatred of Turridu and Alfio.  In the time-honored Sicilian custom, Alfio
challenges Turridu by embracing him and Turridu signifies he accepts the
challenge by biting Alfio's ear.  Naturally, the opera ends in bloodshed.
The sweetly melancholic Intermezzo from "Cavalleria Rusticana" may already
be familiar to filmgoers from its use in RAGING BULL.  Coppola uses it in
THE GODFATHER PART III to underscore the final scenes of the film.
     So does this new film live up to its predecessors?  It is flawed, of
course, but then PART II diluted its effect by jumping around in time to
pick up pieces of storyline both before and after the first film.  That was
the flaw that television thought it could correct when it re-edited the
first two parts into one chronological story.  (Comments on that effort will
appear in my afterword.)  The third film is no more flawed and probably in a
league with the first two.  I would rate it a high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.
(In case you're curious, I would rate THE GODFATHER a +3 and THE GODFATHER
PART II a high +2.)
[Spoiler follows]
     Spoiler-afterword: Earlier in this review I talked about a repeating
structure in the "Godfather" films.  Let me be more detailed.  The films
always start with a major family event and they always end with a bloodbath
that coincides with another major family event: baptism, marriage-
separation, son's operatic debut at La Scala.  In each case Michael is
trying to make himself or his whole family legitimate, but he is stymied.
There is some unspeakable act committed by an apparent enemy: the Tataglias,
the Rosatos, Joey Zasa.  Michael decides his honor and the general safety of
the family demand revenge.  However, the perpetrator is only the apparent
enemy.  The real enemy pulling the strings does not show his face except as
an apparent peacemaker: Barzini, Roth, Altobello.  In the end the ersatz
peacemaker and all his co-conspirators are dispatched in the bloodbath that
spans only hours or minutes.  This strikes me as being too strong a parallel
in structure to be just coincidence.  It, in fact, goes beyond formula.
Each film is a repetition of the same melodrama.  Michael is trying to be
good.  Someone interprets this as weakness and moves against him.  The urge
for revenge with Sicilian anger takes over.  Vito's mother, too, promised
Don Cicci that she and Vito would not take action against him and asked for
peace.  He murdered her in cold blood.  Vito's Sicilian revenge must wait
for the proper time but honor demands it.  Vito's son Michael replays this
melodrama in each film.
     I did not see the television re-editing in which the first two parts
were edited so they told one story in chronological order.  I have been told
it is an improvement.  I find it hard to believe, however, since each story
is a re-telling of an instance of Michael repeating his father's tragedy.
Re-editing would violate the internal structure.  The "improved" version
sounds too much like taking Shakespeare's HENRY IV Parts I and II and HENRY
V, editing them together to make one long play, then showing it over five
nights with commercials.

Title
Review for Long Walk Home, The (1990)
     THE LONG WALK HOME is a powerful and moving film telling the story of
simultaneous victories over racism and sexism during the 1955 bus boycott in
Montgomery, Alabama.  Sissy Spacek plays Miriam Thompson, who slowly comes
to realize her own importance and her power to affect events when she is
torn between loyalty to her family on one hand and her social conscience on
the other.
     Miriam, the wife of an influential real estate developer, is shocked
when the police harass her maid Odessa Cotter (played by Whoopi Goldberg)
for accompanying Miriam's children to a whites-only park.  Using her
position, she coerces the policeman into apologizing.  When Rosa Parks is
arrested for refusing to give up her seat on a bus, the blacks boycott the
buses and Odessa begins the wearing routine of walking to and from the
Thompson house.  Initially more out of the need to have Odessa cleaning the
house on time than out of any conviction, Miriam saves Odessa the long walk
two mornings a week by picking her up on the way back from a convenient
grocery.  She hides this from her husband and his red-neck younger brother.
Eventually her husband will find out and she will have to choose between her
husband's insistence that no white woman can drive a black one and her own
sense that the bus boycott is right and should be supported.
     The film is a powerful statement, but it is doubtful that after 36
years any of the audience will have any sympathies against the boycott.
Given that is the case, one might expect that director Richard Pearce and
screenwriter John Cork could afford to be a little magnanimous to the losing
side.  This most certainly is not the case.  With the exception of Miriam
and her children, whites are uniformly portrayed as being racist, telling
racist jokes, and being hypocritical.  Blacks are all honest church-going
people, wonderful to each other in closely-knit families.  While these
stereotypes may be substantially correct, the portrayal makes it a little
overly obvious where the audience's sympathies should lie.  The film also
tampers a bit with historical fact.  The CURRENT BIOGRAPHY article on Rosa
Parks says that it had previously been the practice to force blacks to enter
the bus at the front, pay the driver, exit the bus, and re-enter at the rear
door so as not to walk past whites already on the bus.  However, this
practice had already been abandoned at the time of Parks's arrest.  The film
depicts this practice as if it were still going on at the time of the
arrest.  Certainly the truth is damning enough without distorting it to make
an even stronger case.  While it would be difficult to exaggerate the degree
of polarization of whites against blacks at the time, this film manages.
While it was a small percentage of Southern whites who supported the black
cause, this film implies there were no more than a half dozen or so adult
whites supporting the blacks, which does something of a disservice to those
whites who were courageous to stand up for their conscience.  It is the
opposite problem to the one of MISSISSIPPI BURNING, which went to the other
extreme, having it be mostly whites in the form of the FBI coming in and
fighting for black freedom.  My suspicion is that THE LONG WALK HOME is the
closer to being accurate, but the truth lies somewhere in the range between
the points-of-view of the two films.
     Pacing is also a minor problem.  It takes Miriam a long time to decide
she will make a stand, then when the story gets going, it is over, with the
remaining history told in screen titles.  Still, THE LONG WALK HOME is good
filmmaking.  It makes the viewer angry about injustice rather than just
depressed about it, the way GUILTY BY SUSPICION does.  On that basis it
deserves a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for L.A. Confidential (1997)
     They are almost a genre by themselves, Los Angeles and San
Francisco crime dramas.  Set in the short space of time around the
World War II are the Philip Marlowe, Easy Rawlins, Sam Spade and a host
of others.  Ranking with the best of them and inviting comparison to
CHINATOWN (which it may even beat) is L. A. CONFIDENTIAL.  Curtis
Hanson who also directed THE HAND THAT ROCKS THE CRADLE and THE RIVER
WILD has given us a rich adaptation of the James Ellroy novel,
directing and co- authoring the screenplay with Helgeland.  He has
retained a complex interconnected plot, but rarely a bewildering one--
not an easy thing to do.  In it Los Angeles is a completely
interconnected ecosystem of police, organized crime, small-time crime,
race, politics, TV, movies, law, and journalism.  There is a second
system interconnecting idealism, bigotry, lies, half-lies, blackmail,
posturing, cover-ups, frame-ups, delusions, and publicity.  It is
impossible to give a decent description of the plot in one or two
paragraphs as the film has enough plot for two or three films.  At 136
minutes, L. A. CONFIDENTIAL can pack in this much plot only because
nothing is wasted.
     Against the backdrop of a 1953 Los Angeles rotting from within we
have the story of three cops.  Each an idealist in certain ways but
willing to get his hands dirty for his principles.  Bud White (played
by Russell Crowe) has a personal crusade against men who beat women.
He also believes in the code of silence protecting other cops who break
the law.  His captain, Dudley Smith (James Cromwell) figures that make
White not very smart and uses him for muscle and for semi-legal
activities of keeping mobsters out of Los Angeles.  Almost precisely
the opposite is Ed Exley (Guy Pearce).  Exley loves the letter of the
law and sees no reason to be loyal to other cops, but he also wants to
climb the ladder and to get all the glory he can gather.  The third cop
is Sgt. Jack Vincennes.  He gets his kicks being the police expert for
TV's "Badge of Honor" (a thinly disguised "Dragnet").  He like
hobnobbing with celebrities and with people like Sid Hudgeons (Danny
DeVito) the editor for the oxymoronically-named "Hush-Hush" true crime
magazine. The three cops get involved with a movie-star look-alike
prostitution ring run by suave Pierce Patchett (David Strathairn) and
particularly his Veronica Lake look-alike Lynn Bracken (Kim Bassinger).
A friend of hers gets herself murdered in a six-victim massacre at the
Nite Owl Coffee shop.
     One nearly wants to call the execution of this film flawless.  The
dialogue is crisp and ironic.  The script is tightly written with not a
single scene wasted or unimportant.  This is not a film that leaves you
a safe moment to go out for popcorn.  The characters are finely
defined.  No two are interchangeable.  Eventually we understand each
and why he does what he does.  If the film does anything superficially
it is in its explanation of why Exley is such a straight-arrow and why
White so hates men who beat women.  But the visuals really capture the
period.  (One minor error in period: the film shows the premiere of the
film WHEN WORLDS COLLIDE.  That would have been in 1951, George Pal's
follow-up WAR OF THE WORLDS was released in 1953.)  Jerry Goldsmith has
written a jazzy score with the feel of a 1950s film.
     It is amazing how much is packed even into a film of 136 minutes
and into what a neat package the pieces fit.  Be prepared to sit
through the entire film, there is not a single scene wasted and few
scenes the film can function without.  I give the film a +3 on the -4
to +4 scale.  Objectively this film probably ranks with CHINATOWN and
THE MALTESE FALCON.

Title
Review for Jumanji (1995)
     I was not expecting big things from JUMANJI.  The coming
attractions make it look like taking the basic concept of HELLRAISER--
the plaything that releases a world of horror--and crossing it with
something like THE ZEBRA IN THE KITCHEN, where animals on the loose
cause havoc.  And in the final analysis perhaps that is not too
inaccurate a description.  But there is considerably more wit and a
whole lot more style to this tale.  After an opening scene in the 1860s
with two children trying desperately to rid themselves of a mysterious
box, it is rediscovered in 1969 by Alan Parrish.  Parrish (played by
Adam Hann-Byrd) has problems enough.  He is bullied by his peers and
dominated by a dictatorial father who seems to run much of the town and
cannot relate to a child.  But young Alan does not know trouble until
he plays the game and on his first move is sucked into "the jungle"
where he remains for twenty-six years.  Only it really is a jungle and
twenty-six years really does pass.  The disappearance remains an
unsolved mystery.  And with a whiff of IT'S A WONDERFUL LIFE, much of
the town has degenerated as a result.  Now a new family has moved into
the house, Aunt Nora (Bebe Neuwirth) and the recently orphaned Judy
(Kirsten Dunst) and Peter (Bradley Pierce).  The two children
unwittingly start the game again and release (among other things) the
missing Alan (now played by Robin Williams).  Unfortunately, each roll
of the dice also releases some safari hazard into the real world.  Most
of these dangers escape the house and into the town.  Like the towns in
GREMLINS or NIGHT OF THE LIVING DEAD, it is slowly to coming to realize
that something strange and very dangerous is happening.  And the only
way to save the town is to finish the game so all the horrors can
return to the game board.  Yet with each roll of the dice some new
disaster escapes the game into the real world.  Each might be bad, but
the cumulative effect is startling.
     The visual effects from Industrial Light and Magic are impressive
but not altogether realistic.  The digitized animals are clearly just
that and in addition, the monkeys look more like Curious George than
real monkeys.  They are never totally convincing but as storybook
safari dangers they work just fine.  This is a film in which many
scenes involving the magic of the game have a very nice look.
     The visuals could overwhelm the characters, but the script by
Jonathan Hensleigh, Greg Taylor, and Jim Strain, based on the book by
Chris Van Allsburg, never lets that happen.  After a shaky start with
Robin Williams looking like the castaway from "Monty Python's Flying
Circus," he gives some real humanity to his role and does not indulge
in the usual Williams schtick.  Kirsten Dunst is fairly good but
JUMANJI must be child's play after her meaty performance in INTERVIEW
WITH THE VAMPIRE.  Bebe Neuwirth manages some nice touches as Aunt
Nora.  It is the kind of role that usually goes unnoticed--friendly
adult supervision in a film for children--but someone in the script
department was looking out for her.  Joe Johnston was a good choice for
director with a sense for integrating human performances with visual
effects.  He was the art director for visual effects on THE EMPIRE
STRIKES BACK and RETURN OF THE JEDI.  As director he made HONEY, I
SHRUNK THE KIDS and the underrated ROCKETEER.  He manages very well
here, though his direction was weakened for me by some slapstick late
in the movie.
     Parents should be warned that just the horror touches that will
delight ten-year-olds will be strong stuff for five-year-olds.  Adults
are warned not to not to leave children at the theater or they may miss
out on the fun.  I give this one a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for U-571 (2000)
     Well, let's get this out of the way immediately.  It did not
really happen this way.  If you read the statement at the end of the
film, even the film tells you that it did not happen this way.  The
first Enigma machine was captured months earlier than this film's
Spring 1942 setting.  It was the British H.M.S. Bulldog whose 1941
mission in the North Atlantic captured the first Enigma.  Americans did
capture a U-boat with an Enigma machine, but not until 1944--much later
in the war.  In fact, even that was a total foul-up.  If the Germans
learned that the Americans had captured an Enigma they would have
changed their codes and ruined the precious work done by the British
cryptographers.
     It was the British who cracked the German military code Enigma in
World War II (building on pervious work by Polish mathematicians
earlier in the war).  That task required a chain of extraordinary
feats, not the least of which was capturing one of the machines.  When
Michael Caton-Jones wanted to make an exciting film about flying
bombing runs over Germany he fibbed and made it the last flight of the
Memphis Belle in the film MEMPHIS BELLE.  The real last flight was not
so dramatic.  It is a sort of dramatic license.  Similarly when
Jonathan Mostow wanted to make a film about submarine warfare in World
War II, he invented a fictional American mission to capture an Enigma
box in 1942.  And for those who think that it is so terrible for
Americans to claim what was really a British accomplishment, I suggest
they look up David Lean's 1952 film THE SOUND BARRIER.  So now we are
even with the British.
     It is spring, maybe four months after Pearl Harbor, and the crew
of an American submarine, the S-33, is called back early from leave for
a special mission that will not wait.  Commanding the submarine through
this world of rain, wind, steel, fire, and water, a world of heavy
machinery, darkness, and loud explosions, is Captain Dahlgren (played
by Bill Paxton) and his second in command, just passed over for
promotion to his own command, is Lt. Andrew Tyler (Matthew
McConaughey).  Tensions arise as Tyler knows that the reason he was not
promoted is that Dahlgren would not recommend him for command.  But
Tyler is going to get his taste of command this mission.
     The S-33 has been modified to look like a German U-boat in a
deception intended to help the crew capture the disabled U-571.  This
U-boat has an Enigma code machine.  The plan is to capture the machine
and scuttle the U-boat so the Germans assume that the Enigma machine is
lost.  But as the title suggests, the U-boat will play a more important
role in the story than that.  Once the American crew finds the U-571
the pace of this film is non-stop up to the closing credits.
     The real problem with U-571 is the amount that has been recycled
from previous films.  The very first shot is just an eye staring.  In a
second or two we realize that it is an eye staring into a submarine
periscope.  It is very similar to the opening scene in THE RUSSIANS ARE
COMING, THE RUSSIANS ARE COMING.  In the next seconds the U-boat
torpedoes a ship and then looks around to see a destroyer headed
straight at the periscope.  Seen almost from the level of the surface
of the water it is a sobering sight.  It certainly was in the film DAS
BOOT.  The filmmakers have used very little imagination to show us
situations we have not seen before.  Perhaps DAS BOOT used up all the
good anxiety scenes that one can have with a U-boat.  But all the
classic submarine film scare sequences are somewhere here.  The
submarine is depth charged as the crew sits and listens waiting for the
concussion that will spell their death.  There is the sequence with a
submarine sinking too deep.  The water squirts in as if from a fire
hose and gauges crack.  A bolt flies like a bullet.  (That is why
submarine hulls are welded, not bolted.  That would not happen in real
life.)
     Jonathan Mostow, who is best known for having written and directed
the very different film BREAKDOWN, repeats those functions in this
film.  The script calls for Paxton to be mature and McConaughey to be a
little less self-possessed.  They do that reasonably well, but neither
gives a memorable performance.  McConaughey looks like he is under
pressure and sweats well, but does not make the audience identify with
him.  Harvey Keitel is a good actor who almost always plays someone
unsavory and somebody who lives outside of society.  It is something of
a departure seeing him playing a good decent career navy man with
nothing but decent intentions.  His few major scenes are really the
acting that I will remember.  Jon Bon Jovi is hardly noticeable in the
film and that is probably just fine.  Richard Marvin's score sounds
brassy and martial, but unlike the characters, the score plays it safe
and takes no chances.  Mostow, however, does take some chances and the
biggest is making this film that will obviously invite comparison to
the modern classic submarine film DAS BOOT.  He loses but, it is a
competition he could probably never have hoped to win.
     Perhaps we should consider U-571 to be just a fanciful thriller
set in World War II in the style of Alastair MacLean.  It is a "could
have happened but didn't" sort of action tale like THE GUNS OF
NAVARONE.  But for the familiarity of the situations I would have rated
it fairly well.  I give it 7 on the 0 to 10 scale and a low +2 on the
-4 to +4 scale.
     [In November 1999 PBS ran a very good documentary, "Decoding Nazi
Secrets" on what all was involved in breaking the code.  Details are
available at http://www.pbs.org/wgbh/nova/decoding.]  By the way,
capturing a U-boat is one thing, figuring out how to run it in a matter
of minutes is something very different.  It should have taken days.
That is one more place where this film takes liberties with the truth.

Title
Review for Antonia and Jane (1991)
     Jane frumps her way through life.  She never knows how to act or how to
dress.  Jane thinks that everyone else has read the book HOW TO FUNCTION IN
THE WORLD and nobody ever offered it to her.  To make matters worse her best
friend, whom she envies and hates, has just about everything.  Antonia lives
the good life.  Married to the lover she stole from Jane, she has a
responsible job high in the publishing business and a beautiful home.  She
also goes to the same psychiatrist that Jane does.  From her point of view
her life just goes from bad to worse.  From her point of view her life
stagnates while Jane has the courage to reinvent herself constantly and to
explore new aspects of her personality.
     Jane Hartman (played by Imelda Staunton) finds herself constitutionally
unable to complain or assert herself.  She floats like a cork on the
currents of life, letting the tides of others' wills push her one way and
then another.  And like the cork, she never floats half in the currents and
half out.  She has a series of freaky relationships, like one with a
boyfriend unable to have sex until he has been read to from the works of
Iris Murdoch.  Meanwhile her lifelong friend and rival Antonia McGill
(played by Saskia Reeves) faces a different set of problems, mostly bred of
her fast-track lifestyle.  Her husband has an unfortunate taste for variety
in bedmates.  Her own extra-curricular activities do not satisfy her and
only serve to complicate her life in bizarre ways.
     Beeban Kidron, who previously directed ORANGES ARE NOT THE ONLY FRUIT
presumably made ANTONIA AND JANE from BBC television.  Kidron gives some
Woody Allen twists to the old saw of the grass growing greener on the other
side of the fence.  The writer seasons her story with plenty of clever wit,
but in an end that comes much too soon in this 79-minute film, the story
amounts to no more than a humorous platitude.  I rate ANTONIA AND JANE a +1
on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Star Trek V: The Final Frontier (1989)
     Okay, what can I say?  I have heard a lot negative about STAR TREK V.
Maybe my expectations were lower for this film than for others in the
series.  And there is a lot that *is* wrong with STAR TREK V.  There is a lot
that it does not deliver that others in the series did.  The special
effects--which are rumored not to have been done by Industrial Light and
Magic because Shatner's and Nimoy's salaries--are not as perfect as in the
other films.  Well, fine.  The effects are not jarringly bad and did not get
in the way of the story.  There are a lot of silly and even stupid scenes.
There is a rescue at the beginning like something out of SUPERMAN that
irritated me.  If you have seen the coming attractions you have seen Jimmy
Doohan doing a silly pratfall.  There are serious style problems.  This is
not going to be one of the more popular Star Trek movies.
     But when it is all over, STAR TREK V has said something about the
nature of religious inspiration and the need to question it.  It did not use
its science fiction merely to give us an interesting backdrop for a
swashbuckler.  STAR TREK V is more subversive than LIFE OF BRIAN, and I
suspect move subversive  than THE LAST TEMPTATION OF CHRIST.  (I say I
suspect because I have not had an opportunity to see THE LAST TEMPTATION OF
CHRIST.  It seems somebody thought the ideas in it were too dangerous.
Luckily there are some relatively safe havens for free thought and science
fiction is one of them.)
     On a remote desert planet a messianic figure, a Vulcan named Sybok,
comes out of the wilderness with a religious mission, a mission that
requires a starship.  It is not difficult to guess what starship he is going
to get.  His plan , though convoluted, is perfectly logical.  Meanwhile, we
are treated to some very sappy scenes of the Enterprise's merry men on shore
leave at Yosemite National Park.  These would have been well left on the
cutting room floor.  Rest assured the plot will soon have Klingons, ship
capturings, a mission to where no anything has gone before.
     There is a lot in this film that the filmmakers will have a hard time
living down.  Nichelle Nichols, who by now looks like a grandmother,
attempts an absurd erotic dance against what looks like an astronomically
impossible backdrop.  There are slapstick scenes in elevator shafts.  There
is a sort of encounter group session in space that is pitifully cliched.
There is bad camerawork at times.  Then there is the puzzling question of
David Warner's role.  It was too big to be a cameo and too small to be
considered a major part.  An actor of his stature is unlikely to have signed
up for such a small role, so one wonders if there was more that was cut.
And the music is entirely retreaded from previous films.  For much of the
film, I was seriously disliking it.  But when it was all over, I liked what
it seemed to me the film had said.  It did for me what I want science
fiction to do for me.  So I give it a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     [SPOILERS FOLLOW]  I am certain I will be asked by someone what I
consider to be the subversive message of STAR TREK V.  If I have to put it
in a few sentences, it would be this: Religious inspiration is not to be
trusted.  You can feel what you think is the light of your god filling your
life and it can be a delusion.  It is possible that all religious fervor is
self-delusion that feels good but has not one iota of truth.  You cannot
trust your feelings, however powerful they are.  God, if He exists, must be
amenable to logic.  You have the right and the responsibility to question
politely what seems to be the word of God.  If it does not make sense to
you, you have the responsibility to deny it.
     Certainly the "god" in STAR TREK V is a false god and the believers in
this god are wrong, but who has more reason to believe in their own god than
the believers in the film?  What makes it more reason?  What is sufficient
reason?  The film is ultimately saying that reason is more important than
faith.

Title
Review for Last Night (1998)
     CAPSULE: The world will come to an end at midnight.  Everyone
knows it and must make a final peace with the last hours of their
lives.  This is an intelligent science fiction film with no special
effects, just personalities and ideas.  Rating: 8 (0 to 10), high +2
(-4 to +4)
   - It is the last night of the planet and several different people
     are reacting each in their own way to the end.  The film covers 6
     PM to midnight.  The main character is Patrick played by David
     McKellan who also wrote and directed.
   - Reminiscent of ON THE BEACH.  But much more so of a story Richard
     Matheson wrote, "The Last Day."  (P.S.  On rereading the 1953
     Matheson, this film is almost a loose adaptation of that story.
     The similarities may be mere coincidence, but they are numerous
     and they are very striking.)
   - US release may be problematical.  The title is lackluster and
     non-memorable, though very appropriate when you know about the
     film.  Also provincial Americans may not care about the end of the
     world coming to Toronto.  They probably would feel it would not
     affect them.  Perhaps a PBS release would be possible.
   - Patrick's family has declared it Christmas and are hurt that the
     (adult) children will not spend the whole evening with them.
   - Grocery stores mostly looted.  It seems though that one of
     everything is left.
   - Some people continue business as usual, some want sex, some react
     with religion, some riot.  Some people are in total denial.
   - Much comedy, much drama.
   - Very Canadian cast.
   - It does not get dark.  It is just always daytime.
   - Radio playing "Last Night I Didn't Get to Sleep At All."  How
     appropriate.
   - David Cronenberg as a kind of bland functionary manager at the gas
     company.  Genvieve Bujold as French teacher visiting former
     student.
   - Science fiction film with no special effects, cost about two
     million dollars.
   - The person you have been thrown together with by chance becomes
     the most important person to you for the rest of your life.
   - Why would it be so precisely at midnight?  What about other time
     zones?  What is the nature of what is destroying the world?

Title
Review for What's Eating Gilbert Grape (1993)
          Capsule review:  WHAT'S EATING GILBERT GRAPE is a
     delicate story which combines pathos and humor and which
     manages to avoid cliche while saying something about unsung
     nobility.  Johnny Depp plays the modern equivalent of a
     Capra-esque hero.  Rating: +2 (-4 to +4)
     The American film industry has the capital resources to attract some of
the best international directors to make what are essentially American
films.  Often these directors see the U.S. through the eyes of an outsider,
and let the viewer see his own country with a fresh perspective.  It is this
sort of freshness that directors like Louis Malle bring to films like
ATLANTIC CITY.  Lasse Hallstrom, who made the charming MY LIFE AS A DOG
about one character with low self-esteem, now has made an American film with
an older, but similar character.  In filming Peter Hedges screenplay based
on Hedges's own novel he gives us his view of a very small American town and
a sort of people who rarely are depicted in films.
     The setting is the fly-speck town is Endora, Iowa (though WHAT'S EATING
GILBERT GRAPE was actually shot in Texas).  A major town event occurs each
year when the local Airstream Trailer club drives a convoy of the aluminum
campers past the town.  Gilbert Grape (Johnny Depp) always brings his
mentally retarded younger brother Arnie (Oscar-nominated Leonardo DiCaprio)
to watch the campers go by.  Arnie is usually a real handful--nearly 18, he
is a wild animal requiring constant attention.  Among Arnie's distressing
habits is climbing the town's water tower from which he needs to be rescued
by the police.  Gilbert has had to control Arnie and be the de facto father
of the family since his own father committed suicide many years earlier.
Gilbert's mother is hyper-obese--in the range of 500 pounds--and she too
needs more care than she is able to give.
     Gilbert himself is an unassuming man, a clerk at a tiny grocery that is
dying from the competition of a huge supermarket nearby.  Like a George
Bailey in IT'S A WONDERFUL LIFE, he is without realizing it the person on
whom many depend and whom few seem to appreciate.  Everyone seems to rely on
him and take him for granted.  On top of that he lets himself be used in an
affair with a bored and unstable housewife (a thankless role for Mary
Steenburgen).  With the constant need to corral his brother, avoid the
husband of the Steenburgen character, handle a sister jealous of attention
given to Arnie, protect his mother from embarrassment by doing things like
secretly reinforce the floor weakened by her weight, Gilbert gets little
pleasure from life.  Enter Becky (Juliette Lewis of CAPE FEAR and HUSBANDS
AND WIVES) who is temporarily stranded in Endora when her grandmother's
camper has engine trouble.  Becky has a friendly but worldly nature that
allows her to see the nobility in Gilbert that others overlook.  While the
ending is a false step, the rest of the film more than compensates.
     WHAT'S EATING GILBERT GRAPE is a story that could easily have been
mishandled by making Gilbert too sugary noble, but Hedges and Hallstrom
create characters of depth and resonance.  And he is able to get some
impressive performances, especially from DiCaprio.  In his films Depp has
been a sort of modern James Dean who gets some sympathy from the audience
playing hurt and confused people.  But Depp's acting has never been the high
point of any of his films.  Here, at least, he is better than usual and
creates a character with some credibility.  But even better is DiCaprio
whose retardation is so well portrayed my wife was unsure if perhaps
DiCaprio himself isn't actually retarded.  (Though some thought tells one it
is extremely unlikely.)  Darlene Cates, in her first performance, gives real
humanity to the obese Momma.
     WHAT'S EATING GILBERT GRAPE reminds one of settings like those of
TENDER MERCIES and characters out of Capra.  I give it a +2 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Quest for Love (1971)
     One of the things I like to do occasionally in my film reviews is to
make reference to some very good film that I doubt most of my readers have
heard of and that I would like to call some attention to.  There are a lot
of decent films, and a handful of very good ones, that at this point may
exist only in the film libraries of obscure television stations, and when
these few prints disappear the films will be gone.  I would like to generate
some interest in four of these films, if not to help save them, at least to
alert people that if you do get a chance to see these films, it is a rare
chance and you should give them a try.
     Of course, there are a lot of obscure films that are showing up on
videotape today, many of them very poorly-made films, and it is ironic that
some terrific films are being over-looked, but in each case I think I can
understand why some producer would think the film would not sell well on
tape.  There are three science fiction films and one horror film.  However,
none of the film has special effects.  Particularly for science fiction,
people have come to expect visual effects.  I guess they feel that if they
do not really enjoy the story then at least there will be something
interesting to watch.  These films are just actors in front of a camera,
perhaps with a very rudimentary make-up effect thrown in (but very little).
Three of the films are in black and white and unfortunately that is also
considered to be a strike against a film.  I still recommend these films
highly to watch for.
     This film combines Cold War thriller elements with science fiction and
a compelling human story.  A scientist working on sensory deprivation
commits suicide and is discovered to have been passing secrets to the
Soviets.  Was he to blame or could his mind have been twisted while under
the influence of the sensory deprivation tank?  The government decides to
experiment to find out.  Another scientist working in the same field (played
by Dirk Bogarde) is very devoted to his wife and family.  Can they change
that in his personality while he is in the tank?  This film is well-acted,
enthralling, and atmospheric.
     A secret project is working on space exploration right in the heart of
London.  The approach to exploration is a novel one.  Rather than sending
the whole human into space, they are working on a sort of technological
out-of-body experience.  Project your mind to another planet and there have
it take on physical form ... invasion by mental projection.  The rub is that
scientists on the project are being killed in some mysterious way involving
super-high energy.  And the wives of some of the scientists seem to have no
background that project security can trace.  The script is tense and the
acting is quite good, with a cast that includes John Neville (A STUDY IN
TERROR, THE ADVENTURES OF BARON MUNCHAUSEN) and Jean Marsh (UPSTAIRS,
DOWNSTAIRS).  (This film is so obscure that Leonard Maltin's usually very
complete MOVIE AND VIDEO GUIDE overlooks it.)
     This film is only 59 minutes long and originally was intended as a
television pilot, but was released to theaters to play with films such as
William Castle's I SAW WHAT YOU DID--which it far out-classed.  Leslie
Nielson plays a detective in late 19th Century San Francisco whose foppish
appearance hides a man very knowledgeable and adept in matters of the occult
and the supernatural.  A series of unsolved murders and a friend's blackout
spells may be connected and have some occult significance.  Mark Richman and
Werner Klemperer also star.  The latter, best known as the gullible
commandant from HOGAN'S HEROES, does a terrific job in a sinister role.
     This film is loosely adapted from the short story "Random Quest" by
John Wyndham.  Colin Trafford (played by Tom Bell) is a  leading scientist
at Britain Imperial Physical Institute when one of his experiments goes
wrong.  Suddenly he finds himself in a parallel London in a parallel Britain
that has not been to war since the Great War in the early part of the
century.  Trafford here is not a physicist, but a popular playwright.  He is
also now married to a beautiful woman (played by Joan Collins) whose life he
has made miserable with his selfish ways and his philandering.  Can Colin
convince the world he is the playwright while convincing his new wife that
he is different?  Then there are plot complications that lead to a fast-
paced climax across parallel worlds.  Denholm Elliot also stars in the story
which is part science fiction adventure and part love story.
     Of these four films only the last is in color.  At present, the only
one available on video, UNEARTHLY STRANGER, is offered only by a tiny
specialty house, Sinister Cinema.  Of the four, only QUEST FOR LOVE has
played on New York area television in the last fifteen years.  I would much
like to get my hands on copies of THE MIND BENDERS or DARK INTRUDER.

Title
Review for Living in Oblivion (1995)
     Are you in an easy job?  Probably not.  I know my job isn't
simple.  I have to be diplomatic at times, I have frustrations, people
I deal with make mistakes.  In fact, my job seems a lot like that of
director Nick Reve (played by Steve Buscemi) in LIVING IN OBLIVION.
This is less a story than a catalog with dramatization of the problems
a director faces getting three scenes shot for a film called LIVING IN
OBLIVION.  The name "Reve" means dream but Nick's life is anything but
a dream.  The problems Nick faces with assistants who have their mind
on other things, equipment that fails or that nobody on set knows how
to use are driving him into hysteria.  The film is nearly plotless, as
for most of the film the viewer sits on the shooting stage like a fly
on the wall and watches what happens.
     What the viewer does see is an incredible number of foul-ups,
personality clashes, and accidents.  Nick has to act as confessor,
mediator, diplomat, counselor, and general seer.  We are presented an
unending chain of weirdos, people with chips on their shoulder, and
people who think they can do Nick's job better.  It is easy to believe
each of the problems that Nick faces; it just stretches the credibility
to say he faces all these problems just filming three scenes.
Admittedly one expects more problems working on a low-budget film with
cheap equipment and with fewer assistants than on a big Hollywood
production.  Still, it is hard to believe that this day is typical.
There is internal evidence in the film that this really is not all
happening in a single day.  But that is not clear due to logic holes in
the script by writer/director Don DiCillo that I will discuss in a
spoiler section after the review.
     There is a good deal of discussion of the different production
methods that have to be used in low budget independent films and in
polished but empty Hollywood productions people on set refer to as
"Hostess Twinkie films."  But again the sort of problems faced in
making the independent film cannot be all that different from problems
in any small semi-technical operation.
     Steve Buscemi is a good actor and one of those actors who appeal
to low-budget, independent, cult directors much as John Turturro does.
One will nearly always see him somewhere in a film by Quentin Tarantino
or the Coen Brothers.  Not as familiar are Catherine Keener as an
insecure actress who is all too easily crushed by any criticism at all
and James LeGros as a supremely egocentric but untalented actor.  The
two actors, have slept together the night previous to the shooting and
have a comic battle of wills on the set.
     The photography makes good use of both monochrome and color
photography, though it is not consistent as to where it uses each.  As
films about the making of films go, this one is certainly one of the
most informative.  It suffers from its limited scope and an
insufficient number of different things to go wrong to keep the
audience amused.  In the end the viewer has been edified more than
satisfied.  Give this movie a rating of 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     Spoiler...Spoiler...Spoiler...Spoiler...
     Dreams are very important in this film.  There are three
sequences, two of which turn out to be dreams and a third is the
filming of a dream sequence.  As I pointed out above, Nick's last name
is French for "dream."  Tito criticizes Nick for not understanding how
dreams work, but DiCillo does not seem to understand any better.  I
believe (but am willing to be corrected) that dreams are always from a
subjective point of view.  In sequences that turn out to be dreams,
characters see themselves as another person.  A dream would always be
from the inside of the person dreaming looking out.  I think it is also
very unlikely for a person to dream a scene where he or she is not
present.  Perhaps someone who know a little more about the psychology
of dreaming can tell me if these two assumptions are correct.  They are
certainly true of all my own dreams that I remember.  Things that
happen in dreams seem to carry over to the filming of the third
sequence, which is apparently not supposed to be a dream.  For example,
Wolf's eye is injured in one dream, but that seems to be carried on to
other sequences.  My suspicion is that at some point the first two
sequences were not originally written as dreams and the script was
patched to say they were dreams at a later point.

Title
Review for Nitti (1988) (TV)
     Last summer when Brian DePalma's THE UNTOUCHABLES was released, I made
the comment that nobody seemed to get the facts right about Frank Nitti, a
gangster who was misrepresented by the papers in his own time and who became
the regular arch-rival of Elliot Ness in television's UNTOUCHABLES after the
series had their Capone go to prison.  DePalma had Nitti dying before Capone
ever got to prison.  Each had a polished pre-shaped image for Nitti to fit
into the story they wanted to tell.  Now ABC has made a film to tell just
the story of Nitti himself.  I watched it with curiosity to find out if
someone was finally going to get down to the real gritty Nitti.
     Well, something everybody gets wrong about Nitti was the idea that he
ran the Capone gang after Big Al got sent up (DePalma got it wrong
differently but even less accurately).  The contemporary newspapers wanted
to write about a single person running the gang and with Al gone they wrote
the story as if Nitti ran the gang.  In truth the organization of the gang
became pretty complicated with different people having power in different
areas.  Nitti may have even thought that he was running the show, but in
truth he did not command much obedience.  Well,  FRANK NITTI: THE ENFORCER
makes pretty much the same mistake; at least if Nitti has competition
running the mob, the film understates it for many of the years it was going
on.  Beyond that as far as I have been able to verify the facts in Carl
Sifakis's authoritative ENCYCLOPEDIA OF AMERICAN CRIME and MAFIA
ENCYCLOPEDIA, the film has a sort of 50-50 hold on the truth.  They get off
to a bad start by saying that Nitti was born in 1888, making him four years
younger than he actually was.  Then the film has him seeking out Capone out
of respect.  Not so--Nitti had parlayed his job as a barber for small-time
hoods into a fencing job before he had ever met Capone.  The Capone gang
sought Nitti out to sell him stolen booze.  His skill at organization, not
so much at killing, was the reason he rose in the organization.  It did
leave him in a good position when Capone went to prison, but not the
undisputed head the papers made him out to be.  Speaking of the papers, the
film did get right that Elliot Ness was a headline hound who had little
serious effect on the mob, but who was a hero in the papers.  That seems to
be the truth.
     By padding the film with a love story and showing scenes of incidents
like the St. Valentine's Day Massacre without telling what led up to them,
the filmmakers have produced a story much of which is neither really
accurate nor inaccurate.  There is also some speculation stated as fact.
The killing of Chicago Mayor Cermack is usually assumed to be an accident
when he got in the way of an assassin's bullet intended for FDR.  The film's
claim that the assassin Zangara was actually trying to kill Cermack under
orders from the Capone mob is only a minority opinion.  Beyond that, much of
the plot and particularly the muscling into the entertainment business and
how it led to Nitti's death was all square with the encyclopedia facts.
     FRANK NITTI: THE ENFORCER is nicely photographed in subdued colors that
both satisfy the network's requirement for color and evoke some of the
black-and-white feel of the classic gangster films or the sepia tone of the
photography of the period.  Anthony LaPaglia (playing Nitti) leads a cast of
unfamiliar faces (one exception is Michael Moriarty playing a lawman).
LaPaglia's troubled, introspective crime lord who kills for strategic ends
but never for personal anger looks amazingly like a cross between Robert
DeNiro and Sam Waterston.  Overall, FRANK NITTI: THE ENFORCER is nearly as
subdued as its colors, but as gangster films go it is not all that far from
being accurate.  As a fan of this sort of film, I would say that FRANK
NITTI: THE ENFORCER, with a 50-50 record for accuracy is far closer to being
true than 99% of gangster films.  And Frank Nitti, whom I have always
claimed was misrepresented to the public, gets about the fairest shake from
this film as any gangster ever gets from the movies.  Rate it a low +2 on
the -4 to +4 scale.  Not bad for a made for TV movie.

Title
Review for Marvin's Room (1996)
     MARVIN'S ROOM was originally a play produced first in Chicago and
then in New York.  Scott McPherson adapted his own play into a
screenplay before dying of AIDS at thirty-three.  He died five years
ago and now Jerry Zaks has directed a film version of the play.  The
film version is a comedy drama that is getting some positive attention
and an Academy Award nomination for Diane Keaton, though I have to say
it is not my sort of film and so I may not be the best person to judge
it.  Lee and Bessie (played by Meryl Streep and Diane Keaton
respectively) are two sisters who have been separated for two decades.
Lee has gone off to find herself and has since raised two children, the
disturbed Hank (Leonardo DiCaprio) and his studious younger brother
Charlie (Hal Scardino) whose spare time, at least for the course of the
film, seems to be taken up reading 20,000 LEAGUES UNDER THE SEA.  Lee
is so self-centered, colorful, and tough it is surprising the role did
not go to Cher.  Bessie is more a warm and loving person who has spent
the year unfulfilled, taking care of her soap-opera-loving Aunt Ruth
(Gwen Verdon) and her senile, long-dying father Marvin (Hume Cronyn).
As Bessie tells her doctor, "My father has been dying for twenty years,
slowly, so I won't miss anything."  Each sister has problems as Hank
burned down Lee's house and has been committed to a mental institution.
Bessie has recently been diagnosed with leukemia.  Bessie needs a bone
marrow transplant from someone with the right kind of marrow so Lee has
arranged a leave for Hank and the two of them and Charlie have driven
down from Ohio to Bessie's home in Florida to test if they have the
right marrow type.  Hank, who never realized that he had an aunt is
first alienated from Bessie, then discovers that in many ways she is a
kindred spirit.
     It is remarkable that Keaton would allow herself to take such an
unglamorous role.  Bessie is starting to show the signs of aging and
her disease.  Her teeth look bad and her hands look like those of an
elderly woman.  Streep is abrasive and usually at odds with her sons,
particularly Hank.  Robert DeNiro, who produced the film along with
Scott Rudin and Jane Rosenthal, plays a role as Bessie's doctor and his
role seems to be one of the most ill-considered touches of the film.
He seems less than totally competent and something of a buffoon.  It is
surprising that Keaton would choose such a misfit to treat her for
something like leukemia, placing her life in his hands,  The
combination of his distressing diagnosis and his comic behavior just
does not seem to work in the film.  The same unevenness comes later in
the film as Bessie is telling a very humorous story to Lee only to have
us realize that the story is one of the great tragedies of her life and
is one she would be unlikely to be laughing about.
     MARVIN'S ROOM is one of a spate of female bonding films we have
seen of late, and not really one of the best.  Like Bessie's life, the
film really goes nowhere in specific, but it picks up texture along the
way.  It is not the kind of film I feel I can judge really well.  The
theme of fulfillment through service to others and forgiveness is one
that could have been taken directly from the Boy Scout Handbook.
Certainly what is deep and meaningful to one person will be trite to
another.  For me this film leaned heavily to the hackneyed, but
admittedly there were those in the audience who were touched by the
film's message.
     For the right audience this was probably a moving film but I was
not that audience and I can give it only a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Clerks (1994)
          Capsule review:  One day in the life of two clerks.
     CLERKS. is a very funny and perceptive film debut for
     writer/director/editor/clerk Kevin Smith.  This ultra-
     low budget film proves the most cost-effective
     ingredient to improve the quality of a film is the
     writing.  Rating: +2 (-4 to +4)
     The logo at the beginning of the film is a microcosm of the film
itself.  Technically it is a poor piece of animation.  Under the title
telling us this is a View Askew Production is a slightly off-color gag
that is fairly funny.  And CLERKS. is the first View Askew production,
a comedy about clerks at the local Quick Stop.  In fact, Kevin Smith,
who wrote the film based on years of experience clerking, shot the film
at night, then when the daylight came the actors cleared out and Smith
worked behind the counter as (what else?) a clerk.  He paid for the
film on what little he could get from backers, even less that he could
earn clerking, and money he could borrow with his credit cards.  The
film is shot in black and white with virtually no art direction.  To
prepare the store for shooting, Kevin Smith moved the lottery machine
off the counter.  Smith had only two professional actors.  Second
billing went to Jeff Anderson who has no acting experience (and happens
to work in the mail room of the same company I work for).  This goes
beyond film minimalism; in only slightly less capable hands this would
be considered an amateur film.  Instead it won top prize in the
Critics' Week section at Cannes, has been doing very well at other film
festivals, and has been fought over by distributors.  Miramax won the
battle and will spend four times the cost of the film just promoting
it.  Why has it been so successful?  Because Kevin Smith is a good
writer with a great sense of humor.  Good jokes and dialogue are cheap
and are most of what this film has to offer.
     Dante (Brian O'Halloran) didn't plan to work today.  He wanted to
take it easy and play a little hockey in the afternoon.  But when you
are a clerk you have to answer even the unexpected call of duty.  The
day starts badly with first some vandalism discovered and then an
anti-smoking activist trying to scare off cigarette customers.  Dante's
girlfriend Veronica (Marilyn Ghigliotti) visits, and the two sit behind
the counter and have an explicit sex discussion in which each is
shocked by the other's experience.  Dante's best friend Randal (Jeff
Anderson) drops in from the video store next door where he clerks.  And
so the day goes with friends and weirdo customers coming in and
leaving.  Through the dialogue we get a story of a love triangle, and
another of unfinished business between friends.
     In fact, this is not a typical day at all in a Quick Stop.  Like
the flight in MEMPHIS BELLE, it is a distillation of the most dramatic
parts of many days.  Even with that, the plotting is pretty mundane
stuff.  What sets this film apart is the dialogue which is often
hilarious.  Not unlike PULP FICTION, the story is broken into titled
substories.  The one-word titles of those stories (e.g.  "Syntax,"
"Juxtaposition") do not always make sense, but they do focus the
audience in on the story.
     Smith tells his story with no more violence than a poorly staged
fist fight between two people who are really friends.  There is no
nudity or on-screen sex, yet the MPAA rated the film an NC-17 for
extremely explicit sexual language.  This seriously damaged the film's
profit potential and Miramax hired Alan Dershowitz to appeal the
rating.  Without any cuts the MPAA changed the rating to an R.  But for
those who are bothered by such things, be warned that the language is
very explicit.  Still CLERKS. is one of the funnier comedies you are
likely to see this year.  I give it a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     CLERKS. qualifies as a genuinely experimental film if for no other
reason than that it is the only film in recent memory to have scenes in
a convenience store without having the store being robbed.  Earlier
cuts of the film had Dante murdered at the end in a robbery, but that
ending has been excised.
     Note: The film and Kevin Smith's cap list the title with a period.
Every place else the period seems to be dropped.  I assume that Smith,
who titled the film, prefers the title with the punctuation.

Title
Review for Metropolitan (1990)
          Capsule review:  An outsider gets involved with the
     tinder of the vanities, a clique of young, chic, semi-
     intellectuals who talk like the ATLANTIC MONTHLY but whose
     lives are just as mis-managed as anyone else's.  Walt
     Stillman's dialogue is the main reason to see METROPOLITAN.
     Rating: +1.
     There is a separate sort of film I think you would have to call "the
dialogue film."  It is a concept parallel to that of "the special effects
film."  A dialogue film is built around and shows off its dialogue the way a
special effects film is built around and shows off its visual effects.
While films one would classify as dialogue films have been more common in
Europe than in the United States, obvious American dialogue films include
RETURN OF THE SECAUCUS SEVEN, THE BIG CHILL, and especially MY DINNER WITH
ANDRE.  METROPOLITAN has marginally more plot than the former three films,
but it probably still qualifies.
     In METROPOLITAN, Tom Townsend (played by Edward Clements) gets politely
kidnapped to a debutante party populated by young, wealthy, sophisticated
intellectuals and pseudo-intellectuals.  They call themselves the SFRP
(Sally Fowler Rat Pack) and representatives of the UHB (Urban Haute
Bourgeoisie).  Tom's background is not quite so haute as the others but he
can talk the talk and with a little help from the others he can walk the
walk, in a second-hand tuxedo.  But it is talking the talk that is the main
thing and while on an intellectual level Tom has objections to this young
tinder of the vanities--Tom believes himself to be a Fourier socialist--he
nonetheless finds himself repeatedly drawn to their company.
     The plot of METROPOLITAN is only very slight as one of the quieter
members of the rat pack, a literature fan named Audrey Rouget (played by
Carolyn Farina), takes a liking to Tom, though Tom is still in love with
former girlfriend Serena Slocum (Elizabeth Thompson).  But this film's fine
point is not so much the plot as its view of this young aristocracy and the
often funny and always engrossing dialogue.  Writing credit for the dialogue
(as well as most of the rest of the credit) goes to writer/director/producer
Walt Stillman who, according to VARIETY sold his Manhattan apartment to help
finance the film.  He probably will not get rich making films like
METROPOLITAN, but he should be able to get another apartment.  I rate this a
+1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Central do Brasil (1998)
     Oscar-nominated Fernanda Montenegro plays Dora, a retire school
teacher who earns a modest living working in Rio's Central Station, a
bus and train station.  She writes letters for the illiterate.  But she
rarely if ever mails the letters.  Instead, she cynically uses her
position to look into the lives of her uneducated clientele to laugh at
and despise them.  Hers is one of many dirty businesses that prey on
people who travel through the station.  One day Dora sees one of her
clients accidentally hit by a bus and killed leaving the client's son
Josua (played by Vinicius de Oliveira) homeless.  She is initially
untouched by the boy's plight.  Eventually she is drawn in and decides
to accompany the boy on a bus trip to be sure he finds his father.  Her
journey takes will take on many meanings as she learn to love first the
boy and through him the illiterate poor of Brazil as she learns to
understand each better.  Unlike the approach that would likely be taken
with an American or British film the poor are not shown to be quirky
and humorous.  Director Walter Salles, Jr., gives them a quiet and
pious dignity.  Chance makes Dora herself one of the rural poor, even
if only temporarily and from this vantage point she sees the poor very
differently.  She also will see this journey as a sort of last chance
to grasp life and a last chance to escape her cynicism actually feel
inspired as she once did.  Salles shows us she is in more desperation
than the boy she is helping.
     A Frank Capra would have handled the story making the people that
Dora meets offbeat. Salles is not quite so subtle.  He floods the film
with Biblical and religious allusions.  In the United States, religious
imagery in film often has a sinister overtone.  Certainly American
filmmakers are frequently willing to show a sinister side to religion.
Our films frequently portray fraudulent evangelists like Elmer Gantry
or vaguely sadistic Catholic schools as we saw in THE SAINT.  Salles is
making a film for a Brazilian audience for whom fervent Catholicism is
an unquestioned virtue.  For that reason frequently a viewer in the
United States will be wondering what point Salles may be trying to make
when, in fact, he will have already made his point.  We may wonder at
the significance of the Biblical names of men in Josua's family, when
the real point is just to say that these are all simple and good
people.
     Salles does create a definite dichotomy between city people and
country people.  City people, particularly those who work in the
station, are soulless people who look dispassionately on death for
minor infractions like shoplifting.  The country people, never well
defined, are simple, pious, and pure.  When they use Dora as a scribe,
they open into their lives a window that is purer and finer than what
Dora sees in the city people.  Oliveira's acting as the boy is simple,
but very natural.  But of equal importance with the actors is the
setting.  We see Brazil with its road stops.  We see people willing to
show Dora small kindness that it is implied they would not show her in
the city.
     Central Station is a road picture touching look into the lives of
the people of Brazil.  Perhaps it simplifies them a bit, but Fernanda
Montenegro gives a solid performance as a woman going through
unexpected changes.  Part of what makes her stand out for audiences is
her worn face, almost like a female Humphrey Bogart.  But her
performance is what gives the film what power it has.  I rate CENTRAL
STATION a 6 on the 0 to 10 scale and a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Blair Witch Project, The (1999)
     There is a paradox in filmmaking.  The viewer goes to a film to
see an experience, but ironically not really to share the experience.
We as viewers want to see the story, but we do not really want to
participate in the experience.  The filmmakers we consider to be the
best do not make realistic films.  These great stylists of cinema are
mostly people that rather than making a film real for us make it
unreal.  The most real film is crude footage right out of a hand-held
camera.  Even using Steadicam is stepping away from reality. As we look
at he world our head bobs and jerks.  Steadicam smoothes out the bobs
and jerks making the resulting film less real.  A rare few films use
crudity and a lack of style to make the film more real for the viewer.
THE NIGHT OF THE LIVING DEAD is an effective horror film, not because a
great stylist polished it but because it looks like it is not polished
at all.  It is shot in black and white and photographed crudely.  It
does have music, but it is the music that the filmmakers could get free
and the music is rough.  Color and a lush orchestral score are a
distraction.
     As I write this review there are two horror film in wide release.
The remake of THE HAUNTING is a highly glossy film with great special
effects and images from the imagination of an artist.  THE BLAIR WITCH
PROJECT on the other hand is shot primitively with hand-held cameras
and has almost no music.  And that lack of style makes the film seem
all the more real.  By showing almost nothing of the menace in the
story it allows the viewer's mind complete freedom to imagine the
threat.  In fact THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT--perhaps coincidentally--very
nearly follows the rules of Dogma 95.  THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT was made
on a very tiny film budget, and it is made with almost no stylistic
tricks.  In fact it has no style whatsoever to distance the viewer from
the action.  That makes it the most effective horror film we have seen
in years.
     The plot of THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT is obvious from the first
minutes of the film.  We are told at the very beginning of the film
that in October 1994 three student filmmakers, Heather Donahue, Michael
Williams, and Joshua Leonard (played by Heather Donahue, Michael
Williams, and Joshua Leonard) were making a film.  They went into the
Maryland woods near Burkittesville to shoot a documentary about a local
legend, the Blair Witch.  They never came out of that woods and we are
told a year later their film footage was found.  We don't even know how
it is supposed to have been unearthed.  But we are seeing the raw film
footage they shot.  It is clear from the beginning that they were
incompetents and should not be out in the wild by themselves.  It is
not hard to guess what trouble they found in the woods and what caused
them not to come back.  The film spends the rest of its short 85-minute
length showing the viewer what was expected to happen did happen.  This
is not a great plot.  It is almost no plot at all, in fact.  The viewer
knows what is going to ensue and just sits there to see it happen and
to pick up the details.  Yet just seeing it all happen without having
the filmmaker interpose style between the viewer and the story makes
this film an experience so immediate and intense that people are
walking out of the film rather than subjecting their nerves to the
film.  The special effects in this film are all mostly sound effects.
They are all easy to create, but they tap into a basic fear of being
vulnerable in the woods, in the night, in the dark (to paraphrase both
versions of THE HAUNTING).  This is a film that will tap into some very
basic fears.
     The film is written, directed, and edited by Daniel Myrick and
Eduardo Sanchez. It is a Haxen Films production (probably named for the
classic 1922 Norwegian film documentary HAXEN, meaning "Witches").  The
three main characters apparently play themselves.  According to the
publicity most of the dialog is improvised, giving it a real immediacy.
Apparently they were given a rough plot outline and identifying with
the characters they argued among themselves in a sort of role-playing
game.  I would bet that the scenes were filmed in very much the order
that we see them in the film to make easier the slow build in the
actors' hysteria.  The reported cost of shooting the film was $20,000,
but the film is playing to full houses.  It is the kind of trick that
probably can be done effectively only once, though THE BLAIR WITCH
PROJECT is bound to have imitators.  This is a film of incredible
intensity.  It has no sex, no violence, a fair amount of medium-strong
language, but less than a lot of other films in theaters.  Yet it is
too strong for even some of the adults seeing the film.  I rate it an8
on the 0 to 10 scale and a high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.  In case
there is any confusion the film THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT, the television
documentary "The Curse of the Blair Witch," and any legends or
historical factoids found in either are complete fictions created for
the film.  A possible exception is the television description of the
backgrounds of the three film students who were real people and played
themselves in the film.  There never was a Blair Witch or an attempt to
do a serious documentary about her.
     Dogma 95 is a European film movement founded by Danish filmmaker
Lars von Triers.  It is intended to bring film back to a more natural
sort of filmmaking. THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT follows, as far as I can
tell, the first seven of the rules and breaks the last three.  However,
its compliance with so many of the rules of Dogma 95 may be purely
coincidental.  The following are the rule of Dogma 95.
     I swear to submit to the following set of rules drawn up and
confirmed by DOGMA 95:
     1. Shooting must be done on location. Props and sets must not be
brought in (if a particular prop is necessary for the story, a location
must be chosen where this prop is to be found).
     2. The sound must never be produced apart from the images or vice
versa. (Music must not be used unless it occurs where the scene is
being shot).
     3. The camera must be hand-held. Any movement or immobility
attainable in the hand is permitted. (The film must not take place
where the camera is standing; shooting must take place where the film
takes place).
     4. The film must be in color. Special lighting is not acceptable.
(If there is too little light for exposure the scene must be cut or a
single lamp be attached to the camera).
     6. The film must not contain superficial action. (Murders,
weapons, etc. must not occur.)
     7. Temporal and geographical alienation are forbidden. (That is to
say that the film takes place here and now.)

Title
Review for Yatgo ho yan (1997)
     It is difficult to evaluate a Jackie Chan film like one evaluates
other films.  Was the plot any good?  Well no, it was pretty lame
actually.  Was the acting any good?  Well, no, that was not so hot
either.  Chan has a lot of personality--more so than just about any of
the martial artists who regularly star in films--but that is not the
same thing as acting.  Acting has to do with giving the viewer insights
deep into a type of personality or it can be just playing a certain
type of person very authentically.  However, there is nothing very deep
about the personalities Chan plays.  And since I doubt there is anyone
really like a Chan character, the whole question of whether he is doing
a good job of acting is moot.  Does a Chan film have good
cinematography?  Well, it probably is no easy task to keep in the frame
of the camera a moving target like Chan.  And there is some okay
location scenery of (in this case) Melbourne, Australia.  But it hardly
is what anyone would consider good camerawork.  All of what one thinks
of as the usual virtues of a movie do not apply to a Jackie Chan film
besides the general fact that it is entertaining.
     The virtues of a Jackie Chan film are not those of a film, they
are the virtues of a circus performance.  Are there fabulous stunts in
the film?  Is it impressive that a human being can do what his
character does?  Are the movements smooth and graceful and well staged?
There are the virtues one expects of more from Ringling Brothers than
from Warner Brothers.  I am sure when a new Chan film is being
considered choosing the stunts is the first order of business.  Then a
minimal story is written to tie the stunts together.
     In this outing Chan plays a chef on Melbourne television.  The
irony of having a martial artist in such a delicate profession as
cooking is already familiar from the UNDER SIEGE films.  In any case
Jackie seem equally adept at delivering a well-done karate chop and a
well-done lamb chop.  After a cooking show broadcast one day Jackie is
returning to his car when he sees a damsel in distress being chased by
thugs.  He jumps in and saves the woman and quicker than a three-minute
egg he finds himself in the middle of a three- way war between two
rival gangs and the police.  There is a plot with a missing
incriminating videotape and some unexplained detective work by the
baddies who have an uncanny ability to find Chan and the people under
his protection wherever they hide.  After several confrontations Chan
gets angry enough and brings his enemies to a crushing defeat.
     The story is pretty basic stuff, but does anyone REALLY care about
the plot?  Chan fans probably want to know what kinds of action scenes
there are and what kinds of props does Chan use.  The centerpiece is
probably a sequence with a horse carriage.  There are some sequences
with power tools including that old standard of villainous menace, the
buzz saw.  And at one point Jackie takes on a giant earth-moving
machine.  There is a comic bit in a building under construction that
has only walls and doors.
     Some people were disappointed with the conclusion of Chan's RUMBLE
IN THE BRONX. Instead of having a climactic martial arts battle, Chan
let a hovercraft do the fighting for him.  That history repeats itself
for MR. NICE GUY.  Reportedly Chan suffered a neck injury in the
shooting.  Again the audience does not get the final fight between Chan
and villain and a convenient vehicle does the real fighting for Chan.
Perhaps Jackie Chan is nearing the end of his run and is discovering he
can no longer take the risks he has in the past.  Time is catching up
with him.
     A film like this deserves multiple ratings.  The stunts are
enjoyable to watch and little else really matters to someone who would
come to see a Jackie Chan film.  The film is pretty much
interchangeable with any other Jackie Chan film.  For those who like
this sort of thing, go for it.  I give MR. NICE GUY a 6 on the 0 to 10
scale and a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Meet the Parents (2000)
     In China in 1982 I turned the tables on our National Guide and
asked him if he had any questions about America.  I guess I was
expecting some sort of political question.  Instead, I was
dumfounded by what was most on his mind.  "In America, do wives and
their mothers-in-law get along well?"  He assured me in China that
they did, but I am certain if that were true he would not have
asked.  Even in China people seem to have problems relating to in-
laws.  Perhaps some of life's most difficult relationships arise
when families are suddenly artificially joined by marriage.  A man
trying to relate to his new prospective in-laws and vice-versa could
be the basis of a very strong comedy.  MEET THE PARENTS does not
demonstrate that fact, however.
     Greg Focker (played by Ben Stiller) has been dating and in love
with Pam Byrnes (Teri Polo) for ten months and is now ready to
propose to her.  He will do it during a weekend visit to meet
Debbie's family and to attend her sister's wedding.  From the
beginning the relationship is awkward between Greg and Jack and Dina
Byrnes (Robert DeNiro and Blythe Danner).  Through no fault of his
own, the airline has lost Greg's luggage.  And he has to ask to
borrow clothing.  It is the beginning of a game of one-upmanship in
which Greg is nearly always one-down.  As the games go on Greg is
more and more uncomfortable and uneasy which only contributes to the
mistakes he makes.  Greg is playing a game he does not understand,
in a league he is new to.  But perhaps along the way he will
discover some unexpected secrets about his father-in-law.
     This film had potential in its tale of one-upmanship.  It has
hit on a situation that many in the audience may find familiar--one
that has not been done overly frequently in films.   But the script
by Jim Herzfeld and John Hamburg is a little too contrived.  Too
many coincidences in the story work against Greg.  The script could
not decide if the main character was incompetent or simply unlucky.
Certainly he does not help his situation by doing everything wrong
he possibly could, but even when he is trying to do the right things
nature conspires against him.  There is an uneven mix of slapstick
sequences and human comedy.  Certainly the last part of the film
feels awkwardly written.
     The main reason to see MEET THE PARENTS is to see Robert
DeNiro's performance.  DeNiro plays the suspicious and not a little
fascistic father as tightly wound and threatening as he can.  The
little judgmental expressions on his face are a show in themselves
as Greg digs himself deeper and deeper into his insecurities.  But
we do not really see much of that digging.  Ben Stiller is an
affable presence in the film but is not really stretching himself by
playing the role as the nebbish to whom so many bad things happen.
It is nice to see Blythe Danner again on the screen.  But her
character has a basic conflict between a basic decency and her love
for her husband and the script should have given her more to do with
that.
     Randy Newman has written a playful score.  In the first few
seconds of the film it does something creative I have never heard a
film score do before.  There is a lot of source music that is
popular music of the 1960s.  Presumably that is what the upper class
listens to at least in somebody's imagination.
     Humor is subjective and some this film has been getting some
favorable comment.  But this is a comedy that works only
occasionally for me.  I would have to rate it 4 on the 0 to 10 scale
and a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for At Sachem Farm (1998)
     CAPSULE: Well-produced, well-directed, but a fairly weak theme.
This is a film that tells you that you can be everything you want to be
if you just decide to be true to yourself and if you happen to have a
lot of money.  Rufus Sewell, Minnie Driver, and Nigel Hawthorne star.
The film is competently made but the story is muddled.  Rating: 4 (0 to
10), 0 (-4 to +4)
   - The story deals with an extremely wealthy British family who own a
     fantastic farm out somewhere in the American West.  Ross (Rufus
     Sewell) is fairly normal and is trying to sell off the family's
     wine stock in order to buy a local manganese mine and get his own
     fortune.  His brother has gone off to live in the woods.  Uncle
     Cullen (Nigel Hawthorne) dresses in Eastern robes and has plans to
     live at the top of a column like the hermit St. Simeon.  Living
     all around the farm are eccentrics.  Coming to visit is Ross's
     wealthy girlfriend Kendal (Minnie Driver) and her friend Laurie
     (Amelia Heine).
   - Written and directed by John Huddles, who does not make very clear
     what he is driving at.
   - Apparently trying to go for the same sort of audience as HAROLD
     AND MAUDE, but the deep meanings all seem to fall flat.
   - Tone of the film begins madcap, but it becomes serious before
     long.  Different people try to reach the top of Uncle Cullen's
     column in different ways.
   - Pleasant photography of the farm only underscores the wealth of
     the family and hence undercuts the theme.  Would you and I have
     the same set of options?  There were a few errors in the
     photography and parts of scenes that go out of focus.
   - Some scenes seem to go on and on.
   - This should be a G-rated script.

Title
Review for Mission: Impossible II (2000)
     The new "Mission: Impossible" film is out for early summer
audiences.  It will have stiff box office competition from Disney's
current DINOSAUR which offers material that will appeal to adults.
     Once again we have a "Mission: Impossible" movie without a
"Mission Impossible" plot.   What is a "Mission: Impossible" plot?
It is like a jigsaw puzzle.  Through most of the plot you see the
pieces being fit together, but you have no idea what they build.
Suddenly toward the end you go through an "Ah-ha!" experience when
you understand what it is all for.  Then you see what you built do
its thing.  Maybe doing its thing is to make some banana republic
would-be Hitler suddenly appear to have been stealing from the
country's treasury.  It is a spy film powered by gray cells instead
of testosterone.  MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE 2 is as clueless as its
predecessor what its title claims it to be.  It is like me saying I
am going to write great romantic sonnets just like Shakespeare, but
I am going to write them in four lines.
     Instead of a "Mission: Impossible" plot it has something that
might have worked as a James Bond script.  And evens so, it would
have been a Bond script a little heavy on chases and fights.  For
too much of the screen time Cruise is just showing off for the
camera.  Cruise is trying to be the Douglas Fairbanks, Sr., of our
generation.  He wants to be dashing and handsome and superb at any
number of sports.  This film is too intent on glamorizing Cruise.
     As the story opens we have a scientist in Sydney, Australia,
who had developed a great anti-virus.  And to prove the anti-virus
works he has also developed a great deadly virus for his anti-virus
to counter.  (Yes, that's what he did.)  Now he wants to take the
virus and the anti-virus to the CDC in Atlanta so he injects himself
with the deadly virus.  The deadly strain will be benign for exactly
20 hours, then it will attack him like Ebola.  Our brilliant
scientist wants to get to Atlanta and inject himself with the anti-
virus and not become the Patient Zero of a virus that could destroy
the world.  And what does he do to be sure to get to Atlanta in
time?  He boards a commercial air flight.  (Is this making sense to
you?)  But there are baddies who will stop at nothing to get the
virus and anti-virus.  On the commercial plane the pilot happens to
be one of the baddies' gang.  (However did they manage that?  They
didn't even know what plane he would be taking.)  The baddies, led
by Sean Ambrose (Dougray Scott), seize the biological agents and
escape the plane, leaving it to crash.
     The Impossible Mission Force has to call in the vacationing
Ethan Hunt (played by Tom Cruise) who is having fun by climbing
about half a mile up a sheer rock face without benefit of equipment.
The IMF brings in Ethan and tells him to pick two team members as
well as recruit a third, one a beautiful jewel thief named Nyah
Nordoff-Hall (Thandie Newton).  (With a name like Nordoff-Hall one
wonders if there was a bounty on her head.)  In the best traditions
of Hitchcock's NOTORIOUS, she is asked to go not just under cover
but also between the sheets with former lover Ambrose.
     The film stars Tom Cruise as the lead agent of the IMF.
Thandie Newton is a new face and a different one, but she does not
have enough to do on the screen.  Tom Cruise plays the athletic
miracle man.  In an unbilled role, Anthony Hopkins is around to give
Cruise his orders.  Tom Cruise plays the great lover secret agent.
Dougray Scott is a little lackluster for the villain, but perhaps a
lackluster villain is more realistic.  Tom Cruise is there as the
quick-thinking super-agent.  The Impossible Mission team also has
the talented Ving Rhames returning as Luther Stickell.  He gets to
ride a helicopter and shoot a gun.  Rounding out the crack team of
four agents was some dude with a thin moustache and beard.  I don't
remember if he did anything or had any speaking lines.  I seem to
remember he flew the helicopter.  MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE 2 also
features Tom Cruise.
     MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE 2 was badly in need of another script re-
write, particularly by someone who was a fan of the original series.
John Woo keeps the action coming, but not the intelligence.  And Woo
is not able to make the action scenes believable or enjoyable.  The
climactic fight is as funny as it is contrived.  MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE
2 is more just a Tom Cruise vanity piece than anything else.  I rate
it 4 on the 0 to 10 scale and a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     I am starting to have a real problem with this whole mask
thing.  The idea seems borrowed from the opening of FROM RUSSIA WITH
LOVE, where it was fresh.  But let us be clear that to masquerade as
someone else with one of these masks requires a lot of preparation
ahead of time.  It cannot be easy to make a mask that would fool
someone into thinking they were seeing someone they knew when it was
really someone else.  The voice disguise would also take a
tremendous amount of preparation.  Probably neither could be done
without the cooperation of the person who is going to be
impersonated.  Further, people recognize each other by more than
scent, word-choice, accent, memories, and dozens of other
parameters.  The original series used impersonation very, very
sparingly giving the person a lot of preparation time and even then
it was really a credibility stretcher.  You do not just attack a
building with a back-pocket full of these impersonation masks ready
to use.  In addition dramatically it is a poor idea.  It distracts
the audience making them constantly wonder if they really know who
they are looking at or not.  The script uses it entirely too
frequently, whenever the writer wants to throw the audience a cheap
and easy curve ball.

Title
Review for Analyze This (1999)
     Paul Vitti (Robert DeNiro) is the head of one of New York City's
two biggest crime families.  But he is losing his drive.  He is beating
people up less and he is feeling their pain more.  For no apparent
reason he will start crying. (The head of a crime family beats people
up himself????  Why does this not seem very likely?)  He decides he
needs good psychiatric help, but he must keep it secret since seeing a
psychiatrist would be seen as a sign of weakness.  Through an odd chain
of events he chooses analyst Ben Sobel (Billy Crystal).  But the last
thing Sobel wants is one of New York's most notorious criminals as a
patient.  Nor does Sobel know how to treat Vitti.  A psychiatrist works
by getting and holding the upper hand over his patient.  No matter what
a patient does the psychiatrist must always be in control of the
situation.  With Vitti he is dealing with a man who is also expert at
control, even if he needs a gun to maintain it.  The two of them begin
a battle for control of their sessions.  It is a struggle that should
have been more interesting than it was.
     But his doctor is not the only opponent that Vitti is battling.
He is in a cold war with Primo Sindone (Chazz Palminteri), the head of
New York's other major crime family.  And Sobel may become a pawn in
the conflict.  At the most inconvenient times suddenly Sobel will be
summoned to have a silly psychiatric session with Vitti.  It is a gag
repeated as many times as is necessary to fill out the length of the
film.  Writing which is very funny in the first part of the film is
wasted in a film which has much sparser and less funny gags in its
second and third.  This film could have done more with the doctor-
patient relationship, but settles for pop psychology and an instant
miracle cure.  It could have done more with the crime plot, but it
settles for something hackneyed and overly cliched.
     What is curious about the film is that the acting is way below
anybody's standards.  Robert DeNiro coasts along as the gangster, a
part he could play in his sleep.  What gives Vitti potential as a
character is that he has emotional problems, but DeNiro is not used to
playing emotional problems of this sort. When he cries in front of the
camera it is like amateur night tryouts for the Actors' Studio.  His
touch at comedy is only marginally better.  Billy Crystal is again the
nice-guy, sincere, New York Jew he always plays, only this time he
plays it as a psychiatrist.  This would have been a far more engaging
film if on Day One DeNiro and Crystal would have just looked at each
other, said "not this role again," and then traded roles.  Lisa Kudrow
is capable or more but plays a bewildered third wheel in the grand
tradition of Terry Garr.  She should never have settled for such a
tangential role.  More interesting are the character roles of Joe
Viterelli as the bodyguard Jelly and Chazz Palminteri is his usual
riveting character.
     Many of the jokes really are funny, but again most are in the
first half of the film.  There are also some interesting allusions to
crime films, both in the dialog and visually.  But the script by Ken
Lonergan and Peter Tolan is not content to simply have many of the
allusions, it must tell the viewer about them so that they are not
missed.  It sacrifices subtlety.  Overall this averages out to being a
decent comedy, but it was capable of being much more.  I rate it a 6 on
the 0 to 10 scale and a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Midsummer Night's Dream, A (1999)
     There was a time when seeing a particular Shakespeare play might
be a once-in-a-lifetime opportunity.  People would rarely have a
chance to see two different companies performing the same play.  Then
it was sufficient to be simply providing Shakespeare.  That is not so
any more.  Turner Classic Movies frequently plays the 1935 film
version.  It is not so long since PBS broadcast a BBC version.  In
fact, the Internet Movie Database lists nine TV versions and it does
not list the comic version featuring the Flying Karamazov Brothers.  If
a filmmaker wants to do a new version of a Shakespeare play, it should
be at least in some way very original.  It should have something that
the previous versions do not offer.  Certainly two films that I thought
did that were Kenneth Branagh's MUCH ADO ABOUT NOTHING and Ian
McKellan's RICHARD III.  The former managed to use diction that made
following the dialog easy and a pleasure to follow.  That and its
pleasant Tuscan setting made the film a real joy.  And McKellan's
reframing of RICHARD III as an alternate history with a Fascist
takeover of Britain in the 1930s stands as the single most exciting and
inventive performance of Shakespeare I have ever seen.  The new WILLIAM
SHAKESPEARE'S A MIDSUMMER NIGHT'S DREAM was presenting a very familiar
story, so with a fixed plot it should have been greatly creative in
some other way.  It should have been as innovative as those films.  It
was not.
     Michael Hoffman adapted the Shakespeare play and directed.
Hoffman did a beautiful job creating a sumptuous look and feel for the
1995 film RESTORATION, but his ideas were far less rich or original for
WILLIAM SHAKESPEARE'S A MIDSUMMER NIGHT'S DREAM.  As the film starts we
are immediately plunged into cliche with Felix Mendelssohn's "Midsummer
Night's Dream."  It is a rather obvious choice and hardly one that is
inspiring.  The first original touch is to move the setting from
ancient Athens to late 19th Century Monte Athene in Tuscany.  But there
is something of a problem there almost immediately.  The play has many
references to its setting, and there is an immediate dissonance to see
Italy and hear it called Athens.  It is also jarring to have characters
whose names are Theseus, Demetrius, Lysander, Helena, and Hermia.  The
move of location is probably an attempt to repeat the effect that
Branagh achieved with his Tuscan setting, but it really does not work
the same sort of magic.
     For those who do not know the story, I will say just briefly that
Duke Theseus (David Strathairn) is preparing to wed Hippolyta (Sophie
Marceau) when he is asked to settle a dispute between a father and
daughter.  Egeus (Bernard Hill, recently seen as the captain going down
with the ship in TITANIC) has arranged a marriage for his daughter
Hermia (Anna Friel) to Demetrius (Christian Bale). But the rebellious
daughter instead loves Lysander (Dominic West).  Another woman, Helena
(Calista Flockhart), loves Demetrius.  Getting involved into the action
is also a traveling theater company preparing to put on a bad play
about Pyramus (Bottom (Kevin Kline)).  And as if that were not enough
in another part of the forest is Oberon, King of Fairies (Rupert
Everett) is having his problems with his queen Titania (Michelle
Pfeiffer).
     The stars of the film are really Stanley Tucci and Kevin Kline.
Kline has a somewhat expanded role from the Shakespeare involving
Bottom's wife who never appeared in the original play.  These sequences
have to be done without dialog since it is easier to do it that way
than to get Shakespeare back to write lines for their interaction.
Stanley Tucci is almost always a pleasure to watch on the screen.  Here
he does his rubber-faced thing a little too much and amazingly he
overstays his welcome.  But Calista Flockhart (TV's Ally McBeal)
manages to out-rubber-face even Tucci and to almost achieve the level
of a Macaulay Culkin (not appearing in this film, thankfully).
Sadly, the film is never as enchanting as it is supposed to be or even
as it needs to be.  Many of the intended magical elements turn leaden.
Having Puck ride a bicycle again and again is just not all that
whimsical.  Having him ride a silly-looking plastic turtle intended to
be real is even less so.  Hoffman even has a mud-wrestling scene with
Helena and Hermia.  Really.  The sequence of the play of "Pyramus and
Thisbe" may be where some of the humor works the best in a sort of
imitation Monty Python way.  Still, this sequence comes off as
gratuitous filler, but then it always did in the original play also, so
that is not Hoffman's fault.  Once one accepts the Italian setting, the
use of Italian opera melodies is pleasant and does add to the mood,
though when the same melodies are repeated one starts to wonder if
there were not more to choose from.
     In spite of the cast, this is a competent but unexceptional
version of one of Shakespeare's more popular plays.  I rate it 5 on the
0 to 10 scale and a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Yao a yao yao dao waipo qiao (1995)
     The Triads are in Southeast Asia very much what the Cosa Nostra is
in the United States, a secret society that runs organized crime.  Some
historians attribute them to the 17th Century Heaven and Earth Society,
augmented by an outgrowth of the Boxers of the 1898-1900 Boxer
Rebellion.  In the beginning and for much of the intervening time their
avowed goal was to return the Ming Dynasty to power in China.  It is
not likely that they still take that cause seriously, but they still
hold a great deal of power in the countries where they operate in
places as diverse as Vietnam, the United States, and the Netherlands,
though probably not much in their native China, having been to a large
extent cleared up in 1949 and 1950 by an equally ruthless Communist
government.
     However, the title SHANGHAI TRIAD is a play on words.  The film is
really about a triad of three people involved in the underworld of
1930s Shanghai.  At least the English subtitles never explicitly say
they are Triads.  Suffice it to say one of the characters runs a
Shanghai crime syndicate, controlling the trade in opium and
prostitution.  And that could be part of the Triads.
     Shuisheng (played by Wang Xiaoxiao) is a country boy brought to
Shanghai by an uncle who is a flunky for Mr. Tang (Li Boatian), the
biggest crimelord in Shanghai.  Shuisheng's new job is to be a servant
for Tang's mistress Xiao Jinbao (Gong Li) a prostitute and a singer in
Tang's nightclub.  We see the story from Shuisheng's viewpoint from
which it is frustratingly difficult to see who it is killing whom and
why.  It will be more clear by the end of the film, but in the mean
time the story concentrates more on how cruelly treated Shuisheng is by
the beautiful prostitute Xiao Jinbao, who clearly is herself very
angered and frustrated by something and takes it out on Shuisheng.
Some of her anger is caused by her own virtual captivity by Tang.  In
spite of her status as a popular singer, Tang keeps her on a short
leash and uses her like a piece of furniture.  Shuisheng struggles to
understand his new employers and their current crisis.
     By now international audiences have come to expect Zhang Yi-Mou
films to star Gong Li.  The two have been very closely associated since
1988, having made RED SORGHUM, JU DOU, RAISE THE RED LANTERN, THE STORY
OF QUI JU, and TO LIVE.  In fact, their association is to come to an
end after just one more film already made but not yet released entitled
TEMPTRESS MOON.  Gong Li gives her most unusual and perhaps most
complex performance.  But perhaps she plays it with a little less
credibility than in some of her previous films.  Certainly this is the
most fanciful role she has played.  It is hard for a Westerner to judge
nuances in her acting due to the language barrier in this subtitled
film.
     Zhang is not constrained by some of the conventions of popular
Western films, so he is free to experiment a little with the form.  The
plot takes some turns that would be unlikely in a Western film,
particularly toward the end.  He is also able to tone down the violence
or leave it off-screen entirely.  And not just the violence but much of
the crime story takes place where the viewpoint character, Shuisheng,
cannot see it.  Zheng uses Steadicam shots to give us Shuisheng's
subjective viewpoint extensively.  This is his first use of Steadicam
and he reports in an interview that he mistrusts a reliance on the
device.  This is certainly one of Zhang's most opulent films and it
seems very strange to see musical production numbers in one of his
films.  Still, one cannot say overall that it all works.  I rate this
one a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Driving Miss Daisy (1989)
          Capsule review:  Good but disappointing story (after its
     reputation) of a cantankerous, aging Southern woman and the
     chauffeur hired for her over her protests.  Good performances
     but the mechanics of the play that should make us care for
     these characters and convince us that two decades are really
     passing are strangely absent.  Rating: low +2.
     Daisy Werthan is at war with the world and the world does not even
notice it.  At 72 she is still desperately holding on to her dignity, but
she is having increasing problems interfacing with the world.  Her response
is to lash out at anyone around and then go back to her lonely, insular
world.  As the film opens she is preparing to drive herself somewhere, only
to end up wrecking her car instead.  Her son decides it is time to hire
someone to do her driving for her, but she wants no part of the plan.  Her
son hires Hoke Colburn for the job, but Daisy refuses to give him anything
to do, at least at first.  DRIVING MISS DAISY covers in all too short a span
of minutes the next two decades of so of the relationship of Daisy and Hoke.
We see both reacting to the prejudice around them against each's group:
racism against Hoke's race, anti-Semitism against Daisy's religion.  Hoke
tries to be sympathetic.  Daisy does not try as hard.  Most of her impulses
are selfish.
     DRIVING MISS DAISY seems to be a sentimental favorite for Oscar
nominations this year, but in some ways it is a disappointment.  The film's
screenplay is by Alfred Uhry, based on his Broadway play and it is perhaps
his writing that gives the film both its best aspects and its greatest
flaws.  In the course of the film it is obvious why Daisy, portrayed by
Jessica Tandy, is so unpleasant.  But the unpleasantness is so rarely
relieved that understanding why she is the way she is is not enough.  It
perhaps is realistic that Daisy is so rarely likable, but it is dramatically
unsatisfying.  Perhaps she is more than one-dimensional, but she is less
than three.  Perhaps the story is really more Hoke's story, but here too the
writing is lacking.  Morgan Freeman does as much with a smaller supporting
role in GLORY as he does with Hoke in this film.  Perhaps at the beginning
he is a little more countrified and later he is a little more dignified, but
he too seems pretty much fixed in time.  Time is shown to pass very
awkwardly in DRIVING MISS DAISY.  There is a change of props, a graying in
the makeup, but we are told of rather than feel the passage of time.  By
comparison, in a film like SAME TIME, NEXT YEAR (also adapted from a
Broadway play), the passage of time is keenly felt, and in that film the
characters do change and are not so fixed in time.
     This is not to say that the film does not have its tender moments, but
every time Daisy shows some consideration for Hoke, they seem dramatically
to be saying it is a major victory, and frankly it just is not satisfying
enough.  Freeman turns in as good a performance as the story allows him.  So
does Tandy.  Aykroyd turns in his best performance ever as Boolie, Daisy's
son, but none of these performances makes for a character one really wants
to know, not even Freeman's.  There just is not enough to turn this from a
good film into a truly memorable one.  My rating is a low +2 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Wandafuru raifu (1998)
     CAPSULE: The recently dead must each choose the most memorable
moment of their lives to have them filmed.  Once this process is
complete they can continue on to heaven.  The film combines documentary
footage with interviews with dramatic storytelling.  A little slow at
times, but worthwhile over all.  Rating: 6 (0 to 10), high +1 (-4 to
+4)
   - Directed by Hirokazu Kore-Eda.
   - When one dies, according to the premise of this film, each person
     must choose the best moment of his life to have it recreated on
     film, then to live it for eternity.  One gets a week complete with
     advisors to get this accomplished.  This is the story of one week
     in this odd purgatory.
   - The building used for this purpose seems to be some sort of old
     school building.  It is one much in needing of a repainting.
     There is a staff of advisors, many with their own problems, trying
     to help the dead in their task by counseling them on what moment
     to choose and then helping them to get it filmed.
   - Much of the film is real documentary footage of people choosing
     and talking about the most significant moment in their lives.
     Actors hired for the film and when possible they talked about
     moments from their lives.  Only the actors who had scripted key
     moments were those who were needed for the story.  This use of
     interview material reminiscent of some Aardman animated films.
   - Not clear why the moments chosen by the dead had to be filmed by
     them except that the director had the facilities.  Only one or two
     moments are seen being filmed.

Title
Review for Rosewood (1997)
     I suppose for me the low point of ROSEWOOD was when at the end of
the opening credit sequence it says the film is based on a true story
and then immediately sets the date as Thursday,  December 31, 1922.  It
damages the credibility of a film when a screenwriter seemingly could
not be bothered to pick up a World Almanac to check a day of the week.
(A quick calculation told me it was a Sunday.)  Indeed, the story that
is told is admitted to be still very controversial in its facts and a
filmmaker generally has no good way of distinguishing, scene-by-scene,
fact from conjecture.  This is one version of the events and one that
still may be closer to the truth than the Florida state's official
version.  ROSEWOOD gives us a harrowing depiction of the race massacre
as it has not been shown on film before and one that some people will
be reluctant to believe could happen in this country.
     In the early 1920s the town of Rosewood is a prosperous black
community in what should have been a pleasant natural setting in
Florida.  However, there are long simmering resentments by local
whites, many of whom were not so successful but who felt a natural
superiority because of their skin color.  The film opens the day before
the historic events to give a view of life in and around Rosewood.
Whites with some money use the blacks for menial tasks and generally
seem more interested in fooling around than in actual work, most of
which seems to be being done by blacks.  We focus particularly on two
men.  The first is John Wright (played by Jon Voight) who runs a
grocery and general store in Rosewood.  He deals with blacks every day
but still thinks there is something not quite right about blacks being
allowed to join the army and kill white Germans.  He is not above
taking sexual advantage of his seventeen-year-old black clerk.  Today
he would be classed as a bigot, but for 1922 he almost passes as a
reasonable and enlightened man.  We see riding into town a tall, dark,
handsome stranger, in the tradition of Westerns, who is just visiting
the area looking for a place to settle down.  He is Mann (Ving Rhames),
an erudite army veteran.  One more or less expects his dramatic arrival
to be part of the chain of events that starts the riot that is to come,
but that story is told fairly accurately and he and Wright are purely
fictional characters created for the purpose of the story.  The actual
historic incident begins New Year's Day when white Fannie Taylor
(Catherine Kellner) is beaten by her white lover.  In order avoid the
wrath of her jealous husband and to explain the bruises to the
community she claims that a black man came to her door and started
beating her.  The person who really beat her was seen by her hired
help, Sarah Carrier (Esther Rolle), but Sarah is afraid to speak out
and risk vengeance on herself.  "'Nigger' is another word for guilty,"
she laments.  Fannie carefully added to her story that she was not
raped, but the local low-class white population, chaffing at the mere
presence, not to mention prosperity, of some of the blacks, forms a
lynch mob to find victims.  And so the events start rolling.  Before
they are over the very landscape will look like a war zone of
lynchings, burnings, and shootings.
     Chief among the mob is Duke (Bruce McGill), local white trash who
in the course of the film glories over his good work of killing blacks
and tries carefully to pass on to his son the finer points of how to
tie a noose and the best ways to lynch a black in some of the most
chilling scenes of the film.  Still Gregory Poirier's script, which may
at times be overstated, shies away from showing the events in their
full grimness.  At the height of the killing the script brings in Mann,
a larger than life hero to protect the young.  Sadly his heroics are
just a wishful fantasy of the script, though some exciting action
sequences toward the end of the film really are based on fact.  One of
the strengths of the script is the ambiguity of some of the characters.
Is grocer Wright a bigot who will side with the lynch mob or will he
side with the blacks that he has known.  How do we place Mrs. Wright
the quiet and ineffectual churchwoman.  Is Mann ultimately a coward or
a hero?  Is Sheriff Walker, who walks with the mob, restraining the
killers or supporting them?
     It is odd that in a film by and about black people the most
interesting character is white, but Jon , ambiguous tradesman really
remains just about the best thing in a very good film.  In stark
contrast to his muted character, Ving Rhames is magnetic and powerful,
but somehow seems to have stepped into the wrong film.  He is the one
flaw in the otherwise very good period feel of this film.  This is a
man who would have fit much better into a brash Western--in fact his
character seems as if he could have been based on the Danny Glover part
in SILVERADO.  There must have been some sort need felt to have a black
hero.  In fact historically the real heroes, and we do see a little of
this in the film, are the white people who risked bringing the wrath of
the mob onto themselves to give shelter to blacks.
     At 140 minutes, this film qualifies as a genuine film epic, and
one of the few we have seen in a while.  It has the feel, however, of a
film that used a low-budget wisely rather than being a big-budget film.
In that regard it is very similar to MATEWAN.  I have not cared for
what I have seen from director John Singleton to this point, including
the highly-touted BOYZ N THE HOOD, but ROSEWOOD is quite another
matter.  This is a film that deserves multiple viewings.  I give it a
+3 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     The following is an account of the Rosewood Incident as described
in a Florida State document submitted on March 24, 1994 in
investigation of the incident.
RE:  HB 591 by Representatives De Grandy and Lawson
Claim of Arnett Goins, Minnie Lee Langley, et al. v. State of Florida
FINDINGS OF FACT:   THIS IS AN EQUITABLE CLAIM SEEKING $7.2 MILLION
FOR DAMAGES RESULTING FROM THE 1923 DESTRUCTION OF ROSEWOOD, FLORIDA.
     Upon review of the record presented, and consideration of the
sworn testimony, the following description of the events which occurred
in Rosewood in 1923 emerges. In January of 1923 Rosewood was a small,
mostly African-American community of approximately 120 residents
located on the Seaboard Air Line Railroad in western Levy County, nine
miles east of Cedar Key.  Today the site of Rosewood is marked on State
Road 24. At one time the community had a timber mill, a post office,
several stores, a depot and hotel; however, by 1923 the cedar wood had
been harvested, and the sawmill operations moved to Sumner, a somewhat
larger community, three miles west of Rosewood.  The black residents
remaining at Rosewood earned a living by working at the Cummer sawmill
in Sumner, trapping and hunting, and vegetable farming.  In addition,
several of the black women of Rosewood worked in domestic capacities
for the white residents of Sumner. The main store of Rosewood was owned
and operated by a white man named John Wright.  In 1923 the black
community of Rosewood consisted of approximately twenty families, many
of whom were closely related through marriages. Some of the black
families owned their homes as well as other property in the area. The
community had a one-room school, at least two churches, and a masonic
lodge.  The railroad depot remained, but it does not appear that there
was a regularly scheduled stop at Rosewood at that time. There was no
history of racial tension at Rosewood, and the record indicates that
prior to 1923 the black and white communities had a generally amiable
relationship.
     On Monday, January 1, 1923, in Sumner, Florida,  Mrs. Frances
Taylor, a twenty-two year old white housewife, alleged that a black man
had entered her home and assaulted her. Mrs. Taylor, who was visibly
bruised, told her neighbors that while her husband James Taylor was at
work at the sawmill, an unidentified black man had assaulted and robbed
her. The specific nature of the assault is not apparent from the
record; however, the white community believed there had been a sexual
assault, although it does not appear that Mrs. Taylor was ever examined
by a physician. After repeating her allegations, Mrs.  Taylor then
collapsed and was taken to a neighbor's home.
     A contradictory account of this event circulated in the black
community. According to Mrs. Sarah Carrier, a black woman from Rosewood
who did laundry for Mrs. Taylor, and Mrs.  Carrier's granddaughter,
Philomena Goins, who accompanied Mrs. Carrier to the Taylor home on the
morning of January 1, 1923, a white man had visited Mrs. Taylor that
day, and left shortly before Mrs. Taylor made her allegations. The
black community believed that Mrs. Taylor had a romantic relationship
with this unidentified white man, that they had quarrelled, and that
this white man was actually responsible for Mrs. Taylor's injuries.  In
response to Mrs. Taylor's allegations, a group of white men, mainly
residents of Sumner or workers at the Cummer sawmill, came together to
search for the perpetrator. At about this  time word reached Sumner
from Levy County Sheriff Robert Elias Walker that a black convict named
Jesse Hunter had escaped from a work crew doing road construction near
Otter Creek.  Jesse Hunter became the focus of the search. Later that
day, Sheriff Walker sent for bloodhounds, and the trail of the fugitive
was followed from behind the Taylor house in Sumner, leading the party
of men toward Rosewood.
     The group first came across Aaron Carrier, a black man from
Rosewood who apparently was coerced into implicating Sam Carter, a
forty-five year old black man who did some blacksmith work. Sheriff
Walker intervened during the interrogation of Aaron Carrier and
apparently sent him to the jail in Bronson for safekeeping. The dogs
followed the trail to Sam Carter's house, and the search party became
convinced that Sam Carter had placed the fugitive in his wagon and
assisted the fugitive in an escape. The men seized Sam Carter and
strung him up over a tree limb in an effort to make Carter  reveal the
place where he had taken the fugitive.
     The role of the law enforcement officers in the search is unclear.
The record indicates that Sheriff Walker was informed and probably sent
for the bloodhounds from Ft. White. There is also testimony that the
deputy sheriff assigned to western Levy County, Clarence Williams, who
also served as a quarterboss at the Cummer sawmill, was involved in
searching for the fugitive; however, it does not appear that either the
sheriff or the deputy were actually members of the search party that
seized Sam Carter.
     Of particular interest in this regard is the testimony of Ernest
Parham, who at that time was a nineteen year old resident of Sumner,
working at the general store. Mr. Parham testified that after the news
of Mrs.  Taylor's assault on January 1, 1923 spread, tension was very
high in Sumner. At the general store where he worked, they sold so much
ammunition that the store's owner decided to hide his supplies and tell
customers that they were sold out. Later that evening, Mr. Parham
closed the store and noticed that deputy sheriff Williams, who had
walked to Rosewood, had left his car  parked outside. Mr. Parham drove
the Williams' car by a back road from Sumner to Rosewood and located
the deputy near Rosewood. At that time noise from a crowd could be
heard from down the road. Mr. Parham left the deputy and walked down to
where the crowd was gathered, and observed that a group of white men,
many of whom he knew, had strung Sam Carter up on a tree limb in an
attempt to force him to reveal information about the fugitive. Mr.
Parham intervened in the situation, and the crowd of men let Carter
down. Carter then took them to a place down the road where he said he
let the fugitive off; however, when the dogs failed to pick up the
scent, one of the men in the crowd shot and killed Sam Carter. The
crowd then dispersed, and Mr. Parham returned to Sumner.
     The body of Sam Carter was left on the road that night and
apparently law enforcement officials did not discover the body until
the following morning of Tuesday, January 2, 1923. Later that same day
a coroner's jury inquest verdict signed by L.L. Johns as Justice of the
Peace determined:  "We the Jury after the examination of the said Sam
Carter who being found lying Dead, find that the said Sam Carter came
to his Death by being shot by Unknown Party so say we all."
     It does not appear that any further criminal investigation was
conducted into the circumstances of the death of Sam Carter.
     The search for Mrs. Taylor's assailant continued. On Thursday,
January 4, 1923, word reached Sumner that the man they sought was being
protected by Sylvester Carrier in Rosewood. A group of white men went
to the Carrier home that evening. Minnie Lee Langley and Arnett Goins,
claimants in this case, were children present at the Carrier home the
night of January 4, 1923, and testified to the events of that evening.
The children had been told that trouble was expected and they were
gathered together with other relatives at the Carrier home for their
protection.  They were taken to an upstairs bedroom. A group of white
men approached the house and called for Sarah Carrier to come out.  She
did not respond. The white men then came to the porch.
     The white men shot and killed a dog tied in front of the house.
According to the testimony, one of the white men, C.P. "Poly"
Wilkerson, a former quarterboss from Sumner, kicked in the door, and
was immediately shot and killed by Sylvester Carrier.  A second white
man Henry Andrews tried to enter the house and was also shot and killed
by Sylvester Carrier. The remaining white men retreated, and gunfire
was exchanged.  During the ensuing gunfire Sarah Carrier was shot and
killed. The white men apparently ran out of ammunition, and during the
respite the children were taken out of the house by older relatives,
and escaped into the woods of Gulf Hammock.
     It does not appear that any law enforcement officials were among
the group at the Carrier home on the night of January 4, 1923. Ernest
Parham testified that deputy Williams was at the hotel in Sumner that
evening.  Mr. Parham specifically remembered that deputy Williams was
discussing the ongoing events and stated that "All hell's breaking out
in Rosewood." There is nothing in the record to indicate the
whereabouts of Sheriff Walker on that night.
     In the morning of January 5, 1923 the bodies of Poly Wilkerson,
Henry Andrews, Sarah Carrier, and another black man, reported to be
Sylvester Carrier were found at the house. There is some dispute as to
whether Sylvester Carrier was actually killed at Rosewood. His family
believes that he escaped and members received Christmas greetings from
him for many years after the shootings at Rosewood.  After the killing
of Poly Wilkerson and Henry Andrews, the violence escalated. Groups of
white men from the surrounding areas, and some reportedly from other
states, came to Rosewood. During the following days every black
residence was burned. The black community fled to the woods. Two more
deaths of residents of Rosewood were reported. Lexie Gordon, a woman of
mixed color, was sick with typhoid fever and unable to leave Rosewood.
When her home was set on fire she went out the back door and was shot
and killed.  James Carrier, the grandfather of Minnie Lee Langley, was
reported to have been forced to dig his own grave and was then shot and
killed.  Another black man, Mingo Williams, was reportedly shot while
chopping down a tree twenty miles away by a group of the white men
going to Rosewood.
     Many of the white residents of the area came to the assistance of
the black community. John Wright, the white owner of the general store
in Rosewood, hid some of the children at his house, and arranged for a
railroad car to pick up the women and children who had escaped into
Gulf Hammock. Margaret Cannon testified that her father, Morris Cannon,
a deputy sheriff in Levy County at the time, went into the woods and
found the black woman and children and brought them to the train. They
were taken to Gainesville. The black residents of Rosewood did not
return.
     Several years later the Cummer sawmill in Sumner burned. The
company opened a new mill in Lacoochee, Florida, in Pasco County, and
many of the Rosewood families moved to that area.  Others dispersed to
Jacksonville and Miami, and a few others moved out of state. Some of
the property of the Rosewood residents apparently was lost to taxes,
but there are a few records that indicate some property was later sold.
At this time it is difficult to determine the role of law enforcement
officers, and other local and state officials, regarding their conduct
during the Rosewood violence. Media accounts state that the Governor,
Cary Hardee, was aware of the events, but had gone hunting on the
afternoon of January 4, 1923. It also appears that Sheriff Walker had
informed the Governor that there was no need to call in National Guard
troops. Although the record indicates that the National Guard had been
mobilized in preceding years to keep the peace during civil
disturbances, the Guard was not called to Rosewood. It further appears
that the Sheriff of Alachua County organized a posse to come to Levy
County to assist in keeping order, but the role of the Alachua Sheriff
in these events is not clear from the record. Sheriff Walker resigned
July 8, 1924 after the Rosewood incident, and was replaced by L.L.
Johns, the former Justice of the Peace, who signed the coroner's
verdict regarding the death of Sam Carter.
     On January 29, 1923 the Governor ordered that a special grand jury
investigate the violence at Rosewood.  The grand jury was presided over
by Judge A.V. Long of the Eighth Judicial Circuit.  George DeCottes,
the state attorney for the Seventh Circuit in Deland was appointed as
prosecutor. On February 12, 1923 the grand jury convened in Bronson.
There are no records of the grand jury. The newspaper accounts state
that thirteen witnesses testified on February 13, 1923, and more
witnesses were scheduled for the following day.  Examination of
witnesses ended on February 14, 1923, and on February 16, 1923 the
grand jury stated that they were unable to find any evidence upon which
to base indictments.
     No charges were ever brought by the State of Florida against any
person for the assault on Frances Taylor, for the killing of Sam
Carter, for the deaths occurring at the Carrier home on the night of
January 4, 1923, for the deaths of Lexie Gordon, James Carrier, or
Mingo Williams, or for any acts of arson and theft which occurred at
Rosewood, Florida.
As AMENDED, I recommend HB 591 be reported FAVORABLY.
Respectfully submitted,

Title
Review for Bai fa mo nu zhuan (1993)
     The historic backdrop for THE BRIDE WITH WHITE HAIR by itself
would have made a better film than THE BRIDE WITH WHITE HAIR did.  What
makes this an interesting film is something that will be missed by
viewers of the film with little knowledge of Chinese history.  The
fantasy is the story of Yi-Hang who appears in the film as a friend of
Wu San-kuei.  They are two men who will react very similarly in
different but parallel struggles.  Each will betray people who depend
on him and in each case it will be for the love of a woman.  Supposedly
the story of the film is an old folktale, but to play up the thematic
similarities to actual history it is set in the 1640s with only a few
brief references to what was happening with Wu San-kuei.  Here is a
quick summary of what was happening.
     For too long the Ming Dynasty had ruled selfishly and had sown the
seeds of their own destruction.  A whole class of hangers-on--60,000
people all claiming to be part of the royal family--were supported at
public expense, impoverishing the peasants.  They did little for their
keep but collect taxes.  Whole families would go first into debt and
then into slavery in their own villages.  Public suicides were common.
In 1628 there was a famine in the Northwest and out of it rose a rebel
leader, Li Tzu-ch'eng.  The people could take no more, and a peasant
army rose up under the leadership of Li Tzu-ch'eng and captured
Northern China in 1642 and Beijing in 1644.  The Ming Emperor committed
suicide, but his army for the most part stayed loyal to the Mings.
     Both Wu San-Kuei and his father had been military commanders for
the dying Ming Dynasty.  They had been charged with repelling the
powerful Manchus, the descendents of the Mongols, wanting to sweep back
into China.  What was stopping the Manchus was the Great Wall and the
tactical difficulty of getting past its army defenses.
     But Li's rebel army had captured Wu's father to hold as a hostage.
Then adding to Wu's pain they captured his favorite concubine.  So the
peasants, the Manchus, and the Mings were each trying to take control
of China.  Li offered a Wu San-kuei a truce with the Mings and an
alliance to push back the Manchus.  But Wu's hatred was so great now he
wanted no part of an alliance the peasant army.  Li attacked Wu.  Wu
made his alliance with the Manchus.  He opened the Great Wall gates at
Shanhaikuan and allowed the Manchus to enter China on the promise they
would help defeat Li's rebellion and if they had power would allow the
elite to retain their privileges.  Perhaps Li felt he could control the
Manchus or perhaps his hatred of the peasants who captured two people
he loved was just too great.  But he let the Manchus into China, and it
was like ringing the dinner bell.  The peasants held Beijing for just a
month before they were crushed by the combined might of the Mings and
the Manchus.  Then suddenly it was just the Mings and the Manchus vying
for the country.  Soon the Ch'ing Dynasty of Manchus were China and
they remained China for 267 years until 1911.  Wu San-kuei had indeed
changed the course of history, but only to open the door for one
dynasty to defeat another.
     THE BRIDE WITH WHITE HAIR is purportedly based on an older
folktale, but is retold against the backdrop of the falling of the
Ming.  Wu San-kuei shows up briefly in both THE BRIDE WITH WHITE HAIR
and its sequel, THE BRIDE WITH WHITE HAIR II.  His story runs
simultaneously and parallel to that of Yi-Hang who would be called a
traitor to the eight good clans who form the Wu Tang.  He would be
accused of unleashing the forces of a very different evil.
     Yi-Hang was just a young boy, but already a student of martial
arts, when he was chased and nearly killed by wolves.  What saved his
life was a girl about his own age who seemed to have the ability to
command the wolves.  For years she remained just a memory.  In typical
martial arts film fashion Yi-Hang (Leslie Cheung as an adult) grows up
frequently getting into trouble usually through no fault of his own.
But his virtue and his martial arts skill get him out of any problem.
He becomes the best fighter of the eight Wu Tang clans.  But there is
trouble for the eight clans coming from an evil rival clan, the Chi Wu
Shuang, led by a somewhat unique pair of evil sorcerers.  What they are
I will not describe, but clearly magic was involved in their origins
since it is a biological impossibility.  But their secret weapon is a
third and powerful sorcerer, the beautiful woman, Lian Nichang (played
by Brigitte Lin) who uses her hair to entangle her enemies.  Yi-hang
finds Lian bathing in the woods and recognizes her as the wolf-girl of
his youth.  He falls in love with her, or realizes that he has loved
her since she was a child.  But she is of the rival clan threatening to
destroy the Wu Tang.  We have a sort of Romeo and Juliet story of the
love between these two martial artists.
     The story does not have a lot to offer that we have not seen
before.  And the martial arts fighting is augmented by special effects
and by modifying the camera speed.  So the fighting we see is about as
believable as the story.  What makes this film worth going out of ones
way to see is the photography.  In spite of the fighting and the blood,
this is something of an art film just for the stunning visuals.
Director Ronny Yu apparently wanted to give this film a unique look
that is a visual feast.  The film's rich use of colors, the beautiful
costuming, and the art direction are just terrific and make up for a
multitude of other sins.  The cinematographer is Peter Pau and he did
more to create this mythic film than anyone else involved.  THE BRIDE
WITH WHITE HAIR really deserves to be seen for the rich visual imagery.
I rate it a 6 on the 0 to 10 scale and a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     THE BRIDE WITH WHITE HAIR II continues the story ten years later.
But the relationship it bears to its predecessor is a lot like SON OF
FRANKENSTEIN bore to THE BRIDE OF FRANKENSTEIN.  It has the same
director, it even has the same actors, but the creativity is all gone.
Instead of being about mythic characters, the film is about people who
know the mythic characters.  Lian Nichang is no longer a three-
dimensional character but has been reduced effectively to being a
monster (again parallel to the FRANKENSTEIN films).  I do not know who
the cinematographer was but I could bet that it was not Peter Pau.
Blue filters are over-used to try and recapture some of the look of the
first film, but too much of the magic has gone out of the story.  I
rate THE BRIDE WITH WHITE HAIR II a 4 on the 0 to 10 scale and a low 0
on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Prince of Egypt, The (1998)
     Back in the 1950s and 1960s Biblical films were again a big
business like they had not been since the days of silent film.  Cecil
B. DeMille opened the way with his remake of his own THE TEN
COMMANDMENTS (1956).  BEN HUR (1959) followed, and while not a story
directly from the Bible itself, it did involve Biblical incidents.  It
was also a remake of a 1920s film.  Eventually the times changed and
the popularity of Biblical films died.  The last major Biblical films
released to theaters were KING DAVID (1985) and THE LAST TEMPTATION OF
CHRIST (1988).  There have been some made-for-TV experiments, since but
THE PRINCE OF EGYPT from Dreamworks is the first major Biblical film
released to theaters in a decade.  In many ways it is THE TEN
COMMANDMENTS for a new generation and it repeatedly invites comparison.
Ironically the new version may create as much interest in the art and
culture of ancient Egypt as it creates for the Bible.
     THE PRINCE OF EGYPT begins with a statement that the story that
follows is true to the essence and values of the original story.  That
may be true but the film is somewhat truer to the plot of THE TEN
COMMANDMENTS than it is to any story told in the Bible.  DeMille based
his story on three novels about Moses as much as he did on the Bible.
The Bible does not make the young Moses an important person in
Pharaoh's household.  In Exodus the story is told with terse economy.
It merely says he was raised as the son of Pharaoh's daughter and later
that a slave called him "a prince."  And do not over-rate the value of
being a prince of Egypt, there were dozens.  Rameses the Great, who by
the way is generally considered to be the Pharaoh with whom Moses
bargained, had over 100 children.  His father might well have had
equally many and probably would have had little interest in the Hebrew
child one of his many daughters had adopted.  It makes for a better
story to say that Moses nearly became a Pharaoh himself, but that is
not what the Bible says.
     The story of THE PRINCE OF EGYPT will be familiar to many in the
audience, though somewhat more if they are familiar with the 1956 film
than is they know the Bible story.  The Israelites were slaves to a
Pharaoh in Egypt who was afraid that even as slaves they were becoming
too numerous and soon would become too powerful.  Pharaoh decrees that
all the male children of the Israelites are to be slain.  This brings
us to the opening of the film where Yocheved (voiced by Ofra Haza) sets
her newborn son adrift on the Nile in a reed basket, weighing a great
danger against a more certain death.  The boy is adopted by Pharaoh's
wife (not daughter as the Bible says) and becomes like a second son to
the Pharaoh.  In the most interesting variation on the DeMille version
Rameses (Ralph Fiennes) loves Moses (Val Kilmer).  Moses loves Rameses
too until he finds that he, Moses, is really a Hebrew.  So rather than
being a one-dimensional villain, there is some depth to Rameses.  Moses
kills an Egyptian taskmaster and flees Egypt.  While Rameses misses his
friend, Moses is called on by God (also voiced by Val Kilmer) to return
to Egypt and free his people, setting up the classic conflict.
     In animation, virtually anything that the mind's eye can see can
be put on the screen, and THE PRINCE OF EGYPT wastes no opportunity to
outdo DeMille's spectacle.  The Egyptian architecture as it appears
here is positively titanic.  The whole film seems to show architecture
of the same scale that was used to cow the locals at Abu Simbel.
Egyptian architecture is impressive, but here it is portrayed with a
certain hyperbole.  The buildings and statues as shown here are
enormous and their size is frequently exaggerated with overhead views.
     The style of Egyptian wall decoration is to show important figures
as being larger than other figures in a scene.  A variation on that is
used by the Dreamworks animators.  The most important characters are
given a realistic three-dimensional look.  Lessor characters are
animated in a flatter style.  That effect could have made the animation
look wildly uneven.  But the animators at Dreamworks make it all work
quite well.  In addition some of the important sequences look in part
or all almost photographic.  Some of the most effective scenes however
are done entirely flat as the story of what led to the opening of the
film is shown as animated wall decoration.  This sequence rivals the
parting of the Red Sea as the most imaginative in the film.
     In the DeMille telling there is an emotional climax to the story
and a visual climax.  The visual climax is the parting of the Red Sea.
Using the best visual methods available in the 1950s, DeMille used a
patchwork of mattes of scenes of flowing water.  The methods were
imperfect and little more convincing than using two rounded cakes of
Jell-O as DeMille did in the silent version. Computer animation gives a
filmmaker much more freedom and also more responsibility to do
something spectacular.  And spectacular is what they manage.  Where
this version falls flat is mishandling of the emotional climax of the
story.  After the night of terror and death comes the morning of
Freedom.  DeMille managed to give it a tremendous impact that remains
exciting even after many viewings.  A big piece of the credit goes to
Elmer Bernstein's music. THE PRINCE OF EGYPT understates the departure
almost disastrously with the Hebrews just quietly picking up and moving
out to the music of a song.  Time will tell if I am wrong, but all the
songs by Steven Schwartz seemed immediately forgettable.
     As with ANTZ a host of familiar actors were used to voice parts.
In this case Val Kilmer, Ralph Fiennes, Michelle Pfeiffer, Sandra
Bullock, Jeff Goldblum, Danny Glover, Patrick Stewart, Helen Mirren,
Steve Martin, and Martin Short.  To my ear only Goldblum and Stewart
have voices characteristic enough to pick out.  Both Moses and God are
voiced by Val Kilmer, so it was almost a mercy that I did not recognize
his voice.  In general animation does not require big stars to do the
voices, and it almost seems wasteful.
     THE PRINCE OF EGYPT tells the story of the Exodus for a new
generation and does it in spectacular style.  I give it a 7 on the 0 to
10 scale and a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Doc Hollywood (1991)
          Capsule review:  A good director turns out his most
     commercial but least interesting film.  Michael Caton-Jones,
     the director of SCANDAL and MEMPHIS BELLE, tells the story of
     a big city doctor stranded in a small town in South Carolina
     who finds himself bewitched by the locals.  Pleasant but
     predictable.  Rating: 1 (-4 to +4).
     This whole film is something of a riddle and the riddle is what is
Michael Caton-Jones doing directing a film like this?  First, Caton-Jones is
British and DOC HOLLYWOOD is about small-town life in South Carolina.  That
cannot be a subject about which Caton-Jones is particularly expert.
Probably the closest Caton-Jones has ever been to the American South is
watching reruns of "The Andy Griffith Show."  That television show's
Mayberry has more than a passing resemblance to Grady, South Carolina.  But
Caton-Jones worked on ABSOLUTE BEGINNERS in a minor but formative capacity.
He went on to direct SCANDAL and MEMPHIS BELLE.  Each of these films was set
a generation or so back.  Each had notable actors but no big stars.  Each of
these films took something of a risk presenting what could have been an
unpopular viewpoint.  (An interesting piece of trivia: Mandy Rice-Davies
played in ABSOLUTE BEGINNERS, Bridget Fonda played in DOC HOLLYWOOD, and in
SCANDAL Bridget Fonda played Mandy Rice-Davies.)
     The story of DOC HOLLYWOOD is far from original: big-city boy meets and
falls in love with a small-town of interesting and eccentric characters.  I
have seen that plot attributed to Frank Capra, though I myself cannot think
of a single Capra film with a plot that seems to me all that similar to DOC
HOLLYWOOD.  I will, however, point out that this film has a strong
similarity to Bill Forsythe's LOCAL HERO.  I would claim that LOCAL HERO is
by far the better film, but if I were from Scotland I might well prefer a
film to show me exotic South Carolina.  The title is a nickname for
Dr. Benjamin Stone (played by Michael J. Fox), who is headed for a lucrative
cosmetic surgery practice in Beverly Hills when an accident and the damage
it causes forces him to spend some time in Grady, South Carolina.  You can
probably figure the plot from there.  Boy meets town.  Boy hates town.
Audience loves town.  Boy meets girl.  Girl hates boy.  Audience loves girl.
Boy loves girl.  Girl starts to like boy.  Boy starts to like town.  Boy,
girl, and town live happily ever after.  Together.  Audience leaves happy.
     I can be as silly as the next guy and I liked the town and laughed at
the jokes.  The town is likable.  The town is lovable.  What's not to love
about a town where blacks and whites, men and women, city folk and rednecks
all sashay together in perfect harmony, where never is heard a bigoted word
and nobody looks twice at gays.  This Southern town is the Ku Klux Klan's
worst nightmare come to life.  And the plot doesn't bear much thought
either.  One of the characters pays a minor podiatry bill with a pig whose
value is probably ten times the size of his debt.  He could easily have sold
the pig, paid his bill, and had a big piece of change in his pocket.
     Then there is the incredible stretching Michael J. Fox.  He has a lot
of scenes together with female lead Julie Warner.  Somehow when you see
full-length shots of the two of them she is perhaps an inch taller than he
is.  In every close-up she has to reach up to a Michael J. Fox who has a
good two or three inches on her.  This film is willing to find endearing all
sorts of eccentricities which Grady, South Carolina, accepts without batting
an eye, but would rather create a distraction than break the taboo that the
boy has got to be taller than the girl.  The film has people joke about how
short Dr. Stone is, but of course he finds a soulmate who is even shorter.
     DOC HOLLYWOOD is entertaining and pleasant but the audience gets none
of the value of seeing itself through someone else's eyes that they would
get from a Louis Malle film such as ATLANTIC CITY.  I rate it a flat +1 on
to -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for My Beautiful Laundrette (1985)
[This is another retrospective of a film which had limited theatrical release
and is just now becoming available on videocassette.  Also, the director,
Stephen Frears, has just released another film, PRICK UP YOUR EARS.  -ecl]
          Capsule review:  A serious plot rife with unexpected
     twists combines with some nice comic touches to make this
     film about a Pakistani family a memorable one.  This film
     portrays some Pakistanis as having faults, hence it is the
     center of controversy, but it probably gives a realistic
     picture of what one extended family in London's Pakistani
     community might be like.
     One of the most controversial films of 1986 is an apparently minor film
that in this country is playing almost exclusively in art houses.  MY BEAUTIFUL
LAUNDERETTE was made for England's Channel 4.  Pakistanis are picketing the
theaters that show the film, claiming that it portrays an unfair portrait of
their countrymen.  What is it they do not like about the film?
     Well, MY BEAUTIFUL LAUNDERETTE is a comedy/drama about a young Pakistani
who is caring for his ailing father and who goes to work for his uncle, Saeed
Jaffrey.  The uncle, the family patriarch, has the boy washing cars, but then
asks him to manage a run-down launderette.  The boy instead offers to rent the
launderette and run it for his own profit.  From there the plot gets pretty
complicated.  If it doesn't sound like an AIRPLANE!-style comedy, you are
right.  This is actually a fairly serious film with a wide variety of comic
touches salted in.  The film at once entertains and gives some insight into the
structure and politics of Pakistani families and into the problems they face.
     I cannot say for sure if it was done intentionally, but the photography
seems often to use three planes of action.  Something will be happening in the
foreground, midground, and background of a scene.  The director orchestrates
the three planes so your attention will be on one plane of action and you will
realize a piece of humor or a plot complication is simultaneously being
introduced on one of the other two planes.
     There are few familiar faces in the film.  Saeed Jaffrey is best known for
the role of Billy Fish in THE MAN WHO WOULD BE KING.  Another actor is familiar
for having played Nehru in GANDHI.  Beyond those two the cast is unfamiliar but
good.
     So why the controversy over this film?  I think it is not because it
misrepresents Pakistanis but because they are not represented as angelic.
After a long time of mainstream American cinema using blacks only as buffoons,
there was a period in which they could only appear in films as being nearly
perfect.  These were films like A PATCH OF BLUE and LILLIES OF THE FIELD.  Even
now it is unusual for filmmakers to show a realistic spectrum of blacks: some
good, some bad.  MY BEAUTIFUL LAUNDERETTE is the first major film to show much
of the Pakistani community.  Some Pakistanis appear in a favorable light, some
in a much less favorable light.  I think as long as the viewer realizes that
the people in this film do not represent traits of a whole nationality of
people any more than the characters in RUTHLESS PEOPLE or PSYCHO III do, the
film will promote rather than destroy understanding of Pakistani immigrants.
Rate it a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Cliffhanger (1993)
          Capsule review:  Can Rockies rescue ranger Sylvester
     Stallone recover from a trauma, and get it together enough to
     clobber nasty super-criminals trying to recover three
     suitcases of stolen money that fell out of a plane over the
     Rockies?  Hint: Stallone co-authored the screenplay.  Lots of
     action, lots of cliche, a few stunts.  Rating: low +1 (-4 to
     +4).
     Sylvester Stallone is back in a pure action, non-comedy role.  He had
tried breaking out into comic roles in OSCAR and STOP OR MY MOM WILL SHOOT.
OSCAR I like to spring on unsuspecting people since it really is about the
funniest comedy I have seen in the last ten years, though probably not due
to Stallone's efforts.  On the other hand, STOP OR MY MOM WILL SHOOT is
reputedly just awful.  So Stallone is back in a sort of mountain-climbing
equivalent of DIE HARD that might have been called FALL HARD.  Stallone
himself co-authored the screenplay with Michael France, undoubtedly to make
sure the story gave audiences exactly what they wanted--breath-taking stunts
tied together with brain-numbing cliche.
     Stallone plays Gabe Walker, a Rocky Mountain rescue ranger who was once
great but lost his nerve after a horrible traumatic experience on a wire
high over a valley that should have been called Macho Grande.  Gabe is back
in the Rockies a year later, testing to see if he can get together with his
woman friend Jessie (played by Janice Turner), patch things up with a buddy
(played by Michael Rooker), and pull his life together.  Just at that moment
a plot to steal $100,000,000 is falling apart overhead.  John Lithgow plays
Qualen, a British master criminal with an accent that occasionally fades.
Qualen heads a team of killers who intended to hijack the cash but ended up
accidentally dropping it in three suitcases over the Rockies and who now
want the rescue rangers to retrieve the suitcases.
     Of course, the real stars of the film are the three S's: Stallone,
scenery, and stunts.  While some of the scenery really is the Rockies, some
is the Italian Alps near Cortina D'Ampezzo, and some is sets.  The stunts,
which I will not describe so as not to spoil them, are impressive, though
not really too different from those you would probably think of if you were
scripting a similar story.  Trevor Jones's score bears a marked resemblance
to his score for THE LAST OF THE MOHICANS.
     This is about what you would expect Sylvester Stallone would be
releasing in the summertime.  It is nearly two hours of action and familiar
plot against a less familiar setting.  I give it a low +1 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Heart and Souls (1993)
     The light "life after death" fantasy is still with us.  You know the
sort of film: TOPPER, A GUY NAMED JOE, STAIRWAY TO HEAVEN, HERE COMES
MR. JORDAN, DEFENDING YOUR LIFE, even GHOST (though it had darker tones
mixed in).  They all have a nice, cushy, "death is just a change of state"
feel.  They were particularly popular during World War II when a comforting
view of death was needed.
     The latest entry, HEART AND SOULS, has a surprising degree of charm.
We are introduced to four people, each working out his or her life but
having unfinished business.  Destiny puts them all on the same ill-fated bus
which falls off the side of a bridge to avoid crashing into a car.  The car
just happens to contain a woman giving birth.  All four are killed along
with the driver, but the souls of the four passengers survive and are
somehow metaphysically attached to Thomas Reilly, the baby.  They are
compelled never to leave Reilly's side.  For a while they are visible to the
young boy, but when this appears to do more harm than good, they follow him
invisibly.
     When Reilly becomes a man (played by Robert Downey, Jr.) the souls
suddenly find they each have a mission and must appear to, and sometimes
physically possess, Reilly.
     Our four spirits are Charles Grodin as a singer with stage fright,
Alfre Woodard as a woman torn from the children she loved, Tom Sizemore as a
small-time hood with an attack of conscience, and Kyra Sedgwick as an overly
diffident lover.  But Downey outdoes Steve Martin's performance in ALL OF
ME, being in turn possessed by the four spirits.  Downey prior to CHAPLIN
never seemed to have much screen presence.  Now he is showing an amazing
flair for physical comedy and a tremendous versatility.
     There are some problems with the script.  All too often American
businesses are shown as having one conscienceless cut-throat and a bunch of
executives living off his kills.  This film falls into that same trap.  What
is more, the company that Downey's character seems to be liquidating is
apparently never save.  But in spite of that loose end, this is a likable
fantasy with some of its kooky special effects and its phantom bus.  It
might be a little sugary for some tastes, but it also has its share of
touching moments.  I rate this a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Angel Heart (1987)
     Harry Angel (played by Mickey Rourke) is a hard-boiled private eye in
the Philip Marlowe tradition.  He is a little crude, a little rude, and
occasionally a little bit dense.  His client is Louis Cyphre (played by
Robert DeNiro), a recluse with a silver cane, pointed fingernails, and, like
a cipher, is something of a mystery to be solved.  Cyphre hires Angel to
track down Johnny Favorite, a singer who disappeared twelve years earlier in
1943.  Angel follows a trail that has been cold for twelve years through
Harlem, Poughkeepsie, Coney Island, and soon to New Orleans.  The trail will
lead from drug addicts to evangelists to voodoo worshipers.  Harry will
trigger a series of murders of friends of Favorite and will become the prime
suspect in some of these murders before he discovers the secret of the
disappearance of Favorite.
     ANGEL HEART is an interesting variation on the detective stories of the
'40s.  It is as moody a piece as Raymond Chandler would have written,
probably nearly as suspenseful, but it also is a comment on religion.  We
see gospel evangelists squeezing money from their believers, we see baptisms
for a religion whose primary symbol is, as one character describes, a man to
a wooden cross, and we see voodoo rituals with slaughtered chickens.  Each
somehow looks equally ridiculous.  I doubt that Raymond Chandler would have
ever thought to put comparative religion into one of his stories.
     To be perfectly frank, my first reaction was to say that this was just
a fair detective story and a little bit more and hence would have given the
film a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.  However, thinking back, the full solution
of the mystery makes a lot of the film, even some of its settings, seem a
lot more interesting.  The film has a complexity and makes statements not
immediately apparent on first viewing.  On consideration, the film does
deserve a +2.
     Oh, and as for the film having to have ten seconds of Mickey Rourke
shaking his buttocks edited out in order to go from an X to an R rating--who
cares?  That ten seconds has become a major topic of interest about the
film.  It has little to do with the main thrust of the film.  There might
not have even been an explicit sex scene if the rating system had not been
around.  Arguing what an R-rated film should be and what can only be in a
X-rated film is like arguing how many angels can dance on the head of a pin.
And I guess that brings us back to Angels.

Title
Review for Clay Pigeons (1998)
     CAPSULE: A non-murderer who broke the law avoiding a possible
murder charge finds himself deeper and deeper in trouble.  The plot is
tightly written and reminiscent of Hitchcock's FRENZY.  Tightly paced
and well acted.  Only the very last sequence rings false.  Rating:  8
(0 to 10), high +2 (-4 to +4)
   - Nice vicious murder mystery with a patsy caught in the middle.
   - Should appeal to the same audience that liked RED ROCK WEST.
   - The viewer (almost always) knows what is going on, but the web of
     events becomes tighter and tighter around the neck of Clay
     (Joaquin Phoenix).
   - Great little suspense thriller set in Montana (though filmed in
     Utah).  Having caught Clay fooling around with his wife Amanda
     (Georgina Cates), one guy commits suicide, framing Clay for
     murder.  Clay decides to cover up the suicide starting a bigger
     and bigger chain of events linking him with other murders.
   - Vince Vaughn steals the film as Lester Long.  Vaughn is very
     natural in front of a camera with an easy charm and grace.  (P.S.
     He also was good in RETURN TO PARADISE and is going to play Norman
     Bates in the new version of PSYCHO.)
   - Sarcastic FBI agent played by Janeane Garofalo.  "A murder scene
     is not crowd-appropriate." (That sounds a lot like Garofalo's own
     style of humor and may well have been ad-libbed.)  She makes fun
     of deputy named Barney.
   - Sound editing has loud noises on soundtrack, made this audience
     jump.
   - Final scene does not make sense logically.

Title
Review for Hsi yen (1993)
          Capsule review:  Marriage-of-convenience comedy of a
     gay, well-to-do, Chinese-American businessman marrying a
     citizenship-seeking artist in order to please his parents.
     The is an enjoyable Taiwanese comedy (filmed and set in
     Manhattan) but what we see of Chinese culture is more of
     interest than the well-trodden material about gays and
     straights.  Rating +1 (-4 to +4)
     Miss Wei-Wei and Mr. Wai-Tung Gao are in love and are getting married.
Wei-Wei (May Chin) is in love with Wai-Tung (Winston Chao) and Wai-Tung is
in love with Simon (Mitchell Lichtenstein), his long-time roommate and
lover.  So why is Wai-Tung marrying Wei-Wei?  His parents do not know that
he is gay and would not be able to handle knowing it.  They have tried for
years to get him paired with a nice Chinese girl, and Wai-Tung has not had
the heart to tell them his sexual orientation.  Wai-Tung is a well-off
landlord and his tenant Wei-Wei, an out-of-work artist and an illegal alien,
has been attracted to him and also would like American citizenship.  So
Simon has suggested this charade of a marriage and the two Chinese have
reluctantly decided it was a good idea.
     The most disappointing aspect of this film, written and directed by Ang
Lee, is that while it is pleasant enough, the basic story is overly
familiar.  It is very much a LA CAGE AUX FOLLES set in the Chinese-American
community.  (And even CAGE itself was derivative of Frank Capra films such
as LADY FOR A DAY.)  So THE WEDDING BANQUET is an engaging view into a
community too rarely depicted in film, but the story itself could occur in
just about any culture and has little in the plot that is not telegraphed.
I think I learned more about Chinese-American marriage customs and life in
general in their community than I learned about gays from THE WEDDING
BANQUET.  Where this film shows us what we have not seen, it is in Gao's
parents' cultural fascination with Chinese calligraphy; it is in some odd
wedding tradition about a piece of what looks like fried chicken on a
string.  Then there is the wild party after the banquet that seems so out of
character with the usually staid outward appearances of the Chinese.  Take
these out of the film and it becomes a television-level situation comedy
with a few very pat lessons.  In fact, it is even a bit uneven as a comedy.
The showpiece scene seems to be the marriage ceremony with the two
principles having almost no command of English.  That seems a bit contrived
since at other times they seem to have considerably more command of English.
     Generally, performances are very good.  Sihung Lung as the father has
little to do but look stiff and dignified in the early parts of film, yet
still finds opportunity to make his the most memorable character of the
movie.  Perhaps because he is enigmatic for so much of the story.
Lichtenstein is winning, if a little overly bright-eyed.  The score, by
Mader, is a bit of a disappointment as it is neither particularly melodic
music, nor does it use Chinese themes.  But it is always interesting to see
foreign films set and filmed in the United States just to get some idea how
other people view the United States.  This Taiwanese film really effectively
uses its Manhattan locations.
     This is an enjoyable film, though perhaps not as good as word-of-mouth
would have it.  I would say it is just average for theatrical films I have
seen this year, giving it a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Dangerous Beauty (1998)
     It is 1583 in Venice.  Society has proscribed a place for its
women.  The vast majority are to remain the uneducated maintainers of
households for their husbands.  It is not the most exciting of lives,
but if a woman is sufficiently charming her family may arrange a
marriage to someone prominent.  This will get the woman and perhaps her
entire family good social connections.  And at least the married woman
may hope to live in moderate comfort.  In most arranged marriages love
is not given strong consideration in the choice of a husband.  Families
essentially sell off their daughters for material gain.
     On the other hand a few of the most beautiful women can become
courtesans--mistresses or prostitutes of the wealthy and powerful.
Veronica Franco (played by Catherine McCormack) is in love with
handsome Marco Venier (Rufus Sewell).  But he is from a wealthy family
and her father had died leaving the family with a pile of debts and a
desperate need of money.  As Veronica's mother (Jacqueline Bisset)
tells her she must give up the idea of marriage.  Besides "marriage is
a bargain, not a perpetual tryst."  And it is not profitable enough to
support the Franco family.  Veronica must make the sacrifice of
becoming a courtesan as, she is informed, her mother did years ago.
     The plot follows a very predictable trajectory from here.
Veronica does not want to become a prostitute, but agrees when she
discovers that being a courtesan has its advantages.  It really is the
only way that a woman in Venetian society can escape the heavy
restrictions placed on women.  A good courtesan is allowed to become
educated and, in fact, learning becomes a necessity.  Trained by her
mother, Veronica learns the skills necessary for the new profession and
makes herself the most desirable courtesan in Venice as well as a quick
wit with verse.  We follow her career from being too poor to have a
normal life to having one of the most powerful names in Venice.  But
the fantasy world she comes to know will change abruptly when it
collides with the real world of the Plague and of the Inquisition.
     DANGEROUS BEAUTY was written by Jeannine Dominy based on the book
THE HONEST COURTESAN by Margaret Rosenthal.  The plot is predictable
and even familiar, somewhere between myth and soap opera.  This does
not ruin the story but a less obvious story could have improved the
film considerably.  As interesting as the foreground plot is the view
of life in Renaissance Venice in the background is really what rivets
out attention.  The visual effects are far from perfect, but
occasionally they do create a stunning image, particularly the
recreation of nautical scenes.
     McCormack previously played Mel Gibson's love interest in
BRAVEHEART.  In this film she get chances to display her wit, her skill
with a sword, and her body, one more enjoyable to see than the other.
Rufus Sewell of COLD COMFORT FARM and the current DARK CITY plays Marco
her lover.  There seems to be between Sewell and McCormack genuine
chemistry, a thing too frequently missing from screen love stories.
DANGEROUS BEAUTY is populated with actors who would not seem typical
for a historical film. Fred Ward seems an odd choice to be playing as a
member of the Venier family, but is reasonable if cast against type.
Oliver Platt of FLATLINERS as a competing wit also seems as out of
place in a costume drama thought he did play in THE THREE MUSKETEERS.
     If DANGEROUS BEAUTY has a rather obvious plot and takes the safe
course of exploiting a feminist theme, but the production is well-
mounted, well-acted, and pretty to look at.  I give it a 7 on the 0 to
10 scale and a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Dybuk (1937)
          Capsule review:  Paydirt!  A Yiddish film made in Poland
     in 1938 turns out to be a little-known gem.  The film lacks a
     lot of what we might consider high production values, but
     besides being an unintentional artifact of the culture of
     Eastern European Jewry wiped out in the Holocaust, it also
     turns out to be a haunting horror film that deserves to be
     seen by all fans of 1920s and 1930s horror films.  At least
     one sequence, a grotesque dance, ranks this film up with some
     of the best of German Expressionism.  Rating: +3.
     Watching the 1938 Polish-made Yiddish film THE DYBBUK, one is only too
aware that the film is flawed.  Much of the acting is exaggerated as it
would be in a silent film.  Some of the photography seems poor, as well as
some of the editing.  At least once the film cuts from a quiet scene to a
loud scene and the sudden sound causes the audience to jump.  It is true,
however, that in retrospect most of the faults seem hard to remember.  The
strongest memories of the film are beautiful images, some haunting and
horrifying.  And while taken individually many of the scenes were less
effective for me than they may have been for THE DYBBUK's intended audience,
this is a great mystical horror film, perhaps one of the better horror films
of the 1930s.
     [Spoilers follow, though as with a Shakespeare play, one does not see
THE DYBBUK for plot surprises.]
     Sender and Nisn have been very close friends since their student days.
Now they see each other only on holidays.  To cement the bond of their
friendship they vow that if their respective first children--each expected
soon--are of opposite sexes then they will arrange a marriage of the two
children.  Sure enough, Sender has a daughter Leah, though he loses his
wife in childbirth.  Nisn has a son, Khonnon, though an accident claims
Nisn's life before he can even see his new son or conclude his arrangement
to marry Khonnon to Leah.
     Years later Khonnon, now a Talmudic scholar, meets Leah and they fall
in love.  Neither knows about the vow they would be married and Sender does
not know whose son Khonnon is.  The intense Khonnon is already considering
giving up his study of the Talmud to study Kabalah, the great book of
mystical knowledge and magic.  Sender three times tries to arrange a
marriage with a rich but rather sheepish young man.  Twice the plans fail
and Khonnon believes his magic has averted the arrangement.  The third time,
however, an agreement is reached.  Khonnon calls upon dark forces to help
him but is consumed by his own spell and found dead.  The day of Leah's
marriage--in fact, during the marriage ceremony itself--Khonnon's spirit
returns from the grave as a dybbuk, a possessing demon, and takes over the
body of the woman he was denied.  Leah is taken to a great and pious
Rabbi, now nearing the end of his life and torn with self-doubts, who alone
may have the knowledge to remove the demon.
     If some of this smacks of William Peter Blatty, it should be remembered
that this is a 1938 film based on a pre-World-War-I play.  THE DYBBUK by
S. Anski (a pen name for Shloyme Zanvl Rappoport), along with THE GOLEM by
H. Leivick (a pen name for Leivick Halper), are perhaps the two best remembered
(and most commonly translated) plays of the great Yiddish Theater.  While
Yiddish folklore has many dybbuk and golem stories, and the play THE GOLEM
was based on an actual legend ("The Golem of Prague"), THE DYBBUK was an
original story involving a legendary type of demon.  The film retells the
story of the play, but remains very different.  Other than plot there is not
much of the play carried over into the film.
     All too commonly constraints of budget and even what appears now to be
inappropriate style rob some scenes of their effect.  Much of the acting is
exaggerated in ways that might have been more appropriate to silent film or
to the stage.  In fact, in some ways this feels like an entire film done in
a style much like the early, good scenes of the 1930 DRACULA.  Director
Michal Waszynski could well be excused on the grounds that he was making the
film for a very different audience.  However, just occasionally, a scene
will be really supremely well done.  The best sequence of the film is when
Leah, just before her marriage, is called upon to dance with the poor of
the town, as is traditional.  Leah is reluctant and the dance turns into a
grotesquery culminating with Leah dancing with a figure of death.  The
film is a showcase for Yiddish songs, cantorial singing, and dancing, both
traditional and modern.  Much seems out of place, but this one dance creates
one of the most eerie and effective horror scenes of its decade.
     THE DYBBUK stands as more than a good horror film.  It is also an
artifact of pre-Holocaust Yiddish film and of Eastern European Jewish
village life.  Curiously, for a Yiddish film some of the stereotypes that appear
could be interpreted as being anti-Semitic.  We see a miser with exaggerated
Jewish features counting and recounting his coins.  We see what is intended
to be a great Rabbi looking pompous, fat, sloppy, and apparently lazy.  Why
a Yiddish film would have such images is open to question.   Still, it is a
pity that this film is not better known.  It deserves to be thought of as a
major film of its decade.  I rate it +3 on the -4 to +4 scale.
Congratulations to the National Center for Jewish Film for restoring this
film.
[THE DYBBUK will be playing at the Festival Theater in New York through
September 28.  -Moderator]

Title
Review for Ikinai (1998)
     CAPSULE: All passengers on a tour bus but one share a deadly
secret.  A suicide pact will kill everybody on the bus.  The passengers
live out their last days alive.  Part comedy, part drama, we see the
lives of the passengers amusing themselves as they approach death.
Rating: 6 (0 to 10), high +1 (-4 to +4)
   - Hiroshi Shimizu directs from a screenplay by Dankan who also acts
     in the film.
   - The sign says "The Sunshine Club Okinawa New Years Tour." Yet
     everybody sitting on the bus seems strangely somber.  Everybody is
     accounted for and the bus is about to leave when a young woman
     joins the group.  Her uncle has been committed to an asylum and
     she will use his ticket.  Reluctantly the tour manager lets her
     join the tour.  Eventually we find out that the passengers and
     tour manager all have a suicide pact to send the bus over a cliff
     so the families can collect on insurance.
   - In many ways similar to LAST NIGHT we get to know the various
     people on the bus by their stories, what they choose to do in
     their final hours, word games they play on the bus, etc.
   - The film starts as a comedy, laughing at the various foibles and
     personality traits of the passengers.  They argue over what to do
     about the woman who does not know about the suicide.  Each has to
     entertain at a dinner.  Some show tricks with chopsticks, one is
     obscene, etc.  But as the suicide hour draws close the film
     becomes more serious and desperate in tone.
   - Some satire of dull bus tours.  Also passenger-provided
     entertainment like on some tours I have been on.
   - One passenger's defense of the suicide plan: "All's well that ends
     hell."

Title
Review for Addams Family Values (1993)
     Yes, it's time for another visit to the little house out in the middle
of nowhere, the Addams House.  Perhaps it is out in the middle of nowhere
because nobody could stand to move next to the Addams, or perhaps it was
once a thriving neighborhood before the darling Addams children were let
loose on it.  In either case, back are Gomez (Raoul Julia), Morticia
(Angelica Huston), Uncle Fester (Christopher Lloyd), Wednesday (Christina
Ricci), Thing (Francis Ingram), and the rest of the Addams clan.  The
characters are based on those of the television series which in turn were
inspired by the ghoulish New Yorker cartoons of Charles Addams.
Unfortunately that sums up the strengths and weaknesses of the new film and
its predecessor.  Magazine cartoons have no plot at all, just quick-punch
jokes.  Where the two Addams Family films are their strongest is in the
quick-punch jokes.  When the film tries to advance a plot it loses most of
its energy and humor, and tells a rather weak story.  It is only when the
story-telling comes to a full halt for the sake of a joke that the film is
really funny.
     This time around the Addams have a new baby and little Wednesday and
Pugsley decide to execute the little thing as ghoulishly as possible to
protect the status quo.  To keep peace in the family Gomez and Morticia hire
a nanny who turns out to be a Black Widow murderess (Joan Cusack) out to
marry and kill Uncle Fester for his fortune.  Did I miss something?  The
plot calls for Fester to be rich and famous.  I do not remember that ever
being part of the plot before this outing.  The story also calls for
Wednesday and Pugsley to go to Summer Camp.  So we flash back and forth
between the Addams at home, a married-to-a-killer subplot, and a Wednesday-
and-Pugsley-make-a-shambles-of-a-Summer-Camp subplot.  The two subplots have
been done better as full-length films in the past.  There is also an
equation of Wednesday's and Pugsley's eccentricities with positive political
correctness.  The latter really was a fiasco and threatens to torpedo the
whole spirit of the series.
     Still, when it is just showing little vignettes that could have come
from Addams cartoons, it is terrific.  We have very little impression of
what Addams characters are like between the little flashbulb glimpses we get
from the cartoons, so Huston's and Julia's performances are based on the
interpretations of John Astin and Carolyn Jones.  It is not easy to outdo an
actor at a popular role that actor created.  That is like trying to do
Inspector Clouseau better than Peter Sellers.  But Julia and Huston actually
outdo Astin and Jones at their own game.  This is a film with big ups and
big downs so overall it gets just a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.  (My apologies
to Christopher Hart who did such a good job as Thing.  Attributing the part
to Ingram was something of an inside joke though I doubt that anyone will
recognize the reference to Francis Ingram.  Anyone want to try to identify
that name?)

Title
Review for Cape Fear (1991)
          Capsule review:  How can you go wrong with a crime
     thriller directed by Martin Scorsese, photographed by Freddie
     Francis, with credits by Saul Bass and a score (virtually) by
     Bernard Herrmann?  You do it by trying too hard to make the
     ultimate thriller and taking things just too far.  Had this
     film been tied up twenty minutes earlier, it would have been
     rated better than a low +2 (-4 to +4).
     There seem to be a lot of different groups who were involved with
making CAPE FEAR.  There was Steven Spielberg's Amblin Entertainment, there
was Cappa Films, and there was Tribeca Productions.  Martin Scorsese
directed.  But somehow at the heart of this film is Steven Spielberg.
Though his name appears no place in the credits, what is good about this
film and what is bad about it has Spielberg's name written all over it.
Spielberg seems intent on going from one genre to another making the
ultimate film of that genre and then overpowering it with excess.  What 1941
was to wartime comedies, what RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARK was to action
adventures, what POLTERGEIST was to the ghost story, that is what CAPE FEAR
is to the crime-suspense film.  This was supposed to be a tense suspense
film in the tradition of NIGHT OF THE HUNTER and the original CAPE FEAR.
And it succeeds beautifully.  Robert DeNiro's Max Cady is a brilliant and
implacable stalker.  For maybe eighty or ninety minutes, this is one of the
great suspense films.  Then some place--I'd say it is a trick Cady is able
to pull off with a belt--CAPE FEAR crosses the line from tense but realistic
film into monster movie.  And if a monster movie has tension at all, it is a
different kind of tension.  From that point on, the identification value is
gone and the viewer just watches two opposing forces chew away at each
other.  This is one film where less would have certainly been more.
     Fourteen years ago public defender Sam Bowden (played by Nick Nolte)
intentionally hid evidence that could have freed his illiterate client Max
Cady.  He had known his client was guilty of rape and did not want to see
Cady go free.  Sent to prison for fourteen years, Cady taught himself to
read, then educated himself to understand the law.  He also built his body
into a tower of strength.  And once he learned of his lawyer's betrayal, he
dedicated himself to making Bowden pay for hiding evidence.  In fourteen
years, Cady has made himself a supreme strategist preparing for the war with
Bowden that Cady knew was coming.  Cady's attacks will tear apart Bowden's
family life and will destroy Bowden's career.  While Sam Bowden flounders to
find the best way to defend himself, Cady will make one brilliantly
considered move after another.
     Robert DeNiro's Max Cady is an excellent screen villain.  Behind the
hair slicked back with black grease and the big obnoxious cigar is the agile
mind of a chess master.  He can be vicious like a force of nature or he can
be seductive like a snake.  In the longest scene of the film he turns his
seductive power on fifteen-year-old Danielle Bowden.  This is a particularly
powerful and disturbing scene.  It is the centerpiece of the film and it
shows how Cady manages to turn every human frailty to his advantage.
     Another example of the excesses of this film, incidentally, are Cady's
religious tattoos.  A nice touch from NIGHT OF THE HUNTER (and perhaps from
the original CAPE FEAR--I do not remember) is that Robert Mitchum covers his
psychotic behavior with a veneer of fundamentalist religious piety.  We are
never really sure whether or not he really believes his viciousness is
fulfilling God's will.  However, he takes the piety to the point that he has
tattooed himself with religious messages.  In this film, DeNiro's Cady has
the same religious fervor and has become a veritable illustrated man, with
more than a dozen religious tattoos.
     This is a film that spared little expense to create its effects.  On
top of a good cast--Robert DeNiro, Nick Nolte, Jessica Lange, and Joe Don
Baker--the film throws in cameos of three actors from the original film--
Robert Mitchum, Gregory Peck, and Martin Balsam.
     Technical credits are equally well cast.  Title sequences are done by
Saul Bass.  For those unaware, Bass really pioneered the idea of making the
titles into films that stand on their own and comment on the rest of the
film.  Many of the classic films that had striking credit sequences show his
work.  These include AROUND THE WORLD IN EIGHTY DAYS, VERTIGO, THE BIG
COUNTRY, ANATOMY OF A MURDER, NORTH BY NORTHWEST, and NINE HOURS TO RAMA.
The tension and the bizarre visual effects start in the opening credits,
which are superbly crafted by Bass.
     From there the visuals are carried by Freddie Francis--also one of the
greats in his field, moody photography.  Francis's work includes THE
INNOCENTS, THE FRENCH LIEUTENANT'S WOMAN, THE ELEPHANT MAN, and DUNE.  This
year he did THE MAN IN THE MOON.  To have both Bass and Francis on the same
film seems to indicate someone went out with a very large wallet and a
determination to buy the best.  The one visual out of place is the use of
super-dramatic storm-cloud skies, uncharacteristic of Francis, but almost a
trademark of Spielberg.
     The original CAPE FEAR and many of the best of Alfred Hitchcock's
thrillers had scores by the late Bernard Herrmann.  Herrmann, of course,
could not do this score, so Elmer Bernstein was hired to rework Herrmann's
original themes from the first CAPE FEAR and in general to write in
Herrmann's style.  So one more expensive but tasteful decision was made.
The new CAPE FEAR essentially has a Bernard Herrmann score, full of the
master's dramatic dissonances, even if Herrmann was not around to write it.
     Of all the choices of who would work on the film, the only one that was
really questionable is Martin Scorsese to direct.  And it may have been the
biggest mistake.  Scorsese's forte is realistic crime.  His one foray into
horror fantasy, AFTER HOURS, works mostly because it needed exactly what
Scorsese could give it: a feel of realism.  Here that same feeling of
realism stands him in good stead as long as it can, but when Cady crosses
the line into monster and super-villain, Scorsese has mothing more to
contribute.  The film goes into auto-pilot and Scorsese just films his
scenes.  The film shows Freddie Francis's art but loses any Scorsese feel.
One more reason that the last part of the film was ill-considered.
     CAPE FEAR is a very good thriller that saves almost all of its mistakes
for the last part of the film.  I would give it a low +2 on the -2 to +2
scale.

Title
Review for Cold Fever (1994)
     Atsushi Hirata is a stranger in a strange land.  He wanted to
spend his holiday in Hawaii, but his grandfather talked him into an
unusual family responsibility.  He has to trek across Iceland in the
dead of winter to the remote spot where his parents died seven years
before.  There he must perform a traditional Japanese memorial
ceremony.  Any journey through unfamiliar territory can be a mixture of
comedy and horrors and in the frozen Iceland of December the right (or
wrong) error could prove fatal.  (One ominous road sign asks in several
languages "Does anyone know you are going this way?")  In Jim Stark's
and Fridrik Thor Fridriksson's screenplay characters time and again
find they must put themselves in each other's hands or volunteer help
to others.  Sometimes it proves to be a wise thing to do; sometimes it
is a mistake.
     The most active character in the story is the landscape of
Iceland, a colorless combination of fog, ice, snow, and black rock.
Sometimes it looks dead only to come to life unpredictably spouting
volcanic geysers of hot water into the air.  In this mostly frozen
world Atsushi is a fish out of water, trying to understand the strange
Icelandic people and the rules they live by.  Notable among the people
he meets are a woman who claims to collect funerals (or rather pictures
and recordings of them), a bar of Icelanders who consider themselves
cowboys, and an incredibly rude and vulgar American couple.  Sometimes
Atsushi finds that going with the flow of the people around him is
dangerous, but sometimes fighting the tide is worse.
     Atsushi Hirata is played by Masatoshi Nagase, who seems to be
specializing in the role of Japanese tourist abroad.  He played a
similar character in Jim Jarmusch's MYSTERY TRAIN.  His character does
not convey a lot of emotion that is obvious to a Western audience.  And
much of his character's appeal is in the empathy of what he must be
feeling rather than his expressiveness.  Fisher Stevens and Lili Taylor
play the American couple whom Atsushi finds much more trouble helping
than it seems worth.  Much more appealing is the morbid but pleasant
fan of funerals, Laura, played by Laura Hughes.
     Not all that is in the script is original or even in good taste.
To create artificially some visual excitement on the first scene of the
frozen landscape of Iceland, Fridriksson borrows a touch from THE ROAD
WARRIOR.  There seem to be some scenes poking fun at the lack of appeal
of Icelandic cuisine that seem a little over the top.  The moral of the
story and what Atsushi has learned from his experience is a line simply
spoken at the end of the film and seems a bit pat and uninspiring.
Except perhaps for its setting this film is not going to win any awards
for originality or profundity or even for being highly articulate of
its theme.  But it is as amiable a film as many playing at local
theaters and from time to time even manages a few surprises.
     COLD FEVER is a likable if somewhat unoriginal road picture, even
it may not have much to say other than to accept Icelanders however
weird their customs are.  One wonders if the beautiful but forbidding
vistas of Icelandic landscapes, looking like views of another world,
will help or hurt Iceland's tourist business.  The film itself rates a
low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Un coeur en hiver (1992)
     For many years Stephan (played by Daniel Auteuil) and Maxim (played by
Andre Dussolier) have been partners in a violin repair business in Paris.
Where Maxim is handsome and affable, Stephan is introspective and
introverted.  In the years of their partnership Maxim has been married and
divorced and has dated many women.  Stephan has little life outside of the
repair business.  He is a genius in building and repairing violins.  He has
one friend, a woman, in whom he confides, but their relationship is purely
platonic.  Maxim's latest girlfriend is Camille, a brilliant and beautiful
violinist (played by Emmanuelle Beart) who takes an instant dislike to the
blunt Stephan, but when it is clear that Stephan appreciates Camille's
music, Camille becomes interested in the odd loner.  The stage is set for a
tragic love story.
     UN COEUR EN HIVER revolves around about Stephan's unusual personality,
which is revealed only gradually through the film.  Suffice it to say this
is a much more touching and engaging film than could be expected from the
above description.  Stephan is a personality type rarely seen in film, yet
not nearly so rare in real life.  I went into this film expecting a fatuous
love story and came out with a film that will almost definitely be on my top
ten list of the year.  Stephan's personality, what it does to him, and how
others use it and react to it make this a thoughtful and intelligent
addition to the films of this year.  UN COEUR EN HIVER was directed by
Claude Sautet from a screenplay he co-authored with Jacques Fieschi.  Scenes
of Emmanuelle Beart playing Ravel (beautifully orchestrated by Philippe
Sarde) have a pristine beauty that is as sexy as anything you will find in
any American film this year.  I give it a low +3 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Nueve reinas (2000)
Perhaps this film should be called an homage.  It certainly is a 
film very much in the spirit of David Mamet's HOUSE OF GAMES.  Two 
con men meet when the younger, Juan (played by Gaston Pauls) gets 
himself into trouble and the more experienced Marcos (Ricardo 
Darin) bails him out.  Marcos offers friendship and a one-day 
course in the short con.  He shows a restaurant con to give the 
illusion of having paid for his meal with a large bill.  But then 
he suggests that Juan help him on a bigger con.  The two will get 
their hands on a near perfect forgery of a plate of valuable rare 
postage stamps.  Soon the viewer is not sure who is doing what to 
whom.  Complicating matters is Valeria, Marco's successful sister 
who is less than pleased with her brother's occupation. 
NINE QUEENS was written and directed by Fabian Bielinsky of 
Argentina.  This is his first time as director.  He has created a 
sufficiently twisty plot, though the plot and situation is far 
from original.  It is a diverting enough puzzle when watching it 
and thinking of possibilities.  This is not a film that leaves one 
with a lot to think about but it is diverting.  I rate it a 6 on 
the 0 to 10 scale and a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale. 

Title
Review for Vice Versa (1988)
          Capsule review:  Father and son trade bodies in what
     seems an unpromising comedy-fantasy but which breathes new
     life into into an old concept.  VICE VERSA compares favorably
     with the Thorne Smith fantasy-comedies of the 1940s.  Judge
     Reinhold's and Fred Savage's acting is very much on target.
     Rating: +2.
     Thorne Smith was the master of the sophisticated supernatural comedy.
Back in the 1920s and 1930s he wrote a series of sophisticated comic novels
including THE PASSIONATE WITCH and NIGHT LIFE OF THE GODS, though his best-
known series were the "Topper" books.  Hollywood 1940s comedy fantasies
including TURNABOUT, I MARRIED A WITCH, and the "Topper" series were based
on his novels.  TURNABOUT involved the comic effects of a man and a woman
who somehow trade minds.  The same idea of variations has been tried in
films with uneven results.  Not too long ago there was a reputedly terrible
film on this theme called LIKE FATHER, LIKE SON in which a father and son
change places.  Dudley Moore played first the father, then the son.  It
appeared to be one more step down in Moore's career, which has been spotty
since the hilarious BEDAZZLED.  Now, perhaps too soon afterwards, another
film has come out on the same theme and this one, I must say, is worthy of
the Thorne Smith tradition.
     Seymour Marshall (played by Judge Reinhold in one of his first adult
roles) is an executive for a large department store who, through a smuggling
slip-up, has come into possession of a magical skull from Tibet.  While
caring for his son while his ex-wife is on vacation, he whimsically wishes
to trade places with his son Charlie (played by Fred Savage).  For once
whimsey does make it so.  Now such a plot can be and has been done well or
poorly.  VICE VERSA does it about as well as it can be done.  Dick Clement
and Ian LaFrenais, who produced the script the film as well as wrote the
script, have really creative imaginations for comic situations.  The result
is a story that is not just cute but genuinely very funny.  The film's only
real false step is to mix in a cliched subplot with criminals and chases,
but it remains a small part of the plot and even it is resolved in a novel
manner.
     The acting is surprisingly good by both Reinhold and Savage, who play
the father and son (or VICE VERSA) under the direction of Brian Gilbert.
Each has a feel for the mannerisms of the other.  Savage is staid and
dignified with a dominant edge; Reinhold's eleven-year-old boy is sloppy and
explosive with a great feel for physical comedy.  Savage as the father
pretending to be the son finds seventh grade a breeze, but dealing with
seventh grade bullies takes more than just an "enlightened, mature"
approach.  Reinhold's little boy as department store executive, dealing with
what he calls "yin-yangs" and what the credits call "the backstabbers," has
a winning ingenuous quality.  VICE VERSA was a very pleasant surprise.  Rate
it a low +2 on the -2 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Steel Magnolias (1989)
          Capsule review:  Six women go through folly, friendship,
     and tragedy together.  If the basic formula is familiar, at
     least the writing by Robert Harling--based on his own stage
     play--is usually crisp and often genuinely funny.  Rating:
     low +2.
     STEEL MAGNOLIAS is about as formulaic a "women's film" as any film I
can imagine.  You have a set of two or more women whom you get to know very
well through relatively mundane circumstances.  You get a feel for what they
do in life's more ordinary moments.  The tragedy (usually medical) strikes
and having known them already you feel for their tragedy.  Suddenly any old
antagonisms seem small.  But they are stronger for having known each other
and the remainder of their numbers will abide and endure.  That's BEACHES,
that's TERMS OF ENDEARMENT, that's lots of other films, and that's STEEL
MAGNOLIAS.  All that makes one of these films good or bad is whether the
viewer is really brought into the characters during the normal, mundane part
and is that part enjoyable.  In STEEL MAGNOLIAS the mundane part is quite
good.  As it so often is, it's not silly or cute or whimsical.  It is
genuinely funny.  And as such it leaves most of the other films of its
formula behind.
     STEEL MAGNOLIAS is the story of six women from a small town in
Louisiana.  The women are played by Sally Field, Shirley MacLaine, Dolly
Parton, Daryl Hannah, Olympia Dukakis, and Julia Roberts.  Much of the story
takes place in a beauty parlor--as did all of the play the film was based
on.  But the film greatly benefits from the opportunity to get out of the
beauty parlor and see the world. There are really three pairs of women: a
mother and daughter, the beauty parlor owner and her assistant, and two
older women who are often at odds with each other.
     As is almost the requirement for this sort of film, there is a soft and
sentimental film score by George Delerue.  Nobody plays these soft and
sensitive strings like Delerue.  Also reasonably good, but obviously of
secondary interest, are the men, played by Tom Skerritt, Sam Shepard, and a
few others.  Also this film boasts (?) a view of the most revolting cake
ever baked.
     STEEL MAGNOLIAS obviously has a good cast and is diverting and
enjoyable.  I rate it a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Sonámbula, La (1998)
     CAPSULE: In a distopic future in which a disaster has wiped out
memories of 300,000 people, one of the amnesiacs has memories from
another time.  They may be the key to finding a fugitive revolutionary
leader.  Toward the end there are a lot of interesting ideas
introduced.  Rating: 6 (0 to 10), high +1 (-4 to +4)
   - Directed by Fernando Spiner who co-authored.
   - Fairly prosaic totalitarian society.  Plot of secret rebel person
     or place is fairly familiar.
   - Photography in monochrome with some objects in color to call
     attention to them as in SCHINDLER'S LIST and ZENTROPA (a.k.a.
     EUROPA).
   - Main character Eva awakes in a cathedral and is arrested by
     security forces.  No memory but an accident with amnesia gas has
     left 300,000 people without memories.  Nobody knows who was
     married or related to whom.  (Did none of these people carry
     identification in this totalitarian state?)
   - New state draws the letter "K" backwards wherever it appears.  How
     did this come about?
   - Government can look at tapes of main character's visions,
     memories, and dreams.  Not well done since main character sees
     herself in the third person in her own dreams.
   - The State is looking for Gauna, a poet and resistance leader.
     Agent Kluge chasing main character decides to join her.  Cross
     country chase.
   - Matte work not good by some countries' standards.  But artwork is
     good.  Some interesting ideas about the future.
   - Toward the end there are a lot of ideas.

Title
Review for Event Horizon (1997)
     I have heard it observed that any film that starts out with an
aerial view of a city is not a film worth seeing. That may be helpful
on cable, but not for films in a movie theater.  I guess I would claim
that any film whose publicity uses the word "terror" is a film well
worth avoiding. I saw a coming attraction for EVENT HORIZON and thought
that it looked pretty good.  At the time I did not realize that I knew
the rule about the word "terror."  I knew but knew not that I knew.  I
only realized that I knew when I looked up some information about this
interesting looking film on the web and saw the word "terror" in the
ad, that I realized it had to be a bad film and I knew that only on the
basis of seeing that one word.  PSYCHO is one film that could be said
to produce terror, but the ads did not use the word.  Hitchcock never
claimed to be a master of terror; William Castle made that claim.  As a
rule of thumb, if you are terrified by a William Castle film you should
wait five or six years until you hit puberty and try it again.
     EVENT HORIZON is essentially a haunted house film in space that
rather artfully uses scenes and touches from a lot of different films
to tell a new story.  There is a lot of ALIEN and a lot of HELLRAISER
with bits of THE HAUNTING, FORBIDDEN PLANET, 2001, STAR TREK VI, MARY
SHELLEY'S FRANKENSTEIN, THIS ISLAND EARTH, and probably others I
missed.
     These days too many films tend to have a great look but not very
much content.  It is the music video aesthetic.  This is a film with
great visual images, but the plot is really basically the haunted house
film in space.  The film shovels images at the viewer so fast that it
is difficult to interpret just what has been seen, and really it may
not matter.  When you find out what is really going on, it is a real
letdown.  This has to be one of the least intriguing concepts possible
for a film.  I will not give it away, but this is more a Clive Barker
sort of horror film in a science fiction setting than it is a science
fiction film.  The title is the most intriguing thing about the film,
but "Event Horizon" is just the name of a spacecraft, and there is no
internal evidence that anyone involved in the production knew even what
the term meant.
     This film is really a good cast wasted.  Sam Neill and Laurence
Fishburne are, of course, major actors.  I suspect they will take the
money and run.  But what makes the casting particularly unusual is the
inclusion of Kathleen Quinlin of I NEVER PROMISED YOU A ROSE GARDEN.
She is an actress who always added a certain fragility to her roles.
She is sort of the anti-Bette-Davis.  Here that quality is not just
ignored, it is plastered over and she is nearly unrecognizable.  She is
cast against type and brings nothing special that is usable to her
role.
     This is a film that needed a writer with vision, but instead had
one with a high concept.  I would rate this letdown a -1 on the -4 to
+4 scale.

Title
Review for Big Lebowski, The (1998)
     Now I claim what is going on here is that a cowboy without much
respect for the sort of people he finds in Los Angeles, spins the
gull-darnedest yarn about a guy he met in a bar a couple of times.  But
there will probably be other interpretations.
     Jeff Bridges plays a laid-back aging hippie who happens to have
the same name, Jeff Lebowski, as a famous philanthropist, though the
hippie prefers being called The Dude.  That sounds like it could be a
good thing, but the philanthropist has enemies and some of the no-so-
bright ones confuse the two and take their ire out on The Dude.  After
discussing the situation with his close bowling buddies, para-military
Walter Sobchak (a hilarious role for John Goodman) and low-voltage
surfer Donny (Steve Buscemi), The Dude figures there is nothing he can
do but face the Big Lebowski (David Huddlestone).  The Big Lebowski at
first has little use for someone with The Dude's marginal life-style,
but he finds a use when his wife is kidnapped and he needs someone to
drop off the million-dollar ransom.  The Dude wants to play it
straight, but Sobchak figures if they play their cards right he and The
Dude could split the million.
     Only the Coen Brothers could tell a story this complicated, this
weird, and with so many characters on so many different frequencies.
The film is full of weirdoes, many of whom are present only to add
texture. John Tuturro, missing from films for a while, plays the
totally superfluous role of Jesus, the bowling rival of our heroes.
The over-ripe Jesus practically dances a flamenco every time he throws
the ball.  Then their are the nihilist bikers.  And if the script does
not add enough weird characters, the character you think you know get
weirder and weirder.
     Raymond Chandler used to add a touch of the surreal to his mystery
stories whenever his detective was knocked out by telling us Marlowe's
dreams while he was unconscious.  But then Philip Marlowe was only an
amateur at hallucinating.  He was not a stoned-out hippie like The
Dude.  Conk The Dude on the bean and you get weird bowling dreams that
are worth the price of admission by themselves.  The Coen Brothers have
incredible visual imagination and tremendous good humor.  Comedies of
late have been mild smile- along-with-Sandra-Bullock sorts of things.
The only recent film that made me laugh out loud recently was MIDNIGHT
IN THE GARDEN OF GOOD AND EVIL.  But it has been a good while since I
have laughed as hard as I did at THE BIG LEBOWSKI.  The only real
problem with the script is the plot lacks a strong finish.  After a
strong first and second act, the film has a much lower-key third act
that resolves the mystery but lacks the strength and the humor of the
first two.  The film needed a wild finish and goes soft and sentimental
at the wrong time.
     This is a film that has great visuals and has genuine laugh-out-
loud humor.  If it has a weak spot it is only that the story is just
okay, but that is not really the point.  I rate it 8 on the 0 to 10
scale and a high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Cast Away (2000)
     Chuck Noland (played by the versatile Tom Hanks) is a very
dedicated executive for Federal Express, the package delivery
company.  He is extremely systematic and obsessed with the passage
of time.  Chuck has become a local legend for his dedication to
delivering packages on time.  He is even the center of a Federal
Express urban myth about the lengths he will go to get a package
delivered on time.  Chuck knows that in his business time is all
important for him, but unknown to him, he is about to spend the next
few years of his life in a place where time is far more subjective.
     Chuck is napping on a company flight over the Pacific and
awakes to discover that the plane is off course in a storm and
desperately trying to find its way back.  Suddenly the world falls
apart under him and we find ourselves in a crashing plane that is
rapidly decompressing.  After what well might be the scariest plane
crash in cinema history Chuck finds himself in a life raft in a
storm alone on a hostile ocean.  With extreme good fortune he is
blown to an island.  But perhaps the island is not such good luck as
he has no tools and no means to feed and protect himself.  How he
does that is the heart of the film.  Unfortunately, there is not
enough of this heart.
     The problem is that the buildup to this point really takes too
much time.  The script shows you a bit of his relationship with his
lover Kelly Frears (played by Helen Hunt).  But once he is on the
island that part of the film really is necessary only to establish
that he has a woman whom he dearly loves.  Developing that
relationship takes valuable time from coverage of the island
experience.  The opening setup is not only unneeded, it is also
puzzling.  We are taken to a large family Christmas dinner at which
everyone in the family seems to dress the same and work for Federal
Express.  That strikes the viewer as peculiar, but it leads to
nothing.  It not only wastes precious screentime, it does nothing to
enhance the story.  What it does serve to do is give Federal Express
an even larger product placement than the huge one they would
already have.
     The centerpiece of this film is the air crash which is as
detailed as it is frightening.  One might almost say it was done in
the realistic style of the beach landing of SAVING PRIVATE RYAN and
may be nearly as harrowing.  It packs quite an impact and I will
certainly think of its images the next time that I fly.  Trust me,
you should not expect to see this film as an airline in-flight
movie.
     This in many ways is an engineer's film.  With a set of modest
tools washed up on the shore from the crash or available on the
island he is forced to reinvent or discover ways to fulfill his
needs.  He must reinterpret objects from a few floating FedEx
packages as the tools to build his small world.  And the knowledge
of how to do that does not come easily.  In the beginning he is
almost a laughable character, strange-looking and overweight, and he
makes foolish and frustrating mistakes.  And he pays for those
mistakes in pain and blood.  What seem like very small tasks in
civilization become extremely hard.
     As time goes by, Chuck's intelligence as well as his fitness
seems to improve immensely, though not his sanity.  I think that the
most interesting point made by the film is that sanity may be really
a social affectation.  Many people let down their guard when they
are alone and do things like talking to themselves that they would
not do in front of others.  Chuck's circumstances are more extreme
and he goes a lot further.  To save the greater part of his reason
must sacrifice the lessor part.  Chuck allows his sanity fall away
and to be replaced by a benign and natural insanity.  He invents a
friend to talk with.  In order to battle the solitude he even comes
to love the friend.  But he can only do this because he is alone.
If he knew anyone was watching him he would be inhibited from
creating such a friend.  Yet his actions seem natural.  Perhaps we
are all at least partly insane and keep that part in check while
there is danger that other people may find out.  And those others
also keep their irrational sides hidden.  While this phenomenon is
usually interpreted as the solitude driving him insane, it seems
really to be a process of the privacy allowing him to drop his
guard.  He allows himself to be natural in ways that few other
people in the world can.
     This is a better story than the platitude that it seems to
build up to in the final scene.  But it was not all the film it
could have been if Zemeckis would have realized where his best
material lay.  It rates a 6 on the 0 to 10 scale and a high +1 on
the -4 to +4 scale.  Wouldn't this be a good time for Luis Bunuel's
1952 ROBINSON CRUSOE to show up again and be rediscovered?  I
haven't seen it since I was five years old, but by all accounts it
was quite good.  Extra: look in this film for an emotionally charged
scene that seems to be borrowed from MISSION TO MARS.

Title
Review for Clean and Sober (1988)
     Back in 1962 Jack Lemmon had a reputation as a comic actor and
surprised audiences by playing a dramatic role and being *very* good at it.
The film was DAYS OF WINE AND ROSES.  The story was of a young couple with
everything going for them whose lives are ripped apart by an alcoholism
problem.  Somehow to audiences who had seen Lemmon in a humorous context,
his serious role seemed all the more serious.  Well, times have changed
since DAYS OF WINE AND ROSES, and while alcoholism is no less a problem drug
addiction is much more of a problem today so, perhaps even inspired by WINE
AND ROSES, comedy actor Michael Keaton is currently starring in the serious
CLEAN AND SOBER.
     While DAYS OF WINE AND ROSES concentrated on why a successful young man
would get an alcohol problem, it is clear from early on that Daryl Poynter
(played by Keaton) is a jerk who deserves the worst that his alcoholism and
drug problem will bring him, so the film wastes none of its 124 minutes on
how he got into this state.  Instead, the film starts with the incident that
finally causes Keaton to check himself into a detoxification clinic and
tells how even there he tries to sidestep his problem rather than
confronting it.  Most of the film covers Keaton trying very hard to relapse
into being once again the addict who embezzled $92,000 to support his habit.
The real heroes are ex-addicts Craig (played by Morgan Freeman) and Richard
(played by M. Emmet Walsh), who take no nonsense in trying to straighten out
Poynter against his will.  Craig runs the rehabilitation clinic; Richard
heads up the local chapter of Alcoholics Anonymous.
     Where CLEAN AND SOBER goes most astray is in Poynter's romantic
attachment to fellow clinic attendee Charlie Standers (played by Kathy
Baker).  In spite of the fact that both are addicts, Poynter's attempts to
get involved in Standers's life are something of a diversion and a
distraction from the central theme.  It is through his relationship with
Standers that Keaton will eventually get serious about his own problem, but
the screentime spent on that aspect of the plot is excessive in a film that
is overly long anyway.  That screentime could have been more effectively
used in telling the story of Poynter's problem.  It is good to see a serious
film, well-acted, on the problem of substance abuse, but a better film than
CLEAN AND SOBER really is needed.  Rate it a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Fourth Protocol, The (1987)
     Frederick Forsyth writes good suspense stories about political
intrigue.  He is best known for THE DAY OF THE JACKAL and THE ODESSA FILE.
They are clearly written and tense thrillers, though if the truth be known,
there is a certain sameness about them.  While there are major consequences
to what is happening, his stories really come down to a sort of chessgame
between two men, one good and one evil.  Nobody else is really important in
the story.  Just about everyone else is a prop.  THE FOURTH PROTOCOL is a
new film based on a novel of the same name by Frederick Forsyth.
     THE DAY OF THE JACKAL dealt with a lone assassin in the pay of
political extremists whose mission is to kill Charles DeGaulle.  We see how
the assassin works and thinks.  We also see a police investigator, one who
is not altogether popular with his superiors, and we see how he is able to
discover an amazing amount of information about the assassin.  And that
information, together with a modicum of dumb luck, are sufficient to avert
the assassination.  With minor substitutions, we have the same story here.
Instead of a political extremist group, we have a rogue general in Soviet
intelligence.  The general sends a sort of assassin, Petrofsky (played by
Pierce Brosnan), to head up an operation in Britain.  Trying to uncover the
operation is John Preston, played by an aging Michael Caine.  Preston takes
his orders these days from an officious supervisor played by Julian Glover,
who seems to make a career of playing unlikeable officials (including Breen
in FIVE MILLION YEARS TO EARTH).  Only this time, the assassin's mission is
not to kill a single man.
     THE FOURTH PROTOCOL is solidly acted with Caine a likeable if
independent-minded agent.  Pierce Brosnan is not very good at showing
emotion, but as emotionless killers he is just fine.  There are a host of
other familiar faces including, I think (and someone can correct me if I am
wrong), the same actor who plays Max Headroom, in this film playing an
obnoxious American.  As suspense films go, THE FOURTH PROTOCOL is not the
most cerebral, but it is several cuts about American suspense films like
BEVERLY HILLS COP.  Give it a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for So I Married an Axe Murderer (1993)
          Capsule review:  Unlucky in love, Michael Myers plays a
     man who finally finds the perfect woman, only to start
     finding clues that she may have murdered three husbands.  The
     comedy is uneven but often amusing; the mystery elements need
     a lot of work.  Rating: high 0 (-4 to +4).  (Mystery elements
     discussed in a heavy spoiler at the end of the review.)
     Charlie Mackenzie (played by Michael Myers) has been unlucky in love.
Each of his former loves has had something seriously wrong with her, as he
recounts to his policeman friend and as he sets to jazz poems as part of a
very obnoxious coffee house act.  It could be that each had been involved on
the mossy side of the law or it could all be in Charlie's mind.  Or a third
very real possibility is that Charlie's personality drives people to
desperate acts.  Then Charlie meets Harriet (played by Nancy Travis) and
they are just perfect for each other.  This might be the one for Charlie.
The only problem is that Harriet's background is surprisingly like that of
"Mrs. X"--the designation the tabloids have given to an unknown woman who
has apparently murdered three husbands.  One piece of evidence after another
links Harriet to the three murders.  Is Harriet the infamous Mrs. X?
     SO I MARRIED AN AXE MURDERER is a comedy/mystery, with the accent on
comedy.  And I mean that 100% of the accent is on comedy.  The mystery
writing is an insult to mystery films.  It is just a framework on which to
hang the comedy.  (Strongly-worded spoiler section to follow.)  Perhaps this
is more a skit than an actual film.  While I was not fond of Myers in
WAYNE'S WORLD, there is some humor here that works.  Alan Arkin is on hand
as a police captain, the boss of Charlie's best friend, and a running gag
involving him is original and funny.  Robbie Fox's screenplay tries to go
for some bad-taste humor that on the whole falls flat.  Mostly it is aimed
at the audience who thinks that crotch injuries are hilarious and not over-
used.  The scenes of Charlie's home life with his eccentric Scottish father
(also played by Myers) fail to generate much interest value or feel of
authenticity.
     SO I MARRIED AN AXE MURDERER is a comedy/mystery with some edge on the
comedy, but the mystery elements are just not very keen.  I rate it a high 0
on the -4 to +4 scale.
  **HEAVY SPOILER** **HEAVY SPOILER** **HEAVY SPOILER** **HEAVY SPOILER**
  **HEAVY SPOILER** **HEAVY SPOILER** **HEAVY SPOILER** **HEAVY SPOILER**
     SO I MARRIED AN AXE MURDERER is the worst mystery film I have seen
since HAUNTED HONEYMOON.  Historically there have been few mystery films
written this poorly that did not have Bela Lugosi in a red herring role.
First, there is a rule in mysteries that you look for the person who is
completely unnecessary to the plot, particularly if that person is played by
someone well-known.  In this film, one person stands out in neon lights as a
familiar actor who seems to have nothing to do up to the finale.  If that
character is not played by Lugosi, you can bet that you have the murderer.
     Second, there is no sign that the writers gave any thought at all to
their own story.  There is a strong implication at the end that because
somebody else was the actual killer, Harriet is now happy and free.  Harriet
may not have been the killer but she certainly has been an accessory to
these murders, concealing them from the law.  And having concealed the first
murder, she is legally responsible for the two that followed.  It is absurd
to see Harriet grinning in a coffee house at the end: this is a woman who is
going to spend most of the rest of her life behind bars.  And I may not be
in the spirit of the film, but I think it's a good thing.

Title
Review for Volcano (1997)
     This is the spring of two different volcano movies, DANTE'S PEAK
and VOLCANO and it surprising how differently the two films treat the
same sort of disaster.  DANTE'S PEAK was a dark and downbeat film
taking place in Mt. St. Helens territory and its disaster is filmed in
dark colors.  Its message is that volcanoes are immensely powerful
forces of nature and even with the help of technology about the best we
can hope for from a confrontation is to get away alive.  But they are
impressive.  VOLCANO is set in Los Angeles among famous landmarks.  It
tells us that with a bit of ingenuity and a little time any problems
including volcanoes can be solved.  Much of VOLCANO is tongue-in-cheek
with in-jokes about well- known Los Angeles personalities and digs at
the controversial Metro system.  In short VOLCANO is just one more
colorful action film.  It seem to have had little interest in seriously
exploring the possibility of a volcano in Los Angeles.  It does not
seem to have been based at all on any existing accounts of real
eruptions.
     For Mike Roark (played by Tommy Lee Jones), the director of the
Office of Emergency Management, the first day of the disaster starts
off badly... with an earthquake.  In spite of officially being on
vacation, he wants to jump immediately into action.  But his first
problem is that he has to find a sitter to manage his rambunctious
thirteen-year-old daughter Kelly (Gaby Hoffman).  When he gets to his
job, Mike's way of managing is to be in the field investigating while
his assistant (Don Cheadle) manages things in the office.  It is not
long before the earthquake problem gives way to a mystery of several
workers who were mysteriously burned in an underground tunnel by
something strange that left no sign of its presence.  Whatever it is
leaves scorching only on its victims, not on the walls of the tunnel.
It is time to call in spunky seismologist Dr. Amy Hoffmann (Anne Heche)
between them they discover that the real problem is volcanic flames
that creep up through the cracks in the floor of the tunnel, then sneak
away before they can be seen or leave a scorch-mark.  Amy discovers
this secret, but before she tell anyone the flames attack with a
genuine volcanic eruption geysering out of the La Brea Tar Pits.  This
micro-mini-eruption sends flaming rocks into the air which come down
like cannonballs for blocks around and ash starts falling like snow.
But then the real threat appears, streams of hot liquid lava come out
of the volcano.  They flood Wilshire Boulevard setting fires and
burning cars (but for some reason never exploding the gas tanks).  With
angry lava in the streets the question becomes, can it be stopped
before it reaches actual homes?  Also, can a coalition of Los Angeles
residents put aside their ethnic differences and work together to save
the city from the uncontrolled lava stream?
     Director Mike Jackson has done some intelligent films including
THREADS, THE RACE FOR THE DOUBLE HELIX, A VERY BRITISH COUP, L.A.
STORY, and INDICTMENT.  Each of those is a modest film that reaches for
the mind rather than getting a gut reaction.  Unfortunately, that was
not how he made VOLCANO.  This was a script that he should have turned
down from the start, but perhaps he wanted to see what he could do with
a bigger budget.  The story and screenplay are by first-timer Jerome
Armstrong, though Billy Ray shares the authorship of the script.  Tommy
Lee Jones is okay, but needs to get a little more variety into the
roles he plays.  He has one interesting character, but he has played
that character too often.  More interesting is the seismologist played
by Anne Heche.  She currently is also playing Johnny Depp's long-
suffering wife in DONNIE BRASCO.
     Armstrong throws frequent jokes into the script, though most of us
will have to have many of the jokes explained.  Apparently Dennis
Woodruff's car, seen prominently in a pool of lava, is a familiar Los
Angeles sight.  Also familiar is a billboard with a particular actress.
Just whether a certain restaurant chain we see multiple times is an
in-joke or a product placement, I am not sure.  There are some scenes
probably were not very well thought-out.  Mike seems to be abusing his
power asking for special attention from the fire department for his
daughter.  This probably did not sit well with the audience.  In one
scene Amy apparently measures a temperature of the ground and gets a
reading of 600 degrees just below her feet.  That would have burned
away her feet.  While the special effects are generally fairly good,
the digitized lava flows are not always convincing.  Neither are some
of the matte paintings.
     If you want to see an action adventure see VOLCANO, if you want to
have a feel for what it really would be like to be caught too close to
an erupting volcano, see DANTE'S PEAK.  VOLCANO rates a 0 on the -4 to
+4 scale.

Title
Review for Meschugge (1998)
     CAPSULE: An anti-Semitic incident in Germany sparks a murder and
starts events connected with a 50-year old mystery involving the
Holocaust and two people claiming to be the same person.  This is a
well-crafted thriller.  Rating: 8 (0 to 10), high +2 (-4 to +4) Minor
spoilers in this review.
   - Dani Levi directed.  He and Maria Schrader co-wrote, and star.
   - Two women unknowingly share the same identity.  When the factory
     of a wealthy Jew in Germany is torched by anti-Semites, and it
     appears in a New York newspaper, an American Holocaust survivor
     recognizes the victim as her own father whom she had assumed was
     killed by the Nazis.  She tries to contact her father only to find
     out that there is a woman in Germany who has lived in her father's
     household since the war also claiming to be the same daughter.
     Two elderly women are each sure they are the same person.  When
     the New Yorker is mysteriously murdered, her son decides to
     investigate the mystery on his own.
   - Action takes place in New York and in Germany.
   - Daughter of the German woman and the son of the American woman
     form an uneasy alliance to try to find out what has happened,
     against the recommendation of a Jewish Defense League lawyer
     played by Davis Strathairn.
   - Some of early action is intentionally mysterious to be intriguing.
   - View of New York Orthodox (but not Hassidic) community.  Includes
     such stereotypic roles as the matchmaker.
   - A complex plot told in a crisp style.
   - Director has a real ethnic mix of characters in New York.

Title
Review for Millennium (1989)
     MILLENNIUM is one of those film projects that seem to take forever to
come to fruition; then the fruit turns out to be a lemon.  I happen to like
some lemons but they are not to everybody's taste.  Years ago, there were
rumors that somebody was going to base a film either on John Varley's novel
MILLENNIUM or the short story the novel was expanded from, "Air Raid."
Well, it came out finally based on the latter but named for the former.
Varley himself is credited with the screenwriting, though it should be noted
that screen credit is dubious.  As far as I know Varley has no experience
screenwriting and the script is really very different from the short story.
And rather than the accomplished and creative story-telling of a popular
science fiction, MILLENNIUM has more the feel of mediocre matinee science
fiction films of the 1960s and in particular Ib Melchior's THE TIME
TRAVELERS.
     [Minor spoilers follow, but no worse than were in the coming
attraction.]  This downbeat science fiction film starts with a spectacular
collision of two airliners and the resulting crash.  Enjoy the special
effect.  It is the only one in the film both ambitious and convincing.  Bill
Smith is the bland name of the even blander Federal agent sent to
investigate the crash.  Smith is played by a bland Kris Kristofferson.
Smith runs into the chain-smoking Louise Baltimore (played by Cheryl Ladd).
Baltimore is not exactly what she seems to be.  Instead she is a visitor
from a thousand years in the far future where she wears a punk hairdo
distressingly like what you are already starting to see in New York City.
Baltimore is on a mission involving air disasters.  Just what she is doing
is part of the mystery.
     The script for MILLENNIUM needs some clarification.  There is an
apparently unintentional ambiguity in the story-telling.  The script clearly
tries to clarify which interpretation is correct, but does so inconclusively
and unclearly.  With the exception of a few half-hearted humorous moments,
the writing is all very downbeat and at the same time hokey.  The film's
vision of the future is as hopeless as it is hopelessly unconvincing.  The
film returns to 1960s science fiction film conventions such as having a
convenient scientist along to explain the idea of the film.  Then there is
an attempted love interest between two stars as animated as a Ken and Barbie
doll and whose love is just about as interesting to the audience.  Some of
the time paradox play does work; some comes off as really stupid.  In short,
MILLENNIUM is easily better than some other adaptations of real science
fiction stories--films such as NIGHTFALL and NIGHTFLYERS--but it is far from
being a winner.  I rate it a low 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Deceiver (1997)
     Jonas and Josh Pate co-wrote and co-directed this enigmatic crime
film.  Two pieces that together make up one dead prostitute, Elizabeth
(played by Renee Zellweger in flashbacks), have been found.  The police
investigation has turned up a most unusual suspect, Wayland (Tim Roth).
Wayland is the misfit heir to a textile fortune.  The evidence tying
Wayland to the prostitute is very weak: she simply died with his phone
number in her pocket.  But Wayland acts guilty and a two-man team of
policemen administer a series of polygraph lie detector tests to
Wayland.  In little flashbacks we get to know the policemen.  There is
Kennesaw (Michael Rooker) and Braxton (Chris Penn).  Each has
complications in his life at the moment. Kennesaw has a beautiful but
wayward wife (Rosanne Arquette) that he does not want to lose, but he
has fits of rage about the situation.  Braxton is a younger man, a
security guard turned cop.  We are explicitly his IQ is a lowly 101 and
he certainly is not one of the more promising policemen on the force.
He also has gotten into trouble with a flamboyant bookie (played by--
are your ready for this?--Ellen Burstyn) and he desperately needs money
that he hopes to borrow from Kennesaw.  Braxton and Kennesaw work as a
team to try to break down Wayland, but it is not clear that even his
answers on the polygraph are dependable. Even on the polygraph Wayland
may be playing a deadly game of deception.
     Tim Roth is, of course, second only to Steve Buscemi as the king
of bizarre roles in arthouse films.  His smooth strange manner is just
about right for this film.  He maintains a wall around himself inside
which he remains aloof even from the audience.  Most of the rest of the
casting is prosaic.  By far the most interesting choice is to have
Ellen Burstyn as the bookie and kingpin Mook, complete with glitter
eye-shadow.  It is, of course, in stark contrast to the matronly roles
we expect of her, and while we see her in only two scenes, her face is
the one image of the film that sticks in my memory.  Photography by
Bill Butler is dark and moody.
     DECEIVER is clearly an attempt to make another puzzle crime film
in the tradition of THE USUAL SUSPECTS.  It is the sort of story that
does not really begin until the film is over and the audience has all
the clues and then can start trying to piece them together.  Generally
that is a very good touch, but there has to be at least one real
solution and way to get to it.  It goes wrong, however, in DECEIVER
because the clues do not seem to lead in a coherent way to a solution.
It is an art in a puzzle story to leave enough clues about what is
going on so that the viewer can piece together one or more possible
satisfying explanations but at the same time make the explanation
complex enough that piecing together the clues is a challenge. One had
the feeling that on a second watching of THE USUAL SUSPECTS the viewer
could make all of the clues fit.  (And in fact it was not difficult on
the second viewing.)  A second viewing of DECEIVER on the other hand
seems much less promising because there will still be too many holes to
piece together the story.  At the same time what we have already seen
seems contradictory.  There seem to be no explanations for what we have
seen that are both coherent and interesting.
     The Pates are trying a little too hard to surprise the us at the
expense of logic in the script.  Still while the illusion of the puzzle
film lasts this film is intriguing.  I rate it a 5 on the 0 to 10 scale
and low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Antonia (1995)
     According to VARIETY, when ANTONIA'S LINE was premiered at Cannes,
"only women buyers and press were allowed into the first screening.
Even the film's male producers were excluded from the good- humored
solidarity screening."  (Please don't confuse this policy with sexism.
This is, of course, a blow for equality of the sexes and should in no
way been seen as justifying anyone else's policy of discrimination by
sex.)  Indeed, ANTONIA'S LINE is a sometimes good-natured, often very
angry story looking at four generations of women running a sort of
communal farm in what is probably Holland or Belgium.  As the film
opens Antonia (Willeke Van Ammelrooy) is an old woman is an old woman
who is still apparently healthy but knows that this is her final day
alive.  In flashback she remembers the preceding forty or fifty years.
The story picks up after World War II when Antonia returns to this
unnamed village, the site of her youth.  With her she brings with her
teenage daughter Danielle (Els Dottermans).  Together they start to run
a farm.  Sebastian, the farmer who runs a neighboring farm expects he
will acquire the two ladies in a manner not unlike the way he acquires
cattle.  In fact, like cattle is how he and his sons treat his own
homely daughter Deedee (Marina De Graaf), showing her off in the local
pub by holding up her breasts to accentuate them.  But when Deedee's
own brother rapes her, it is the Antonia's farm that acquires Deedee.
And so begins the communal farm that takes on all comers willing to
work.  The farm is, of course successful and never has any agricultural
problems.  The only problems we see come from Sebastian's sons.  But
that is only to be expected because men will be men.  Just made that
way, I guess.  Not that all men in the village are bad by any means,
but when there is trouble it is generally caused by a man.  One is
given the impression that if there were no men around everything would
just go swimmingly.
     Danielle decides to have a daughter and has a friend arrange a
one-night stand with a hunk in a local town.  (Please don't confuse
this with the way men use women as sex objects!  This is just an
example of what an unfeeling society forces a woman to do if she wants
to have a man's child but then never see the man again.)  The product
of this union and enlightened child-rearing techniques is a child who
is both a brilliant mathematician and a composer of music.  There are
more problems (including another rape) to come.  But through it all
tolerance and enlightened thinking are more than a match for any
problem that arises.  Before we are done there are four generations of
women on the successful farm.
     The makeup design by Jan Sewell is terrific.  Antonia ages forty
or fifty years in the course of the film and yet one never doubts that
she is the age she is playing at the moment.  The same goes for other
women in the film.  I would be very curious to the actual age of the
various actresses.  I suspect they must be young because it is easier
to make a young person look old than an old person look young.  The
acting must be good because it takes more than makeup to make these
people look the right age.  The casting is also very good with people
who look like people you might find in such a town.
     This is a film that I tried very hard to like but there is just
too much sanctimony here.  This is a film with strong virtues, but at
heart there is also a lot of sexism here.  It is really hard to respect
a film that condemns sexism on one hand while practicing it on the
other.  I guess on balance I would give it a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Good Morning, Vietnam (1987)
     There is a spate of films coming out about the Vietnam experience.
Most seem to focus on large aspects of the war.  FULL METAL JACKET was
spread between Marine training and the Tet Offensive.  HANOI HILTON was
about the POW experience.  PLATOON put us into the boots of American ground
troops.  GOOD MORNING, VIETNAM is an exception.  It is mostly about what
would be a minor footnote to the war, a disc jockey (Adrian Cronauer, played
by Robin Williams) brought in to keep the troops' morale up.  Cronauer has
to fight a separate war, not against the enemy but against his own immediate
superiors, who want him to play music fit for elevators and to keep his
humor toned down.  Often in this sort of film it is the brass that does not
understand the rebel and people on his own level defend him.  One of the
interesting reversals in GOOD MORNING, VIETNAM is that here the top brass
want to keep the disc jockey.  Far from the usual cliche of dehumanized
generals making unfeeling decisions, this an anti-military film in which the
highest-ranking officer is one of the heroes of the film.
     There is another interesting reversal.  Many war films have two plot
lines, the main character's personal life and his professional life.  But
the personal plot line will have little to do with the war; only the
professional life plot line will really have the war as an important
element.  THE CAINE MUTINY is a good example--the (superfluous) love story
could easily have been moved to a non-war setting.  GOOD MORNING, VIETNAM
does just the reverse.  The main plot line could have been moved to WNBC in
New York without much change.  It is the love story that really requires the
Vietnam War setting.
     Part of what bothers me about GOOD MORNING, VIETNAM is that it feels
like it is rearing back to make some sort of powerful statement, but if the
punch ever hit, I missed it.  There is some talk about Americans seeing
Vietnamese as animals, but much of the film makes the point that there are
caring Americans and we see really only two who are not.  There is a dab of
"horrors of war" scenes but not much to emphasize the point.  Director Barry
Levison is used to making gentle human dramas like DINER and TIN MEN.  His
most biting film to date was AND JUSTICE FOR ALL and his heart just did not
seem to be into making a bitter anti-American statement.
     GOOD MORNING, VIETNAM leaves ample places for Robin Williams to "do his
thing."  He does wild improvisational comedy at the microphone, some quite
good.  It has the feel of being spontaneous and if it is, he must be some
sort of genius.  GOOD MORNING, VIETNAM is not the film it could have been,
but deserves a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Hollow Reed (1996)
     Some very fine films get made for British television and only few
of them ever get seen in the United States.  HOLLOW REED tells the
moving story of a custody battle between two divorced parents.  It also
subtly comments on the advantages that a woman has in the British legal
system.  As the film opens Martyn and Hannah Wyatt (played by Martin
Donovan and Joely Richardson) have been married, had a child, and been
divorced and each now lives with a lover--both male.  Martyn, a doctor,
has nominally accepted fault for a marriage he suspected from the
beginning could not work because he simply could not make himself
sufficiently interested in a woman.  Though he practices medicine, he
lives in a rather tatty apartment with his lover Tom Dixon (Ian Hart).
In the divorce Hannah received the rather upscale house and at least
temporary custody of young Oliver, their son.  To reaffirm her
attraction to men she lives with Frank Donally (Jason Flemyng), a macho
construction worker, the antithesis of Martyn.  As the film opens
Oliver has been badly beaten and comes to his father's apartment.
Oliver remains mysterious about the boys he claimed did the beating,
but since nobody can find any more about the incident it is allowed to
pass.  When Oliver shows up at school with a crushed hand and this time
obviously lies about how he got the injury Martyn begins to suspect
that his son has fallen victim to being systematically brutalized by
Frank.  Hannah denies that as a possibility and Martyn realizes his
only chance to protect his son lies in trying to win Oliver in a
custody battle.  But that makes for a doubly up-hill battle being gay
and a man in a country that systematically shows preference to the
mother in custody battles.
     The audience eventually knows who attacks Oliver though it takes
the characters a good deal longer to piece it all together.  Meanwhile
Oliver remains a cipher.  He ingenuously devises complex ways to escape
from his house and to spy on his parents, apparently planning some
counter-attack of his own.  But in the presence of adults he remains
withdrawn and nearly silent, only coming out of his shell to show
enthusiasm for STAR WARS toys and radio broadcasts.  Just why he
behaves as he does forms the central mystery of HOLLOW REED.  He
clearly misses having both his parents present, but Hannah fills
herself with hostility for her former husband and now even jumps at his
touch.  At the same time she reaches out for the stable relationship
she thought she had and later lost in her marriage to Martyn.  The
screenplay is by Paula Milne based on a story by Neville Bolt, itself
based on a true story.
     Angela Pope directs the film in a generally low-key style.  That
seems for the best since her one flamboyant touch is to send the camera
orbiting around the major characters in the climactic scene of the
film, a touch which may have some symbolic meaning but it gets lost on
the viewer as much as the unexplained title of the film.  Top billing
goes to Martin Donovan of THE PORTRAIT OF A LADY as the concerned
father.  He and Ian Hart have a steamy gay love scene that brought
gasps from the audience.  Joely Richardson has less passion in her role
in spite of character's professed disappointment with Martyn as a
husband.  She went on to be the second female lead in 101 DALMATIANS.
Most familiar to American audiences will be Edward Hardwicke as a chief
magistrate but who may be best known as Watson to Jeremy Brett's
Sherlock Holmes.
     The land of Shakespeare and Marlowe still has its share of good
writers still prizes writing as part of a basic education and much of
what they give away free on television is better than what we pay for
here.  I give HOLLOW REED a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Short Circuit 2 (1988)
     It would be hypocritical of me to say that SHORT CIRCUIT 2 is a big
come-down from SHORT CIRCUIT since, frankly, I was not much of a fan of the
first film.  Also, I hate to see a sequel be too much like the original, and
it true that SHORT CIRCUIT 2 was not much like its predecessor.  What it was
like was any of dozens of throw-away summer films. The basic plot could have
been done as a sequel to anything from THE LOVE BUG to STARMAN with small
variations.  In fact, with the exception of Ally Sheedy's off-screen voice
in one scene, there are only two characters in common with the first film.
One is Number Five itself, now mysteriously called by Everyone Johnny Five;
the other (I am sorry to report to all Asian Indians) is Ben, the
malapropping Indian robotics specialist who is now a toy manufacturer.
     Ben is in a major United States city--the script seems to imply it is
New York, but you see just about every Toronto landmark except Toronto Tower
itself.  He makes a deal with a department store that he will make a
thousand toy replicas of Number Five in time for Christmas, a deal that gets
him involved with small-time thieves and big-time bank robbers.  But Number
Five is reduced to being just a cute character made out of electronics
parts.  Whether or not he is alive--the major point of the first film--has
little to do with SHORT CIRCUIT 2.
     All this is not to say that there were not a few fairly funny jokes in
SHORT CIRCUIT 2.  I remember laughing more than once at what was happening,
but I frankly expect more from a movie than a few good gags.  If you think
that a dozen or so laughs are worth the price of an admission ticket, be my
guest.  My recommendation, however, is to wait to rent it or see it on
cable.  Rate it a flat 0 on the -4 to +4 scale--for the sake of those dozen
reasonable gags.

Title
Review for Freshman, The (1990)
          Capsule review:  College freshman takes a part-time job
     working for a well-known organized crime figure, then finds
     himself sinking in deeper and deeper.  Well-drawn characters
     salvage a less-than-original plot.  Rating: low +2.
     Marlon Brando does not particularly like THE FRESHMAN.  Or so he said
at the close of the shooting for the film.  And I suppose I can see his
point.   The basic plot for THE FRESHMAN is not all that original, and in
less skilled hands this could have been a very forgettable film.  It gets
very few points for originality.  Still, even a film made with a very tired
motif can be done with some style and can still be a quality film.  This is
yet another film of someone in his late teens just trying to go to school or
going to summer camp, but getting embroiled in screwball circumstances.
Deep down this is another teen comedy, but like RISKY BUSINESS or THE
GRADUATE, there is a little more substance here than in most teen comedies
and it should appeal to a larger audience.
     Matthew Broderick plays Charles Kellogg, who is starting college at New
York University's film school.  Or at least he is trying to, but all his
bags and money are stolen.  His attempts to get them back take a strange
turn when the hood who took them offers Kellogg a "great job" in return for
the money, which the hood has gambled away.  The great job turns out to be
running errands for Carmine Sabatini (played by Marlon Brando) who doesn't
just look like Vito Corleone from THE GODFATHER, he apparently IS the
Godfather.  The first job is to pick up SOMETHING at the airport and deliver
it to New Jersey.  His payment is to be $500 for a few hours' work.
     Andrew Bergman, who both wrote and directed THE FRESHMAN, has a good
feel for bizarre and comic characters.  We get to meet some of the most
quirky members of the underworld since POCKETFUL OF MIRACLES, including a
bon vivant ex-Nazi hiding behind the obvious alias of "Larry London" (played
by Maximillian Schell).  Much has been made of how good Brando is in his
role, though I am not convinced that it is as difficult a part as other
reviewers seem to think.  (Also, Brando now has the stature of someone
eating himself to death and should take better care of himself.)
     Cinema fans should enjoy all the references to classic films to be
found in the film school scenes and pretty much everybody will enjoy some of
the comedy scenes, such as the pickup at the airport.  In general this is a
well-made comedy that transcends its formula.  I would rate this a low +2 on
the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Lost Boys, The (1987)
          Capsule review:  Moody photography and baroque sets
     constitute most of the value of this punk-vampire film about
     the undead on motorcycles and pre-teen Van Helsings.  The
     story plays a little fast and loose with traditional vampire
     lore.
     Back when Hammer Films was making its best vampire films--and they were
some of the best ever made--they used vampirism as a sort of metaphor.  The
early Dracula films with Christopher Lee (KISS OF THE VAMPIRE and especially
BRIDES OF DRACULA) likened vampirism to drug addiction.  This added a little
relevance to the films and it made things easier for the scriptwriter.  How
does a mother behave when she discovers her beloved son has become a
vampire?  Well, it's not so hard to find mothers whose sons have become drug
addict; just have them react the same way.  In BRIDES OF DRACULA one woman
talks about how there is a so-called smart set who consider vampirism a sort
of special privilege.  Hammer's metaphor has been resurrected for Joel
Schumacher's LOST BOYS.
     The story concerns two boys Sam (about 12 years old) and Michael (about
18) who are the new family in town in Santa Carla, California.  Michael
quickly falls in with the wrong sort, punk bikers forever getting into
trouble.  Sam makes friends, too, with boys his own age.  The bikers are not
just punks; they are vampires, and Sam's friends are vampire hunters.  From
there the plot follows turns which, if not completely predictable, are
hardly surprising either.  In fact, the only real surprise comes from where
the scriptwriter suddenly decides to vary from the standard rules of the
powers of the vampires.
     With not much of a script to work with, Schumacher manages a few
pleasant moments of tongue-in-cheek but little more than that.  This is,
however, a cinematographer's film and while everyone else seemed to be
putting in half-hearted efforts, the cinematographer was working overtime.
The photography is moody and at times even eerie.  The atmospheric
camerawork extends even to the gratuitous rock concert scenes.  If THE LOST
BOYS is better than Schumacher's previous films, like THE INCREDIBLE
SHRINKING WOMAN, it is mostly because of emotional effects orchestrated by
the cinematographer.  Rate the film a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Road Scholar (1993)
     Andrei Codrescu is a Romanian-born Jew, a fact that explains many
aspects of his personality.  His acerbic sense of humor is a survival trait
when one lives in a background radiation of anti-Semitism from both the
neighbors and the government.  It also trains one to expect the worst and
hope for the best from institutions and the bureaucracy running the country.
At the same time, having come to the United States and finding conditions
better, he clearly likes this country and has an affection, if somewhat
bewildered, for Americans.  And he sees America as an outsider.  Because of
these different perspectives, he has become a commentator on National Public
Radio's "All Things Considered."  In ROAD SCHOLAR Codrescu brings these
perspectives to bear on various aspects of American life seen during a trip
across the country.
     ROAD SCHOLAR is not so much a film as a news magazine in cinematic
form.  It is supposedly inspired by the book ON THE ROAD by Jack Kerouac,
but it is closer in form to a stringing together of segments of "Charles
Kurault on the Road" or "Jean Shepherd's America."  It is also comparable to
Michael Palin's short television series "Around the World in Eighty Days"
and "Pole to Pole."  Codrescu drives from Manhattan to San Francisco
commenting on the passing parade.  He visits Ellis Island and comments on
the immigrant experience.  He also visits a Romanian restaurant, where his
compatriots make up for years of extreme poverty in the old country by
eating pornographically large cuts of meat.  He is served a steak so long he
has to fold over the end so that it does not drag on the table.  Detroit and
its hard times remind him of Romania.  In Chicago (if I remember correctly)
he visits a sausage factory and discovers a new sensuality in the packing of
sausages.  Also in Chicago he visits a McDonald's restaurant exactly as they
were when they were first open.  It is an educational exhibit for McDonald's
Hamburger U.  Codrescu mixes in a private war between the city council and a
junk artist who is half burying a car in her yard.
     Westward he continues to report on New Age crystal religion and a
healing shrine in New Mexico, and a drive-up window in a kitsch matrimonial
chapel in Las Vegas.  We visit Biosphere II, a sealed and totally self-
contained community to which inhabitants have exiled themselves for two
years.  This is supposed to prove people can live in similar confines in
space, though presumably in space there will not be a constant stream of
tourists to chat with at the windows.  Codrescu dubs Biosphere II a
"Disneyland for the Millenially Disabled."  According to Codrescu, America
seems to be discovered over and over again and never definitively.
Definitive discovery seems to have eluded Codrescu also, but at least his
commentaries and slices of life are never dull.  I rate this a +1 on the -4
to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Shadows and Fog (1992)
          Capsule review:  Beautifully filmed and intriguing
     tribute to German Expressionism and in general the Central
     European sensibility between the World Wars.  The story and
     the director's intentions are never better than vague.
     Rating: high 0 (-4 to +4).
     Out in the fog a killer--a tall bald man in a long frock coat
reminiscent of Orlok in NOSFERATU--is strangling people.  A deputation of
vigilantes drags Kleinman (played by Woody Allen) from his bed.  He must
fulfill an important role in their plot to catch the killer, but there is no
time to explain to Kleinman what his role is to be.  To prove his support he
must go out into the fog and perform an unexplained but dangerous function
to catch the killer.  There he meets a beautiful sword swallower (played by
Mia Farrow) who is married to a thoroughly unpleasant clown (played by John
Malkovich).
     With the dissonances of Kurt Weill's music under the credits, Woody
Allen opens SHADOWS AND FOG, his tribute to Central European culture and
mindset between the two World Wars.  The unwary viewer might expect this
film to do to German and Czech culture what Allen's LOVE AND DEATH did to
Russian culture.  To a large extent, that is what Allen is doing, playing
his poor schnook character in the middle of a cultural milieu and making it
look silly.  We have the allusions to film and to literature.  Here there is
a scene inspired by NOSFERATU or M.  There there is Kafka-esque situation or
some characters out of Brecht.  As a character drops into a saloon, the
soundtrack plays Weill's "Show Me the Way to the Next Whiskey Bar."  But in
LOVE AND DEATH the point of it all was good-natured and fun.  There is fun
in SHADOWS AND FOG, a carrot to the lovers of Allen's earlier films, but the
point of this bleaker film is introspection and abstract philosophy.  It
also can be read as an elliptical allegory about anti-Semitism.  Its main
character, a little Jew named Kleinman, wanders in the fog caught up in
circumstances darker and more complex than he can understand.  And where he
goes there are allusions to medieval accusations against Jews as well-
poisoners.  And there are allusions to the Holocaust to come as he is
betrayed and sold by the Church, or told be a one-time fiancee to "Get out
there and die."  All this to music by a Jewish Kurt Weill in situations
originally created by the Jews Fritz Lang and Franz Kafka.  SHADOWS AND FOG
is certainly a black followup to LOVE AND DEATH.
     It has been suggested that SHADOWS AND FOG is purely an exercise in
using the photographic conventions of German Expressionist and horror films.
Certainly the photography is the film's strongest suit.  Scene after scene
is visually striking, even if the action of the scene is not so striking.
The film is top-heavy with major actors, many of whom have only cameos.  In
the search for faces you will find Madonna, Donald Pleasence, Lily Tomlin,
Jodie Foster, Kathy bates, John Cusack, Kate Nelligan, Fred Gwynne, Julie
Kavner, Kenneth Mars, David Ogden Stiers, and Wallace Shawn.  the film is
short and there really is not enough time for seventeen major actors.
Clearly there are lots of actors willing to settle for tiny roles in a Woody
Allen film and Allen is willing to create a role for any recognizable name.
In this case this cast has only gotten itself roles in a rather vague and
elliptical allegory.  I rate SHADOWS AND FOG a high 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Batman & Robin (1997)
     Someone decided it was time for another Batman film.  Note that
this is not the same thing as saying that somebody had a good idea for
a Batman story that they wanted to film.  I did not say that someone
was really excited about the possibilities for the Batman character and
the peripheral people in Batman's life.  But time has definitely passed
and the cash cow was ready for another squeeze.  Batman (George
Clooney) and Robin (Chris O'Donnell) battle Mr. Freeze (Arnold
Schwarzenegger) a villain who wants to freeze the world and Poison Ivy
(Uma Thurman) who can make people love her, has a poison kiss, and
wants to make the world safe for plants.  Batman's butler Alfred
(Michael Gough) is dying.  Batman and Robin have a falling out over
Ivy.  Alfred's British niece (Alicia Silverstone) becomes Batgirl.  And
this plot is just one minor feature of the new BATMAN AND ROBIN!  If I
seem not to consider the plot very important, you should see the
treatment it gets from director Joel Schumacher.  The script was not
ready to film and Schumacher should have rejected it.  Clearly there
are better things to do with the villains than to have them call the
title characters "Batface and Birdbrain."  Ivy was turned into a
monster by being buried with some poisons for a few minutes.  She comes
back to life and immediately says various parts of her have been
replaced by chemicals and her lips are now poison.  How would she know?
One sparkling line in the film has a scientist claiming to have drilled
"three concentric circles" into somebody's skull.
     Top-billed as Mr. Freeze is Arnold Schwarzenegger, who may be able
to bench press a Buick but finds it beyond his ability to push a
performance out through thick layers of blue makeup and plastic suit.
The concept of a villain who fell into a freezing vat and now wants to
freeze the world left me cold, and Schwarzenegger's performance is an
absolute zero with none of his natural wit and far too many lamely
unfunny one-liners.  Physically, George Clooney looks the most like the
comic book Bruce Wayne of the three actors who have played him so far,
or put another way, this is the first one who looked at all the part.
The problem is that Clooney is not a very exciting or even interesting
actor.  And if you cannot be exciting as Batman, you may just not be
destined to be exciting at all.  Chris O'Donnell plays Robin, the Boy
Wonder who in my days of reading the comic was eternally about fourteen
years old.  Unfortunately it is hard to find a fourteen-year-old with
marquee value.  Putting O'Donnell in the role becomes an increasingly
silly piece of casting each time he shows up.  This leaves the BATMAN
AND ROBIN wide open to be stolen by the fourth-billed Uma Thurman.  Uma
Thurman!  How bad do three actors have to be for a decorative but dull
Uma Thurman to turn in the most interesting performance?  Next comes
Alicia Silverstone as Barbara Wilson, soon to be Batgirl.  Silverstone
is a cute blonde who gets most of her personality by making funny
expressions with her mouth: biting her lower lip, pouting, so forth.
The script apparently calls for her to be British, but she made no
attempt to sound British and nobody cared.  Michael Gough, who has been
in ALL FOUR Batman films turns in the most touching performance and may
well be the best actor in the film.
     With each new Batman film Gotham City becomes more deeply engulfed
by the inevitable and all-consuming advance of Art Nouveau.  The art
style appears to be chewing up all the more normal-looking buildings
and spitting out titanic geometric formations and baroque reliefs and
statues of colossal human figures.  Gotham seems unable to stem the
tide, but apparently Batman has not been called.  The city has gone
from resembling Helsinki in the first film to being an incredible
architectural nightmare in BATMAN AND ROBIN.  Perhaps the one saving
grace of the film is that it does bring this abstract art-form to the
masses.  But this combines with Stephen Goldblatt's dark photography
and Dennis Virkler's fast editing.  The result is a film that might be
entertaining to look at if it were just a little more sparse and if the
pace were cut down just a bit.  But there were many scenes in which I
had to ask myself what it was that I just saw.

Title
Review for Full Metal Jacket (1987)
     Well, the Vietnam War film seems to be with us at last.  While the war
went on and for a good while afterward it seemed a taboo subject.  People,
and in particular film backers, did not want to make films about so downbeat
a subject.  With the passing of time some of the wounds have healed and we
have some gung-ho Vietnam films.  The RAMBOs and MISSING IN ACTIONs made it
entertaining (if unrealistic) as the John Wayne films a generation earlier
did for World War II.  Now serious Vietnam films are being made.  We had
DEER HUNTER, APOCALYPSE NOW, THE KILLING FIELDS, and PLATOON.  Kubrick's
latest film is FULL METAL JACKET.
     The film is the history of a Marine known only as Lt. Joker (played by
Matthew Modine).  The story is the memories of Joker from the war and, like
memories, it is episodic.  The first 3/4-hour of the film is the story of
Joker's boot camp experience on Paris Island.  90% of the words you hear
during this story are yelled by Joker's drill instructor.  From there we
follow John's early Vietnam career in some shorter episodes, then the film
ends in another long story.  Joker becomes a correspondent for the only
newspaper the brass respects, the military's own STARS AND STRIPES.  By their
own admission, all they publish is good-news war news and stories about
soldiers giving half their income to down-trodden Vietnamese.  The war, and
in particular the Tet Offensive, is seen from his ironic viewpoint.  While
the film is not as exaggerated as DR. STRANGELOVE, it always has a tragic
and usually a comic undertone.  The film starts bitter and funny like DR.
STRANGELOVE and slowly transforms to sad and bitter like PATHS OF GLORY.
Those are Kubrick's two best films and FULL METAL JACKET could well come to
be accepted by many as his third best.
     FULL METAL JACKET is not the Vietnam War the grunts saw.  That was
PLATOON.  It isn't the war the Cambodians saw.  That was THE KILLING FIELDS.
The Vietnam War the middle-aged right wing saw was THE GREEN BERETS.  If I
ever figure out from whose viewpoint the was was seen in THE DEER HUNTER or
APOCALYPSE NOW, I'll let you know.  FULL METAL JACKET is the Vietnam War
that the college kids who didn't go (and a few who did) saw.  As such it has
some truths, some distortions, and more than a little nostalgia value.  Rate
it a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Lawrence of Arabia (1962)
     While it is an old film, and a well-known one, I probably should say
something about the restored version of LAWRENCE OF ARABIA since its release
is one of the big events of the year.  ("What?  More words?" as Jack Hawkins
asks early in the film.)  And it's true, there has has been a lot of media
coverage.  As a labor of love, Robert Harris has organized the restoration
of a classic film, many people's favorite film of all time, and certainly
one that deserves a +4 rating from me.  The time spent on the restoration
was longer than was spent on the original film (19 months on the
restoration, 18 on the original film).
     I think it is now film history what Harris and his people went through
to restore the film.  First Harris got Steven Spielberg and Martin Scorsese
to tell Columbia that if the restoration did not get funded there would be
no more Columbia films by either director.  Harris's team scoured the world
for prints that might have some footage that may have been cut from more
commonly available editions.  They found footage for which they had no sound
and in some cases no script.  They hired lip-readers to tell them what the
actors were saying.  Then they re-hired Peter O'Toole, Alec Guinness, and
several of the other actors to recreate their voices for 1962 and to redub
the scenes, then they had to cut the new pieces in, artificially add hiss so
the transition would not be so noticeable, and so forth.  It was a
remarkable piece of work.  Further they had to remove the scratches for the
pieces they had.  Surprisingly, that is possible.  The scratches are only on
the surface and there is a process by which if you put the film in fluid, it
fills up the cracks and you can transfer a scratchless image as long as you
do so in the fluid.
     So it was a giant piece of work, though I am told not incredibly
expensive as new films go, and at the Ziegfeld in New York they did have
lines wrapped around the block.  I stood for 90 minutes in the cold to get
in, and would probably do so again, though I have to say I was less than
pleased with the Ziegfeld's presentation of the restoration, at least of the
sound.  The music was painfully loud and I would say it sounded distorted.
It is rare that you see a 70mm print that is not a blown-up 35mm print.
This was filmed on 70mm and you can see a difference, not a tremendous
difference, but it is noticeable.  The "mystical" experience of seeing the
desert in all the glory of the original film eluded me.  Yes, it is very
good photography and seeing it in this really wide-screen version reminds
you how good the photography is.  It is a very good cinematic experience
seeing the restoration, not much more.
     Now here comes one of those pieces of heresy that I get my ears pinned
back for occasionally.  The people who cut down the film from 223 minutes to
187, they diminished the film.  They did not butcher it.  That 187-minute
film that I got off of cable--that was a +4 film.  The restored version seen
on the wide screen is a better film, but not that much better.  Given that
the film was going to be cut, the "butchers" made pretty much the right
cuts.  There is one notable exception, the sequence of Lawrence massacring a
group of Turks toward the end of the film.  The cut version was incoherent;
the full version was bloodier and made Lawrence less sympathetic, probably
the reason for the bad cut.  With the exception of that sequence and what it
says about Lawrence, I find that what I like the film for was never cut out
of it.  (Speaking of what it says about Lawrence, I recommend an hour-long
program they run on PBS that tells you more about the real Lawrence than the
film does.)  I do not approve of the cuts that were made, but the result was
still a very good film.

Title
Review for Mrs. Dalloway (1997)
     Virginia Woolf wrote MRS. DALLOWAY as a stream-of-consciousness
novel taking place in the title character's mind.  Now Eileen Atkins
has adapted the story as a somewhat non-linear narrative jumping
forward and backward in time.  There are two story lines, tangent at
many points but never really converging into a single story.  We have a
view of Clarissa Dalloway as a young woman (played by Natascha
McElhone) and as an older woman (Vanessa Redgrave), and we have the
story of Septimus Warren Smith (Rupert Graves).  More on his story
later.  Even as a young woman Clarissa could not commit to anything but
comfort and ease.  Now as an older woman she has attained comfort and
ease and her big concerns at the moment we see her all over the success
of one of her own parties.  She is an empty shell woman inside whom
thoughts bounce around un-weighted by any real profundity.  She is
nostalgic for a past in which she consistently chose the path of least
resistance in spite of frequent temptations to show a little character.
As an adult she is an antique and a relic of a dying way of life with
little inkling how irrelevant she is outside of a small circle of
friends.  She has little understanding of the hard world outside that
circle.
     Nearby and yet so far away is Septimus Smith who fought in the
Great War and saw a close friend blown to pieces by a land mine.
Already in shock from the war, he felt nothing at seeing his friend die
so horribly.  Now he is coming out of the initial shock and the meaning
of what he has seen is haunting him.  He blames himself for feeling
nothing at the death of a friend.  And he hates his doctors who seem as
out of touch with the harsh realities of life as Mrs.  Dalloway.  They
cannot even understand Smith's painful howl and instead pallidly
prescribe a rest cure at an asylum.  They see Smith as insane when the
pain he feels is more real than anything in Mrs. Dalloway's entire
useless life.
     The theme of the two worlds is curiously reminiscent of Sidney
Lumet's THE PAWNBROKER with Holocaust survivor Rod Steiger telling
well-meaning do-gooder Geraldine Fitzgerald that he comes from a whole
world that she knows nothing about and whose people are of an entirely
different species.  MRS. DALLOWAY is in some ways very much like THE
PAWNBROKER told from the viewpoint of the genteel Fitzgerald character.
     Mrs.  Dalloway's friends and, in fact, her whole class seem to be
out of touch with harsh reality.  In a particularly telling sequence, a
friend of Dalloway's decides that the best thing for England would be
to take all the returning WWI veterans who have been unable to find
work on their own and effectively exile them to Canada.  Her friends
who know a little more decide to humor her in spite of the foolishness
and probable illegality of the plan.
     Virginia Woolf's MRS. DALLOWAY must have been a difficult novel to
adapt (by all accounts, I have not read it) and the script has some
technical problems made worst by some casting problems.  The telling
drifts from present into the past with little signal and it is not
always obvious that it has happened.  It is very difficult in the
flashback sequences to match the younger versions of characters to the
older ones since the characters are played by different actors who
often are physically quite different.  The young Clarissa and her
friend Sally are nearly the same height in their 20s and considerably
different in height what is probably their 50s.  We are led to assume
that having children has shortened Sally by what must be six inches.
It might well have been better to use only young actors and age them
much as Orson Welles aged himself in CITIZEN KANE.  But for these
problems in the casting, most of the roles seem well-played with
veteran British actors in several of the roles.
     This film is for the most part gentle, but deep-down there seems
to be a lot of anger in the telling, perhaps more than one would find
in even an E.  M. Forster or John Galsworthy story.  It would be
interesting to read the novel to see if Woolf has the same disdain for
the characters that the film seems to have.  I rate MRS. DALLOWAY a 6
on the 0 to 10 scale and a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Black Rain (1989)
     A store near me sells a watch that comes with five watchbands of
different colors and five watch faces to match.  The ad says it is five
different watches in one.  The works, of course, remain the same.  You just
change some superficial outer trappings and the ad would have you believe
that you really have a different watch.  At times I think that the American
film industry thinks that same way.
     The story of BLACK RAIN was a good one at one time.  A cop is trying to
bring a mean and violent criminal to justice.  The cop screws up and his
prisoner escapes.  Now he has got to go out into the hostile environment to
bring the creep to justice again.  Fortunately, he gets someone to work with
him.  Unfortunately, he and his new partner can't stand each other.  But
working together for a common goal, against all odds, they learn to respect
each other and finally get the creep.  But they have also learned an
important lesson in human understanding.  Yes, Hollywood has once again
remade RED SUN, RED HEAT, 48 HOURS, BEVERLY HILLS COP, and by now probably a
dozen other films that have that same plot, give or take a detail.  I will
give whoever first wrote that plot some credit, it would have been a good
plot if it had been used once.  Too bad it has become such a popular
standard that good filmmakers like Ridley Scott feel they can get away
filming it again and calling it a new story.
     Now let's get down to a few of the specific details for BLACK RAIL.
In this case, the hostile environment is Osaka.  The main cop is really two
American cops.  One is Nick a dishonest but basically good cop sleazily
played by Michael Douglas.  Nick's close shaves are many but always
figurative--he seems to be able to go for what must be an entire week with
the same two-day growth of beard.  And if the Japanese think Americans are
barbarians, Douglas's character more than justifies the viewpoint.  The
other cop is played much neater by Andy Garcia.  They stumble onto a Yakuza
execution in New York City and nab a major Japanese hood.  However,
escorting him to Osaka turns out harder than they expected.  So they find
themselves in a strange city in which they do not speak the language,
escorted by a dour-faced Japanese detective, Masahiro (played in a nicely
understated manner by Ken Takakura of THE YAKUZA).  The story is really
about how Nick and Masahiro learn to respect each other and how with
motorcycle chases and gunfights Nick regains his self-respect and becomes
honest again.
     If such a hackneyed plot is to be turned into a watchable film by
anyone, it would probably be a Ridley Scott.  Scott has directed some good
films, though generally their weakness has been plot problems.  His ALIEN is
a very good film but almost entirely because of mood and great visuals, not
because it has a stellar plot.  Similarly, the visual sense of BLADE RUNNER
outdistances the plot by miles.  Scott's plots are acceptable (usually
better than for BLACK RAIN's) but it is the misty atmospheric feel of the
film that makes his work worth seeing.  Watching a Scott film is the health
equivalent of smoking a pack and a half of cigarettes.  Virtually every
scene seems to have smoke or smog in it somewhere.  He has smoggy scenes of
New York, smoggy scenes of Osaka, smoky steel refineries, smoky police
departments.  But even if he is starting to do the smoky bit a little too
much he has a fresh eye, particularly for accenting the alien in an alien
culture.  His Osaka is a Japan we have rarely seen before, from neon buses
to smoky (of course) pachinko palaces.
     I will give BLACK RAIN a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale as an atmospheric
travelogue.  It was worth the $3 I paid just to see a different view of
Japan.  I figure the plot comes along free, and that was just a bit more
than what it is worth.

Title
Review for Quills (2000)
     This year there were two films about the infamous Marquis de
Sade and his imprisonment at the mental asylum at Charenton.  There
was Benoit Jacquot's more reserved SADE and Philip Kaufman's QUILLS.
Both tell the same oft-repeated story as such diverse films as GREAT
BALLS OF FIRE and THE PEOPLE VS. LARRY FLYNT.  Each of these films
tells the account of somebody notorious in his own time.  But, we
are told, the REAL evil was that of the establishment that tried to
suppress and crush these free spirits.  The world has come to
tolerate what the outcast was doing and the real villain was not the
free spirit but the world that wanted to suppress him.  There
probably are few other ways to tell the narrative of someone
punished for free expression from the viewpoint of a world that now
tolerates free expression.  It would be hard to tell the story of
the Marquis de Sade at Charenton any other way in a world that now
tolerates Gangsta Rap that is just a violent.  Though Peter Brook's
1966 MARAT/SADE is a film that escapes the cliched just about as
well as it could be done.
     It is the early 1800s and Napoleon is Emperor of France.  The
infamous Marquis de Sade (Geoffrey Rush) has seen the excesses of
the Revolution and the Terror that followed.  He has incorporated
that horror in his "sadistic" writings.  Now he lives imprisoned but
in luxury at the Asylum at Charenton under the sympathetic but
ineffective care of the Abbe Coulmier (Joaquin Phoenix).  All he
needs to engage his bizarre fantasies is paper, ink, and quills.
Coulmier uses argument and what he sees as reason to try to reform
his patient and bring him to God.  Coulmier argues for restraint and
virtue; De Sade is the prophet of unrestrained hedonism and
fulfillment.  Sade's therapy also involves his staging of innocuous
plays with the inmates as actors.  Naturally he subverts these plays
in any ways possible.
     But Sade is an angry spirit who vents his furies by continuing
to write his lurid and explicit sexual fantasies.  For him writing
his fantasies is an irresistible compulsion.  His laundress
Madeleine (Kate Winslet) manages a tidy business smuggling his
fiction to a courier who takes it in turn to be published.  The
stories sell and are enjoyed all over France and the Emperor
Napoleon wants to see this affront to public decency squelched.  He
sends an alienist Dr. Royer-Collard (Michael Caine) to Charenton.
(Alienists were the forerunners of psychiatrists like alchemists
were the forerunners of chemists.)  Royer-Collard obtains real
results by torturing patients nearly to death and forcing them to
give up their insanity.  Royer-Collard is a respected man and
recently has taken as a bride the reluctant Simone (Amelia Warner)
who is about a third his age.
     The screen has yet to provide a really hypnotic and effective
de Sade.  Such diverse talents as Kier Dullea, Klaus Kinski, Patrick
Magee, Daniel Auteuil and the great Conrad Veidt have played the
man, but it was (with the possible exception of Veidt) never played
by someone who combines the whimsy and malignancy that the role
requires.  Rush has some power in the role, but even he falls short.
Michael Caine represents a much more urbane and administrative evil
and does a sufficient job but seemingly without his heart being in
it.  Kate Winslet of TITANIC fame plays the laundress transfixed by
the notorious author.  Joaquin Phoenix as a benightedly idealistic
cleric is also acceptable but uninspired.
     Sadly the theme of this story is over-familiar and tired from
over-use.  Where this film stands out is its ghoulish Grand Guignol
vision of the tortures of the asylum and its enjoyably unpleasant
anti-establishment view of the early 19th century.  And perhaps in
that de Sade would have appreciated it.  I rate QUILLS a 7 on the 0
to 10 scale and a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.  There were two
additional treats for me.  And it is a pleasure to see seasoned
character actor Billie Whitelaw playing as the laundress's blind
mother.  Also being in the telecommunications industry myself, I
enjoyed seeing the early telecommunications fiasco.

Title
Review for Angels and Insects (1995)
     In the 1860s naturalist William Adamson (played by Mark Rylance)
has come back ten years in the Amazon jungle but on the way lost all
his notes and specimens in a ship disaster.  His patron, the
Rev. Harald Alabaster (Jeremy Kemp), has invited Adamson to visit the
Alabaster country estate.  The Reverend Alabaster has embraced the
teachings of Charles Darwin, albeit reluctantly, and is looking to
Adamson to help him sort out his crisis of faith in the face of
changing ideas.  Adamson is struck by the beauty of Alabaster's
daughter Eugenia (Patsy Kensit), but having lost everything he cannot
hope to win her, particularly with Eugenia's snob brother Edgar
(Douglas Henshall) reminding Adamson at every turn that while he is a
guest at the Alabaster estate, he is of quite a lower station in life
and must never think of himself as being anywhere near an equal.
However, Eugenia's fiance committed suicide before Adamson knew her and
with Eugenia's younger sister marrying Eugenia feels the need to be
married.  Knowing that she is considered out of his caste, Adamson
offers what help he can give to Eugenia, even marriage, and is
astounded when his unobtainable love readily accepts his offer.  The
marriage is an odd one and not wholly satisfying, but Adamson is able
to channel his time into the study of ants on the Alabaster property.
It is a study in which he is ably assisted by Matty Crompton (Kristin
Scott Thomas), a quiet, spinsterish relation to the Alabasters also
living at the estate.  Adamson finds to his amazement that Crompton is
at least his equal in intellect.
     If all this sounds a little bit like a Jane Austen plot, the
answer is yes, it is a little bit like that, but it is also very
different in theme.  There is also some Charlotte Bronte thrown in.
And something more.  The story, the photography, and even details like
the costume design are intended constantly to compare and contrast the
upper class society with the society of insects, particularly ants and
butterflies.  It does so as the odd behavior of the Alabaster family is
developed.  The problem is that the we note the odd behavior for so
long that we start to wonder why we are being shown so much upper-class
weirdness we no longer really want to understand the family.
Eventually the viewer gets tired of waiting for some concrete
development.  It is not that there is not some interest to the study of
the ant world and its comparison to the Alabaster family social
structure.  But the film seems aimless for too long before things tie
together.  The screenplay is by Belinda Haas who edited the film Philip
Haas who directed.  The same team did the same tasks on 1993's THE
MUSIC OF CHANCE, which was a better film.  While it was perhaps even
more enigmatic than this film, it seemed like an enigma to better
purpose.
     ANGELS AND INSECTS is a bit of a disappointment and rates a low +1
on the -4 to +4 scale.  Incidentally, don't look too hard for angels.
The book ANGELS AND INSECTS had two novellas, one having to do with
angels, one with insects.  This is an adaptation of "Morpho Eugenia,"
the novella about insects.

Title
Review for Very Bad Things (1998)
     CAPSULE: Five friends at a stag party are involved in the
accidental killing of a prostitute.  The cover-up attempt becomes a
monster that eats up the friends, two wives and several innocent
bystanders.  This was a real audience pleaser at Toronto, but it did
not do much for me.  Rating: 4 (0 to 10), low 0 (-4 to +4)
   - Directed by Peter Berg who acted in THE LAST SEDUCTION and
     COPLAND.
   - Five buddies go on a stag outing to Las Vegas while Cameron Diaz
     works through the logistics of her upcoming wedding to one of
     them.  One of the buddies accidentally kills a prostitute.
   - Several people with no moral compass.  They started out with a
     simple, innocent little cocaine party (!) and by accident look
     what happened.  They have one moral person among them (Daniel
     Stern), and one totally amoral person (Christian Slater).  It is
     more selfish to let the amoral lead, so they do.
   - This film is strange, but not really funny or biting.  Black
     comedy should actually be funny as well as strange.  There should
     be some element of satire.  The satire is missing here.  I did not
     find myself laughing here either.  What we have is a strange crime
     tale.
   - One just does not care what happens to these people.
   - The same idea of people just getting themselves in deeper and
     deeper has been done frequently.  If this film is popular it is
     just bringing a familiar plot to a new generation.
   - It begins like DINER (particularly with Daniel Stern) and ends up
     like an extended horror/crime comic book.
   - There are several logical holes in script.  If a security man goes
     to investigate a complaint and disappears, wouldn't the guests he
     was investigating be the first suspects?  Someone framed for a
     crime in the way shown would be judged innocent after minimal
     forensic detective work.  (I am desperately trying to avoid making
     this a spoiler.)
   - Popular and situation ethics get a real slamming.
   - Some acting of grief is hammy and overdone.  More yelling than
     humor.

Title
Review for Night on Earth (1991)
     Jim Jarmusch's films are an acquired taste.  In some ways they are just
too realistic to be really enthralling.  Particularly in his first film,
STRANGER THAN PARADISE, his characters always think for five or ten seconds
before speaking a single sentence.  This made listening to the conversations
just a bit frustrating, which I suppose was the point.  After his DOWN BY
LAW, his most recent film was MYSTERY TRAIN, three interconnected stories
taking place the same day and night in Memphis, Tennessee.
     NIGHT ON EARTH is five stories involving taxi cab rides taking place at
the same instant.  The stories are less connected than those of MYSTERY
TRAIN.  Each takes place in a different city: Los Angeles, New York, Paris,
Rome, and Helsinki.
     In Los Angeles, a rather butch tomboy cab driver (played by Winona
Ryder) drives a casting agent (played by Gena Rowlands).  Each is
discouraged by the way things are going on her job and the other may be able
to help.  In New York, a black man (played by Giancarlo Esposito) hails a
cab and finds his driver (played by Armin Mueller-Stahl), a recent East
German emigre', knows nothing about New York or driving a cab.  Esposito's
frustration gives way to friendship as the German is pulled into his life,
but then the German ends up worse than when he started.  In Paris, a black
cab driver (played by Isaach De Bakole') first is the butt of racist remarks
from two drunk black passengers.  He throws them out of his cab and picks up
instead a blind woman who is non-discriminatory--she has a nasty attitude
toward everyone.
     Rome is the site of the fourth story where a  very funny and inventive
cab driver (played by Roberto Begnini) confesses his sins hilariously to a
priest in his cab.  It may or may not be a joke, but it has serious
consequences.  The final sequence takes place in Helsinki.  This time the
driver is played by Matti Pellonpaa (who played the manager in the worth-
looking-for LENINGRAD COWBOYS GO AMERICA).  He picks up three drunk
passengers who tell him a sad story that he matches with one of his own.
     Any of these segments might add needed texture to somebody's film about
a cab driver but it overall is a film that had the viewer asking at the end
of each segment, "Yeah?  So?"  Perhaps the idea, like in MY DINNER WITH
ANDRE, is just to let you hear the conversation, but since the characters
are so contrived there is little feel that these are real conversations.
And lulls in the conversation tend only to stretch out a film already too
long for many audiences.
     NIGHT ON EARTH is a just-okay entry in Jarmusch's filmography.  I give
it a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.  It is intriguing to compare Jarmusch's films
to LENINGRAD COWBOYS GO AMERICA.  Aki Kaurismaki recognizably borrows from
Jarmusch's style, an observation I made before I had realized that Jarmusch
also acts in THE LENINGRAD COWBOYS GO AMERICA.  So the two directors have
some cross-fertilization.  Yet of the two, Kaurismaki seems the better
director.  Kaurismaki totally avoids the "so what?" response that so often
comes with Jarmusch's work.

Title
Review for Frankenstein (1994)
          Capsule review:  Unevenly-paced rendition of the
     famous horror story takes far fewer liberties than most
     versions, but still does not really deserve to call
     itself "Mary Shelley's."  Kenneth Branagh has a few
     bizarre images worth seeing, but much of his film lacks
     the spark really to capture the imagination of general
     audiences.  Fans of the story, however, will find the
     film rewarding.  Rating: low +2 (-4 to +4) (This review
     contains spoilers for people who do not already know the
     plot of the original novel.  I don't believe they would
     hurt the enjoyment of the film, but reader discretion is
     advised.)
     The novel FRANKENSTEIN has been filmed in at least eleven previous
English-language versions (listed at the end of this review).  But
perhaps it is more accurate to say that it has failed to be filmed for
nine of those versions.  Most adaptations take only an idea or two from
the novel.  They stitch those ideas together with ideas more from the
filmmaker in attempts to infuse the story with the spark of life on the
screen.  The problem is that the novel has almost no visually dramatic
images beyond that of the creature itself.  The original novel shies
away from describing in any detail the process for creation.  This is
in part because Frankenstein, who in the novel tells the story, does
not want to give away the secret.  It also worked out conveniently for
the teenaged Mary Shelley, who had only a slight acquaintance with
science and could not realistically describe such a process herself.
As a result the novel, while exciting, is extremely non-visual.
DRACULA, on the other hand, was written by a man in the theater
professionally, and that horror novel is extremely dramatic visually.
The treatment DRACULA has gotten at the hands of filmmakers is far more
shameful since a filmmaker has much more to work with.
     But in adapting FRANKENSTEIN to the screen a filmmaker is always
faced with the dilemma that the more accurate a film version is to the
book, the more ponderous and less dramatic the film must be.  Calvin
Floyd's VICTOR FRANKENSTEIN (TV title: TERROR OF FRANKENSTEIN) is the
only version I would call a faithful adaptation of the novel.  But that
film, an ambitious Swedish-Irish co-production, turned out impenetrably
static and dull even for a Swedish film. Dan Curtis made a middlingly
faithful version for television in 1972, and most other filmmakers have
not even tried to be faithful to the book, either because of the nature
of the book or because they have just been sure that they could improve
on Shelley.  But adapting this novel to the screen in a way that is
both faithful and entertaining is a real puzzle comparable to, say,
giving modern audiences something they can enjoy from Shakespearean
plays like HENRY V or MUCH ADO ABOUT NOTHING.
     So Kenneth Branagh has taken on the ambitious task of adapting
FRANKENSTEIN to the screen in a reasonably faithful manner.  Sadly,
this film will not be his crowning achievement, but it is not a
disaster either.  People looking for excitement on the screen and
people who wanted to see Shelley's novel accurately done will probably
agree that this movie is just okay, but nothing great.  But, in fact,
Branagh has a sort of a moral victory on both fronts.  He perhaps has
created the second most faithful screen adaptation and still has
managed to make it moderately entertaining.  And fans of the horror
film will find he has infused some of the most interesting and bizarre
original visual images since James Whale did the 1931 version.
     The script does take liberties with the original story but
generally these changes show the expert hand of Frank Darabont as the
co-writer.  Darabont, who wrote and directed THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION,
has a remarkable ability to see minor strategic revisions to a story
that have maximum impact in improving the resulting story.  For
example, modern readers of the novel are usually surprised that
Frankenstein is not more concerned when his creature escapes and
disappears.  By the minor addition of setting the creation during a bad
cholera epidemic, the script explains how Frankenstein is able to find
"parts" as plentiful as he does, adds some visually exciting street
scenes, and explains why Frankenstein had reasonable motivation for
believing that his escaped creature will perish on his own.  The
epidemic is a very minor liberty which pays major dividends to the
story-telling.  With the exception of purists, most people should
appreciate that the story works better with the change.  There is a
sequence toward the end of the film that is a major departure from the
novel.  It picks up the interest in a section of the story that would
be slow and pays homage to another cinematic Frankenstein story.
     Generally Branagh's style in telling the classic story is to take
less dramatic scenes in the novel and to goose them up so that they are
considerably more engaging in film version.  For example, while the
ship in the framing story just quietly gets locked by ice, the film
version has an exciting scene of the ship foundering as the ice closes
in on it while in the background huge icebergs rear out of the water.
Time and again this film has scenes from the novel but gives them more
dramatic interpretations, which is exactly what the story needed.
Scenes that would normally have some dramatic impact, like the creation
scene, are further energized by short quick cuts.
     In fact, the creation scene is a study all by itself.  The
laboratory that is the setting seems strangely organic instead of
mechanistic as is the case in many film versions.  Mammoth bags of
electric eels pulsate over the body.  As we approach the instant of
creation Branagh uses a frenzy of shorter and shorter cuts, then at the
instant of the creation the pace changes to a long languorous shot.  I
assume the male readers will understand what just that particular
pacing has to do with the act of creating life.  It is amazing what you
can do with editing.  Moments later we see the creature pulled from its
watery artificial womb amid a torrent of spilling fluid, again a very
powerful birth image.  The laboratory mechanisms are as bizarre for us
today as Kenneth Strickfaden's electrical gizmos and Jack Pierce's neck
bolts must have been to 1931 audiences.  Whatever faults the film might
have, and it certainly has them, the creation sequence makes up for.
     The set design is often sumptuous.  Much of what we see of
Frankenstein's palatial family home takes place in a huge front hall
dominated by a mammoth stairway that is at once both beautiful and
dangerous-looking, another very symbolic image.  Street scenes have a
realistic feel.
     Some of the script touches seem not well thought-out.  It is
tempting to say these touches were made after Darabont's work since
they seem uncharacteristic of the care he seems to take with a script,
but of course there is no way to tell for sure.  At one point
Frankenstein writes in his journal that in the morning he will destroy
this journal.  So why is he bothering to write?  Did he have a surfeit
of ink?  In another sequence Frankenstein is standing in the middle of
his home's enormous empty front lawn.  He turns to the house, but from
nowhere we see the previously undetected creature reach out his hand
and grab Frankenstein.  What did he do, burrow up from underground?
Hoe do you sneak up on someone standing in an open field?
     Most film versions interpret the creature as a sort of zombie--the
resurrected dead.  Shelley saw the creature more as a baby in the
artificially-created body of a large and powerful man.  Branagh really
gives the creature both aspects and walks a tightrope between them,
much as the Karloff films did.  The creature sees the world with fresh
eyes, but can draw on memories of a former life.  Branagh's version has
Frankenstein initially inspired by the wish to bring his mother back
from the dead, so he himself thinks of his work as resurrection as much
as it is creation.  In another departure in interpretation, Shelley's
creature was powerfully strong, but only humanly so.  Branagh's version
chooses to give him superhuman strength.  Most film versions do this,
of course, but VICTOR FRANKENSTEIN and the Dan Curtis version do not.
     As Frankenstein, Branagh is intense and angry.  Unlike the moody
Colin Clive or even Peter Cushing, Branagh is vital and alive in the
role.  Top billing goes to Robert De Niro as the creature.  It is a
casting decision that I still do not understand, unless it was a role
that De Niro himself was anxious to play.  I do not think it is as hard
to play the creature well as most people think it is.  I have always
contended that it takes far more acting talent to play believably a
Georgia cotton farmer than to play Frankenstein's creature.  The
creature should have some humanity, but also some feel of being alien.
But as long as an actor gives him that, not much else he can do with
the role can be wrong.  The creature needs imposing physically--which
De Niro is not--and beyond that just has to be a good creative actor.
Except for stature problems De Niro is fine in the role, but is over-
qualified for the role that should have gone to encourage the career of
promising but less recognized actor.  The surprise of the film is John
Cleese in a rare serious role.  He is terrific as an aging scientist
who could have created life himself but who lacked the final spark of
courage.  His Dr. Waldman is a man broken by his own cowardice at
taking that one last step (at least that is my interpretation).  His is
the most interesting character in the film, ironically.  Helena
Bonham-Carter is her usual pouty character as Elizabeth.  Tom Hulce is
just a little too naughty-schoolboy-ish to play Henry Clerval.
     This interpretation does not always work, but at its best it is a
vital interpretation of the Shelley book.  I would have to give
Branagh's MARY SHELLEY'S FRANKENSTEIN a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     Previous film English language versions with the actor who played
the creature:
   - FRANKENSTEIN (1910)--Charles Ogle
   - LIFE WITHOUT SOUL (1915)--Percy Darrell Standing (I have not seen
     it)
   - FRANKENSTEIN (1931)--Boris Karloff
   - CURSE OF FRANKENSTEIN (1957)--Christopher Lee
   - HORROR OF FRANKENSTEIN (1970)--David Prowse
   - FRANKENSTEIN (1972)--Bo Svenson
   - FRANKENSTEIN: THE TRUE STORY (1974)--Michael Sarazan
   - ANDY WARHOL'S FRANKENSTEIN (1974)--Carlo Mancini
   - VICTOR FRANKENSTEIN (a.k.a TERROR OF FRANKENSTEIN) (1975)--Per
     Oscarsen
   - FRANKENSTEIN (1984)--David Warner
   - FRANKENSTEIN (1993)--Randy Quaid

Title
Review for Kaze no na wa amunejia (1993)
     It is San Francisco some time in the 1990s.  The human race has
somehow been reduced to a brutal, animalistic state.  The cities are
full of animal-people looking for what food they can find.  One unnamed
wanderer about twenty years old seems still have his mental faculties.
He encounters the mysterious Sophia who also seems to be immune to the
mindlessness.  The wanderer remembers living in Arizona when a strange
wind came blowing across the land.  The wind seems to have blown away
the memories and minds of everybody.  Humans become snarling animals.
The big take from the small, the strong take from the weak.  Most
victimized are children.
     The wanderer tells Sophia that he remembers the coming of the wind
and the loss of all his intelligence and memory.  He remembers fighting
to wrest sausages from some young children.  Then he stumbled onto a
government defense facility where a dying scientist, Johnny, had been
working on memory enhancement.  He is able to restore the wanderer's
ability to remember and even some of the memory.  But Johnny dies
shortly after the wanderer finds him.  Sophia listens to the wanderer's
story and dubs him Wataru, literally the wanderer.  Wataru and Sophia
set off on a road trip to see the country and the devastation that has
resulted from the amnesia.  Meanwhile we see what they so not, that
government satellites are tracking their progress.
     The story naturally breaks into episodes, but after the opening in
San Francisco there is one episode in Los Angeles and one in the
desert, perhaps Utah.  Suddenly our characters are on the East Coast.
One scene is in front of a pillared building, perhaps Washington, and
then New York.  It feels like there should be more episodes as they
come across the country.  We are not cheated of the climactic fight,
but we are cheated of a lot of understanding of why the battle is being
fought and what is going on.  The filmmakers had some impressive scenes
that they wanted to include but they did not care to sweat the details
that would have made this a real story.  Instead it is just a
collection of related incidents.  This problem is not uncommon in
Japanese animated films.
     The biggest problem with the plot is that it raises so many
questions and then answers so few of them.  Who brought the wind?  Why
did they do it? How does it work?  How widespread are the effects?  Is
there a cure?  How long will it last?  Who is Sophia?  Why is she here?
Why is Wataru being tracked by the government?  To be a decent story
most if not all of these questions should have been answered in the
writer's mind.  Only one of those questions is answered and not really
very well.  At under ninety minutes the film does not seem to have time
for explanations.  Leaving so much unanswered should bother the
audience, but in the age of THE X-FILES the bar seems to have been
lowered on that expectation.
     General opinion is that the actual animation techniques in
Japanese animation is very good.  That very simply is not true.  It is
a lot better than bad Saturday morning animation.  I think what people
are responding to is not the animation techniques, which are primitive,
but the art direction which actually is quite nice, though it does not
stand out from other anime films.
     A WIND NAMED AMNESIA has really only one good idea and it is used
up in the first fifteen minutes of the film and it still feels
incomplete.  Oddly, the song over the end-credits begins in Japanese
and then lapses into English. I rate it a 5 on the 0 to 10 scale and a
low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Suspect (1987)
     Detective novels tend to have the detective who goes out on his own to
solve a crime.  That works find in books because the author can say in text
what the detective is thinking.  And what the detective is thinking is
important to the plot.  In film you usually are told what the detective is
thinking in one of two ways.  Voice-over first-person narration was popular
in the 1940s detective films.  It may even have become cliche.  (A comedy
currently running on cable called EAT AND RUN would be the final coffin nail
for the voice-over if it was any better known.)  The other approach is to
send someone around with the detective who may or may not be a detective
also.  Holmes had Watson, Smith had Petrie, Chan had Number One Son, Nick
had Nora.  The more interesting the relationship, the better.
     SUSPECT is a mystery/courtroom drama worthy of the old PERRY MASON
show, but the gimmick is that the detective pair cannot be seen together.
Kathleen Riley (played by Cher) is a public defender appointed to the case
of a derelict accused of murder.  Eddie Sanger (played by Dennis Quaid) is a
juror with a quick and logical mind who finds he is better at defending the
derelict that Riley is.  Sanger has sufficient has sufficient reason to
disqualify himself as a juror and have a substitute replace him, just as
would happen if he had appendicitis.  That would free him to help defend the
charged man, which is clearly where his heart is.  But that would mean there
would be no story here.  Instead he and Riley sneak around and she agonizes
over the ethics of the situation.
     The narrative line of SUSPECT is a little unusual.  It begins with four
widely separated plot strands that take a little while to wind together.  So
the opening is, perhaps, confusing or intriguing, depending on your point of
view.  There is a completely extraneous subplot of Sanger lobbying for dairy
price supports on Capitol Hill, which broadens his character a little but
could easily have been trimmed from this unusually long film.  The final
scene of the film, intended to lighten the proceedings, is miscalculated and
is out of character for the serious lawyer Cher plays.
     Cher is supposed to be a competent lawyer in an unusual role for her.
She does better by the role than does the scriptwriter, who has her overlook
some very basic aspects of the evidence, leaving Sanger to point them out to
her.  Along those lines, this is the third film I have seen in about a month
in which a defense lawyer unexpectedly tosses an object to a defendant to
establish left- or right-handedness.  Quaid adds another boyish-enthusiasm
role to a filmography already stocked with them.  Joseph Mantegna, who did
such a superb job in HOUSE OF GAMES is on hand in a less noticeable role as
the prosecuting attorney.
     SUSPECT has a reasonably good plot and some acceptable acting, but some
minor script problems.  Rate it a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Insider, The (1999)
     I read the NEW YORKER magazine and I enjoy some of their really
in-depth articles about some incident.  They will take some incident
like the investigation of a mysterious plane crash and tell you what
happened in detail.  It becomes a real education in what agencies get
involved and how theories are suggested, and what kind of pressure the
investigators are under, and just about any other aspect you can think
of.  Frequently I get the feeling that the article sounded exciting,
but I am being told in more detail than I really wanted to know.  Often
I get to the middle of a story and say, OK, it sounded good but I now
have invested more time than I am willing to spend on this subject.
Film is a different medium.  It is a visual medium.  That slows down
the telling of stories much more than people realize.  I frequently am
surprised to find out how short a film script is and how much of the
pages are empty space.  The magazine article and the film script are
two very different media.  THE INSIDER is a film adaptation of the
Vanity Fair article "The Man Who Knew Too Much" by Marie Brenner.  It
is too much an adaptation of a magazine article slowed to the pace of a
film.  It really verges on being tedious at least at times.
     For years the seven big companies knew that they dealt in an
addictive drug that caused a host of unhealthy side-effects.  But they
pretended for the public that it was unproven and they did not really
believe it.  The business was incredibly profitable and the proceeds
translated into the political power to squelch and discredit any
political movements against big tobacco.  The tide turned when a former
vice-president of one of the companies was convinced by the CBS 60
Minutes News team to tell the public how much the tobacco companies
really knew about the health effects of smoking.  The resulting
pressure to stop the story created a small civil war at CBS.  Who were
the major people involved, what were their motives, how was the story
almost killed, how did it get aired anyway?  That is the story covered
in surprising detail by THE INSIDER.  This all could have been
enthralling, but it is not the sort of thing that a stylist like
Michael Mann would be likely to do well.  And in the end, he failed.
To make a long story short, the film needed a director who knew how to
make a long story short.
     The film opens with the CBS 60 Minutes team in Iran with the
assignment to interview a terrorist.  We get a taste for their personal
style and how they get the upper hand.  They go from being one newsman
blindfolded at the hands of the terrorists to the actual interview with
Mike Wallace (played by Christopher Plummer). There the news team under
producer Lowell Bergman (Al Pacino) are ordering around the terrorists
and getting away with it.  This seems to have nothing to do with the
main line of the story, but later when the tobacco industry is so much
harder to manipulate than committed terrorists, we have a wry irony on
who really has clout in the world.  Terrorists can grab the headlines,
but the tobacco companies have the real position of power.
     Incongruously intercut with the Iran interview sequence we see
Jeffrey Wigand (Russell Crowe) dejectedly returning from work to his
home.  We discover that he has been fired and his career brought to a
complete halt unexpectedly.  He had been a very profitably rewarded
vice-president in charge or research and development at Brown and
Williams Tobacco; now he was unemployed and needed money to support his
family.  Rather than support him his wife Liane (Diane Venora) demands
of him what are they supposed to do for income.  Meanwhile the 60
Minutes team trying to do a story on fires started by cigarettes have
obtained some data they do not understand.  They offer Wigand $12,000
just to interpret the data.  Wigand's severance agreement swears him to
secrecy about anything he knows about tobacco dealings, but he is
reluctantly he stretches the severance terms.  He is willing to read
some documents from another tobacco company and interpret them for
Bergman.  In spite of the secrecy, Wigand's former employers seem
immediately to know Wigand is talking to 60 Minutes and he is warned
off by former boss Thomas Sandefur played Michael Gambon in an all too
brief but deliciously sinister role.  And so the game begins.  Wigand
is irate at his negative treatment for what he still considered
continued to be loyalty to his agreement and his former employer.
Meanwhile someone is playing very rough with Wigand and his family.
     The film examines Wigand and the pressures placed on his family as
they are caught between two powerful giants.  Wigand has always wanted
to make tobacco safer and has natural sympathies with getting the story
out.  He and his family are assaulted psychologically and financially
by the giant tobacco industry that had never lost a legal fight.  Al
Pacino is given top billing but the Wigand family is the core of THE
INSIDER.
     The story is told slowly and in just a bit too much meticulous
detail.  The film is 157 minutes and is an extremely demanding film for
the audience.  The musical score by Pieter Bourke, Lisa Gerrard, and
Graeme Revell is one of the worst in recent memory.  It puts ominous
chords under some scenes and using voice in ways that become a
distraction that gets in the way of the storytelling.  Also disturbing
is the casting of Christopher Plummer as Mike Wallace.  Plummer and
Wallace are such different types and Wallace is too well-known for even
so good an actor as Plummer to play him convincingly.
     This film might have been a really engaging experience under
another director's control.  Michael Mann was the wrong person to helm
this film and THE INSIDER lacks intensity because of his style.  I rate
it a 4 on the 0 to 10 scale and a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Much Ado About Nothing (1993)
[Take note--this review was posted on April Fools' Day! -Moderator]
     With the coming of April, I felt it would be nice to see a
warm-weather sort of movie and the video release of MUCH ADO ABOUT
NOTHING seemed about right.  The title makes it sound as if it is a
carefree sort of film.  WRONG!  What we have is a particularly vicious
exercise in political correctness and anachronism.  What this film
gives us is almost two hours of tiresome lecture on how wise and good
women are and how stupid, gullible, and vicious men are.  The story is
set in some historical never-never land.  The film never even bothers
to tell us exactly when.  Even CONAN THE BARBARIAN, itself set in a
historical never-never land, at least gives you some context as to when
to place it.  But the two films have similar approaches, at least in
their polyglot cultures.  MUCH ADO ABOUT NOTHING seems to be set mostly
in Italy, maybe late 13th Century, but we have Spanish names
indiscriminately mixed into this witch's brew.  In any case, it does
not matter.  The characters and their attitudes are all 1990s, or at
least how somebody sees the 1990s.
     I knew I was in trouble from the very beginning when the film
opened with a song about how faithless and useless men are.  That would
be bad enough, but director Kenneth Branagh puts the words on the
screen and all but puts a bouncing ball with them.  So the whole
audience is reading as well as hearing his sexist diatribe against
men.  The song is sung by Beatrice, the hero of the piece.  (But not
the Hero of the piece.  A rather insipid female character is given the
name Hero.  I am surprised Beatrice is given a name like "Beatrice"
rather than "Sisterhood" or just "Woman." Perhaps the name conjured up
some picture of women beating men.)  Beatrice hates all men, for good
reason no doubt.  At the beginning of the film she is haranguing
against Benedick, who has been off to some war, risking his life for
people like Beatrice.  But her hatred is still strong.  (It's as if she
is saying, "Women, take note.  Do not let absence soften your heart.
Always remember who the Enemy is.  Your country will lie to you about
who your enemies are.  Just remember the real foe is Man.")
     What follows is intended to be a comic mix-up of treachery.  There
is a good schemer and a bad schemer.  The good schemer is case in
anachronistic black.  (Denzel Washington is good, but he is not
convincing as a medieval Spaniard.  I suppose, though, that one must be
politically correct in one's casting.)  The evil schemer is played by
Keanu Reeves, whose acting is the dramatic equivalent of the sound
"thud."  His scheme is to prevent a marriage from taking place and for
this he is branded the villain of the piece.  Little mention is made of
Beatrice's own scheme.  As the film wears on, Beatrice has softened on
Benedick but now hates Claudio.  She gives Benedick the task that if he
loves her (oh, he now loves her for some reason) he should kill
Claudio.  That is on the pretext that Claudio has caused Hero's death,
but Beatrice knows it is not true.  She merely wants to see Benedick
kill Claudio.  The film never says that Beatrice, trying to arrange
murder on what she knows is a false pretense, is doing a bad thing.
The victim, after all, is only a man.  If women murder innocent men,
well, all men are guilty of something or other--maybe for being
"potential rapists."  "Men are deceivers ever," as Beatrice says.  It
is open season on killing them, ladies.  That seems to be the theme of
this rather odious piece of cinema.  And what about the law?  Well,
here the law is represented by Dogberry (Michael Keaton) and he comes
off as being even less than human.  This film is one diatribe against
men after another.
     The photography of Italy is very nice when it does not have some
jerk of a man dancing in a fountain.  (I have never seen a man dance in
a fountain--but the director wants to make men seem a trifle flighty
along with all their other failings.)  The screenplay is by William
Shakespeare, more than likely the pen name for some woman who has been
spending her time in feminist bookstores.  Rating: -2 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Extraordinary Visitor (1998)
     CAPSULE: John the Baptist is sent from Heaven to see is the world
is worth saving.  He must find some sign of hope in the people of
Newfoundland.  This is little more than a TV skit in movie form.  It is
watchable and apparently will be released to theaters in Canada, but it
is unlikely to be seen on the international market.  It is diverting
but hardly a serious piece of cinema.  Rating: 4 (0 to 10), 0 (-4 to
+4) Minor spoilers in this review.
   - Written and directed by John W. Doyle.
   - John the Baptist sent to St. John, Newfoundland.  Gets an
     invitation to live with a family.  That extraordinary hospitality
     for some reason does not count as a reason for hope.
   - Script has a lot of holes.
   - Friend who adopts John is surprisingly militant and is planning
     actions to destabilize Wall Street.
   - John does look Middle Eastern, but somehow one expects John the
     Baptist to be more dramatic.
   - There is a conspiracy in the Vatican riding on the result of the
     visit, though that result seems small compared to the end of the
     world.
   - Big yucks like seeing a nun give the Pope a pedicure and evil
     Pope's aid praying to a Mendes goat.
   - In large part a satire of life in Newfoundland taking licks at
     things like the poor produce.  The one good tomato in grocery (by
     virtue of a miracle) "must have fallen off the truck to Toronto."
   - Based on a 20-minute short film.

Title
Review for See You in the Morning (1989)
          Capsule review:  At last we are starting to see three-
     dimensional people with genuine problems returning to films.
     SEE YOU IN THE MORNING overcomes some narrative problems to
     tell a believable slice-of-life story.  Rating: low +2.
     Fifteen years ago there were a lot of films like SEE YOU IN THE
MORNING.  Three years ago it was much more of a rarity, at least from United
States films.  Now, knock wood, we are starting to see a few more films from
the American film industry that admit there are problems in life that cannot
be solved by a karate kick, by a machine gun, or by winning the big race or
a dance competition.  I have to admit to being partial toward the former
sort of film since none of my problems ever seem amenable to the latter
sorts of solutions.  SEE YOU IN THE MORNING is about re-marriage--not
actually one of my problems, thank God.  It is about the strains that
frustrate second marriages.  The principal characters here are not real
people--the widow of a famous concert pianist, the ex-husband of a famous
covergirl--but they are real-ish.
     The story is somewhat convoluted.  It begins by showing two marriages
with problems starting, then jumps forward three years to when Beth, the
wife from one marriage, is marrying Larry, the husband from the other.  Then
for 45 minutes or so flashbacks fill the audience in on the interim, then
the film continues linearly.  This disorients the viewer, who is not always
sure when a scene is taking place.  Larry meets Beth at a party and
discovers all they have in common.  To start with, they each have a
headache.  About a third of the film is spent showing how Larry courts Beth,
as often as not with cockeyed stunts.  Then the film gets down to the
serious question of whether a man can be grafted onto a family that has lost
a father.  We see this question from almost every aspect and angle, making
one wonder if writer/director Alan Pakula has not actually been through it
all.  We see the jealousy of the previous spouses, we see how the children
react to the step-father, we see the half-hidden urge to return to former
spouses.  While some of the stunts early on seem a little stagey, for most
of the film the characters behave in very human ways.  You see warm human
moments, and cold spiteful ones.
     Larry, a successful psychiatrist played by Jeff Bridges, does his
earnest best to overcome rejection by his second family.  Not everything
works for him the way it does in the movies.  He makes mistakes with the
best of intentions sometimes.  Alice Krige plays Beth.  She may be a little
glamorous as a photographer who gets offered trips to Russia and who always
looks like Candice Bergen at her best.  Around them are a collection of
people well-drawn and each unique.  This one is worth seeing.  I give it a
low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Twice Upon a Yesterday (1998)
     CAPSULE: The woman Victor loves is marrying another guy and his
job is going down the tubes.  Then two magical junkmen give Victor a
chance to relive the last eight months again and he tries to avoid the
same mistakes.  The characters are tiresome and familiar.  Rating: 4 (0
to 10), 0 (-4 to +4)
   - First feature film by Maria Ripoll.
   - Plot concept similar to GROUNDHOG DAY or upcoming TV series SEVEN
     DAYS.  Victor (Douglas Henshall) has really screwed up the last
     eight months of his life.  But he has been given another chance
     not to lose Sylvia (Lena Headey) the woman he loves.  He finds
     things harder than he expected and requiring more than just good
     intentions.
   - Two mysterious Spanish junk men have the ability to send him back
     in time and allow Vic to relive the past eight months and not to
     hurt Sylvia.
   - Elizabeth McGovern in a small role as a bartender whose wisdom
     inspires Vic.
   - All these young romantic films seem to have some nudity to keep
     the audience titillated.  It is unnecessary for this story, but
     expected.
   - Vic is not very smart in how he uses his memories of the first
     time around.  He says things that would make no sense to anyone
     but himself and the audience, convincing people that he is not all
     there.
   - This film makes London look really, really ugly.  The capper is
     walls with signs saying "Please do not piss here."
   - Title chosen to be intriguing, but has to be forced into the film.
   - Interesting in what can be changed and what cannot.
   - Vic is not very likeable.  He slashes tires and in general is just
     not very appealing.  It makes the audience not care if he gets the
     woman he wants or not.

Title
Review for Fly II, The (1989)
[This seems to be the day for "bug" reviews! -Moderator]
     In 1958 Twentieth Century Fox released THE FLY, based on the story of
the same name that had appeared the year before in PLAYBOY.  As they would
later do with STAR WARS, they assumed that THE FLY would be a quick summer
film for the kids and would soon be forgotten.  Instead it was their top
moneymaker of the year.  Later they made the first of two sequels, RETURN OF
THE FLY, about the son of the tragic hero of the first film also being
transformed.  Three years ago Mel Brooks' Brooksfilm production company and
Fox made a non-remake remake of THE FLY, directed by David Cronenberg.  It
was successful so with the inevitability of history repeating itself,
Brooksfilm and Fox have made a sequel about a son following in all six of
his father's footsteps.  Since RETURN OF THE FLY was already used and PUPA
OF THE FLY is hard to say, they have called it THE FLY II.
     Technically this is not a teenage sequel since Martin Brundle (played
by Eric Stoltz wearing more makeup than he did in MASK) grows up very
quickly and only looks, sounds, and acts like a teenager.  He is really only
five years old, but a *very mature* five years old.  In fact, he is not only
mature enough to have a sophisticated adult relationship, including sex,
with a woman who cannot tell she is making love to a five-year-old (Beth
Logan, played by Daphne Zuniga), little Brundle has also become a computer
hacker and genetic scientist par excellence.  This prodigious brilliance is
apparently the result of a skillful blending of the genes of a brilliant
scientist, a science magazine writer, and a horsefly.  He also seems to have
inherited a love of dogs from his insect parentage.  (Dogs are very nice to
flies and often make them dinner.)  Now suddenly, after five years of at
least looking normal, Martin is being taken over by the fly genes he
inherited.  Of course, his genes seem to be all he was allowed to inherit as
he is unknowingly kept prisoner by Bartok Industries, which in Martin's
father's day seemed to have a very nice "hands off" policy on their workers'
efforts, but which in the intervening five years has become Cruelty,
Incorporated, performing vicious experiments on animals and ignoring the
human rights of their employees.  Yes, we have a genuine teenage sequel with
sensitive, smart teens (one of whom is only five years old) and nasty,
stupid, vicious adults.
     Like THE FLY I, THE FLY II is a somber dark film, literally and
figuratively.  Like THE FLY I, it has one or two ideas mixed in with liberal
doses of balderdash.  You can also see more of anything that went over big
in the first film.  There are lots of gore effects.  Little Fly seems to
have his father's habit of shattering his way straight through panes of
glass.  And in the grand tradition of sequels, the main continuing character
was one of the least interesting characters in the original.  In this case
it is Stethis, the publisher, played by John Getz.  Admittedly we do get
flashes of Martin's two human parents.  (The actor who played the fly parent
tragically died before the sequel was made, if I know my entomology.)  A
Gina-Davis-non-lookalike we see scream on an operating table and die.  We do
actually see a tape of Jeff Goldblum as Seth Brundle, claiming he designed
the transporter/reconstructor to be "creative" in the way it rebuilds
things.  "Creative."  That was the word he used.  Right!  Oh, and there is
an in-joke.  One of the characters is reading THE SHAPE OF RAGE, a study of
the films of David Cronenberg, the director of THE FLY I.
     This is one of those films you can tell is in trouble just by reading
the credits.  Four people worked on the script--always a bad sign, and even
worse since two have the same last name.  Then there is the fact that the
special effects were created and designed by Chris Walas, Inc.  Why does
that sound bad?  Because the film was directed by Chris Walas, that's why.
     The science of THE FLY II could have been interesting, combining
aspects of modern genetics and computer science.  The plot involves both
gene splicing and the first reference I have seen on the screen to computer
worms.  But the science is bad and uses dramatic license rather than any
knowledge of the field.  The science is tailored to the plot and the special
effects rather than the reverse.  The creature that Martin mutates into has
little to do with a human or a fly.  And then the idea that the fly genes
would save all their disfiguring effects until Martin is grown up seems
absurd, and the idea that the fly DNA and the human DNA would combine for a
viable (living) creature is a little hard to believe.
     All told, this is a disappointing sequel to Cronenberg's THE FLY.  Rate
it a -1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for American Psycho (2000)
     It would seem that Ed Gein has inspired yet another film.  The
real Ed Gein was a retired Wisconsin farmer who in November 1957 was
discovered to be a serial killer.  He made a hobby of killing at least
fifteen women and eating or playing with the parts including wearing
the skin of his mother.  His crimes were the inspiration for the films
PSYCHO, THE TEXAS CHAINSAW MASSACRE, and now AMERICAN PSYCHO.  To date
almost all serial killers have been portrayed on the screen as being
lower class or at best lower middle class.  AMERICAN PSYCHO asks, "What
if such a person were in Wall Street's high-earning elite?"  For the
purpose of satire, Bret Easton Ellis's controversial novel looked at a
wealthy young financier at a serial killer.  The intent is not so much
horror but as a satirical view into the lives of the rich, successful,
and vacuous.  Canadian Mary Harron, who scripted and directed I SHOT
ANDY WARHOL, has scripted and directed AMERICAN PSYCHO based on the
Ellis novel.
     As Patrick Bateman (Christian Bale) readily admits to himself and
to the audience, he is empty.  Patrick Bateman is in most senses just
"not here."  Nobody greatly notices.  Bateman is one of a set of nearly
identical vice-presidents of a Wall Street financial firm.  He makes a
salary that is at least six figures and probably more.  He wears the
perfect suits, he eats in the best restaurants, and he comes close to
having the perfect business cards, though this is a field of great
competition among the vice-presidents.  Like the other vice-presidents
he does everything so perfectly that they are really impossible to
differentiate him from the others and themselves have problems telling
each other apart.  Bateman's one distinguishing characteristic is his
hobby of sado-masochism and murder.  If Patrick Bateman really did
inhabit his body he might have some feelings about the killing, but as
he sees himself as an empty shell he might as well enjoy the momentary
respite from total monotonous boredom.
     Much of the film is just a view into the wealthy lifestyle with
people who feel no human emotion but greed.  They go to absurd lengths
to get reservations at the finest restaurants but will return only to
those whose bathrooms that have the best facilities for snorting
cocaine.  Bateman takes the luxury a step further with a home gymnasium
where he can exercise to the strains of THE TEXAS CHAINSAW MASSACRE and
pornographic movies.  Every once in a while he will do in a homeless
beggar or a co-worker.  At work he seems to do little real work beside
tell his secretary (Chloe Sevigny, Oscar-nominated for BOYS DON'T CRY)
what to wear.  He has a fiancee (Reese Witherspoon) and a mistress
(Samantha Mathis).  Both are very spacey though it is a little harder
to tell with the fiancee since her condition does not come from
chemicals.
     Christian Bale plays his role cool, making seamless shifts from
dapper to ripper.  But he seems really to enjoy his hobby of killing.
Reese Witherspoon has just a small part, but now every role she takes
reminds me of the high school prig she played in ELECTION.  Willem
Dafoe plays a police detective is the traditions of Columbo.
     It is curious how this film echoes other recent films.  Bateman's
descent from the rich and stylish into his netherworld of violence
resonates with a similar descent in EYES WIDE SHUT.  In this film
Bateman readily tells people that his hobby is murder, but people just
do not connect with him as we saw in GROSSE POINT BLANK and THE SIXTH
SENSE.  Bateman's money seems to go into entertainment gadgets, not
unlike the people we saw in BOILER ROOM.  One could even say that
Bateman's secret anti-social actions resound with THE FIGHT CLUB.
This is a film that makes a sharp, strong, but surprisingly simple
statement.  But perhaps the one statement is less than we should expect
for a feature-length film.  I rate this a 6 on the 0 to 10 scale and a
+1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Return of the Killer Tomatoes! (1988)
RETURN OF THE KILLER TOMATOES: I think pretty much everybody knows that a
sequel to a cult film cannot be as good.  Of all the films that have tried
to imitate ROCKY HORROR PICTURE SHOW's success the real sequel, SHOCK
TREATMENT, is one of the lamest.  RETURN OF THE KILLER TOMATOES fits the
principle on a technicality.  It is, to all intents and purposes, not a
sequel.  A mad scientist is creating imitation humans and he makes them from
tomatoes.  If he made them from mushrooms or turnips the film would have a
much smaller audience.  Stylistically, RETURN is very different from the
original in a lot of ways, not the least of which is that it is often a lot
funnier.  Among other things it takes a funny and well-deserved swipe at
product placement and another one at RAMBO.  This film isn't LION IN WINTER
but considering it is a low-budget sequel to a not-very-funny spoof of
horror films, RETURN OF THE KILLER TOMATOES surely beats the point spread.
Rate it a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.
DEVIL GIRL FROM MARS: In spite of its title, this film takes itself pretty
seriously.  several diverse odd characters are at an isolated Scottish inn.
Each has his own melodramatic problems when out of the sky pops a flying
saucer complete with an odd-looking alien woman and a powerful robot.  Her
mission is to kidnap a man and bring him back to Mars as breeding stock.
There is nothing like an alien woman with a deadly raygun and a menacing
robot to help earthlings get their lives in order.  Even making allowances
for the vintage, this film is an interesting historical artifact.
Stylistically much like STRANGER FROM VENUS, and a cut below MAN FROM PLANET
X.  Rate it a -1 on the -4 to +4 scale.
THE PROJECTIONIST:  This film covers 24 hours in the life of a movie theater
projectionist.  And nothing much happens to him.  "Dull stuff," you say?
Oddly enough, no.  See it--it is very worth seeing.  Our projectionist lives
in a series of fantasy worlds.  There is a fake fantasy world he creates for
his friends.  In it he has a desirable young woman who is very interested in
him.  Then there is his real fantasy world in which he is a costumed super-
hero.  Then there are little short films he creates for himself in his own
mind including two about the world of the future: one optimistic, one
pessimistic.  All this is in stark contrast to our hero's real life.  he
lives in a squalid little apartment and has to deal with an unreasonable
boss (Rodney Dangerfield in his first film role, apparently).  There are
some remarkable people working at the theater, but the boss sees them as
only cogs in a machine that makes money.  Chuck McCann plays the title role
and shows some versatility and breadth.  Rate it a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Great Balls of Fire! (1989)
          Capsule review:  A much fictionalized and glossed-over
     account of the first year of Jerry lee Lewis's musical
     popularity and his marriage to his 13-year-old cousin.  The
     film will be most remembered for Winona Ryder's performance.
     Rating: 0.
     Rock and roll biographies are popular, of course, since THE BUDDY HOLLY
STORY.  GREAT BALLS OF FIRE! promised to be a little different.  First of
all, this was going to be one rock biography that did not end in a snowy
plane crash.  In fact, it turned out to be quite different, but being
different did not make it better.  This is a film of uneven style, ranging
from occasional drama to musical comedy in the style of BYE, BYE, BIRDIE--
complete with production numbers.  The characters are flat and thin, and the
relationship to truth or even credibility is tangential at best.  Dennis
Quaid's wild high-energy mannerisms break new ground in his acting, but
surprisingly, newcomer Winona Ryder as his 13-year-old cousin and eventual
bride is more than a match for him in attracting audience attention.  It may
well be that Ryder is remembered for this film more than Quaid.
     The film is a *very* light treatment of Lewis's first year of popularity.
A bigamist and a troublemaker, Lewis comes to live and make music with his
uncle.  His vision is to take the wild Black music he heard as a child and
infuse it into rock and roll.  He is attracted to his young teenage cousin
who idolizes him and one thing leads to another.  At the same time, his
first recorded song is a stupendous success.  We have all the standard
cliched scenes, of course.  We have the suffering rock and roll star playing
someone else's idea of good music and failing, then playing his own style
and being really popular.  We have the unruly audience that is tamed by
hearing the hero's music.  One touch that is unusual is Lewis's conflict
with his famous evangelist cousin, Jimmy Swaggart.  But there is no
substance to the conflict besides Lewis first paying lip service to
Swaggart's pontifications, then finally openly defying them.
     But really jarring are the segues into musical production numbers, such
as a whole high school suddenly dancing to his music and doing cartwheels
(what is a 13-year-old doing in high school?).  Quaid supposedly wanted to
sing all the songs but apparently while he can flip his hair like Lewis, he
cannot do a passable imitation of Lewis's voice.  Lewis re-recorded his
songs for the soundtrack.
     Far more than LA BAMBA or THE BUDDY HOLLY STORY, this is a quickly
forgettable summer film.  I give it a flat 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Heaven & Earth (1993)
     Film critics seem to be asking themselves what went wrong with the
third film in Oliver Stone's Vietnam trilogy.  After two films they loved he
has failed in his third.  Frankly, I do not understand their reaction.  For
my money the other two films have much greater flaws than HEAVEN AND EARTH.
Perhaps because this film is told from the point of view of a Vietnamese, I
think it gives a much better view of what the war was all about.  For once
in a film that this was not a war in which just Americans were to blame,
there is plenty of blame to go around to all involved.  It is a powerful
view of the dilemmas faced by the Vietnamese people.  This true story has
the sweep of forty years of turbulent history filled with tragedy and
horror.
     When Le Ly (Hiep Thi Le) remembers her home when she was a little girl
she remembers it as the most beautiful village in the world.  And it
certainly appears to be.  We see an almost idyllic life of hard work and
spiritual joy.  Then the French come to Vietnam to fight a war, but it still
seems to affect the village little until some Vietcong come to recruit
soldiers.  Their simple appeal for national unity wins the sympathy of
village for Vietcong.  Against her father's wishes, Le Ly's mother sends her
two sons to fight with the Vietcong.  That sets into motion a course of
events that will shape the next forty years of Le Ly's life.  The South
Vietnamese army suspect Le Ly's family of sympathies with the North and
arrest and torture Le Ly in some extremely harrowing scenes.  Le Ly's mother
bribes the South Vietnamese officials to release Le Ly only to see her
arrested by the Vietcong for suspected complicity with the South.  The
Vietcong, she finds, are little if any better than the South Vietnamese
government.  A short stint as a servant in a rich household leaves her
pregnant and penniless, and she must turn to the streets of Da Nang to earn
her living.  Eventually she will fall in love with an American soldier who
will marry her and take her to California where her life's tragedies will
continue.  Perhaps there is where the critics are disliking the film since
the American household melodrama falls into cliche, but even there it is the
tragedy of the war that pursues her.
     HEAVEN AND EARTH is based on Le Ly Hayslip's two autobiographies WHEN
HEAVEN AND EARTH CHANGED PLACES and CHILD OF WAR, WOMAN OF PEACE.  It is
ironic that in this story of how a Vietnamese woman is exploited and abused,
Hiep Thi Le, who plays Le Ly and who must be on-screen for more than 90% of
the film gets only fourth billing.  Top billing goes to Tommy Lee Jones who
certainly does a fine job as Le Ly's disturbed husband, but it really is
Hiep Thi Le's film.  Second and third billing go to Joan Chen and Haing S.
Ngor as Le Ly's parents.
     The photography of the Vietnamese countryside is just spectacular
making Le Ly's claim of the most beautiful village believable.  Creative, if
gimmicky, camerawork is also used to show Le Ly's first reactions to her new
American home with its pandemonium from the family dogs and its huge
refrigerator stocked from a grocery aisle that looks like a fjord.  The
score by the Japanese composer Kitaro is a little overpowering at times, but
the music by itself is actually quite good.
     There are definitely unexpected touches in the script.  Late in the
film Le Ly herself gives in to a Buddhist belief in not challenging fate but
just going with it, yet clearly the film shows her agony at being buffeted
by fate without fighting it.  Each time she does take a step to fight her
apparent fate she gains a new set of problems but each time they seems less
painful than the situation she is escaping.  When she returns to the village
at the end of the film, she is deciding it may have been better to submit to
fate, but it is clear that she has improved her state a great deal in some
ways over what it would have been had she stayed in the village.  It is
almost as if Stone--who wrote the screenplay as well as directed--is subtly
arguing with the real Le Ly.  It is clear also that Stone does not care so
much for the Buddhist priests that Le Ly goes to for advice casting at least
one as a charlatan.
     Overall I found this story moving and at times wrenching.  In spite of
some negative reactions by some of the critics I think that Oliver Stone has
made his best film about Vietnam.  I give it a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Return of the Living Dead Part II (1988)
          Capsule review:  Entertaining but unimaginative
     retelling of RETURN OF THE LIVING DEAD with younger
     protagonists.  An occasional clever joke but in general a
     degradation of this branch of the series.  Rating: 0.
     1. And now let us speak of the generations of the Living Dead.  Now
Richard Matheson was mindful of the popularity of vampires that stretcheth
back to Dracula and yes, even unto Varney.  And he said, "I shall make me a
modern vampire story."  And he took unto himself a typewriter and there was
born a writing called I AM LEGEND.  And the fans looked upon I AM LEGEND and
they dubbed it pretty good.
     2. Now I AM LEGEND begat three films in degrees that varieth.  And
their names are INVISIBLE INVADERS, THE LAST MAN ON EARTH, and THE OMEGA
MAN.  The two younger admitted their parentage, but not the oldest.  The two
older were meager of budget, but not the youngest.  But it was the middle
one, THE LAST MAN ON EARTH, than became the father of generations.  It
starred Vincent Price and was made in the distant land of Italy.
     3. And it came to pass that in the land of Pittsburgh there dwelt a
lowly maker of television commercials.  And his name was George Romero.  And
Romero looked upon THE LAST MAN ON EARTH and sayeth unto himself, "Now there
is how to make a horror movie for few pieces of silver."  And he spake unto
John Russo, saying, "Write me a script."  And in the fullness of time there
was NIGHT OF THE LIVING DEAD.
     4. But NIGHT OF THE LIVING DEAD was poor of prospect and none had heard
of it and fewer cared.  And it played only at theaters with big screens and
no walls.
     5. And Roger Ebert looked upon it and his eye was offended.  And he
took unto himself a typewriter and spake unto legions of his anger, a very
grievous error.  And the READERS' DIGEST was among the legions who heard his
lamentations and repeated his words unto hosts.  And the hosts repeated the
words unto multitudes.
     6. And NIGHT OF THE LIVING DEAD prospered.  And John Russo took unto
himself a typewriter and wrote the novel of the film.
     7. And in the fullness of time George Romero saw that there were
multitudes who were mindful of NIGHT OF THE LIVING DEAD and he made DAWN OF
THE DEAD.  And in the land of Italy DAWN OF THE DEAD was known by the name
of ZOMBIE and multitudes had audience with it.
     8. And Lucio Fulci said, "Here is how to make a film for not many
pieces of silver but which will call forth legions."  And he made ZOMBIE II.
And in the land of America there had been no ZOMBIE I, so there ZOMBIE II
was called ZOMBIE.  And in the lands of Italy and America there were legions
of filmmakers who looked upon the prosperity.  And they had envy of
audiences of multitudes and of the smallness of the investment.  And many
made films like unto what they had seen.
     9. And John Russo looked upon the storm and lo he was wonderly wroth.
Had he not written the writing of NIGHT OF THE LIVING DEAD?  And the courts
said, yes, he did.  And lo, did this not mean he could also make sequels?
But Romero said no, he knew whereof he wanted the series to go.  But the
courts spake unto Romero, saying "Give unto Russo equal right."  And he did.
     10. And John Russo took unto himself a typewriter and wrote a book
called RETURN OF THE LIVING DEAD.  And in the fullness of time he made him a
film called RETURN OF THE LIVING DEAD, though it were not in the likeness of
the book.
     11. And George Romero made a third "Living Dead" film, DAY OF THE DEAD.
And it was released in a short span of days from RETURN OF THE LIVING DEAD.
And audiences looked upon RETURN OF THE LIVING DEAD and many were well
pleased.  But when audiences looked upon George Romero's DAY OF THE DEAD,
many said that his day was done.
     12. And John Russo was well used to writing novels from "Living Dead"
films.  And, yea, it came to pass that he wrote a novel of the film RETURN
OF THE LIVING DEAD and called it RETURN OF THE LIVING DEAD.  And some fans
and librarians were wonderly wroth and spake in anger, saying, "One author
cannot write two entirely different novels and give them but one title.  For
lo, many libraries are geared to the principle that if two novels have but
one author they will have different titles.  And if two novels have but one
title they will have different authors."  But John Russo turned his face
from these people.  And, in truth, few libraries had either book.
     13. And it came to pass that RETURN OF THE LIVING DEAD was popular unto
its generation and it begat RETURN OF THE LIVING DEAD II.
     14. Let us speak now of RETURN OF THE LIVING DEAD II and so that the
ear of the mind not become weary, let us lapse into modern English.
     RETURN OF THE LIVING DEAD II is a bit like RETURN OF THE LIVING DEAD--
JUNIOR EDITION.  The story has been scaled sown so that two teens and one
pre-teen can be the heroes.
     Jesse Wilson (played by Michael Kenworthy) is bullied by the older kids
in the neighborhood.  Chased by two big kids, he runs across a lost,
hermetically sealed canister containing a living dead corpse.  It is assumed
you know from the previous film that the military has packed corpses from a
nerve gas accident in these canisters and opening them will lead to a new
plague of zombies.  Now, Jesse knows  there are some things boy was not
meant to tamper with.  He is willing to leave the corpses alone, but his two
tormentors (of course) have all the sense that adults have in this film
(namely none).  Soon the cat's out of the bag, the corpse's out of the
canister, and a bunch more from a nearby graveyard are climbing for higher
ground.  The remaining story provides jolts but no surprises.
     The horror content of RETURN OF THE LIVING DEAD II is overly familiar;
the graveyard humor occasionally hits paydirt but not often enough.  To
further confuse matters, James Karen and Thom Mathews, who died in the
previous film but didn't realize it until hours later, reprise almost
identical roles with different character names and die again in just the
same way.
     The best way to make a sequel to a popular horror film is either to
tell a different story or to tell the same story but tell it more creatively
(as EVIL DEAD II and, to a lesser extent, NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREET III did).
RETURN OF THE LIVING DEAD II does neither but does succeed in putting its
tongue further in its cheek than its predecessor did.  For the few good gags
(and it spite of gross-out effects that give another sort of gags), rate it
a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Man for All Seasons, A (1988) (TV)
     I like film more than most people.  And I have seen a lot of films that
have deeply affected me, but my favorite film of all time is Fred
Zinnemann's 1966 A MAN FOR ALL SEASONS.  Back when I was in graduate school
I had the entire film on audiotape and would play it two or three times a
week.  It was the second film I had recorded on audiotape in a collection of
eventually hundreds.  It was the FIRST film I ever recorded on videotape to
keep.  Very well, I could never expect the new version to measure up.  I was
sure I would begrudge the film every minor variation from the original.
That expectation turned out to be wrong, but not by a whole lot.
     The plot and most of the dialogue are, of course, identical to the
Zinnemann version.  The first plus for the remake is that it follows very
closely the original stage play.  The original film rearranged things a
little.  For those who have not seen the 1966 version, you have my pity and
this plot synopsis.  A MAN FOR ALL SEASONS is Robert Bolt's play about the
results of Thomas More's choice of principle and integrity over all else.
More had an extremely nimble mind, a love of his king and close friend Henry
VIII, and a love of his religion, Catholicism.  These loves are perfectly
consistent until Henry decides to split from the Church and expects the
endorsement of the nobility.  Being asked to choose between his loves, More
decides to be officially neutral with full knowledge that the law should
protect his stand.  For the lack of one oath of support, Henry's agents make
war on More.  They have the power of the king; More has only the law and his
agile use of it to protect himself.
     For this version Charleton Heston both plays More and directs.  He
certainly has more name recognition than Paul Scofield, who played the role
in the Zinnemann version.  Scofield is better known for stage than for film.
Heston's dramatic talent and acting range lie somewhere between those of a
Scofield and those of, say, a Sylvester Stallone, and I would guess it lies
at just about the halfway point.  Heston has none of the frailty of
Scofield.  He has always overpowered his roles.  When More tells Henry that
he is sick to think how much his (More's) actions grieve Henry, Heston gives
the line as if it is a matter of form, as if he is playing chess.  The pain
in Scofield's delivery gives the line far more sincerity.  He is a friend
who has to hurt a friend and does not want to, while Heston's More is only
saying what is expected.  In one scene in the play, More breaks down and
cries.  Scofield lets his voice break up and then sobs.  He does it gently.
Heston contorts his face in agony.  He just cannot project gentle emotions
so he rarely uses them.
     One place where the remake should have been an improvement and
disappointingly was not was in the role of Wolsey.  Where Zinnemann had
Orson Welles, Heston had John Gielgud.  Both are good actors but I generally
would give the edge to Gielgud.  But not in this film.  When Heston faces
Gielgud, each knows his own lines but they are not playing off of each
other.  Talking about actions that will be taken against the Church, Wolsey
refers to "certain measures, perhaps regrettable, perhaps not," then noting
More's wry smile, "All right, regrettable."  Gielgud does not stop to see
the smile.  He runs the two lines together with no change of tone and there
is no wry smile.  It is a misdelivery and a better director than Heston
would have corrected it.
     Vanessa Redgrave, the only obvious actor to play in both versions goes
from playing a nubile Anne Boleyn to Alice, More's wife.  Wendy Hiller
played the role as an intelligent, willful woman who, when she calls herself
"a fool" clearly means it only in contrast to More.  Redgrave really plays
it as a fool--doughty, flutterly, and superficial, with just a hint of
something deeper behind the gestures.  Her interpretation is certainly a
valid one, but as with most interpretations of roles in the Heston version,
she is not as appealing as she was in the original film.
     All these criticisms are, of course, only contrasts to the original
film.  In its own right, the Heston version is an excellent film.  It is a
superb play done with a very good cast.  It raises the same issues as the
other version and has the same excellent writing.  There is little even an
indifferent filmmaker could have done to hurt the story.  In good conscience
I could not give the Heston film anything beneath a high +2.  To my mind,
however, the Best Picture of 1966 remains the best picture of all seasons.

Title
Review for Simple Plan, A (1998)
     Sam Raimi grew up a close friend of the Coen Brothers.  All three
want into filmmaking.  The Coen Brothers specialized in crime films.
Raimi, focusing on a younger audience, made a variety of films, but he
was best known for his horror film trilogy, the EVIL DEAD films.  Now
Sam Raimi is moving into Coen brothers territory with a serious and
dark crime thriller set somewhere in the frozen North Central states in
the cold of winter.  The plot is a familiar one.  Three people have
come into a lot of money they must keep secret.  But three is a big
crowd when it comes to four and a half million dollars.  The setting is
like FARGO, and the basic situation is like THE TREASURE OF THE SIERRA
MADRE.  The plotting is like a serious version of the too-recent VERY
BAD THINGS, but serious makes all the difference.
     Scott B. Smith wrote the screenplay based on his own novel.  The
opening image of the film is a fox making a quick raid on a hen house,
snatching what it can get and running with it.  While that really is
the event that sets the plot in motion, the "grab what you can and run"
scene also sets the tone for what is to come.  In A SIMPLE PLAN Hank
(played by Bill Paxton) works in the feed and grain, but hopes his
college education will bring him something better for his wife Sarah
(Bridget Fonda) and the daughter he will have in a few days.  Sarah has
learned to accept Jacob, Hank's grungy brother (Billy Bob Thornton),
but not Jacob's redneck friend Lou (Brent Bisscoe).  Jacob and Lou
similarly are a bit contemptuous of Lou's comparatively manicured
existence.  Ordinarily these tensions would never be spoken, but events
are about to stress all the relationships.
     One frosty winter day Hank, Jacob, and Lou come upon a plane
crashed in the woods.  On board they find a dead pilot and a satchel
with 44,000 one hundred-dollar bills.  If all three people can
cooperate perfectly it should be no problem hanging onto the money.
Right?  But of course the presence of the money will test each of the
men's relationships with the others and Hank's relationship with Sarah.
Sarah, Jacob, and Lou each has a different idea of what to do with the
money and they do not all mesh.  Hank wants to wait until things die
down and then leave town.  Jacob sees the money as his opportunity to
buy back his father's farm and make it work again.  Lou is in unhealthy
debt and wants to pay off some loans and live high.  Hank will discover
entirely different people inside the skins of the people closest to
him.  And one of them is himself. As Sarah observes to Hank late in the
film, "Nobody would ever believe that you would be capable of doing
what you've done."  The plot is composed like a chain with each event
leading to the next and all lead to chaos.
     As in FARGO, the icy setting becomes a character in the film
itself.  These are people who are worn down from just fighting the
climate.  It casts a pall over the entire film.  Raimi accentuates the
gray of the weather by filming with muted, depressing colors.  A SIMPLE
PLAN is a compelling ride through an alien moral landscape.  While much
of the chaos that is the plot is predictable, some of the places the
plot takes us are quite unexpected.  I rate it 7 on the 0 to 10 scale
and a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Grifters, The (1990)
          Capsule review:  A lot of impressive names cooperated to
     create a surprisingly unimpressive film noir crime story.
     This film pulls its punches by throwing in absurdities at the
     wrong moment and has at least one surprisingly vicious scene.
     Rating: +1 (-4 to +4).
     A "grifter" is a con-man (nobody calls them "con-persons"), someone who
makes a living by fraud.  There are little cons and big cons.  A small con
will net pocket change and maybe a busted jaw.  A big con can net in the
millions and can get you killed.  Con men have been portrayed as likable in
THE FLIM FLAM MAN and THE STING.  They are seen with a kind of dark awe in
HOUSE OF GAMES.  Perhaps the most realistic view and by far one of the
dirtiest is in THE GRIFTERS, anew film with a superb pedigree that still
disappoints.  What is the pedigree?  It was a novel by Jim Thompson, a
crime-story writer who is only now, after his death, reaching his greatest
popularity.  The film adaptation of his AFTER DARK, MY SWEET is also in
current release.  Thompson also occasionally did screen work, co-scripting
one of the great films of all time, Kubrick's PATHS OF GLORY.  Thompson's
GRIFTERS was adapted for the screen by Donald Westlake, himself a popular
crime novelist and author of books such as BANK SHOT.  The film was produced
by Martin Scorsese, who directed film noir crime films such as MEAN STREETS
and TAXI DRIVER, and directed by Stephen Frears, who also directed MY
BEAUTIFUL LAUNDRETTE, SAMMY AND ROSIE GET LAID, and DANGEROUS LIAISONS.  As
close as it would be possible to have a spectacular film noir film, this is
it.  Still, this turns out to be just an adequate crime story, little more.
     The film concerns three grifters.  First there is 25-year-old Roy
Dillon (played limply by John Cusack).  Then there is his 39-year-old mother
Lily Dillon (played by the oddly mis-cast Anjelica Huston).  Unusually mis-
castings have a pretty person cast where someone grittier is needed.  Here
it may be the reverse.  Lily looks old enough to be Roy's mother.  The story
calls for her to be Roy's mother without looking it.  She is supposed to
look young and attractive, and while Ms. Huston really is the right age for
the role--she was born in 1952--she looks too old for the role and dressing
her in a sexy dress and stiletto heels does not do it.  The third vertex of
this dark triangle is Myra (played by Annette Bening), a bouncy young
grifter with a background for big grifts.  Often her bounces are out of her
clothes and onto a bed, particularly when big money is involved.  She wants
to partner up with Roy in more ways than one, but she and Lily are just too
similar and know too much about each other to get along.
     (I will try to avoid spoilers in what follows but there will be minor
spoilers.)
     What is wrong with this story?  Why is this only an adequate crime
story?  First, the plotting is less complex than you would expect.  You have
three devious characters and one would expect a really devious plot, but it
fails to materialize.  There are no big surprises in the plotting.  The
viewer never really feels grifted by the script.  Second, parts of this film
really do not make sense.  The climax of the film is contrived and if it is
not a physical impossibility, it is a very strong physical improbability.
In another incident, a bullet is fired and the police conclusion about the
incident seems completely inconsistent with what would have been the
trajectory of the bullet.  It is almost comical to imagine the incident as
the police must be picturing it to create the required trajectory.  While
the previous problem in physics is probably from the novel, the trajectory
problem seems to be Frears not thinking out the scene ahead of time and
could have been avoided.
     This is not a bad film, it just fails to  materialize into a very good
one.  The scenes that should carry the dramatic impact lose it because of
small absurdities.  In my opinion, this film has been over-rated.  It would
have made a decent black-and-white in the 1940s and it still is just about
that good.  My rating is +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Jurassic Park III (2001)
    CAPSULE: A short punchy action sequel to the two dinosaur 
    films made by Steven Spielberg.  Joe Johnston directs a 
    straightforward story of an excursion back to the island of the 
    dinosaurs.  It lets us see some new dinosaurs (is that an 
    oxymoron?) and gives us a nice and generally reasonably 
    written adventure.  The film is neither ambitious nor 
    pretentious.  I had a good time.  Rating: 7 (0 to 10), low +2 
    (-4 to +4) 
Here goes my credibility.  This is a film on which I expect to be 
in a minority.  I liked the third JURASSIC PARK film.  I even 
liked the second JURASSIC PARK film.  In a lot of ways JURASSIC 
PARK: THE LOST WORLD was a creative three-way braiding together of 
Michael Crichton's novel THE LOST WORLD, Arthur Conan Doyle's 
novel THE LOST WORLD, and the classic silent film version of the 
Doyle.  JP2 was an adventure, as Doyle said, "for the boy who's 
half man or the man who's half boy."  That is what all the 
JURASSIC PARK films are.  Expecting them to give the viewer 
insights into the human condition is like expecting your car to 
vacuum your house.  The classic adventure films like GUNGA DIN or 
KING SOLOMON'S MINES had under-written characters also. 
JURASSIC PARK III is an all out adventure on an island inhabited 
by dinosaurs.  The characters are a little more complex than they 
at first appear to be, and even that is a little more complex than 
I was expecting.  Some of the characters who start out looking 
stupid and useless prove to be neither as the film proceeds.  That 
degree of complexity combined with those very realistic looking 
dinosaur effects is just about as much as I require.  I feel I got 
my money's worth. 
The story opens with Eric (played by Trevor Morgan) and friend 
parasailing near the forbidden island of Isla Sorna off Costa 
Rica. This was the research island where the dinosaurs were 
created for the now defunct Jurassic Park.  They hope, no doubt, 
to get a look at the island's dinosaurs from a safe height.  The 
height is safe, but driving the boat in the water is not.  The two 
soon find themselves in trouble and have to ditch their parasail 
onto the island where they do indeed get a better look at the 
dinosaurs than they had intended. 
Flash to the United States and someone is offering to fund 
paleontologist Alan Grant (Sam Neill) in his research if he will 
go and fly over Isla Sorna and act as a guide.  He has said that 
no force on earth or heaven could get him back near real 
dinosaurs.  But again money convinces him to drop what he is doing 
and go.  Doing the convincing is a wealthy and eccentric couple 
(William H. Macy and Tea Leoni) who has been just about everywhere 
else in the world and wants the adventure of seeing real 
dinosaurs.  They too plan to see the island from a safe height 
Grant is relieved to learn.  He will fly over this island at a 
safe altitude just this once.  Right.  Guess what happens next? 
JP3 probably functions better as a sequel than JP2.  First it has 
Alan Grant and Ellie Sattler (Laura Dern) back rather than the 
much less appealing Ian Malcolm.  Sattler has a much smaller part 
in JP3, but is still present to tie this story to the first.  
Curiously each film seems to arrange to have a signature scene 
with characters holding on to some large metal object that is 
about to fall some great distance. 
One thing that does not quite fit with the earlier films is just 
as Grant discovers that raptors may be able to talk to each other, 
suddenly they seem to be doing it all the time.  They did not 
appear to be conversing in the previous films.  Of course, these 
raptors look a little different also, so perhaps they are a 
different related species.  Not only are they more intelligent 
than in the past films, they are also more sympathetic.  In this 
story they are not just killing machines, they have reasonable 
motives for what they do beyond nutrition.  This time around they 
may be a little too anthropomorphized. 
Each new film in the series introduces us to some new dinosaurs, 
of course.  In this film a major threat is from a spinosaurus, not 
as common or as popularly known as a Tyrannosaurus, but larger and 
presumably more nasty.  It has a crocodile's head and the body 
that looks like a dimetrodon walking upright. 
Perhaps as an economy measure or just to create a mood the visual 
effects team frequently obscures our view of the dinosaurs.  
Sometimes they just move too fast to see.  Occasionally darkness 
or fog obscures our vision.  A few times we get unconvincing matte 
shot, particularly of the laboratory.  But there is less money on 
the screen in terms of dinosaur effects than in the two previous 
films.  The musical score by Don Davis borrows heavily from John 
Williams's score for the first film.  Joe Johnston, who directs, 
already has to his credit two very good films I recommend THE 
ROCKETEER and OCTOBER SKY.  A team including Alexander Payne and 
Jim Taylor known for ELECTION writes the screenplay.  The film 
they have made is a long way from great cinema, but it still is 
fun.  If you get a thrill from seeing what look very much like 
live dinosaurs alive today, the film is for you.  I rate it a 7 on 
the 0 to 10 scale and a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale. 

Title
Review for Kyua (1997)
     CAPSULE: A series of killings, each by a different killer seems to
have elements in common.  One killer may be using mind control to avoid
being caught.  A Japanese film with an effective concept for a serial
killer who would rival Hannibal Lector.  Rating:  6 (0 to 10), high +1
(-4 to +4)  Spoiler warning: nearly any description of the premise will
be something of a spoiler.
   - Director is Kiyoshi Kurosawa has done many films in Japan, mostly
     crime films, but this is first international film.  It is a
     different idea and one that is likely to be copied, or would be if
     it were used in a film that got seen in this country.
   - There are a series of almost identical crimes, which would point
     to one killer, but in each case the killer is caught and it is a
     different person each time.
   - Atmospheric horror-mystery.  Reminiscent of FALLEN.
   - Subdued color which creates a mood as effectively as black and
     white.
   - Pace is a little slow at times due to some long and lingering
     camera shots.
   - Detective trying to piece thing together in spite of personal
     problems with a disturbed wife.
   - Complex film with many things going on at once.
   - Slow but effective horror film with deeper meanings about mind
     control.  Themes similar to THE MANCHURIAN CANDIDATE.

Title
Review for Twister (1996)
     "We sure been havin' a lot of weather lately."  It is a line from
an old comedy, somebody trying to make conversation.  But the last few
years that line seems to have taken on new meaning with record storms,
hurricanes, high temperatures, heavy snowfalls, and cold winters.  So
Amblin Entertainment (by way of Warner Brothers and Universal Pictures)
thought that the time was right to make a film about the most violent
weather they could.  And that, of course, is what they did.
     This is a sort of a monster movie in which the monster is not a
giant lizard but something a lot less tangible, but a lot more deadly-
-a sort of spirit of tornadoes.  Back in 1969 the monster came and took
Jo Harding's father, and Jo is going to have her vengeance on the
beast.  And, like with many monster movies, the film lives when the
monster is on the screen and the rest of the film is just waiting for
those scenes.  There are some good action sequences when that tornado
(or actually one of several tornadoes) is on the screen.  The rest of
the story is actively bad as a collection of warmed-over cliches from
other films.  In addition to the cliche of the vendetta that Jo has
against tornadoes, there a love triangle with Jo competing with
psychologist Melissa for the affections of Jo's soon-to-be-ex-husband
Bill.  Bill is himself a former tornado hunter, but now he has decided
to give all that excitement up and become a docile TV weatherman.  Jo
leads a whole group of idealistic young tornado hunters who will win
their victory against tornadoes if they can launch a homemade probe
into a raging cyclone.  Now you would think that a set of angry
tornadoes would be opponent enough.  But there is also a human enemy, a
team of evil tornado hunters who stole the idea of the probe from Bill
and have made their own with (gasp!) corporate funding.  And while the
good guys are a free-thinking ragtag lot who dress casually and chase
their tornadoes in mismatched cars and vans, the bad guys have their
own armada of vans--all black--they all dress in matching designer
outfits, and they steal their ideas and their plans from the idealists
every chance they get.  And to top it all they bask in television
publicity while the good guys are unsung in their heroics.  Each team
is set on wresting from tornadoes the secret that will let people
predict where a tornado will strike fifteen minutes in advance of the
hit rather than the current three minutes.  The good guys have to get
the secret data before the bad guys get it and give it to some
corporation.
     Because a single tornado lasts for only a few minutes the film
contrives to have a series of tornadoes forming over Oklahoma, each
larger than the last, to put our two teams in ever increasing danger as
they try to jockey themselves into the paths of the storms in the hopes
of getting their probes picked up and picked up and spun by one of the
deadly funnels.  Just how the data can be used to make the tornado more
predictable is never explained.  This is an odd failing considering the
script was co-written by Michael Crichton (and by Anne-Marie Martin,
a.k.a. Mrs. Michael Crichton).  Crichton likes to explain (and often
slam) scientific investigation and it would have been worthwhile to get
his explanation for how the data would be used.  There is a little
scientific exposition, but it is more descriptive than explanatory.  We
learn, for example, that tornadoes are measured on the Fujita Tornado
Intensity Scale (see discussion after review) of the light gale F1 to
the incredibly deadly F5 that of all the tornado hunters only Bill has
actually seen.  An F5 is called "the finger of God."  (Now what do you
think they would use for the finale of this film?)
     This is the second film ex-cinematographer Jan de Bont has
directed, the first being SPEED.  And he directs like a cameraman.  The
most memorable characters of TWISTER are all the very visual tornadoes.
There is, however, what seems like it might have been an unexpected
problem.  Action scenes require moderate close-ups.  Like an
expressionist painting, a tornado looks great from a distance and not
so good in a close- up.  It is a huge finger sticking out of the sky
which is an awe-inspiring sight.  Get close enough to it to see it
giving our characters' trouble and the tornado no longer looks so
impressive.  In close-up it looks more like just a big, unimpressive
dust cloud.  It helps to have it pick up heavy objects and whirl them
around, but it is not easy to make a cloud of dust look dramatic.
Still, the acting honors go to dust.  Spencer Tracy said all that is
necessary for acting is to remember your lines and do not bump into the
props.  Playing tornado hunters Jo and Bill Harding, Helen Hunt and
Bill Paxton remember their lines and wait for the props to bump into
them.  Neither pulls in a whole lot of interest on the screen.  As the
hapless fiancee of Bill, Jami Gertz fairs a little better, but she is
given some really sappy comedy relief lines like explaining to someone
who has called her on her cordless phone, "This is not a good time for
me," as she rides into the path of a raging tornado.  Cary Elwes has
little to do as the evil tornado hunter, and the most memorable human
in the film is Lois Smith as Aunt Meg who makes wind-driven lawn
ornaments and who proves she is a good person by cooking up huge
quantities of good-looking food, almost all protein and cholesterol.
     A friend has suggested that the script might better have been
titled HOWLER.  Without much loss, TWISTER could be edited down to
twenty minutes of great action scenes, and then it might have gotten
better rating than a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     We are really just tiny and frail creatures living in a huge sea
of atmosphere.  The forces that we can create, with the possible
exception of nuclear forces, are small compared to some of those
routinely--but luckily rarely in our time scale--unleashed by nature.
This ocean of atmosphere that we live in can at times have currents
that become deadly, and one of the deadliest and most focused forces it
can unleash is a tornado.  Perhaps lightning has more impact per square
inch and a hurricane may last longer and dissipate more force overall,
but nothing combines the focus and the sheer power of a tornado: a
finger of spinning wind with speed that can uproot trees and swing
trailer trucks like they were toys.
     Because air is invisible, we can rarely see how much chaotic
motion there really is in the atmosphere around us.  But unequal
heating can cause powerful updrafts of air, as much as 100 miles per
hour.  With all that air going up in the air, a low pressure area is
formed and surrounding air has to rush in to replace it.  That air can
go straight into the partial vacuum, but sometimes, like an object in
decaying orbit around the earth, it instead spirals in.  As it spirals
in faster and faster, it pulls more and more air with.  The air rushes
around the low pressure area faster and faster until it is traveling at
speeds of up to 300 miles per hour, rushing in to the center to get
pulled up the chimney.  Along with the air being pulled up comes
anything and virtually everything that gets in its way.  When this
happens over water, a huge spout of water is formed.  But when it
happens over land what it picks up can be solid objects which get
carried along at the same high speeds.  The reason we can see the
funnel shape of a tornado is that it is picking up dust and dirt from
the ground and pulling it into the updraft.  Often the color of the
tornado is just the color of the soil under it.  In the funnel we are
also seeing water vapor condensing from the cooling effect of in-
rushing air.  Colliding with air at the speeds that the air is swirling
is deadly, colliding with water is worse, colliding with something
solid is incredibly destructive.  And a wind this powerful can pick up
and whirl around a train locomotive.  As the low pressure area moves
the deadly finger can move along the ground at speeds from 20 to 70
miles per hour, carrying destruction with it.
     As they said in the film, the intensity of tornadoes is measured
by the Fujita scale (see below).  There can be as many as 1000
tornadoes a year over land, almost always over flat countryside as
there is in Kansas, Missouri, and Texas, and especially Oklahoma.  Many
of these have funnels less than 100 feet wide and last only a few
minutes, but tornadoes a mile wide or lasting as long as an hour are
not uncommon.  Sometimes you can have funnels forming around not around
the entire low pressure area but at its edge. And when that happens one
can get several tornadoes forming around the same low pressure area.
March 18, 1925, there were seven funnels from one low pressure area in
the Midwest (especially Illinois) with a resulting death toll of 689.
     THE FUJITA TORNADO INTENSITY SCALE (provided by the National
Weather Service)
   - (F0) Gale tornado (40-72 mph)
        - Light damage. Some damage to chimneys; break branches off
          trees; push over shallow-rooted trees; damage sign boards.
   - (F1) Moderate tornado (73-112 mph)
        - Moderate damage. The lower limit is the beginning of
          hurricane wind speed; peel surface off roofs; mobile homes
          pushed off foundations or overturned; moving autos pushed off
          the roads.
   - (F2) Significant tornado (113-157 mph)
        - Considerable damage. Roofs torn off frame houses; mobile
          homes demolished; boxcars pushed over; large trees snapped or
          uprooted; light-object missiles generated.
   - (F3) Severe tornado (158-206 mph)
        - Severe damage. Roofs and some walls torn off well-constructed
          houses; trains overturned; most trees in forest uprooted;
          heavy cars lifted off the ground and thrown.
   - (F4) Devastating tornado (207-260)
        - Devastating damage. Well-constructed houses leveled;
          structures with weak foundations blown off some distance;
          cars thrown and large missiles generated.
   - (F5) Incredible tornado (261-318 mph)
        - Incredible damage. Strong frame houses lifted off foundations
          and carried considerable distance to disintegrate; automobile
          sized missiles fly through the air in excess of 100 meters
          (109 yards); trees debarked; incredible phenomena will occur.

Title
Review for Tampopo (1986)
          Capsule review:  High-calorie comedy about one
     restaurant's quest for the perfect noodle soup.  Enjoyable
     comedy from Japan includes several comedy sketches unrelated
     to the main story, but which help to buoy it up.
     Are you into food?  I mean, are you REALLY into food?  And when you get
the food, is it important that everything about the food be just perfect?
And, just by the way, are you really into Japanese food?  If so, you will
probably enjoy TAMPOPO, a new film from Toho Studios.  Toho is known best in
this country for having invented Godzilla and many of his tall friends.
They also made the best of the samurai films.  They now bring the plot of a
samurai film and the subtlety of a Godzilla film to a comedy about the
adoration of food.
     Two truck drivers stop at a noodle shop somewhere in the outskirts of
Tokyo.  Even though the ramen is mediocre, one of the truck drivers finds
himself in a fight defending Tampopo, the chef.  He is knocked unconscious
by five ruffians and when he awakes the next morning, Tampopo has an odd
request: she wants our truck driver to become her master and teach her to
make perfect ramen noodle soup.  Thus Tampopo begins the arduous and
occasionally dangerous journey toward perfection in even so apparently minor
a task as noodle-making.  In this task details that seem minor to gaijin--
foreigners like you and me--become very important.  The plot from that point
forward advances much like a samurai film.  If thick noodles seem to make
for a thin plot, they do.  About half the movie is filled with tangential
comedy routines that have little or nothing to do with the plot.  Some are
funny; some seem a little pointless to us impatient gaijin; almost all are
on the subject of food.
     One may question if the world really needed a comedy dedicated to
gourmet cooking--particularly one that shows in detail the proper way to
kill and drain the blood from a turtle.  But TAMPOPO is a diverting hour or
so.  It is a pleasant (mostly) and forgettable film guaranteed to increase
the business of local Japanese restaurants.  Rate it a +1 on the -4 to +4
scale.  Don't see it on an empty stomach.

Title
Review for Malcolm X (1992)
     Spike Lee's MALCOLM X is a mammoth 201-minute film about the black
Islamic leader that may not always be doing what Lee intended it to do.  The
film does say a lot about Malcolm, both positive and negative, but not
nearly as much as one would expect for a film almost twice the length of
most feature films.  The film tells in approximately equal thirds about 1)
his youth and his drift into crime; 2) his "redemption" and his association
with the Nation of Islam; and 3) his break with the Nation of Islam, their
campaign against him, and his murder, very likely at their hands.  This
should have given the audience a very good understanding of the man, but the
screenplay by Arnold Perl and Spike Lee does not use its time well.  At one
point it stops the action dead for an extended dance production number.  It
also spends far too much time with Malcolm X's great good buddy, Shorty, who
just happens to be played by Spike Lee.  In addition, many of the events
shown in the film are of questionable authenticity.  For example, my
understanding is that Malcolm's mother denies that her husband was murdered,
unlike how it was shown in the film.
     The film opens with Malcolm's youth.  Malcolm (played by Denzel
Washington) begins as a teenager trying to straighten his hair with the help
of Shorty.  The film then jumps around in time, never giving us a really
good feel for what years things are taking place.  We see something of his
earlier youth with his family harassed by the Ku Klux Klan.  Those scenes
include one amazing shot that ironically seems to romanticize the Klan,
riding off into a huge moon on the horizon.  Again it is a sign that Lee is
not fully in control of this film.  Malcolm eventually moves first to
Boston, then New York, then Boston again, embarking on a life of crime cut
short by a prison sentence.
     In prison, Malcolm is recruited by Baines (played by Albert Hall) for
the Nation of Islam.  Malcolm is impressed by Baines's questionable
rhetoric.  (His description of why Muslims eat no pork is a real corker!  As
for his claims that Islam has a great in-built respect for blacks as
people...  am I the only person who remembers there was a huge Arab slave
trade in Africa even well after slavery was abolished in Europe and the
Americas?  In fact, I believe that the reason Swahili is still so widespread
in Africa is that it was the language created from Bantu and Arabic for the
Arab slave trade.  That fact just does not seem to square with a large black
movement to champion Islam.)  Malcolm leaves prison with an abiding belief
in Elijah Muhammad--very well-played by Al Freeman, Jr., who played Malcolm
X in ROOTS II--and in the precept that all whites are devils.
     The film than covers Malcolm's rise to and fall from power in Elijah
Muhammad's Nation of Islam.  Here it becomes unclear exactly what the film's
attitude toward the Nation of Islam is.  While Malcolm appears in some ways
to be doing very positive things, he behaves and presents his viewpoints
very differently in front of blacks than in front of whites.  Lee seems to
be attacking the Nation of Islam for hypocrisy.  Eventually when Malcolm
starts presenting the same vitriolic message to the whites that he was
giving to the blacks, it starts the rift between Malcolm and the Nation of
Islam.  It may be hard for much of the audience to cheer statements like,
"The Earth belongs to us ... the black man," or banners that say, "We must
protect our most valuable property ... our women."  Malcolm also rejects
integration entirely in favor of complete separation between the black and
white races.
     In the final third of the film, Malcolm's views shift entirely.  He is
no longer an advocate of racial separation, but of racial harmony through
Islam.  He is willing to accept that there may be good whites in the world,
as long as they are also good Muslims.  He is no longer willing to follow
Elijah Muhammad and founds his own rival Muslim black sect.  This leads to
the tragic events of which the audience is probably already aware.
     The film concludes by showing documentary footage of the real Malcolm
X.  Often historical films shy away from showing documentary footage of
characters they have portrayed by actors.  Perhaps it is to avoid confusion
about if it is indeed the same person.  Or perhaps showing the footage would
be inviting criticism of how well or badly the actor was made to look like
the actual person.  Lee's use of real footage of Malcolm X shows that
assumption may well be underestimating the audience.  After the footage,
several black celebrities are seen wearing caps bearing the "X," though it
is not clear which set of Malcolm X's sets of beliefs they are claiming to
espouse.
     The performances in MALCOLM X are generally quite good.  Denzel
Washington very quickly becomes Malcolm X for the audience.  Al Freeman,
Jr., is very believable as the founder of a huge movement.  Angela Bassett
and Lonette McKee are both very moving as Malcolm's wife and mother,
respectively.  Only notably out of place is Spike Lee himself playing
basically the same jazzy character he played in SHE'S GOTTA HAVE IT, or
comically fainting on hearing his prison sentence.  There is much he could
have cut from the film to actually improve its effectiveness and his own
performance heads the list.
     MALCOLM X teaches some history and presents some ideas, but does
neither well enough to justify its length and hoopla.  Lee's dream project
falls short of some of the films he made preparing for it.  I rate MALCOLM X
a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Wayne's World (1992)
     One of the most standard architectures for a comedy team is the
straight and the wacky.  The straight person will generally seem either just
very normal or perhaps romantic.  The wacky person is, well, wacky.
Examples are Crosby and Hope, Burns and Allen, Abbott and Costello, Martin
and Lewis, Rowan and Martin, and even Bergen and McCarthy.  Generally the
wacky person gets most of the laughs and the straight person gets top
billing just for setting up the wacky person's jokes.  There is more
potential when you have two or more comics playing off each other as you did
with the Marx Brothers or what is to my mind the best of the teams, Laurel
and Hardy.  So Mike Myers and Dana Carvey--playing their SATURDAY NIGHT LIVE
alter egos Wayne Campbell and Garth Algar--start with a plus.  Both are
comics.  There is potential for some really good humor.  Unfortunately, they
rarely play off each other for laughs.  Either each does his own thing or
they just both do the same thing.  Wayne's main thing is to make a joke or
do something clever and then flash a big open-mouthed grin as if he were
standing in front of a cheering audience.  He also negates sentences by
adding a belated " ... not."  Garth's thing is to act a little befuddled and
stupid.  Not the most auspicious starting material, but with enough
personality the team could have potential.  Where they go wrong is that they
are just not all that winning, and most of their gags are familiar and not
funny.
     Wayne and Garth have a public access television show on cable
television.  The show is done on almost no budget from the basement of the
house where Wayne lives with his parents.  The idea is that in spite of the
low budget of the cable production, they are supposed to be the best thing
on television.  Sadly, their cable hijinx are not all that funny and leave
one wondering what the attraction is to their cable program.  (SPOILER
ALERT: They sell out to commercialism but realize that commercialism is not
what they really want.  George Romero did the same basic plot considerably
better in KNIGHTRIDERS.)
     Besides the two main characters, the film features Tia Carrere as
Wayne's singer girlfriend from Hong Kong.  Her singing, like Wayne's
program, is just never as good as the script calls for it to be.  Rob Lowe
is a sleazy, slimy television promoter who is more style than substance.
One of the better bit parts is Ed O'Neill as the doughnut shop owner with a
darker side.
     As in an AIRPLANE! film, about a quarter of the jokes but, but unlike
in an AIRPLANE! film, the jokes do not come nearly fast enough.  At times
the film drags.  That is particularly bad since the plot is predictable and
if you know what is going to happen, you wish it would get it over with.
Nearly every funny joke in the film is an allusion to or lampooning the
entertainment industry.  Most are meta-jokes that poke fun at product
placements or actors talking to the camera.  There are several film and
television allusions.  They give the film some chuckles but still too few
laughs.  WAYNE'S WORLD is often on the edge of being funny, but rarely
crosses that line.  Even at 95 minutes the film is often too slow and just
not rewarding enough.  I give the film a flat 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Curse of the Jade Scorpion, The (2001)
    CAPSULE: This film is more interesting for its nostalgia value
    than for actual story values.  That value is certainly better
    than any comic value it might have.  Woody Allen writes,
    directs, and stars in a whimsical B film of a style that was
    popular in the year it is set, 1940.  Allen's humor just is not
    as funny as it used to be.  This is better than some of his
    recent efforts, but that is not saying much.  Rating:
    4 (0 to 10), 0 (-4 to +4).
As far as I am concerned Woody Allen, once one of our finest
filmmakers, has not made a really satisfying film since his
excellent CRIMES AND MISDEMEANORS.  CURSE OF THE JADE SCORPION is
his best effort in recent times.  At least he is not obviously
trying to write about his life, as he was in DECONSTRUCTING HARRY.
There are not missing scenes, as there were in SWEET AND LOWDOWN.
He does get the feel of the genre of film he is resurrecting,
unlike EVERYONE SAYS I LOVE YOU.  Here he tells a whole story and
it feels right (mostly).  The one problem is that it is not a
really good story.  It has plot holes and the plot might very well
have been used for a 1930s or 1940s B picture.  It probably would
not have had a lurid, pulpish title like CURSE OF THE JADE
SCORPION.  In filmdom those titles were pretty much confined to
the serials at that time.  And this film is in color, albeit
sepia-tinged, and is a little more explicit about sex than one of
those films would have been.  But those exceptions aside this
might well have been a film that might have starred Lee Tracy and
nestled at the bottom of a double bill right under a big Warner
Brothers studio film.  If that was what Allen was trying to
recreate, that does not make this a particularly ambitious film,
but it probably achieves those ambitions.  Even the comedy is up
to the standards of that sort of film.
C.W. Briggs (Woody Allen) is a super-hot-shot investigator for the
North Coast Insurance Company.  (Does the U.S. have a north
coast?)  He gets all the big cases and breaks them with lightning
speed with the aid of his network of skid row informants.  He has
just broken a tough case of a stolen Picasso.  Everybody in the
office is agog but for the insurance company's executive
efficiency expert Betty Ann Fitzgerald (Helen Hunt).  Fitz, as she
is called, has absolutely no use for smug, self-obsessed,
egotistical Briggs, and Briggs has no use for the officious Fitz
who can match him insult for insult in battles of double
entendres.  One night the two go with a group to see a nightclub
hypnotist, Voltan (David Ogden Stiers).  When called up to the
stage neither thinks that Voltan can put them under.  He does and
temporarily makes them love each other.  He also leaves them with
post-hypnotic suggestion that makes them his slave when he uses
the right code word (a la THE MANCHURIAN CANDIDATE).  He has plans
of his own for them.
This is, of course, not Allen's first outing into nostalgia for
the world of the popular culture of his youth.  His most
successful film along these lines would probably be RADIO DAYS.
There he showed how the entertainment world and his own real world
interacted and fed each other.  There is no such attempt here.
His script is pure pastiche.  His humor is more than a little
strained and for me at least was just not funny.  At one point he
tells police that he cannot talk to them because he has a chorus
girl in his bedroom.  An instant later he tells them he has to get
back to his nurse.  When they remind him that he just said she was
a chorus girl, flustered he says it is a chorus girl who does a
little nursing.  The line is very Woody Allen, but it is not at
all clever or funny.  The film is just full of predictable twists
and gags that do not quite amuse.
In this film Allen is looking a little tired and bedraggled.  He
continues to cast himself as the romantic lead in his films.  The
heart wants what the heart wants, and the heart no longer yearns
to see him get a woman twenty-eight years his junior.  It seemed
only recently that Helen Hunt was in several films released at the
same time.  Now she is content to be in just Allen's film. Allen,
like Robert Altman, is in the enviable position that he can put a
familiar face in just about every major role.  This film has Dan
Aykroyd, Wallace Shawn, David Ogden Stiers and Charlize Theron.
One can tell from the beginning that this is a Woody Allen film.
Every Allen film these days starts with a jazz score and white on
black credits.
CURSE OF THE JADE SCORPION is whimsical, but it is empty and
rarely elicits a laugh.  I give it a 4 on the 0 to 10 scale and a
0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Lion King, The (1994)
          Capsule review:  With the exception of BEAUTY AND
     THE BEAST this may be the best Disney animated feature
     since FANTASIA.  Rather than distorting an existing
     story, the filmmakers have created a myth brand new, but
     with elements going back to Jason and Pelias or Hamlet
     and Claudius.  Some of the artwork is spectacular.
     Rating: low +2 (-4 to +4)
     With the success of THE LITTLE MERMAID Walt Disney Studios returned
in a big way to making animated feature films.  It looks like it was a
good decision, since some of the best animated feature films they or
anyone have ever made were made by Disney in this period.  The formula
has always been to take a well-known fairy tale or children's classic
and retell it, usually distorting it nearly out of recognition.  I have
often wondered why they don't just write their own stories like they do
for Mickey Mouse and Donald Duck.  They have finally chosen to do a film
that is their own story entirely--well mostly.  Actually rather than
taking a fairy tale and very freely adapting it they have chosen to
retell an archetypical myth and move it to an African setting.  The
story is basically "The Return of the True King."  Simba is really Jason
or Arjuna or Hamlet or Aslan returning to defeat the usurper on his
throne.  It was a good idea for a film and it is told with a good deal
of style.
     The story begins with a prologue of all the animals in a kingdom
coming to see their new-born prince, the young Simba.  It is a powerful
scene beautifully rendered with impressive art and music.  The latteris
rendered by Hans Zimmer's beautiful interpretations of African folk
music, much like his work on THE POWER OF ONE.  Young Simba (voiced by
Jonathan Taylor Thomas) is the son of the great and powerful Mufasa, the
reigning Lion King (James Earl Jones).  One wonders how much a
wildebeest an antelope really loves this reigning family, given that he
might well become the family's next meal.
     As a cub Simba is fascinated by everything in the world including
his brooding uncle Scar (Jeremy Irons).  Scar has been waiting for the
day Mufasa would die and Scar would succeed him.  With the birth of
Simba that hope has been snatched away ... unless perchance something
nasty should befall both Mufasa and Simba.  Perhaps with an alliance
with the smirking hyenas--currently exiled to the dark regions of the
kingdom--something nasty can be arranged to happen.
     In the classic Disney films like SLEEPING BEAUTY and SNOW WHITE AND
THE SEVEN DWARFS the villains are usually far more interesting than the
heroes.  The margin is still there, but is starting to narrow a little.
Belle in BEAUTY AND THE BEAST was every bit as interesting as the
villain Gaston.  This time around Mufasa and Simba are still just a bit
handsome and empty.  So it is hardly surprising that Scar is the most
watchable character in the film.  The smirking hyenas, however, hold
their own for audience attention.  Their clowning around making fun of
Mufasa really is a lot of fun, villains or not.  A carefree meerkat and
warthog who figure into the later portions of the film make far more
interesting sidekicks with far more personality than Disney himself
would have created.  Note how much more engaging they are than the mice
in CINDERELLA, for example.
     For no apparent good reason, name actors are chosen to voice many
of the character.  Matthew Broderick is the young adult Simba, but does
not seem to need to do a whole lot anyone else his age could have done.
Jeremy Irons does give some real personality to Scar, though after
hearing him attempt to sing on of the film's songs, my suggestion is
that he should hold on to his day job.  James Earl Jones does Mufasa and
surprisingly we interpret his deep voice as noble, even after hearingit
so often as the less-than-noble Darth Vader.  But again only Irons seems
to give his character much that any moderate actor could not give him.
     Some of the artwork with majestic African scenery is the best that
has appeared in a Disney film.  Disney, of course, always had great
animation, but often his artwork often left something to be desired.It
might be cute, but was rarely impressive.  Here the art and animation
work beautifully together.  An early scene of birds flying over a
waterfall brought gasps from adults in the audience.  There are more
nice experimental touches in the visuals, playing with focus or having
characters appear out of dust.  This is a film in which the visual
interest goes well beyond the animation.
     Moments of direction are also very good.  After the prologue the
screen goes silent for the title of the film to appear and it is far
more dramatic than any chord that could have been played.  This also has
one of the better scripts of Disney animated features.  I think that The
producers realize that much of the audience is parents bringing
children, and there are many creative allusions and puns in the script
that children will miss but adults will appreciate.  There is even a
liberal dash of Swahili, and those who can recognize it can appreciate
that.  And for the kids who like that sort of thing, there are moments
of grossness.  And there were children in the audience who seemed to
liked being pleasantly grossed out by realistic details like animals
eating insects and grubs.
     One problem with the story is the whole theme of the hyenas.  They
are almost too likable for the film's own good.  Certainly they are
cynical, but considering their exile they have a right to be.  Their
motivation is that by any means necessary that they not go hungry.
Somehow that does not sound like so villainous a motivation.  The lions
who have exiled them are certainly not missing any meals.  On the face
of it such a Grand Order, a circle of life that exiles one of its
species, deserves to be toppled.  Why are hyenas chosen as the villains?
Probably because we find them unpleasing in appearance.  In any case the
film seems to take the (racist?) point of view that the hyenas are
intrinsically evil and in a well-run world should be banished.  When the
hyenas are given freedom the land withers, though just why is never
really explained.  The film seems to have a subtext of all the pretty
animals do cooperate and get along under a benevolent dictatorship
except for the ones who are born into an ugly and evil species.  These
uglies get thrown out of the society because if they got enough to eat
it would spoil everything.  The grand order of things assumes that
hyenas should stay confined to their ghetto, outside "the circle of
life" and the natural order of things is destroyed by letting them into
the circle.  One can question the message children will get from this.
Outwardly the film has a love of African rhythms and language and yearns
for a united world--everyone but hyenas united.  But the core is justa
bit ugly and scary.
     With that one objection, and clearly this film is not unique in
that regard, I would say that this is a rewarding film for both children
and adults.  Walt might have found reason to object to parts of it, but
he never made a better animated feature.  I rate it a low +2 on the -4
to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Blood and Wine (1997)
     These days crime films seem to have spectacular gun-fights, big
explosions, crazed madmen, and, of course, tense car chases though
metropolitan centers.  The films go for the spectacular, roller-coaster
experience.  And the characters are bigger than life.  You cannot get
much better a feel for what has happened to the crime film than to
compare the original CAPE FEAR with its high-tech remake.  Explosive
film-making has replaced gritty little crime films.  One misses the
low-key crime dramas like the original CAPE FEAR.  Occasionally there
is a throwback like THE GRIFTERS, but they are all too few.  BLOOD AND
WINE has the feel of a John D. MacDonald novel from the 50s.  The
characters are smallish and petty, but they are believable and except
for perhaps its complexity, the story is believable also.
     Alex Gates (played by Jack Nicholson) runs a Southern Florida wine
store and in his spare time cheats on his wife Suzanne (Judy Davis).
Both Suzanne and his son Jason (Stephen Dorff) have had their fill of
him and the marriage is in its last stages.  Alex is fooling around
with the Gabrielle (Jennifer Lopez) the nanny of a rich customer, but
he also has his eye on that same customer's safe where he believes
there to be a diamond necklace worth over a million dollars.  To get
the necklace Alex has to go into partnership with Victor (Michael
Caine), a tubercular safecracker who might well just be using Alex.
This is not a very tightly-knit little group at the best of times and
add to the mixture a necklace with "diamonds the size of chocolates"
and the bonds of family and friendship may be totally forgotten.
     The film revolves around five characters, but the heart is
Nicholson and Caine, of course.  In a sense they are playing much the
same character, suddenly-violent, constantly-vile.  Caine plays the
British version of the character, Nicholson the American.  Bob Rafelson
has directed Nicholson before, in fact he was largely responsible for
Nicholson becoming a respected actor with FIVE EASY PIECES (1970) and
THE KING OF MARVIN GARDENS (1972).  It has been suggested that the
three films form a pattern with Nicholson playing a son in the first, a
brother in the second, and now playing a father.  There does not seem
to be a whole lot of connection beyond that.  To Nicholson's and
Caine's characters the greasy lowlife life-style comes naturally, but
Judy Davis seems to be someone who was once decent, but in self-defense
has been pushed to become the same sort of violent person her husband
is.  Significantly even after she has escaped the control of her
husband she is attracted to another man with many of the same
characteristics.  Her performance could easily be overlooked playing
against the two scheming greaseballs, but she does a nice job at
playing a no longer very nice person.  Jennifer Lopez is attractive and
reasonably convincing, but her thick Cuban accent obscures some of her
lines.  Stephen Dorff is nominally the main character.  But his
performance is the least textured of the five major characters.
     As films go today, this was probably a fairly low-budget one.  In
the realistic crime story style the characters use golf clubs against
each other rather than dynamite.  If there are explosions they are ones
of sudden anger.  This was a good role for Nicholson and a better one
for Caine.  The production values are decent, though I would swear
Nicholson's black eye comes and goes from scene to scene.  Other
continuity errors have been reported also, though I did not catch them.
This is a small film and one that works not on photography or
pyrotechnics, but in acting and script.  As such it may be a sort of
nostalgic reminder of the days when that went without saying.  This is
not a major film but it is watchable and at times tense.  I would give
it a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Braveheart (1995)
     With the directorial experience of just one film, THE MAN WITHOUT
A FACE, Mel Gibson has tried to make his own film comparable to
SPARTACUS, built around the late 13th Century Scottish hero and freedom
fighter Sir William Wallace.  He has given the film a 177-minute length
of which could have been better used to tell the story of this larger-
than-life hero.  Unfortunately, Gibson's pacing is a bit off and the
film gives way to some dull stretches.  This is a film that I am happy
I did my homework for before seeing to avoid being too impressed by the
film and then having to be disillusioned later when I discovered the
film's inaccuracies.
     The story, with many obvious parallels to that of the film
SPARTACUS, tells of the young Wallace growing up in a Scotland occupied
by the troops of Edward Longshanks (a.k.a. Edward I, played by Patrick
McGoohan).  William's father narrowly misses being murdered with some
other important Scots, then is killed fighting Edward.  William is
brought up by his uncle and taught to fight with his wits rather than
by brute strength.  He returns home to live as a simple farmer, and the
story slows down to tell the story of his romance and marriage.  But
soon Edward's injustice reaches out to him.  Wallace strikes back, is
outlawed, and becomes a powerful leader of the rebels fighting against
English rule.
     In a large film with a big cast Patrick McGoohan walks away with
all honors as the villainous pre-Machiavellian Machiavellian King
Edward I.  Rarely has the screen produced so ruthless a tyrant.  While
more ruthless than the character he played in DANGER MAN (a.k.a. SECRET
AGENT), he brings the same cold, calculating efficiency to this role.
Gibson seems to have had his hands full directing the film and brought
little to his role more than expected.  Besides the apparent love of
freedom, he could have been playing his character Mad Max.
     Curiously, this film seems less anachronistic than its trailers
made it feel.  Occasional lines seem, if not out of place, at least
overly fine-tuned for the late 20th Century.  Having characters
exclaiming "Excellent!" seems better attuned to the time of Bill and
Ted than of William and Edward.  Gibson's visual style seems not yet
matured so that he overuses slow motion scenes, sometimes telegraphing
the action.  Some of his scenes seem contrived and unbelievable.  One
such scene involves a dead body that drips blood just at perfect
instant.  Another involves what has to be the world's least skittish
deer.  (You have to have seen the film to know what I mean.)
     Gibson tries to create a realistic feel by making Scottish
communities seem properly grimy, though he applies this standard far
less to women than to men.  He has a great deal of violence, graphic
and implied, in the course of the film.  Toward the end of the film
there are certainly some painful scenes to watch.  Gibson also has some
fun with the battle scenes that I suspect was not inspired by any
historical record.  Unfortunately, while the battle scenes are exciting
and colorful, what we see bears little relation to what actually
happened in the battles portrayed.  In fact, while the film seems to
say that Wallace was trained to use his wits in battle rather than
brute force, that is not how he is portrayed on the screen.  The
historical Wallace used his wits far more in battle than Gibson's
representation, who seems to rely on a good speech and little more than
headlong berserker assaults.  (The battle shown are very little like
the real battles.  See the historical note after the review.)
     BRAVEHEART is well-intentioned and ambitious, but is
disappointingly flawed.  It probably required a more experienced
director--and one who would have demanded a little more from Gibson.I
give it a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     HISTORICAL NOTE (possible light spoilers):
     In the years just preceding William Wallace's revolt Edward I knew
his real enemy was France to the south with a military force much
superior to his own.  England had been at peace with Scotland for more
than a century and Edward expected little trouble from the north.  But
John de Balliol, King of Scotland, allied himself with Philip IV of
France rather than supply Edward with men and arms to fight the French.
It was not a strong alliance since France had little faith in John's
power to defend his title as king.
     Edward was already taxing England for the war with France and did
not relish the idea of fighting a war against Scotland and France at
the same time.  He certainly did not want to tax his people for both.
In 1290 he had expelled the Jews from England and without them to
borrow from any more he was finding that the decision to expel had been
a costly one.
     Edward decided to confer with Scotland's King John and to assure
John's loyalty.  He called upon John to meet him at Berwick.  John
refused.  Edward took this as a declaration of war and invaded Scotland
with intent to conquer, sacking Berwick.  King John then renounced any
homage to England.  But Edward's commander, Warenne, the Earl of
Surrey, defeated King John at the Battle of Dunbar.  He captured John
and imprisoned him.  Edward declared himself to be King of Scotland
before returning to fight France.
     Edward set up a puppet government in Scotland, not expecting much
resistance.  William Wallace, the son of a poor knight, was outlawed at
this time when he got into a personal argument with a young Englishman.
The Englishman Selby insulted Wallace and Wallace killed him.  Wallace
joined one of the several bands of outlaws.  With a band of 30 men he
burned Lanark and killed the sheriff in May 1297.
     Wallace organized an army from the small landowners and organized
guerilla attacks on the English between Forth and Tay.  Through this
time Edward was fighting in France and Wallace was fighting the Earl of
Surrey.  Surrey brought a large army to fight Wallace in September.
The two armies met September 11, 1297, at the Battle at Cambuskenneth
(a.k.a. Stirling) Bridge near Forth.  (This is very different from how
the battle was portrayed in the film.)  A narrow bridge separated the
two armies.  The Earl's own advisors told him that he could not get his
full army across the bridge in under eleven hours and if he tried
crossing he could bring only a small part of his army to bear on
defense.  He ignored the advice and ordered him men across the bridge.
Wallace awaited the proper time, when about half the army was across
the bridge, and attacked.  Half the army watched helpless on the far
bank as the other was driven back into the river to drown.  Wallace
earned a stunning victory and in the process captured Stirling Castle.
     Edward made a truce with France by marrying the king's sister and
betrothing the king's daughter to his son.  He was off in Flanders when
he found out that Wallace had defeated his army and, flushed with
victory, had invaded England and was sacking Cumberland and North
Umberland.  Wallace was knighted and given the guardianship of Scotland
ruled in Balliol's name.  He decorated his shield with the skin of an
English tax-collector.
     Edward I, having his truce with France, re-invaded Scotland,
marched to Stirling, and met Wallace's army at Falkirk on July 22,
1298.  Wallace formed his forces into four schiltrons.  That is a
circle of men with spears pointed outward (similar to what the film
showed at Battle of Stirling Bridge, but that was a straight line).
Edward's knights could do little against these phalanxes and so were
called off.  Instead the English used a shower of arrows from long
bows.  This made quick work of the Scottish army.  Wallace, however,
survived by hiding in a dense nearby wood.
     Wallace resigned his guardianship, but still fought a guerrilla
war against the English in Scotland.  In 1305 he was arrested at
Robroyston near Glasgow.  He was found guilty of being a traitor to
Edward, though he had never sworn allegiance to the king.  He was
executed that same year, much in the manner shown in the film.
     Contrary to the film, however, Edward I did not die until 1307,
Edward II did not marry until 1308, and Edward II's and Isabella's
first child was Edward III who was not born until 1310.  Henry the
Minstrel, also known as "Blind Harry" made Wallace a popular hero by
immortalizing him in an epic romance poem in the 15th Century.

Title
Review for Little Princess, A (1995)
     In 1993 Warner Brothers scored a coup with the critics for their
adaptation of THE SECRET GARDEN by Frances Hodgson Burnett.  That wasa
cloyingly sweet if unconvincing moral tale for children.  Perhaps
sensing the mood of the country is moving back to the same sort of
sympathies it had at that time, Warner Brothers is again adapting one
of Burnett's stories, this one--A LITTLE PRINCESS--has been done twice
before, once with Mary Pickford in 1917 and again with Shirley Temple
in 1939.  I will say at the outset that this is not the kind of story
that does much for me,  It is not that I do not like children's films,
but Caroline Thompson's excellent BLACK BEAUTY is much closer to what
would appeal to me.  In spite of the fact that that film is a story
told by a horse, I found it far more touching and believable than this
exaggerated and contrived tale.  A far better treatment of similar
themes was in another example of a better children's film THE JOURNEY
OF NATTY GANN.
     As with THE SECRET GARDEN, this film opens with a young girl
brought up in India but having to return to her native country.  In
this case it is imaginative Sara Crewe (Liesel Matthews) who loves the
tales she has been told from the Ramayana.  But it is 1914 and called
to war is Sara's widower father (Liam Cunningham, who also plays the
blue-skinned Prince Rama in the too few dramatized sequences from the
Ramayana).  Sara is placed in Minchin School for Girls in New York.
The school is ruled over by the very repressed and autocratic Miss
Minchin (Eleanor Bron, veteran of films going back to the great
BEDAZZLED).  Minchin is clearly jealous of the advantages that wealth
has brought Sara.  But the audience knows that Sara's popularity is the
result of her story-telling ability which she uses to enliven the lives
of the other students.  Sara believes that a happy fantasy is better
than a grim reality.  When Sara's fortunes are reversed, however, Miss
Minchin is quick to turn Sara from a pampered student into a cruelly
used slave.  Sara is forced to give up her studies and work in the
school instead.  Still Sara has the ability to make and keep friends
including the other girls at the school and (from across the way) the
enigmatic Indian servant Ram Dass (Errol Sitahol) and his monkey
called--what else?--Hanuman, after the king of monkeys from the
Ramayana.
     Top billing goes to Eleanor Bron with a Frankensteinian shock of
gray hair.  Second billing goes to Liam Cunningham as the slightly too
good to be true father.  Liesel Matthews, who carries the film, must be
content with third billing because she is a child and a newcomer.
Almost all to the other cast members are unfamiliar, but the acting is
uniformly good.
     A LITTLE PRINCESS, like THE SECRET GARDEN, wants to be a moral
tale but falls more into the realm of kiddie film noir.  It is not her
virtue that saves Sara.  Coincidence is what saves her.  And her
virtues are a big part of what gets her into the trouble in the first
place.  The film does, to its credit, show some of the value of
imagination.  The villainous Miss Minchin is trying to eradicate any
imagination from her girls.  Yet it is the escape that comes from the
imagination that the girls really need.  This would be a very
interesting film to see paired with Peter Jackson's HEAVENLY CREATURES.
     Mexican director Alfonso Cuaron gives the film a nice feel for a
New York girls' school of the time (though actually the novel was set
in an English girls' school).  His film most comes alive when he is
portraying scenes from the Ramayana and he seriously might consider
lengthier dramatizations of that epic work.  He gets some details
wrong.  My wife noticed that his map of World War I Europe included a
Yugoslavia that would not come into existence until after the war.  His
depiction of gas warfare might be strong stuff for children if they
really understood what they were seeing.
     But the biggest fault is this.  A LITTLE PRINCESS is a superbly
contrived story in which a young girl seems destined to be badly
punished for being intelligent and imaginative.  Then the extremely
unsubtle hand of the author reaches out and saves the poor girl at the
last possible moment by a series of unconvincing and nearly impossible
coincidences.  There is little doubt that in the real world Sara would
not have been so fortunate.  Boy, am I glad I didn't read this one when
I was young and impressionable.
     I am afraid that I am just not destined to like any film based on
Frances Hodgson Burnett books.  This was only a little better than THE
SECRET GARDEN and I give it a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for X-Men (2000)
     There is a war going on.  The battlefield is all around us, but
we normal people do not see it being fought.  We will, but not yet.
There are around us mutants with special powers far superior to us
humans.  But the war is not yet between them and us.  Right now it
is between two factions of mutants.  And we humans are just
bystanders whose fate may depend on the outcome of that conflict.
This is the plot of David Cronenberg's 1981 film, SCANNERS.  It was
indeed a very original and atmospheric film.  However that same plot
also describes X-MEN made almost two decades later.  Now it may well
be that SCANNERS could have taken some inspiration from the X-MEN,
but Cronenberg did the in film first.  Even if the Marvel Comics X-
MEN preceded the film SCANNERS, it is an idea that has already been
explored in film and probably more intelligently in a previous film.
Most of anything is good about X-MEN has been done better elsewhere.
     The film opens at an unnamed concentration camp.  A young
Jewish boy is separated by force from his mother.  Trying to follow
her he is restrained by four guards and in his grief somehow causes
two metal gates to bend.  (There are two things wrong with this
scene.  The Jews they show are in a condition too good.  They
probably would not be brought to the camp without already having
been through much rougher treatment than implied.  Also a Jew
causing this much trouble would simply have been shot.)  We see that
the boy, Eric Lehnsherr, obtains his powers from his own mental
anguish and that he has good reason for mistrusting and hating human
nature.  Perhaps understanding this is why Dr.  Xavier (Patrick
Stewart) and he remain lifelong friends.  One would expect them to
be enemies.  Each leads one of two opposed factions of mutants.
This friendship of adversaries is probably the most remarkable and
unexpected twist of the script.  Lehnsherr (now played by Ian
McKellan) leads a faction of militant and ugly mutants, preparing
them for war against humans.  Xavier trains his attractive mutants
to co-exist with the normal humans.  Invited to join the fold are
two new mutants: the nihilistic Logan, known as Wolverine (Hugh
Jackman), and the very confused Marie, called Rogue (Anna Pacquin).
Xavier runs a school for mutants not unlike the one in Brian De
Palma's THE FURY.  The school is complete with a huge spherical
chamber the design for which seems to come from Terry Gilliam's
BRAZIL.  To this school he invites the new mutants Rogue and
creature of rage Wolverine, a creature who likely was inspired by
the animal ferocity of Lawrence Talbot in THE WOLF MAN.
     David Hayter wrote the screenplay based on a story by director
Bryan Singer of THE USUAL SUSPECTS and by Tom DeSanto.  Occasionally
the lines are unintentionally humorous.  The first line of the film
says that mutation has allowed us to evolve from one-celled
creatures to the dominant life form on this planet.  Of course when
there was only one-celled creatures, that WAS the dominant life
form.  Occasionally the writers overstate their point.  At one place
we anti-mutant people hanging "Mr. Mutant" in effigy.  This is a
little heavy handed.  I think discrimination these days would take
more subtle forms after this sort of expression has been so
obviously associated with racism.
     The art direction and set design give this film a nice look
down to detail like X-MAN symbol shows up as the wheels of Xavier's
wheelchair.  They have not given in to satire or levity.  Instead
this is a nice dark story that wants to be taken seriously.
Unfortunately when the fight scenes play fast and loose with
Newton's Laws the feel drops to the level of a bad martial arts
film.  The film has a lot to see, but not much to think about.  It
all builds to a large fight out in the interior of the Statue of
Liberty, perhaps a tribute to Alfred Hitchcock.
     That makes it all the more surprising that it attracted the
acting talent that it did.  Patrick Stewart, Formerly of the
Starship Enterprise and currently of the cast of Arthur Miller's
"The Ride Down Mt. Morgan" plays the lead.  Ian McKellen is one of
the finest actors living, but the role of a super-villain in a
costume may stretch his talents.  Anna Paquin of THE PIANO is
reasonable as the troubled Rogue.  Bruce Davison who was touching in
LONGTIME CONPANION and on Broadway as THE ELEPHANT MAN has not much
to do as a United States Senator bigoted against mutants.  This is
hardly one of his better roles.  Famke Janssen who played Xenia
Onatopp in GOLDENEYE is on-hand, apparently as Xavier's assistant.

Title
Review for Twilight (1998)
     Considering that TWILIGHT is only 94 minutes long and moves at
such a slow pace, the plot is surprisingly complex, not to say
downright confusing.  The three main male characters are in their
sixties and are taking that fact rather hard.  Harry Ross (Paul Newman)
has been a cop and a detective, but these days he is a houseguest for
the well-off Jack and Catherine Ames (Gene Hackman and Susan Sarandon).
Harry pays back his hosts by being a companion for Jack and
occasionally running errands.  Two years earlier the errand was to pick
up Jack's daughter who had run off with her boy friend to Puerto
Vallarto.
     Given a private package to deliver to a woman runs Harry into a
man dying of a fatal dose of bullets.  The man's last act is to try to
kill Harry.  Both the police and Harry are anxious to know why.  Harry
is able to discover that the dead man was anxious to uncover the story,
never fully explained, of what happened to Catherine's first husband
before she married Jack.
     Director Robert Benton, director of NOBODY'S FOOL, co-wrote this
film trying for the depth of character that film had and at the same
time the sort of mystery that Newman had with HARPER.  It must have
looked good on paper.  Clearly a lot of good actors had some respect
for the production and were willing to take non-starring roles.  We see
people like Stockard Channing and James Garner in supporting roles.
M. Emmet Walsh appears just long enough to die on camera.  It is hard
to judge from a script if a mystery will be a good one or not.  While
the plot complications were convoluted, I picked out the killer early
in the film, never wavered from my belief, and I was right.  I suspect
many viewers did the same.  The film was probably made with the
assumption that audiences would want to go along with Newman's easy-
going rapport with his fellow actors, particularly James Garner with
whom easy rapport does not seem like much of an accomplishment.
However, with too much being so mellow the film robs itself of a sense
of any real tension.  Hackman tries to give some power to his role, but
there is only so much he can do playing a man dying of cancer.
     Of some additional interest is that the Ames mansion was really
the home of Cedric Gibbons and Delores Del Rio.  Gibbons was the art
director on films like A NIGHT AT THE OPERA, THE BAD AND THE BEAUTIFUL,
and LUST FOR LIFE.  Del Rio was a fiery Latin beauty in films of the
1930s and 1940s. The Ames's other home was one actually built by Frank
Lloyd Wright, though never completed.
     The aptly named TWILIGHT seems full of characters in the twilight
of their lives and reaching a point where they think and talk rather
than act.  The point is carefully driven home that Newman's character
is still a lover, but the viewer has reason to be skeptical.  The
actors give the feel of people going gently into that good night.  I
rate TWILIGHT a 6 on the 0 to 10 scale and a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Midnight Clear, A (1991)
     A MIDNIGHT CLEAR is a World War II story on the insanity and stupidity
of war in general told with bitter humor and irony.  It begs comparison with
CASTLE KEEP and especially CATCH-22  It pretty well had to be an angry film,
being directed by Keith Gordon (who had previously made THE CHOCOLATE WAR),
and being based on a novel by William Wharton (the author of the book
BIRDY).  And there is a lot of rage let out in A MIDNIGHT CLEAR, sometimes
eloquently, sometimes muddled.
     The story is set in mid-December, 1944, in the Ardennes Forest.
Somewhere, in another part of the forest, the Battle of the Bulge--the last
great German offensive of the war--is raging.  (Curiously, they never
mention that this is the Battle of the Bulge, even in the narration.  It
might have helped some viewers place the action in perspective.)  The story
concerns a squad of six very war-weary Americans sent to act as sentinels
where the Germans are expected to break through.  Basically they are to
report, then save themselves if they can.  It does not help their odds that
one of their number is already nearly insane.  No reasonable commander would
give such an order, but their Major Griffin (played by John McGinley) is
every soldier's worst nightmare--stupid, officious, and without a touch of
sympathy for the men he commands.
     Then things start getting stranger for the squad.  They find the
corpses of a German and an American soldier frozen in a tableau of dancing
together.  They have several encounters with Germans that should have gotten
them killed and the Germans refuse to throw anything at them worse than
snowballs.  In fact, they have run into a squad of Germans who apparently
wants to play one of the most dangerous games of wartime--they seem to want
to make a separate peace.
     This is a slow, deliberate, and very introspective film--an odd choice
to start the summer fluff season.  It reaches its climax a good half-hour
before the end of the film and then just sort of smolders out.  There are
many bizarre touches in the photography, not the least of which is the
bizarre statuary in the area the squad is trying to secure.  One statue
holds its decapitated head in front of it like a ghost.  Mark Isham's score
depicts the weirdness of the situation, but certainly not the period.  The
film is sad, angry, and anti-war straight through.  Even the flashback sex
scene turns out to be sad, angry, and anti-war.  The film is much more
anxious to attain a literary style than to be an accurate portrayal of how
war is fought, but it makes its point.  I give it a low +2 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Haunting, The (1999)
     For me there are three ghost stories on film that I would put in
my first tier-these are the best.  Those are THE UNINVITED, THE
INNOCENTS, and THE HAUNTING (1963).  The second tier would include THE
LEGEND OF HELL HOUSE, THE CHANGELING, and THE LADY IN WHITE.  There
would probably be a few others.  The third tier would probably include
POLTERGEIST, effective but a little soul-less.  In interviews about the
new THE HAUNTING from The Dreamworks, this second film based on the
novel THE HAUNTING OF HILL HOUSE by Shirley Jackson, director Jan de
Bont (SPEED, TWISTER) said that he was not really approaching this as a
horror film. What he wanted was to make was a different sort of action
film. Audiences are tired of traditional crime action films, but not
many have been done as horror.  Given that that is the case, it is
remarkable that the new THE HAUNTING is as good as it is at raising
gooseflesh.  For now I would put it in the second tier.  I may or may
not feel that positive on the film in five years.  Time and again de
Bont does wrong what director Robert Wise did so very right in the 1963
version.  Part of what made the original film effective is that the
main character was weak.  We could empathize with her rather than
admire her and we saw the film from inside her head, even to the point
of hearing her thoughts. The horror in the 1963 version is almost all
heard rather than seen. There is just a hint that is visual that any of
this is really happening.  Wise had to use very three-dimensional
characters to make the people and the threat to them seem real.
Today's younger action audience might not have responded to that, so
instead de Bont gives us some strong characters and the scariest
haunted house money can buy. There are more special effects in the
trailer to the new film than Wise put into the entirety of his version.
     Eleanor Lance (played by Lili Taylor) gets an invitation to be
part of a sleep study by Dr. Jeffrey Marrow (Liam Neeson).  The study
will have her staying in a huge old mansion dating back to 1837.  The
house was built by a textile magnate and was the scene of much
unhappiness. Eleanor's fellow test subjects include the seductive
Theodora (Catherine Zeta-Jones) and the irreverent Luke Sannerson (Owen
Wilson).  What none of the subjects knows is that the study is not
about sleep but about fear.  Marrow is intentionally putting them into
a frightening house to observe their reaction.  As Marrow says "you
don't tell the rats the rats will be in a maze."  But the house may be
scarier than he realizes. Even Marrow does not know the full history of
evil in this house or of the spirits of the original master among
others who still make the house their home.  While starting with the
plot from the book and the original film, this plot goes off in some
new directions.  Jerry Goldsmith makes his own comment on the profusion
of haunting phenomena we see in this film by starting his end-credit
music with a carnival theme.
     There are far too many touches in this film that just seem weak
after having seen the Robert Wise version (two nights earlier, in
fact).  In the original the groundskeeper and housekeeper seem to have
been taken over by the spirit of the house and themselves seem to be a
bit haunted. In this version they just come off as mean.  Bruce Dern
plays the groundskeeper as just his usual nasty, bullying character.
It is not as effective as weaker-than-the-house characters in the
original.  But de Bont has a hard time doing weak characters.  This
version makes much more use of the early residents of Hill House,
particularly the industrialist who built it and who here looks a lot
like the early makeup designs for THE PLANET OF THE APES.  De Bont
replaces the mysterious seductive evil of the house with too great an
abundance of strange phenomena.  If Hill House is getting this
treatment from the spirits, are not there a lot of places in which
greater evils occurred. Why do we not see this degree of haunting more
places?
     The production design is credited to Eugenio Zanetti.  If that
name does not sound familiar consider that he performed the same
function on such beautiful films as FLATLINERS, RESTORATION, and WHAT
DREAMS MAY COME. Zanetti won the Academy Award for set design for
RESTORATION and was nominated (and deserved to win) for WHAT DREAMS MAY
COME.  The Hill House he designed would be a dominating spirit even if
there were no haunting.  I hope Jan de Bont realizes how very much he
owes to Zanetti for making this film as good as it is.
     This version of THE HAUNTING would be a better film by another
name.  On its own it is actually quite a good ghost story about what is
the most incredibly haunted house the screen has yet seen.  By inviting
comparison to one of the three best ghost stories on film, this action-
oriented version comes up a poor second.  But if we had to have a
graphic version of Jackson's novel, this is far better than any we
could have expected.  I give it a 7 on the 0 to 10 scale and a low +2
on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Not of This Earth (1988)
     Somebody once said that if you remake a film, remake one you can
improve on, not a classic.  If that is true, you could do much worse than to
choose Roger Corman's 1957 NOT OF THIS EARTH, a lackluster quickie with Paul
Birch, looking like a businessman in sunglasses and riding around in a big
black Cadillac.  His real mission was to collect blood and other biological
samples from humans and ship them off to his home planet where they are
needed for a war.  Beverly Garland played Nadine Storey, a registered nurse
hired to take care of what she thinks is just an unusual patient and slowly
comes to realize he was (dah...dah...duh...DAH!) not of this earth.  Even as
a fan of 1950s science fiction films, I have always been indifferent to NOT
OF THIS EARTH.  Improving on it should not be difficult if it has to be
remade.
     The weakness of the original makes it all the more surprising that the
remake actually turns out to be a travesty on the original.  The Beverly
Garland role now has ex-porn star Traci Lords, who can act her way out of
her clothing much easier than she could a paper bag.  The film has been
peppered with tasteless nude scenes and an occasional car chase or two, but
nothing that improves on the plot.  Little vignettes intended to be
humorous, like a bag lady who thinks she has a radio to heaven, simply fall
flat.  The original was a solid -1 on the -4 to +4 scale; the remake is -2.

Title
Review for Raising Arizona (1987)
     The Coen brothers have made another movie.  Two years ago the then 29-
year-old director Joel and the then 26-year-old producer Ethan made a superb
story of murder and misunderstanding.  BLOOD SIMPLE was a great first film
and all the more amazing for having come from two unknowns.  Joel had been
editor on some low-budget horror films, the best known of which was THE EVIL
DEAD; Ethan had no film experience.  BLOOD SIMPLE was a great film and an
outstanding critical success.  More recently the Coens had to prove that
they had more than just one film in them.  Well, RAISING ARIZONA proves that
and while it seems less ambitious to make one more comedy in a market full
of comedies, RAISING ARIZONA is as unique in its own way as BLOOD SIMPLE
was.
     Nicholas Cage plays H.I., an ex-con who went through jail terms as
often as you go through tubes of toothpaste.  Then he married Edwina, an
ex-cop who wants to settle down with him and raise a family.  One problem.
No kids.  And as a cigar-chomping doctor gaily explains, there aren't gonna
be none, neither.  Things look pretty bad until Edwina hears about a
furniture chain (Trey Wilson who played in FX and as the base commander in A
SOLDIER'S STORY).  owner whose wife just had quintuplets.  Now, if some
folks don't got enough kids and others got too many, the answer is obvious.
If H.I.'s so used to stealing....  Well, you get the idea.  And what the
Coens give us a bringing-up-baby sort of comedy done in a manic Joe-Bob-
Briggs style.
     I think while he was making this film, the cameraman must have lived on
black coffee and motion-sickness pills.  In fact, the same might be true of
most of the major actors.  The Coens have a way of telling a story that is
fast and staccato.  The camera moves in fast, jerky motions, making the
viewer feel as manic as the characters.
     The film grinds up biker movies, the prison system, other people's
kids, the parents of other people's kids, and just about anything else that
gets in its path.  The film is fast and it's funny.  And it's not like most
of the other comedies out there.  Rate this one a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Chandramukhi (1993)
     Well, to start with, much of what I say here is purely conjecture.
I am writing about a Hindi film made for the Indian market that was not
subtitled.  (In what follows I am not talking about Indian films
intended for an international market like those of Satyajit Ray.  I am
speaking of the sort of film that makes up the huge volume of
entertainment films made for neighborhood theaters in India.)  For
someone who does not speak Hindi, this means that enjoying the film
requires some guesswork ... but not nearly as much as you might think.
It requires a lot less guesswork than would watching a non-subtitled
Chinese film, for example.  A Hindi film will almost always have a
surprising amount of English in the dialogue.  Certainly it is enough
to give clues every now and then of what is going on.  A character will
use a phrase like "half-breed" or "Chinese torture."  Also, the plots
are not difficult to figure out.  Indian domestic films are aimed
rather low with fairly simple plots, often carried by action.  Every
film is a musical--approximately every half hour there is a big
production number.  Most are in large part comedies--even if the rest
of the film is suspense or horror.  When seen in theaters almost all
run about ten minutes shy of three hours but have a ten-minute
intermission.  When traveling in India, I recommend taking in a film or
two as an alternative to sightseeing in the hot sun while being chased
by aggressive touts.  You may learn more than you might expect about
Indian culture.  CHANDRAMUKHI was a film I went to see in India, but it
had finished its run and we ended up seeing DAALAL instead.  I probably
would have enjoyed CHANDRAMUKHI more since it is more fun than any of
the films I did see.  This is not to say it is actually good.  For
quality of filmmaking it is roughly on a par with our SANTA CLAUS
CONQUERS THE MARTIANS.  And that is not intended as a dig.  Standards
and audiences are very different in India.
     In any case, do not take what I say about this film as being
absolutely true since holes are filled in with conjecture and
inference.  But here is what the plot seems to be....
     The film opens with gangsters making a plot of some sort.  From
context, it is probably plans for a kidnapping.  Also, we appear not to
be in India but in East Africa someplace; it looks like Kenya.  The
scene flashes to some boys living in the Indian community who are
friends and ride their bicycles together looking at the wildlife.  One
of the boys is Raja.
     The scene flashes to an alien world or heaven--I am not sure
which--where we see some celestial beings.  It is not clear if they are
supposed to be aliens or something supernatural, but they are
sufficiently advanced that from our perspective they are magical in one
way or another.  I will assume they are magical and supernatural.  One
female, Chandramukhi, goes flying.  She has the flowing silk dress you
might associate with a Chinese goddess, at least in a Hong Kong film.
But I mean she really goes flying ... without benefit of any
equipment ... like Superman ... and runs afoul of some sort of flying
demon--we will see more of him later--who shoves her to make her fall.
Fall she does, all the way to our planet.
     Upon landing she is chased by the criminals for some reason you
need to understand Hindi to follow, but she is discovered by Raja.  So
the story comes down to one of the title character using magic (in the
tradition of "Bewitched") and helping the kids against the gangsters.
And she is a good ally to have.  She shoots magical rays from her eyes;
among the things she does is make angry people meek and friendly, not
unlike Obi-Wan Kenobi,  By just gesturing she cleans up Raja's bedroom.
Then when she is hungry she eats telekinetically.
     Does all this seem a little simplistic?  Is this not enough plot
for you?  Okay, she magically ages Raja to an adult.  Now he has to
come to terms with an adult body as well as gangsters.  At the same
time.  The makers of this film apparently knew that they had almost
three hours to fill and were more concerned about the danger of letting
the story slow down than about making its being difficult to believe.
Indian neighborhood audiences want a good time, not a whole lot of
credibility in a film story.  There are some nice whimsical touches
that come across the language barrier.  One of the gangsters is half
Indian and half English so calls himself "a half-breed."   And being a
half breed he dresses like Horst Bucholtz in THE MAGNIFICENT SEVEN.
But that is still not all, since I have not even mentioned the lost
civilization that captures everybody.  This script is not one that
anyone would call restrained.
     What can you say about the style of a Hindi film?  This is a film
that has had everything lavished on it but money.  The special effects
are poor even by American TV standards.  Generally a scratch on the
film is used for a ray blast.  Martial arts skills are created,
brazenly cheating, by running the film backwards.  The only things
polished are the musical numbers.  That is pretty close to par for a
Hindi film.  Indian audiences demand big musical sequences in every
film, some to sing along and some to go out for snacks.  This film has
a whole production number before the opening credits.
     CHANDRAMUKHI is a film you have to meet halfway, like most Indian
domestic films,  If you catch it in when you are in the right mood, it
can be fun.  And it may tell you more about Indian culture than you
expect.

Title
Review for I Woke Up Early the Day I Died (1998)
     CAPSULE: An escaped mental patient loses the loot from a robbery
and goes on a search for it.  This is basically a silent film.  It
often borrows its style from Chaplin and other comics, plus adding some
manic style of its own.  Do not expect to see much Ed Wood here.
Rating: 3 (0 to 10), high -1 (-4 to +4)
   - Hollywood really is the place where dreams come true.  Clearly
     with the renewed popularity of Ed Wood somebody wanted to have a
     new Ed Wood film to cash in with.  Supposedly this is a lost
     script from Ed Wood.  There is little about I WOKE UP EARLY THE
     DAY I DIED to remind one of Ed Wood's style (or lack thereof).  If
     this unfilmed Wood script really exists not much of it seems to
     have made it to the screen.
   - A lot of familiar people in small roles.  Billy Zane is the star,
     going from a huge-budget film called TITANIC to a very low-budget
     film.  He is actually better as a comic actor than a serious one.
   - Some scenes could be out of an Ed Wood film so either parts really
     are by Wood or are made to be in his style.  But there are not
     enough of those.
   - No dialog except on pieces of stock footage.  The claim was that
     this was the first time that was done.  Actually it wasn't.
   - Tippi Hedren, John Ritter, and Bud Cort in small roles.
   - A lot of slapstick.  (Anyone remember Wood even putting
     intentional humor in a film?  His films usually took themselves
     very seriously.)
   - Hip and occasionally funny but unlikely to be authentic.  Not
     funny enough to deserve a good rating.

Title
Review for Dangerous Liaisons (1988)
     It is the France of Louis XVI and the aristocracy has turned sex into a
game like chess with strategy and tactics.  The Marquise de Merteuil seems
prim and proper, but behind the facade she is a conniving power-monger who
on a whim can destroy the lives of those around her.  If less capable of
escaping notice for his sexual manipulations, no less adroit at the
manipulation is the Vicomte de Valmont.  The Marquise, to get revenge on a
former lover, suggests that the Vicomte seduce the innocent 16-year-old
fiancee of the lover.  But the Vicomte considers seduction of the innocent
too small a challenge; instead, he will attempt seduction of the truly
virtuous and proposes to bed the highly moral Madame de Tourvel.  The
Vicomte then proceeds to accomplish both challenges.  and the film becomes a
sort of sexual "Mission Impossible" as under a cultured facade this
merciless game of strategy and tactics takes place.
     Based on the stage play LES LIAISONS DANGEREUSES and the 1782 novel of
the same title by Choderlos de Laclos, DANGEROUS LIAISONS comes to the
screen beautifully directed by Stephen Frears.  Losing the immediacy of a
live on-stage performance, Frears takes full advantage of the new medium by
making use of the most perfect facial expressions by John Malkovich as the
Vicomte and by Glenn Close as the Marquise.  Even if such expression were
possible in the stage play, it would be lost on all but the first few rows.
The film also stars semi-actress Michelle Pfeiffer, who is as out-classed by
Close and Malkovich as her character is by theirs.  Frears uses her as
little more than a mannequin.  It is unfortunate for her sake that she and
Frears were content to let her give such a flat performance in a film in
which there was real direction and acting going on.
     In fairness, I should mention that Malkovich has been criticized for
using such an American accent for his role.  Why he has been singled out I
am not sure.  In the syntax of cinema French accents are often used rather
than subtitling when the characters would realistically be speaking French.
Frears did not follow the convention and I was not bothered by it.  I
wondered whether an actor as plain-faced as Malkovich could play a man women
found so seductive as the Vicomte.  This too I never questioned while
actually watching the film.
     If the very most basic plot is a little too much like some of those
incompetently made French sex-romps that show up on late-night cable,
everything else is first-rate in this production.  I would give DANGEROUS
LIAISONS a +3 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Red Heat (1988)
          Capsule review:  Arnold Schwarzenegger plays a Soviet
     policeman teamed with a laconic Chicago cop Jim Belushi in
     Walter Hill's latest police chase film.  That's the high
     concept and the rest of the details are filled in just about
     the way Hill filled them in in 48 HOURS.  Enjoyable as a
     summer throwaway.  Rating: +1.
     Cop films are in this year.  Maybe it was the automatic success of even
the very weak BEVERLY HILLS COP and the marginally better LETHAL WEAPON.
The most popular formula for the police film is the "odd couple."  That's
where you have two mis-matched partners who learn to love and respect each
other.  LETHAL WEAPON was a case in point, THE ENFORCER was another.
Formula number two is the lone cop who discovers the force is corrupt and
weeds out the bad guys.  BULLITT may have been one of the first, but there
were plenty more like SHARKY'S MACHINE and BLUE THUNDER.  The third popular
plot is the "outsider."  That one is like a COOGAN'S BLUFF and a ROBOCOP
where someone of questionable value proves his worth.  If you want to
stretch a point, RED SUN fits in here and in category number one.  Walter
Hill combined plots #1 and #3 to make 48 HOURS; he has returned to that plot
combination for RED HEAT.
     In Moscow, perestroika has turned into booming drug traffic.  Ivan
Danko (played by Arnold Schwarzenegger), a muscle-bound Moscow policeman, is
dispatched to Chicago to pick up an escaped pusher.  He is chosen because he
is already on the case and perhaps because his English is better than his
Russian.  In the U.S. he ends up teamed up with a wisecracking partner
played by Jim Belushi.  Together they find themselves in the kind of chase
Walter Hill films are famous for: violent, funny, more often lethal, and
with plenty of car chases--or rather in this case, a bus chase.
     Hill's great understanding of Soviet culture shows up almost
immediately with a scene of an apparently co-ed public bath house supposedly
in a country where nudes in art are considered pornography.  Of course,
without this scene the film would have almost no female nudity and
authenticity does not sell tickets.  Then there is the obviously authentic
Austrian accent his Moscow policeman has.  And just to get the audience in
the right mood, the opening credits have the 'R's and the 'N's backwards and
no crossbars on the 'A's.  O guess that really captures the Soviet feel.  On
a more positive note, Hill tells a reasonably enjoyable story with enough
action to make the film exciting rather than realistic.  RED HEAT is,
however, notable for not being really anti-Soviet.  The Soviets are shown as
occasionally having effective, if brutal, means of ridding their society of
criminals.  But, hey, Hill's audiences have nothing against brutal or they
would not still be Hill's audiences.  RED HEAT could use a few new touches
besides the choice of the origin of the outsider cop, but it tells its story
competently.  Rate it a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Licence to Kill (1989)
          Capsule review:  More action, less campy self-parody is
     the by-word of the latest Bond film.  There is almost too
     little humor in this hard-edged adventure film involving
     Bond's vendetta against a Panamanian drug lord.  Rating: +2.
     Operative 007 had been getting older and softer as the series
progressed.  The series had lost its hard edge.  In the early days, Bond was
a sort of all-purpose thug for the good guys fighting people who were
basically grandiose hoods toppling missiles or holding cities for ransom.
Later he lost the hard edge and became a sort of fop.  His foes were people
wanting to start nuclear wars and/or kill everyone in the world.  And the
stories became more campy and more silly, with more idiotic special
equipment and more and more obvious product placements.  Around the time
they made MOONRAKER, the series hit bottom.  After MOONRAKER, somebody must
have seen that the series needed rethinking.  Since then the plots have been
better constructed, but there has been an uneasy blend of the tongue-in-
cheek with some tighter storylines.  The choice of Timothy Dalton, with a
face like a Swiss Army knife and a sharp edge to match fueled speculation
that the series was going back to hard adventure.  LICENSE TO KILL is the
least fanciful Bond film ever made.  James Bond is no longer the lucky but
greying fop; he is young and vital and angry.  But for a couple of stagey
stunts toward the end of the film, this is a surprisingly serious action
film.
     There is a lot of story in this 133-minute film.  Even the pre-credit
action sequence advances the main story.  It is rare that it ever does and
this time it really is an integral part of the plot.  Bond is helping old
friend Felix Leiter(played by David Hedison, who becomes the first actor to
play the role twice) catch Sanchez, a Central American drug lord.  Things go
extremely wrong and Bond finds he has a serious vendetta against Sanchez
(played by Robert Davi, whose pockmarked face adds a touch of realism).
Bond must track the drug lord to Panama (thinly disguised under the name
Isthmus) where Sanchez ruthlessly holds his own empire through schemes
involving drug-running, evangelists, and Contras.
     The credit sequence is once again stunning in spite of the instantly
forgettable credit song by Gladys Knight.  Michael Kamen's score is not up
to the classic John Barry efforts, but it gets the job done.  Some aerial
stunts are impressive though driving stunts tend to be a weak point in the
film.  The characters lack some of the interest value of those in FROM
RUSSIA WITH LOVE, the only other Bond film with any credibility.  LICENSE TO
KILL is a sign that the Bond series is improving.  I give it a +2 on the -4
to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Alienł (1992)
          Capsule review:  Fury is a dreary, ugly prison colony
     planet, made up of "double-Y-chromosome" criminals who have
     rediscovered monastic life.  To this planet comes Ripley and
     her alien.  And Ripley's nightmare starts over.  ALIEN 3 will
     probably kill the series.  Director David Fincher's previous
     major credit is music videos for Madonna.  Rating: -1 (-4 to
     +4).
     In 1979 Ridley Scott directed ALIEN.  Scott had previously directed the
moody story THE DUELLISTS.  The inspiration for ALIEN was the weird
surrealist paintings of H. R. Giger.  The world Giger creates has the feel
of an alien culture, the feel of a mind incomprehensible to humans at work.
In 1986 James Cameron directed ALIENS.  Cameron had directed TERMINATOR.
His inspiration was apparently to show how a company of marines reacts when
faced with something like the alien threat of the first film.  While many of
the sequences are lifted from the previous film, Cameron brought complexity
to the character of Ripley and had a reasonably complex plot.  Now 20th
Century Fox has made ALIEN 3.  For a director they got David Fincher, who
has had a successful career directing music videos and television
commercials.  The inspiration appears to have been an empty slot at the
beginning of the 1992 summer release schedule.
     I thought the first film was the best of the series and the second film
was a step down.  It borrowed whole sequences and ideas from the first film.
Also it seemed to sidestep very lightly the moral issue of the earth people
stealing and transforming a planet already colonized by an intelligent alien
race.  It is genuinely surprising and more than a little disturbing how many
of the audience were rooting to see the aliens exterminated because they
were hostile to humans and not cute and dewy-eyed.  Unintentionally, ALIENS
was an intriguing test of whether the audience would still buy into
attitudes that had caused major foreign policy failures in the past.  (And
the answer was an undeniably "YES!"  Audience cheered ideas as blatant as,
"Let's withdraw and nuke 'em from orbit."  Perhaps what it showed was that
in the end we are just only to those we find appealing.)  There were many
who preferred the second film for its realistic treatment of marines in
space.
     The third film is easily the weakest of the three.  On one of the
ugliest planets ever portrayed in film, human criminals and an alien tear
away at each other in the cinematic equivalent of a pit bull fight.  The pit
is Fury 161, an evacuated lead mine and prison colony.  There the worst
outcasts of the galaxy have been isolated and have formed a sort of monastic
order living in the lead mining facilities.  They have no weapons and, to
make the place even uglier, they all have to shave their heads because the
planet is infested with lice.  On this delightful planet crashes Ellen
Ripley (played by Sigourney Weaver), the future equivalent of Typhoid Mary.
When deaths start occurring on Fury 161, Ripley realizes what she has done
but--for reasons never explained--still refers to tell the inhabitants even
while people are being killed.  Most of the rest of the film is running and
screaming through the ugly lead mine.
     Fincher has filmed ALIEN 3 with a lot of superficial attempts at style.
The foundry seems like one big dark and ugly basement.  One or two scenes
with odd camera angles, shooting up or down on characters, would be welcome.
Fincher, perhaps used to short music videos, does not seem to know that
eventually this becomes very tiresome.  The plot takes a long time to
advance and in the first half is also short on action.  Without sympathy for
Ripley from previous films and some minor flashes of humanity from the
prison doctor, the film is without sympathetic characters at all.  The
screenplay is by three people with two different conjunctions: it is by
David Giller & Walter Hill and Larry Ferguson.
     This is a film that I can recommend only to people into the "Alien"
series as a series.  (And since this is a third director with a third
concept and a third style, this is much more loosely a series than it might
be.)  As a film it is no better than much of the low-budget productions that
show up only on cable.  I rate this one a -1 on the -4 to +4 scale.
The way the alien is killed ranks with one of the most absurd sequences I
can think of in a major science fiction film, and is arguably inconsistent
with previous entries in the series.

Title
Review for Fortress (1993)
     I went with friends to see this one.  They had coupons.  It was a
dollar to get into the movie and twenty-five cents for popcorn.  My friend
Dale got the popcorn.  When the film was over I told Dale I hoped he had
gotten a dollar's worth of popcorn because he hadn't gotten twenty-five
cents' worth of film.
     Okay, that is a bit of an overstatement.  But certainly this was a film
that is better to have seen than it was to be seeing it.  There was a breed
of science fiction writing called "space opera" because it was really just a
bad Western or "horse opera" translated to a science fiction story just by
making substitutions.  FORTRESS is not really a science fiction film at all
but a bad prison film thinly disguised as science fiction because it takes
place in the future.  The plot is one long string of prison film cliches.
We have the good guy who is sentenced to prison unfairly for breaking an
unjust law.  He is threatened and abused by the sadistic prison warden while
the tough prisoners want make hamburger out of him.  The toughs try beating
up on him and can't.  Meanwhile he wins the hearts and minds of all the
prisoners but the toughest con and he proves he has guts by taking a
punishment intended for a weaker friend.  But he still has to prove he is
the top of the pecking order by fighting the biggest and meanest of the
prisoners.  By the skin of his teeth he beats up the tough and has him in
his power, but... surprise... he shows mercy.  And on and on ad nauseum.
This is a plot built of one cliche after another.  Except it doesn't take
place in some jerkwater prison in the present, it takes place in Tomorrow.
In this future the ZPG folks AND the pro-life folks have both gotten their
way.  The law in "one woman, one pregnancy."  Our hero tried to have a
second baby after their first baby died.  So into the clinker husband and
wife go.  The prison is privately owned by sadists who somehow can run this
ultra-modern electronic prison on the $26/day/inmate they get from the
state.  This prison may be uncomfortable, but it sure is fancy, and how they
run it on $26/day/inmate is beyond explaining.
     Christopher Lambert did a decent job as Tarzan in GREYSTOKE.  That is
mostly because there seems to be something strange about him that is hard to
put a finger on and there would be with Tarzan also.  But generally he just
is not a very good actor.  In this film his acting seems particularly wooden
as he plays John Brennick, the lone wolf standing up against a society gone
wrong.  Loryn Locklin plays Brennick's beautiful blond wife, loved by
Brennick and lusted after by the nasty warden.  She is bland but she can
speak her lines and does not bump into the furniture.  Kurtwood Smith who
seems to be making a career of playing stern villains (like the
unsympathetic father in DEAD POETS SOCIETY) here plays the prison warden.
As it turns out there is a little more to him than meets the eye at first,
but nothing that is very interesting.  Still admittedly he is a better actor
than either Lambert or Locklin.  Lincoln Kilpatrick--trying hard to be
Morgan Freeman and nearly succeeding--plays a wise old inmate.
     Stuart Gordon who is better known for horror directs, but the drab
prison motif robs this film of the black humor that his REANIMATOR films and
his PIT AND THE PENDULUM had.  About the only aspect of this film that is
above rather than beneath expectation is the art direction and set design.
The prison really has a decent look.  I just wish a better story was written
to take advantage of the look.  My rating for this is a high -1 on the -4 to
+4 scale.

Title
Review for Anaconda (1997)
     When I reviewed RUMBLE IN THE BRONX and said that I did not
particularly like the movie, one person wrote me to say that not every
film has to be so serious and that Americans make very few "fun" films.
That came to me as something of a shocker since I had thought that the
majority of feature films made in this country in the 90s were "fun"
films, or at least intended that way.  I grew up when the 50s science
fiction films were hitting television and for me a fun film is
something not unlike Jack Arnold's THE CREATURE FROM THE BLACK LAGOON.
Arnold's Amazon opus is not a good film by any objective standard but
is a sort of a dark pleasure.  The new ANACONDA is not even enough
unlike THE CREATURE FROM THE BLACK LAGOON, borrowing a good deal of its
plot.  For me more pleasure than watching Jackie Chan kick somebody or
gliding over them in a hovercraft is seeing a snake the size of a small
traffic jam making mincemeat of an expedition to the Amazon.  Not that
ANACONDA is even a well-made rip-off of CREATURE and it would be more
enjoyable with a better script, but it passes as a decent film.  It is
the sort of film that I peg in the back of my mind as a "drive-in"
film, though in my part of the country the last drive-in died several
years ago.  The script of ANACONDA borrows much of its plot from THE
CREATURE FROM THE BLACK LAGOON, with a nod or two to MOBY DICK and
JAWS.  But let us face it, it is fun to see a recreation of a
primordial battle between humans and some giant force of nature.
     The film opens with some young filmmakers on the Amazon planning
to make a documentary about a legendary tribe of people, the People of
the Mist.  Immediately we know there is trouble brewing since these
people would not be safe on the Amazon even if there were no giant
snakes around.  We have Terri Flores (played by Jennifer Lopez of BLOOD
AND WINE and in the title role of SELENA).  She is leading the
expedition, believe it or not.  Her cameraman is Danny (played by Ice
Cube).  Why do I have the feeling that Ice Cube would last on the
Amazon just about as long as an ice cube would last in the Amazon?
What passes for adult supervision is Dr. Steven Cale (Eric Stoltz) who
seems to know a little of lore of the river, but mostly from books.
There are several others, just as hopeless.  And as someone who has
actually been stranded on the Amazon in an outboard canoe ... without
gasoline ... and with an Amazon storm blowing up, I could tell at the
beginning that snake or no snake these people are not all coming back.
In a nick of time they pick up somebody real who knows the Amazon.
Paul Sarone (Jon Voight) is a Paraguayan snake hunter who has some idea
about how to handle the river without getting killed.  Unfortunately he
has a plan of his own.  He wants to capture alive a forty-foot anaconda
he has reason to believe is living in a little traveled tributary.
(Actually for those interested, a forty-foot anaconda is not that much
of a stretch.  These aquatic boas have been reported to actually reach
to lengths of thirty feet and the largest may never have been seen and
reported.)
     Eric Stoltz is a good actor, but the script does not give him
nearly enough to do.  He is the logical descendent of the Whit Bissell
character in THE CREATURE FROM THE BLACK LAGOON.  Actually is
surprising that with three names credited to the screenplay and at
least two more people who worded on the script, there should have been
more to the story than a patchwork of other films.  But the characters
are flat and uninteresting, with one exception.  Jon Voight is a
terrific actor and his Sarone is what keeps the film watchable between
snake attacks.  The role is something of a departure for him and the
hardened Amazon Paraguayan with the down-turned mouth and the
understated manner of talking really is the best thing about ANACONDA.
The snake isn't too bad either.  The snake is done as a combination of
animatronics and digital animation.  Somehow the animatronics work
better.  The film was directed by Luis Llosa who must have been an
obvious choice for the producers as his last four films were two action
films (SNIPER and THE SPECIALIST) and two documentaries about the
Amazon.  But Voight was the most solid choice.
     I cannot give the film a high rating, but it was watchable and
between the snake and Voight's performance I did not feel cheated.  I
rate it a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Kid, The (2000)
     Russell Morely Duritz (played by Bruce Willis) is an image
consultant.  He is very successful at this.  Unconcerned, he uses
his talents to make society's slimeballs acceptable to the public.
His assistant Amy (Emily Mortimer) tries to get him to reform him,
but he ignores her efforts.  Lately however, Russell's life does
seem to be unraveling.  He is seeing a red bi-plane flying overhead
and occasionally buzzing his convertible.  Nobody else seems to see
it.  There is a young child who seems to be breaking into Russell's
property.  But proof that what is happening is not in the realm of
the natural is that this Rusty (Spenser Breslin) turns out to be
Russell at age eight.  This is an opportunity for Russell to see
himself at age eight and come to understand better where he came
from.  Rusty gets a chance to see what he will really become: no
wife, no dog, in short a loser.
     Questions about what is going on in this film come in two
types.  One type is things that we can gloss over with the
explanation it is all magic, the other flavor is real logic flaws.
We can say that the fact Russell has very little memory of this
strange interlude is magical.  Part of the process is wiping the
memories clear.  It is a lot harder to explain why Russell remembers
so little of his life at age eight.  It is almost like he is delving
into the life of a stranger.
     DISNEY'S THE KID is light fantasy of the sort that when it
works, you get a magical film like a BEING JOHN MALKOVICH or even a
JOE VERSUS THE VOLCANO.  Here the magic makes the story run, but the
magical never takes hold of the viewer.  It seems like a strange
complaint but this film has a serious lack of Wonder and the
Wonderful.
     Bruce Willis and Spencer Breslin do act well together.  There
is a certain chemistry between them.  They do play off each other
well.  Lily Tomlin is present to be a voice of reason, Janet,
Russell's righteous secretary.  Similarly principled is Russell's
assistant Amy played by Emily Mortimer of THE GHOST AND THE DARKNESS
and currently of LOVE'S LABOUR'S LOST.
     Spoiler...Spoiler...Spoiler...Spoiler.. .
     I think the breezy summertime look of this film belies its
actual origins.  We have the story of a man nasty to people in and
out of his profession.  He is happy to go through life with no human
ties except to his employees whom he abuses.  He has little thought
about the future he is making.  Then through supernatural agencies
he is confronted with his past, his present, and his future.
Suddenly he knows what he wants in life and it transforms him into a
loving and generous man.  He will be good to his employees and will
have human ties.  Isn't this a plot we have seen someplace before?
Maybe it might be connected to some December holiday?

Title
Review for Jacob's Ladder (1990)
     Within the space of a few short months Bruce Joel Rubin has had two
films he has written released.  Each deals with death.  GHOST had a few
heavy horror moments but they were counter-acted by a lot of lighter and
more pleasant moments.  "Pleasant," however, is not a term applicable to any
single sequence in JACOB'S LADDER.  While it probably has the more
intelligent and demanding story, JACOB'S LADDER is a Gordian knot of
unpleasant concepts.  It is a story of disturbing horror requiring some
effort and detective work to come to any consistent interpretation and then
open to multiple interpretations.  This is one weird movie.
     It is October 6, 1971, and a company of American soldiers in Vietnam is
getting ready to move into battle.  Suddenly something is going very wrong.
Some of the men are convulsing; others are running around fighting as if an
enemy, whom we do not see, is right there on top of them.  One of the
soldiers, Jacob (played by Tim Robbins), is bayonetted in the stomach and
left for dead.  Flash forward several years and Jacob is a postman living in
a surrealistically squalid New York City.  Sights that the audience finds
ugly or even terrifying seem commonplace in Jacob's everyday existence.  But
things are happening that are not commonplace for Jacob.  Something is
stalking Jacob, or perhaps someone who can call up faceless demons.  And, as
if that were not enough, the world seems to be deteriorating and people are
mutating in some mysterious ways that only Jacob sees.  Jacob is even a
little unstuck in time as images from the past flood on him as if they are
the present.
     This is an unpleasant and uncomfortable horror film to sit through, be
warned.  It improves a great deal on thinking about it afterward.  Just as
is true with many of the individual scenes of this film, so too when the
entire film is over we are tantalizingly unsure of exactly what we have seen
and how it is to be interpreted.  Adrian Lyne, who directed FLASHDANCE,
FATAL ATTRACTION, and 9-1/2 WEEKS, photographed this film in murky, muted
colors, much as FLATLINERS was photographer, but his visual style picks out
the squalid and the disturbing.  Murky colors are an intelligent ploy to get
around audience insistence on color photography but still have mood effects
that one usually can get only with monochrome.  I rated this film a low +1
leaving the theater, but it improves greatly on reflection and at this point
I would rate it a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     As early as when Jacob is dropped off at the locked subway station, I
started thinking this was a re-working of Ambrose Bierce's "Occurence at Owl
Creek Bridge."  I left the theater assuming that was correct.  However, that
would imply that the entire future is fictional.  But Jacob's entire
knowledge of The Ladder is from the future.  Yet Jacob has already seen the
convulsions that are explained only by The Ladder.  If the convulsions are
real, we must interpret The Ladder as real.  If The Ladder is real then some
of the future is really happening also.  Suddenly the story is less like the
Bierce and much more like CARNVAL OF SOULS, where the soul survives and
assumes it is still alive and the living take it for a living soul.  The
faceless demons could even be a direct borrowing of the carnival dead in
CARNIVAL OF SOULS.  Well, if you're going to borrow, borrow from the best.

Title
Review for Roxanne (1987)
          Capsule review:  Funny, intelligent updating of CYRANO
     DE BERGERAC has something to say about the nature of beauty
     without ever failing to entertain.  Unfortunately, Martin's
     script cops out at the end, denying the audience the power of
     the end of CYRANO.
     Steve Martin's new film has the best plot of anything he has done to
date.  But the credit, of course, does not go entirely to Martin's
screenplay.  In fact, ROXANNE is an updating of one of the great plays of
French theater, CYRANO DE BERGERAC.  It is a good enough play that Martin
could have coasted through his version and still have had a marvelous film.
Instead, he broadens the humor and makes Cyrano de Bergerac--renamed
C. D. Bales--perfectly at home as the ever-perfect chief of the world's most
incompetent fire department.
     Bales has an old problem and a new problem.  His old problem is that he
has an absurd-looking four-inch-long nose.  That problem he pretty much
under control.  That is because he is unmatched as both a wit and a fighter.
Nobody makes fun of that nose for very long.  His other problem is that he
loves the new-in-town astronomer Roxanne (played by Daryl Hannah).
Unfortunately, Roxanne wants Bales only for a friend.  She really has eyes
only for Christopher, a handsome but vapid new recruit to the fire
department.
     Christopher is low-brow and crude, but is physically attracted to
Roxanne.  Knowing he is too clumsy to woo her by himself, he asks for help
from Bales.  Bales coaches Christopher to say the things that Bales wishes
he could tell her himself.  To be able to say to Roxanne everything that he
feels, Bales is willing to let Christopher reap the advantages.
     ROXANNE represents one more step for Martin away from his off-the-wall
origins and into making comedy of some lasting value.  Updating CYRANO DE
BERGERAC was a clever idea and is one that works.  One complaint, however--
when ROMEO AND JULIET was updated for WEST SIDE STORY it was the *whole
story* that was updated.  They did not soften the ending.  Martin insults his
audience by denying them the powerful and tragic end to the story.  Probably
at the beginning he was planning to include it because he made Bales a
firefighter rather than, say, a stockbroker.  But at some point he changed
his mind, apparently to make the film more commercial.  The film remains a
light throwaway summer comedy instead of a powerful adaptation of Rostand
that the final scene of CYRANO could have made it.  Rate it a +1 on the -4
to +4 scale.  Good, but watch the Jose Ferrer version of the original if it
comes up on PBS.
POST SCRIPT:  It may be of some interest that Cyrano de Bergerac really
existed.  He was at once one of the greatest swordsmen and one of the
greatest wits in France.  He did have a nose of prodigious size, about which
he was extremely sensitive.  He is also credited as being the first major
science fiction novelist.  His VOYAGE TO THE MOON was the first real science
fiction novel to use its concepts not for allegory, but for sense of wonder.
He thought of, on his own, several means of getting humans to the moon, most
of which were absurd by modern standards, but the one he invented for his
book (and which nobody is recorded as having thought of before) was to use
rockets.  Science fiction historian Sam Moskowitz devotes the first chapter
of his EXPLORERS OF THE INFINITE to Cyrano de Bergerac.

Title
Review for Innerspace (1987)
          Capsule review:  FANTASTIC VOYAGE crossed with FOUL PLAY
     makes for another science fiction comedy cut from the same
     mold as BACK TO THE FUTURE.  INNERSPACE does not always make
     sense, but it is just about always fun.  (Spoiler warning:
     major elements of the plot are presented first as minor
     surprise plot twists.  Read the following at your own risk.)
     Two years ago Steven Spielberg's production company had a big hit with
a light science fiction comedy, BACK TO THE FUTURE.  Success is not
something that Hollywood takes lightly. so presumably it was not long before
Spielberg had a second film, cut of much the same cloth, on the drawing
boards.  Well, INNERSPACE is out and very probably it will be a hit of equal
or almost equal strength.
     INNERSPACE, directed by Joe Dante, is a light-hearted film which can
easily be taken as a prequel to FANTASTIC VOYAGE.  Tuck Pendleton (played by
Dennis Quaid) is a "right-stuff" sort of pilot who feels he never got the
recognition that astronauts have gotten, so he volunteers to be the first
human to be miniaturized and injected into another creature--in this case, a
rabbit.  Through an absurd chain of events he is instead injected into
neurotic grocery clerk Jack Putter (played by Martin Short) who happens to
be in the wrong shopping mall at the wrong time.  Pendleton must make
contact with Putter and together they race against time to stop a weird
assortment of freelance spies who want to steal the secret of
miniaturization and sell it to the highest bidder.  One, we are told, has
already made a fortune by selling the secret of Velcro to the Persian Gulf.
     Pendleton's abilities to enhance Putter's own powers start impressive
and eventually get absurd, while the characters are really only
superficially developed and at times are totally absurd.  At one point,
Putter takes time out from a race against time to do a little jive dancing
around Pendleton's apartment.  The film sometimes relies too much on
slapstick scenes and goofy chases, but at other times it makes very clever
use of its premise to create some exciting action scenes.  And the script
does leave room for the Spielberg trademark (malfunctioning mechanical arms)
and some Dante trademarks (cameo roles by Dick Miller and Kenneth Tobey).
The film is packed.  It has science fiction, comedy, chases, really weird
situations, and really weird characters, and it just keeps delivering.
After the film has already run long, it rolls the end credits before its
story is even finished.  Not a great film, but good light entertainment; it
gets a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Prince of Darkness (1987)
          Capsule review:  A very demanding and very rewarding
     horror film.  Horror and science fiction combine together to
     make a film for real long-standing horror film fans only.
     Lots of old stuff but a lot that even the long-time fans have
     not seen before.  The last half-hour is a let-down, but it is
     hard to imagine an ending fitting the buildup.  Rating: +2
     A lot of horror films are coming out about now.  Released in one
weekend are both PRINCE OF DARKNESS and NIGHT FLYERS.  Earllier this year
Clive Barker directed and wrote HELLRAISER.  BELIEVERS, based on a respected
horror novel, came out this year.  Then there were a number of minor pieces
of the NEAR DARK ilk.  Horror, I understand, sells well on videocassette, so
it is pretty tough for a horror film to lose money.  I was vaguely aware
that the aforementioned PRINCE OF DARKNESS was from John Carpenter, but he
has had a spotty career.  I like his DARK STAR, HALLOWEEN, THE THING, and
maybe a few others.  His most recent, BIG TROUBLE IN LITTLE CHINA, was a
good idea that went amazingly bad.  But then things are not always what we
expect.  PRINCE OF DARKNESS, for example, turns out to be the best thing
that Carpenter has ever done.  It may well be the fantasy film I will want
to remember from 1987.
     For 2000 years the Brotherhood of Sleep have kept secret what
Christianity was *really* about--have kept secret the true nature of evil and
of the Devil, a secret with roots far older than humanity.  Now, 2000 years
after they discovered the secret, it is becoming important to understand it
once more.  The laws of physics are changing and the focus of all that is
happening is one small rundown church in Los Angeles.  There a group of
scientists, their graduate students, and a priest are trying to unravel the
mystery of what is happening.  And what is happening will tie together
particle physics, mathematics, and orthodox Christianity.
     PRINCE OF DARKNESS has everything it needs but the payoff.  The final
third of the film is good Carpenter-style suspense, but it fails to live up
to the promise of the first two thirds of the movie.  If it had, this would
have been an excellent science fiction film as well as a good horror film.
As it is, PRINCE OF DARKNESS is rich in ideas and has some good suspense to
boot, but doesn't quite deliver.
     I really enjoyed the film, but have to give this film a qualified
recommendation.  It takes a lot of effort just to understand as much of what
is going on as the director wants to show you.  There are many scenes that
are deliberately disturbing and a lot more that are violent, though it has
been pointed out to me that there is very little actual blood.  If you
haven't seen many horror films, you may not find this one worth your effort;
there are a lot of other good films out there.  If you have seen a lot of
horror films, you will recognize little ideas here and there from (are you
ready?) DRACULA, THE EXORCIST, THE THING, THE QUIET EARTH, THE LEGEND OF
HELL HOUSE, THE NIGHT OF THE LIVING DEAD, ESCAPE FROM NEW YORK, FIVE MILLION
YEARS TO EARTH, THE KEEP, and THE TERMINATOR.  Yes, there are recognizable
ideas inspired by each of these, yet there are so many new ideas in this
horror film that the familiar ones are outnumbered.
     The name of the man who crafted all these ideas into a single
screenplay is Martin Quatermass.  Perhaps that is a pseudonym and even a
film reference.  Since some of the images, like the marauding street
schizophrenics, are reminiscent of images out of Carpenter's ESCAPE FROM NEW
YORK and ASSAULT ON PRECINCT 13, it is at least conceivable that the film
was written by Carpenter himself.  In any case, it is often hard to follow
exactly what is happening; the film makes the audience work a little.  And a
little knowledge of paradoxical 20th Century physics helps to set the
atmosphere (that's a remarkable statement all by itself!).
     If you are tired of seeing old ideas rehashed in horror films, PRINCE
OF DARKNESS will show you a lot you haven't seen before.  You people (and
me) who wanted to see a horror film of power in Clive Barker's HELLRAISER:
sorry, Barker didn't deliver, but PRINCE OF DARKNESS is what you were
expecting.  I'd give it a high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     DISCLAIMER:  As might be obvious, a film that audaciously plays with
ideas will appeal to me more than to the viewing public at large.  A prime
example is LIFEFORCE, itself a film that gave a science fictional alternate
interpretation to traditional beliefs.

Title
Review for Leonard Part 6 (1987)
     Back in the mid-to-late 1960s, NBC-TV had the highest-rated television
show.  The show was I SPY starring Robert Culp and Bill Cosby.  These were
still the early days of color television for many people and I SPY had
enjoyable plots and was filmed in interesting locations like Hong Kong or
Mexico.  The stories were good (at least for American commercial
television), and the locations were great, and Cosby was terrific as
Alexander Scott, the Rhodes scholar turned wise-cracking secret agent.  He
was the number two man to Culp's Kelly Robinson.  Well, in those days you
were more interested in the second man anyway.  The first guy was dull as
white bread.  Think of THE MAN FROM UNCLE, STAR TREK, Martin and Lewis,
Abbott and Costello, Rowan and Martin.  The top banana is there to give the
audience someone to identify with and the second guy is the one with the
real personality.
     Cosby was great as an irreverent spy.  He was what you would get if you
took the "Beverly Hills Cop" and injected him with 60 more IQ points and
about a gallon of class.  The idea of an Alexander-Scott-like character as
Cosby knows how to play him in a spy adventure is a pretty good idea.  Well,
Cosby has returned to the spy business in a film called LEONARD PART 6.
Neither the title nor the poster really encourages me that this is the film
I could have hoped for.  The credits do list Tom Courtenay (who played the
title character in LONELINESS OF THE LONG DISTANCE RUNNER and the powerful
Strelnikov in DOCTOR ZHIVAGO).  The film also stars Joe Don Baker and Moses
Green, who has real dramatic abilities.  So what kind of a film has Cosby--
who also starred and provided the story--put together?  He has put together
a film that shows exactly what he thinks will sell.  He has put together a
film aimed at a seven-year-old's mind  He has wasted Gunn and spit on
Courtenay.  Anyone who has any respect for Cosby should be forced to watch
this film to see what Cosby thinks of his audience.
     Cosby plays a super-super-secret agent who has saved his country five
times before in five stories that (mercifully) have never been told.  He has
now been retired for seven years doing little but be rich.  The film is
filled with lots of "rich lifestyle" jokes that were boring in ARTHUR and
are worse in LEONARD.  And in the rich jokes is where Courtenay gets used,
as Leonard's butler!  An evil force is controlling small animals like
squirrels and frogs and getting them to kill people.  The CIA asks for
Leonard's help but he is too busy trying to win back his ex-wife.  He is
also having trouble with small animals, but with him it is the shrimp his
ex-wife is throwing at his face.  Hey, if you get the giggles seeing people
pour food on Cosby, this is the film for you.  Well, eventually Leonard gets
his act together enough that he is ready to go after the baddies.  That's
when the film starts to go downhill.
     And talk about product placements!  There is a certain brand of
flavored sugar-water that Cosby hawks when he isn't movie-making, so why
should he stop when he is?  But of course he does it realistically and
artistically.  In one action scene he opens a refrigerator in a fancy
restaurant's kitchen and it is full of cans of the stuff--more than the
restaurant would use in two years!  In another scene, he is in his
fantastically well-appointed exercise room in his mansion and there is a
vending machine for the stuff.  Why he'd put a vending machine in his own
exercise room is never explained.  But the best placement is where he is
having a conversation with someone and is holding a bottle of the stuff
(where he finds it in glass bottles anymore, I have no idea!) placed so it
is the part of the scene nearest the camera.  He is holding the bottle so
that the name is centered for the viewer.  And he is holding it at the
bottom third of the bottle in a way nobody holds a bottle, but he has to
hold it that way so his hand does not cover up the name!  Oh, yes, another
scene is backstage at a theater and there, piled up, are literally hundreds
of bars of soap of an easily readable brand..  Just why an acting company
needs several hundred bars of soap is unclear, particularly since this
particular soap is recommended for hands only.
     Being fair, this film does have a few funny gags.  I am going to be
generous and give it a low -1.  After all, it is the holiday season and also
Cosby has done good work a couple of decades back.

Title
Review for Ninotchka (1939)
     1939 was a classic year for MGM studios.  Along with THE WIZARD OF OZ
and GONE WITH THE WIND, Ernst Lubitsch directed Greta Garbo in what is
probably the best remembered film from either career, NINOTCHKA.  The story
pokes fun at politics in the Stalinist Soviet Union.  In the title role
Garbo plays a Soviet envoy sent to Paris to clear up some problems in the
sale of some jewels from Tsarist Russia.  Initially a political fanatic and
patriot, she finds herself falling in love with a gigolo (played by Melvyn
Douglas) and with Western decadence in Paris.
     I had a chance to hear a 1939 radio adaptation of the film, complete
with laugh track, just recently and after the fall of the Soviet Union.  You
would think that after the film's attitudes about the Soviet Union have been
vindicated, that the dogma Ninotchka recites would sound even sillier.  Au
contraire.  The Communism may have failed, but what sounded like absurd
Soviet political correctness in 1939 just sounds politically correct in the
1990s in the United States.  The supposedly indoctrinated Ninotchka would be
very much at home in the 1990s United States.
     Let's look at Ninotchka in the first part of the Lubitsch film.  Start
with the basic situation.  Three Russians in Paris are waiting on a train
platform for an envoy from Moscow and suddenly realize, to their surprise,
that the envoy is the plainly dressed Garbo.
Kopalski:   If we had know we would have greeted you with flowers.
     Ninotchka is always practical.  On seeing the suite of rooms her
predecessors had rented in the fancy hotel:
Ninotchka:  Ninotchka: Do you know how much a cow costs, Comrade Iranoff?
     These conversations were apparently amusing to 1939 audiences.  Replace
Russia with a corporation and we could be hearing Melanie Griffith in
WORKING GIRL.  Even more so at the end of the scene, when Ninotchka has
already formulated an action plan and sends Kopalski to get the best lawyer
in Paris and Iranoff to get her the section of the Civil Code on properties.
In 1939 this was very unusual characterization for a film.  Today it is
nearly cliche.
     Ninotchka seems obsessed with hard facts and figures, to the amusement
of Leon (played by Melvyn Douglas).  They have the following exchange in the
street when they first meet.  Ninotchka is flat and expressionless
throughout and very businesslike:
Ninotchka:  Correct me if I am wrong.  We are facing north, aren't we?
Ninotchka:  No, I am looking for the Eiffel Tower.
Ninotchka:  I am interested in the Eiffel Tower from a technical standpoint.
Ninotchka:  Ninotchka (still deadpan): How long does it take a man to land?
 ...
Ninotchka:  Ninotchka (still deadpan): I'm interested only in the shortest
            distance between these two points.  Must you flirt?
     These days a response stronger than "suppress it" might be given, but
still her reactions do not seem at all out of keeping with the United States
in the 1990s.  the same conversation ends with:
Ninotchka:  You're very sure of yourself, aren't you?
Leon:       Well, nothing's happened recently to shake my self-confidence.
Ninotchka:  Your type will soon be extinct.
     The rhetoric is somebody's idea of Stalinist rhetoric, but the concerns
seem quite modern.  One final exchange to show Ninotchka's 1990s pride at
being able to take care of herself and her unwillingness to be dominated by
others:
Ninotchka:  I was wounded before Warsaw.
     The irony, of course, is that while the Stalinist system that NINOTCHKA
was satirizing has fallen, the attitudes that were being lampooned have not
fallen with it.  The revolution that Ninotchka was so committed to at first
may indeed still be taking place.  Ernst Lubitsch may have thought he was
only poking fun at another country, but he was actually poking fun at the
future.  He probably never expected the day would come when Ninotchka would
seem the most normal character in the film.

Title
Review for Star Trek: Generations (1994)
     There are two kinds of "Star Trek" fans.  There is the kind who
like action and special effects and the kind who like a well-thought-
out science fiction idea.  The most popular "Star Trek" films are the
ones aimed at audiences who want to turn off their minds and just have
a roller-coaster ride.  In a small unofficial poll the best-liked "Star
Trek" film is STAR TREK II: THE WRATH OF KHAN.  That film is built
around a completely absurd plot device called the "Genesis Effect" that
seemed to create and instantly evolve life on barren planets, moving
suns in place as needed.  The film did have good action and special
effects, however, and many of the fans were not troubled by the film
being built around a poorly-conceived premise.  STAR TREK GENERATIONS
should please the people who liked WRATH OF KHAN and should irritate
the set of fans who were irritated at that film.  This time the story
is built around something called the "Nexus."  This thing is described
as a scientific phenomenon, but as used in the film it is pure pixie
and fairy dust.
     As the film opens, Captain Kirk and other members of the Corpulent
Space Corps are guests aboard a brand new Enterprise under the
fledgling Captain Harriman.  The ship is not really provisioned to
travel, but then this maiden voyage is intended only as a three-hour
cruise.  We all know, however, that the Enterprise's enterprises never
run smoothly.  This Enterprise is unexpectedly called to a rescue
mission.  Things do not go well for Harriman and most embarrassing of
all for the new captain is that old Captain Kirk is, for the first time
in his career, sort of killed.  Unfortunately, Spock is not along to
help Kirk through that trying first death.  Meanwhile, 78 years later,
the Next Generation crew is involved with a similar rescue.  Curiously,
they seem to rescue one of the same people that the earlier Enterprise
rescued.  He is one Dr. Soran (played by Malcolm McDowell), an inhuman
non-human with his own plans for the weird temporal phenomenon that
chews planets, attacks Starships Enterprise, and especially likes to
suck up captains.
     This is a film with a plot that goes in for quantity rather than
quality.  One film that is less than two hours long involves two
Enterprise crews, renegade Klingons, enemy Romulans, an interstellar
temporal thingee, a sailing ship, Jean-Luc Picard's family, a Christmas
tree with odd ornaments, a new chip that greatly modifies Data, two
different Enterprises on the brink of destruction, Captain Kirk's long
lost love, some very funny-looking eggs, and a mad scientist.  That is
just a bit too much for everything to gel.  What works the best are the
acting--which most of these people can do in their sleep--and those
special-effects action sequences.  The space battle scenes are always
impressive on the big screen, though hardly original.  One sequence
involving the Enterprise and the planet Veridian III actually is
breath-taking.  Not all the visuals work out so well, however.  When
blown up to ten feet across, Data's make-up looks not enough like the
covering of a machine and way too much like clown's greasepaint.  But
in general the look is more polished than the script deserved.  To have
so many nice special effects lavished on the film and yet to have such
a poorly thought-out script is a very negative indication of the
filmmakers' opinion of their audience.  Unfortunately the "Star Trek"
people probably do know their audience only too well.
     This film is a triumph of style over substance.  It is far more an
exercise in sci-fi than science fiction.  I give it a high -1 on the -4
to +4 scale.  I have to be honest and say that I walked out of the
theater thinking this film was at least decent, but as the film started
to gel in my mind and I realized some of the gaping holes in what I had
seen, I realized this script had far too many problems to get near a
camera.
     SPOILER SPOILER SPOILER SPOILER SPOILER SPOILER
     I would like to say a little more about why this thing called the
Nexus has no place in a science fiction film.  The Nexus seems to have
attributes usually ascribed only to Heaven.  It is a physical
phenomenon that seems to pluck people out of our universe and somehow
plop each person right into the best of all possible parallel universes
for that person.  There the castaway has things like a ready-made
family.  Picard has a wife and children who are not at all surprised to
see him suddenly appear.  Kirk, who has been in the Nexus for 78 years,
seems to have just arrived.  Kirk and Picard apparently manage to
escape the Nexus only by wishing to be elsewhere.  (Perhaps they
clicked their heels together and said "There's no place like
Veridian.")  The concept is great for fantasy fans but has little to do
with physics or any other science.  It is an idea full of
contradictions that seems to have been contrived only to give Soran a
motive for his crimes--so it is a nice place to be--and to have Kirk
and Picard come together in time--so it is a temporal phenomenon.  Room
is certainly left for a sequel since the interstellar transtemporal
space ribbon is still zapping around out there were no one has gone
before.  Of course leaving room for a sequel in a "Star Trek" film is
redundant.
     Besides the foolishness of the main premise--and the fact that 47
people are pulled out of the heaven-like Nexus and 78 years later the
Federation seems to have forgotten that the Nexus exists--there are
other problems in the script.  In one sequence Picard is crawling only
very slowly through the hole in the rocks and is fired upon.  There is
no way he could have moved fast enough to get out of the way of the
explosion, yet he sustains not even a scratch.  A rocket fired from
Veridian III to its sun seems to hit its target in seconds.  In fact,
based on timing we see, the filmmakers apparently thought the sun wasa
small ball less than a mile overhead--this is a giant step backward in
cosmology.  The bug in Geordi LaForge's glasses is still broadcasting.
Will he ever discover it?  All these touches seem speak more of the
first draft of a script than of a finished product.  To have so many
people working on the film and not to have anyone asking basic
questions like "how do the captains get from the Nexus back to Veridian
III?" indicates to me a very cynical attitude of the Star Trek
organization--and this is the product of an organization, not just a
few script-writers--toward science fiction fans.  They have taken the
attitude that their audience cares about visuals and not intelligence
or even the basics of continuity in scriptwriting.

Title
Review for Cité des enfants perdus, La (1995)
     The plot is almost as bizarre and complex as the characters.  Evil
Krank (played by Daniel Emilfork) has lost the ability to dream and as
a result is aging before his time.  He can preserve his life by
kidnapping children and stealing their dreams.  To do this kidnapping
he has a band of video-enhanced henchmen called Cyclopes.  They steal
children and bring them to his fortress in an off-shore oil derrick.
There he keeps a philosophical brain alive in a tank and is tended by
six identical clones (all played by Dominique Pinon seamlessly rematted
into the same frame as many as seven times since he also plays a diver)
and their dwarf mother (Mireille Mosse).  Pitted against Krank is One
(Ron Perlman), an inarticulate carnival strongman looking for his
adopted little brother who has been kidnapped.  He is joined by a young
thief Miette (Judith Vittet) from the local band of child criminals
ruled over by the villainous Octopus, a pair of Siamese twins played by
Genevieve Brunet and Odile Mallet.  Now have I left any of the weird
character out?  Yes, lots of them.  But I do not have the space to list
them all.
     The film is the brainchild--or is it the enfant terrible--of
Jean-Pierre Jeunet and Marc Caro, who in 1991 gave us DELICATESSEN, a
popular but not fully realized post-holocaust comedy.  This time they
have created a film that will be hard for them ever to match.  This is
a creation that is so full of visual wonders that it really needs to be
well-dubbed since the eye is much too busy to read subtitles
translating the French.  The visual style is very much like that of
Terry Gilliam in BRAZIL with if anything a darker sense of humor.  But
the density of images is somewhere between that of BRAZIL and THE
NIGHTMARE BEFORE CHRISTMAS.  (I saw the trailer for the film perhaps
eight times before I noticed the screaming faces in the green nightmare
smoke!  That is just the kind of film it is.  By comparison 12
MONKEYS's imagery i simplistic.)
     The film has a nifty set of sequences that work like something out
of either Rube Goldberg or "Mission Impossible."   One sequence asks
the question if you want to get into a locked room, why would you start
by grating cheese onto the floor?  Another follows a miraculous set of
events that shut down a city because one tear flew through the air.
This is a film of often jaw-dropping imagination.  Few faces will be
familiar to American audiences, though it does star Ron Perlman of TV's
"Beauty and the Beast" and CRONOS.  Daniel Emilfork will be a pleasant
surprise for audiences who have not seen him before, though he did make
an excellent devil in the surprising horror film, THE DEVIL'S
NIGHTMARE.
     For those with a taste for the unique or who just want to be
weirded out by the creatively bizarre, this is an amazing film.  Mostly
for its originality I give it a high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Do the Right Thing (1989)
     Spike Lee, who charmed the critics and audiences with the low-budget
SHE'S GOTTA HAVE IT, then disappointed people--at least me--with SCHOOL
DAZE, has made his third film and this time his work is both entertaining
and important.  Lee clearly did the right thing when he made DO THE RIGHT
THING.  This film is really the anatomy of a race riot.  And it is a film in
three dimensions.  When it was over the kids from a black family sitting in
front of me were disagreeing whether the blacks were at fault or the whites.
I found myself thinking how wonderful to have a film with conflict and
without having the good guys and bad guys spelled out for me.  In fact,
nobody is entirely right and nobody entirely wrong.  That is what life is
like.  Lee is a good enough director that he makes some blacks and some
whites likable, and some of each not likable.
     DO THE RIGHT THING follows about 26 hours in the life of a neighborhood
in the Bedford-Stuyvesant section of Brooklyn.  Most of the action centers
around Sal's Famous Pizzeria.  Sal himself (played by Danny Aiello) does not
seem at all like the sort of person who would be the center of a race riot.
He has a genuine affection for the people in the nearly all-black
neighborhood.  He takes pride that the local kids grew up on his pizza.  Yet
in the space of a few short hours on a hot summer day, small irritations
would boil over into violence.  Tantalizingly slowly, Lee shows us how that
happens.  We get to know the neighborhood and particularly an old drunkard
nicknamed Da Mayor (beautifully played by Ossie Davis).  But this film has
many major characters and several stories being told at one time.  Lee has
given himself a major role as a black man working out his problems and
frustrations.  He has resisted the temptation to make himself either a good
guy or a bad guy.  He plays just one more person in the neighborhood.
     One of the more interesting subplots concerns the mini-grocery run a
Korean couple.  The locals wonder why this little grocery has proved so
profitable when black businesses so often fail in the same neighborhood.
Some of the locals are unsure just what their attitude is toward the
Koreans.  Do they resent them, admire them, or what?  And the question will
become even more pointed when the night brings violence.
     Issues of attitude come up through the day as groups in the
neighborhood come in contact with each other in numerous permutations.  The
issues are not just black versus white, but also whether violence is ever
right.  The film even concludes with contradictory quotes from Martin Luther
King and Malcolm X on the justification of violence.  This may not be the
best film of the summer, but it is the most ambitious.  It is this year's
MATEWAN, low-budget but satisfying like few high-budget films.  This is an
R-rated, perhaps a little strong for the children in the audience, but they
seemed to have gotten a lot out of it and the adults even more.  I rate it a
high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Broadcast News (1987)
          Capsule review:  A winning romantic comedy also takes
     some reasonably good shots at the television network news
     business.  James L. Brooks (TERMS OF ENDEARMENT) has made an
     adult film with solid characters.  Rating: +2.
     In fairly short order Twentieth Century Fox has brought out two "what
goes on behind the scenes" films each by a director of a film that won an
Oscar for Best Picture.  Each is a glossy, high-budget production and that
is where the similarity ends.  Oliver Stone's WALL STREET is unoriginal and
predictable and has poorly developed characters.  What WALL STREET has to
say about the world of high finance you already know.  You probably already
know everything about network news you will learn from BROADCAST NEWS, but
along with the social statement you will get three interesting characters in
one of the best love-triangle films since PHILADELPHIA STORY.  Nobody is
reduced to being "the other man" or "the woman."  Instead you have three
well-defined characters who do not grow tiresome.  BROADCAST NEWS is 131
minutes long, but characters like these could have carried a film twice as
long.
     Holly Hunter--every bit as energetic as she was in another great
comedy, RAISING ARIZONA--plays Jane Craig, a high-tension news producer who
usually works with reporter Aaron Altman (played by Albert Brooks): high IQ,
low charisma.  Along comes the network's new anchorman Tom Grunick: sincere,
hard-working, and good-looking, but he doesn't always understand the news
he's reading.  Any bets who Jane ends up with?  Don't bet.  This is not a
pat, predictable comedy of the type we get so many of these days.  The
characters are three-dimensional and have minds of their own.  James L.
Brooks wrote, produced, and directed the film, undoubtedly getting backing
on the strength of his TERMS OF ENDEARMENT.  I personally did not respond
well to the characters in that film, but BROADCAST NEWS offers a much better
choice.  Two of the three leads are supposed to be highly intelligent and
Brooks manages to write them so they really seem to be, as well as all three
being just quirky enough to be real.
     BROADCAST NEWS is a sign that the film industry is starting to recover
from the post-STAR WARS decade and is starting to go back to making films as
adult audience can appreciate.  I would hope it would be nominated for Best
Picture at least, though it would not be my choice to win.  Rate it a +2 on
the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Another Day in Paradise (1998)
     CAPSULE: The overly familiar story of a gang of criminals hitting
the road.  After initial success mistakes and internal tensions take
their toll.  The moral is, of course, that crime does not pay.  What
makes this one worthwhile is the fact that James Woods just sizzles.
Also starring Melanie Griffith.  Rating: 7 (0 to 10), low +2 (-4 to +4)
   - Larry Clark, director of KIDS directs a script by Christopher
     Landon and Stephen Chin, based on the book by Eddie Little.
   - There is little variation in James Woods's screen persona, but he
     does it so well.
   - Mel (James Woods), Sid (Melanie Griffith), Bobby (Vincent
     Kartheiser) and Rosie (Natasha Gregson Wagner).  Uncredited role
     for Lou Diamond Philips as Jules.
   - Bobby and Rosie are junkies.  Bobby supports them with smalltime
     crime like robbing cigarette machines.  When Bobby is almost
     killed Mel saves his life, then realizes he would be useful for an
     upcoming robbery.  Mel decides to mentor Bobby and Rosie.  He
     tells Bobby that a professional thief does not have risks.  He has
     everything planned out.
   - Melanie Griffith plays a likeable gun moll.
   - Echoes of THE ASPHALT JUNGLE and of THEY LIVE BY NIGHT, among
     others.
   - Opens with bloody robbery.  Some scenes are very, very violent.
   - Mel is dictatorial and gets angry fast.  Also can be winning.
   - Mel sets up drug deals with uneven results.
   - Early on the gang is successful and the times are good, but it
     cannot last, and it quickly becomes clear that this is not much of
     a life anyone would want.
   - Woods has a very powerful screen presence.
   - This sort of story is very familiar.  It has been done many times
     before.

Title
Review for Topsy-Turvy (1999)
     The Savoy Theatre, London, March 14, 1885, saw the world premiere
performance of the Gilbert and Sullivan operetta THE MIKADO, quite
possibly the most popular operetta ever written.  Mike Leigh whose
films of late have dealt with the slice of life problems of the lower
classes instead this time tells us the story of the birth of this
operetta, one that almost did not make it to the stage after a
production beset with problems.
     As the film opens Sir Arthur Sullivan (Allan Corduner) is ailing.
As he sees the end of his life coming, he wants to get on to writing
serious music.  Sullivan would like to write a major serious opera.  He
had written the scores for several William Gilbert (Jim Broadbent)
comic librettos, but he has decided that he should get on with his
serious writing while he still could.  Gilbert had come to the end of
creative streak and his new plays were sounding a lot like his old
plays.  Sullivan wished to remain friends with Gilbert, but wanted no
more to do with their partnership.  Gilbert, whom Broadbent plays as
witty without being really intelligent, is bewildered at the loss of
his partner.  In a nick of time a traveling fair from Japan gives
Gilbert the inspiration to set a story in Japan.
     For once it may be good for the viewer to know ahead of time that
the story is leading to the production of THE MIKADO.  Otherwise the
first half-hour or so would seem aimless and pointless.  Watching the
elements collect in the early stages of the formation of a classic is
much like watching the dust collect in the early stages of the
formation of a star.  There is not much to see.
     Speaking of stars, this film has been cast with very few.  Leigh
has chosen mostly lessor luminaries but nonetheless quality actors for
nearly every role.  He intends the draw to be curiosity about the
subject matter rather than to see any well-known actor's next film.  On
seeing the film I had to say that the only face familiar to me was that
of Jim Broadbent, and him I knew from BBC imports.  This is an
intelligent policy with so many good but unknown actors to choose from
in Britain.
     By the second half of the film it is clear what we are seeing.  We
see some extended shots of the preparation, much as we would see in a
current documentary.  In very realistic style we will see three or four
actors on a stage going over the minutiae of how to pronounce the words
of the script and where to put emphasis in the lines.  Acting seems to
have changed very little in 115 years.  Elsewhere we see negotiations
over what will and will not be worn for costumes.  Through it all
Gilbert is demanding to tyrannical.  In one incident he cuts a well-
liked song a day before production making very clear that the cast has
performed it excellently, but that his own song is at fault.  The cast
is willing to take Gilbert's treatment, but rebels because they think
the song should be performed.
     One stylistic problem is the detailed inclusion of a scene in a
bordello.  It seems out of place with the rest of the film and
certainly it would seem that the nudity could be implied rather than
graphic.  The scene seems to be calculated to give the film a more
profitable rating, as there is little else in the film worthy of more
than a PG-rating.  Arthur Sullivan's dilemma of having to choose
between creating popular crowd-pleasing entertainment or high art
revisits an argument carried on in such films as SULLIVAN'S TRAVELS and
THE WHOLE WIDE WORLD.  Leigh who wrote and directed is clearly a fan of
Gilbert and Sullivan as a duo and would clearly vote for Sullivan's
staying with popular art.  Most of the film takes place in rooms, but
the film creates a very credible version of England in the 1880s.
     Mike Leigh gives us a very credible view of what it must have been
like to be present at the production of THE MIKADO.  It gives more than
a little insight into similarities and differences in the creative
process 115 years ago and today.  I give it an 8 on the 0 to 10 scale
and a high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Zebrahead (1992)
          Capsule review:  This is a realistic but far too open-
     ended story of racial tensions that may or may not have led
     to violence.  Story of a white Jewish boy dating a black girl
     and its eventual outcome by neophyte writer-director Anthony
     Drazen avoids being too obviously a Romeo-and-Juliet story,
     but ends up muddling whatever point it was trying to make.
     Rating: low +1 (-4 to +4).
     The setting is Detroit in what was once a middle-class neighborhood.
Now it is run-down, bombed-out, and polluted over.  One guy in the
neighborhood likes to set fire to his lawn and see it burn in jets of flame
from some flammable pollutant in the soil.  These days the people who live
in this neighborhood are people who have no other choice.  The area is
dominated by blacks, with some Asians, Hispanics, and Jews mixed in.  Zack
Glass (played by Michael Rapaport) is a Jew, but his culture and friends are
black.  Zack's father Richard (played by Ray Sharkey) runs a record store.
Richard has two interests in life: making sure he and his son are getting
enough sex, and listening to black music from the 1950s and 1960s.
     Zack's best friend Dee (played by DeShonn Castle) is black.  Through
him Zack meets Dee's beautiful cousin Nikki (played by N'Bushe Wright).
When Zack starts dating Nikki, their friends and family are not sure what to
make of the situation.  There seems to be a suspicion that a white-black
relationship will not work out, but this is not "Romeo and Juliet" or "West
Side Story."  This is not a story of whites and blacks at war, but there are
tensions that set events in motion that do lead to violence.
     ZEBRAHEAD is not a simplistic story.  Even when violence does occur it
is left open to the viewer's interpretation whether or not the violence even
can be termed a racial incident.  Anthony Drazen has shown us the background
for an incident without tying it up and making it simple.  As a first-time
writer and director he has told a story that is probably near his own
experience and his characters both talk and act realistically.  Most are
also acting for the first time and probably playing characters much like
themselves.  The only familiar face is, in fact, Ray Sharkey, a rather good
actor who takes James Woods sorts of roles.  The dialogue and acting are
both quite acceptable considering the overall lack of experience.  Only the
ambiguity of the events of the story works against the film.  However, one
does get to the end of this film expecting some point to have been made a
little more strongly than Drazen has.  The "Okay, so what?" dissatisfied
feeling does not serve this film well.  As a result, I give it a low +1 on
the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Blind Date (1987)
     Blake Edwards has been making comedies for a long time.  He may be best
known for the Inspector Clouseau films that starred Peter Sellers.  Edwards
has turned out a comedy every year or so since the mid Fifties, and since
the early Seventies he has made little but comedies.  Many of his comedies
have been uproariously funny like THE PARTY, but in my opinion he is having
some trouble keeping up the level of his humor and his comedies work nowhere
nearly as well as they once did.  Edwards seems to be running out of ideas
and his films seem to have less and less care lavished on each.
     BLIND DATE has the feel of an hour-long script padded, mostly at the
end, to be a full-length film.  Like INTO THE NIGHT and AFTER HOURS, BLIND
DATE is the story of how much can go wrong with someone's life in the course
of a single night.  After the story of that night, BLIND DATE finds itself
with no story to tell and no place to go.  The rest is just sort of tacked
on.
     Walter Davis (played by Bruce Willis) is a financial executive who
needs to find a date to take to a business dinner.  Against his better
judgement, he allows his brother to fix him up with a woman he has never
met.  To his surprise she doesn't look like the underside of a rock.  In
fact, Nadia (played by Kim Basinger) is a knock-out.  Then he makes his big
mistake.  Against the advice of his brother and Nadia's own reluctance, he
gives her a drink of champagne.  From that point on, Pandora's Box has been
opened and Walter's life would never be the same again.
     There are perhaps two scenes that actually work in this film; the rest
of the film just frames those scenes, and not particularly imaginatively.
Through much of the film people act in totally unexplainable ways on the
weak script excuse that they are drunk, so not themselves.  Often the script
doesn't even make that much sense.  One character spends a good part of the
film driving though store fronts.  The police never stop him and his car
sustains only minor damages.
     These days some very good comedies are coming out, with the current TIN
MEN, RAISING ARIZONA, and perhaps OUTRAGEOUS FORTUNE as prime examples.  If
Edwards is going to trade off of his name and do as slipshod a job as this,
he will soon have to hang it up.  For the sake of a couple of scenes that do
work, rate this one a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Stakeout (1987)
     There are all kinds of police films coming out this year.  The more
notable among them are THE UNTOUCHABLES, BEVERLY HILLS COPS II, LETHAL
WEAPON, and DRAGNET.  The newest addition to the list is John Badham's
STAKEOUT.  STAKEOUT is unlikely to earn at the boxoffice anything like those
four films, yet of the four, only THE UNTOUCHABLES may be a better film.  To
begin with, STAKEOUT is about three-dimensional characters.  THE
UNTOUCHABLES had at least an interesting character in Elliot Ness.  They go
downhill from there to DRAGNET, whose main character is not so much a
character as a voice impression over a smirk masquerading as a character.
Which had believable situations?  None of the four really, but STAKEOUT
does.  There are, perhaps, other virtues that makes THE UNTOUCHABLES a
better film in general, but as a police film STAKEOUT is probably the best
thing we have seen since some of the better films based on Joseph Wambaugh's
novels.  And with so many police films coming out, that is saying quite a
bit.
     Chris Leece (played by Richard Dreyfus) and Bill Reimers (played by
Emilio Estevez) are the kind of cops you rarely see a film about.  They are
neither supercops nor complete screw-ups.  They are just average men trying
to do a job.  They pull an assignment that no cop really wants to get--a
dull stakeout spending nights watching the house of the former girlfriend of
a sociopath who has recently escaped from prison.  It's a dull, stupid job
just watching a house, so they keep themselves occupied by joking with each
other and fighting a practical joke war with the two cops on the day shift.
None of the humor is forced or unrealistic and it comes from the
personalities of the characters rather than being forced into the plot.
Complications set in as Leece gets closer to the girlfriend than police
rules allow and eventually finds himself falling in love with her.
     John Badham is an unpredictable director.  Some of his films work as
well as the clever TV-movie ISN'T IT SHOCKING?, SATURDAY NIGHT FEVER, and
WHOSE LIFE IS IT ANYWAY?.  He can also turn out tripe like WARGAMES and BLUE
THUNDER.  The latter is a police film whose weakest points are just where
STAKEOUT is strongest--its credibility and its human characters.  STAKEOUT
throws in a little more action than it needs, but if you like the genre of
police films, this is the one to see.  Give it a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Gasu ningen daiichigo (1960)
CAPSULE: Toho Films of Japan made this story of a man who could change
from solid to gas and back.  While the English-language version is
hard to find and badly edited, it is a more accomplished story than
some of Toho's later and better-known films.  It makes for a decidedly
offbeat science fiction film.  Rating: 6 (0 to 10), high +1 (-4 to
+4)  This review contains plot spoilers.
Toho Films, probably the premier film company of Japan, is probably
best known for their Godzilla films and some of the finest Samurai
films.  In the late 1950s they produced at least four science fiction
films on the subject of humans who could change their physical
properties.  For some reason they are each also crime films in
addition to being on a science fiction theme.  They made a film in
1954 called THE TRANSPARENT MAN, but it is very hard to find in this
country.  Humans turn into a sentient viscous fluid in THE H MAN.  THE
SECRET OF THE TELEGIAN features a man who can transform himself into
electronic impulses and transmit himself where he wants to go, not
unlike the later British film THE PROJECTED MAN.  The man in HUMAN
VAPOR, their fourth film, has the power to go back and forth into a
state like water vapor.  He can make himself invisible, he can fit
through small spaces and he can ride the wind.
While HUMAN VAPOR did get a 1964 release in the United States on a
double feature with another very different Japanese science fiction
film, GORATH, it is almost unknown in this country.  It also is a film
that is about themes that most American mass audiences cannot
appreciate.  A large part of the motivation of the main character is
his desire support a famous classical dancer and to help her to reach
perfection in her art.  Americans understand lust as a motive, or
love, but it is very hard for us to accept that someone can respect an
art like classical dance to such an extent that it becomes his primary
motivation.  I have always interpreted the story of THE PHANTOM OF THE
OPERA that the Phantom is not physically attracted to Christine Daae
but instead believes through her he can potentially create a perfect
operatic voice.  This is just not a theme that Americans seem to
appreciate, but it is easy to believe that the Japanese would accept
this motivation more easily.
Perhaps another reason this film is not frequently shown is the fact
it is Japanese with a title almost suggesting it is about people
vaporized by a nuclear explosion, making HUMAN VAPOR further seem like
it will be an unpleasant film to watch.  However the American edition
does more to make the film unpleasant than anything in the plot.  In
any case HUMAN VAPOR was poorly dubbed, poorly edited, and poorly
distributed.  For most American fans of Japanese science fiction films
it was unavailable or showed up very rarely on late movies.
In addition the film has been crudely re-edited for American
audiences. The Japanese editing is far superior.  The plot of the
Japanese version has the police facing some crimes that are baffling
to them and to the audience.  Slowly they track down the culprit who
has the strange ability to turn into a gas and return to human form.
The American version begins by telling the secret to the audience,
robbing the film of much of its suspense.  It also appears the
Japanese version lavishes much more footage on the Japanese dance
sequences.  These are very transparently chopped down for American
consumption.  The American editor has done everything possible to
dumb-down what looks like a fine and subtle film for an American
audience.
In the American editing, the film begins with Mizuno (played by Yoshio
Tsuchiya) granting an interview with a newspaper.  It is clear he
knows that this meeting is a trap for the police to catch him, but he
has no fear of the police and he wants to tell his story.  He then
tells how he became the Human Vapor in flashback.  He had originally
been a test pilot or astronaut, but was washed out for health
reasons.  Embittered, instead he takes a job as a librarian.  A
mysterious scientist, Dr. Sano (Fuyuki Murakami), seeks him out
wanting to use him as the subject of an experiment.  Sano lies about
the purpose of the experiment, and Mizuno agrees to participate
without question.  Mizuno is locked in a chamber and appears to be
reduced to a coma.  When he awakes he finds he has "become the Human
Vapor," a man who can at will turn his body into a gas and return it
to its solid form.  He discovers Sano has performed the experiment
several times, but that he was the first test subject who has lived.
In a rage Mizuno kills Sano.
Mizuno turns to a life of crime, robbing banks.  However, he announces
the crimes ahead of time, in order to save lives.  He clearly has no
fear that the police can stop him.  If someone does try to stop him he
can use his powers to make himself invisible, he can escape from the
bank through any tiny hole, and he can float into the sky and ride the
winds.  This makes him almost impossible to kill.  The police track
stolen money to a famous classical dancer Fujichiyo Kasuga (Kaoru
Yachigusa) and her instructor (the miserable looking Somesho
Matsumoto).  Police detective Okamoto (Tatsuya Mihashi), who has been
leading the investigation of the mysterious crime wave, discovers that
Mizuno has been supporting Fujichiyo.  Okamoto uses her as bait for a
trap to catch Mizuno.
The special effects are minimal by modern standards, using mostly
animation and/or smoke to show the presence of the vapor man.  He will
appear as a suit of clothing with smoke rising from it.  It is not
clear that smoke could hold up a suit of clothing, but it looks good
on the screen.  Throughout the 1950s Toho science fiction had used
more intelligence than money to create their special effects.  The
American version threw out the Japanese musical score for the film and
instead uses pieces of Paul Sawtell's score for THE FLY (1958).
Veteran actor James Hong dubs Mizuno.
THE HUMAN VAPOR can hardly be considered a classic of science fiction,
but it certainly has its rewards and is worth seeking out.  I would
rate it a 6 on the 0 to 10 scale and a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Lepke (1975)
          Capsule review:  Minor gangster film about one of the
     most vicious crime lords and the only major American crime
     lord ever to get the death penalty.  Fidelity to the truth is
     generally high with occasion serious lapses.  Similar
     material has been done better.
     I do not watch gangster movies the way I watch other films.  A gangster
film requires homework and, particularly if I am going to watch it on video,
I will stop it and watch parts over.  The reason is that I have a couple of
good sources on American crime.  Robert Jay Nash's BLOODLETTERS AND BADMEN
gives detailed biographies of American criminals.  Nearly as good and
presenting a lot of non-overlapping detail is Carl Sifakis's ENCYCLOPEDIA OF
AMERICAN CRIME.  I listen to historical details in the film carefully and,
if on video, sometimes two or three times.  Before the film I will have read
the primary entries about the characters in the film.  During the film I
will stop and read about the more tangential characters.  I fume about
historical inaccuracies for literary license as if they were facts everyone
knows and has always known, even if I have just read about them for the
first time ten minutes earlier.
     Cinemax this month had LEPKE, the 1975 biography of Louis "Lepke"
Buchalter, produced and directed by Menachem Golan (who would go on to form
Cannon Pictures with Yoram Globus, this film's executive producer).  The
film was made shortly after THE GODFATHER II, undoubtedly to ride that
film's wave of popularity.  Israelis Golan and Globus, apparently not
wanting Italian mobsters to get all the attention, made their film about one
of the most powerful American criminals, who just happened to be Jewish.
Lepke was one of the two or three founding fathers of the American syndicate
and of Murder Incorporated.  Generally the film follows Lepke's career
fairly faithfully, though a number of important details are omitted near the
end.  The worst of them was having Lepke murder Legs Diamond within days
after Diamond saw Lepke kill "Little Auggie" Orgen.  In the film, apparently
Lepke wanted to silence Diamond, so has him stabbed with an icepick while
swimming at Coney Island.  That one I knew was all wrong without looking at
the book.  Nobody knows who killed Diamond, but it was four years after the
Orgen killing and on the second floor of a private in Albany.  Lepke's
friend "Gurrah" Shapiro, who dies in the film defending Lepke, actually
outlived Lepke by three years.  There are probably a dozen other places
where the film contradicts my sources, but those two are the worst.
     Lepke is played by Bernie Schwartz (alias Tony Curtis).  The acting is
sufficient but not outstanding.  Milton Berle takes a rare dramatic role as
Lepke's father-in-law who first welcomes his son-in-law and later comes to
hate him.  ("You're a hoa!  A filthy hoa!" he tells his daughter.)  Some of
the accurate historical detail is worth knowing, like the underhanded
dealings that newscaster Walter Winchell took part in to get stories.  The
same Walter Winchell whose voice may be familiar from narrating THE
UNTOUCHABLES TV show really did get involved in the stories of major
mobsters.  In particular, he took part in the capture and betrayal of Lepke
by J. Edgar Hoover.
     The film was cut from 100 to 98 minutes for cable release, so some of
the film just turns into incoherent violence, but some nice touches remain,
the best of which is a friendly, jolly-looking fellow with a moustache.
When you see him it is generally because in a moment or two he is going to
jovially kill someone.
     If LEPKE was to be a Jewish version of THE GODFATHER, it fell somewhat
short.  Sergio Leone's ONCE UPON A TIME IN AMERICA comes as close to being a
Jewish GODFATHER as any film, and this film is not as good.  Give LEPKE a 0
on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Atlantide, L' (1961)
     This 1961 film seems to appear in the United States most
frequently under the title JOURNEY BENEATH THE DESERT.  It is based
on Pierre Benoit's 1920 novel ATLANTIDA.  That novel is heavily
derivative of H. Rider Haggard's SHE.  Both books had multiple
silent adaptations and each was adapted into a film in the 1960s.
(SHE was adapted also once in the 1930s.)  Each is about a lost
civilization found in Africa and ruled over by a beautiful but evil
female tyrant.  In this film three men crash a helicopter in the
Sahara only to find that caverns underground hide the lost
civilization of Atlantis.  This desert was once under water and
Atlantis was then an island, but the ocean receded and sands covered
the city.  Antinea, the evil queen of Atlantis, holds the men
prisoner.  They are desperate to escape knowing that the desert
above their heads will soon be used for a nuclear test that will
obliterate the lost city.
     The Italian/French production of L'ATLANTIDE was directed by
classic director Edgar G. Ulmer who earlier directed films like THE
BLACK CAT and DETOUR.  Nearly every aspect of this film falls short
of its potential.  The inexpensive sets are small and lack
imagination.  One unimaginative set just has a curtain as a
background and a vase in the foreground.  The musical score is weak
and creates little emotion in the viewer.  The model work is poor
and frequently obvious.  The men's costumes are unimaginative robes
and the women's are just skimpy.  The acting is of the quality of
that of a Machiste muscle man movie.  The dialog in the dubbed
English version is at best uninspired and occasionally overripe.
All of these factors make it hard to meet this film halfway.  A film
like this needs to grip the imagination but this one never quite
achieves a feel of H. Rider Haggard it desperately requires.  This
rates a 4 on the 0 to 10 and a low 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Say Anything... (1989)
     There must be at least a hundred high school dating movies made each
year by Hollywood since there are about two new ones on cable each week.  It
would be very easy to assume that this type of film had been all mined out
and that there was not much more that could be done with it.  But in fact
there is always room in any genre for a film of fresh and well-observed
characters.  Humans like looking at humans and seeing how humans behave.
James Bonds are fun to watch too, or sexy mannequins doing unrealistic
things under some circumstances, but a film that shows fresh and real people
will always be a joy to watch.  SAY ANYTHING is unique and a very human
comedy/drama.
     Diane Court (played by Ione Skye) has it all.  She is class
valedictorian, she has won a prestigious fellowship to study in England, she
is beautiful, and in all probability she has butterscotch in her veins.
Lloyd Dobler (played by John Cusack) is not good-looking and is below
average in his class.  He has no goals except to be a better kick-boxer and
to date Diane.  Sound familiar?  Except for the valedictorian part it has
been done hundreds of times.  Give the film half an hour and you will start
to like this film a lot better, particularly James Court, played superbly by
John Mahoney, who goes from bemused at Lloyd, to protective of his daughter
through a lot more changes until he becomes the focal point of the film.
SAY ANYTHING goes from a teen comedy to a very solid drama of human
interaction.
     The writer/director of SAY ANYTHING is Cameron Crowe, who is best known
for screenwriting FAST TIMES AT RIDGEMONT HIGH based on his novel of the
same name.  That film was about 90% teen comedy but had a surprisingly solid
piece of human drama at its core.  This time the comedy is more even
balanced with the drama.  SAY ANYTHING joins TERMS OF ENDEARMENT and
BROADCAST NEWS as a James L. Brooks produced film. of a woman choosing
between love and loyalty.  That may, of course, be coincidental, but because
each triangle is resolved in a different and believable way, the films make
an excellent trilogy.  Through unlike Debra Winger and Holly Hunter, Ione
Skye cannot quite hold her own for audience interest against the other two
vertices.  While it is not quite the strength of a BROADCAST NEWS (nor
probably TERMS OF ENDEARMENT, though I am not as fond of that film), SAY
ANYTHING does the nearly impossible of making a satisfying film from a high
school dating comedy.  I rate it a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Atlantis: The Lost Empire (2001)
     In the late 1800s there was still a lot of the world that was
terra incognita.  Much of the map had still to be filled in and
adventure stories were being written about fabulous finds of ancient
cities still alive in the far corners of the world.  The greatest of
these stories, in my opinion at least, was H. Rider Haggard's SHE,
filmed in multiple silent versions and at least two sound versions.
Other authors who have written lost race stories include Edgar Rice
Burroughs, Ian Cameron, and A. Merritt.  What science fiction is to
many branches of science and alternate history is to the study of
history, lost race stories are to archeology.  They are the stories
of the imaginative dreams of every archeologist.  (For those
interested in the lost race genre I can recommend the web site
http://www.violetbooks.com/lostrace-check-guide.html.)
     The current film starts at a breakneck pace as a huge wave
rushes foreword to engulf the advanced island-civilization of
Atlantis and some strange flying machines racing it to try to save
the island.  Meanwhile there is something strange and mystical
happening on the island, but not so powerful that it saves the
island from sinking below the waves.
     Flash forward to 1910 or so.  Exploration runs in the family
for Milo Thatch (voiced by Michael J. Fox).  Thatch's grandfather
searched for the lost city of Atlantis.  Milo has his own ideas as
to where the city can be found.  His dedication and energy applied
to this goal has won him a reputation of being a little demented on
the subject.  Then an enigmatic millionaire has his own plan to find
Atlantis with the help of an ancient book thought to be lost but
found by Milo's grandfather.  A new expedition will search for the
city and its mysterious power source.  The expedition will be led by
Commander Lyle Tiberius Rourke (James Garner) and begin with a
descent to the ocean floor in a fabulous submarine.
     The base story by Bryce and Jackie Zabel leaves room for some
spectacular action scenes with an undeniable excitement.  The film
seems to be an H. Rider Haggard adventure in concentrated form.  The
story moves faster and has more action than Haggard would have given
it, but the spirit is there.  One thing that does seem a little out
of place: most lost race stories were told in a serious tone.
Because of the subject matter the stories were rarely told with much
humor.  There is a lot of Disney-style comedy and weird
international characters on the expedition.  (Is the character of
Moliere based on the character of the same name in the ZBS's Ruby
series?  There are definite similarities.)  The writers make the
usual politically correct choice for the presence and ethnicity of
the villain.  The script in the end feels a little top-heavy with
fighting and mysticism.  Some may long for the subtlety of some of
the writers of years past, but overall the film does have its
moments.
     To some extent ATLANTIS: THE LOST EMPIRE is an experiment.
First it is a PG cartoon, unusual for Disney.  The whimsical nature
and the less realistic animation techniques seem less likely choices
for the subject matter.  The style might go better with a humorous
animal story.  Further toward the end of the film a lot of what is
happening is not carefully explained and is left to the viewer's
interpretation.  The film does have some breathtaking images of the
city Atlantis and especially of the great submarine seen all too
briefly in the first part of the film.  The submarine seems like a
cross between Disney's Nautilus and the interior of an airship.
Real submarines don't look like this, but they ought to.
     Once again we have an all-star cast of voices in an animated
film where their familiarity can be only a distraction.  We have
Michael J. Fox in the lead.  We also have James Garner, Jim Verney
(who died in February of 2000), Claudia Christian, Don Novello (who
on frequently played the comedic Father Guido Sarducci), John
Mahoney, and Leonard Nimoy as the King of Atlantis.  While far from
ideal, Atlantis is a good adventure film with at least some of the
nostalgic feel of classic exploration films.  I rate it a 7 on the 0
to 10 scale and a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Hollow Man (2000)
     If Hollywood's makers of summer films can be said to show any
creativity and imagination--admittedly a difficult point of view to
defend--it is in how they manage to takes such a variety of film
premises and turn them into standard borrowed endings.  It is truly
remarkable how many different films build to cliches like the
sympathetic underdogs winning the big game.  The other standard
ending, which if you think about it is only a variation on the first
one, is the sympathetic heroes in a confined space facing and
defeating something that wants to kill, perhaps already has, but
cannot itself be killed.  We saw it in IT! THE TERROR FROM BEYOND
SPACE, ALIEN, ALIENS, HALLOWEEN, and who knows how many more films.
Of the eight films playing currently at my local multiplex three
have unkillable killer endings.  One of them is HOLLOW MAN which
begins as a revisiting of concepts from H. G. Wells's THE INVISIBLE
MAN but in the end is just two people being chased by a perfectly
visible monster and killing him several times only to have him keep
on coming.  The once-respectable Paul Verhoeven should have rejected
the script as inferior, but instead let it be just another step in
his decline.  Besides its striking lack of originality HOLLOW MAN
wastes some of the most interesting convention of the Invisible Man.
     Most invisible man films are all based on H. G. Wells's novel
THE INVISIBLE MAN.  That novel is itself a reframing of the story of
Gyges, which today we remember best through its reference in Plato's
REPUBLIC.  Gyges, a shepherd who comes into possession of a ring of
invisibility, uses it unscrupulously to make himself king.  In the
dialog of THE REPUBLIC Glaucon suggests that god-like power, like
that of Gyges, of necessity corrupts.  These stories look at the
power an invisible man has and frequently examine whether that power
really does necessarily corrupt the person who has that power.  One
important aspect is that he can be virtually anywhere unseen, using
his power in clever ways.  But since this film places the invisible
man in an inescapable deep lab complex (with the exception of one
short sequence) most of the imaginative power of the concept is
thrown away.  There is just too much haste to get to the secure
territory of cliches and ultra-familiar plotting.
     Sebastian Caine (Kevin Bacon) heads up a super secret
government project.  With his ingenious process he already can make
animals invisible.  Ironically his most difficult problem is making
them visible again.  (Perhaps this is also an idea borrowed from
Wells.  As the novel begins Griffin has already made himself
invisible and struggles to find the way back to visibility.  The old
Universal Invisible Man series stretches this quest over multiple
films.)  For Sebastian's discoveries he expects to win a Nobel
Prize.  (Why does every cinematic mad scientist who can grow a
three-foot-long blood-sucking garden slug think that is what they
give Nobel prizes for?)  The military is ready to cut his funding
for lack of usable results so Sebastian decides to experiment on
himself.  He already is a bit of a jerk, will the power that
invisibility gives him exaggerate his character flaws into madness?
Was this plot built from a kit or what?
     This is a film that could have risen to the level of mediocre,
but blows it in the cliched final reel.  Sure, there is a tradition
in films that the hero and the villain survive hazards and
situations that really should have killed them.  The final sequences
of this film go beyond any reasonable suspension of disbelief.  The
writers confuse the concepts of "invisible" and "invincible."
Sebastian goes through a gauntlet that should have reduced him to
the consistency of tapioca pudding, made even worse by him running
around without the protection of clothing, but he keeps on fighting.
The heroes themselves survive treatment only a little gentler.
     The script by Andrew W. Marlowe seems oblivious to the most
basic technical issues about invisibility.  H. G. Wells gave more
thought to the technical questions of invisibility than went into
this film.  This film uses Star-Trek-style double-talk physics to
explain the invisibility in the first place, something like a
"quantum phase shift," but then apparently is going to use chemical
and biological means to bring the guy back.  At one point Sebastian
eats a Twinkie and it is immediately invisible.  Wells knew better.
Sebastian is totally invisible and yet his eyes are apparently still
focusing.  Again Wells knew better.  Even the opportunities for
prurient voyeurism, while absent from Wells, have been handled
considerably better elsewhere.  Jerry Goldsmith probably saw little
effort on the part of the filmmakers to exercise much imagination
and followed suit with what is one of his least memorable scores.
     Not to be totally negative and to give the film its due, the
special effects are uniformly dazzling.  The original series used a
few simple effects that were not entirely convincing.  Most notably
I believe they filmed in a black room an actor with clothing over a
black velvet suit that totally covered him.  Only the clothing shows
and it gives them an image they could lay on top of another shot.
The computer has changed a very great deal.  The visuals here are
flawless and delightful.  Also as is ironically if frequently the
case, even a very bad horror film can have a very good first scene.
(MARS ATTACKS is a prime example.  Most of what is good in that film
is in the pre-credit sequence.) The horror potential of concept of
an invisible predator has never been captured on film so well as in
the first scene of HOLLOW MAN.  That makes it all the more
disappointing how the filmmakers so badly blew the rest of the film.
     For the same budget this film could have brought the invisible
man film into the modern age.  Instead if will hopefully quickly
sink from sight.  I rate this a 3 on the 0 to 10 scale and a -1 on
the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Enigma (2001)
    CAPSULE: Dark and complex espionage thriller based on the 
    Robert Harris novel.  March 1943 the British lose their 
    former ability to decode German messages to their submarine 
    fleet.  They must either get it back or lose an important 
    shipping convoy.  An intelligent thriller perhaps a little 
    too reserved to be thrilling.  Rating: 7 (0 to 10), low +2 
    (-4 to +4)
For thirty years after the end of the World War II Britain's most 
secret weapon remained secret.  Like the US had done with the 
Manhattan Project, Britain had put many of their best minds onto 
their own scientific wartime project.  What they found could well 
have saved the war for Britain.  At minimum it shortened the war 
by at least two years by negating the Germans' most effective 
weapon, the U-boat.  The Germans communicated with their men in 
the field (or in this case the sea) with an incredibly complex 
code called Enigma.  The code was encrypted and decrypted with a 
device of mechanical and electronic components that created an 
unimaginably large number of possibilities that has to be 
considered in decoding the message.
The mathematics necessary for decoding Enigma was considered to be 
orders of magnitude beyond what any country could accomplish, even 
if the closely guarded Enigma boxes fell into the hands of the 
enemy.  What the Germans did not know was that an Enigma box had 
fallen into allied hands and teams of puzzle solvers and 
mathematicians were recruited for the purpose cracking the code.
The team was installed at Bletchley Park under the direction of 
Alan Turing.  For the first time rudimentary electronic computers 
were used to search for and test solutions.  By July of 1941 the 
work had already borne fruit and supply convoys from America were 
saved from submarine wolf packs.  It typically took two days to 
decode a message, but for many of the messages that was short 
enough time.
Then in February 1942 the code changed.  It was still Enigma, but 
a new order of complexity had been added.  The code could not be 
solved.  At the same time the strategy of the submarine packs 
changed.  The Germans could not know how great a setback it was.  
By December the Allied shipping losses had quadrupled.  It took 
ten months to recover the old capabilities and the Battle of the 
Atlantic again turned in favor of the Allies.  And so it remained.
All this is history.  It is history filmmakers have not made much 
usage of, though code breaking was an important part of World War 
II.  The film U-571 told the fictional story of Americans 
capturing an Enigma box and set it much later than the British 
actually did.  The film MIDWAY tells a little about the Americans 
efforts at code breaking.  Robert Harris wrote the novel ENIGMA, a 
mystery story set in and around the Bletchley Park project.  Tom 
Stoppard has adapted the novel into a screenplay and Michael Apted 
directs.
The premise is that in March 1943, the Germans changed the code 
again.  The British have just four days to break the modified code 
before an important convoy from New York will be entering waters 
that may have German U-boats.  Without knowledge of where the U-
boats are there is no way to avoid these waters.  With nary a 
mention of Alan Turing in the screenplay, sullen mathematician Tom 
Jericho (played by Dougray Scott) who had left the Bletchley Park 
project has been brought back onto the project.  He had been 
instrumental in breaking the code the last time, but had since 
suffered a nervous breakdown.  That breakdown was brought on by 
being rejected by lovely co-worker Claire (Saffron Burrows).  She 
was a fellow project member with whom Tom had fallen in love.  Now 
there is evidence that Claire intentionally broke project security 
and perhaps was spying for the Germans.  Tom has a double problem 
of resolving the new German code and looking for the now missing 
Claire.  Helping him is Claire's swatty and bookish housemate 
Hester Wallace (Kate Winslett).  Making life even more difficult 
is sinister and polished intelligence operator Wigram (played 
nicely by Jeremy Northam).
Tom Stoppard's adaptation is better than one might have expected 
retaining some reasonable explanation of the history and the 
mathematical issues involved without obvious expository lumps, 
though by the end of the film some technical problems are going by 
too fast to comprehend.  Perhaps in deference to Apted the script 
has some feminist touches that I do not remember from the book.  
It also has one gratuitous car chase.  John Barry has provided a 
score that is by turns lush and ominous.
An interesting chapter in history could have made for a better 
thriller, but as it stands it is reasonably exciting if reserved.  
I rate it a 7 on the 0 to 10 scale and a low +2 on the -4 to +4 
scale.
People interested in the efforts to break the Enigma can find a 
lot of intriguing material at 
http://www.pbs.org/wgbh/nova/decoding/.  This is information to 
accompany the excellent episode of Nova "Decoding Nazi Secrets."  
Included is a transcript of that broadcast.

Title
Review for I Like It Like That (1994)
     I LIKE IT LIKE THAT is the first major studio film written and
directed by a black woman.  When actually watching the film it
generally flows fairly smoothly, though in retrospect the styles
represented in the film are very much a mixed bag.  To have in a single
film sex scenes verging on slapstick and grim scenes of street violence
makes one wonder if the writer/director, Darnell Martin, was managing
the tone of the film as a whole or in pieces.  It almost seems as if
she was optimizing individual scenes without thinking of the film as a
whole.  The unevenness of tone extends even to the title.  This is a
film with a lot of people at various levels of dissatisfaction which
would much more aptly be titled I HATE IT LIKE THIS
     In a Puerto Rican neighborhood in the Bronx, the street constantly
boils with activity, but nowhere more than the bedroom of Lisette and
Chino (played by Lauren Velez and Jon Seda).  Chino is into marathon
love-making, much to the amusement of the neighborhood and the boredom
of Lisette.  Chino feeds a family of five on a McJob but wants to
provide some luxuries for his family.  A blackout brings what Chino
sees as an opportunity.  Now Lisette has to feed a family of four and
visit a husband in jail on no job at all.  But a rather contrived set
of circumstances gets Lisette a high-paying job in the recording
industry working closely with a slightly sleazy executive (Griffin
Dunne) who is sexually attracted to her.  Rumors of her having been
seen with the executive reach Chino in prison and when he is released
he wants to set matters straight.  What ensues is a comedy-drama of
Lisette's on-again off-again relationship with her husband and the
struggle of the family to pull together.
     At times the film achieves some of the strengths of MARTY as
self-seeking family and friends try to interfere in the relationship of
Lisette and Chino, but with the exception of a surprisingly well-drawn
and acted Li'l Chino, played by ten-year-old Tomas Melly, most of the
peripheral characters are a bit cartoonish.  Griffin Dunne's record
executive is a one-dimensional cliche.  Rita Moreno as Chino's overly
strident mother is magnetic but more in her delivery than in her lines.
Jesse Borego is a bit too swishy and over-the-top as Alex/Alexis,
Lisette's brother, soon to be sister.  Velez's performance as Lisette
is the heart of the story and she does carry the film, though not
always with sufficient help from the script.  One scene of her handling
her tension by suddenly flashing into a dance just does not seem
realistic and Velez handles it as well as any actress could.  Seda only
at times develops a screen presence.
     Martin could well turn out to be a very good director, but her
technique needs refining.  I would give this film a low +1 on the -4 to
+4 scale.

Title
Review for I'm Gonna Git You Sucka (1988)
     [The following review uses frank language to describe the film I'M
GONNA GIT YOU, SUCKA.  If you feel you may be offended, you may wish not to
read the review.]
     Shiiiit!  Hey, brother, you jiv'n me?  I mean I was spectin' this to be
one bad-ass film.  I mean the way some of the brothers were talkin' this
shit was supposed to be like...what was that other thing?  Like AIRPLANE!
Yeah!  Like, man, no way!  I mean these muthah-fuckers who made this thing
don't got what it takes to cut it.  I mean like no-fuckin-how.
     Well, shit.  Like, it wasn't all bad.  Some of it was cool.  I mean the
story had wha-cha-call possibilities.  I mean this dude gets out of the Army
to find his brother gold-chained to death.  That could happen.  Shit,
something like that happened to this dude I know.  But then this story
started messin' around with this big muther-fuckin crime lord called Mr.
Big.  Now you know and I know no muther-fucker is gonna go anywhere with a
name like Mr. Big.  Shit.  They gonna be more brothers laughin' at him than
at fuckin Eddie Murphy.
     So, like this dude has one badass mother.  I mean like when this bitch
gets mad she goes all the way!  Anyway, turns out she used to be like the
main squeeze of this guy who was like Shaft, only his name was Slade.  And
like when Slade hears what's been goin' down he starts actin' like the bald
guy in that MAGNIFICENT SOMETHING movie.  Like, shit, he starts gettin' a
bunch of mean brothers together to go in and wipe out this Mr. Big.  Well,
shit, he gets guys like Isaac Hayes and Jim Brown.  And, like there's a
bunch of funky shit goin down, like makin' fun of other movies.  And that's
cool.  But there just ain't enough of the funny shit and there ain't enough
of the fightin' shit.  No way, brother.  Now you want to see some good shit,
fuck I'M GONNA GIT YOU SUCKA and go see DANGEROUS LIAISONS.  Shit.

Title
Review for Frequency (2000)
     One of the best science fiction films of the 1970s was Nicholas
Meyer's TIME AFTER TIME.  The rather fantastic and dubious premise
of this film was that H.  G. Wells was not only an unknowing friend
of Jack the Ripper, he also had built a real, functioning time
machine.  The Ripper escapes the police by taking the time machine
to 1979 and Wells has to follow and try to capture the Ripper.  One
would think that a time machine and the ability to retrieve
knowledge from the future might be useful in capturing a serial
killer, but Wells finds that it is a mixed blessing.  These same
ideas are revisited in FREQUENCY, albeit without a time machine.
     The film begins October 10, 1999, at a time of solar flares and
sunspot activity.  (The real height of solar activity was April 7,
2000, just three weeks before the national release of FREQUENCY.
Ironically that would have not been good for the script, however,
which was contrived to take place during a World Series.)
Commentators talking about the solar activity point out that string
theory says that time is fluid.  (What that has to do with sunspots
and solar flares in the commentators' minds is not clear.  But it
does set the stage for the story.)
     John Sullivan's life has been overshadowed by the loss of his
beloved father when John was only six years old.  Frank Sullivan
(played by Dennis Quaid) was a heroic firefighter, a great baseball
fan, and above all a very loving father.  Two nights before the 30th
anniversary of his father's death, John (James Caviezel), now a
detective, pulls out his father's ham radio and starts a
conversation with another ham.  What he does not realize at first is
that a freak solar phenomenon has provided him a radio channel
across almost no distance, but across thirty years.  He is speaking
to his father sitting at the same desk exactly thirty years earlier.
The two discuss the 1969 World Series, not realizing that it was for
one an imminent occurrence, for the other a fond but distant memory.
When John realizes what is happening and what he can now do, he
gives his skeptical father the information that he will need to
avoid being killed.  But John will quickly figure out what science
fiction fans have known all along, that tampering with the past is
risky business.  In a nifty Rube Goldbergism of time, saving Frank's
life has allowed a serial killer to avoid a termination of his
criminal career.  And for reasons less coincidental than they first
appear this particular serial killer is going to strike very near
home.  John has to try to manipulate the past through his father and
then see how the world has changed in thirty years as a result of
those changes.
     The time warp that allows a series of conversations between
father and son is acceptable as a reasonable premise for a science
fiction film.  For dramatic effect they have added that one is aware
of the change if and only if one was involved in bringing it about.
This is total bunkum.  The physical universe does not care whose
idea a change in the past was.  Either everybody would remember the
change or--much more likely--nobody would.  But the first would
completely change the plot and the second would rob the film of
drama because John could not know of his own victories in changing
the past.  Towards the end even this rule breaks down and in the
final scene John seems to remember the past he has changed out of,
but not the new past he has brought about.  Everyone else in the
world remembers only the new past.  The ideas need a little
reconsidering.  And then once the ideas are straightened out, put
them in a movie with a more original plot than stopping a serial
killer.  To compound the credibility problem John is put onto a case
with which he would be expected to be emotionally closely involved.
It is an invitation to conflicts of interest and abuse of power.  It
is highly unlikely the police would allow that.
     There is more than a little social comment in the interfacing
of 1969 and 1999.  In 1969 the elder Sullivan had a storybook,
rose-covered-cottage sort of existence.  He has the most totally
functional family we have seen on the screen for a long time.  Two
parents and a child love the heck out of each other.  The family
gives the father strength to go out and risk his life for others
with the complete support of his loved ones.  Thirty years later
John is separated from a woman to whom he never committed.  He still
lives in his parents' house.  His life seems a mess.  Of course,
losing a father may have contributed to that, but it seems he should
be emotionally further advanced.
     One final complaint.  I am less than thrilled to see the
photography of scenes set in my sophomore year in college tinted a
sepia tone as if to indicate great antiquity.  1969 was just not
that long ago. FREQUENCY is better than most science fiction we see
these days.  It has ideas and good pacing.  I give FREQUENCY a 7 on
the 0 to 10 scale and a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Groundhog Day (1993)
     On May 5, 1961, TWILIGHT ZONE ran an episode called "Shadow Play,"
written by Charles Beaumont and directed by John Brahm.  Dennis Weaver
played Adam Grant, a man sentenced to death.  It is the day Grant is to be
executed for murder.  He claims to have a sort of deja vu and can even tell
people verifiable facts he seems to have no way of knowing.  He claims that
he is living the same day over and over.  Eventually he is executed only to
wake up in his cell with the same day starting over.  This idea gets re-used
and explored in detail in GROUNDHOG DAY.
     Phil (played by Bill Murray) is a television weatherman with a funny
on-screen persona.  Of the television he is bitter and cynical and does just
about whatever he can to make himself difficult to deal with.  February 2,
Groundhog Day, finds Phil in Punxsutawney, Pennsylvania, filming the famous
Groundhog Day festivities.  Phil is less than thrilled and is making life
miserable for his producer Rita (played by Andie McDowell) and cameraman
Larry (played by Chris Elliot).  Next morning he wakes up and it is still
Groundhog Day.  Phil is living the same day over and over and making the
same mistakes.  The day becomes like a video game that he plays over and
over, practicing to get past all the hazards of the day.  He uses one
strategy after another trying to find how to get the most out of the day and
how best to benefit from having gone through the day use his experiences of
having already been through the day.
     The script (by Danny Rubin and director Harold Ramis) starts taking on
a higher meaning of just what the purpose of life.  Phil can play his day
for thrills, he can play it to gain self-enrichment, he can play it to get
sex, he can be an altruist, or he can romance Rita.  The latter is
questionable since, first, Rita is a bit sappy herself, but also it is a bit
of a challenge since after Phil has been so nasty way back on February 1, it
seems unlikely that one day would be enough for re-educating Rita.  The
film's conclusion about what the best of all possible Groundhog Days is is a
bit of a  cheat, since it depends very heavily on previous knowledge--life
is not really like a video game--and it is somewhat reminiscent of IT'S A
WONDERFUL LIFE.
     Ramis has an intriguing premise taken just about as far as it could be
taken.  It is pleasant but not particularly deep.  I rate it a high +1 on
the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Wonder Boys (2000)
     Highly reminiscent of NOBODY'S FOOL, WONDER BOYS is another look
at a life unable to move forward--as if stuck in the snow of the cold
snowy town where the character lives.  Both the town and the character
seem to have seen better days.  But while Paul Newman's character never
achieved any greatness in NOBODY'S FOOL, Grady Tripp (Michael Douglas)
at least superficially appears to be living a constructive life that
only now is falling apart at the seams.  Tripp was at one time a great
novelist.  People were inspired by the novel he wrote years ago.  But
his next novel, now about 2600 typed single-spaced pages, gets further
and further from having its plots tied up.  Like the novel, Grady just
wanders.  And things are falling apart.  His wife has just left him and
returned to live with her parents.
     In the meantime he still is teaching Creative Writing at a
Pittsburgh university.  But Grady knows that he can teach no more than
the mechanics of writing.  He is a man who for a living gives useless
advice to others while leaving no advice to himself unignored.  He is
powerless to turn students into great writers, but at least he can
still recognize when one of his students is a great writer.  In this
case he recognizes that divine spark in James Leer (Tobey McGuire), an
innocent young writer who seems to have the spark of greatness.  Grady
will discover that James perhaps is not so innocent as he appears.
     WONDER BOYS is directed by Curtis Hanson from a screenplay by
Steve Kloves, based on the novel by Michael Chabon.  Hanson's last film
was the beautifully textured L. A. CONFIDENTIAL.  That film marvelously
captured the post-war feel of Los Angeles.  Perhaps WONDER BOYS does as
good a job of capturing the academic community in Pittsburgh, but even
if he does, who cares?  His academic world is populated with strange
characters and Grady himself is an anachronism of the 1960s.  He smokes
pot and leads a Bohemian life-style in a large ugly old house such as
one frequently finds on Eastern campuses.  Grady carries on an affair
with Sara (Francis McDormand) the university chancellor and wife of the
head of the English Department and Grady's boss (Richard Thomas, who
seems typecast after THE WALTONS to play literary types).
     This weekend is Wordfest, an annual event at the university when
one-time good writers and their fans get together to admire the sound
of their own words.  It seems at first as if we are to take it
seriously, but it takes one sharp giggle form Leer to make us realize
that we are really seeing a convocation of emperors without clothes.
The head of the English department has revenge against Leer, misreading
the title of Leer's novel to make it sound banal.
     Through most of the film the very randomness and unpredictability
of the plot gives it a realistic tone.  Unfortunately unlike Grady's
novel, clearly someone realized that the ends had to be tied up and a
fairly contrived incident toward the end of the film shakes Grady from
his status quo.  But until then Grady is really afraid to let his life
move on.  He is a coward.  While he has an obvious paternal side,
caring very warming for Leer, he is afraid of parenthood.  Having
proved himself once he exaggerates the effort necessary for the next
step in order to avoid taking it.  It is better to look like he is
attempting a huge feat than to actually proceed and risk failure.  In
this way he can have failure imposed on him by others.  The is a very
different character for Michael Douglas than those he has played
before.
     In spite of the disappointing contrived-seeming ending, WONDER
BOYS does ring true as a picture of the academic literary community.
I rate it a 6 on the 0 to 10 scale and a high +1 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Michael Collins (1996)
     Most political struggles have their romantic heroes and with a
people as naturally poetic or as argumentative as the Irish, it is not
surprising that the fight for independence spawned a great romantic, if
controversial, hero.  The great hero of the Irish struggle in this
century was Michael Collins.  And who better to play him than Liam
Neeson, the Charleton Heston of the 1990s.  Having played larger-than-
life historical figures Oskar Schindler and Rob Roy, the Irish actor
was an obvious choice to play Michael Collins, at least if audiences
were willing to accept the forty-four-year-old Neeson playing a man who
died at thirty-one.
     The film--in good epic film style told in flashback just after the
main character's death--begins with Collins in the 1916 Easter Rising
of the Irish against British rule.  He escapes immediate arrest only to
be arrested later and receive a short term in prison.  Many of those
rebelling are executed, but Eamon de Valera, a major leader of the
resistance (played by Alan Rickman), is given a lighter sentence of a
term in prison. This is probably because of his multi-national
background, having a Spanish father and being born in America.  Collins
begins setting about the sort of activities that will get him back in
prison.  His public speeches for independence win him an ally in the
British police force, Ned Broy (Stephen Rea).  At least by this
account, Collins was impressed by the efficiency and efficacy of
British Intelligence and sets about the task of modeling the new Irish
Republican Army on it.  Collins manages to break de Valera from prison,
but de Valera is clearly envious of Collins's new-found power and the
relationship between the two is strained. With the intelligence Collins
is able to collect about his enemy he is able to outdo the British in
the effectiveness of his attacks.  He invents the sort of tactics that
have become the trademark of the IRA.  For two years he maintains an
urban guerrilla war against the British.  This creates a conflict with
de Valera in which the latter wants more traditional warfare, Collins
prefers his new terrorism.  His struggle ends in the Truce of 1921 and
de Valera sends Collins to England to negotiate for the Irish.  Collins
realizes that the British will make only limited concessions.  He
brings back a compromise treaty that allows for an Irish free state but
partitions Ireland and requires an oath of allegiance to the British
monarch.  The free state is declared and almost immediately breaks into
civil war with Collins defending the treaty and de Valera now on the
side of terrorist war against the British and against a treaty that is
dividing the country both politically and quite literally.
     There is not much in the style of MICHAEL COLLINS but the
combination of old elements.  Through the war against the British the
film draws heavily on the style of THE GODFATHER, particularly with
back- and-forth cutting between some tension-producing scene of
impending violence, to one more placid.  This gives the effect of a
much longer and more drawn-out tense scene.  Another scene at a
football match reminds one very much a similar scene in GANDHI.  Where
the film borrows, it seems to do it well in most instances.  There is
one James Bond-ish escape involving a seemingly nearly impossible
athletic feat done in complete silence.  Here Jordan, who wrote the
script as well as directing, seriously damages the credibility of his
story which elsewhere is reasonably well maintained.  Other places his
taste is considerably better.  He has a love triangle that could have
been a time-wasting plot cliche.  He leaves it in for historical
accuracy, but he wisely downplays before it can become a distraction.
MICHAEL COLLINS is photographed by Chris Menges who won Oscars for his
work on THE KILLING FIELDS (1984) and THE MISSION (1986).  He creates a
surprising amount of atmosphere with what he does not show.  He
frequently has smoke or fog in the frame.  Often part of the frame is
obscured by darkness or shadow.  At least for me some of the dialogue
was similarly obscured by the thick Irish accents.  While Menges's
images dominate the film, Elliot Goldenthal's score stays modestly in
background coloring the film subtly but rarely getting noticed.
     Liam Neeson is a big man and plays Collins as a big man, somewhat
larger than the people around him.  He sweeps into a scene with that
large bulk of his and commands it.  The one serious problem with the
casting is that he never seems as young as Collins needs to be, a good
fifteen years younger through much of the film.  Aiden Quinn as friend
and fellow revolutionary Harry Boland cuts a much less imposing figure.
Julia Roberts is by no means the center of the show here and her acting
appropriately is not either.  She can smile and look appealing and even
can master an Irish accent, but she makes little contribution to the
film that a lessor-known actress could not have done, and very likely
better.  Alan Rickman needs a good director to keep him from chewing
the scenery and he seems to have found a good director in Jordan.  His
acting is neat and precise.  His de Valera seems to be thinking out
each sentence and then delivering with the incisiveness of a scalpel.
One may not like what he is saying, but it seems certain that it is
precisely what de Valera means.
     It is hard to judge the historical accuracy of MICHAEL COLLINS,
since even the Irish are not sure of Collins's role in the fight for
Independence.  There are no obvious contradictions with anything I have
found written about Collins's role in history, though it is relatively
safe for a filmmaker to fill in some of the blanks about a man of
mystery.  It has been suggested that De Valera is shown a bit worse
than the historical figure, but much of this is within the range of
reasonable interpretation and opinion.  And speaking of opinion, mine
of this film is that it rates a high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Rob Roy (1995)
     Like Robin Hood, or for that matter Billy the Kid, Rob Roy
(actually Robert Macgregor--nicknamed Roy for his red hair) was a real
outlaw who has passed into the realm of legend and folklore.  The film
ROB ROY is based on these legends, though no specific source is
credited.  It bears little connection to the Sir Walter Scott novel of
the same name, except that the same outlaw appears in the novel.
Instead, the film is based on historic and legendary accounts of the
outlaw, the best known of which was "The Highland Rogue" by Daniel
Defoe.  On a very high level, the story of the film is accurate, at
least to the legends, although clearly there are pieces of other film
adventures mixed into this film's plot.  The stories say that he did
borrow money for a cattle venture from a former employer, the first
duke of Montrose, who held lands near Rob Roy's.  When Rob Roy was
unable to pay the loan back in 1712, he lost his home and was outlawed.
To survive he turned bandit, mostly preying on Montrose and his tenants
but remaining friendly with another neighbor, the duke of Argyll.
Though the film invents some, this part of the plot is true to the
legend of Rob Roy.
     This film is the stuff of the old matinees of the 40s.  The
decision to make this film was likely inspired by the success of THE
LAST OF THE MOHICANS, and with the exception of that film, it is a
sub-genre we see too rarely these days.  Too often what could be this
type of film comes out more as a poorly-conceived self-satire like the
bitterly disappointing ROBIN HOOD, PRINCE OF THIEVES.  That film had
little accuracy to the legends of Robin Hood, threw in devices like
telescopes that have no place in the legends, and had a Sheriff of
Nottingham playing way over the top.  ROB ROY is a much more
intelligent adaptation of a heroic legend.
     While being the sort of larger-than-life historical heroic
adventure that would have starred Douglas Fairbanks and Errol Flynn, it
respects itself and its source material.  The major stylistic
differences include better photography, a little sex, and a fascination
with the obscure (but obviously considered very important) historical
fact that the period shown predated indoor plumbing.
     The story is much the same as above.  Rob Roy (Liam Neeson) is an
occasional thief who has a strong sense of honor concerning his word.
He is made an outlaw by three particularly nasty (and well-cast) screen
villains, the Duke of Montrose (John Hurt), his assistant Killearn
(played by Brian Cox, Hannibal Lector from MANHUNTER), and, worst of
all, Archibald Cunningham (Tim Roth--Pumpkin from PULP FICTION), whose
slight build and exaggerated effete, foppish manners hide a sadist and
a clever strategist as well as a deadly swordsman.  Rob Roy's wife
Mary, more earthy and less bloodthirsty than Walter Scott's version of
her, is played by Jessica Lange.  The duke of Argyll is played with
dignity by Andrew Keir (who played Quatermass in QUATERMASS AND THE
PIT, a.k.a. FIVE MILLION YEARS TO EARTH).  Finally, as a fellow
clansman, is Eric Stoltz in a real departure for him.  To an American
ear, the Scottish accents are thick enough to make listening an effort.
To me they sounded accurate, but I am willing to take a second opinion
from a Scot.
     ROB ROY has gotten the treatment of a big spectacular.  Karl
Walter Lindenlaub's camera takes full advantage of the Highland
scenery, using wide screen to capture a symmetry in the mountain
landscapes.  His frame typically will be centered between two hills of
equal height at the two sides of the frame with a pleasing downward
curve between for a valley shot.  That speaks of careful camera
placement.  He uses this pleasing symmetry of his shots to
counterbalance the negative effect of the fog-shrouded mountains.  The
opening showing the MacGregor Clan running over the hills seems like an
allusion to the opening of THE LAST OF THE MOHICANS, but in general
Michael Caton-Smith goes for unusual effects.  A key sword fight is
done without underscoring music, leaving the actors to build the
suspense rather than to have a composer create the emotion, an approach
used all too rarely.
     ROB ROY is a well-made heroic adventure film with a little more
sex and grossness than a 1940s MGM adventure film might have had, but
not more than what modern audiences expect.  I give this film a +2 on
the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for War of the Roses, The (1989)
     THE WAR OF THE ROSES is the story of the marriage of Oliver and Barbara
Rose.  It tells how they met, fell in love, married, and raised a family.
But the primary focus of the film is on how the marriage foundered and on
the bitter battle between the two as the marriage dissolves and becomes a
contest of wills during the divorce.  The film gives new meaning to the term
"idiot plot" (the plot that works only because the main characters are
idiots).  In this case, the point of the film--repeated over and over by the
Roses's lawyer, who is telling the story--is that the Roses *are* being
idiots.  They are willing to give up everything they have to be "one-up" on
the other.  They are empty people with an empty marriage who are finally
given a cause to live for, which turns out to be destroying each other.
     The team of Michael Douglas, Kathleen Turner, and Danny DeVito, popular
since ROMANCING THE STONE, here turn out another comedy.  But the humor is
only a very thin veneer over what is at heart a very black and bleak story
verging on a parable of the Middle East or Northern Ireland.
     Perhaps because the story is told mostly from Oliver's point of view,
he is the more sympathetic of the two principal characters.  Barbara acts
and Oliver reacts when the marriage begins breaking up Barbara attacks and
Oliver counter-attacks.  The film builds to one final evening when Oliver
becomes angry enough that both are attacking at the same time.
     THE WAR OF THE ROSES is just at an awkward level of style.  It could
have worked better if it were light, such as NEIGHBORS, or heavier as a
serious straight drama.  As it is it seems like a comic replug of an old
made-for-television movie, THE WAR BETWEEN THE TATES.  Making jokes about
this sort of self-destructive behavior is too much like making jokes about
leukemia.  There is the germ of a good idea here, but it is improperly
handled.  My rating is a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Nikita (1990)
     This sort of plot has been done many times before in American films.
Most notably, it was done in the film REMO WILLIAMS: THE ADVENTURE BEGINS
based on the "Destroyer" books of Murphy and Sapir.  Some super-secret
government agency wants to create an assassin without a background so they
start with someone whom the world thinks is dead, but who is not really.
Maybe they even arrange the purported death, and then they train this
"zombie" to be their agent.  Nobody misses the person; nobody can trace the
person either.  That story told competently, but without too much in the way
of new twists, is the currently playing French film LA FEMME NIKITA.
     The film opens with four French punks breaking into a pharmacy to steal
drugs for one of them, a nineteen-year-old woman who is clearly in a bad
way.  The robbery goes wrong for just about everyone involved: the owner of
the pharmacy, the police that he calls, and the would-be robbers.  Three of
the punks are killed and only the young addict survives.  She identifies
herself to the arresting police as Nikita.  This Nikita is not just bad
news--she is deadly to anyone around her.  The record later said that this
woman committed suicide by an overdose of tranquilizers, but she is in fact
administered them by injection and they are not lethal.  Then begins the
process of turning her from a sociopathic killer into a controlled weapon.
     While LA FEMME NIKITA is playing mostly in art theaters, it is not an
art film any more than DIE HARD was.  This is a slick, light-weight, high-
violence adventure film.  Much like REMO WILLIAMS, the story of the training
of the human weapon takes about half of the film and it is by far the best
half.  In both films the actual missions that the character is assigned are
rather shallow and silly exercises.  One mission seems to be only a make-
work project where the organization has done everything but actually pull
the trigger and sends Nikita (at great expense) to pull the trigger herself.
It is not that Nikita is so great a marksperson since the shot seems an easy
one.  Nor is it professionally done, since she leaves the gun barrel out a
window for about five minutes while she waits for her orders.  Nor is it
that she is still untraceable, since by this point she has a reasonably
permanent new identity.  The whole sequence is there only to add some comedy
and a little more action to the film.
     LA FEMME NIKITA stands as testimony that English-language film makers
do not have the patent on silly action-adventure.  This one is a likable
see-once-and-forget sort of film.  My rating: +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Rushmore (1998)
     CAPSULE: Max Fischer, 15 years old, seems to have a mind of a 40-
year-old business executive who is also a playwright, but he can't pass
his classes.  This is an amiable ramble through the affairs and
personality of a not very believable character.  Rating:  4 (0 to 10),
0 (-4 to +4)
   - Directed by Wes Anderson who directed BOTTLE ROCKET.  Made for
     Touchstone Pictures, though this is clearly not in the style of a
     Touchstone comedy.
   - Max Fischer (played by Jason Schwartzman) is a superb organizer
     who talks and acts like and adult three times his age.  He founded
     a dozen different clubs at his school Rushmore Academy and writes
     plays like a Broadway playwright.  The film follows several months
     of Max's life and his strategies to win an attractive first-grade
     teacher (Olivia Williams) as a lover and to befriend, then make an
     enemy of, then again to befriend a local business leader (Bill
     Murray).  That may make the plot sound more coherent than it
     seemed watching the film.  In truth you usually know where the
     film is, but it is hard to tell where the film is going or to
     remember where it has been.
   - Example: Max is trying to impress a teacher who likes fish so he
     hires contractors to construct a building to house an aquarium on
     the school baseball diamond.  He gets eight million dollars for
     the project from Bill Murray, but he never mentions it to school
     administrators.
   - Rarely clear what Max's plan is.  That could be fun, but it never
     seems to be.
   - Some of the appeal might be like the appeal of FORREST GUMP.  I
     did not care for that either but Max seems to have the same sort
     of luck.  He is like an intellectual Forrest Gump.
   - Another Luke Wilson film, my third of the festival.

Title
Review for Men with Guns (1997/II)
     One of the most respected names in American independent filmmaking
is John Sayles.  He has built a strong reputation with films like
MATEWAN and THE SECRET OF ROAN INISH, and one of his best was his last
film, LONE STAR.  After Sayles gave us this complex and unconventional
look at ethnic tensions on the US-Mexico border, expectation ran high
for his next film.  Unfortunately, his MEN WITH GUNS is not the film
anyone was hoping for.  We are essentially told in the first reel where
the film is going to go and what it is going to do.  Then the film does
exactly what it promised, a painful as that is.  The plot of MEN WITH
GUNS can be summarized "In a Central or South American country things
are really bad for everybody in the mountains where the army clashes
with the guerrillas.  Dr. Fuentes did not believe how bad things were
so he went.  And he found out again and again and again."  Of course it
is perfectly true that in many places in that region armed conflicts
have turned life into a living hell.  A guerrilla war is always bad for
civilians.  But the film talks down to the viewer.
     Dr. Fuentes (played by Federico Luppi) teaches medicine in the
capital city of his country.  He has, as a great humanitarian gesture,
trained and inspired some of his best students to go into the mountains
and make the world a little better for the poor Indios.  Fuentes
believe the students to be up there doing humanitarian service.  Then
he discovers one of his best students has instead returned to the city
and runs a squalid private pharmacy.  In shame and disappointment
Fuentes asks the student what has happened to the others. The student
tells him the others are still in the mountains, but suggests that it
may not be a good place to be. Fuentes goes off to find and visit the
doctors, ignoring the advice of his family and a patient who happens to
be an army general.  The results are little different than one would
expect.
     Dr. Fuentes starts out incredibly naive.  Even some American
tourists, present in the film mostly for comic relief, seem to know
better than Dr. Fuentes that things have gotten pretty bad in the
mountains.  But Fuentes has to go from one scene of barbarity to
another and discover how wrong he was.  Sayles certainly could have
used 126 minute of screen time to tell us something more profound than
that nasty things are happening down there and most of the worst
happens to the unarmed civilians.
     The cast is mostly unknowns to American audiences.  Federico Luppi
is the good Mexican actor who played the antique dealer torn by
mysterious forces in CRONOS.  Damian Delgado makes a late appearance as
an army deserter.  Mandy Patinkin has a small role made to look bigger
in the trailer.

Title
Review for Limey, The (1999)
     Steven Soderbergh is probably best-known for his SEX, LIES, AND
VIDEOTAPE of a just a decade ago.  That was an unconventional film.
His KING OF THE HILL was certainly a fine effort though of late he has
been doing more conventional work, albeit well.  OUT OF SIGHT, in spite
of some violence, was an amiable film.  With the exception of a little
strange editing, his latest could almost be a good 1960s TV movie.  It
is a plain, straightforward crime film whose only surprise is that
there are no real surprises.  It has a bad guy and an avenger who
implacably draws ever closer to his prey.  We watch fascinated like we
would a fly caught in a spider's web as the spider moves in for the
kill.
     Valentine (played by Peter Fonda) is a successful Hollywood music
producer with a nice-looking house and a string of better-looking young
women living with him.  One of the young women was Jenny Wilson
(Melissa George).  She got drunk one night and was killed in a car
accident never completely explained.  Jenny was a women who always had
self control and her father (Terrence Stamp), an English career
criminal, knows there is something very wrong with the official story
about the accident.  Just having been released from a 9-year sentence
in prison he finds his daughter is dead and he comes to the US to find
out the truth.  The Americans who stand in his way continually
underestimate Wilson and his determination to get revenge.  Wilson had
been alerted to the questionable circumstances of his daughter's death
by a letter from a man named Ed (Luis Guzman).  Now he recruits Ed to
help him track down some answers.  His entourage is completed by a
friend of his daughter Elaine (Lesley Ann Warren).  Wilson might almost
be some sort of alien killing machine, which indeed he is.
     Subtle humor is generated by Wilson's use of impenetrable English
rhyming slang that Ed cannot understand.  In one of the films two most
memorable scenes makes a long speech to a DEA official who listens
patiently without understanding a single word.  The other memorable
scene is Wilson's assault on some uncooperative characters involved in
Jenny's death.  Set in a warehouse the sequence establishes Wilson as
an implacable enemy.  Wilson is in this country so alien to him because
he has a job to do.  And he does it in a straightforward and
businesslike manner.  Adding to the 1960s feel of this film is the fact
that it has given us three 1960s stars, Stamp, Warren, and Fonda.
Stamp and Warren act very well together generating some chemistry in
spite of the very different backgrounds.
     Soderbergh tries a number of stylistic touches, most of which
work.  The primary exception is the intentionally confusing visual
editing.  The sound will be what one expects but visually he will be
rapidly cutting scenes showing the Wilson's memories, his thoughts, and
the present.  Occasionally the conversation seems to be going on
between the two characters at two different locations at once.
Probably the effect is to show the rapid flitting of Wilson's mind, but
it leaves the viewer bewildered.
     Another of the stylistic touches that is getting positive comment
is that footage for flashback sequences is taken from Ken Loach's 1967
film POOR COW which featured Stamp 32 years younger.  Certainly this is
more effective than trying to make up Stamp to look a lot younger or
casting another actor.  It is a clever touch, but it is not as new as
people seem to think.  1962's WHAT EVER HAPPENED TO BABY JANE? used
clips of early 1930s films of Bette Davis and Joan Crawford as films
that the characters played by Davis and Crawford had made early in
their lives.
     This is a fairly violent film, but its use of gore is fairly
reserved, certainly by 1990s film standards.  This is an enjoyable
tribute to the 1960s crime film, more entertaining than one might
expect.  I rate it a 6 on the 0 to 10 scale and a high +1 on the -4 to
+4 scale.

Title
Review for Mask of Zorro, The (1998)
     I think I qualify as a Zorro fan.  When I finally finished the
serial SON OF ZORRO last month I had seen every live-action Zorro film
or serial ever released in the English language.  And I am one-up on
even some of the most confirmed Zorro fans, having found and read THE
CURSE OF CAPISTRANO by Johnston McCulley years ago.  [It was nearly
impossible to find until its paperback reprint this year as THE MARK OF
ZORRO.]  The legend of El Zorro, the Fox, began when Johnston
McCulley's story was serialized in five parts starting August 9, 1919,
in ALL-STORY WEEKLY.  In the story the character of Zorro, dashing
outlaw on the side of good hiding behind the guise of the effete fop,
was almost a direct steal from the Baroness Orczy's Scarlet Pimpernel,
created in 1904.  The following year the story was made into the film
THE MARK OF ZORRO with Douglas Fairbanks, Sr.  The 1920 film was very
faithful to the novel, but it revealed much sooner who was behind the
mask so it would better show off Fairbanks's talents.  Through the
years Zorro has graced several English-language films, serials, and a
TV series. Zorro was the original "Caped Crusader" of American pop
culture and undoubtedly was part of the inspiration for Batman.  As
popular as he is in America, he is even more popular abroad and has
been portrayed in an astounding number of Italian, French, Spanish, and
Mexican films.  The most recent film version was the 1980 ZORRO, THE
GAY BLADE, a strained comedy starring George Hamilton.  Now Tristar
Pictures has brought back Zorro in a (mostly) serious film adventure.
     The film THE MASK OF ZORRO might more aptly be called THE RETURN
OF ZORRO.  Departing from the canon of the earlier stories Diego de la
Vega (also known as Zorro and played here by Anthony Hopkins) is
captured by an arch-enemy Rafael Montero (Stuart Wilson), the Spanish
Governor.  In the process Esperanza, Diego's wife whom both men loved,
is killed.  Rafael takes Diego's daughter Elena, adopting her as his
own, and returning to Spain.  Twenty years later the real story begins
with Rafael returning to California where Diego is still imprisoned.
Diego escapes and runs into Alejandro Murrieta (Antonio Banderas), a
young man that Diego had known before his imprisonment.  Murrieta has
turned into a somewhat incompetent bandit with a vendetta against
Captain Harrison Love (Matthew Letscher) who happens to be an ally of
Montero.  Diego decides not just to befriend this enemy of his enemy,
he decides to make the young man into a new Zorro.  Completing the set
of principles is Elena (Catherine Zeta Jones), a grown woman and
returned from Spain to be with Montero, whom she believes to be her
father.
     The script for THE MASK OF ZORRO was written by Terry Rossio, Ted
Elliott, and John Eskow, who seem most familiar with the Disney version
of Zorro.  At least, when they need to coin new names, they use Garcia
and Bernardo, taken from the Disney version.  The score by James Horner
makes heavy use of crisp flamenco rhythms.  But Horner had his work cut
out for him to try to match the great Alfred Newman score of the 1940
film THE MARK OF ZORRO.
     Anthony Hopkins proves once again how versatile an actor he is as
Diego de la Vega.  He does a decent job playing a dashing swordsman
considerably his junior.  It is obvious that he has a double for some
of the most vigorous scenes, but he is apparently doing much of his own
swordplay.  Antonio Banderas is to the best of my knowledge the first
Hispanic to play El Zorro on the American screen.  The character Zorro
has always been played with some wit, though a little less might have
been more.  Catherine Zeta Jones's Elena has more than sufficient fire
for the role.  Perhaps the best scene in the film is a quiet
conversation between her and Hopkins.  The film was directed by Martin
Campbell, best known for directing GOLDENEYE.
     Perhaps not everything works, as I relate in the spoiler section
to follow.  But as a Zorro fan I just know that had they called me in
as a consultant I could have fine-tuned this film to perfection.  There
was a lot that bothered me, but I still hope it makes a mint and we get
some more.  After all, you just can't have too many Zorro films, can
you?  I rate THE MASK OF ZORRO a 7 on the 0 to 10 scale and a +2 on the
-4 to +4 scale.
     Spoiler... Spoiler... Spoiler... Spoiler...
     There is one very big hole in the plot. Rafael Montero intends to
buy California from Santa Ana in the name of the Spanish government,
but actually for himself.  I strongly doubt that Santa Ana would sell
in the first place even to the Spanish.  The US-Mexican War, 1846-8,
was fought to force Santa Ana to sell Texas and other territories to
the United States.  Santa Ana did not want to sell off his country.
But if Santa Ana agreed to sell California to Spain, then what?  When
he discovered the Spanish government knew nothing about the transaction
he would declare the sale null and void.  He would field an army
(probably with Don Rafael's own gold) and retake California.  If Don
Rafael had had the strength to defend California he would not have
needed the gold in the first place.  If he did not have the strength
the fact that had given Santa Ana some gold and lied about whom he
represented would have amounted to no more than a political
contribution.
     The climactic explosion would have killed all the laborers, at
least the way the sequence is edited.  In most films that would be a
problem.  Here I will consider it a nod to the impossible escapes in
the Zorro serials. Another problem with the plot is that at the end of
the film a lot of people know that there is sufficient gold in
California to make mining highly profitable.  California would have had
a very different history if that information were public so early.
     But not all my comments will be negative.  Usually the scripting
of this sort of film is straightforward and not very subtle.  I would
like to point out what I found a clever piece of plotting.  It was
going to come down to one man's word against another who Elena's father
was.  A lessor script might have left it strictly an emotional
decision.  The double coincidence that Diego is here with such a hatred
for her father and that Elena so resembles Esperanza is just too much
coincidence.  She might not know who her father is, but logically
Esperanza has to be her mother.
     The ending of the McCulley's Zorro was never quite satisfying.  He
was to become a wealthy landowner and "raise fat children."  There is
something satisfying in having Zorro not go gently into that good
night.

Title
Review for Looking for Richard (1996)
     With a remarkable number of Shakespeare plays being made into
films recently, LOOKING FOR RICHARD, directed, co-produced, and co-
written by Al Pacino, could not have been more timely.  There have been
many films about the activity of making films, but to my knowledge this
is the first film about the making of a Shakespeare film.  It gives
real insight into the richness and complexity of Shakespeare's writing
as well as into the filmmaking process.  Pacino's film seamlessly
bounces between real documentary and scenes of the fictitious
production of an all-star version of RICHARD III.  Meanwhile not just
the actors in the supposed film (Al Pacino, Harris Yulin, Penelope
Allen, Alec Baldwin, Kevin Spacey, Estelle Parsons, Winona Ryder, and
Aiden Quinn), but also guests not in the film--like Kenneth Branagh,
Kevin Kline, James Earl Jones, Rosemary Harris, Peter Brook, Derek
Jacobi, John Gielgud, and Vanessa Redgrave--talk about the content of
Shakespeare and the art of acting Shakespeare.  To have all these
people in one film is remarkable in itself.  To get them all talking
about a subject like Shakespeare is wonderful.  To then waste so much
time watching Pacino clown around as much as he does is agonizing.
Indeed, Pacino as a director just does not know when to say no to
Pacino the actor.  After last year for me now the definitive Richard
will be Ian McKellen.  To see Pacino overpowering the role of Richard
as he overpowers so many of his roles is almost painful.  There are
places that the plotting of the film is inconsistent.  For example,
apparently the actors are making no more than a film version of the
play, but at one point Pacino argues with the adaptation's putative
director as to whether they should have an expert discussing the play
looking into the camera.  Pacino's allusions to his other films amount
almost to product placements--at one point he refers to a scene of the
play as the "meeting of the Dons," he wears a cap that says "Scent of a
Woman," and intentionally or not RICHARD III has rather obvious plot
parallels to SCARFACE.  The positives of LOOKING FOR RICHARD would
dwarf the negatives if it were not for the latter taking too much
precious time.
     Pacino's feature-length discussion of Shakespeare also makes some
telling points about the people who play Shakespeare.  John Gielgud's
viewpoint seems so plain and simple while Vanessa Redgrave goes off
into a rambunctious and pretentious incoherence about the "pentameter
of the soul."  These discussions by some of the great actors of our
time into why the Bard does what he does with language and how his
plays are to be acted will undoubtedly be used in the years to come as
part of college courses, yet it is entertaining enough for paying
audiences even while it instructs.  Even the street interviews are
instructive and show a range of people from the well-dressed who have
never seen a Shakespeare play to one man obviously less fortunate who
waxes on about how if in school if we read more Shakespeare we would
know how to feel and would have less violence in the streets.  The
film's playful approach to the classic starts at the very opening
credits that at first say KING RICHARD, then fill in the additional
letters to say LOOKING FOR RICHARD.  It is Pacino's point of view that
today's actors are the inheritors of a grand tradition of acting and
drama, the centerpiece of which is the contribution of William
Shakespeare.
     If Pacino's goal were just to make this one play accessible, which
in large part it was, I would say he fell short of last year's
production which shows more of the play without ever being
inaccessible.  For the additional insights into the plays of
Shakespeare and the acting required in them I would say LOOKING FOR
RICHARD is more successful.  I rate it a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Postcards from the Edge (1990)
          Capsule review:  Petulant, semi-autobiographical comedy
     written by Carrie Fisher about her relationship with her
     mother and the world in general.  There are a couple of nice
     dramatic scenes but not enough to salvage this self-pitying
     story.  Rating: high 0.
     Life can be tough.  It really is not very easy growing up in Hollywood
with no father and a famous movie star mother who wants to run your life.
Then there are all sorts of Hollywood types of people and probably none of
them are looking out for your best interests or treat you as gently as you
think they should.  That is the sad premise of POSTCARDS FROM THE EDGE, with
a screenplay by Carrie Fisher based on her semi-autobiographical novel of
the same name.
     Suzanne Vale (played by Meryl Streep) is a second-rate actress who can
get roles in only third-rate films.  She seems invariably to play women of
action committed to some cause, but she herself is committed to nothing.
She consoles herself with cocaine, which makes her even harder to work with.
Then she takes the drugs a bit too far and ends up in the custody of her
singer-actress mother, Doris Mann (played by Shirley MacLaine), a show
business legend but just as dependent on alcohol and drugs as her daughter.
This all would be pretty bleak if not for Vale's quick wit, which at times
is undeniably funny, and POSTCARDS' laconic view of the nothing-is-as-it-
seems world of Hollywood filmmaking.  The sarcastic wordplay among two and
occasionally three generations of women from one family is perhaps the only
thing preventing POSTCARDS from being a complete melodrama like MOMMY
DEAREST.
     It is a real pity that Fisher and Debbie Reynolds did not play the
characters who were essentially themselves.  It would have added some
authenticity to the roles.  Fisher would have been more believable as an
actress cast in the sort of film in which looks are the most important thing
and acting talent is optional.  Streep would not have been cast in such a
film, regardless of her talent, because she does not have the looks that
women in these films have.  On the other hand, had Fisher and Reynolds
starred, POSTCARDS would have been criticized for where it does
fictionalize.  Some courage points should be awarded to both Streep and
MacLaine for being willing to appear without make-up--each in one scene.
Streep without make-up looks just very plain; how MacLaine looks without
make-up is something of a shock and probably is going to be remembered.  The
scene, however, is essential to the film and gives it the only moments where
it really says something of real interest.  MacLaine's make-up is symbolic
of all the sham and pretense of the Hollywood system, but it cannot be
stripped away without stripping away the dignity.  Much of the value of the
film is dependent on MacLaine being willing to play this scene.
     With the exception of one or two small powerful moments, POSTCARDS FROM
THE EDGE is mostly a thin comedy-drama.  I rate it a high 0 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for In the Winter Dark (1998)
     CAPSULE: In an isolated part of the Australian outback a
mysterious creature is preying on farm animals.  An older farmer leads
four local people into a journey of their inner fears as they try to
find the source of the animal mutilations.  Dark is indeed this story
of natural and unnatural evils.  Rating: 7 (0 to 10), 2 (-4 to +4)
   - Directed by James Bogle who co-wrote the screenplay.
   - Four people are living in this remote region of the outback:
     Morris and Ida, an older farmer who has seen his share of evil
     done by nature and his strange wife.  Then there is Murray Jacob,
     an inexperienced farmer.  Finally there is Ronnie, a semi-hippie
     from the city whose husband has abandoned her.
   - Based on a novel by popular Australian novelist Tim Winton.
   - The film was five years in the making, made for three million
     Australian dollars-something like one and a half million American
     dollars.
   - Ida is played by Brenda Blethyn of SECRETS AND LIES.
   - Moody photography.  Score by Peter Cobbin long on ominous strings.
   - Morris finds what may be a footprint of the beast, but this as
     almost everything else is ambiguous.
   - Morris and Ida lost a child to some unknown animal.
   - Could be one animal or coincidence and several animals.
   - Nature is a force to be feared, not a benevolent being.
   - Tension under the surface of people dealing with each other.
   - Everyone drinks for recreation.
   - Morris to Ronnie in labor: "You can't have that baby right now.
     You have to wait for the authorities."
   - Some echoes of Moby Dick.

Title
Review for Dragnet (1987)
          Capsule review:  Parody of successful summertime action
     movies with Dan Aykroyd doing impressions of Jack Webb.  It
     is unclear how Aykroyd found out how Webb talks as he has
     apparently never seen an episode of DRAGNET.
     Dan Aykroyd grew up in the 50s and 60s; later in improvisational comedy
he often drew on television personalities he saw during that time.  He is
equally good doing Rod Serling from THE TWILIGHT ZONE and Jack Webb from
DRAGNET.  Usually his parodies lasted just a few minutes on SATURDAY NIGHT
LIVE, but his latest film allows him to do his impression of Jack Webb for
an entire film.  The story--c-authored by Aykroyd--is an extended parody of
the DRAGNET TV series.
     Aykroyd plays Joe Friday--not *the* Joe Friday but the nephew of *the*
Joe Friday.  Aykroyd's Friday, for some unexplained reason, has been able to
inherit the famous Badge 714 from his uncle as well as the same clipped
speech pattern and the same self-righteous attitude.  While Aykroyd's
impression of Jack Webb is pretty much on the money, overall the imitation
of DRAGNET is miles wide of the mark.  Aykroyd can talk like Webb but is a
total failure at writing like Webb.  In the old TV shows, sentences of more
than four words spoken by anyone were only slightly more common than scenes
of Friday shooting up heroin.  Stan Freeberg had a better ear for the way
people talked in DRAGNET when he wrote for his parody the exchange:
     "Joe?"
     "Yeah, Frank?"
     "I checked out that 38."
     "Yeah?"
     "You were right."
     "How so?"
     "It was a gun."
     The story of DRAGNET has pagan rituals, gun battles, armored tanks, car
chases, female flesh, a super-villain, airplane chases, and cops in funny
costumes, all of which suggests that Aykroyd had a voice coach who actually
had seen episodes of DRAGNET but that Aykroyd himself had never seen one and
had spent his time watching successful but empty summertime films.  Take out
Aykroyd's character and the only similarity to the object of the parody is
that both involve police.  One wonders how someone can do so many parodies
as Aykroyd has and still not have the slightest idea of how to do a parody.
     DRAGNET is first a summertime throwaway film, second an extended
SATURDAY NIGHT LIVE sketch, and is the parody it is purported to be third--
or perhaps tenth.  Give this one a -1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Crumb (1994)
     Human beings, as evolved animals, have a dual nature.  We have an
intellectual side and an animal side.  The latter we have since we are,
after all, we are animals.  We are forced to spend time eliminating
wastes, we have drives to reproduce ourselves, and we have physical
animal bodies.  But we wall off that part of our lives by doing it in
as much privacy as we can arrange.  Much of what we consider to be
indignity, much of what we find embarrassing, is to be reminded that we
really are biological.  There is sex humor and bathroom humor.  We find
it funny that a President of the United States would vomit on a high
dignitary of Japan because it reminds us that even a President has a
lot in common with all other animals.  CRUMB is a film that says little
more that Robert Crumb is very hung up on the fact that everyone has an
animal side and that his bizarre humor comes out of these obsessions.
     Robert Crumb's nihilistic and misanthropic underground comics
precisely reflect his personality.  The man himself is as misanthropic,
misogynistic, and kinky as the underground comic books he draws and
writes.  Or at least that is the face he is trying to present in the
documentary CRUMB, made by his long-time friend, Terry Zwigoff.  On one
hand the documentary has the air of authenticity because the style of
Crumb's work seems so naturally to arise from the person the film
describes.  But Crumb is obviously someone quite capable of playing
jokes on the documentary maker and his audience.  It might even be to
be expected.  When Crumb describes some of the odder aspects of his
childhood, like his sexual attraction to Bugs Bunny, it could be true.
But it also sounds suspiciously like a put-on in the style of comedian
Emo Philips.  Crumb could be as weird as he wants us to think he is, or
it could be in part a joke or even a publicity stunt.
     As weird as he presents himself, Crumb is a functioning human
being and in the Crumb family that makes him not just not just unusual,
it makes him a real wonder.  Each of the Crumb children we see leads a
psychologically knotted and screwed up dysfunctional life.  The family
peculiarities are due in large part to an abusive father who tried too
hard to force the family to fit his concept of a norm.  We meet three
brothers: Robert, the younger Max, and the older Charles.  (Two sisters
understandably did not want any part of the documentary and perhaps the
family.)  The oldest of the brothers is the suicidal Charles who has
retreated from the world, making himself a recluse in part due to the
drug treatments for his self-destructive impulses.  Robert's brother
Max supports himself by begging on the street and in his spare time
performing feats of yoga.  The boys continue to rebel against their
father and society in general in many different ways.  At one time the
standard Crumb family mode of rebellion was to draw amateur comic books
and this has made one of the boys moderately rich and sort of famous.
     In the course of the documentary Crumb tells the camera about his
background and particularly his sexual hangups.  Bugs Bunny gave way to
a marginally more normal fixation on Sheena, Queen of the Jungle, the
heroine of a 1955 syndicated television series.  The Crumb brothers
were social outcasts in school and continued to be so in the drug
culture.  In spite of rumors that he was at one time "in" with well-
known rock groups, he was an outcast with just about everyone but his
family.
     His discussions in the film include his sexual fetishes,
particularly sitting on women's shoes and riding women piggy-back.  We
are told that he is not much interested in sex in usual way, though he
does have a daughter who is apparently his own.  What we do discover is
that he has a seriously negative attitude about nearly everything that
strikes him as being normal and he seems bitter about just about all
that is around him.  One temporary exception is France; he seems to
think that he will like France and in the course of the making of the
film he moves there.  Though we do not find out in the film, it seems
very likely that he will be disappointed as much by that as by just
about everything else in his life.
     The film's view of Crumb is at times ironic.  While on one hand he
claims to be very disinterested in being successful and is unwilling to
make some effort that would make his art more saleable, he complains
bitterly how his most famous pieces of art did not pay him very well
and all the profits are going to others.  He claims he was "ripped off"
though, in fact, from his account given at a lecture, it sounds more
likely that he just made a bad bargain and sold off the rights for
considerably less than they would eventually be worth.  The three most
successful works were the "Keep on Truckin'" cartoon, the "Cheap
Thrills" album cover, and the film rights to his character "Fritz the
Cat."  Zwigoff's documentary style is very often just to let the camera
roll as Robert talks with his brother frankly about sex or describing
their masturbation or toilet habits.
     There are some nice ironies captured on film.  Another artist,
comments she was never bothered by Crumb's material--some of which it
appears was quite racist, at least on the surface.  But she did object
when his cartoons started taking a misogynist tone, including
mutilation fantasies.  The film does make some interesting points when
it suggests that the image of the wholesome family--the "Leave it to
Beaver" family--that was considered the ideal in the Fifties--may have
been a reaction to WWII in that people found the stable family
reassuring.  It is unclear, however, why there was no similar reaction
to the Korean and Vietnam wars.
     While I am not sure CRUMB lives up to the expectations raised by
some of the critical comment, it is an engrossing documentary with the
same sort of unaccountable fascination that a dead horse by the side of
the road has.  Rate it a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Gremlins 2: The New Batch (1990)
     GREMLINS 2 is a hard film to pin down and review.  It is hard to
criticize the story because it's not seriously trying to tell its story.
Maybe it is working only half-time to tell its story and the other half
is divided up among making film references, making comments about
business and politics, and playing practical jokes on the viewer.  As
rationales for sequels go, this one is about par for being crass and
high concept.  The little monsters are back and taking over Trump Tower.
Of course, they cannot call it Trump Tower so it is Clamp Center, owned
by Daniel Clamp, an amalgam of Donald Trump and Ted Turner.  The world
needed a film with the gremlins vandalizing a skyscraper about as much
as it needed a toothbrush with disk brakes.
     But while it seemed in GREMLINS that the gags were getting in the
way of the story-telling, in GREMLINS 2 the story does a much better job
of staying out of the way of the gags.  Just as the gremlins take over
the building, the gags take over the film.  That is fine, I suppose,
because while I cannot recommend the story, I did appreciate many of the
gags.  I rather hope that this film is marketed on videocassette with a
complete list of the films parodied and the well-known people appearing
during the course of GREMLINS 2.  Then the movie can be played like a
word search puzzle.
     The plot has likable young couple Billy Peltzer (played by Zack
Gilligan) and Kate Beringer (played by Phoebe Cates) living together (in
sin!)  in New York and both working for Clamp (played by John Glover).
All three work in the same building with a team of genetic scientists
led by Dr.  Catheter (played by Christopher Lee!).  Billy finds out that
the genetic scientists are playing around with his favorite Gremlin and
we are off.  Rounding out the cast we have Robert Prosky playing Al
Lewis playing Grandpa playing havoc with Clamp's cable broadcast
station.  Having Prosky playing Al Lewis is like having Robert Duvall
play Soupy Sales.  The whole concept of the "Gremlins" films is that
nasty accidents happen.  But just to show that happy accidents happen
also, at least for Dante, GREMLINS has the Trump character discovering
he likes a young woman working for him.  Her name is Marla.  Director
Joe Dante insists that *all* filming was complete well before anyone
ever heard of Marla Maples but, of course, the choice of that name fits
very nicely with the theme of promising contrivances going wrong.
     Of course, much of the film is spent in little plays and blackout
sketches that parody society and that star the very recently created
Gremlin Repertory Troup.  They act out scenes from films that logic
tells you the creatures could have no way of knowing about.  This
apparently bothers nobody in the audience.  It is supposed to be funny,
not make sense.  Actually somewhat funnier are the jabs at Ted Turner
and his attitude toward classic film, including a great line about
CASABLANCA.
     However, because I am still hung up on films having plots and this
one is a pretty mediocre plot, I can give this film no better than a
high zero on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Como agua para chocolate (1992)
     Relatively often we see Canadian films in the United States.  With the
length of the border we share with our neighbor to the south, it is
surprising that so few Mexican films ever get seen in this country.  With
the exception of some low-budget horror and science fiction films, few
Mexican movies ever make it north of the border.  Many that do come north
are popular only to make fun of.  Films like THE WRESTLING WOMEN VS. THE
AZTEC MUMMY or SHRIEK OF THE MUTILATED can hardly represent the best that
Mexico has to offer.  A reminder of that fact is LIKE WATER FOR CHOCOLATE, a
pleasant shaggy-dog romance story told in the genre of magical realism.  In
magical realism, bizarre fantasy mixes with the everyday and is taken very
matter-of-factly.
     The story takes place in northern Mexico and southern Texas and centers
on Tita (played by Lumi Cavazos), her mother (played by Regina Torne' John),
and her two older sisters.  Tita grew up in the kitchen as a master cook.
The time comes when Tita falls in love with Pedro.  But Tita's mother
forbids Tita to marry then or ever.  Family tradition is that the youngest
daughter cares for the mother until the mother's death.  This arrangement
precludes any personal life for the daughter and reduces the daughter to
involuntary servitude.  At the insistence of the willful mother, Pedro
cannot have Tita, so he settles for Tita's older sister Rosaura.  But the
marriage is at first only a ruse.  Pedro is really using the marriage as an
excuse to remain close to Tita.  Tita is forced to prepare the wedding feast
for Pedro and Rosaura.  But the supernatural shows its hand in Tita's
cooking.  Tita expresses herself in her exquisite cooking only too well.
Eat what Tita has prepared and you will feel what Tita was feeling when she
made the dish.  The misery she feels while making  the wedding feast is
inexplicably spread to all the guests.  But its when Tita cooks a REALLY
happy meal that things start to happen.  Told against the background of a
Mexico in revolution in the first third of this century, this is a story of
anger and vengeance, yet it never loses its whimsical feel.
     At 144 minutes, LIKE WATER FOR CHOCOLATE may be a bit long to sustain
interest through its entire length.  Still, the style is refreshingly
different from anything the American film industry is turning out.  It is
directed by sometime-actor Alfonso Arau with a screenplay by Laura Esquival
based on her own novel, which combines magical realism and recipes for the
dishes around which her story is built.  The title, incidentally, refers to
an anger as hot as the boiling water used for hot chocolate.  I can
recommend this one and give it a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Liberty Heights (1999)
     As Barry Levinson looks at the Baltimore of his youth, in each
successive film things get more serious.  In DINER there was a small
group of guys who were friends.  In TIN MEN we see that there were also
the more serious types who had to earn a living.  AVALON told us that
these people we are talking about are immigrant Jews who have to
struggle to make the American thing work for them.  In LIBERTY HEIGHTS
we see that the Jews have to interface with other classes, other races,
and other religions.  There are definite tensions in this film as the
diverse groups come in contact with each other, but Levinson is not as
militant as a Spike Lee would be.  His approach is more that of a
peacemaker who sees no villains in the tensions.  His world is
populated with diverse groups who feel uneasy about each other only
pending getting to know each other better.
     The story follows the Kurtzman brothers, Van (played by Adrien
Brody) and Ben (Ben Foster).  They are growing up in the area of
Forrest Park and Liberty Heights in Baltimore.  Their neighborhood is
so overwhelmingly Jewish that growing up Ben had just assumed a Chinese
pupil in his grade school was also Jewish.  Levinson, who wrote as well
as directed, makes some humorous comments about how Jewish and non-
Jewish households are different.  Ben is amazed at how the Christians
seem hung up on the color white, even to the point of eating their
bread raw.  In 1954 Van is in college and Ben in high school, but they
remain somewhat provincial.  At home they learn there are Jews and "the
other kind."  They are getting to the point when they will have to deal
with the other kind.  Their father, Nate Kurtzman (Joe Mantegna), runs
a failing burlesque house as a front for his illegal numbers racket.
Yet in spite of being a criminal, he deals only in a victimless crime
and is a man of honor.
     Van, Ben, and friends are planning to crash a Halloween party put
on by some upper class other kinds.  Bens parents are shocked by his
dressing up as Adolph Hitler.  Ben is told that he will have to stay
home. At the party Van sees a woman, Dubby (Carolyn Murphy), who looks
to him like a vision in white and he is immediately smitten.  But the
presence of uninvited Jews at the party leads to a fight that the other
kind boys are spoiling for.
     Meanwhile, Ben is also getting interested in a girl of the other
kind.  But in this case it is another kind of other kind.  He is
intrigued by Sylvia (Rebekah Johnson) the one black girl in his class.
He strikes up a secret friendship with her.  He finds the black
community has their own comedians as well as their own music, but he
quickly develops a taste for both.  A third though less well-developed
line of plot follows their fathers financial problems when the numbers
racket proves to be less than profitable for him and when he finds
himself owing a great deal of money to a small-time drug dealer, Little
Melvin (Orlando Jones).  Nice little personal touches characterize
Nate.  He dresses like a very successful man and always drives the
latest model of Cadillac, even after one stroke of bad luck threatens
to leave him nearly destitute.  He practices his ballroom dancing in
their semi-finished basement with his wife Ada (Bebe Neuwirth).
     As usual, Levinson gets convincing acting from his cast.  But
somehow neither Mantegna nor Neuwirth seem very Jewish.  And neither
has the angular face that the Brody or Foster has, making the family a
little less believable.  It has been claimed that stage comics make
very good actors and so it should not be surprising that Orlando Jones,
formerly of MAD TV, has a great deal of stage presence.  Perhaps
Levinson should have increased the size of his role.
     Levinson ties his series together with touches running though most
of his series.  Once again the main characters hang out in the Fells
Point Diner.  At the diner or elsewhere some of the best conversation
(and much of the comic dialog) is around the table and over a meal.
Levinson repeats the image of handsome women on horseback which he
previously used in DINER.
     Through the film Levinson sustains the 1950s feel though he
overuses the device of wall-to-wall 1950s music.  Chris Doyle's
camerawork could have done the job by itself without so artificial a
device.  Also there are a few anachronisms notable.  There is a
reference to watching Perry Mason which would not debut until 1957.  It
also looks like Hitchcock's 1951 STRANGERS ON A TRAIN is being
broadcast to television on in 1954, which seems highly unlikely.
     LIBERTY HEIGHTS was for me not quite the film that AVALON was.
Some people are a little too unrealistically nice in this film.  There
is nothing in this film that matches the scope of that one or the
tender relationship between the Aiden Quinn character and his son in
AVALON.  I would give it a 7 on the 0 to 10 scale and a +2 on the -4 to
+4 scale.

Title
Review for Good Will Hunting (1997)
     Frankly, the film did not do a lot for me.  I could not believe
the mail character.  Goethe was one of the great geniuses in history
and he excelled, as opposed to just being good, in only a few fields.
The premise of GOOD WILL HUNTING bothered me from the very beginning
because it was too difficult to believe that Will Hunting could be as
brilliant in as many different fields as the script requires him to be.
To have a super-genius of his caliber places this film more in the
category of science fiction than that of a believable drama.  The
premise that there is someone out there of this magnitude of brilliance
who has not by the age of 20 come to a lot of people's attention seems
unlikely.  Here he is working as a custodian at MIT and he can easily
beat the best mathematics professors on the faculty.  Then he
demonstrates he is way ahead of an economics graduate student in that
student's own field.  This would be hard to believe of someone who
spends his full time studying, but Will Hunting (played by Mark Damon)
seems to spend very little time in books.  Instead he spends most of
his spare time drinking with his blue-collar buddies and getting into
trouble with the law.
     His real genius is discovered by mathematics Professor Lambeau
(Stallan Skarsgard), winner of the Fields Medal (the most prestigious
award in mathematics).  Lambeau gives his classes a prize problem to
see if one person can get it over the semester.  Janitor Will Hunting
solves it with the effort of doing the Times Crossword Puzzle and
leaves the answer anonymously on a hallway blackboard.
     Lambeau sets a harder problem and Hunting solves it also, but is
seen leaving the answer.  This gives Lambeau the clue needed to track
down the mysterious genius whom he finds conducting his own legal
defense after having attacked a police officer.  Hunting fails to
convince the judge and is sentenced to jail. Lambeau arranges a parole
on two conditions: Hunting will undergo analysis and will do math with
Lambeau.  Once he is discovered, different people fight to understand
Will Hunting and to pull him in different directions.  For a long
stretch there are just four breeds of scene in this film.  Hunting
carouses and drinks with his rough-playing blue-collar buddies; Hunting
does math with Lambeau, proving himself a far better mathematician than
anybody on the MIT faculty; Hunting has a relationship with Skylar
(Minnie Driver), an English Chemistry student; Hunting has mutually
parasitic mind game sessions with his analyst (Robin Williams).  The
film just goes back and forth among these scenes until Hunting decides
how to handle his life.
     Hunting's ability to turn psychiatrists into raving animals in
minutes seems more modeled on Hannibal Lector than on anything human.
It takes many sessions with his analyst before they can talk in
anything but sarcastic jabs.  The film does a decent job of showing the
relationship between Hunting and his lifelong friend Chuckie (Ben
Affleck) who really care for each other.  The relationship with his
girlfriend was OK, but covers well-trodden territory.  But Hunting's
mind seems really clear only when he is doing mathematics.  It is never
clear what exactly is going on in Hunting's mind or why he changes in
just the ways he does, sometimes playing games and others following the
simplest of advice.  This is a film with a serious credibility problem
and one which stagnates in the middle act.  I would give it a 5 on the
0 to 10 and a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     Side comment: It is difficult to present someone superbly
brilliant in a film without having someone being superbly brilliant to
write the script.  Damon does a reasonable job playing the troubled
super-luminary who has buried himself in a lower-class lifestyle, if
any such person has ever existed.  The film draws false parallels to
Ramanujan and Einstein, neither of whom had Will Hunting's broadband
versatility.  For what it is worth, this is one of the few film that
did a reasonable job of representing higher mathematics. Certainly the
they got the facts on the Fields Medal (though they omitted to mention
that you have to be young to win the Fields).  Ramanujan did not
actually work for "many years" with Hardy as stated.  He died quite
young, probably in large part because of his transplanting from his
native climate to England. It was a tremendous loss.
     I would have assumed that answers to really difficult problems in
combinatorics might involve complex counting arguments and would not
fit on a single blackboard, but it is possible.  It filmed nicely, but
it is unlikely a mathematician would do math with a marking pen on a
mirror.  It is too easy to accidentally rub off, it does not give
enough writing space, and the results are not easily portable or
savable.  He may have done some scratch-work there, but even that seems
unlikely.
     It is hard to believe an American mathematician would not know who
Ted Kaczynski is.

Title
Review for Joy Luck Club, The (1993)
          Capsule review:  THE JOY LUCK CLUB is the stories of
     four families that have migrated from mainland China in the
     last generation.  It is the story of four mother-daughter
     relationships in the United States and the story of the four
     mothers' lives in repressive and sexist Chinese society.  The
     stories are often heart-wrenching and often inspirational.
     If this is a woman's film, it at least is miles ahead of
     something like BEACHES.  Rating: low +3 (-4 to +4).
     It is a party.  Friends have gotten together in a celebration.  Several
families are represented.  The families are Chinese-American, though through
inter-marriage not all the people present are Chinese.  At the center of the
party, four women play Mah Jong.  They are the Joy Luck Club, originally
four women from different parts of China who found each other in the new
country of the U. S. and have played together and talked for years.  One of
the original members died months ago and her daughter has replaced her.
Each of the four families has a daughter who was born in this country; each
has or had a mother who was born and raised in China.  THE JOY LUCK CLUB is
really an anthology film with four pairs of stories, each pair with the
story of the mother's life in China and the story of the mother-daughter
relationship in the new country.  There is a beautiful symmetry in the eight
stories.  In each pair a single theme will run through the mother's story
and the mother-daughter story.  Each mother's story will show the hardship
placed on women in a country bound by the ancient traditions that still live
in China.  They are traditions that are particularly hard on women, giving
them little choice as to their fate.  In the mother-daughter stories, each
daughter faces, and of course overcomes, problems caused by freedom from the
pre-set roles of the old country.  So each pair of stories is also about the
changes that go on in a family adapting to a very new way of life.  It is a
matrix of eight poignant stories woven into a single story.  Bracketing the
entire film is the story of June (played by Ming-Na Wen) who discovers early
in the film that her mother did something bad in China, an act so terrible
June does not understand it and one that calls on June to return to China on
a mission that she is worrying about.  Hanging over most of the film is the
question of how June's mother Suyuan (Kieu Chinh) could have done what she
did.  Yet by the time the full story is revealed we have seen how different
mainland Chinese culture is from our own and we will come to understand
Suyuan's actions.
     THE JOY LUCK CLUB is what used to be called "a woman's film."  And a
"crying film" at that.  I will say in its defense that I liked it
considerably more than my wife did.  I think that the family conflicts I saw
in the film are similar to conflicts I have seen in real families, but that
Evelyn might have seen less of.  Usually we do not see how really different
life is in China even today.  I will defend the "crying film" aspect much in
the same way I defended the same aspect of THE COLOR PURPLE.  We are looking
at very real stories of human misery and the cruelty in parts of this film.
If a film that shows you that does not manipulate you and perhaps bring a
tear to your eye, the film is broken.  Or maybe you are broken.  In any case
we are talking about a culture that has extreme sexism by Western standards;
it has forced marriages; it has terrible poverty.  At least the stories are
all fairly new and unfamiliar here, which already gives it a point above the
recent THE WEDDING BANQUET.  One of the eight stories was in some ways
reminiscent of RAISE THE RED LANTERN, but even there it had unexpected
touches.
     Visually the film brought back memories of China, and particularly the
karst-dotted landscape near the Li River Valley and Guilin.  The camera work
by Amir Mokri is very beautiful when it needs to be and downbeat when that
is what is called for.  The film was directed by Wayne Wang from a
screenplay by Any Tan (based on her novel) and Ronald Bass.  The three
shared production credits with Patrick Markey.  THE JOY LUCK CLUB is one of
several very good films that are coming out this autumn.  I would rate it a
low +3 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Babe (1995)
     These days you hear the terms "children's film" and "family film"
used interchangeably.  The film industry may intentionally blur the
distinction so that some adult will drop in to see their children's
films.  They do not want to admit that even a "Rainbow Brite" film or
MY PRETTY PONY might not be enjoyable or even appropriate for any adult
with more neurons than fingers.  But the result is that good family
films that have plenty to offer adults are seen only by children and
the parents who bring them.  Very often my wife and I find ourselves in
a theater the only adults not accompanied by children.  And it is a
pity.  This week I have seen WATERWORLD, CLUELESS, and BABE.  Of the
three films, the one with the biggest laughs, the most impressive
special effects, and the best story was BABE.  The story should be
enjoyable for anyone in a wide range of ages.  That range goes from
adult down to any child old enough to realize and accept the reality
that today's cute farm animal and tomorrow's dinner may be one and the
same.
     The story opens with the young pig, still nursing, telling us
about the wonderful "pig paradise" where pigs go when the big trucks
come and carry them away.  Already we have a wry little dig at religion
and this family film is just moments old.  The runt of the litter is
given away to a small carnival where he is to be both the subject and
the prize in a "guess the weight of the pig" contest.
     The contest winner is Farmer Hoggett (played by James Cromwell),a
pensive and quiet farmer who sees something special in this particular
pig.  His wife Esme (Magda Szubanski) sees something special in the pig
also, a nice holiday dinner.  In this world all the farm animals talk
to each other; they just don't talk to humans.  Babe, as the pig comes
to be called, falls in with and is provisionally adopted by two Border
collie sheep dogs.  Fly, the mother collie, has just sadly watched her
new pups given to strangers and she feels like adopting something new
to care for.  This is not a film to sugar-coat sad facts of life for
farm animals.  While the film does not dwell on these aspects or let
them spoil the fresh and funny comedy, the film is honest enough to
show that farm life can be painful for animals.  Fly needs Babe as much
as Babe needs Fly and we hear it in her voice.  Eventually Babe will
follow Fly and her mate Rex into the sheep-herding task.  Comic relief
is provided by Ferdinand, a street-smart and wise-quacking duck with a
propensity for causing trouble.  While some of his humor and mischief
may be inspired by Donald Duck, he still is an original character and
his mischief motivated by a very real fear of ending on the Hoggett
dinner table.  One convention is carried over from cartoons--the duck
has many of the funny lines.
     The visual effect of talking animals is not done by cartooning the
mouths as is so often done, and not by filming animals chewing peanut-
butter-like gum as was done with Francis and Mr. Ed.  Instead
animatronics from the Jim Henson shop are used to have lip-movement fit
the words and to provide facial expression.  A careful eye can tell the
real animal from the mechanical one--some of the time--but there are
certainly some scenes that should leave even expert effects spotters
wondering how they were done.  The screenplay was written by George
Miller (known for the "Mad Max" films) and Chris Noone.  Noone directed
and Miller produced, working on this project for seven years.  Miller
and Noone have a good feel for where to economize in the production.
The only familiar face in the film is James Cromwell and he has usually
been a minor actor.  No big name actors voice the animals, though
Roscoe Lee Brown narrates.  The score is by Nigel Westlake who simply
reworked classical themes sometimes to great effect.
     Hearing what BABE was about, I probably would not have wanted to
see it.  Even hearing positive reviews did not convince me.  But the
one or two film clips I saw were such a pleasure to watch that I was
convinced.  And certainly there was a great deal more to enjoy than
what the clips showed.  I rate this a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Dancing at Lughnasa (1998)
     CAPSULE: Change comes to a household of five unmarried sisters
during the Donegal, Ireland summer of 1936.  Some well-observed
performances, but this is not a film in which a whole not happens.  It
is unusual for Meryl Streep to play so negative a person, though she
does make the character understandable.  Rating: 7 (0 to 10), 2 (-4 to
+4)
   - Kate (Meryl Streep), Christine, her out-of-wedlock son Michael,
     Agnes, Maggie, and Rose live in a small cottage.  Michael (as a
     man many years later) is the narrator.
   - Kate, the eldest, is a self-righteous tyrant.  In town she is
     everybody's least favorite schoolteacher, cruelly but well-
     nicknamed "the gander".  She is incredibly judgmental and
     inflexible.  Always can sum up in one or two well-chosen sentences
     why someone else should be serious and should not enjoy life.
   - Two visitors come this summer.  Uncle Jack (Michael Gambon), a
     missionary physically back from Africa, mentally still there.
     Also visiting is Jack Evans, Michael's handsome father, on his way
     to fight for the Republicans in Spain.
   - A Michael Gambon performance is always worth seeing.
   - Nice photography of Irish country life.
   - Puritanical Kate is fighting the coming of change.
   - Rose is a little simple-minded and is tempted to go off with Danny
     Bradley who is married but separated.
   - Michael has no memories of his father and father must win over
     son.
   - Uncle Jack is like the fool in KING LEAR.  From his strange and
     addled mind come the most logical thoughts.
   - A different and mostly unsympathetic role for Streep.
   - Interface of religion and two different kinds of paganism.
   - Release will probably be in November accompanied by ads in Variety
     saying "For your consideration..."

Title
Review for Betrayed (1988)
          Capsule review:  One of Costa-Gavras's lesser efforts,
     BETRAYED replaces telling a true story with telling an action
     adventure made up of possibly realistic elements.  FBI
     undercover agent gets the goods on a white supremacist group
     in a plot that generally follows Hitchcock's NOTORIOUS.
     Rating: +1.
     Costa-Gavras makes political thrillers.  They always have a very left-
wing slant and very often he makes the United States government the villain.
Still, his films usually get a decent following in this country and films
like Z and MISSING have a near-classic status.  Others, like the extremely
shrill STATE OF SIEGE, may get shown but probably generate less interest.
Costa-Gavras usually makes films that have a sort of docu-drama feel, basing
them on actual incidents.  BETRAYED, Costa-Gavras's new film, is very
atypical of his films, enough so that it is difficult to believe that this
is also a Costa-Gavras film.  First, the docu-drama feel is gone.  BETRAYED
is not intended to be taken as a true story, only to have situations that
are realistic in character and which have been rearranged to tell a story.
(One wonders if that might not be how a Greek views Z, which in this country
people generally view as being only a slightly fictionalized account.)  The
second major divergence is that, at least superficially, the U.S. government
really are the heroes of BETRAYED.  the villains are the extreme right-wing
that is trying to organize itself in rural parts of this country.  And even
among the villains there seem to be gradations of nastiness.  They all seem
to be likable family men and farmers with a Jekyll-Hyde edge to them.  We
find out that the bigot who is the film's chief villain hates blacks and
Jews but perhaps nearly as much he hates neo-Nazis and you find yourself
almost liking him when he tears into these supposed allies.
     The film opens with San Kraus's radio show in Chicago.  Kraus (played
by Richard Libertini) has the style of defending causes of tolerance, not
with reason but by being as insulting as possible to anyone who disagrees
with him.  One listener, whom he has previously determined is overweight, he
tells he will not listen to her arguments until she loses fifty pounds.
This is apparently the style that makes him popular.  We feel a little shock
and not much loss when we see Kraus gunned down in a parking garage.
     Flash to the wheat fields of Illinois where country-girl-from-out-of-
town Katie Phillips (played by Debra Winger) meets and falls for handsome
farmer Gary Simmons (played by Tom Berenger).  That is the plot for a slow
half-hour.  Finally, we are told that Phillips is an undercover agent for
the FBI trying to root out white supremacists and shortly after that all the
nice country people we have met start revealing to Phillips that they are
white supremacists and that they kill blacks for sport.  Well, that is it.
She has the goods.  Right?  Wrong!  Her control wants her to get in deeper
and deeper and to get evidence for more and more serious crimes.  The rest
of the film follows a predictable course in a plot that dirties everyone it
touches: the supremacists, the FBI, even the kids.  Along the way we see
white supremacist "hunting," a jamboree where white supremacist groups of
all sorts get together and camp in happy brotherhood and teach the kids how
to shoot blacks and Jews.  The plot gets more and more fanciful has has more
action as it goes along.  One realizes eventually that individual scenes in
the film may be based on real incidents but the plot as a whole is invented.
And that is disappointing.  Costa-Gavras could have done a docu-drama like
MISSING or Z and instead made an action film like so many other filmmakers
do.  BETRAYED is no more hard-hitting than the very similar INTO THE
HOMELAND made for cable over the past year.  Rate BETRAYED a +1 on the -4 to
+4 scale.

Title
Review for Shadow of a Doubt (1991) (TV)
     When I was growing up, I was aware that there were a series of dramas
brought to television by the Hallmark Hall of Fame.  It seemed that near
card-sending holidays Hallmark would do a television play, and some were
decent, but I would have preferred to go out to a movie any day.  I think as
I got older Hallmark really did get better.  I know my perspective changed,
but I genuinely feel that objectively they improved also.  I first noticed
how good they had gotten in 1979 with the remake of ALL QUIET ON THE WESTERN
FRONT.  I liked the film a lot and really wanted to see the original classic
film.  Actually I was a bit disappointed by the original, which did not seem
to be so detailed a story or have so well-developed characters.  But I told
myself it was not a fair comparison.  The original was an early sound film
before a lot of techniques were developed.  Besides, I'd seen the remake
first and it had formed my opinions on the story.  I also preferred their
BEAUTY AND THE BEAST to Cocteau's, but then I am not a big fan of Cocteau's
style.
     I ran out of excuses with Michael Tuchner's HUNCHBACK OF NOTRE DAME.  I
had seen the three major film productions with Lon Chaney, Charles Laughton,
and Anthony Quinn in the title role.  Anthony Hopkins was the best Quasimodo
and this production was the most detailed.  I have also liked some of their
original productions, but have only recently started paying closer attention
to them.  DECORATION DAY was among the best five films I saw last year.  If
I was going to put made-for-television movies on my "Top Ten of the Year"
list, this would have made the list.  Now Hallmark is back, remaking the
classic film.  This may be their first real suspense film, but they are
starting with grand style.
     Overall, the production values of SHADOW OF A DOUBT were very good.
They used the original script, which was co-authored by Thorton Wilder.  The
murderous gigolo "Uncle Charley" was played by Mark Harmon, in the role that
Joseph Cotten originally filled.  Now, Harmon is a lot better looking than
Cotten--almost pretty.  Had someone with Harmon's looks played the role in
the Hitchcock, you have never have been able to put someone with Cotten's
looks in the remake.  But putting someone better-looking in the role of the
charming and villainous lady-killer works just fine.  Harmon is not a very
good actor and he does not project much emotion.  In this role his synthetic
charm and the veiled emotion work in his favor.  The remake on its own is a
pretty good suspense film.
     The Hitchcock film was made in 1943 and, being made during the war, it
was intended to show the soldiers what they were fighting for.  It was a
portrait of somebody's idea of an ideal American town: pearly-white, Anglo-
Saxon, Protestant.  It was a town where just about everyone sees each other
in church.  It was set in its present of 1943.  The remake is a slight
update, being set in 1953, the year Fidel Castro was captured and
imprisoned--we hear about the event on the console radio.  That really is
the film's one questionable note.  In a town like Petaluma, California, I
doubt there were still many wind-up Victrolas in 1953.  With that one minor
objection, this remake is done in fine style.  I would give it a +2 on the
-4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Few Good Men, A (1992)
          Capsule review:  A FEW GOOD MEN is an entertaining
     courtroom drama with some good dialogue.  The script raises
     issues and then unfortunately handles them in a very
     superficial manner.  Nicholson's Colonel Jessep is so
     despicable and vile that the film bypasses a discussion of
     issues and is more the story of the slaying of a monster.
     Rating: low +1 (-4 to +4).  Very minor spoilers.
     Rob Reiner has proved himself to be a fine director, though his scripts
have occasionally been better directed than written.  His latest film has
just such problems.  A FEW GOOD MEN is his film version of Aaron Sorkin's
Broadway play with Sorkin himself writing the screenplay.  Any court martial
play invites comparison to Herman Wouk's "Caine Mutiny Court-Martial," and
in several major aspects, Sorkin's play falls short.
     Marine Pfc. William T. Santiago, stationed at Guantanamo, Cuba, just
did not measure up to the high standards set by the U.S. Marine Corps.  He
is killed in a hazing incident perpetrated by Pfc. Lawson Downey and Lance
Cpl. Harold W. Dawson.  A mis-matched set of Navy lawyers is given the task
of providing the defense in the court martial.  And over the whole idea is
the shadow of Col. Nathan Jessep (played by Jack Nicholson), who commands
the Marines at Guantanamo.  We know almost immediately that Jessep is the
source of all the evil that has taken place.  Little effort is spared in the
script to make Jessep as vile and politically incorrect as possible  The
goals of our three defense lawyers--Lt. Cmdr. JoAnne Galloway (played by
Demi Moore), Lt.(j.g.) Daniel Kaffee (played by Tom Cruise), and Lt. Sam
Weinberg (played by Kevin Pollak)--are first, to stop conflicting with each
other; second, to put together a case to help Downey and Dawson; and third,
if possible, to at the same time bring down the incredibly nasty
Col. Jessep.  The result is a fun, entertaining, Kleenex-like sort of movie
that is a long way from the classic that some critics are claiming it to be.
     While I enjoyed the film, it did not work for me as a drama for three
very strong reasons.  The first is that the three lawyers are trying to
defend two men who to better their position in the Marines were willing to
stuff a rag in a man's mouth, seal his mouth and bind him with duct tape,
and (in so doing) cause the man's death.  It is a little hard to root for
the lawyers defending them.  It is even harder to root for this team of
lawyers.  In their own way they are every bit as unprofessional as Jessep.
Kaffee and Galloway start out at each other's throats for the good reason
that neither is particularly good as a lawyer.  Cruise's Kaffee, slick and
just a bit slimy as a lawyer, is lackadaisically doing his job and prides
himself on his long list of low-effort court cases.  Moore's Galloway is
hopeless in her efforts to control Kaffee, and it is only Pollak as the
sweet, healing, wise, Jewish lawyer who is able to hold the team together.
These are flat, unengaging characters, and they are not written very well.
But the film could have survived that if Nicholson's Jessep had been better
written.
     The third complaint is in the portrayal of Jessep.  If the other
characters are flat, the disgusting Jessep is linear.  It is difficult to
believe that this tactless, rather disgusting man could be given a position
of prominence as he has been in this film.  And it is a serious mistake to
oversimplify the negative characters of the film, making them easier to
detest.  At no point do we see anything in the film from Jessep's point of
view.  How much would it compromise his character to show a little merit in
his arguments?  Bringing him down has much more dramatic impact if it is
regrettable but necessary than if it is dragon-slaying.  That brings me back
to how much better a similar story was handled in the play "The Caine Mutiny
Court-Martial" or nearly as well in the film THE CAINE MUTINY.  A FEW GOOD
MEN is a film whose conflict was asking to be fleshed out, but which
preferred not to risk having the audience agree with the wrong side.
     In the final analysis, we have a film that is entertaining without
being provocative, but is enjoyable for mindless entertainment.  From me it
gets a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.  I am a little surprised at the
positive critical comment it has gotten elsewhere.

Title
Review for Titan A.E. (2000)
     The year I got frustrated with animation was 1973.  That was
the year that two events coincided.  One was the release of the
French film FANTASTIC PLANET.  The other was NBC running an animated
Star Trek series in its Saturday morning line-up.  The former had
some fascinating images of strange animals and plants in an imagined
world, but the script was obscure, static, and emotionally cold.
Ultimately it was very disappointing.  At the same time the animated
STAR TREK TV series used limited animation and even more limited
imagination in the artwork.  As I told friends that in animation you
have to put up 24 frames a second, but it is not like live action.
You have complete freedom as to what you put in those frames.
Somebody somewhere was making the decision that the images in those
frames would be unimaginative and boring, that the alien world where
Kirk was standing would be represented by a horizontal line at the
bottom of the screen.  Even with an example like FANTASTIC PLANET to
show what could be done to show some imagination, nobody did.
     When Japanese anime came along I thought that film was finally
starting to use the potential of animated film.  And it was a step
closer to what I was looking for but in spite of its many advocates,
I think anime cinema has turned into a colossal disappointment.  The
films are full of under-developed characters and over-extended
chases and fights.  If you do not care about the characters, you do
not care who wins the fights.  That brings seeing the film down to
the level of watching professional wrestling.  And in spite of
claims to the contrary Japanese animation is not good.  Generally in
anime that animation is crude and jerky.  What people are responding
to is the occasional quality of the artwork.
     TITAN A.E. much closer to what I had in mind.  The is solid
space opera in the classic tradition of writers like Gordon Dickson
and Alan Dean Foster.  In addition the animation is good and the
artwork extremely imaginative.  With the artwork, the humor, and the
animation, there are no dead spots in the film.  This is a film that
you turn away from at your own risk.  Do not go out for popcorn.
     In the early days of the 31st century a discovery is made that
could change the future for everybody on the planet Earth.  Whatever
that discovery was (and we never find out precisely) it threatens an
alien race called the Drej.  The Drej respond to the threat by
destroying Earth in 3028 A.D.  Only handfuls of people make it off
the planet before it is destroyed.  Scientist Sam Tucker arranges
for his five-year-old son Cale to be taken to safety and then pilots
the huge spherical starship Titan into space just in time to escape
the dying Earth.  Fifteen years later Cale (voiced by Matt Damon) is
a piece of space flotsam.  He is working in an interplanetary space
dump with the dregs of several alien races.  The shadowy human Korso
(Bill Pullman) tags Cale for a mysterious mission to go and find the
Titan.
     So far it seems like a space opera primarily aimed at a teen
audience.  That is exactly what it remains, but then so was STAR
WARS.  The point is that it is space opera well done.  The
screenwriters are an eclectic bunch with Ben Edlund creator of the
satire "The Tick," John August who wrote the surprisingly Generation
X film GO, and Joss Whedon creator of "Buffy the Vampire Slayer."
Three screenwriters is generally a bad sign, but three so different
talents can make for synergy and one very rich screenplay.  Here
they have written a screenplay that has some depth.  It has
unexpected twists (August's forte), some good humor (likely from
Edlund), and a good deal of fantasy imagination (which may have come
from Whedon).  They have bound in strong mythic elements (the quest,
the son avenging the father) that, though familiar, should resonate
with the audience.  The film does owe a debt to anime, but the
characters are much more developed and three-dimensional.
     Where the writing has weaknesses it is in an emotionally weak
ending which also rather stretches the credulity.  There are loose
ends left unresolved, an over-emphasis on fighting, and the Drej
make a very flat and uninteresting villain.  The other questionable
command decision is to use a raft of name actors for voices where
they are not needed.  There are so many good but barely-known actors
they could have used.  And speaking for myself only, I come to a
film like this not even knowing whose voices I will be hearing.  I
would rather not even recognize the voice and be saddled with
connections to the actors' roles in other films.
     Speaking of what is flat and what is three-dimensional, the
animation is an uneasy mixture of the two.  Most of the character
animation is flat, but the hardware uses three-dimensional animation
techniques.  This occasionally means you have a flat face in a
three-dimensional space suit.  But more important than how it is
animated is what is being animated.  Perhaps George Lucas has
finally been beaten in creating worlds and scenery rich in
imagination.  Even the artwork is full of novel ideas in the center
stage and in the details.  And making these spacescapes seem real
may well be the best use to date of 3D animation techniques.
     TITAN A.E. was produced and directed by the team of Don Bluth
and Gary Goldman, graduates of Disney animation studios.  The two
left because they saw different potentials for animation than did
Disney's other people.  They missed out on what is probably Disney's
golden age of animation and frequently their films, while some were
quite decent, seemed a step or two behind Disney Studios.  Films
like AN AMERICAN TAIL and THE LAND BEFORE TIME seemed to be only
Disney-esque.  The real creativity was from places like Disney's
Pixar in the TOY STORY films and in film's like BEAUTY AND THE
BEAST, THE LION KING, and this season's DINOSAUR.  And for animation
technique, perhaps they are still a step behind.  But in TITAN A.E.
Bluth and Goldman have given us much more imaginative images and
probably a better story.  In a season when in short order we have
DINOSAUR, TITAN A.E., CHICKEN RUN, and FANTASIA 2000 released, Bluth
and Goldman have given us what may well deserve to be the STAR WARS
of animated films.
     TITAN A.E. is a film of images and imagination, perhaps the
best space opera to come to the screen since the original STAR WARS.
Weighing heavily the novelty of this film I give it a 9 on the 0 to
10 scale and a +3 on the -4 to +4 scale.  I am hoping this film is a
bellwether of things to come.

Title
Review for Contact (1997)
     Jodi Foster has obviously gotten a little more sanguine on science
for gifted children since she directed and starred in LITTLE MAN TATE.
That was the film in which she had a budding scientific prodigy saying
"I am working on an experiment involving sulfuric acid, lasers, and
butterflies."  In CONTACT she plays one of those prodigies grown up in
a film considerably more positive on science.  This is the story of the
career of the fictional Dr. Eleanor Arroway (Foster) who at an early
age was bitten by the astronomy bug.  Her mother died giving birth to
her and her father, Ted (David Morse of THE CROSSING GUARD) instilled
in her the love of science to devote her career to SETI, the search for
extra-terrestrial life.  The SETI project turns out to be professional
suicide in the field of astronomy.  But she feels compelled to listen
to the sky and to search for signs of intelligent life.  The career
choice earns her no respect from her colleagues, and it makes life a
constant set of battles for even minimal funding.  Her chief nemesis
and occasional boss David Drumlin (Tom Skerritt), National Science
Advisor to the President, who one way or another betrays her at every
opportunity.  A one-time lover and sometimes adversary is Palmer Joss
(Matthew McConaughey), a failed priest who becomes a sort of Billy
Graham figure.  When funding has run out and Drumlin is forcing her off
the Very Large Array, the huge radio telescope made of twenty-three
dish antennae, in the desert of New Mexico, suddenly she hears a signal
that can mean only an intelligent alien broadcast.  This is a scene we
have seen recently in INDEPENDENCE DAY and THE ARRIVAL, but never with
the scientific verisimilitude that we have here.  Arroway announces to
the world that contact has been made and nothing is ever the same
again.
     And now the film takes off and continues as a high pace until the
end.  We start with a very believable picture of just what would happen
if such an announcement were made.  The National Security Advisor
Michael Kitz (James Woods) struggles to take control of any information
received from the aliens, so does Drumlin, each trying to get the ear
of the President.  (My credits list has Sidney Portier playing the
President, but apparently in a last minute substitution they have
William Clinton in the role.  The film is, after all, directed by
Robert Zemeckis who had several Presidents appearing in FORREST GUMP.
It is sure to be a controversial piece of casting, but I think Clinton
does a fine job as the President.)  CONTACT is not just a political
drama about the after-effects of contacting alien life in space.  This
is a long film that keeps going and going--almost three hours long--and
if you have seen the trailer you will find that the science fiction
content is certainly there if you wait for it.  If you have read the
book, you may be a bit disappointed, since there is far more science
fiction content in the original story, but the film does not exactly
remain earthbound either.
     The opening sequence demonstrating for us how far into the galaxy
our radio broadcasts have reached is both breath-taking and
scientifically informative.  The film is almost worth seeing just for
that sequence.  Other scenes are technically impressive, but a little
nonsensical.  In one tracking shot the camera leads Arroway running up
a flight of stairs and into a bathroom and in the end we see we are
seeing her in the medicine cabinet mirror and have been through the
scene.  There is enough good in CONTACT to make a film I would give
very high marks to, and enough that is irritating for me to really
down-rate it.  Generally when that happens I try to excuse the faults.
So while I thought there was much that was dishonest about CONTACT,
overall I would have to give it a low +3 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     Visually you could not ask for a lot more from the film, with one
major exception.  While it is not chock full of special effects and the
mattes of the Transporter seen from a distance are not convincing, the
design of the Transporter is just about as believable as an
interstellar transporter could be.  The scenes of the Transporter
running were stunning, and the journey was terrific though perhaps a
little derivative of 2001:  A SPACE ODYSSEY.  Then she plops down at
the far end and it is the "Oh, shoot!" experience.  What a failure of
imagination!  It was like watching THE BLACK HOLE II.
     There is so much that is right with this film and so much that is
wrong, it is hard to know where to begin to evaluate the ideas.  The
film I would have liked to see is the one this would have been if Carl
Sagan had not died during the production.  I cannot be positive it
would be different, but aspects of this film seem to run very counter
to what I understand as Sagan's philosophy.  Places where the book took
chances and had some engaging thoughts about religion and faith have
been reframed to change their meaning.  Certainly false information
would never have been added to the arguments in the film.  (The film
claims that 95% of the world's population believes in a Supreme Being.
Actually about 21% of the world is atheist or non- religious and while
there may be some who believe in a Supreme Being among the non-
religious, there are certainly also atheists and agnostics who at least
nominally belong to religions.  This also makes the dubious assumption
that Confucians and Shintoists believe in a Supreme Being.  The 95%
figure used in the film is wildly inaccurate.)
     What I did find surprising was people in the audience getting
angry because the "hero" of the film implied that she was either an
atheist or an agnostic.  She never tries to convince anyone to agree
with her, she simply explains why she believes what she does.  Other
people punish her for her belief and nobody in the audience got
(audibly) upset about that.  Apparently with everything else this film
does, it gets people agitated at its ideas.  The novel actually had a
nice piece looking at what could be a proof of the existence of God,
while the film turns into an affirmation of religious faith in its
final scenes.  And Arroway complains that Drumlin tells the people what
they want to hear about his views on religion!

Title
Review for Bronx Tale, A (1993)
          Capsule review:  Calogero is growing up in the Bronx in
     the late 50s with two father figures.  One is his honest,
     hard-working, biological father and the other is a likable
     hood who takes Calogero under his wing.  Robert DeNiro
     directs the film as well as playing the honest father while
     the screenwriter of the semi-autobiographical story turns in
     a winning performance as the hood.  Rating: low +2 (-4 to
     +4).
     When I think of Robert DeNiro these days, I mostly think about an
interview he gave about GUILTY BY SUSPICION.  His comments about the
blacklisting era were so shallow and so lacking in information and insight
that at the time I assumed he was a person with few talents other than
line-reading.  Now I have to reassess that conclusion after seeing his
directorial debut.
     Romantic love triangles are a staple of the film industry.  For Robert
DeNiro's directorial debut he has chosen a story with a different sort of
love triangle, one of paternal love.  Calogero has two father figures in his
life.  His true father (played by DeNiro) is a poor bus driver.  That does
not get a lot of respect in the Bronx Italian community in the late Fifties.
What does get respect is being a hood like the local neighborhood boss Sonny
(Chazz Palminteri).  One day Sonny kills a man and nine-year-old Calogero
lies to save his idol Sonny from the police.  From that point on Sonny
adopts Colgero, after a fashion.  Both he and Lorenzo, Colgero's real
father, want what is best for the boy, but Lorenzo is a straight arrow and
wants his son to have nothing to do with the hood.  In spite of his own
profession, Sonny wants to keep Colgero honest and put him on the path to
success.
     Francis Capra is a little too sharp playing the nine-year-old Calogero.
He is just a bit overly clever in his repartee with his parents.  But then
screenwriter Palminteri is actually writing about himself so might be a
little willing to exaggerate his own verbal prowess when he was Calogero's
age.  And Calogero does have  to be a little devious in how he balances his
two father figures.  The second part of the story has Calogero (now played
by Lillo Brancato) seventeen years old and romantically interested in an
attractive Black girl (Taral Hicks).  The story comes to involve tensions
between the Black and Italian communities in the Bronx.  Now to Calogero,
Sonny seems to be the only sane and tolerant person in the Italian
community.
     The story of A BRONX TALE is based on the Palminteri's semi-
autobiographical play which he used to perform as a one-person show.  The
details of life in the Bronx and the style of storytelling are reminiscent
of GOODFELLAS and DeNiro even has a cameo for Joe Pesci.  Just as earlier
this year Mel Gibson proved he had a better hand at directing than most of
us would have expected, so too DeNiro's style is surprisingly good for a
first-timer.  He has a very sure hand at combining music into the action.
His direction shows this in one of the first scenes of the film in which a
montage of scenes from a stickball game are synchronized to a do-wop song.
     But the real show-stealer is Palminteri himself as Sonny.  The same
stage presence that worked for him doing the story in his one-man show
translates to charisma on the screen.  Like Joe Mantegna in HOUSE OF GAMES,
Palminteri is the central attraction whenever he is on the screen.  As the
hood, Sonny is magnetic while the audience expectation is that he will at
some point do something nasty and his relationship with the boy will break
down.  That may or may not happen, but the character is real enough to
transcend stereotypes and the story of the relationship probably more
interesting and credible than most fiction writers would have made it.
DeNiro proves himself as an accomplished director his first time around.  My
rating is a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Dead Again (1991)
     When a little-known filmmaker has a film that makes it really big, it
is interesting to see what he or she does with that success.  What is the
next film like?  When suddenly a filmmaker is respected and has a little
more freedom, what does s/he do for an encore?  A little-known George Lucas
had a big hit with AMERICAN GRAFFITI; his next project was to bring comic-
book space opera in a way that did not suffer in the transition.  That was a
success.  Spike Lee's first post-success project was the disappointing
SCHOOL DAZE.  Kenneth Branagh, the director and star of the very successful
HENRY V, has returned with a very stylish mystery and supernatural thriller
with a dream cast.  Branagh stars with his somewhat less well known wife,
Emma Thompson.  But also on hand in smaller roles are Derek Jacobi, Andy
Garcia, Robin Williams, and European actress Hanna Schygulla (of THE
MARRIAGE OF MARIA BRAUN and BERLIN ALEXANDERPLATZ).  This is an oddly
matched collected of actors and the screenplay hardly gives them all a
chance to make contributions commensurate with their talents.
     A nameless, voiceless woman (played by Thompson) shows up at a church
school.  She has been given sanctuary for a few days, but when she starts
having screaming nightmares, the school asks a detective who is a former
student (played by Branagh) to help find out who the woman really is.  The
search is heading nowhere when Franklyn Madson shows up.  (Madson played by
Jacobi) is a furniture dealer with a talent for hypnotism.  He offers his
services to put the mystery woman in a trance and help her to remember her
previous life.  And what she remembers is indeed a previous life, a life in
which she was someone else.  It was a life that concluded in a famous murder
case of 1949.  What is more, there are indications that her detective friend
may be a reincarnation who was also involved in the same murder.  In the
past lives a composer and his wife (also played by Branagh and Thompson)
have marriage problems that end in the wife murdered and the husband
executed.  At this point, the uncertainties start to pile up.  The
reincarnation may or may not be authentic.  Roman Strauss, the composer, may
or may not have been the murderer.  And, most disturbing, the events may or
may not be fated to happen again, or perhaps the murder will go in the other
direction as a sort of karmic revenge.  The film has a  complex plot and
leaves unanswered the biggest question: does the film really make sense or
not?  Does the ending really explain all we have seen?  Like JACOB'S LADDER,
most of what you can get out of this film you get thinking about it
afterwards.
     The photography is stylishly done, particularly in the scenes set in
1949.  They are done in monochrome, but the blacks and whites are just
slightly tinted.  At least that is the style element easy to identify.  And
the credits intercut with newspaper clippings about the murder opens the
film with a feel almost like that of MURDER ON THE ORIENT EXPRESS.
     Oh, one more thing.  The best touch in this film is the product
placement.  This film *does* have a product placement.  And as it happens it
is the best product placement you will see in a film this year.  It kind of
makes up for all the bad product placements we have had this summer.
     Overall the production values and the acting talent are better than the
story.  And the story is better than it seems at the end of the film.  I
would still give DEAD AGAIN only a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.  With this
cast it should have been better.

Title
Review for East Is East (1999)
     In 1946, before there was a partition between Pakistan and
India, Muslim George Khan (play by Om Puri) moved to London, started
a business running a fish and chips shop, and took a second wife, a
non-Muslim English woman.  He then reared six sons and a daughter by
the English wife.  He raised his children to be good Muslims--better
Muslims than he could have afforded to be.  They took little looks
at the English world around them, but they did what George wanted.
When they needed discipline, George did his fatherly duty and
corrected them.  But overall life went fairly smoothly.  That is
what happened for twenty-five years as George saw it.  The seven
children, living in the same house but a different universe, saw
things quite differently.  They wanted to assimilate into the
society they saw around them.  To them Dad's presence was always a
hazard.  He could catch them eating pork or marching in a Christian
procession.  Generally they just pretended in his presence to be
practicing Muslims, the path of least resistance.  Outside the house
they were living the new world of freedom that England and
particularly 1971 brought.
     For twenty-five years their world views diverged more and more.
But there was no reason for a confrontation.  The first sign that
things were not right was when the eldest son, in the middle of an
arranged marriage ceremony walked out and went to live in London.
George is bewildered by this strange behavior, but never questions
if perhaps he might be part of the reason.  After all he did nothing
but fulfill his role as father as Islam seems it.  The family
certainly could not fault him for that.  It would be going against
Allah.  But two of his other sons are now becoming a little too
English.  It is time to bring them back to their religion by
arranging good Islamic marriages for the two of them.
     The script follows the sons around showing the character of
each as they try and perhaps fail to be like the people around them.
The youngest son is picked on by each of his siblings and even his
father calls him by the nickname "Bastard."  He frequently hides
from the world in a shed behind his house or retreats into his parka
which he wears day and night, on the street and even to bed.  It is
his own portable cave to retreat into.  When it is discovered that
somehow he is not circumcised his father gives not a jot of thought
to a little boy's fears, the religion says he must be circumcised
and, of course, he will be.
     EAST IS EAST was produced for Channel 4 television in England,
following in the traditions of MY BEAUTIFUL LAUNDERETTE, and SAMMY
AND ROSIE GET LAID.  Those dealt with Indians fitting into London
lower-middle class Manchester neighborhoods, this film deals with
Pakistanis.  EAST IS EAST is the most pointed of the three dramas
and by far the best story.  Tensions between George and his family
mirror those between the Pakistanis and their neighbors, many of
whom espouse Enoch Powell's anti-immigration policies and use it as
an excuse for intolerance.  (Enoch Powell's 1968 "Rivers of Blood"
speech argued against allowing non-white British subjects to
immigrate into Britain.  His speech contained some rather dire and
fanciful predictions of a Britain in which the whites were a
persecuted minority.  The speech did not end his career, but it
ruined it.  A brilliant classical scholar but less than savvy
politically, his views were quickly exaggerated and adopted by a
racist minority who used his arguments as an excuse for racial
intolerance.)  George faces the intolerance of a neighboring Powell
supporter and tries to break up the Romeo-and-Juliet relationship a
son of his has with the daughter of the neighbor.
     The story finds an almost perfect ending in a very understated
but poignant exchange between George and a neighbor boy.  This film
packs a great deal into a small space.  I rate it an 8 on the 0 to
10 scale and a high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Naked Gun: From the Files of Police Squad!, The (1988)
     You are going to have to stick with the old arm-chair historian on this
one.  THE NAKED GUN has a long history.  In 1974 a film was made that was
sort of a radical experiment in comedy films.  THE GROOVE TUBE was a sort of
satire on television that was not a single story but a set of black-out
sketches lampooning all aspects of television.  It spawned a host of
imitators, one of the best being KENTUCKY FRIED MOVIE, which was written in
large part by three men, Jim Abrahams, David Zucker, and Jerry Zucker.  Like
THE GROOVE TUBE, KENTUCKY FRIED MOVIE was mostly made up of very short
sketches but it included "A Fistful of Yen," a very extended satire on the
Bruce Lee film ENTER THE DRAGON.  It was clear that someone felt the same
madcap style could be applied to longer satires.  Meanwhile, in another part
of the forest, a production company called Quinn-Martin was making a set of
popular television series including THE F.B.I., THE FUGITIVE, RUN FOR YOUR
LIFE, THE INVADERS, and a police show or two, all using much the same style
of story-telling, making them an easy target for satire.  But television was
not yet ready for the Abrahams/Zucker/Zucker style of comedy.  What made all
the difference was when the Abrahams/Zucker/Zucker took a mediocre but
popular television movie TERROR IN THE SKY (which was in itself a remake of
ZERO HOUR) and remade it using the same three-joke-a-minute style they had
used in "A Fistful of Yen."  The result was AIRPLANE!  It proved to the
networks that there was a viable market for satire--or at least the
Abrahams/Zucker/Zucker brand of satire.  But could the
Abrahams/Zucker/Zucker style of humor be applied to a regular television
series and could it garner an audience big enough to sustain it.  In a word:
no.  While POLICE SQUAD! was certainly one of the most inventive comedy
programs ever on network television, outside of a loyal core of fans (my
wife among them), people saw it once or twice and then felt they had seen
it.  By the time it was on there were fewer Quinn-Martin productions on
television anyway so perhaps fewer people even remembered the Quinn-Martin
cliches like the dramatic voice reading the title of the episode.  After one
season of six shows the series was apparently no longer profitable enough to
continue and was relegated to the ranks of cult television.
Abrahams/Zucker/Zucker have since made two more theatrical films: TOP SECRET
and now the POLICE SQUAD! movie, THE NAKED GUN.
     While Police Lieutenant Drebbin (played by Leslie Nielsen) is off in
Lebanon beating up every anti-American world and leader and warning them to
keep out of America, one of his own undercover agents is shot, left for
dead, and framed for heroin running.  Drebbin investigates and finds at the
heart of the matter a drug kingpin (played by Ricardo Montalban, in his
second film adaptation of a cult television show) with a plan to kill Queen
Elizabeth.  I will not spend a lot of time on the plot since it is clear the
filmmakers did not either.  I will say that notably missing are some of the
best running gags like the omniscient shoeshine boy and the frozen-scene end
titles.
     The real problem with the POLICE SQUAD! movie is that it is not really
a POLICE SQUAD! movie.  While it has a touch of the old style of three jokes
a minute, it segues into the Inspector Clouseau style in which the jokes are
as funny, probably, but each one lasts longer, and there are fewer.
Clouseau humor relied on the personality that Peter Sellers was able to put
into the character while the original POLICE SQUAD!'s jokes were a steady
barrage from all directions.  Leslie Nielsen's Drebbin does not have the
personal appeal that Sellers gave Clouseau.  As a lampoon of police shows
POLICE SQUAD! took every cliche it could find and turned each one on its
head.  It took place in a uniformly insane world.  THE NAKED GUN, like the
Clouseau films, takes place in a sane world with one insane man.  This leads
to a different character of film altogether.  It is slower and less
interesting.  I would think it would be unlikely people would want to see
Nielsen reprise his role again and again the way Sellers was able to.
     In spite of a number of funny moments, quite a number in fact, THE
NAKED GUN is a misfire and will probably be a one-shot.  Rate it a 0 on the
-4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Barcelona (1994)
     In the early 1980s Ted is a marketing executive posted to
Barcelona.  He is very serious, very dedicated, very straight-laced,
and takes trendy "marketing philosophy" just a bit too seriously.  In
his off hours he dates some of the beautiful women who act as
hostesses at the local trade show, but avoids getting closely attached
to the women and their anything-goes lifestyle.  One night on his
doorstep shows up his cousin Ted, a smooth talking but inconsiderate
navy officer who is a bit of a jerk.  Fred is in Barcelona playing
diplomat and paving the way for a visit of the U.S. Sixth Fleet.  This
gives Fred an opportunity to visit Ted, who is himself less than
enthused about the visit.  Fred enjoys inventing stories for Ted's girl
friends including claiming that Ted wears masochistic leather underwear
and is into sexual perversion.  The only thing that Fred seems serious
about is his love of the United States, but that can be a problem with
anti-US feeling running very high in Europe and even occasional
terrorist attacks against Americans.
     At first Fred seems to the viewer to have a sort of Auntie Mame
charm, playing his wild practical jokes.  But soon we begin to see why
Ted is less than pleased to have Fred around.  Fred's mishaving becomes
something less than endearing and eventually rather irritating.  Fred's
jokes take on a more serious tone, and his lack of diplomacy and
jingoist attitudes cause problems for others and himself.
     Whit Stillman, who wrote and directed 1990's METROPOLITAN, has
returned with another film about smooth-talking young intellectuals.
Taylor Nichols and Chris Eigenman--both from METROPOLITAN--are Ted and
Fred.  Stillman, who won an Oscar nomination for the previous film, has
taken much the same sort of dialog, but has woven into the story
politics sex and politics.  Stillman's screenplay, of course,
concentrates on good dialog.  In fact it is unrealistically good
dialog--it is doubtful that anybody really speaks this well off the
cuff and to some extent that makes the films less believable .  It is
difficult at times to believe that these are real people as eloquent as
Stillman's characters are.  The plot also has a number of nice ironies,
but the story line is a little thin.  Like Woody Allen's MANHATTAN this
is a film that make great visual use of the city in which it is set but
wears out any curiosity we might have about who is going to end up
living with whom. This film needs a little more than that to keep us
caring.  It needs a strong plot and there it falls down.  Much of the
film is about Ted's attitude toward Fred, and Fred just does not seem
worth us caring about him.  Nor is one sure how accurate is BARCELONA's
depiction of US-Spanish relations.
     In general the film is entertaining but not as rewarding as it
might be.  Parts almost fall into the level of fluff, and cliched fluff
at that.  My rating would be +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Outbreak (1995)
     The film starts with a quote saying that viruses pose the greatest
threat to human existence on this planet.  That is probably fairly
accurate.
     Hey, want to see something really scary?  I am not talking scary
because things jump out at you or actors wear plastic masks.  I am
talking scary because it is only too possible.  It probably has already
come near to happening in recent years.  Most of OUTBREAK is a very
credible extrapolation of what might well happen if a seriously
dangerous virus got loose in this country.  If Zaire Ebola had gotten
loose close to home the events shown in OUTBREAK are really quite
possible.  In fact it is difficult to read the non-fiction books THE
COMING PLAGUE by Laurie Garrett or THE HOT ZONE by Richard Preston
without envisioning scenarios not unlike the one in this film.
     As the film opens with an outbreak of a viral disease in Zaire in
1967, the U.S. Army's response to eliminate the disease is quick but
effective.  Twenty-eight years later an Army team from Fort Dietrich
led by Dr. Sam Daniels (Dustin Hoffman) finds a new viral disease has
broken out in the Motaba River Valley and dubs the disease Motaba.
Even Daniels, who is used to working with the likes of Ebola, Lassa,
and Hanta, is frightened by the virulence of Motaba.  And even as he is
returning home to report the terrible new disease, Motaba virus is
traveling to the U.S. by its own route.  And a disease with the
virulence to infect 260,000,000 people in 48 hours and to kill them in
not much more is loosed.
     Daniels wants to pursue the new disease but is ordered off.
Ironically, his ex-wife, Dr. Roberta Keough (Rene Russo), who works for
the Centers for Disease Control, has an opportunity to investigate the
same disease Sam has told her about.  Daniels finds his strings being
pulled by his superior officer, played by Morgan Freman, and a higher-
up general, played by Donald Sutherland, neither of whom want him
working on the new virus.  Sutherland is quick to call in drastic
action to quarantined areas.  "Be compassionate," he tells a
Presidential commission on the crisis, "but be compassionate globally."
What he sees as compassion on the global level is something very
different on the local level.  The film clearly doesn't agree with this
policy, but under the circumstances he may be talking sense.
     One problem with the script by Laurence Dworet and Robert Roy Pool
is that it is all too obviously trying both to be realistic and at the
same time to be an action film.  The two just don't go that well
together.  OUTBREAK wastes time on developing the rocky relationship
between the two divorced doctors.  Then it wastes the last third of the
film on an unlikely and gratuitous action story built around a
surprisingly tired and over-used premise.  It makes a human the villain
as if the story did not have enough viral villains.  And the human
villain's motive is a strikingly overused cliche.  More disappointing,
the race to understand and control the new virus is diverted into a
standard action-film chase.  This takes time and emphasis away from
more interesting questions such as how is it possible to maintain a
strict quarantine on a town of 2600 people?  When the chases are over
it is all the harder to remember what set this story apart from so many
similar action films.
     It is a shock to see Dustin Hoffman in a science fiction film and
one in which he plays an action hero, albeit a reluctant one.  Donald
Sutherland plays much the same character he played in PUPPET MASTERS,
though he plays the character as seen from a different viewpoint.  Rene
Russo is competent and likable in her role, and it is nice to have a
woman over thirty-five in a starring role, but she does not imbue her
character with any real power.  Curiously, for a German, director
Wolfgang Petersen seems to have a need to put action in a story that
might work better as a more cerebral piece.  That is a fault here even
as it was with his ENEMY MINE.
     This is a film I can well recommend for its first two-thirds and
if you have come that far, at least you will not be bored when the film
turns from extrapolation to action.  But the final forty minutes or so
has some serious sacrifices of logic for commerciality.  Somebody
apparently decided that the more interesting and more credible story
would not sell.  I was at times thinking this would be a strong +3, but
it lost a point in the final reel.  It remains a high +2 on the -4 to
+4 scale.
     The following are comments I made about OUTBREAK before seeing the
film:
     "Let me put it this way.  In its present form the Satan Bug is an
extremely refined powder.  I take a saltspoon of this powder, go
outside into the grounds of Mordon and turn the saltspoon upside down.
What happens?  Every person in Mordon would be dead within the hour,
the whole of Wiltshire would be an open tomb by dawn.  In a week, ten
days, all life would have ceased to exist in Britain.  I mean all life.
The Plague, the Black Death--as nothing compared with this.  Long
before the last man died in agony, ships or planes or birds or just the
waters of the North Sea would have carried the Satan Bug to Europe.  We
can conceive of no obstacle that can stop its eventual world-wide
spread.  Two months, I would say two months at the very most....  The
Lapp in the far north of Sweden.  The Chinese peasant tilling his rice
fields in the Yangtze valley.  The cattle rancher on his station in the
Australian outback, the shopper on Fifth Avenue, the primitive in
Tierra del Fuego.  All dead.  Because I turned a saltspoon upside
down....  Who would be the last to go?  I cannot say.  Perhaps the
great albatross forever winging its way round the bottom of the world.
Perhaps a handful of Eskimos deep in the Arctic basin.  But the seas
travel the world over, and so also do the winds; one day, one day soon,
they too would die."
     That was from the novel THE SATAN BUG by Ian Stuart (a pen name
for Alastair MacLean).  Almost the identical quote was used in the film
version.  And it hooked me into a different type of science fiction I
had not known about before, epidemiological science fiction which looks
at what would happen if some really virulent and contagious disease got
loose on modern society.
     I like to consider science fiction a field where people are
thinking out some of the most serious issues that could be shaping our
future.  It is the ideal place to work out some of the more frightening
epidemic scenarios, much as it was for working out scenarios of nuclear
war.  But on the whole science fiction writers have avoided talking
about disease or have limited themselves to separating themselves from
the real action by examining isolated groups of scientists as in
ANDROMEDA STRAIN or the aftermath as in EARTH ABIDES or the British
television series SURVIVORS.  Even THE STAND concentrated only on
people who were to survive.  The time is right for science fiction to
consider the most serious societal aspects of epidemics, but I do not
know if OUTBREAK is the right film.
     Consider some of the issues that particularly dangerous viruses
raise.  Suppose some new virus that came along was something so bad
that the rights of the afflicted were overwhelmed by the danger they
pose to those not yet afflicted.  That is pretty much what happened
with diseases in the Middle Ages, and all our medical research has done
has been to raise the threshold a little to make it harder for a
disease to reach that level.  Science fiction writers, be they in
literature or film, have never seemed as excited by that concept as
they might be.  The attitude of writers has seemed to be, "After all,
we have licked polio and smallpox and it is just a matter of time for
the rest of the diseases."  Well, now people are starting to realize
that we are not as secure as we thought.  Malaria and tuberculosis are
on the rebound; AIDS is not readily amenable to treatment.  And we
think of AIDS as being a horrible disease, but we still have the luxury
(and, yes, the responsibility) to consider the rights of the victim.
If AIDS was as contagious as Zaire Ebola the politics of dealing with
it would have to be very different.  (Incidentally, a very sobering
thought: the best evidence is that Sudan Ebola did not have a common
origin with Zaire Ebola.  That means that in the course of a few short
months nature had invented the Ebola virus twice.)  How would we handle
a disease for which care-giving was tantamount to suicide?  What if the
mere proximity of victims constituted a genuine threat?  Many of the
most bigoted myths and exaggerations about AIDS are theoretically
possible in some disease.  In fact, even AIDS is probably worse in some
regards than the disease in OUTBREAK.  It has a much longer interval of
contagion before showing symptoms.  Combine that with high
susceptibility and you have a monster a few microns long that is a lot
scarier than anything most writers have considered so far.  Hopefully,
recent books on the subject of newly emerging diseases may get people
thinking about these issues even if science fiction writers continue to
shy away from the subject.

Title
Review for Cascadeur (1998)
     CAPSULE: A decent adventure film with story line inspired by
Indiana Jones and action inspired by Jackie Chan movies.  Hardy Martins
does his own impressive stunts but not much acting in a film that is
diverting and lightweight.  Rating: 6 (0 to 10), 1 (-4 to +4)
   - Fast paced, well-produced little adventure film.  Since it does
     not try to be much more than that, the real test is whether it is
     better than the action films that show up in their dozens on
     cable.  It is of the same ilk, but this would stand out as being
     pretty good by comparison.
   - Solid action film with good pace and a little bit of humor.
   - "Cascadeur" means "stunt man."
   - Main character is a stuntman who has had an accident and is now
     living in the Black Forest collecting pine cones.  Christin, an
     art student looking for the Amber Chamber teams with Martins.
   - The only reason it would not be seen in the US is that the
     characters are all German and the McGuffin everybody is looking
     for requires some understanding of German history from the viewer.
     The Ark of the Covenant is meaningful to everybody from a Jewish,
     Christian, or Islamic background.  To care about the Amber Chamber
     (which is real, by the way) you have to know some German history.
     The Prussian king Friedrich Wilhelm I gave it to Peter the Great
     in 1716. The Amber Chamber was kept in the imperial Catherine
     Palace outside St.  Petersburg, then Leningrad, before being
     dismantled and removed by German troops in 1941. The chamber, last
     sighted in 1945, is an assembly of ornately carved amber wall
     panels and furniture.  It is the most sought-after of the Russian
     treasures stolen by the Germans in the Second World War.
   - The plot seems more sado-masochistic than a similar American film
     would be.
   - Main actor, Hardy Martins, is not a very expressive actor.  He
     looks like a taller Jean-Claude Van Damme.

Title
Review for Pulp Fiction (1994)
          Capsule review:  What would you get if Robert
     Altman tried to do a super-violent crime film, a cross
     between SHORT CUTS and SCARFACE?  Quentin Tarantino
     tells a weird collection of inter-connected crime
     stories peopled by a weirder collection of thugs than
     Damon Runyan could have imagined on drugs.  This is a
     film with comedy, heavy violence, some terrific
     dialogue, and a whole lot of entertainment.  Rating:
     high +2 (-4 to +4)
     At the heart of it all is Marsellus Wallace (played by Ving
Rhames), a Los Angeles crime lord who employs two vicious hitmen, Vince
and Jules (John Travolta and Samuel L. Jackson).  The hitmen are on an
errand for Marsellus, killing some young hoods who tried to steal from
Marsellus.  Their conversation is disarming as they discuss how fast
food restaurants are different in Europe and what a "TV pilot" is.
They also talk about Marsellus's wife Mia (Uma Thurman) and what the
crimelord did to someone who gave her a foot massage.  It starts likea
normal job for the two hoods, but it will not be a normal day and
thereby hangs a tale.  Meanwhile super-jealous Marsellus is planning to
ask Vince to look after Mia for a few days while the crime lord is away
on business.  But things are not going to happen like Marsellus plans
and thereby hangs another tale.  At the same time,  the crime lord is
planning to buy off an aging prizefighter, Butch (Bruce Willis), and to
have a fight fixed.  Marsellus is not just in for a surprise, but
genuinely the shock of his life.  And thereby hangs yet another tale.
Harvey Keitel has a terrific little piece proving that an expert
janitor can have more prestige than a hired gun.
     This is a film with some of the weirdest and perhaps among the
most engaging criminals ever put on film.  Tarantino has a real talent
for creating interesting characters and situations, and even for how to
set up a scene so that the audience is constantly seeing the
unexpected.  Even when the plot slows down, as it does during Vince's
night out baby-sitting, the film never bogs down.
     Tarantino, who authored the script based on stories he co-wrote
with Roger Avary, has chosen to tell those stories out of chronological
order.  That throws the viewer a little off balance, but never to the
detriment of the story-telling.  Many scenes are familiar, but
Tarantino makes us see them with a fresh eye.  Whan a character shoots
up with heroin, we have a close-up on the hypodermic with red blood
swirling into the colorless heroin solution before it is injected.  A
visit to a chic hamburger restaurant is a setpiece recreating 1950s
culture.  A taxi ride appears just a little strange until the viewer
realizes everything seen out of the windows of the cab is in black and
white.
     Tarantino has given us a film that is fresh and funny.  It is
peopled with some of the weirdest characters we have seen on film in
quite a while.  It will be interesting to see if he can please both
fans of his ultra-violent action films and a wider audience looking for
interesting stories.  If you do not object to the violence this is a
most rewarding films with authentic horror, action, and characters of
some depth.  I give it a high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Sixth Sense, The (1999)
     Thematically similar to the current STIR OF ECHOES, THE SIXTH
SENSE is a horror story told so subtly that it is a psychological study
that is told against a backdrop that is almost magical realism.  It is
a mystery told so subtly that the viewer does not even recognize it as
a mystery until at the end the solution is presented.  Then the viewer
may want to see the film a second time just to verify if the script is
consistent and to see how well the mystery was hidden.
     Malcolm Crowe (played by Bruce Willis) is a South Philadelphia
child psychologist.  He is so good at what he does he has been given a
citation from the mayor.  Currently he is dealing with a severely
disturbed child, Vincent Gray (Donnie Wahlberg).  Malcolm knows that
the classic treatment and assumptions of treating children with this
syndrome can be wrong.  The last similar patient grew up highly
disturbed and blaming Malcolm.  In revenge he broke into Malcolm's
house, shooting the psychologist.  Malcolm desperately wants to avoid
the same mistakes in treating Vincent.  But from the beginning he is
having serious trouble connecting with Vincent or in truth with anyone.
His bad experience with the previous patient has left him almost
without the emotions to reach out.  What he slowly begins to discover
is that Vincent is trying to adjust in any way he can to something
beyond an emotional problem. His problem is that he sees the dead.  It
is not just that believes he sees the dead--they really are there and
they talk to him.  He will see a dead child, start to talk to him, and
then see the back of the child's head is blown off. He lives with a
thousand unpleasant jolts like this every day.  The resulting shock is
just more than he can handle much of the time.
     Bruce Willis obviously gets top billing for this film being a
veteran of so many high-grossing films.  In fact he turns in one of his
most subdued and best performances here.  But he is playing opposite an
even better actor.  Donnie Wahlberg has some very difficult scenes to
deliver as the haunted--figuratively and literally--child.  Too young
to have gone through the years of training most of today's actors have,
he seems to be a natural actor capable instinctively of giving a
layered performance.  Whether he is remembered at Academy Award time or
not he has given just about the best performance of the year and he has
made a difficult film work.  Certainly some credit must go to writer
and director M. Night Shyamalan who must have known exactly what
haunted feel he wanted from Wahlberg.  Shyamalan keeps the pacing slow
and ominous throughout.  The James Newton Howard score is not one of
his best but adds to the tension.
     This is a film with some clever twists and a really good
performance by a child actor.  This may be the surprise film of the
season.  I give it an 8 on the 0 to 10 scale and a high +2 on the -4 to
+4 scale.

Title
Review for Tucker: The Man and His Dream (1988)
          Capsule review:  Francis Ford Coppola and Lucasfilm in
     top form bring to the screen the story of automotive legend
     Preston Tucker.  The film is a tribute to American creativity
     and a lament about a system that wastes genius.  Jeff Bridges
     refreshingly plays that increasingly rare hero of the screen,
     a man of genius.  Rating: +3.
     Okay, I admit it.  I like stories about engineers and engineering
feats.  My favorite war film is probably DAM BUSTERS.  I liked THE RIGHT
STUFF a lot, even if it in some ways trivialized the space program.  I like
tributes to intelligence and ingenuity, particularly if the ingenuity is in
something other than a better way to clout someone on the head or drive a
car in a car chase.  It is about time filmmakers recognized that some
audiences respect and have interest in other talents than those--perhaps
some skills that can't be tested in a video game.  The problem is that
videogame skills are easy to make exciting on a screen.  Intelligence,
drive, and vision really require a good script.  Francis Ford Coppola's
TUCKER: The Man and His Dream has a good script.  It is the first film I
have seen since THE RIGHT STUFF that has a hero I would call heroic.  Part
of the reason is that both films are about true pieces of history, but also
that both portray a sort of American engineering optimism of the 1940s and
1950s that seems to be very rare today.
     TUCKER is the biography of Preston Tucker (enthusiastically played by
Jeff bridges), who had visions of creating a car of superior design but who
was brought down by the system in a true story that could have come from an
Ayn Rand novel.  It shows the design and the building of the Tucker--a
futuristic car that the entrepreneur wanted to build in the years following
World War II.  This film is the anecdotal story of how Tucker assembled a
design team, financed the project, acquired a factory, and sold the idea of
the car to the public, and finally of the events that led to Tucker's name
*not* becoming a household word.
     A film about creativity should be creative and TUCKER is, in a lot of
different ways.  The film starts out as a public relations film for the
Tucker Motor Company and with no discernible boundaries, segues into the
real story of the film.  Particularly creative are the ways in which the
film visualizes telephone conversations.  And even with the creative
photography, TUCKER creates a period feel.
     And speaking of imaginative things never done before, Coppola manages
to turn Martin Landau's character (Abe) into someone likable and
sympathetic.  With the exception of an abortive effect during the second
season of SPACE: 1999, no one has ever tried, much less succeeded, at making
this wooden actor seem likable.  Landau even looks the part, or at least the
type, something done by no one else major in this film, as Coppola seems
intentionally to tell the audience.  No matter--his characters embody a
spirit that transcends physical resemblance.  Also occasionally they say
things that are intended more for 1988 ears, but always to make a point
well-taken.

Title
Review for Wyatt Earp (1994)
          Capsule review:  Instead of short films that
     inaccurate portray the Wyatt Earp and the gunfight at the
     O.K. Corral, Costner and Kasdan bring us a big 189-minute
     biopic of Wyatt Earp that inaccurately shows his whole
     life.  Costner does not do too much for Earp, but Dennis
     Quaid's Doc Holliday is a genuine tour de force.  Still,
     the film just does not entertain or edify sufficiently to
     justify the length.  Rating: high 0 (-4 to +4).  A
     discussion of historical accuracy at the end of this
     review may contain minor spoilers.
     Last year I reviewed TOMBSTONE and both criticized and praised the
film for being half-accurate as a film version of the events around the
famous gunfight at the O.K. Corral.  Well, I see the error of my ways.
At least I have to say that there is a whole lot more to an historical
film than accuracy.  WYATT EARP is even a little more accurate than even
TOMBSTONE on some points.  But just recreating historical facts does not
make for a good film.  The two films are faithful to the historical
detail about equally, but TOMBSTONE is certainly the more worthwhile.
The definitive film about Wyatt Earp, if it is even possible, still
remains to be made.
     Basically the title of WYATT EARP tells it all.  This is a
biography of Wyatt Earp from the time he was a teenager to his
retirement.  When the film opens Wyatt is in the Oriental Saloon waiting
for the most famous gunfight of his life and probably of the American
West.  Then we flash back and now Wyatt is a teenager on his family farm
in Missouri, anxious to go off and join his brothers fighting the South.
Instead he finds himself giving in to the will of an autocratic father
(Gene Hackman).  Wyatt's real father, incidentally, was not a lawyer as
the film would have it, but a farmer and a cooper.  Over some protest,
Wyatt's father announces one day that the family will move west.  Wyatt
goes and finds the West beautiful but also lawless and violent.  He
returns to Missouri to learn to be a lawyer and to raise a family.  When
his wife dies he returns west and tries his hand at being an alcoholic,
a low-life, a horse thief, and a mugger in the hopes that he will soon
be able to add "corpse" to his resume.  This doesn't work out for him
either.
     Getting back on his feet, he decides to hunt the mighty buffalo (or
"titonka" to you Costner fans).  Wyatt befriends Ed and Bat Masterson
who come along with him as mule skinners.  Later when Wyatt accidentally
shows his prowess at subduing drunks he is asked to become a lawman, he
brings the Masterson's along with him.  And the rest is history--not
that script writers Dan Gordon and Lawrence Kasdan did much of a job of
researching it.
     Costner plays Wyatt as Costner.  He glides through the part doing
little we have not seen from him before.  That is really a pity, since
he desperately needs a role that will give him more to do.  He has been
in some good films, but it is becoming clear he wants to play the hero
roles of an Errol Flynn without the dramatic range of a John Wayne.  But
if it looks like this film didn't give him much opportunity to stretch
himself, look what it did for Dennis Quaid.  As Doc Holliday, Quaid
submerges himself into a Georgia accent, a moustache, and a beard, and
is nearly unrecognizable.  (The real Holliday wore no beard, by the
way.)  There are a host of other familiar faces including Mark Harmon,
Catherine O'Hara, Tom Sizemore, and Betty Buckley.  Clearly not much
expense was spared on the cast or even the sets, yet the film has not
much sparkle or style.  James Newton Howard's score is never engaging.
With all the beautiful Arizona scenery available Kasdan rarely lets the
camera take much advantage of it.
     Under Kasdan's direction the film ends up being somewhat ponderous
and oddly dull.  Events take a long time to develop.  While no film has
ever so well caught the complexity of the events surrounding the corral
gunfight, and that is the difficult part, the gunfight itself is staged
very inaccurately.  The actual scenario of the fight is easily available
so that piece of the script could have written itself, but apparentlyit
just was not researched or Kasdan did not care.  I am not certain, but I
seem to remember in this film five men facing down the Earps rather than
the actual four.  It seems as if somebody who knew something about the
Earps wrote an outline for the film that said at this point put in the
gunfight, and then someone who didn't know as much wrote the description
of the fight.  The film is accurate on a high level, but very inaccurate
on low-level details.  And it is about an hour longer than it should
have been to sustain audience interest.  For what they got right, I am
tempted to rate it higher, but it also makes some big mistakes.  I rate
it a high 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     I have heard some critics praising this film as finally being an
accurate representation of Wyatt Earp.  I suppose that they mean that
because this sees to be a warts-and-all representation of Wyatt.
Actually this film just shows more of his life than most previous films,
but it also is full of inaccuracy.  As I say above, it is almost as if
the writers started with an accurate outline of Wyatt's life, then
invented the details they needed to flesh it out without checking on the
truth of the details.  Not that accurate details are easy to come by.
Wyatt is one of the most fabled characters of the West and there seemto
be all sorts of stories about him.  But many of the details that were
thrown into this version, while lending a believable historic texture,
only distort the facts.
     I don't know how emotionally scarred Wyatt was after the death of
his first wife, but he and some of his brothers were supposedly involved
in a twenty-minute street fight with two of his wife's brothers not long
after the death.  This torching of the house in grief was made up of the
whole cloth.
     Ed Masterson tells Wyatt that Bat picked the name Bat because he
couldn't stand his real name, Bartholomew.  And Bat is unhappy about
divulging this secret.  Actually, he was born William Barclay Masterson,
not a particularly stigmatizing name.  The story certainly added a
realistic texture to the script, but it didn't come out of anybody's
research.
     The film shows Earp as being a crack shot and an honest lawman.
None of this is true.  In fact he took bribes, pocketed fines, and at
least on one occasion nearly shot himself with his own gun.  Most of his
legend was little more than legend.
     Big Nose Katie Elder (Isabella Rossellini, who strongly resembles
her mother, Ingrid Bergman), explaining her unexpected good looks, says
people get nicknames for all sorts of reasons.  She points out her nose
is not actually big.  That is a nice piece of texture.  And it is good
script writing.  But the real Big Nose Katie Elder, based on her
portrait, was an ugly woman with a large nose.  In fact, most of the
Earp/Holliday women are portrayed far more attractively than their real
counterparts.  That is standard in the syntax of cinema.  Probably only
Josie Marcus would still be attractive by today's standards.  Of course
standards of beauty change, but it would be nice to see a film in which
the people and not just the scenery and buildings look right.
     There is a problem with Wyatt's distaste for prostitution and his
reforming Mattie and getting her out of the profession.  Again, it is
invented.  Some sources think that he actually was half-owner of brother
James Earp's whorehouse.  In any case, Mattie was apparently not in that
profession before Wyatt Earp knew her, as this film would have it, but
did become a prostitute after Wyatt abandoned her.
     Hype has been around throughout all of history, and perhaps the
emotional need for hype has been with us even longer.  Wyatt was a
convenient person to make a hero in his own time and in ours.  And in
truth he was one of the most colorful figures of the old West.  But even
the most admiring of his serious biographers conclude that Wyatt Earp
was a long way from being a real hero or even an admirable character.
If he fits any of the classic molds, it would be "scoundrel."  And in
showing more than usual of his negative side, though less than the
truth, perhaps this film has its greatest virtue.

Title
Review for Boys on the Side (1995)
     In SLEEPLESS IN SEATTLE, the characters talk about "chicks'
films."  There they mean romance, but there is something else that is
much more a chick's film.  There is a whole sub-genre of films like
RICH AND FAMOUS, BEACHES, STEEL MAGNOLIAS, and TERMS OF ENDEARMENT.
They are bittersweet explorations of women bonding with each other
through good times and bad, often to the beautiful and lush strains of
a score by Georges Delerue.  [His title theme for RICH AND FAMOUS is
one of the most beautiful film themes I know.]  Delerue died in 1992,
sadly, but the kind of films he scored go on with the latest entry
being BOYS ON THE SIDE.
     Actually BOYS ON THE SIDE begins atypically for a women's picture
with two very different women sharing a cross-country ride.  Jane
(Whoopi Goldberg) is a crude club singer who makes racist comments and
tells cab drivers to go back to Pakistan.  Robin (Mary-Louise Parker)
appears to be a slightly ditzy real estate broker with a penchant for
banal Carpenters songs.  Along the way they pick up Holly (Drew
Barrymore), the girlfriend-victim of an extremely obnoxious drug-dealer
and junkie.  While there is an initial tension between Jane and Robin,
of course women of goodwill always learn to respect each other
eventually.
     Curiously, near the middle  the film seems to run out of steam and
its apparent whole reason to be.  Suddenly it is no longer a road film
and the plot, after a short section of aimlessness, goes off in another
direction.  In an almost artificial manner the major women, and even
some of the minor, get to show both positive and negative traits.  It
is better than painting them as saints, but it appears to be just a bit
too deliberate.  Overall, however, the film plays it safe, pushing the
right buttons and espousing the right causes.  Director Herbert Ross
knows his audience a little too well.
     Whoopi Goldberg is obviously winning as an actress, but her acting
range has always seemed to me to be very limited.  She has a more
restrained performance in "Star Trek: The Next Generation," and Steven
Spielberg definitely got her to act in THE COLOR PURPLE, but she and
most of her directors are content to let her play the same character
time after time.  In BOYS ON THE SIDE she is playing a woman with a
personality almost identical to the one in JUMPING JACK FLASH or SISTER
ACT.  This is a film in which she could have shown some real dramatic
range, if nothing else as an investment in her own career.  The
meatiest part in the film actually is Mary-Louise Parker's and while
her role is not as flamboyant as is Goldberg's--in fact it appears very
unpromising at the beginning of the film--she makes much better use of
opportunities the story affords her.  We see more different facets of
her personality and even of Barrymores's than of Goldberg's.
     After a promising start this film gives us little besides a few
nuances in Parker's character that we have not seen better elsewhere.
Rating: low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Family Thing, A (1996)
     Earl Pilcher, Jr. (played by Robert Duvall), is an Arkansas good
ol' boy, complete with a pick-up truck that works a lot better than his
family does.  When his mother dies she leaves him a letter explaining
that she really is not his biological mother.  His real mother was a
black servant whom his father had raped and who died giving birth to
him.  The final wish of the only mother Earl has known is that he find
and get to know his black half-brother, Ray, in the Chicago police
department.  Earl takes his blue pick-up truck to navigate the
Interstate and find his brother.  What he finds is that Ray (James Earl
Jones) has buried just beneath the surface the hate he still feels for
Earl Sr. and Earl Jr.  Having discharged an unpleasant responsibility,
Earl starts for home only to be mugged and have his precious pick-up
stolen.  Ray finds he must care for Earl while Earl recovers and tries
to get back his pick-up.  Earl stays with Ray and gets to know Aunt T,
their mother's sister (played by Irma P. Hall).
     Earl describes his football days by saying he was small but made
up for it by being slow.  Much the same could be said of the plot of A
FAMILY THING, but the texture of life in the black neighborhood of
Chicago is more the point of the film than the pacing.  The plot is
just a bit contrived to give Earl a grand tour of the black experience
in America.  It does more than just show it to him; he also experiences
the feel of being an outcast and a minority.  All this happens while he
is thinking over the implications of his being black, all the while
still looking and thinking white.  Charles Gross's jazz score matches
in style the low- energy story-telling.  It pushes the right buttons,
but is not very creative.  Special credit should be given to Fred
Murphy's photography which is constantly engaging in both the Arkansas
town and especially in the Chicago black neighborhood with its El track
supports.
     If I were to choose whom I thought was the best American actor,
there is no doubt in my mind that Robert Duvall would be my first
choice.  Here he gives a quiet but rich performance.  The scene in
which he reads his white mother's letter to his father is a beautiful
piece of acting.  Reportedly his approach is to get someone with the
same background as his character and record him reading the lines, then
to mimic it.  Whatever he does, he is clearly sweating the details and
turning in a totally authentic performance.  James Earl Jones has a
much narrower acting range, but within that range he is a joy to watch.
However, Duvall's and Jones's acting styles do not quite mesh since
while Duvall slightly understates his acting, Jones overstates.  And
both are often upstaged by Irma P. Hall whose Aunt T seems to have more
personality than the two main characters combined.

Title
Review for Dirty Dancing (1987)
     At least one film critic and one three-dimensional person have told me
that DIRTY DANCING is the SATURDAY NIGHT FEVER of the 1980s.  I can see what
they mean.  The dancing hooks the kids and then they see a good story of
human values anyway.  It's a good way to solve the problem of "I don't want
to see a film with character development.  hey, let's get Mikey to watch
it."  The problem is that while the story is good, it is a little pat.
Things work out a little too well.  Life is not really like that.  SATURDAY
NIGHT FEVER is a genuine slice-of-life film.  Things do not all work out
right, but they do work out like they do in life.  It is not true at the end
of SATURDAY NIGHT FEVER that "all's right with the world," but some progress
has been made and that is a victory.  DIRTY DANCING is a good film too.  It
is good like ON GOLDEN POND.  But it lacks the grit of SATURDAY NIGHT FEVER.
     DIRTY DANCING is the story, set in 1963, of how Baby Houseman (played
by Jennifer Grey) comes of age during a two-week stay at a resort in the
Catskill Mountains.  (Actually the resort film is becoming its own sub-
genre.  The best of the lot is probably THE GIG.)  She gets involved with
the resort dance instructor (played by Patrick Swayze), and Penny, a
pregnant but unwed dancer (played by Cynthia Rhodes).  Baby has a natural
desire to get involved with people in trouble and try to set things right,
but in doing so she risks hurting her own relationship with her father
(played by Jerry Orbach).
     The title refers to two or three steamy scenes of dancing, but really
erotic "dirty" dancing is sort of a paste-on to the plot.  Professional
mambo dancing is much more important, but let's face it, who under 60 years
of age would go to see a film called PROFESSIONAL MAMBO DANCING?  When it
got to video, it would end up with the instruction tapes.
     Acting honors for the piece go to Grey, who really does seem to
transform, but they also go to Jerry Orbach, who presents a real aura of
integrity.  He is sort of the father that everyone wishes they had.  For
being a little too neat and pat, this film gets a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Perfect World, A (1993)
          Capsule review:  This is something of a departure for
     Eastwood, a gritty and realistic crime drama that slowly
     fades into a story with warm relationships.  Costner has
     center stage as an escaped convict who forms a father-son
     relationship with his young hostage.  Rating: +1 (-4 to +4).
     Clint Eastwood has built a career on playing violent characters,
particularly his "Man with No Name" and Dirty Harry.  Two films back he made
UNFORGIVEN, an anti-violence Western that was nonetheless violent.  There
was speculation that his films would be less violent from that point on and
that UNFORGIVEN was a sort of penance.  The next film he starred in, IN THE
LINE OF FIRE, was another film in the "Dirty Harry" mold, but Eastwood
claimed that he had no artistic control and was just an actor playing a
part.  Eastwood has now directed his first film since UNFORGIVEN.  Like
UNFORGIVEN it is a film with some violence, but at the same time does not
glorify that violence.
     Kevin Costner plays Butch Haynes, who breaks out of a Texas prison on
Halloween night of 1963 together with Terry Pugh, a brutal hood.  Along the
way they pick up an eight-year-old hostage, Philip, played by T. J. Lowther.
On their trail is Texas Ranger Red Garnett (Eastwood) who has been assigned
a state criminologist Sally Gerber (Laura Dern).  This is a Clint Eastwood
film, so of course Dern is along to play the required female lead to be
subjected to the Eastwood character's insensitive male chauvinism in the
early parts of the film but to be won over by Eastwood in the later parts of
the film.  In this outing, however, Eastwood and Dern take a backseat to
Costner and Lowther, who play the real main characters of the film, Haynes
and Philip.  Eventually it is just Haynes and Philip on the run and learning
to get along with each other.  Lowther is attracted to the father figure he
was missing at home, Costner is torn between his anti-social urges and his
desire to be a better father figure to Philip than Haynes's father had been
to Haynes.  Costner make a very believable Texas con.
     Much of the story is told with very little mood music as Eastwood
adopts the realistic style of IN COLD BLOOD and BADLANDS.  Unfortunately
that is only the part of the story about the fugitives.  The witty in-
fighting of the police on the case and comic bits involving an aluminum
trailer serving as police headquarters for the Texas backroad chase tend to
sabotage the almost documentary style of the fugitives' story.  Eventually
this part of the plot gives in to more humanistic values and we get some
more background music to tell us how to feel about what we are experiencing.
     Costner's character is one of the more complex ones we have seen on the
screen in a while, particularly in an Eastwood film.  His unfinished
business with his own father has led him to idolize children and his
violence is usually triggered by his seeing a child not being treated well.
He is infuriated to discover that Philip's religion, Jehovah's Witness, does
not allow the boy to trick or treat or to go to carnivals and does not
distinguish between religious restrictions and parental brutality.  It is
the combination of his own unintended cruelty to his young companion and his
desire to protect the boy that lead the story to its denouement.
     Eastwood makes a few beginner's mistakes not expected of an experienced
director.  There are serious continuity flaws, particularly with arm
positions in a key scene at both the beginning and end of the film.  This
combined with the uneven style do not sink the film, but certainly count
against it.  My rating for A PERFECT WORLD would be a less than perfect +1
on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Shine (1996)
     SHINE is a true story, a biography of a sort of local celebrity in
Australia.  The man is eccentric to the point of being nearly autistic
but is also a brilliant pianist.  David Helfgott is a man with many
personal demons, some real and some imagined, who was a musical prodigy
but could not face the pressures that a musical career placed on him.
The greatest of all the pressures came from his father, a man of huge
rages who wanted to control David like he would control a puppet.
     As SHINE opens, we see David as just another schizoid wandering a
city street like you might see in any big city.  He is seen staring in
at a small wine bar after closing time.  The staff at first sees him as
trouble, but find his quick staccato conversation endearing.  They
decide to give him a ride home.  From there film flashes back to
David's youth to show us the forces that created this apparent human
wreckage.  David is the son of Peter Helfgott, a Polish Jew whose
entire family was murdered in the Holocaust.  Peter survived, but
hardly intact.  Emotionally blasted by his loses he irrationally holds
his new family in an iron grip.  Out of an irrational fear of losing
these new loved ones he refuses them the freedom of making any
decisions for themselves, least of all decisions that may take them
away from him.  Peter Helfgott treats the members of his family as
something between objects and pets.  Criticism and even blows are
administered on a daily basis while praise is reserved only for the
most special of occasions.  David, who has never known any other
treatment accepts it and considers it natural.  And through this
treatment he is able to become an exceptional talent as a pianist,
perhaps even brilliant.  In spite of his family's low income and the
crude facilities available locally, David is able to prove his talent
in competition and even comes to the attention of the great Isaac
Stern.  But any attempt that David makes to go someplace to develop his
talent is vetoed by his father.  The film follows David as eventually
he does get away and makes an effort to develop his great talent, but
the struggle to escape his father has already too far weakened him and
taken too much of a toll.
     What is interesting in the film is the affect that music has on
David.  As a boy music is a negative influence on him, dragging him
down into the strange psychological state he eventually reaches.  He is
eventually even forbidden to play the piano for fear of the effect it
will have on him.  Yet the same music is also what pulls him out of
that slump, returning some semblance of a life and even a career to
him.  Also remarkable is how people seem to keep finding David
endearing.  In spite of his many problems and the infinite patience
that is required for dealing with him, the adult David seems to have
the charm somehow to attract admirers and people who are willing to
care for him.  The adult David strikes one as having an intelligent,
but uncontrolled mind.  He talks as fast as his fingers move playing
the Rachmaninoff Third Piano Concerto, but he jumps from idea to idea
and drops each for the next.
     Top billing ironically goes to Armin Mueller-Stahl who plays Peter
Helfgott.  Mueller-Stahl is a good actor with a single
characterization, but he rarely varies from that characterization and
shows any breadth in his acting ability.  The reason that the actor
playing David does not get top billing is because it is shared among
three actors: Alex Rafalowicz playing David as a boy, Noah Taylor plays
him as a teenager, and Geoffrey Rush plays the adult version.  Rush
seems to be getting the most attention for the role, but all three are
interesting actors.  Other recognizable actors include John Gielgud,
Lynn Redgrave, and Googie Withers.  (Gielgud this year alone has been
in GULLIVER'S TRAVELS, LOOKING FOR RICHARD, SHINE, THE PORTRAIT OF A
LADY, and HAMLET, in addition to doing voices in DRAGONHEART and THE
LEOPARD SON.  It is nice to see that he can find work!)
     While it is possible to see this as a story of triumph over great
odds, it seems like a weak triumph.  It will be hard for most viewers
to see much to admire in the adult David who must seems so incredibly
hard to control.  It seems like a small victory, and may leave the
viewer a little dissatisfied with this as a story of redemption.  I
rate SHINE a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     Just an afterthought: In part where SHINE falls down is in its
allusion to what much of its audience will see as a mystery about great
musical performances.  It does not make clear to the audience just what
makes one musical performance great.  Any good record store will have
two or three recordings of the "Rach 3."  Presumably each of these will
have every note that Rachmaninoff wrote, played exactly as the composer
specified.  And presumably the same is true of Helfgott's performance.
The filmmaker knows that there is great variation in these performances
but besides showing some (silent) sweat on David's brow and showing his
emotional agony as he plays, the film leaves as a total mystery why
David's is a performance more to be prized than any one of the many
others.  I am not sure I know the answer to this question and it
certainly is something very germane to the film.  The script dangles
this very central issue in front of the viewer but makes little attempt
to answer it.

Title
Review for Frankenstein (1910)
     Back in 1894 Thomas Edison was a pioneer of the American film
industry and was claiming (not entirely truthfully) to have invented
the motion picture.  He did however sell a Kinetoscope and the he
had to make films to show on his Kinetoscope, much the same a Vu-
Master has to make slides for their viewer.  His was not big scale
film production, today it looks amateurish.  But he built a small
studio barely the size of a truck, and started grinding out one-
minute films.  The Black Maria was the world's first film studio and
built at Edison's West Orange laboratories where it still stands.
It was called the Black Maria because of its resemblance to a police
wagon.
     In 1910 (eight years after Georges Melies made his famous A
TRIP TO THE MOON in France) Edison made the first movie adaptation
of Mary Shelley's FRANKENSTEIN.  The film was just fourteen minutes
long and starred Charles Ogle as the monster.  When I first heard
about the film it was considered a lost film.  There were stills of
Ogle's make-up and some descriptions left--that was all.  So many
old films were lost forever, it was not surprising that this one was
also.  In the mid-1990s the claim was made that a copy had been
found.  Soon there were also stories that the man who had found it
owned the print and wanted one million dollars for the cinema relic.
And that was how things stood.  Yesterday I heard that a poor
reproduction of the film was available on the web in Realplayer
format.  It is a terrible reproduction, but it was a film that many
people had wanted to see for years and any means seemed good.
     Most Frankenstein films assume the title character built a
monster of dead bodies and animated them with electricity.  But the
films have been made in an age of science.  Mary Shelley is very
vague about how the monster is created, but the approach seems to be
more alchemy and mysticism than the rationalistic approach taken in
the films.  Shelley had the monster be more a mystical creature,
created like the medieval mystics created homunculi.  That is the
approach of the 1910 film.
     The story is told very briefly in ten or twelve sentences with
action filmed to illustrate the story.  Frankenstein goes to
college.  There within two years he discovers how to create life.
He decides he will prove himself by making a perfect man, then to
return home to claim his bride.  Mixing some volatile chemical
together, he puts them in something that looks like a cross between
a gas chamber and a kiln.  As he watches through a little porthole
the chemicals form a skeleton and meat forms on the skeleton.
     When the monster is being created it just moves its arms up and
down mechanically.  Surely a marionette artist at the time could
have given it more realistic movements.  But for that the creation
sequence is fairly effective with burning pieces of body just sort
of assembling themselves magically.  When a bony arm sticks out of
the creation chamber the film comes closest to having a genuine
scary moment.  Certainly Frankenstein is horrified by what he has
created.  He faints and the monster disappears. Frankenstein had
wanted to create a perfect man, but not all recipes work out.  What
he got was a ragged and shambling monstrosity, its features and its
very expression are horribly distorted.  It has long stringy hair
and a nondescript torso.
     Frankenstein returns home to the arms of his fiancee.  But the
monster finds him.   Frankenstein has the monster hide in a closet
so as not to frighten his bride.  The monster cooperates but then
comes out and in a fit of anger attacks Frankenstein.  Frankenstein
lives only because the monster sees his reflection in a mirror and
is frightened off.
     Frankenstein is married, but in the night the monster returns.
The bride sees the monster and faints.  But before the monster can
do anything terrible he sees himself in the mirror and apparently
realizing he is too ugly to ever win such a bride, he just
disappears.  The presence of love does to him what sunlight and
thwarted love does to Count Orlock in NOSFERATU.  It simply
dissolves him.  This seems to imply that like Dracula, the monster
is an incorporeal being and is more magical than scientific.
     The film appears to be on different film stocks to get a slight
feel of color, brown-tone for daytime and black for night.  Being
made a full eight years after the Melies A TRIP TO THE MOON yet
being so much more crude and primitive in style one has the feeling
that film would not have advanced much if Edison had controlled the
American film industry had he tried to do.
     I am not rating this film since there is no objective criteria
to rate it with modern films.  It is really just a very short
telling of the story and filmed illustrations, filmed with a
stationary camera looking at a stage.  One reason that this film
disappeared may have been the poor quality of the production.
Still, it is an amazing circumstance that the film is visible at all
and it was a great pleasure to see it after so many years.

Title
Review for Once Around (1991)
          Capsule review:  Boston Italian family has its problems
     when their daughter brings home as a lover a flashy, boorish
     salesman.  Salesman overpowers the family and tests the
     strength of relationships.  Comedy-drama has more to it than
     it may at first seem.  Rating: +2 (-4 to +4).
     The Bellas are a closely-knit Italian family living near Boston.  They
have little oddities but they accept each other and as a family they work.
Then Renata (played by Holly Hunter) breaks up with her boyfriend and
decides she wants to sell condos for a living.  She goes to a sales class in
St. Martin and brings back a lover.  Sam (played by Richard Dreyfus) is an
over-ripe salesman with a phenomenal sales record and some odd Lithuanian
ways.  Sam is welcomed into the family with a big smile that wilts when he
is not looking.  He simply does not fit it.  He upstages family members with
extravangances and he overpowers family events with the subtlety of sales
pep rallies.  As time passes the pressures increase until the family is
seriously in danger of splitting up.  Is Sam a genuinely destructive force
or is the real problem in the family's unwillingness to accept a newcomer
who is do different from themselves?
     ONCE AROUND is directed by Lasse Hallstrom, the Swede who directed MY
LIFE AS A DOG.  Like Louis Malle, Hallstrom has insights into American life
that an American director might miss.  By the same token, however, he misses
details such as the inappropriateness of Hunter's accent.  She is the main
character and she could have really used an accent coach.  Dreyfus is,
however, well-cast, if not too much differently from his role in TIN MEN and
even THE APPRENTICESHIP OF DUDDY KRAVITZ.  The casting of  Laura San Giacomo
and Gena Rowlands as Renata's sister and mother are both fine.  Especially
good is Danny Aiello as Renata's father Joe.  Much of the friction that
makes the story is between the Dreyfus character and the Aiello character.
Joe Bella goes through a lot of changes in the course of the film and Aiello
is a joy to watch.  Also notable is co-producer Griffin Dunne as Renata's
boyfriend.
     Hallstrom has a good eye for the small dramatic incidents of life and
also the daily ironies.  While the film is largely about Sam's
idiosyncrasies, it takes at least one meaning of its title, ONCE AROUND,
from a strange custom of Joe Bella: on important family occasions he
traditionally drives around a traffic rotary.  But for a little heavy-handed
melodrama toward the end, this is a nice comedy-drama worth seeing.  I give
it a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Toto le héros (1991)
          Capsule review:  The reminiscences of a man who blames
     all the pain of his life on a friend with whom he believes he
     was switched at birth.  Childhood and adult fantasy
     intertwine with reality as Thomas (nicknamed Toto) plots his
     revenge on Alfred.  Strange but likable film.  Rating: low +2
     (-4 to +4).  (Warning: there are spoilers in this review.)
     Thomas van Hasbroeck is unstuck in time.  Well, in fact his whole
family was a little unstrung in various ways.  Thomas grew up with the
childish fantasy that he had been switched with another baby, Alfred, in the
nursery and the rich kid across the street really belonged to Thomas's
family and Thomas belonged to the rich family.  Through life, every
misfortune Thomas suffered he blamed on Alfred.  Every piece of good fortune
Alfred enjoyed should have gone to Thomas.  Thomas blamed Alfred for the
loss of the two women he loved.  One was his sister Alice, who was
attractive and had a natural flair for arson and incest.  Later it was
Evelyne, who loved Thomas but married Alfred.  All this is a set of
disjointed reminiscences of the old Thomas as he plans his revenge on
Alfred.  At each age, we see Thomas's fantasies of revenge against the
dastardly usurper Alfred.  Usually they are framed as scenes from a spy film
about the great Toto--Toto is Thomas's nickname.  And part of what the film
is about is the function of fantasy as an important part of how we see
reality.  Thomas must know that he is making most of his fantasies up, but
they impact strongly on his world view.
     Flashing forward and backward in time, we see little enigmatic memories
as flashes that will later be fleshed out.  Eventually we discover that the
film has played a nifty little sleight-of-hand on us--a double sleight-of-
hand, in fact.
     The director and screenwriter of this Belgian-French-German production
is Jaco van Dormael, who went from being a clown to being a children's
theater director to being a film director.  He has fun with children and the
way they look at the world.
     This film has been getting a lot of positive comment after appearing at
several film festivals.  It is a little slight for the comment it is
getting, but it is worth seeing.  I give TOTO THE HERO a low +2 on the -4 to
+4 scale.

Title
Review for Heat (1995)
     Robert De Niro has been in two crime films released in relatively
short order, each just a bit short of three hours long.  Of the two,
Martin Scorsese's CASINO tells what was for me the more interesting
story of how organized crime lost Las Vegas.  The same critics who
claimed that they had seen before most of what was in that film are
praising the originality of Michael Mann's HEAT.  But HEAT really is a
tale that has been done multiple times before.  It is the story of the
really good cop and the really good (well, proficient) crook and their
long battle of wits and weapons.  Director and screenwriter Michael
Mann draws that story out to 172 minutes by showing with one good cop
and two criminals what being part of that game does to their emotions
and their personal life.  The film begins by showing us several strands
of plot with different characters.  In the first part of the film the
question is what do these people have to do with each other and what is
happening.  It turns out that one of the people we see is a police
detective and the rest are criminals preparing a heist.  Mann
intentionally disorients the audience by showing scenes that the viewer
cannot be expected to understand yet.  They are all part of the story,
of course, but they may not become important or even understood until
much later.  The gang pulls off its heist in spectacular fashion under
the supervision of super-criminal Neil McCauley (Robert De Niro).  It
works nearly like clockwork until loose cannon Waingro (Kevin Gage)
kills a man.  That changes the nature of the crime.  The unflappable
McCauley still knows exactly what are the right things to do, but it is
the beginning of McCauley's problems.  Later when police detective
Vincent Hanna investigates the crime he finds very few clues and the
biggest one is just that whoever did the crime was very, very good.
But Hanna is also good.
     Thus begins the long game of the cat and the mouse as Hanna tracks
down McCauley.  What sets this film somewhat apart from numerous other
films with similar plots is Mann's deliberate pacing.  We get to see
what being a police detective does to Hanna.  His inability to turn off
his work on those rare occasions that he can spend time with his wife
and step-daughter has ripped apart his home life.  McCauley, on the
other hand, claims to allow no relationships in his life that he cannot
break on half a minute's notice.  Mann show us what these tendencies do
to each man as well as to Chris Shiherlis (Val Kilmer), a member of
McCauley's gang.  On a small scale McCauley and Hanna have a private
war complete with impressive arsenals of weapons and clever ways of
tracking down intelligence about the other.
     The script has some serious problems.  We see Pacino called in to
investigate multiple homicides that will *eventually* be tied together.
But it is always the same homicide investigator, Hanna, who is called
to the scene.  Is he supposed to be the only homicide detective in Los
Angeles?  Often the script has the police just seem to be
supernaturally good at their jobs.  And Pacino overdoes the caring
policeman bit just a bit too much.  In one scene that seems to go
over-the-top he grabs and hugs the mother of a murder victim to console
her and prevent her from seeing the victim's body.  It is an emotional
scene but just does not ring true.
     Robert De Niro plays McCauley as smooth and self-assured but given
to explosive violence.  Pacino plays Hanna as edgy and quick-witted and
given to explosive violence.  Michael Mann's direction is stylized with
his usual exaggerated camera angles and his unusual use of color.  And
it too is given to explosive violence.  Probably the best thing about
Mann's previous film, THE LAST OF THE MOHICANS was Wes Studi's
performance as Magua.  Wes Studi, with a face like a corn-grinding
stone, is capable of extremely intense acting.  Here, however, his role
seemed gratuitous and is only of interest in that it was an American
Indian in a role that did not need to be played by an Indian.  It is
nice to see him working and in a non-ethnic role; it is just a pity he
was under-used.
     The set design is of particular interest here.  Hanna's house
seems almost totally drained of color, perhaps to make some point about
the turning off of emotions.  One bad piece of set design has a
character who is basically a book clerk living in an apartment with a
breathtaking view overlooking the city.  A line in the script explains
that the building is run-down but has a nice view.  But I suspect there
are darn few book clerks in Los Angeles with apartments that have views
like that.
     HEAT is a well-told crime story but tells us little new or really
interesting about the lives of anyone one on either side of the law.I
rate it a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Boogie Nights (1997)
     There certainly is nothing unusual in a film about a rise to fame
and a fall of some entertainment sensation. In the field of popular
music there is THE ROSE, IDOLMAKER, THE COMMITMENTS and THAT THING YOU
DO.  Another rise and fall film might be KNIGHTRIDERS, a personal
favorite.  If you want to stretch a point CITIZEN KANE is about the
same theme.  What is unusual is to see a good film set in the world of
pornographic films.
     Jack Horner (played by Burt Reynolds) is a super-mellow director
of pornographic films, but he has a dream.  He no longer wants to make
just good pornographic films, he wants to make good films that also
happen to be pornographic.  His dream is a continuing series with James
Bond-like plots framing his usual show-everything explicit sex scenes.
He wants his audiences to want to know how things come out, not just to
see what things come out.  But it is tough to be experimental in a
medium with such a high budget.  As Horner puts it, "Before you turn
around, you've spent maybe twenty, twenty-five, thirty thousand dollars
on a movie."  And Horner has a new star for his series.  Eddie Adams
(Mark Wahlberg) is a bus boy at a San Fernando Valley night club.
Eddie's home life is a mess and he is looking for an excuse to leave.
Horner sees something in Eddie that could make him a sex-film star.
When things get bad enough at home Eddie agrees to make one film for
Jack.
     At Jack's insistence he chooses a new name for himself and Dirk
Diggler sounds "sharp" to him.  But this is not just an invitation to a
one-time job.  It is an adoption into something between a repertory
company and a family, a tightly knit group who make Horner's low budget
films.  In fact, one of several running gags in the film is that it is
always the same faces showing up in the films, only in different parts.
Among the regulars are Rollergirl (Heather Graham) who never removes
her roller-skates, even when making love.  In spite of her silly-
looking persona she demands to be taken on her own terms, especially by
her lovers.  William Macy plays Little Bill whose wife's cheating on
him is about as subtle as a billboard on Broadway.  Perhaps the most
normal of the crew is Buck Swope (Don Cheadle) who is acting in
pornography only long enough to earn enough to open a hi-fi store and
whose country-western persona seems out of place for an Afro- American.
If the company is a family, the father is Horner and it has porno star
Amber Waves (Julianne Moore) as the nurturing mother.  Then funding the
who operation is The Colonel (Robert Ridgely) who produces and likes
what he produces.  The general format of the film is sort of a rise and
fall as Horner pulls his dream all together, but has problems keeping
it all together in the face of monstrous egos, the changing market, and
the easy availability of cocaine.  The film's longest segment takes
place in 1977, then has shorter and shorter pieces showing how the
group fares as the years go by.
     The best performance is certainly the super-mellow Burt Reynolds
who is trying hard to hold on to what pretensions his group has.
Julianne Moore is certainly a scene stealer, sustaining the group in a
motherly way, but unable to get custody of her own child because of her
business.  Bill Macy, who has become familiar in mostly unsavory roles
manages to generate real pathos in what is basically a comic
situation-a wife who cares so little for her husband that she is
willing to have sex on a driveway with a crowd standing around and
watching.
     BOOGIE NIGHTS creates a very plausible look at a moment in the
history of the pornographic film when it looked like it might get some
respectability from the mainstream.  I give it an 8 on the 0 to 10
scale and a high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Lost in Yonkers (1993)
     Neil Simon built his reputation on warm, whimsical comedies with
occasional pieces of real drama mixed in, as long as they do not threaten
too much to spoil the play or movie-goer's day.  LOST IN YONKERS is not
typical Simon.  There is some whimsey here, certainly, but there is also
some tragedy and some authentic human pain.  A lot of people may be
disappointed by LOST IN YONKERS; I certainly was not.
     It is the summer of 1942 and Eddie Kurnitz, a widower, needs to have
someplace to leave his two sons Jay and Arty (played by Brad Stoll and Mike
Damus) so that he can make some money to pay his debts.  Reluctantly he's
decided to leave them with his mother, the family matriarch.  Grandma
Kurnitz (played by Irene Worth) loves nobody and is herself unloved.  Her
family has always lived in fear of her and it has never really functioned as
a family.  This is the story of the boys and that summer, but even more,
this is the story of the boy's Aunt Bella, who lives with her mother.  Aunt
Bella has always seemed a little out-to-lunch to the boys (and everybody
else), and the idea of spending a summer with both the aunt and the
grandmother is less than promising for Arty and Jay.  This is the story of
how the boys come to love their aunt and understand their grandmother, but
the telling is not pat.  Understanding does not always bring forgiveness.
While there is hope by the end of this story, there is also some
disappointment.
     Receiving top billing is Richard Dreyfus as the boys' uncle who is
fooling around on the shady side of the law.  He has double-crossed a flashy
hood and is using his mother's house to hide out in temporarily.  While he
gives a little panache to his role and some action to the film, his part is
really mostly distraction from the main plotline.  In the end he is just
there to show one more way Grandma Kurnitz's personality has damaged the
lives of his children.  I may be one of the few people in the world who was
not bowled over by Mercedes Ruehl in THE FISHER KING, but LOST IN YONKERS is
a good film and it is mostly due to her.  She has already won a Tony Award
for her role as Aunt Bella on Broadway and she may get an Oscar nomination.
     Martha Coolidge's direction is engaging and the feel of 1942 is well
conveyed, considering that it depends mostly on one house, a street, and a
candy shop.  Critical comment seems very mixed on LOST IN YONKERS, but I am
inclined to think it is because it has been so long since we have seen real
human drama on the screen that we may have forgotten how to react to it.  I
give LOST IN YONKERS a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Mighty Quinn, The (1989)
     As they say in the song, "You've not seen nothing like THE MIGHTY
QUINN.  Resolving the double negative, it means you have seen something like
THE MIGHTY QUINN and indeed you have.  Ever since HAWAII FIVE-O, it has been
common knowledge that television producers have wanted to set police films
in pleasant climates.  We've had CARIBE and MIAMI VICE actually make it to
production.  Though nobody has said it anywhere, my natural cynical
suspicion is to believe that Jamaica is some producer's dream and THE MIGHTY
QUINN is the pilot for a television series.  The film has the unmistakable
(or maybe only semi-mistakable) feel of a television pilot.
     Our hero is a young, idealistic Chief of Police, Xavier Quinn (played
by Denzel Washington).  Born on a large Caribbean island, Quinn went to the
United States to get his training from the FBI.  He returned to the island
to keep the peace driving an open jeep and wearing a conveniently photogenic
uniform with short pants and short sleeves.  His boyish charms are
irresistible to women regardless of social status.  Quinn has his problems
dealing with the island governor, an ex-chicken inspector, whose chief
concern is to keep a lid on things for the resort business.  The governor is
played by Norman Beaton, who looks a bit like the late Adolph Caesar but,
without insulting Beaton, lacks Caesar's magnetic screen presence.
     In this case Maubee, Quinn's boyhood friend, is suspected of being
involved in the murder of a resort owner who has been found with his head
cut off.  Maubee is even more boyish and winning than is Quinn and he seems
to be magical to boot.  Maubee is very disappointingly played by Robert
Townsend (of HOLLYWOOD SHUFFLE).  Townsend has a bad habit of grinning at
the camera that director Carl Schenkel should have curbed but did not.  This
is one of those films when you are never more than ten minutes from a break
in the action for the next song (in this case, reggae).
     Lest you think that this is an actively bad film, the basic story is
okay as a mystery--not great, but not all that bad either, though the
villain is perhaps a bit predictable.  M.~Emmet Walsh and Esther Rolle are
present and are always assets.  (Though having just seen Rolle in PBS's
superior production of A RAISIN IN THE SUN, I find her performance here and
this whole film tepid by comparison.  You want a recommendation?  See A
RAISIN IN THE SUN.)  Other assets of THE MIGHTY QUINN include some likable
interaction between Quinn and his young son, and the fact that the movie
does not become a real action film, at least not until the last few minutes
and then only half-heartedly.  There are at least a couple of in-jokes, one
a reference to GUESS WHO'S COMING TO DINNER? and another a visual reference
to DR. NO.  I'd rate THE MIGHTY QUINN an ambivalent low +1 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for People vs. Larry Flynt, The (1996)
     As portrayed in this new film, the first directed by Milos Forman
in seven years, Larry Flynt is a free spirit who spent most of his life
drifting.   He makes the decision to publish a magazine with pictures
of the dancers at his sleazy Cincinnati strip club, just as a publicity
stunt, after that things pretty much just happen to him.  The magazine
become popular; Flynt becomes rich and famous filling the demand; the
local government decides to prosecute him; his cause becomes a major
civil liberties case; he becomes a national figure in the anti-
censorship movement.  In the course of all this he occasionally tries
to make decisions that will change the course of his life and his
magazine, but none of these decisions ever sticks.  He decides to have
his Hustler magazine mix fundamentalist Christianity with pornography,
but somehow the combination just does not sell.  Flynt fires the entire
executive staff of his own magazine only to be ignored. He decides that
he and his wife, Althea, should kick their drug habits and though he
succeeds himself,  he finds he has no control over her.  Flynt seems to
want to scuttle himself when he to be as uncooperative as possible with
his lawyer, but his defense goes on in spite of himself, all the way to
the Supreme Court. During all of this Flynt shows no admirable traits
at all beyond loyalty to Althea.
     The film opens with a prologue set in the early 1950s in Kentucky
where a young Larry Flynt is already giving the public what it wants by
making and selling his own moonshine.  Cut to two decades later and
Flynt is running the Hustler Club in Cincinnati.  He has the idea to
have a magazine to promote his club. Once that is in place he decides
to make his HUSTLER magazine what PLAYBOY is not, a magazine overtly
aimed at the shotguns and pickups types who come to his club.  While at
his club he meets dancer Althea Leasure (Courtney Love) who shows
immediate romantic interest in Flynt.  The publicity says that Flynt is
an unlikely hero for a film and that is a true statement.  But the hero
of the film is Alan Isaacman the civil liberties lawyer who took his
principle of defending the First Amendment to the Supreme Court in
Flynt's name, often frustratingly sabotaged by the childish antics of
Flynt himself.  Had there been some nobility shown in Althea beyond her
initial loyalty to Flynt, she might have made an interesting character.
But eventually she will show herself to be even weaker than her
husband.
     Forman tells the story of Larry Flynt, but never gives us much of
an emotional investment in his character. Flynt is never anything but
selfish in the course of the film.  With other characters his love for
Althea might have been touching, but only occasionally is there any
chemistry between the two of them or any feeling that it is good that
these two people have found each other.  Interestingly Courtney Love
made her film debut in SID AND NANCY, in some ways a very similar film
with very similar problems.  Forman may have seen parallels between
Flynt and McMurphy in his ONE FLEW OVER THE CUCKOO'S NEST, but he was
able to capture an emotional core and a nobility in McMurphy that seems
lacking in Flynt.  Even when his lawyer is winning in court, Flynt
seems determined to play the Bad Boy and to derail the proceedings.
Forman's telling of the story of Flynt moves too quickly with too
little explanation of what is going on.  Flynt will be in jail in one
scene and out the next organizing a free speech rally without
explanation of how he got out of jail.  Other obvious production
details seem to be ignored.  Edward Norton, playing the idealist
lawyer, seems not to age at all over the course of the many years the
film covers (not including the prologue).
     Woody Harrelson will probably never be a great actor.  Here Flynt
is supposed to behave in an eccentric manner, and Harrelson does.
Flynt is supposed to be superficial and have a fly-weight intellect
easily influenced by others, and Harrelson does that sufficiently too.
And he is supposed to be juvenile in unexpected places, and he is.  On
the surface this does not seem like a difficult role to play and
Harrelson is just fine.  Curiously he is out-performed by the much less
experienced Courtney Love as Althea.
     THE PEOPLE VS. LARRY FLYNT has positioned itself to be an engaging
film on the meaning of the First Amendment of the constitution.  It
also is supposed to be a little titillating, though in a style much
more subdued than is Flynt's enthusiastic approach.  Frankly the film
does a better job of the former than the latter.  I rate it a +1 on the
-4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for JFK (1991)

discussion of the conspiracy is being held.  If you are discussing
the *movie*, feel free to change the followup line to
rec.arts.movies. -Moderator]
          Capsule review:  This is Oliver Stone's biography and
     defense of New Orleans D.A. Jim Garrison attempting to
     discredit the official explanation of the Kennedy
     assassination.  While not always convincing in it ambitious
     conclusions, it will cause people to question the Warren
     Report.  Rating: low +2 (-4 to +4)  (Minor spoilers in
     review)
     It is difficult to evaluate a propaganda film--that is, a film intended
to convince the viewer of a particular political point of view.  How
strongly do you weight your agreement with the political message?  How
strongly do you weigh whether the filmmaker played fairly and honestly?  How
strongly do you consider whether the film was convincing or not?  How
important are traditional values such as plot and technique?  Is Leni
Riefenstahl's TRIUMPH OF THE WILL a good film because of the beautiful
filmic technique or a bad film because it deified Adolf Hitler?  How good
were Einsenstein's BATTLESHIP POTEMKIN and ALEXANDER NEVSKY?  How good was Z
or MATEWAN or ROGER AND ME?  What about MR. SMITH GOES TO WASHINGTON or ALL
THE PRESIDENT'S MEN?  I take the amoral--hopefully not immoral--view that
what is important are traditional film values plus whether the film makes a
good argument.  I divorce myself from my own political viewpoint.  Nor will
I strongly consider if the filmmaker is being fair unless it hurts the
argument being made.  I would claim TRIUMPH OF THE WILL is much better
propaganda than television's M.A.S.H. in spite of the fact I agree much more
with M.A.S.H.'s politics.
     That stated, I can now begin to discuss Oliver Stone's JFK.  Is it a
good film from the traditional viewpoint?  It does hold the viewer's
attention and it does have some good performances, and some wooden ones
also.  Overall it is an enjoyable film.  Is it convincing?  That depends on
what you think it is trying to convince you of.  If it is trying to convince
the viewer that the Warren Commission's official explanation of what
happened is wrong, it succeeds beautifully.  It is difficult to believe that
earl Warren himself could see this film and not question his own
commission's findings.  On the other hand, the film darkly implies that this
might have been a huge governmental conspiracy--essentially a coup d'etat--
with the express goal of precipitating a war in Vietnam.  For this
conclusion the evidence is sketchy at best.  Jim Garrison and Oliver Stone
essentially show tens of thousands of people who had a motive to murder
Kennedy and a few people who might have been involved with pulling the
triggers.  There is not much connection in between.  That is where the film
falls down.
     JFK is structured as Kevin Costner, in the role of Jim Garrison,
presenting the Warren Commission's findings and knocking holes in them.
This is followed by a speech on the implications to American democracy of
the government's cover-up and these pieces are preceded by a docudrama
prologue that tells how Garrison got involved and what he discovered in his
investigations.  Of course, we see this prologue first, but the real heart
of the film is the rebuttal.
     The prologue does not really have much of a plot any more than ALL THE
PRESIDENT'S MEN did.  Instead, we just follow step by step the
investigation.  Other than the obvious dramatic impact of the puzzle getting
solved, there is a minor melodramatic sub-plot of Garrison alienating his
family and his staff over his monomaniacal approach.  This sub-plot is
superficially added and resolved just as superficially.  The detail of the
investigation is well told, though its impact depends a great deal on the
viewer's interest in revelations about the assassination.  Stone makes a
safe bet that most of the public, and certainly most who would come to see
the film, have a great deal of interest in the Kennedy assassination.  The
chase after information is at least as interesting as the similar chase in
ALL THE PRESIDENT'S MEN.
     Kevin Costner brings a good deal of his Elliot Ness portrayal to his
Jim Garrison.  Sissy Spacek plays Mrs. Garrison exactly the way she played
the Southern housewife in THE LONG WALK HOME.  Joe Pesci is good playing one
more and different breed of low-life.  Edward Asner is notable as a gruff,
bullet-shaped, bigoted conspirator.  There are quite a few notables in the
cast, perhaps to make a political point.  Jim Garrison himself is along as
Earl Warren.
     As with many docudramas, JFK may not play exactly fair.  It mixes
together newsreel footage, fake newsreel footage, dramatization of events
that happened, dramatization of events that may have happened, dramatization
of events that did not happen but that improve the story, even mental images
and supposed memories.  This is, of course, a questionable strategy, but
with a little thought the viewer knows what is being shown.  It does shed
some question on some of the assertions made.
     This is a film that will change some minds and provoke argument.  73%
of Americans believe there was a conspiracy and that percentage is likely to
go up with this film.  I give it a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for They Live (1988)
     These days you have two kinds of filmmakers.  You have your original
filmmakers who tell new stories and make new films.  Then you have
filmmakers who recombine elements of successful movies.  This kind sprinkles
science fiction ideas into a police action film and gets something like
ALIEN NATION or DEEP SPACE.  One filmmaker you can usually depend on being
mostly original is John Carpenter.  He may add some prefabricated filler but
at least his films are stories you have not seen on film before.  This time
around Carpenter has adapted a comic book version of the popular science
fiction story "Eight O'Clock in the Morning" by Ray Nelson, beefed up its
political message, added a lot of not very imaginative padding, and turned a
fast-paced story into a snail's-paced 93-minute movie.
     The story is that of John Nada (called George Nada in the short story),
who gets a pair of sunglasses that allows him to see what is REALLY going
on.  (In the short story Nada is awakened too far from an hypnotic state.)
And what is going on?  We are all being shepherded by aliens who to most
people pass for human.  All our literature and advertising and television
gives us nothing but subliminal messages like "Buy," "Obey," "Stay asleep,"
"No imagination," "Marry and reproduce," and "No independent thought."  With
the sunglasses the world is black and white but you can see what is really
going on.  (Hmmmm!  Could this be a comment on colorization?)
     The real problem with THEY LIVE is that Carpenter has taken his five-
page story and added little to it but padding.  Most of the padding is
action scenes which undiscerning audiences have come to accept as a
substitute for plot.  If the filmmaker has people shooting each other,
breaking windows, having fist fights, and in general keeping images flicking
on the screen, audiences do not care that the story is stopped stock still
and is not advancing one whit.  This film is packed with very long stretches
of mindless action, including a seemingly endless fist fight.  And
mindlessness in the media is very apropos for the plot of THEY LIVE, though
at one point in the film Carpenter explicitly lists himself and George
Romero as being part of the solution rather than part of the problem.
     In spite of the fact that there was only about thirty minutes worth of
story here, it is a good story and for its sake I would rate this a +2 on
the -4 to +4 scale.
Sources of "Eight O'Clock in the Morning" by Ray Nelson:
MAGAZINE OF FANTASY AND SCIENCE FICTION, November, 1963
BEST OF THE MAGAZINE OF FANTASY AND SCIENCE FICTION #13, ed. by Avram Davidson
THE OTHERS, ed. by Terry Carr
TALES OF TERROR FROM OUTER SPACE, ed. by R. Chetwynd-Hayes
YEAR'S BEST SCIENCE FICTION #9, ed. by Judith Merril

Title
Review for My Life (1993)
          Capsule review:  Bruce Joel Rubin himself directs the
     fourth film in his "Dying and the Death Experience" series.
     Michael Keaton plays a dying public relations executive who
     videotapes life lectures for his yet unborn child and the
     tapes lead him to resolve the unfinished business of his
     youth.  Some good believable human drama here is sabotaged by
     gratuitous mysticism about the nature of death.  Rating low
     +1 (-4 to +4).
     Bruce Joel Rubin has previously written the story of BRAINSTORM and
screenplays of JACOB'S LADDER and GHOST, each exploring its own mystical
view of life after death.  His latest film focuses a little more closely on
the dying experience itself.  Bob Jones (Michael Keaton) had a sad childhood
filled with disappointments and he has tried hard to bury that past.  But
now he is heading for the biggest disappointment of all.  Just when his life
was coming together with his beautiful wife (Gail, played by Nicole Kidman)
pregnant with their first child, Bob was diagnosed as having terminal
cancer.  Now in his days remaining he is taking all of his fatherly advice
and putting it on videotape as a legacy for the child that he may never
know.  Bob wants to be sure his child knows who Bob was.  But Bob himself is
not sure who he is.  He has intentionally buried his unhappy childhood in
the Russian immigrant community of Detroit.  As part of that burial he had
even changed his name to Jones from Ivanovich as part of his escape from the
past.  Now that he is dying he must come to terms with that past in his few
remaining days, or he will never finish that business.
     Rubin's script is often moving, as we would expect.  It would be
difficult to make a film that shows the dying process in such detail without
being moving and at some level manipulative.  But surprisingly here the
experienced Rubin has problems with the very mechanics of script-writing.
There are places where the script just does not convey what is going on.
For example, the first time we are aware that Gail knows about the tapes,
she is watching a tape about herself and she is angry.  Why?  Is she angry
about the project of making the tapes?  Is she angry about the content of
this particular tape?  It is not clear from the script.  And with the writer
being the director, if Rubin thinks the idea is conveyed, nobody can
overrule him.  Gail's mother is an important character in the plot, but for
several scenes it is unclear if she knows about her son-in-law's condition
and the interpretation of those scenes makes knowing important.
     This is a story that might well have been done better in other hands,
in spite of Rubin's fascination with death.  Rubin's previous films assumed
a life after death.  In some senses that was the whole point of GHOST and
JACOB'S LADDER.  MY LIFE did not need any mystical metaphysics to tell its
story and it would have been a more poignant story without the nice
comforting mystical view of life of life after death.  However, Rubin gives
in to the temptation to philosophize about survival of the soul and mystical
healing processes and in doing so he kills much of the credibility the film
had.  This is a film that will get people thinking about the death
experience and it is probably fairly accurate to the famous Elisabeth
Kubler-Ross studies of the psychology of dying, but it also throws in some
metaphysical fantasy without leaving it clear that it is fantasy.
     MY LIFE has many good points, but often Rubin's screenplay betrays them
and compromises.  My rating would be a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Chicken Run (2000)
     Nick Park is now a three time Academy Award winner having won
Oscars for his shorts "Creature Comforts," "The Wrong Trousers," and
"A Close Shave."  The latter two feature his characters Wallace and
Gromit.  He has made his trademark to have his clay animation
characters have teeth that do not quite fill the cheeks from side to
side so there is a gap on each side.  In this country his style may
best be recognized in some commercials he has done, particularly
Chevron ads with talking cars.  It takes a little chutzpah for him
to do a feature length film with chickens satirizing World War II
POW escape films like THE PASSWORD IS COURAGE, STALAG 17, THE
COLDITZ STORY, and especially THE GREAT ESCAPE.  In the first place
it is a little hard for Park and co-director Peter Lord to sustain
one joke for that length of time.  The joke in his popular Wallace
and Gromit stories are that Wallace is such a dull personality.  It
takes considerably more character value to keep an audience
interested for 85 minutes.  In the second place chickens do not have
teeth or wide cheeks so he must give up his trademark or have his
chickens look not very much like chickens.  He does the latter.
Does the Nick Park charm work for a feature film?  In my opinion,
not really.  There were chuckles throughout the film but the story
is cliched and silly.  Apparently that is part of the point and that
can be done in satire if the film just remains entertaining.  It
becomes a little too much of the same good thing.
     Ginger (voiced by Julia Sawalha) is one smart chicken.  She
knows that her days are numbered at the chicken farm where she
lives.  Sooner or later she will stop producing eggs.  And she knows
that when a chicken stops providing breakfast, she provides dinner.
So every night she tries to escape from the barbed wire fences and
every night she is caught and thrown into solitary confinement.
After several attempts and after involving other chickens, she is
about at her chicken-wits' end.
     No escape plan works until an American rooster named Rocky the
Rooster (Mel Gibson) comes flying over the compound one day.  So
chickens can fly!  The news is inspiration to all the hens.  They
convince a reluctant Rocky to teach the group to fly and lead them
all over the fence.  There are a lot of jokes, but most are more
cute than funny.  The few surprises in the plot have a way of
telegraphing themselves.  The plot seems to have been written on
autopilot and, except for the choice of animals, is very familiar.
John Powell and Harry Gregson-Williams provide a nice military score
reminiscent of Elmer Bernstein's score for THE GREAT ESCAPE.
     Park and Lord have chosen a number of major British actresses
to voice the chickens and humans, though their names will be
familiar mostly to art house crowds here.  He has Miranda Richardson
(of THE CRYING GAME and MERLIN), Jane Horrocks (of LITTLE VOICE) and
Imelda Staunton.  The main character is played by Julia Sawalha who
is almost unknown in the US.  To balance this, apparently top
billing unjustifiably goes to Mel Gibson.
     Park's cartoons have always had a dark side and this film has a
few grim scenes involving head chopping that could be disturbing to
younger children, so parents should not be fooled by the G-rating.
In some ways this film is even grimmer than the war films it
imitates.  The prisoners in the war had the Geneva Convention to
give them some protection and they could look forward to being
released at the end of the war.  These chickens could be killed any
time at the farmer's will and their captivity would never end of its
own.  So if you look for it the story is fairly grim.  Still, the
script shies away from looking at the implications of the treatment
of domestic animals unlike some better films like Caroline
Thompson's excellent BLACK BEAUTY (1994).
     This film is a "curate's egg" as the British would say. Some
parts are much better than others.  Overall it does not deliver
quite enough.  I give it a 4 on the 0 to 10 scale and a 0 on the -4
to +4 scale.  Stay through the end of the credits.

Title
Review for Hsing hsing wang (1977)
     CAPSULE: A wild jungle woman and an 11-story gorilla are
discovered in Tibet and taken to Hong Kong where the gorilla escapes
and causes havoc.  This is a laughable 1977 rip off of KING KONG
(1976), itself a rip-off.  Production values are low and audiences seem
to like the film mostly for derisive laughter.  Rating: 2 (0 to 10),
high -2 (-4 to +4)
   - Directed by Ho Meng-Hua.
   - This film is provided to be a sort of laughing stock to finish the
     festival.
   - An earthquake uncovers an 11-story tall gorilla in the Himalayas.
     A hunter, chosen because he just broke up with his girl and is at
     loose ends, gets sent to find the ape and finds a sort of female
     Tarzan who controls the ape.
   - Evelyne Kraft is the jungle girl in a leather bikini that she is
     pasted into so she always looks on the verge of bouncing out of.
   - Gorilla actor has no idea how gorillas move and suit is terrible.
     Nice miniature effects, however.
   - Has almost a music video inside it of jungle girl playing with
     animals like Chi-chi the leopard.
   - Several places there is narrative that is nearly incoherent as if
     there are missing scenes and the viewer has to guess what happened
     in the interim.
   - Actual location shooting in Mysore.  Ape shown badly matted behind
     temple.
   - Combining of images usually pretty bad.  Incompetent matching of
     film stocks.
   - Stock footage frequently used.
   - Gorilla brought to Hong Kong by greedy entrepreneur who really
     abuses the ape before it escapes and tears things up real good.

Title
Review for Boiler Room (2000)
     Who wants to be a millionaire?  Almost everyone wants to be rich
and most people do not want to really have to work for it.  At least
that is the point of view presented to Seth (Giovanni Ribisi) when he
interviews at brokerage house J. T.  Marlin.  Seth is something of a
disappointment to his father (Ron Rifkin), a Federal Judge.  At about
the age of 18 Seth has quit school and is running an illegal casino out
of his apartment.  One of Seth's customers recruits him to interview at
brokerage house J. T. Marlin where the cash flow is even better--a lot
better.  Seth finds that the offered interview is not to sell himself
to the firm, but more to sell him on the idea of working for the
Marlin.  And the package seems almost too good to be true.  Give the
firm three years of very hard work and they will nearly guarantee to
make him a millionaire.  Who could resist a deal like that?
     Jim Young (Ben Affleck) tells the recruits he himself is 27, which
is almost over the hill in that business.  It is the young people who
are the big traders.  And the financial rewards are terrific.  Seth
sees a chance to be successful and show his father that he has worth.
Almost immediately it seems to be a Faustian bargain.  As Seth is
pulled deeper into this world he makes a visual transition.  Younger
puts him in darker clothing.  Dark suits, dark shirts, even his eyes
seem to darken.  He begins to look like almost gothic or vampirish.  In
a less than subtle manner Younger seems to be suggesting that the life
is being slowly sucked from him.
     Younger shows us the world of these young kids thrown into the
world of finance.  In their expensive suits and with their expensive
cars they give the appearance of respectability and of having class.
Yet over and over Younger makes the point that these are children, and
vulgar ones at that, who do not know what to do with their money.  They
know the neighborhoods to buy expensive homes but in a look inside one
the house seems almost unfurnished except with a few technical toys.
There is almost nothing soft in the house.  Almost everything is
plastic and electronic.  When the dealers go out to bars they behave
little better than teenage gangs.  They live an existence of well-
rewarded banality and conspicuous and ill-considered consumption.
     In order to make the point that the illegal trading is not a
victimless crime we also see a subplot of one investor who is hurt by
the illicit trading.  Still, by concentrating too much on the one
investor the film blunts the point that there are many investors
damaged by the shady firm.  The drama works best in the subplot of the
relation between Seth and his father.  It is in this relationship that
the film has its most moving moments.
     The film borrows heavily from both WALL STREET and GLENGARRY GLEN
ROSS, but it also works both films into the plot.  Ben Affleck is not
only a young model of the ruthless Alec Baldwin character from
GLENGARRY GLEN ROSS, he also quotes him.  Not only is the plot borrowed
from WALL STREET, it also is the traders' favorite film.  The film also
works in a romance that seems gratuitous, but just adds one more
ingredient to the mix.
     The music seems mostly gangsta rock.  This combines with the jerky
editing to give a sort of new wave feel.  The score did not do a lot
for me but underscore the disorientation of dropping into the new world
of brokerage.  (Odd trivia point: I am not sure of the symbolism, but
the opening chords of the closing credit music are borrowed directly
from a recording of the score for GODZILLA VS. MOTHRA (1964).)
     The film is at its best at what should be the hardest task,
interesting the audience in the finances and the trading and at the
same time being educational.  I rate it a 7 on the 0 to 10 scale and a
low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Maverick (1994)

Title
Review for October Sky (1999)
     It is October 1957 in Coalwood, West Virginia and there are
virtually two different worlds--worlds that never touch each other.
One world is the town's coal mine.  The Olga Mining Company runs that
and it is the town.  Most boys know from an early age that when they
get old enough they will go down in the mine to work.  The other world
is what they read about in the papers.  It is where amazingly the
Soviets just put a satellite called Sputnik in orbit around the whole
planet.  And for nearly the first time the two worlds touch.  There
right over Coalwood is a light shooting across the sky.  Homer Hickam,
Jr. (played by Jake Gyllenhaal) sees the satellite go overhead, and
nothing will ever be the same for him.  There overhead is a piece of
the outer world, put there by a rocket.  Homer gets some of his buddies
together with the school nerd and they decide that they are going to
build their own rockets.
     This is the story of the four boys who dedicate themselves to
building and launching their own rockets.  Naming the rockets Auks
after flightless birds they soon find that launching rockets not only
can be the ticket to get them out of town, it really has to get them
out of town.  The town is owned by Olga and they are not allowed to fly
rockets from Olga's property.  Instead they find a slate hilltop eight
miles from town and set it up as their launching base.  They begin to
get the materials and money they need by any means, fair or foul.  This
includes stealing spikes from abandoned railroad tracks and selling
them.  But there is tremendous resistance in the town to doing anything
as strange as building rockets and they come into conflict with the
school, with the police, but most of all Homer Jr. comes in conflict
with his father, Homer, Sr., superintendent of the Olga mine.  [Note:
to avoid confusion, Homer, Sr.'s name is changed to John in the
screenplay.]
     "John" is played by Chris Cooper in an ironic piece of casting.
Cooper is most familiar for his role as the coal mine union organizer
in MATEWAN.  In this film he is cursing that same union.  But the
conflict between Homer and his father forms the dramatic core of the
film.  It is in the love-hate relationship between Homer and his father
that the film gets its strongest resonance.  Homer's relationship with
an inspiring teacher, Miss Riley (Laura Dern), while also strong, falls
into more familiar territory.
     OCTOBER SKY is directed by Joe Johnston who directed THE ROCKETEER
and JUMANJI.  The screenplay is by Louis Colick, based on the book
ROCKET BOYS by Homer Hickam, Jr.  Hickam claims to be pleased with the
adaptation of his book and even points out that the two titles are
anagrams.  For acting credit, the honors go mostly to Chris Cooper as
Homer's father.  Laura Dern and Jake Gyllenhaal are just a little too
good-looking for their roles as films of the original people
demonstrate at the end the film.  However, Coalwood, filmed in a
Tennessee coal town really does capture the look of West Virginia in
the 50s.  [I say this as someone lived in West Virginia for a while in
the 1950s.  Okay, I was very young, but I still remember the look of
coal country.]
     OCTOBER SKY is a powerful look at a young man's drives to become a
scientist.  It is also a moving portrait of a father-son relationship.
I rate the film an 8 on the 0 to 10 scale and a low +3 on the -4 to +4
scale.
     MINOR SPOILER: There are some odd touches that should have been
cleared up in the script with some explanation.  Why did the boys never
look at the object the police were holding until AFTER they proved it
was not theirs?  For that matter why did the police never notice that
the object they were holding was professionally built and not made by
amateurs.  Also were both younger and older brother high school seniors
in the same year, as they seemed to be?  This seems possible, but
unlikely.

Title
Review for Weekend at Bernie's II (1993)
     For me WEEKEND AT BERNIE'S was precisely the right film at the right
time since I usually find it difficult to sleep on an airplane.  What I saw-
--a total of about ten or fifteen minutes--seemed like mis-fire humor.  A
lot of it was the same joke--abuse of a dead body--ad nauseum.  When I saw
that the sequel was being made I said, "They'd have to pay me to go see
that."  Then a friend who gets paid by the distributor to count audiences
asked Evelyn and me to cover for her.  That fulfilled the condition.  This
time I stayed awake, and while I cannot say I thought it was a genuinely
good film, it would be about average for cable fare (which is pretty much my
definition of a zero rating--+1 is average for a theatrical release).
     Robert Klane once again wrote and directed.  Terry Kiser again played
the corpse.  I suspect in the first film Kiser had little opportunity to do
much in the line of physical comedy.  This time around, however, Bernie has
been subjected to a voodoo ceremony that went wrong and he gets to return as
a zombie whenever music with a strong beat is playing.  His almost animated
body is probably the best thing about this film.  Certainly inferior is the
acting of Andrew McCarthy and Jonathan Silverman as the two cretins who are
stuffing the body into suitcases, dragging it down stairs, banging its head
around, and in general having the scene stolen from them by a mostly
inanimate object.  It seems they have grabbed the corpse and are trying to
use it to get their paws on Bernie's ill-gotten gains.  All the while they
are chased by company detective Hummel (played by Barry Bostwick).
     What can I say that is good about this film?  A few of the gags work,
though many of the jokes that were not funny in the first film are trying
again and failing again in the second.  The opening credit sequence managed
to tell enough of the plot of the first film so that I did not feel lost in
the sequel.  Moving the story to the Virgin Islands ties in with the voodoo
plot and adds some nice scenery.  This film is a time-waster but it managed
to keep me out of trouble for an hour and a half (and awake this time).  I
would rate it a 0, as I said before, on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Relic, The (1997)
     THE RELIC is based on what is apparently a fairly popular horror
novel by Douglas Preston (author of the non-fiction DINOSAURS IN THE
ATTIC, about the American Museum of Natural History) and horror editor
Lincoln Child.  The trailers for the film preceded the release by
several months.  That is all really something of a pity.  This would be
a great little film to come upon by accident, sitting in some dusty
corner of the video store.  Maybe this should be the second film of a
drive-in double-feature, playing with something like MARS ATTACKS!  The
key to enjoying THE RELIC is to see it on the cheap with very little
expectation.  Then you would not feel you have to analyze the ideas in
any great detail.  This film is for the 90s what a film like TARANTULA
was for the 50s, a bit of playful fun with some really dubious science.
THE RELIC pastes together bits from a lot of horror and science fiction
movies and gives some nice hokum explanations for how its particular
monster came to be haunting a natural history museum in Chicago.  If
you look for it you will see the ghost ship from DRACULA or a big chunk
of plot borrowed from THE PHANTOM OF THE OPERA.  Another piece of the
idea comes from THE CREEPING UNKNOWN.  Still, by STAR TREK standards
the ideas in the film seem mostly reasonably plausible and nothing
seems totally absurd.  The film fails only in that it does not offer
enough to satisfy the expectations for a major studio production.
     A museum expedition to the Amazon Basin in Brazil has discovered
some peculiar superstitions of the local Indians.  They involve a
statue and some other jungle artifacts that get crated up and sent to
the Chicago Museum of Natural History by an explorer who later regrets
sending them.  At the museum the artifacts come to the attention of the
research staff including a young evolutionary biologist Margo Green
(played by Penelope Ann Miller) and her mentor and friend Dr. Frock
(James Whitmore).  But what really attracts attention is the set of
beheadings that start occurring in different parts of the museum.
Investigating them comes Lieutenant Vincent D'Agosta (Tom Sizemore).
He is asked to keep a lid on the killings because the museum is about
to open a major new exhibit on superstition that will be extremely
lucrative for the museum.  The museum director (Linda Hunt) is planning
in just a day or two to inaugurate the exhibit with a celebration, a
major social event for the city government of Chicago.  D'Agosta does
not want the opening ceremonies for the exhibit to occur in a museum
with a killer still at large somewhere in the huge system of
underground chambers beneath the museum, but the museum plans to go
ahead.  While D'Agosta tries to find the killer, Dr. Green struggles to
understand exactly what the superhuman killer is.
     Penelope Ann Miller is probably the least interesting of the top-
billed four actors.  Tom Sizemore as the superstitious police detective
is a much more interesting actor.  He overcomes the distraction of his
constant one-day growth of beard to put some interesting accent on his
character.  He is probably remembered best for the sleazy sorts he
played in DEVIL IN A BLUE DRESS and NATURAL BORN KILLERS.  He plays his
hero in much the same way and it is worth seeing the sleaziness
translate into attitude.  Linda Hunt and James Whitmore are both
magnetic scene stealers, as is a somewhat mournful-looking dog.
Director Peter Hyams's previous science fiction films have been
CAPRICORN ONE, OUTLAND, 2010, and TIMECOP. Of those, only 2010 warrants
even the effort of a second viewing and it was pretty stodgy.  Hyams
had to step over into horror to make his first reasonably enjoyable
science fiction film.  Even in THE RELIC he lacks the style he really
needs.  Hyams floods the film with false-alarm jump scenes, many highly
predictable, instead of creating the feeling of tension he really
needs.
     Perhaps the best thing to do with this film would be to forget you
ever heard of it and then rent it in two years.  Barring that, go into
the theater with lots of popcorn and no expectations.  Then you might
agree this film deserves a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Newsies (1992)
     It is New York City, 1899.  Life is hard if you are a boy on your own
with no money.  But if a boy is poor and needs work, he could buy newspapers
at a cent each and sell them on the street for two cents a piece.  You might
earn a dollar a day that way.  Or you might not be able to sell what you
have and end up losing money.  A really good newsie might get $50 a week.
Joseph Pulitzer (played by Robert Duvall) decides to raise the price to the
newsboys by 10%.  Seeing their livelihood drying up, newsboys Jack Kelly and
David Jacobs (played by Christian Bale of EMPIRE OF THE SUN and David
Moscow) decide to organize the New York City newsboys into a strike against
the local newspapers.  Pulitzer, deciding he has a fight on his hands,
decides to play as dirty as he needs to win.  NEWSIES is the story of that
strike.
     Disney Studios tried something a little different with NEWSIES.  The
historical film is currently at a low ebb since historical education is also
at a low ebb.  For once more films being made are set *after* the 20th Century
than *before*.  Still, Disney did make a historical film about an 1899 newsboy
strike.  Then they tried to aim it at both adults and children.  Then on top
of that they decided to make it a musical.  This is an idea that is either
audacious or nutty, depending on your point of view.  So, does it all work?
Well, sort of.  My impression of the trailer is that it all sounded like a
good idea except for making it a musical.  Certainly once I saw the film I
would say that its biggest problem is that it is a musical.  The idea of a
big pro-labor musical has a nostalgic feel reminiscent of Broadway shows
like PINS AND NEEDLES.  This certainly is a more engaging theme for a
musical than "I'm in love" or "Let's put on a show" Like the vast majority
of musicals.  The problem here is that this is only half-heartedly a
musical.  There are only about six songs, so the viewer is generally
thinking straight drama when a character or group of characters starts
acting funny and with a jolt the viewer realizes they are going into a song.
It may well be that making this a musical was an afterthought after Menken's
success with BEAUTY AND THE BEAST.  I noted without minding that the film
used Bale's and Moscow's real singing voices--if you really want to call
them singing voices.  David Fristrom, in a review of the film, noted the
dances were not very well filmed and he is probably right, thought I might
not have picked up on it.  I did like the song "The World Will Know," which
had almost some of the force of LES MISERABLES.  Incidentally, please note
that the name of Pulitzer's newspaper is "The New York World."  The script
has some fun with that name; if you miss the name, you miss the point of
some of the word-play.  When Pulitzer says, "When I created the World..." it
is intended as a subtle statement that Pulitzer is a megalomaniac.  Instead
it sounds like he is certifiably insane.
     As for the story of the strike, it has a minor Dickensian tone crossed
with obvious Disney touches.  Visually the old New York was created with
perhaps too many obvious matte shots, but maybe in a musical we expect a pat
plot and make allowances for some of the visuals being less than authentic-
looking.  In spite of the nits that can be picked, there is enough substance
to appreciate here.  I might not recommend NEWSIES but I rate it a high +1
on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Deconstructing Harry (1997)
     Woody Allen is one of the most successful artist-directors in
Hollywood, but he is becoming less and less reliable as a filmmaker.
In his early years of film-making he mastered the simple comedy.  From
there he went into a second phase and took risks experimenting with
different approaches and styles.  Some of these work better than
others.  ZELIG and CRIMES AND MISDEMEANORS are the work of a creative
and intelligent artist.  DECONSTRUCTING HARRY goes to the other extreme
and is a bizarre experiment demanding more of the viewer than it gives
back.
     Harry Block (Allen) has in his life only two drives.  He wants to
have sex with as many women as possible and when he makes a mess of his
life and those of his lovers he wants to retreat into his writing.  The
story of this static and highly unsympathetic character is told with a
number of often clumsy stylistic experiments. Perhaps the most
irritating device is to express the disjointedness of Harry's life by
editing Harry's scenes putting in cuts in the middle as if to show
missing time with something edited out.  As a writer, Harry puts his
friends into his books in the thinnest of disguises.  The film
dramatizes incidents from these supposed books and cuts between his
real story line and fragments from Harry's books with different actors
playing the real and fictional people in Harry's life.  These fragments
are frustrating in their lack of completion, but even more frustrating
is the bringing of the characters out of the fragments into scenes with
the real characters.  It is up to the viewer to keep track not just who
is fictional and who is real but also to keep straight who is the
fictional doppelganger of which real person.  If that sounds
complicated, it is.  Then as another device in one of the stories, an
actor seems to have the peculiar property that he has gone out of focus
and can only be seen in blurry image.  Harry sees this as a metaphor
for his own condition and himself goes blurry for a short time.  As if
these touches did not create sufficient confusion, the story is told
out of chronological order.  If Allen were giving the audience a story
that was worth decoding, any and all of these stylistic touches could
be excusable.  But Allen puts the audience through all of this to give
us a portrait of Harry Block who is a selfish manipulator who is not
worth the effort to understand.
     DECONSTRUCTING HARRY is set at a time when Harry's old college,
the one that expelled him when he attended it, wants now to honor him
for a lifetime of writing achievement.  Harry is searching among his
friends to find one who will go with him.  Just why someone who is so
unwilling to commit to a relationship with anyone suddenly needs the
support of someone else is unclear.  Harry tries his current girl
friend Fay (Elizabeth Shue) only to find that she is about to marry
Harry's old friend Larry (Billy Crystal).  Block would like his son
Hilly (Eric Lloyd) to accompany him, but Hilly's mother, previously
first Harry's psychiatrist and more recently his wife, refuses to let
her son see his father.  Another friend Richard (Bob Balaban) would go
but has health problems.  Harry also considers bringing a prostitute
Cookie (Hazel Goodman).  It is interesting that Allen should introduce
another likable prostitute so soon after MIGHTY APHRODITE, but Cookie
is considerably different--black and a lot brighter than Mira Sorvino's
character in the previous film.
     While the comedy sequences are never complete, a few are elaborate
and some quite funny.  The centerpiece of the film is a journey into
Hell with Allen playing a sort of Orpheus rescuing Fay from the
clutches of the Devil, who looks a lot like Larry.  That story also is
left uncompleted, perhaps to show Harry's unwillingness to commit even
to telling a story.  The linchpin that was needed to tie together the
stylistic quirks of this film was a central character who changes and
who gives us something about which to care.  That character is patently
not the one Allen creates in Harry Block and not the characters around
Harry as seen through his acerbic eyes.  Allen can do much better than
DECONSTRUCTING HARRY.  I rate it a 3 on the 0 to 10 scale and a -1 on
the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Lawnmower Man, The (1992)
          Capsule review:  In THE LAWNMOWER MAN, a mix of virtual
     reality and mind-expanding drugs turn a mentally retarded
     handyman into a psychic monster.  The film borrows heavily
     from ALTERED STATES, FORBIDDEN PLANET, and CHARLY, and pays
     back in some nice computer graphics and an over-used revenge
     plot.  Rating: +1 (-4 to +4).
     Dr. Lawrence Angelo (played by Pierce Brosnan) is one more Stephen King
character being exploited by the evil government intelligence agency "The
Shop."  His experiments with drug-enhancing virtual reality not only make
the effect more complete, it may actually be raising the intelligence of his
chimpanzee subject.  Unfortunately, the chimp does not want to find out.
The ape picks the lock of his cage and is killed walking to freedom, zapping
humans as he goes.  Angelo continues with Jobe (Played by Jeff Fahey), a
mentally retarded lawn man.
     In over-used King style (perhaps "pseudo-King" since King had little to
do with the story in the film), Jobe lives in a world of people willing to
torment him because he is so powerless.  If only he had the intelligence and
power to get back at his tormenters.  But then the brain boost he is getting
from the ultimate video game and psycho-active drugs starts giving him a
super intellect as well as telekinetic powers.  As Angelo's wife tells him
early in the film, "It may be the future to you, Larry, but it's the same
old shit to me."  She obviously knows her Stephen King films.  Other lines
seem downright silly.  "He learned Latin in two hours!  It took me a year to
learn the Latin alphabet."  That may well be true, Larry, but I assume you
were about four years old at the time.
     If the plot is overly predictable--and believe me, it is--the computer
graphics are spectacular.  They may not always make sense.  Jobe's new
girlfriend sneaks into the lab to try the virtual reality equipment.  While
she appears to be the first woman who has been in the lab, the computer
knows to visualize her virtual reality body as a female.  The computer
visuals make one wish this film had been shot in 3-D.  Even shot flat, the
visuals are quite a trip.
     The screenplay is loosely based on the short story by Stephen King.
(No, let me correct that: it is tightly based on a Stephen King story title.
It has virtually nothing to do with King's story of a lawnman who worships
the God Pan.)  It was written by the director Brett Lawrence and the
producer Gimel Everett.  It is dedicated to the memory of the co-producer,
the late Milton Subotsky.  Those of you who are fans of British horror film
will remember some classics, particularly anthology films such as THE HOUSE
THAT DRIPPED BLOOD, ASYLUM, TALES FROM THE CRYPT, and BEYOND THE GRAVE that
were co-produced in the 1960s by Subotsky for his production company Amicus
Films.  His last film was typical for him: entertaining but not heavy on
thought.  I would rate THE LAWNMOWER MAN a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Princess Caraboo (1994)
     1817 in England was during a time of great awakening in England.
The recently ended Napoleonic Wars had brought an awareness that there
was a lot of world beyond the shores of Britain.  Coleridge and Byron
wrote about exotic lands and the aristocracy hungered to know more of
faraway lands with poetic names.  And in the midst of this craze for
the foreign and exotic, Princess Caraboo shows up wandering in a field
near an English village.  The turbanned Caraboo speaks an unknown
language, writes in totally unknown pictograms, and has seems to have
fashion tastes molded on some Pacific Island or someplace in Asia.  She
is adopted by the affluent Mrs. Worrall (Wendy Hughes) and her less
charitable husband (Jim Broadbent).  Little by little the Princess's
story comes out of how she was kidnapped by pirates and managed to
escape from them off the coast of England.  But nobody is sure if the
story is true or a fraud.
     Michael Austin's film is not so much about the title character but
about the phenomenon and controversy that surrounded her appearance.
The mysterious woman's fame soon spreads across England.  Some believe
her to be a Javanese princess, others believe her just a woman with a
vivid imagination.  But many of the experts who first doubt her are
confounded by the evidence that she is the genuine article.
     Phoebe Cates is the Princess who acts like Asian royalty, but
Cates herself just does not look Asian enough to be convincing.  In an
interview at the Montreal Film Festival Michael Austin said that he
first cast Phoebe Cates and since her husband Kevin Costner [sic] came
along to tend their baby, the director gave him a part in the film
also.  Actually Kevin Kline really grabs the attention of the audience
as Frixos, the Greek dandy who is the Worrall's insolent butler.  As an
early and overly candid sceptic of Caraboo his role is a comic gem.
What was probably a minor or even non-existent role expanded just for
his talents becomes the most engaging characterization in the film.
Wendy Hughes is a good actress, but this film does not give sufficient
depth to her character.  Perhaps it was pushed aside by the Kline role,
but she is a little too sweet and understanding, a bit too good to be
true.  Jim Broadbent has more to do as Mr. Worrall who married into the
aristocracy without any touch of nobility.  Stephen Rea is Gutch, who
narrates the story.  As a newspaperman Gutch is romantically attracted
to Caraboo but also feels a responsibility to investigate the truth of
her story.  John Lithgow rounds out the cast as a linguistic expert won
over in multiple ways by the princess.
     A film with Freddie Francis's camerawork will always be worth
seeing.  His work goes back at least to THE INNOCENTS and his feel for
creating a period atmosphere in films like THE FRENCH LIEUTENANT'S
WOMAN is always excellent.  Under Austin's direction his images here
have more of a storybook feel than usual.  But we do get a look at
village life from the fancy manors to the town square with its ale
houses and gibbets.  The score by Richard Hartley often has majestic
moments but is not memorable on first hearing.
     The film is a light enjoyable look at an England that rarely is
shown in historical films.  It is short at 96 minutes, but also sweet.
I give it a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Shigatsu monogatari (1998)
     CAPSULE: A pleasant slice-of-life about a woman from Hokkaido
adapting to life at a Tokyo University.  Toward the end there is a
twist and the viewer discovers the plot has been developing all along.
Rating: 6 (0 to 10),  high +1 (-4 to +4)
   - Directed by Shunji Iwai
   - Young woman leaving Hokkaido to go to Musashino University in
     Tokyo.
   - Slice-of-life style just shows what life is like adjusting to her
     tiny dorm room, her nervousness about meeting new classmates,  We
     also see her recreation as she goes to a movie, becomes a regular
     at a local bookstore, makes a few friends, joins a school fishing
     club.  Her life seems very lonely.
   - Story could have taken place in England, US, Canada, etc.
   - Dorms in Japan seem very depressing.  Tiny rooms, rundown walls,
     rust on metal.
   - Appears to be snowing when she leaves Hokkaido and when she
     arrives in Tokyo.  You realize in Tokyo it is actually not snow
     but apple blossoms falling.  There is a pleasant musical theme as
     the score.  It seems to be played on a single piano.
   - Film is short, about 67 minutes.  Seems like it could be an
     afternoon TV program for high school girls.

Title
Review for Little Voice (1998)
     A big personality can push out of the way all personalities around
it.  Mari Hoff (played by Brenda Blethyn) is a woman with a big
personality and a big voice.  When she enters a room she squeezes out
just about everybody else.  Both her best friend and her daughter are
nearly mute in her overpowering and frequently vulgar presence.  It is
not that she has any intelligence to spread around but she dominates
all about her by verbally overpowering them.  One of the few people who
can get a word in when talking to Mari is Ray Say (Michael Caine).  He
is an entertainment promoter well past his prime, but who denies the
truth even to himself.  He promotes pointless acts that are more
pitiful than entertaining.  Still, Ray has big plans that obviously are
of little value even to Ray.  He is convinced he can still strike it
big if only he can find some great talent right here in his own
neighborhood.
     Mari's daughter Laura (Jane Horrocks), living with Mari, has
almost given up the struggle to talk.  On the rare occasions when she
even bothers to speak it comes out at a squeaky tiny voice that has
earned her the nickname "Little Voice."  Laura has retreated from the
world dominated by her mother and into a world of daydreaming of her
dead father, now nearly elevated to the status of saint in her own
mind.  She listens over and over to his records of Marilyn Monroe,
Shirley Bassey, and especially Judy Garland.  Unknown to anyone while
Laura has almost no voice of her own she can borrow and even sing in
voices of Garland, Monroe, and Bassey in perfect voice impressions.
     One night when Laura is listening to the beloved Judy Garland
records and Ray is visiting Mari the power goes out.  Ray hears the
music stop, but strangely Judy Garland's voice continues to sing.
Suddenly Ray realizes that "Little Voice" may have real talent that he
can exploit to find some real success.  But can he get Laura to come
out of her shell?  And if she does come out, can Mari stand to see
someone else in the family getting attention?
     Jim Herman wrote the screenplay and directs a film based on the
play "The Rise and Fall of Little Voice" by Jim Cartwright.  Blethyn
and Caine each give performances so earthy one almost feels dirty just
watching them.  Each is totally self-absorbed.  Caine at least is aware
enough of how he is perceived that he can control himself.  Blethyn's
character is so self-absorbed that she does not even think of
appearances.  Horrocks is so victimized that she seems to be retreating
into autism.  Ewan McGregor is present as a young telephone installer
who is the first person since the death of Mari's husband who really
cares for Laura.  While reminding the viewer that there are still
normal and decent people in the world, he is a little too good to be
true.  It is never clear what he sees in Laura whose personality
qualifies her for the walking wounded.
     LITTLE VOICE is a downbeat look at English lower-middle class
standards.  The little neighborhood nightclub, Boo's, is seamy and
tawdry, even if there is little that we see that is explicit.  If
LITTLE VOICE really is a comedy, it is a dark one and one full of
people whom one is happy to be rid of at the end of its 100 minutes.
Much of the plotting of LITTLE VOICE is predictable, but the
performances are raw and realistic.  This is a side of England most of
us would rather do without.  I rate the film 6 on the 0 to 10 scale and
a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Rambling Rose (1991)
          Capsule review:  Lightweight memoir of a boy growing up
     in the mid-1930's Georgia and of the commotion caused by
     hiring a former "loose woman" to do housework.  Well filmed
     and to nobody's surprise Robert Duvall turns in a terrific
     performance as the father of the household.  Rating: +2 (-4
     to +4).  [minor spoilers in the review]
     "She caused one hell of a damnable commotion," says a middle-aged Buddy
(played by John Heard) recalling the young woman who came to live with his
family when he was 13.  The story of that commotion is told in a golden-
toned flashback that makes up all but about five minutes of the film.  The
"she" he is referring to is Rose (played by Laura Dern).  In a small Georgia
town in the mid 1930s, a younger Buddy (played by Lucas Haas) has a crush on
Rose.  His daddy (played by Robert Duvall) has hired Rose to save her from a
life of prostitution.  But Daddy has no idea how much Rose is going to
disrupt his well-ordered existence.
     That well-ordered existence includes three precocious children, Buddy
being the oldest, and a wife who is working on her Master's degree from
Columbia.  In talking, Mother tends to go off on philosophical tangents and
Daddy calls that "going off into the fourth dimension."  Mother takes a
maternal interest in this new hired girl.  Mother is played, incidentally,
by Dern's real-life mother, Diane Ladd.  The ruckus is caused by the fact
that Rose just exudes and radiates sexuality.  Both Daddy and Buddy are
attracted to her.  At this point one is really expecting the cliche of
Southern gentility being a thin veneer over decadence.  This film flirts
with that cliche, but generally seems to say that underneath that gentility
is just more gentility.  Or perhaps it is just Mother's good example.
Mother seems to have a sensitivity to the feelings of all living things with
the possible exception of her own children.  Daddy and Buddy are fascinated
by Rose's sensuality and in one memorable scene watch from a distance as
Rose walks around town attracting men.  Later this quality of attraction
will cause what may be more trouble than it is worth.
     Robert Duvall is in all probability the best American actor alive.
This might have been a pleasant enough film without his contribution, but it
would have not been nearly as good.  His gestures and his very posture are
unfailingly perfect.  Lines that could have been just straight flat dialogue
become witty or very telling when Duvall delivers them.  Laura Dern is not a
great actress but she has the right look for Rose.  She has a feral
sensuality that makes her attractive without being pretty balance that is
just about right for Rose.  The late Kevin Conway plays a Northern doctor
with his accustomed slightly sinister edge.  The one bad piece of casting is
John Heard as the 1971 Buddy.  He must look 49, speak with a Southern
accent, and look like Lucas Haas.  I usually like John Heard but he fails on
all three counts.
     RAMBLING ROSE is not a great film.  Though at times it reminds one of
other childhood reminiscences of the South such as TO KILL A MOCKINGBIRD and
THE HEART IS A LONELY HUNTER, it has little of the power and does not really
have a whole lot to say,  But it is an enjoyable film and is well above the
general run of films of the last few months.  I would give it a +2 on the -4
to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Wings of the Dove, The (1997)
     The characters that Jane Austen writes about are almost from
another world.  Perhaps that is part of their appeal.  An Austen
heroine may spend the best part of a novel wondering if she should make
her move and profess her love for some man, or if she will instead
follow the conventions of her society.  That helps us get a better feel
for early 19th century British society, but it makes it a little harder
for the viewer or reader to identify with her characters.  Henry
James's characters, coming from a world a century later, are far more
modern and they get involved in situations the modern viewer can more
easily recognize.  While set in 1910, THE WINGS OF THE DOVE might have
taken place in the middle or maybe even the late 20th century.
Certainly the characters could be ones from a much more modern novel.
     Years ago Kate Croy's mother married for love a man from a lower
class.  The mother is apparently dead and her father has returned to
the lifestyle of drinking away what little money he has left.  Kate
(played by Helena Bonham Carter) now lives with her aunt (Charlotte
Rampling), who wants to protect her from making the same mistake her
mother did.  And protect she must because Kate loves a poor journalist,
Merton Densher (Linus Roache).  Kate's Aunt will not allow Kate and
Merton to even see each other.  Kate wants to marry Merton, but they
cannot live on the small salary that Merton makes.  Kate has a friend
who is an heiress from America, Millie Theale (Alison Elliott).  Millie
is a fresh young woman who appears to enjoy life, but as Kate discovers
Millie is actually dying.  Millie is being courted by Lord Mark, who
has breeding, is of the noble class, and otherwise is a consummate
jerk.  Kate would much prefer to see Millie leave her money to her
Merton.  That will make him acceptable to her class and will give them
both the money to live on.  She sets about trying to act as matchmaker
for her friend and her lover.  The story unfolds on a backdrop of
Kate's native London and Venice where she visits.
     To be frank, I have liked many of the films that Helena Bonham
Carter has been in but never been particularly fond of her as an
actress.  Her trademark has seemed to be an indelible indignant pout.
She has too often played the woman who knows all too well what is wrong
with society and has every right to pout. Ironically she is much more
likable as an actress when she is playing someone who is essentially a
deceitful schemer and who is betraying one of her closest friends.  I
liked her in this film as much as I ever have in any role.  My one
complaint is that the screen was probably just not ready for a Helena
Bonham Carter nude scene.  Nor was I.  Much more captivating is Alison
Elliott as the dying heiress.  She is brash yet unassuming,
representing all the positive characteristics that the British used to
think Americans had.  She is a very flattering stereotype.  Neither
Linus Roache nor Elizabeth McGovern (as Theale's friend and nurse) make
much of an impression.  Both are a little bland, though the film
suffers more from Roache's blandness.
     Under Iain Softley's direction Eduardo Serra's camera captures
memorable views of both London and Venice.  London is usually seen in
business-like blues and grays, often showing the coming of the modern
age.  The film starts on an underground train and often shows us
streets choked with cars and busses. Venice on the other hand is
usually shot in earth tones.  Most of what we see is centuries old.  Is
there some ironic comment that Kate's aunt with her old school ideas of
class remains behind in a very modern seeming London, while the more
modern seeming, cigarette-smoking Kate and her modern-thinking friends
gravitate to the antique splendor of Venice?  One remarkable scene is
captured by Serra has Kate's face lit up and framed in an oval mirror
so that the subtle conniver looks a lot like the witch from SNOW WHITE.
     THE WINGS OF THE DOVE surprises the viewer in several ways.  While
the ending is not much of a surprise, the film is creative in the ways
it get there.  I think people will find this film more approachable
than they expect.  I rate it a 7 on the 0 to 10 scale and a +2 on the
-4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Breaking the Waves (1996)
     BREAKING THE WAVES is an unusual and extremely compelling film set
in the remote north of Scotland.  It is set in a town long closed to
outsiders where life is ruled by a tight little group of church elders,
all male.  As the film progresses we find that stern Calvinist values
suffuse everyday life.  One of the loyal daughters of the church is
Bess (played by Emily Watson in an Oscar-worthy performance).  Bess is
a childlike woman with a strong abiding faith in God.  But her feelings
go beyond simple faith.  She has conversations with God, voicing both
parts and has formed God in the mold of the cold an unforgiving clique
who run the church.  Hers is a demanding and unforgiving God in this
world with all rewards postponed until the next.  But as the film
opens, God has made a rare exception to give His Bess something
wonderful.  A man has fallen in love with Bess.  True, Jan (played by
Stellan Skarsgard) is an outsider and the elders do not trust
outsiders.  Still, something has opened up in the quiet, mousy Bess and
she can pour out her love on a man.  Jan is a rough North Sea oil
driller, but Bess loves him with a fierceness that startles the people
of the village. But her happiness cannot last and after a week of
marriage, Jan must return to the rig.  To Bess any separation is
tragedy.  After missing Jan unbearably she makes a deal with God to
take whatever consequences to get Jan back.  Then as an apparent
fulfillment, Jan has a violent injury and is paralyzed and perhaps even
dying.  He is back to the village but unable to be with Bess in any but
the most superficial way.  Jan does not want to see Bess waste herself
devoted to a dying man.  He wants her to taste life and asks her to go
and make love to men and come back to tell him about it.  This request
sets in motion a series of unfortunate events and a storm of
conflicting emotions.
     This is the fifth feature film of Danish director Lars Von Trier,
best known in this country for ZENTROPA. That was a good film; this is
a better one.  The one thing that has not improved and, in fact, has
gone considerably downhill, is the look of the film.  For reasons best
known to Von Trier, much of this film was apparently shot with a hand-
held camera.  What is more it is a camera that seems to be forever
fidgeting, jumping from one person to the next.  The scenes that the
camera shoots, except for the chapter titles--the story is split into
chapters, are almost all in subdued color.  Some of the chapter titles
are so beautiful they seem to be more paintings than actual scenes.
The narrative is clean and well-told up until the final half hour.
Then the telling becomes a little muddled.  The final image of the film
does things to the plot that I personally did not care for, but up
until that point the story was extremely good.  It is not easy to make
a character as simple and straightforward as Bess as likable as she is,
but the script written by Von Trier makes the viewer really feel for
Bess.
     Emily Watson turns in a beautiful performance, at times genuinely
heartbreaking.  She plays a woman who is simple--not to say dim-
witted--and so totally consumed by the love of her man that nothing
else has any meaning in her life.  Even her love of God is superseded
by her love for this gift.  Hers is a degree of devotion the screen
usually reserves for dogs' love of their masters.  Watson is a stage
actress new to the screen but whose acting instincts seem rarely short
of perfect in a difficult role.  Stellan Skarsgard is stolid as Jan,
but his role is not one of much complexity.  For much of the film he is
in a horsecollar lying in bed, paralyzed from the neck down.  A
somewhat more interesting role goes to Katrin Cartlidge whose looks are
reminiscent of Amanda Plummer.  She is Bess's sister-in-law who ends up
Jan's nurse.  She is hostile to Jan, suspicious at first of his love of
the simple Bess.  Eventually she realizes the degree that he loves
Bess, but then does not approve of his methods to give Bess a life
independent of himself.
     BREAKING THE WAVES is a powerful and a moving drama, one of the
best of the year.  It does not seem to be getting a lot of play, but it
is worth looking for.  I give it a low +3 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Enchanted April (1992)
     I admit it.  The reason I wanted to see this movie was because I wanted
to see more of Miranda Richardson.  No, I wasn't taken with her stunning
beauty.  I just saw her in one film clip in which she had no lines.  She was
only reacting to a conversation between Josie Lawrence and Joan Plowright.
The conversation was funny but Richardson's reactions were priceless.  I
admit it was a silly reason to pay $7 to see a film but nothing else in the
film appealed to me.  And this is a film that turned out to be well worth
seeing.  This film seamlessly bridges the gap between E. M. Forster social
indignation and a Shakespearean romanticism.
     It is a rainy, ugly winter in 1922 London.  Lottie Wilkins (played by
Josie Lawrence) sees a stranger, Rose Arbuthnot (played by Miranda
Richardson) wistfully looking at the same newspaper ad that she had.  It
offered a Northern Italian castle for rent for April ... "wisteria and
sunshine."  Both women are unhappily married, Lottie to a miserly
businessman (played by Alfred Molina) and Rose to a writer of sexy novels
(played by Jim Broadbent).  With four women they might be able to swing the
vacation.  They find a crusty old harridan, Mrs. Fisher, whose father knew
every great literary genius of his generation.  Also there is a world-weary
heiress, Lady Caroline Dester.  Soon the mousey Lottie and Rose find why it
is not good to travel with strangers.  Mrs. Fisher is selfish and nasty,
Lady Caroline is cold and aloof.  Then the warmth and the beauty of
Portofino begins to work a kind of magic on all.
     Mike Newell, who previously directed the horror film THE AWAKENING and
later directed Richardson in DANCE WITH A STRANGER, here directs a
surprisingly magnetic film.  Peter Barnes adapted the 1922 novel by
Elizabeth von Armin.  The film was shot in the same castle where von Armin
wrote her novel.  Each of the four actresses has opportunities to stand out
and Molina's half-serious, half-comic role is also a positive pleasure.
Watching this film is like taking a pleasant vacation.  This is one of the
year's best films.  I rate it a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Thirteenth Floor, The (1999)
     The year is 1937.  As our story opens we follow an elderly man
(played by Armin Mueller-Stahl) from his mistress's bedroom to a
nightclub.  He leaves a letter he has written someone in the care of a
bartender (Vincent D'Onofrio) and goes home to his wife.  As he lies in
bed, suddenly he is propelled into the present. The world of 1937 was a
fully functioning world, realistic is every respect but one.  It was
not actually real but a total computer simulation.  And it was a very
complete computer simulation.  It is not just a virtual reality program
creating for one person what could be a three-dimensional world.  Each
person in the 1937 world has a life and personality of his or her own
and continues even when there is nobody to see him.  It is an entire
virtual world functioning on its own.  And our elderly gentleman is
Hammond Fuller, "the Einstein of our generation" who created the
cyber-world.  But tonight Hammond Fuller is going to be murdered and
suspicion will fall on his chief programmer Douglas Hall (Craig
Bierko).  Hall and his friend and coworker Whitney (Vincent D'Onofrio)
have worked for Hammond for years and think that they know him fairly
well.  Now that he is dead, they are not so sure.  A daughter (Gretchen
Mol) has turned up mysteriously and nobody knew Fuller had a daughter.
Discovered also is that Fuller has been repeatedly projecting himself
into his created world of 1937. Even Hall had not realized that was
possible yet.  Now Hall will have to solve a mystery spread across two
different worlds.
     Part of what makes this film as remarkable as it is is that it
comes from Centropolis Film Productions, Roland Emmerich's company.
Until now the best thing we have seen coming from Centropolis is their
imaginative opening banner. However, the approach for THE THIRTEENTH
FLOOR is entirely different from that of STARGATE, INDEPENDENCE DAY,
and GODZILLA.  Director Josef Rusnak, experienced mostly in European
films, has kept the use of special effects modest.  Rather than having
a visual carnival, this film is instead intelligent and filmed with a
great deal of visual style.  Cinematographer Wedigo von
Schultzendorff's style uses relatively modest special effects.  His
views of 1937 Los Angeles are lush and gorgeous, generally filmed with
a sepia filter to give us a Los Angeles where Philip Marlowe would feel
right at home.  von Schultzendorff has made his modern-day Los Angeles
looks like a giant electric-blue circuit pack.  Where the 1937 city has
a rich period feel, 1999 feels electronic and electrically charged.
     Rather than paying expensive stars, Rusnak has two little known
actors, Craig Bierko and Gretchen Mol, in the two top-billed positions.
He has saved the familiar faces for supporting roles.  His familiar
actors are more known for good performances than for powerhouse marquee
value.  Armin Mueller-Stahl had a long career in Germany and now
frequently appears in English-language films including SHINE, THE GAME,
and THE X FILES.  Vincent D'Onofrio has also been a familiar character
actor since his pivotal role as a somewhat retarded Marine recruit in
FULL METAL JACKET.
     So now we have had released in about a month three films about
worlds that seem real but are in reality created in computers.  We can
see how three different filmmakers have each handled the theme in an
action-adventure.  This is a rare opportunity.  The Wachowskis created
in THE MATRIX a future world that was visually imaginative and gave us
a plot that to a very great extent was chases, fighting, and martial
arts.  David Cronenberg's worlds in "eXistenZ" are basically our world,
but ones where the line between the totally inanimate and the
biological is breaking down.  Josef Rusnak has dusted off the 1964
science fiction novel SIMULACRON-3 by Daniel F. Galouye, toned down the
Frederik Pohl aspects (in the novel the world are used to predict
public opinion) and played up the Philip K. Dick aspects.  He has given
us a beautiful sepia-toned view of the 1930s to compare with an
electrically charged view of the present.  Perhaps which you prefer
says something about you.  THE MATRIX will clearly be the most
profitable, but THE THIRTEENTH FLOOR is the one I want in my
collection.  I rate the latter film 8 on the 0 to 10 scale and a high
+2 on the -4 to +4 scale. (Oh, and when we see a newspaper toward the
end, June 21 should be a Friday, not a Monday.)

Title
Review for Pleasantville (1998)
     CAPSULE: Smug and self-congratulatory allegory introduces popular
1990s values to the world of the 1950s TV situation comedy and causes a
revolution.  Two 90s teens fall into the world of a 1950s situation
comedy.  Some major logic flaws.  Rating: 6 (0 to 10), high +1 (-4 to
+4)
   - Well-made (albeit wrongheaded) fantasy about two teenagers who are
     given a magic remote control unit and are pulled into the world of
     "Pleasantville," an amiable television situation comedy.  They
     find themselves actually in Pleasantville with only the memory of
     episodes from the series to guide them.  The world is in black and
     white.  When the teens introduce sex and passion to a passionless
     world, objects and even people start transforming to Technicolor.
     White male power structure wants to stop the revolution of
     feelings.
   - Jeff Daniels as soda jerk who wants to be a painter.  Theme bears
     some relation to his THE PURPLE ROSE OF CAIRO.
   - Our world of the 1990s is seen as being ridden with unemployment,
     global warming, and AIDS.  Pleasantville seems to be a more
     pleasant place to live, but it is quickly found not to be.
   - Computer graphics to partially colorize scenes.  Only those
     objects (especially people) who are fulfilled are in color.  (I
     wonder what Roger Ebert makes of that?)
   - Don Knotts as magical TV repairman.
   - How can passionless people riot and remain passionless?
   - Film cannot decide if it is against 50s values or just 50s values
     as seen on TV.
   - Film pessimistic about AIDS but it is positive on the sexual
     revolution assuming that sex brings fulfillment.
   - There were some serious topic even on FATHER KNOWS BEST.  This is
     not an accurate view of 50s TV.
   - How pleasant to see white males standing in the way of the sexual
     revolution rather than being the ones who are sex-crazed!  But
     that is, of course, so that they are the villains even here.
   - If whole world is Pleasantville, where does pineapple come from?
     Where does the gas station get its gasoline?
   - Visual tribute to TO KILL A MOCKINGBIRD's courtroom scene.
   - First half of the film is considerably better than the second half
     which is full of all sorts of self-satisfied assumptions that
     1990s have things working a lot better than the 1950s.  While
     claiming that no decade has things right, the film provincially
     assumes that the 1990s has things a lot better than the 1950s.

Title
Review for Much Ado About Nothing (1993)

Title
Review for Two Hands (1999)
     Things are starting to go right in Jimmy's world.  Until now Jimmy
(played by Heath Ledger) has been a street hawker for a second rate
Sydney strip club.  But Jimmy has fallen in love with Alex (Rose
Byrne), a woman he has seen outside the club.  And a local gangster
Pando (Bryan Brown) offers a small job as courier to Jimmy.  What Jimmy
does not know is that Pando killed Jimmy's brother.  Now Pando wants to
make things up to Jimmy and offers him a job that could lead to bigger
things if Jimmy does not screw up this first job.  Of course we would
not have much of a story if something did not go wrong.  In a careless
moment Jimmy loses $10,000.  Now Jimmy needs $10,000 to square things
with Pando and a few of his friends want to see Jimmy dead.  Before the
film PULP FICTION was made this all could have been a fairly serious
matter.  But now we expect crime films to have really strange dialog
and really weird interconnected plots with very strange twists and odd
characters.
     Heath Ledger is a good actor and carries his part well.  Bryan
Brown is particularly enjoyable as a vicious hood by profession but
also a caring and loving family man at home.  There are occasional
astonishing touches like the Narrator from Hell.
     This is not a bad little film.  One of the people in a Cairns
audience said it was the best Australian film he had seen in a long
time.  I can believe it.  The real problem is the timing.  TWO HANDS is
just one more creative, violent, semi- comedic crime film made in the
wake of PULP FICTION.  Its pacing and its plotting remind one a lot of
LOCK, STOCK, AND TWO SMOKING BARRELS.  And in the comparison it is
nearly but not quite as good.  My recommendation for Showtime Australia
is put this film in a vault for five years and release it again when it
will again be fresh and a discovery. I rate it a 6 on the 0 to 10 scale
and a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Country (1984)
     Every month cable dredges up a bunch of older films to fill up their
programming schedules.  the quality of these films is spotty at best.  This
month seems to have a better selection of filler films than usual.  These
films running on cable this month all rate a +2 or higher on the -4 to +4
scale, at least in my opinion.
     COUNTRY (1984):  One of three save-the-farm films that came out at the
same time.  This was the only one that was really believable (though PLACES
IN THE HEART was a good story).  The people looked the part and acted the
part.  A strong piece of human drama.  +2.  Cinemax and Showtime.
     FUNERAL IN BERLIN (966):  The producers of the James Bond films tried
to have a second series based on Len Deighton's books about an unnamed agent
(the films called him Harry Palmer).  THE IPCRESS FILE and FUNERAL IN BERLIN
were both good spy stories.  (The series was killed when Ken Russell
horribly mishandled BILLION-DOLLAR BRAIN, the third film.)  On the axis
between action and believability, with Fleming at one end and LeCarre at the
other, these stories sit nicely in the middle.  Michael Caine plays the
laconic anti-establishment agent.  +2.  Cinemax.
     A MAN FOR ALL SEASONS (1966):  This is probably my favorite of all
time.  In the days before videotape, I had it on audiotape and played it
often once or twice a week.  Thomas More is a man of wit and brilliance and,
above all, integrity.  The play itself is full of bitter humor and meaty
ethical argument.  It will not be for all tastes, but it is a fine film.
+4.  Cinemax.
     OBSESSION (1976):  Brian DePalma made this film while Hitchcock was
making his last film, FAMILY PLOT.  Had I not seen the credits of the two
films, I would have guessed that this was the Hitchcock.  It is in the style
of some of Hitchcock's best films and ranks with them.  DePalma, who made
Stephen King a household name with CARRIE, also seems to have discovered
John Lithgow, featuring him in this film and BLOWOUT.  +2.  HBO.
     OUTLAW JOSEY WALES (1976):  Clint Eastwood's best film, though BRONCO
BILLY is not far behind.  Eastwood is just one of several interesting and
three-dimensional characters in a story that is as much about the shape of
the country at the close of the Civil War as it is an action Western.  +3.
Cinemax and Showtime.
     I seem to remember THE SPY WHO CAME IN FROM THE COLD, based on the
novel by John LeCarre, as being pretty good, but I haven't seen it since the
1960s.  It is on Cinemax.

Title
Review for Kundun (1997)
     Seeing KUNDUN is a lot like reading a good article about the Dalai
Lama and Tibet from the National Geographic.  It has great color
photography and it has a lot of facts.  But it is an appeal more to the
intellect than to the emotions.  And even as an appeal to the intellect
not everything that the viewer sees will be understood.  But neither
what we see, nor what we hear in the dialogue fleshes out the
character.  Director Martin Scorsese would almost have us believe that
there is nothing to the Dalai Lama but a bundle of wise Buddhist
aphorisms.  Like a Magic 8-ball, whenever he is shaken a different wise
response comes floating to the surface.
     The story begins in 1933.  The 13th Dalai Lama is dead and in the
Tibetan tradition scouts have been sent out to find a young boy who is
the new incarnation of the Dalai Lama's soul.  A two-year-old child is
found who seems to be the 14th reincarnation of the Buddha of
Compassion.  The young child's parents are already aware that their son
is special due to favorable omens surrounding the child, but we never
find out what they feel when they have confirmed that their child is,
in fact, a Buddha of Compassion.
     The boy is brought to the magnificent palace embedded in the side
of a mountain, one of the most majestic buildings in all the world.
And to the boy's bewilderment he is immersed in Buddhist wisdom.  Soon
he begins to understand what is going on and begins to speak with the
insight we would expect of the Dalai Lama.  Still, there is much in the
film left intentionally enigmatic for the audience.  In one scene we
have a large hissing dancer performs for the Lama and then slides
across the floor up to the Lama.  The scene ends with no more message
to the viewer than that this obviously means something.  The viewer
begins an outsider at the beginning of the film and remains an outsider
right through to the end.  Then, as if there was not already enough in
the film that is hard to follow, Scorsese adds sequences of his own
visual symbolism. Rather than show us a big unexplained piece of
Tibetan culture, Scorsese would have done better to show us a smaller
sample and explain his understanding of it.  We get a better idea of
who the Dalai Lama is as a person from SEVEN YEARS IN TIBET than we do
from this biography of the Lama.
     As the story progresses, Tibet is invaded by China and the Lama
has to face the implications of the Chinese invasion of his country.
He is brought, a virtual prisoner, to China where he meets with a
surprisingly affable Chairman Mao.  The Chinese leader is apparently a
man who can have a simple peasant charm one moment and order the death
of thousands the next.  Mao politely but firmly threatens the Lama to
cooperate with the Chinese rape of his country.  The Lama appeals to
the world for help, but not surprisingly his pleas are to little avail.
It seems Tibet's natural isolation is a double-edged sword: over the
centuries it has been a natural barrier to invaders, but no military
force in the world will pierce that barrier just for the sake of
altruism.  Eventually the Lama must decide if he will serve his country
best from within or outside its borders.  The film lacks the scope of
history and the human values that the similar GANDHI had.  Gandhi was
made much more a three-dimensional character than the Lama.
     Scorsese tells the story of the Lama with a cast of unknowns, most
of whom are Tibetan amateurs.  They all stand in the right places say
their lines, but there is no passion in the performances.  The
Tibetans' seem as cold and distant as their land.  Melissa Mathison's
screenplay conveys none of the emotion of her writing screenplays for
THE BLACK STALLION and for E.T., THE EXTRA-TERRESTRIAL.  Roger Deakins
to create a believable Tibet in hues of reds, yellows, and browns.
(The real Tibet being inaccessible, he shot instead in Morocco, British
Columbia, and Idaho.)  Philip Glass provides a score hypnotic in its
repetitious minimalism.  It seems well-suited to the splendor of Tibet
but is perhaps not a rousing as the film needed.
     KUNDUN is like a very sincere tribute to a great man that just
would not come out the way it was intended. The Dalai Lama may well be
a great man, but KUNDUN is not a great film biography.  I rate it a 6
on the 0 to 10 scale and a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Silence of the Lambs, The (1991)
     Since 1959 the psychopathic killer has, perhaps unfortunately, become a
staple of popular film.  Most films that had psychopaths before that point
really blurred the distinction between your garden variety murderer and the
actual psychopath.  Perhaps one notable exception was THE BAD SEED, which
suggested that there could be something like a "congenital evil."  Extreme
criminality and madness were very much equated.  That was very much what was
meant with "mad scientists" of the old horror films.  There was an urge to
deny the existence of evil or to relegate it to the supernatural.  How many
people even today deny the culpability of Adolf Hitler and say instead that
he was simply mad.  There were some films that suggested that there was
something more to criminal insanity than just extreme criminality, but it
was Alfred Hitchcock's PSYCHO that turned the cinematic view around.  Norman
Bates was himself a victim as well as the perpetrator of his acts.  Bates
was a normal person twisted by his past and driven by forces he could not
control.  This is a marvelously egalitarian view of the criminally insane.
It assumes that all men (and women) are created equal.  This is probably an
equally invalid view of the criminally insane.  When John Hurt played
Caligula in I, CLAUDIUS, he described his character as "congenitally
bonkers."  In all probability that was fairly accurate.  It is at least my
belief that Caligula was genuinely insane and Hitler was not.  This view of
the pitiful victim-psychopath became the dominant view in films with PSYCHO
and it has remained dominant.  With John Carpenter's HALLOWEEN (1978) there
was a new view, or perhaps an old view harkening back to medieval beliefs,
that the psychopathic killer is a supernatural force.  Fortunately, few
films have picked up on this idea and most that have have large Roman
numerals in their titles.
     Thomas Harris has a different concept of the psychopathic killer which,
if no more credible than the supernatural force, s at least more intriguing.
He created the idea in his novel RED DRAGON, which Michael Mann adapted into
his 1986 film MANHUNTER.  The idea was expanded in his SILENCE OF THE LAMBS,
which has been adapted into a film by Jonathan Demme.  Harris's concept is
that psychopaths have a distinctly different form of intelligence.  Their
reasoning power is consistent and logical, but alien to our own.  If you
cannot bridge the gap and think like a psychopath, you are at a distinct
disadvantage in dealing with them.  In addition, the psychopath often has
superhuman sensory powers.  For example, Harris's Hannibal Lecter, in
addition to a super-intellect, apparently has a heightened sense of smell.
I believe these are ideas that owe their origin more to Poe's "Tell-Tale
Heart" than to actual case histories.  But where Harris is really superb is
in being able to make Lecter's reasoning really seem brilliant.  It is
extremely difficult to write a character who is supposed to be brilliant.
To see how poorly it can be done, try going back and listening to Lex
Luthor's reasoning about Kryptonite in SUPERMAN (1978).  Lecter's reasoning
is at once perverted and brilliant.
     MANHUNTER and THE SILENCE OF THE LAMBS are two of what have to be at
least four stories involving Hannibal Lecter.  And they are probably the two
least interesting.  When RED DRAGON begins, Lecter has already been captured
by Will Graham, who made himself into a psychopath in order to catch Lecter
in the first place.  Graham needs Lecter's help to capture another
psychopath.  In THE SILENCE OF THE LAMBS, fledging FBI agent Clarice
Starling (no pun intended) (played by Jodie Foster) similarly must enlist
Lecter's (Anthony Hopkins's) help to find a killer.  This time, however,
Lecter thinks he can work his own deal.  While this story does conclude,
there is still a major loose end that really demands yet another story.
     In this story the primary villain is a killer whom the press has dubbed
Buffalo Bill.  The killer not only murders his victims, he later skins them.
Starling is chosen to talk to Dr.~Lecter about the crimes with an eye toward
getting his unique insight into how to capture Buffalo Bill.  Starling,
however, has her own personal demons inside and Lecter is just the person to
turn those demons against her.  In the book the main story is how Starling
catches the killer, with the Lecter story being a major subplot.  The film
reverses the importance of the two plots by leaving the Lecter plot intact,
if not actually expanded, and cutting drastically the Buffalo Bill plot.
     The character of Lecter seems calculated to play off every anti-
intellectual prejudice in the audience.  The man is an ice-cold, emotionless
intellect.  He listens to ice-cold, emotionless music.  Even when he kills
we are told that he is ice-cold and emotionless.  In one chilling detail the
character is defined.  We are told that he attacked and partially ate a
victim without his pulse ever going over 80.
     Stylistically the film is well handled generally.  At times the music
is a bit overly dramatic in underscoring the mood as if Howard Shore, the
composer, did not trust Hopkins's acting to convey a mood of menace.  If
that was the case, the composer was misguided, since Harris's villain will
probably be as memorable as Norman Bates and Michael Meyers.  The
photography uses a filter to subdue the colors.  If that was not downbeat
enough, Starling is really the only sympathetic character in the whole
story.  She seems to go from one man to the next who tries to bed her.
     For the sake of completeness at least two nits should be mentioned.
Starling is first seen climbing a steep hill in the rigorous FBI training
school.  When we see her in close-up, she is wearing earrings.  For her own
safety, at least, you would think they would insist on no jewelry.  Also,
certain scenes are supposedly seen through an infra-red snooperscope and at
least one time the subject is in total darkness.  As seen through the scope,
even items that do not emit heat are easily seen.  In the total darkness
scene the subject can not only be seen, but also to be seen is the subject's
sharp shadow on the wall.
     THE SILENCE OF THE LAMBS is as unpleasant and hypnotic as watching a
cobra.  This is one heavy thriller.  I give it a high +2 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Map of the Human Heart (1992)
          Capsule review:  This could have been a story about
     racism, it could have been a film with historical scope, it
     could have been a film about courage in wartime or an anti-
     war movie, it might have been about an engaging love triangle
     story, it might have been a study of contrasting cultures,
     but in trying to be all those things this murky film is not
     enough of any of them.  (Warning: this review tells more plot
     than I usually do as the film is otherwise difficult to
     describe.  For most readers I don't believe I will be
     damaging the enjoyment of the film.)  Rating: 0 (-4 to +4).
     With THE NAVIGATOR, New Zealand director Vincent Ward showed he had an
unusual photographic style, some interesting ideas, and an occasional
mystical impulse.  They all worked fairly well in that small film.  MAP OF
THE HUMAN HEART is a big film, but Louis Nowra's screenplay from Ward's own
story assumes it is bigger than it actually is and that Ward's direction can
deliver more than it actually can.
     Avik (played by Robert Joamie as a child and Jason Scott Lee as an
adult) is an Inuit--or as he says, an Eskimo--who meets a cartographer and
tells him his life story.  As a boy in 1931, his life was changed when
another cartographer, Walter Russell (played by Patrick Bergin) came to his
people's land to survey for maps.  Russell is impressed with the boy's
curiosity and deeply affected when he discovers that the boy has
tuberculosis.  Russell arranges to take to take the boy to a Montreal
Catholic hospital and school, flying the boy in the open biplane the
cartographer came in.  One taste of flying and the young Inuit is hooked for
life.
     At the hospital Avik is traumatized by all the scientific equipment.
He is mistreated by the nuns, who are portrayed as extremely bigoted against
Protestants and "half-breeds."  Avik forms a close relationship with
Albertine (played by Annie Galipeau as a child and Anne Parillaud as an
adult).  He is half white, half Inuit; she is half white, half Indian.  They
are torn apart by the nuns.  In 1941 events draw Avik into the RAF and he,
Russell, and Albertine will cross paths again.
     This is a film with at least two or three very memorable scenes--one
over the Albert Hall, one involving a barrage balloon, and a horrifying
sequence set in Germany--but it still leaves loose ends and is unsatisfying.
Patrick Bergin's last scene comes totally out of left field and seems to
belong more to a surrealistic satire.  The scenes of air warfare are of a
unique style that perhaps gives them the feel of real Army-Air Force World
War II documentaries: the scenes are murky and more than once scenes seemed
out of focus.
     This was a film I was anxious to see and tried very hard to enjoy, but
I have to say that it really did not work for me.  This British-Australian-
French-Canadian-Japanese co-production is a hodge-podge of too little of too
much.  I give it a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Torch Song Trilogy (1988)
          Capsule review:  Disappointing window into the gay sex
     life shows a lot of the same elements as a straight sex life.
     A film with interesting and even poignant moments but overall
     neither interesting nor poignant.  Rating: low +1.
     Let me be clear at the outset where I am coming from on TORCH SONG
TRILOGY.  I don't condemn the "I-Love-you, you-left-me, I-hate-you, I-miss-
you, you-want-to-come-back, I-don't-want-you-back" sort of film, but it
doesn't do much for me either.  Perhaps it is because there has not been a
lot of sexual turmoil in my life, but any such machinations more complex
than those in CASABLANCA will almost never strike any kind of responsive
chord in me.  I will generally find these films pretty fatuous and dull.
Even Woody Allen failed to pull me into MANHATTAN and TORCH SONG TRILOGY's
Harvey Fierstein is no Woody Allen.
     Originally this story was three hour-long one-act plays by Fierstein:
"The International Stud," "Fugue in a Nursery," and "Widows and Children
First."  In 1982 the three semi-autobiographical plays were performed back-
to-back as a single play, TORCH SONG TRILOGY.  Fierstein himself starred,
which must have made him awfully difficult to direct.  How do you tell
someone acting out scenes from his own life that he isn't doing it right?
In any case, the story covers about ten years in the life of a gay man who
is a female impersonator and later a playwright.  It is mostly about how he
comes to terms with the men in his life and his mother.  Once again
Fierstein is played by Fierstein, the lovers are played by Brian Kerwin and
Matthew Broderick, and the mother is played by Anne Bancroft.
     While the play was considered an insightful and honest view into gay
sex life, much of what we see in the film could apply to any sort of
relationship that society frowns on: inter-racial, inter-class, ever inter-
faith.  We are constantly aware that the characters are gay but we do not
really see much of how losing a lover of the same sex is different from
losing one of the opposite sex that your parents didn't like.  There is the
added complication that you could conceivably lose one lover to another--
which I suppose could not happen in a set of purely straight relationships-
-but most of the situations set up are gay people in standard situations.
Whenever you put four people in a house of whom three pairs have been lovers
you expect problems, for example.
     There are definite problems with some of the writing.  One has the
feeling that Fierstein is washing his family's dirty linen in public.  It is
as if we are paying to be an audience for Fierstein giving his mother what-
for.  And some of his speeches are just a little too well-formed to be off-
the-cuff.  It is as if he is turning his "what-I-should-have-saids" into
"I-saids."  Also, the passage of time seems to be inadequately handled.  The
characters talk about how they age, but they do not appear to.  Given that
this is not really a type of film I think I can fairly judge, I would rate
TORCH SONG TRILOGY a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Dave (1993)
     The basic concept of the plot is an old and familiar one.  A commoner
looks just like a famous person and suddenly finds he must replace that
person.  Coming up with examples is almost a trivia game itself: THE PRINCE
AND THE PAUPER, THE PRISONER OF ZENDA, Robert Heinlein's DOUBLE STAR,
KAGEMUSHA, MOON OVER PARADOR.  If you want to press the point, there's also
RETURN OF MARTIN GUERRE and SOMMERSBY.  The underrated science fiction film
QUEST FOR LOVE treats some of the problems of standing in as realistically
as many films more grounded in reality.  Many of the recent body-switch
films also treat the subject.  Of course, to make one of these stories
believable the writer has to come up with some contrivance as to why the
shape of the ear does not give the imposter away.  As Sherlock Holmes
correctly points out, the shape of an ear is as unique as a fingerprint.
Certainly somebody photographed as often as the President of the United
States is could not long be replaced by an imposter.  However, that is the
premise of DAVE.
     Dave Kovic (played by Kevin Kline) is an exact look-alike for President
Bill Mitchell (played by guess who?).  Dave runs a small temporary
employment office and occasionally picks up dollars impersonating the
President doing things like riding a pig at places like local car
dealerships.  Then one day the Secret Service shows up in Dave's living room
asking Dave to impersonate the President at a social function.  (Even this
seems very implausible in a world where one wrong comment can ruin a
politician's career.) The President is needed elsewhere.  The elsewhere is
an illicit tryst with one of his aides, and unfortunately the President
suffers a massive stroke.  At the urging of two aides (played by Frank
Langella and Kevin Dunn), Dave agrees to continue his role as the President.
     Dave quickly finds out that President Mitchell was nobody to admire.  A
small group of people are running the Presidency for power and greed.
Finding that the First Lady (played by Sigourney Weaver) detests the
President, Kovic decides to change policies.
     Perhaps the biggest surprise of DAVE is the performance of Frank
Langella.  Getting past the age when he can play dashing roles such as Zorro
and Dracula, he is turning to acting.  In a bleached crewcut he quietly
steals scenes from Kline and Weaver.  He has learned  the difference between
acting hammy and having an expressive face.  Like Frederic March before him,
he has made the transition from depending on his good looks to having an
expressive face that is a study in itself.  It seems even director Ivan
Reitman underrates the power of Langella's acting.  In one notable scene
Reitman has the camera focused on Kline in the foreground.  He then sets the
focus deeper to pick up a reaction from Langella in the background, then
again focuses on Kline to give him the viewer's attention.  But once the
viewer's eye is on Langella it stays on Langella through the scene, even
though he is now out of focus.  Reitman has underrated the interest and
magnetism of Langella's expression.  Kline plays his usual amiable self.
Weaver does what she can with a role that gives her very little to do until
late in the film.
     DAVE is a light, pleasant film in the style of Frank Capra that may be
a bit politically simplistic.  The view that there is corruption in high
places is undoubtedly true, but the view that a simple non-politician using
intuition could do better than an elected President is questionable.  There
is some hypocrisy in this populist pseudo-President who wants programs that
will increase Federal spending but who at the same time cheats on his own
taxes--a rather wry touch in Gary Ross's script.
     Still, it is fun to see over two dozen celebrities and commentators on
government affairs commenting on this new President.  The most enjoyable
cameo features Oliver Stone.  And one more nice touch: Kline's rendition of
the song "Tomorrow" from "Annie" is the first time I could ever make out all
the words.
     While not startingly original, DAVE is fun and well-made.  I give it a
high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Hamlet (1996)
     Kenneth Branagh has now directed his third Shakespeare film.  His
HENRY V surprised all by being a vivid and powerful adaptation that
transcended the frequent language barrier that some feel seeing
Shakespeare's plays.  Branagh managed this by putting more modern
intonation into the words and by just plain good acting.  His MUCH ADO
ABOUT NOTHING proved to be a joyful romp that was even more
approachable than HENRY V.  It demonstrated that Shakespeare comedies
could really be made as enjoyable and even as funny as most modern
comedies being produced.  For his third Shakespeare adaptation Branagh
decided to make his most ambitious film to date, an unabridged HAMLET.
Until now his Shakespeare films have been abridged to fit the standard
screentime of two hours or less.  And while HENRY V had the exciting
Battle of Agincourt and MUCH ADO ABOUT NOTHING was a light and frothy
comedy, HAMLET is much more weighty and cerebral.  The producers asked
would audiences accept sitting through a four-hour film adaptation of a
tragedy?  Well, they would not have to.  Two versions would be
released: a limited full-length version for the few who would be
willing sit through the whole thing and a faster-moving version edited
down to two and a half hours.  What happened must have startled the
film distributors and undermined the old truism that nobody every went
broke underestimating the intelligence of the public.  What was
discovered was there was almost no market for the peppier abridged
version.  Had the shorter version been the only film made the public
would likely have flocked to it, but just about anybody erudite enough
to want to see the short version actually preferred to see the full
play performed.  After nearly a century of cutting down Shakespeare
plays to make versions the public would want to see--Shakespeare films
go back as least as far as the 1899 KING JOHN--it turned out that the
public really did not want their Shakespeare cut down for them.  This
discovery may affect many Shakespeare film productions to come.  So
even before its release HAMLET had broken new ground.
     Unfortunately, that new ground is among the precious little
innovation this new version of HAMLET gives us.  Not that it is not an
estimable film, but unfortunately it is not so much ingenious as just
highly competent.  Branagh has assembled a terrific cast, particularly
considering the cameo roles, and created a lavish and beautiful
production that is at the same time just a bit dull and safe.  This is
a surprisingly unsurprising adaptation particularly since it is coming
from the innovative Kenneth Branagh.  The only major creative touch--
beyond telling the whole story--is to move the setting to the late 19th
Century.  A year earlier when Ian McKellan moved RICHARD III to Britain
in the 1930s, he chose a time which many of us could actually picture
and for which we had rich associations.  He chose a time when similar
events could have almost taken place in Britain and were actually
taking place in Germany.  But Branagh's change of setting is
comparatively pointless.  The public has few associations with his
chosen setting beyond perhaps the plays of Strindberg and Ibsen in
other parts of Scandinavia.  Branagh's recreation of this time and
place is a time impressive and perhaps a bit exaggerated and overdone.
A major setting is a huge mirrored palace ballroom equipped to drop a
blizzard of white confetti to celebrate the first, rather prosaic,
pronouncements of the new king.  This may be spectacle, but it is
unnecessary and overdone.  The film, set in the harsh Danish winter, is
being distributed at the height of a particularly harsh American winter
when the viewer may well ask himself, "Isn't there enough ice and cold
in the world without having to pay to see it on the screen?"  For
visual effect Branagh has moved the story to the Danish winter in spite
of the play having Ophelia find fresh flowers and unfrozen water late
in the story.  Also the setting calls for an unstrung Ophelia to be
committed to an oppressive asylum, but without comment from any of the
characters she seems to be able to escape it not unlike DRACULA's
Renfield.  Is this what Shakespeare intended?  But then, frequently the
visuals contradict the play.  A character who supposedly has found "a
muddy death" is found floating in clear water.  A scene in which the
ghost is said to turn in a start shows no such action from the ghost.
     Branagh's great talent for use of modern inflection to make
Shakespeare understandable is somehow missing here from his
performance.  This is never more clear than in an exchange with that
great Shakespearean, Billy Crystal, playing the gravedigger.  It is
surprising how much easier it is to follow Crystal's end of the
conversation.  Crystal seems a little out place, but less so than
Michael Keaton was in MUCH ADO ABOUT NOTHING, and his diction is
plainer and easier to understand than Branagh's by far.  At times
Branagh races through his speeches as if his goal is to get to the
other side.  While we are on the subject of famous comedians in smaller
roles, Robin Williams who discusses Shakespearean acting in DEAD POETS
SOCIETY gets a chance to do some as Osiric.  For once he is reasonably
restrained and while his fans may be disappointed he really should not
be the focus in his scenes and he shows commendable control.  Derek
Jacobi plays the new king with quiet dignity and few strong emotions
though why the queen should prefer him to his brother Old Hamlet (Brian
Blessed) is never convincingly clarified.  Julie Christie begins with
the same quiet dignity, but of course her role improves as the story
progresses and as an actress she takes full advantage.  Other small
roles go to the likes of Charleton Heston, Jack Lemmon, and Gerard
Depardieu to no strong effect.
     Branagh has a taste for the visually over-dramatic particularly on
scenes that feature him.  He holds the intermission until the end of
Act 4, Scene 4, very late in the play, so that he can bring the break
with what comes the closest to the usually-vacillating Hamlet giving
something approaching a stirring speech.  Trying to recapture some of
the fire of Henry V doing the St. Crispin's Day speech, he has Hamlet
giving the soliloquy on a field of ice and stone to a camera tracking
back and back from him.  Hot dang, that's dramatic!  Later he self-
indulgently has himself carried from the floor of the palace in a
Christ-like pose.  Once again Patrick Doyle provides the music, though
rarely with the effect of the pre-intermission sequence.  His music is
used to a much lesser degree than in MUCH ADO ABOUT NOTHING, perhaps
because of the more thoughtful nature of the themes.  Sadly the score
is not particularly original or exciting and like Branagh his newer
efforts are strongly reminiscent of his earlier work.
     By its very completeness, Kenneth Branagh's HAMLET will probably
be the definitive version for our generation and beyond.  It stands
head and shoulders above the 1990 Franco Zefferelli version that
starred Mel Gibson.  It probably even outshines the Laurence Olivier
version.  But this was Branagh's opportunity to make what is probably
the most celebrated play of the most celebrated playwright.  As such it
is something of a disappointment and is certainly the least artful and
most overdone of the three Branagh- directed Shakespeare films.  It is
a flawed adaptation, but still probably the best cinematic theatrical
release of Shakespeare's HAMLET.  I rate it a low +2  on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Sea of Love (1989)
          Capsule review:  Steamy love story crossed with a tepid
     police procedural mystery.  The plot may have been intended
     to be clever but fails somehow to have anything very
     unexpected.  There are problems in continuity, casting, and
     plotting.  Rating: low +1.
     There is a serial killer in New York City.  Somebody seems to be
answering all the rhyming ads men put in the personals columns and killing
the men placing the ads.  Twenty-year veteran police detective Frank Keller
(played by Al Pacino) teams up with Sherman (played by John Goodman).  Frank
and Sherman decide that the fastest way to catch the killer is to place
their own personals ad and plan rendezvous with the thirty or so women who
respond to the ad.  By getting the fingerprints of each, they hope to get a
match with the fingerprints found at the scenes of the murders.  One woman
who responds is the tall, slim, and sensuous Helen (played by Ellen Barkin).
Frank fails to get Helen's fingerprints, but runs into her again and they
become lovers.  Now here is one failing of the plot.  Frank is ambivalent on
finding out if Helen is connected with the murders, but on those days he is
curious he is willing to steal her Social Security card but not to take her
fingerprints.  Frank is expert enough to recognize if two prints match, but
he never bothers to compare.
     Pacino's character is one heck of a policeman.  He is an alcoholic, he
has a chip on his shoulder, and he is a slob.  Even worse, he garbles his
lines so they are almost incomprehensible.  Barkin makes all the right moves
to play a really sexy woman, but somehow she never makes it all the way to
actually being sexy.  Still, her love scenes are sufficiently steamy to keep
the audience staring closely at the screen.  Rounding out the cast is the
now familiar John Goodman.  Goodman has a big St.  Bernardish look but is
likable as the wise-cracking partner.  Also on hand is William Hickey
playing Pacino's father.  Hickey looks and talks like Pacino much more than
some other actors who could have been cast in the role such as Jay
Silverheels or Toshiro Mifune.
     While this film has been likened by some to BODY HEAT, the story is
really just an okay police procedural about the catching of a killer.  While
the dialogue is often quite funny, particularly in the byplay of the two
partners, the script is overall just mediocre.  The plot is just not very
clever or intricate, and needs a few more twists to keep up audience
interest.  I rate this one a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Mickey Blue Eyes (1999)
     Michael Felgate (played by Hugh Grant) is Manhattan art auctioneer
with a mild, non-assertive personality.  He lets the truckers he deals
with walk all over him.  He wants to marry Gina (Jean Tripplehorn) and
she seems to love him, but she is strangely reticent to marry for
reasons she will not say.  When Michael goes to her father's bar and
restaurant he finds out part of the reason why. Her father (James Caan)
and her uncles make up a dangerous crime family.  Gina is sure that if
Michael marries into the family he will be pulled into the criminal
activity.  Mike is just as certain that there is no reason that he
would do that.  But almost immediately he is asked as a favor to use
his auction house to auction off a garish painting created by one of
the crime family members.  This starts an escalating chain of reluctant
favors and counter-favors and a chain of events that pull Mike into the
whirlpool associating him closer and closer to organized crime.
     The problem with this film is that it seems to have been written
by formula.  It started with a skeleton of a cliched plot and then
apparently the writers started hanging jokes on it like ornaments on a
Christmas tree.  The jokes all have little to do with each other.  The
most that they have in common is that they use of screen time.  One can
almost see the writers sitting there saying, "Okay, now we have a 45-
minute story.  Let's throw in a comic FBI agent.  Now we are up to 50
minutes...."  Even then the central plot builds to a very predictable
ending.  Anyone surprised by the surprise ending is probably new to
1990s cinema.
     Hugh Grant was charming early in his career with his boyish smile
and youthful charm.  But he seems incapable of stretching himself as an
actor or leaving his comfort zone.  In this film we care for his
character about to the extent that we want to cuddle and protect a
small child.  Listening to him try to talk like a gangster is like
watching a child trying to sound like an adult in a school play.  It is
cute but it is not really entertaining and shows very little
accomplishment.  Here we are not pulled into the plot or the irony of
the situation and the jokes are not particularly perceptive.  And worst
of all they are rarely funny.  The views we have of crime figures are
largely cliched.  That is part of the joke, that they are instantly
recognizable as crime figures. That worked in THE FRESHMAN, but that
film had a much better story behind it. James Caan provides the only
interesting role interpretation and even he can not make things click.

Title
Review for True Crime (1999)
     Steve "Ev" Everett (Clint Eastwood) is a bad-boy reporter who
refuses to follow any rules.  Right now he is holding back on his
drinking, but he is smoking and, oh yes, sleeping with his editor's
wife.  This does not make for good relationships around the office, but
Ev carries on (in several different senses).  When a fellow reporter is
killed in a (gratuitously spectacular) car accident, Ev picks up her
responsibilities including the interviewing and writing a human
interest sidebar about Frank Beachum (Isaiah Washington), a Death Row
inmate scheduled to be executed the next night at midnight.  But in
reviewing the trial from six years earlier Ev starts questioning
whether the story makes sense.  There appear to be problems in the
trial testimony.  But Ev now mistrusts his own once powerful talent to
"smell out" when there is something suspicious with a story.  And as he
traces the story he sabotages his own effectiveness by not following
anybody's rules but his own.
     Eastwood creates more believable characters for the minor roles
than the character he creates for himself.  But then going back to THE
OUTLAW JOSEY WALES he has frequently done the same thing.  Bernard Hill
plays the role of Luther Plunkett, the prison warden.  It would be
cliche to play him as officious and unfeeling.  Instead he turns out to
be a genuinely caring person.  On the other hand Isaiah Washington has
been getting some favorable press as the condemned Frank Beachum.  We
see a lot of him, but he plays the simon-pure innocent to the hilt.
Where an actor should have personality he has only virtue.  Though his
character was not always so, we see him he is the perfect husband and
father. The film intentionally contrasts his ultra-perfect family
values with those of Everett which have ripped apart Everett's family.
We feel for Beachum, but other than in his moments of greatest pain it
is more for his predicament than for his character.  His family is just
a little too wholesome.  James Woods plays Eastwood's boss at the
newspaper in a role only a little less slimy than his usual.  Woods is
one of the few actors who can steal attention away from Eastwood.
Other familiar actors include Anthony Zerbe and an almost
unrecognizable William Windom as a bartender.
     Clint Eastwood is really a very good director in a very controlled
film. However he has the same Achilles Heel that Woody Allen has.  He
has to paint himself as being the great lover.  His character seems to
be able to seduce any woman he wants.  The problem is that he is
getting on in years.  His youthful good looks have given way to an
older chiseled look.  Eastwood seems to be doing his locker room
bragging on the wide screen.  His even raspier voice is now a sort that
lost actors careers when sound came to films.  Perhaps Eastwood, the
gifted director, should consider if he needs a better star than
Eastwood, the actor.  On the other hand playing the character himself
thematically gives the film one big advantage.  Eastwood almost
invariably plays the outlaw.  He is Kurosawa's samurai Sanjuro, a law
unto himself, transplanted to America.  But in his younger spaghetti
Western and Dirty Harry days he has played that character as hero.  As
he has aged Eastwood has begun to look at that character more deeply
than Kurasawa ever did.  In UNFORGIVEN he began re-examining the hard
man who was this character he had created on the screen.  He began
questioning on film if the violence that was the former screen
persona's daily bread did not exact a toll.  Was the man with the big
gun not dehumanized and desensitized by carrying and using that weapon.
In TRUE CRIME Eastwood shows us how that character gets to middle age
and can no longer make his personal relationships work.  In this film
he clearly envies the man who, though once a criminal, has reformed and
built a strong family, even if that relationship turns out to be only
temporarily.
     Just as an aside, an interesting visual allusion is used.  When Ev
is interviewing Beachum, Eastwood has himself shot through the bars
recreating the poster from his ESCAPE FROM ALCATRAZ.  It is a reminder
of the days when Eastwood was building his reputation and his films
were just solid entertainment.  TRUE CRIME is certainly a good film,
but lacks the fun of his earlier work.  Still I would give it a 7 on
the 0 to 10 scale and a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Who Framed Roger Rabbit (1988)
          Capsule review:  In a world where Mickey Mouse and Bugs
     Bunny really could come knocking at your door, nearly
     anything can happen.  WHO FRAMED ROGER RABBIT is a rather
     dull mystery plot set on a really great background where
     cartoon characters rub shoulders with living humans.
     Technical credits and inspiration of having the favorite
     cartoon characters of the 1940s come together in one film
     make the plot inadequacies seem unimportant.  Rating: +2.
     Back in the three or four years after the Second World War, two
different sorts of films were reaching their heyday.  One was the hard-
boiled detective film, which made a tentative start before the war with a
few films like THE MALTESE FALCON, had dried up a little during the war
years, then really hit its stride with films like MURDER, MY SWEET; THE BIG
SLEEP; and LADY IN THE LAKE.  At the same time, Chuck Jones' cartoon
characters began taking on the shapes and styles familiar to modern viewers.
But no two styles of film could be much further apart than the film noir
detective story and the cartoon form.  At least that was the case until Gary
Wolf wrote the mystery novel WHO CENSORED ROGER RABBIT?  Wolf set his story
in those post-war years but took out the blacks that Raymond Chandler's
detective called "shines" and replaced them with "toons," the characters of
cartoons.  In this world cartoons are just live-action films in which all
the actors are toons.  Adjoining Los Angeles is the ghetto where all the
toon actors live, a place called Toontwon.  Against this background the film
WHO FRAMED ROGER RABBIT takes place.
     And the background is what is important in this film.  In the
foreground is a sort of prosaic mystery story in which tough-guy (humor)
detective Eddie Valiant (valiantly played by Bob Hoskins) is looking for the
real killer in a murder case in which the police strongly suspect famous
cartoon star Roger Rabbit.  Valiant (at least initially) thinks Roger is
innocent, but he is not so sure about Roger's buxom wife Jessica Rabbit.
(Don't let the name fool you; she is a very human-looking toon.)  The
mystery story is not a very good one and its resolution is disappointingly
bad, but it is unlikely that that will disappoint much of the audience.
What may resonate a little is the statement against bigotry against toons or
humans.  The technical effect of mixing live action and cartoon will
definitely dazzle most audiences.  The integration of live action and
cartoon, reputed to be flawless, is at least technically very, very good.
Just occasionally we find Bob Hoskins looking a little too high as he talks
to Roger.  The animators had, after the fact, placed the top of Roger's head
rather than Roger's eyes in Hoskins' line of vision.  But that quibble
aside, this film goes many orders of magnitude beyond any previous such
mixing.  The cartoon characters in the real world have a three-dimensional
quality, resulting from careful use of shadow--no explanation why they do
not have shadowing when they appear in cartoons.
     Among the interesting touches are the attempts to make toons work
consistently in the real world.  Clearly the laws of physics do not work the
same in cartoons as they do in the real world, but when you start separating
cartoon characters from cartoon settings you have to decide which side gets
the ability to break with physical law.  As it turns out--logically or not-
-both sides get it to some extent.  Roger tends to rocket around a real
world room when he drinks a glass of whiskey.  But a human in Toontown also
gets some special cartoon protection like being able to survive falls.
Apparently toons have magic both in themselves and in their setting.
     WHO FRAMED ROGER RABBIT is a cooperation between the two traditional
competitors, Steven Spielberg's Amblin Entertainment and Walt Disney
Enterprises, who decided late in the production that this film would be a
Touchstone film and not a Walt Disney film.  Perhaps they wanted it released
through their adult division because of some violence, though their
professed reason was that Jessica Rabbit was a little too well-endowed and a
little under-dressed for a child audience.  That cooperation and either the
money it brought or the inspiration of the project bred more cooperation.
As Disney was one of the production companies, getting permission to use
Disney cartoon characters was probably no problem, but somehow they managed
to get Warner Brothers' characters, complete with Mel Blanc's voice, so you
could have Daffy Duck on screen with Donald Duck and making wisecracks about
Donald's speech impediment.  (Donald may have been wisecracking back but
with Donald, who can tell?)  Woody Woodpecker and hosts of other cartoon
characters are also on hand.  For humans, the cast is no so star-studded but
Christopher Lloyd is on hand with another weird  character for director
Robert Zemeckis (BACK TO THE FUTURE).  Then there are Kathleen Turner and
Amy Irving who do the voice for Jessica: Turner does the speaking; Irving
does the singing.
     WHO FRAMED ROGER RABBIT is a great film for lots of reasons, many of
which have little to do with the actual plot.  Rate it a +2 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Mulan (1998)
     The first thing I ask of a Disney film is whether the storyteller
took large liberties with the original source. Unfortunately, though I
have several books on Chinese history and folklore, Hua Mulan (or Fa
Mulan, as she is called in this film) lies somewhere in the gray area
between the two, a real person of whom much is told but little is
remembered.  There were some patchy references to Mulan on the
Internet, the best of which were under http://www.chinapage.com.  That
reference indicated that there are is only a little in common among the
tales of Mulan, and for the most part this animated story is fairly
accurate to what is common in those tales.  The one variance is that
the original Mulan stories had her fighting for years and then retiring
before her ruse was revealed.  The Emperor offers her a position at
court, but she refuses it and takes instead a horse as her reward.
This is somewhat different from the Disney version, but then it is hard
to compress an entire military career to an 88-minute movie.  Since
there are no specific stories of her service, the scriptwriters are
probably justified in presenting the time as being just a few months.
For once Disney Studios animated films are reasonably accurate to the
source material.  Perhaps this is some penance for their travesty on
Victor Hugo's HUNCHBACK OF NOTRE DAME.
     Fa Mulan is the daughter of a former soldier, once a strong
soldier but now old and infirm.  The high- spirited young woman is
being forced into the traditional role of young Chinese women her age.
She has to try to make herself look pretty and submissive enough to be
matched with a man who will prize a submissive and pretty women.  But
she knows that is not her.  She asks her mirror, "When will my
reflection show who I am inside?"  But the time is approaching.  The
Huns have attacked the Emperor's lands and her father is called into
service in the Emperor's army.  Mulan's father is old and sickly, but
the law says that each family must provide a soldier.  (In the legend
Mulan has brother, but he is too young to fight.)  To the mind of the
army that means that Mulan's father must return to military service.
But Mulan knows her father is too weak to serve, and she has other
ideas.  She disguises herself as a man and joins the army herself.
Mulan's ancestors wish to send a powerful dragon spirit to guard her
and give her wisdom, but through a trick they instead send Mushu, a
comical little dragon who needs protecting himself.  Well, you probably
know the rest of the story.  This is a standard telling complete with
the nudity jokes that might seem out of place for a Disney Studios
animated film.
     The artwork is generally extremely good in MULAN, though for
stylistic reasons most of the characters look two-dimensional, and
perhaps a little less realistic than characters drawn in the past.  On
the other hand, there are spectacular aerial views that look more like
live-action film than animation.  Other scenes show good imagination in
recreating classical China from village life to the Emperor's palace
suggesting the Forbidden City, but exaggerated from what that palace
was to what it might have been in stories.  In a film about Chinese
fighting in hand-to-hand combat, the film could have easily degenerated
into excessive and ultimately boring animations of martial arts
techniques.  Happily, the Disney animators resisted that temptation, if
indeed they had it.  And once again each major character is created by
a different team who does art work.  That is the right approach.
Familiar actors voice many of the characters, and I strongly recommend
that the audience stay for the credits.  But I would like to call
specific attention to the speaking voice of Mulan's grandmother done by
the wonderful June Foray.  Foray was the voice of Rocket J. Squirrel
and virtually all of the female characters on ROCKY AND BULLWINKLE.
     But the film is far from perfect.  The antics of Eddie Murphy as
Mushu--who presumably takes his name from a popular Chinese dish--are
sure to be a pleaser, but only for those in the audience for whom any
comedy is better than no comedy.  But it is a sad misstep for others.
One can only feel sorry for the stylists who worked so hard trying to
create an atmosphere evocative of China of the ancient past only to
have that effort sabotaged for the sake of a joke.  The inclusion of
Murphy's Mushu was obviously inspired by the Robin Williams schtick in
ALADDIN, which was equally out of place.  The Chinese history is a
little amiss also.  If this were, as is claimed, the Emperor who had
the Great Wall built, that would make him the Emperor Qin Shi Huangdi.
But he ruled from 221 B.C. to 206 B.C., well before the time of the
Huns, and was anything but the benevolent despot we see in the film.
But except for the inclusion of the painfully inappropriate Eddie
Murphy this is a respectful and respectable version of Mulan's story.
     In the end, MULAN is a sort of YENTL with warfare.  Even at its
silliest it is fun, and at times the images on the screen are the most
impressive of any Disney animated film to date.  Probably the best two
Disney animated films in recent years, or any years, are BEAUTY AND THE
BEAST and MULAN.  Perhaps at Disney they do their best work treating
vulnerable female heroes.  Overall, Walt would have been proud.  I rate
MULAN 8 on the 0 to 10 scale and a high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.
In the East Market she buys a spirited horse,
In the West Market she buys a saddle,
In the South Market she buys a bridle,
In the North Market she buys a long whip.
At dawn she takes leave of Father and Mother,
In the evening camps on the Yellow River's bank.
She doesn't hear the sound of Father and Mother calling,
She only hears the Yellow River's flowing water cry tsien tsien.
At dawn she takes leave of the Yellow River,
In the evening she arrives at Black Mountain.
She doesn't hear the sound of Father and Mother calling,
She only hears Mount Yen's nomad horses cry tsiu tsiu.
She goes ten thousand miles on the business of war,
She crosses passes and mountains like flying.
Northern gusts carry the rattle of army pots,
Chilly light shines on iron armor.
Generals die in a hundred battles,
Stout soldiers return after ten years.
On her return she sees the Son of Heaven,
The Son of Heaven sits in the Splendid Hall.
He gives out promotions in twelve ranks
And prizes of a hundred thousand and more.
The Khan asks her what she desires.
"Mu-lan has no use for a minister's post.
I wish to ride a swift mount
To take me back to my home."
When Father and Mother hear Daughter is coming
They go outside the wall to meet her, leaning on each other.
When Elder Sister hears Younger Sister is coming
She fixes her rouge, facing the door.
When Little Brother hears Elder Sister is coming
He whets the knife, quick quick, for pig and sheep.
"I open the door to my east chamber,
I sit on my couch in the west room,
I take off my wartime gown
And put on my old-time clothes."
Facing the window she fixes her cloudlike hair,
Hanging up a mirror she dabs on yellow flower powder
She goes out the door and sees her comrades.
Her comrades are all amazed and perplexed.
Traveling together for twelve years
They didn't know Mu-lan was a girl.
"The he-hare's feet go hop and skip,
The she-hare's eyes are muddled and fuddled.
Two hares running side by side close to the ground,
How can they tell if I am he or she?"
Author: The Flowering Plum and the Palace Lady: Interpretations of
Chinese Poetry
By Han H. Frankel, Yale University Press, 1976.

Title
Review for Mars Attacks! (1996)
     This year has reeled from two major films made that are tributes
to George Pal's 1953 film THE WAR OF THE WORLDS.  INDEPENDENCE DAY is,
of course, already one of the most financially successful films of all
time.  Tim Burton's MARS ATTACKS! is just now being loosed on theaters.
     Following the release of WAR OF THE WORLDS, a whole generation of
fantasy film fans grew up with the images from that film engraved on
their memories.  The images of the planet Earth being trounced by the
weapons of alien super-science inspired imitations like EARTH VS. THE
FLYING SAUCERS, THE MYSTERIANS, and BATTLE IN OUTER SPACE.  In another
medium, Topps Bubble Gum released a series of trading cards to cash in
on these images.  The "Mars Attacks!" cards were an updating of the
gratuitous sadism of the earlier "Horrors of War" trading cards.  They
added a generous injection of imaginative science fictional weapons to
more effectively melt the flesh from the poor victims' bones.  The most
memorably card shows a pet dog being turned into a skeleton.  There was
not a lot of plot to the story told on the back of the cards except
that the Martians came and blasted away at everything, so (if I
remember correctly) we Earthlings went to Mars and blew it up.  Now
inspired by this rather rudimentary but image-rich story Tim Burton has
made a film with his own version of the story.  It seems like a natural
matching since Burton films specialize in being image-rich with
rudimentary stories.
     This is a wedge-shaped film with its highest point in a genuinely
nightmarish image before the opening credits.  I was tempted to feel at
this point that perhaps Burton really did understand the style and
kinky imagination of the "Mars Attacks!" cards and was steeling myself
for harrowing and delicious film experience.  This is followed by a
nearly as impressive image of a vast armada of flying saucers picking
up from Mars and converging on our own green planet.  Good stuff so
far.  From there the film introduces us to several groups of
characters, a sort of cross-section of America in a sort of hideous
mosaic.  We see a trailer park family from some prairie state.  We meet
a vulgar entrepreneur wanting to build a Las Vegas casino. And as a
sort of first among equals we meet the over-ripe President of the
United States (Jack Nicholson) and his weird entourage.  Then for a
half hour the script bogs down as we meet all these people and the
people around them without getting to know them very well.  Then for a
while the story is fun again.  But only for a while.
     The real problem with MARS ATTACKS! is the deterioration of the
script.  It starts with a serious plotline, then begins treating the
plot in a tongue-in-cheek manner.  From there it starts adding jokes,
and finally the whole plotline turns into a joke.  Eventually the film
is doing anything it can to milk laughs from the material in the worst
traditions of THE CANNONBALL RUN.  Each step is away from the
imagination that made the cards exciting to adolescents and towards a
sort of smirking patronization of the spirit of the source material.
     The film sports a hefty cast of familiar actors, though certainly
not for the challenge of the roles.  Typical is to have an actor like
Rod Steiger playing a high military official who yells his strategy at
the President ("Kill!  Kill!!  Exterminate.")  Nicholson is his most
overripe playing a very un-Presidential President of the United States.
Also on hand are Glenn Close as the First Lady, Danny DeVito, Martin
Short, Tom Jones, and Michael J. Fox.  One unexpectedly creative bit
involves the fate of Pierce Brosnan and Sarah Jessica Parker.  But on
the whole we have familiar actors standing around to wait for a
screaming death scene given to them compliments of the Martian invaders
who turn out to be by far the most believable characters in the film.
     With a little more respect for the original material, Burton could
have had a wonderful little film instead of this tiresome comedy with
one or two good moments.  I give it a low 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Terminator 2: Judgment Day (1991)
          Capsule review:  A big sci-fi (as opposed to "science
     fiction") film with amazing special effects has Arnold
     Schwarzenegger again playing a robot caught up in a battle
     for the future being fought in the present.  Stronger on
     action than intelligence, it still manages to expand the
     ideas of the first film.  Rating: +1 (-4 to +4).
     (There are films plotted in such a way that it is very difficult to say
anything without giving away twists in the plot.  This review has been
worded carefully to avoid spoilers that have appeared in *every* other review
I have seen.  A spoiler section will follow the review to discuss matters
that could not be addressed in the main body of the review.)
     On August 29, 1997, so the story goes, the world is plunged into
nuclear war, though of about six billion people, only about half are
actually killed.  The remaining three billion people are locked into a
life-and-death struggle of humans against machines.  The machines achieve
sentience and set out to kill all humans to make the world safe for
machine-kind.  But the one human who most stands in their way is John
Connor.  So the machines send a killer robot, a "terminator," into the past
to the year 1984 to kill Sarah Connor, who is destined to be the mother of
John.  The humans manage to send back a human to protect Sarah Connor.  The
struggle of these two time travelers and the conception of John Connor is
the plot of the 1984 film THE TERMINATOR.  The first robot, played by Arnold
Schwarzenegger, failed in his mission so the machines, who could send only
one robot back before, suddenly found a way to send a second robot.  The
humans, too, who could send only one human before, find the means of sending
back their own representative for their own second shot.  This time each
sends to somewhere around the year 1995, one with a mission to kill the now
ten-year-old John Connor, the other with a mission to protect John Connor.
Their conflict is the story of TERMINATOR 2: JUDGMENT DAY.
     Sarah Connor's reaction to the events of the first film bordered on the
psychotic.  She made it her mission to learn everything she could about
guerilla warfare and survival tactics to pass on to her son.  She slept with
mercenaries and made friends with military personnel to help achieve her
goal.  She was eventually placed in a mental institution and John was given
to foster parents.  He seems to have aged fast and behaves like a much older
boy.  He even apparently has a license for a dirt-bike that he rides like a
teenager and has broken the security on local cash machines.  One might
assume that the sequel is more of a juvenile film if the main character is
so young, but director James Cameron uses that device only to widen the band
of audience appeal to include younger people.  Arnold Schwarzenegger is as
tough as he was in the first outing but this time has more of an opportunity
to put personality into his character.
     The new script adds some new concepts and forgets about some of the
old.  And both actions are welcome.  We discover this time around that the
nuclear war was not with the Soviets.  This might have been considered a
necessary change since month by month the possibility of nuclear war between
the United States and the Soviets seems more and more remote.  But without
the Soviets as foes, the question would be whom would we be fighting with.
The film provides an answer, as Cameron often does, by borrowing a concept
from another major science fiction film.  (See the spoiler section if you
dare.)  Not entirely gone but soft-pedaled is the ridiculous idea that only
living matter can go through the time portal.  So the time portal strips
away clothing and weapons but for some reason leaves intact other dead
matter like hair and fingernails.  However, at one point in the film, the
machines of the future send back a piece of metal and it makes it through
just fine without being living tissue.  The concept that some physical
process in the time portal recognizes what is living and what is not is
dubious at best.  This of course does raise an inconsistency in the plot,
but then Cameron considers and develops the ideas of the film only enough so
they do not get in the way of all the action scenes.  Along those lines it
still has not occurred to the humans of the future (is "still" the right
word for events in the future?) that their efforts might be better spent in
sending back agents actually to avert the war, rather than just to lessen
its impact.
     The action scenes and special effects--what most of the audience has
come to see--are delivered, even if not always in the most intelligent
manner.  I consider Cameron's last film, THE ABYSS, a much more intelligent
and interesting action film.  It had better characters and a much more
engrossing story.  In one sequence of TERMINATOR 2, one of the good guys is
sprayed with machine gun fire that should have been instantly fatal, but he
lives considerably longer to exact his revenge.  It is a little redundant,
incidentally, to say that it is a good guy sprayed with machine gun fire.
From a certain point in the plot on, the good guys undertake to do what has
to be done without killing any more of the bad guys, much like in the
Japanese action film SANJURO.  The special effects are extremely well done
and undoubtedly account for a big piece of the film's price tag of somewhere
around a tenth of a billion dollars.  That cost was apparently partially
defrayed by rubbing the audience's collective nose in the name of a well-
known soft drink.
     While much of the special effects budget went into creating some really
impressive robot effects, there was enough left over to spend some very
impressive effects on a dream sequence.  In the film THE MOUSE THAT ROARED,
in the midst of showing some screwball characters playing tag with a nuclear
super-weapon, we see a huge nuclear detonation.  The narrator reassures us
that it did not really happen in the plot and the scene was just to remind
us what could happen any moment.  Similarly, we see some of the most
frightening and realistic scenes ever created of a city destroyed by a
nuclear bomb.  And we see them in a dream sequence to tell us, this is what
Sarah Connor is trying to avoid.  In those scenes and many others the
audience can only marvel at the incredible technology used to create this
fervently anti-technology film.
     TERMINATOR 2: JUDGMENT DAY is a large film with large virtues and large
faults.  Like Mt. Rushmore, it is huge and a must-see, but one wonders if it
really was such a good idea in the first place.  I would rate this
Mt. Rushmore of a movie +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.
       ***SPOILER SECTION****SPOILER SECTION****SPOILER SECTION***
     One of the nice touches of the script is its use of the audience's
expectations from the previous film to surprise the audience this time
around.  Once again you have a mean-looking Arnold Schwarzenegger and a
smaller and more human-looking guy--thin, short, and his ears stick out--
arriving from the future.  The natural assumption the audience has is that
the Schwarzenegger robot will be a killing machine aimed at John Connor, and
the other visitor will be playing defense.  It would have caught the
audience nicely off-guard when each does precisely the opposite thing.
Unfortunately, you are looking at the first and only review I have seen that
does not spoil this twist for the audience.
     Every review also gives away the nature of the bad terminator, a truly
awesome idea for a killing machine which it strikes me was borrowed from a
1960s DC comic book called "Metal Men."  Visually the effect, a close
relative of the "water-tentacle" used in THE ABYSS, is very impressive.
However, the story simply did not carry through with the power of this
killer.  In at least three of the scenes, he should have been able to take
out John Connor by turning himself into a strong clamp and a very long
sword.  He should have been able to kill any human within twenty or thirty
feet of him fairly easily.  There may have been some rule that said only a
certain percentage of his weight could go into the sword, but if that were
the case they should have said so.  And this thing is many orders of
magnitude advanced over the old-style terminator.  Where did the new
technology come from?  It seems unlikely for 2029 that any such technology
will be possible.
     It is nice that Sarah Connor starts to use her head, but why does
nobody in the future think in terms of stopping the nuclear war?  And
destroying the computers is a good thought for someone like Sarah, but it
probably would not work.  It is a standard security precaution to store
important software backups off-site just in case two robots from the future
decide to use your lab as a battleground.  Or in case a defense computer
becomes sentient and starts dictating terms.  I think Cameron probably
borrowed that idea from COLOSSUS: THE FORBIN PROJECT.
     One last question: When the liquid nitrogen truck took the liquid robot
into the foundry, am I the only one who knew the next two forces that would
be used against him?  No, I thought not.

Title
Review for Flirting with Disaster (1996)
     Most novels and most scripts are written first with an overall
plan of what the story is that is going to be told and where is it
going to go.  FLIRTING WITH DISASTER seems to have been written instead
one scene at a time in the faith that when the time comes to write the
next scene that the inspiration will come as to what to put into that
scene and how it should unfold.  To the film's credit, a story did
result without writer (and director) David O. Russell writing himself
into a corner.  And this style of writing has the advantage of keeping
the viewer guessing what is going to happen next, since the author may
very well not know either.  But after the film is over it also leaves
the audience with the uneasy feeling that they do not know where they
have been.  When all is said and done we have seen eggshell-thin
portrayals of a lot of different kinds of characters from many
different walks of life, but nothing to touch the audience and no
reason to care about any of the characters, making a film that is just
vaguely dissatisfying.
     Mel Coplin (played by Ben Stiller) is off on an odyssey to find
his real parents.  Like the original Odyssey it seems at the start like
it should be an easy trip, but Mel finds that it is more arduous than
he expects.  And along the way he travels through whole worlds he never
expected to see close up.  Along on the trip is his fleshy wife Nancy
(Patricia Arquette) and his new-born son, whom Mel hopes to be able to
name after a member of his real family.  Also along is Tina Kalb, a
willowy psychologist (Tea Leoni) sent by the adoption agency  to record
and study the experience.  The first problem: Mel's parents (Mary Tyler
Moore and George Segal) are dead-set against him making the trip and
try every manipulative trick in the parent book to get Mel to give up
the idea.  The traveling companions soon find relations strained with a
temperamental Nancy jealous of the attention that Mel and Tina give
each other.  Relations are further strained when the trip goes weirdly
awry.  The company get to see a lot more of the country than they
bargained for and as more people join the party there are even stranger
relationships to be strained.
     This is the kind of story that Albert Brooks does extremely well.
In fact there are parts of this film that are strongly reminiscent of
Brooks's REAL LIFE and LOST IN AMERICA.  Unfortunately, Russell has a
long way to go before he can match Brooks's wit and his
characterizations.  It is in the characterizations, in fact, that
Russell fails the worst.  Brooks can make his characters likable at the
same time that they are strange and there is often a feeling of
recognition in his people.  Russell has real problems humanizing his
characters.  His people are just a little bit too bizarre and
exaggerated; his humor is just too leaden-handed.  For example, Brooks
would not be likely to have a character rip open her blouse to try to
show her family the benefits of a support bra.  Under Russell's
direction none of the characters has any real human appeal.  They seem
more like dolls getting into funny situations.  The editing by
Christopher Tellefsen is often confusing or just crude, like in an
amateur film.  There also seems to be a very noticeable continuity
error involving a wheel of brie.
     In spite of many bits that were funny, FLIRTING WITH DISASTER just
does not hang together as a film and, in spite of positive critical
comment it has received, rates a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Crimes and Misdemeanors (1989)
          Capsule review:  Two stories somewhat intertwined to
     make a single story of morel decisions and their consequences
     show up most of the popular dramatic media as being pallid
     morality plays.  These are clearly not morality plays.  They
     are realistic and at least one is very worth seeing.
     There are not many filmmakers who can make a film about moral
philosophy and get away with it--at least not a film with deeper thoughts
than that unjust acts are punishable by having Sly Stallone blow you up with
a hand grenade.  Woody Allen is one director who can make a film about
ethical dilemmas.  And he has the courage to treat them in a manner that is
realistic and non-Hollywoodish enough that some may feel that the story does
not work or is somehow incomplete.  CRIMES AND MISDEMEANORS does not just
reject the popular ending, it is an indictment of the popular dramatic media
and the people who create it.
     CRIMES AND MISDEMEANORS is really two stories only tangentially related
as far as the plot is concerned, though each in some way throws light on the
other.  One of the stories starts superficially as if it was inspired by
FATAL ATTRACTION. Successful opthalmologist Judah Rosenthal (played by
Martin Landau in his best role ever) has been having a two-year affair with
a neurotic stewardess (played by Anjelica Huston).  She now threatens to
ruin his career, frame him for embezzlement, and destroy his marriage if he
does not marry her.  His brother (played by Jerry Orbach) offers to arrange
to have the mistress murdered.  Judah has very strong moral principles, but
he also has a lot he can lose if the mistress is not stopped.
     The other story involves Cliff Stern (played by Woody Allen), an
unsuccessful documentary filmmaker whose dream and long-term goal is to make
a film about a philosophy professor with a very deep life-affirming
philosophy.  Instead he is commissioned to make a film about a very
successful television comedy producer who happens to be Stern's brother-in-
law.  The producer (played by a perfectly cast Alan Alda) is glib and
polished, makes pseudo-profound pronouncements on the nature of comedy, and
in general personifies just about everything that Stern despises.  The
situation is exacerbated by a love triangle with a television documentary
maker (played by Mia Farrow, who steadfastly refuses to let talent rub off
on her no matter how many times Allen casts her).  The irony is that Stern's
hero, Dr. Levy, seems to have ideas no more profound than those of the
television producers Stern hates, even if Levy does express them more
eloquently.
     Of the two stories by far the more meat is in the story of the
opthalmologist with the moral dilemma.  In that we see the ethical
philosophy illustrated.  The story of the filmmaker is more comedy and is
sure to be more of an audience pleaser, but it is also far less ambitious.
It is the spoonful of sugar that helps the medicine go down.
     There seem to be four ways to get a major role in a Woody Allen film.
You can be an established actor such as Claire Bloom.  You can be an under-
rated actor such as Landau, whose career took a nosedive with "Space: 1999"
and who until last year's TUCKER had been getting thankless roles not nearly
commensurate with his talent.  You can get a role if Allen wants to make a
point about you as an actor, which he seems to have done with Alan Alda.
Actually it is surprising that Alda accepted a role that is so much of a
put-down on Alda himself.  The fourth way to get into an Allen film is the
way Diane Keaton and Mia Farrow did and neither has really been an asset.
     This is probably one of Allen's better "serious" films and I give it a
+2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Chasing Amy (1997)
     (WARNING: This film is structured so that it is nearly impossible
to discuss the themes of the film without revealing aspects of the plot
that are left as plot twists.  I will spoil nothing that is not spoiled
by the trailer for the film.)
     CHASING AMY is the third film form writer/director Kevin Smith and
is set in his native central New Jersey.  While his first two were
nearly purely comedies, this time around he mixes in some serious
themes with his raunchy brand of comedy.  It is about how fallible is
the procedure of finding the right relationship and how delicate that
relationship can be once it is found.  Holden McNeil (played by Ben
Affleck) and Banky Edwards (Jason Lee) are two Red Bank, New Jersey
comic artists who create the popular comic book BLUNTMAN AND CHRONIC.
At a comic convention in New York a friend introduces them to Alyssa
(Joey Lauren Adams).  Alyssa is cute, bright, and funny and Holden
immediately feels they have a mutual attraction and are perfect for
each other.  It even turns out she comes from Middletown, a neighboring
town to his.  He tells the incredulous Banky that he and Alyssa "shared
a moment."  Anxious to share more than just a moment he goes to a club
where his friend tells him he can find Alyssa only to discover in an
embarrassing moment that Alyssa is a lesbian.  In spite of knowing that
his relationship cannot become mutually romantic, he continues his
friendship with Alyssa, hoping to somehow convince her somehow to be
interested in him.  He hopes to win her in spite of her orientation.
The story becomes an odd sort of a love triangle with Banky afraid of
losing the friendship, now also a professional relationship, he has had
since childhood with Holden.  Banky finds Holden's love is even
starting to affect their professional relationship.  The other vertex
of the triangle is the free-thinking Alyssa with her own history.  In
the end, Kevin's story has returned to a theme he covered, albeit more
lightly, in CLERKS.
     All three of the main characters are veterans of other roles in
MALLRATS and of course writer/director Kevin Smith has played the wise
Silent Bob in all three of his films.  Ben Affleck as Holden is a bit
confused by it all and at the same time nicely witty.  There may be a
bit of Albert Brooks in his role and of Jason Lee's Banky.  But the
actor who shines the most is Joey Lauren Adams who does a terrific job
going through a wide gamut of emotions and always comes up genuine.
Smith has a good ear for dialogue and the words seem to come out very
naturally from the actors' mouths.  The one problem that perhaps could
have been better handled in a higher budget production is that they do
not enunciate so that their dialogue is distinct.
     Kevin Smith has a sense of humor to match better-known comic
filmmakers like Woody Allen and Albert Brooks.  He fills his script
with some hilarious send-ups of popular films.  Early on the film he
give us a militant African-American appraisal of STAR WARS that is as
funny as anything I have seen in a film in the last twelve months.
Later he has a terrific send-up of a familiar scene from JAWS.  And at
the same time Smith treads the boundary near political incorrectness by
implying that sexual orientation is really a matter of choice.
Alyssa's has logical reasons for being lesbian rather than having her
orientation come from an internal compulsion.  It seems like a small
thing, but it is a fairly radical departure from what we have seen
before in films.
     CHASING AMY is well-acted and directed and proves to be a very
moving and personal film.  After the critical misfire of MALLRATS, it
looks like Kevin Smith is back on target.  I give it a +2 on the -4 to
+4 scale.

Title
Review for Shall We Dansu? (1996)
     In the strict rules of Japanese society, public signs of affection
are considered to be in bad taste.  Things that Americans would find
innocuous, like a husband putting his arm around his wife, are
considered to be breaches of decency.  And while there are Japanese who
get involved with ballroom dancing, we learn in this film that it is
considered as tawdry in Japan, as going to strip clubs would be in the
United States. Paradoxically, the society that shuns the touching of a
partner on the ballroom floor is the same society that jams so many
people into a subway car that literally nobody else can be shoved
through the doorway.  But that touching is considered non-voluntary.
Ballroom dancing has connotations of rebellion in Japan that we just do
not see in our country.
     Shohei Sugiyama (played by Koji Yakusho) is a successful 40-
something business executive with a staff of people working for him.
He has a wife and daughter and has recently bought a house in suburbia.
In Japanese society, this is not just success, it is affluence.  Yet
Shohei is dissatisfied with his pat little accounting job and his
simple, programmed life-style.  One night, returning home, he gazes up
from his subway car and sees a beautiful woman, Mai Kishikawa (Tamiyo
Kusakari) gazing out the window of a ballroom dance studio.  After
seeing her there multiple times he decides to go up and look in on the
dance studio.  He enrolls as a student in secret.  As anxious as he is
to meet and even dance with Mai, he is unwilling to pay 6000 yen per
lesson from her.  So, unable to afford private lessons from Mai he
enrolls in a public class with two other men to be taught by an older
woman.  There at least he can see Mai and perhaps occasionally dance
with her.  Shohei becomes friends with the two other men in his class
as well as with a Japanese dancer with his own fiery Latin style.
Shohei's wife Masako (Hideko Hara) recognizes that her husband is doing
something without telling her and it is taking a lot of his time.  She
suspects the worst and determines to find out what mischief her husband
is up to.
     Masayuki Suo wrote and directed the film that tells its story and
gives us a few chuckles and a few bittersweet moments along the way.
The real problem is that what happens is rarely unexpected and never
surprising.  Indeed the dramatic last sequence of the film is not just
cliched, it seems almost inevitable. Mai's secret that she contemplates
so wistfully at the window each night seems far too trivial to warrant
so much attention, and as the core of the film seems too meager.  This
almost might have made a decent hour- long story, but there really is
not enough here to make a satisfying feature film.  Perhaps some of the
reason is that there are very likely cultural differences that make
this story resonate better in Japan than it does in the United States.
Certainly there is humor in this film that requires some knowledge of
Japanese culture to appreciate.  In one scene one of the characters
takes a strip of dried squid and dances it on the top of a restaurant
table.  Some of the humor was lost on most of our audience who probably
did not recognize what it was that was dancing.  Certainly the Japanese
would see the touching while dancing as being daring. While Tokyo may
have rock and roll dancers in the park--dressed like 1950s bikers from
THE WILD ONE- -even they do not touch each other when they dance.  It
is difficult to see this film as a Japanese would and that might make
all the difference between the simple story we see and one that is
considerably richer. Similarly it is difficult to judge the quality of
the acting.  While we might recognize the difference between really bad
acting and decent acting, it is unlikely we would recognize really
great acting if we saw it.
     What does come across is an innocuous and enjoyable comedy with a
touch of human drama and a bit of melodrama.  The story of the dancer
with the secret past will remind some of STRICTLY BALLROOM, but this
film is nowhere near as amusing as that film was.  I rate this one a
low 1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Crossing Delancey (1988)
          Capsule review:  Well-above-average comedy/drama
     reminiscent of MOONSTRUCK but set in the Jewish community of
     Manhattan.  Some nice characterizations in this story of a
     33-year-old career woman's relationships with two men.
     Rating: +2.
     It has been a good long while since my wife and I have found ourselves
to be the youngest people in an audience, but we did with CROSSING DELANCY
and that in itself is a testimonial that the filmmaker must be doing
something right.  And she is.  Joan Micklin Silver has directed a warm,
human sort of comedy that is at least comparable to MOONSTRUCK and at least
in some ways better.
     Isabelle Grossman (played by Amy Irving) is 33 and has a fulfilling
career.  Working in a very literary bookstore.  She arranges for public
readings by very good authors, she runs book discussion groups, she lies to
her grandmother that she does not mind being single, and she knows many
important people in the publishing field.  Working hard at her job, it is
late at night before she gets back to her big, empty apartment.  Knowing
many major literary figures, perhaps some day she will have a lasting
relationship with one or perhaps even marry one.  Her closest relative, her
grandmother, calls in a matchmaker for Isabelle, much to Isabelle's
embarrassment.  And who does the matchmaker suggest?  A pickle salesman, Sam
Posner (played by Peter Riegart of ANIMAL HOUSE and LOCAL HERO).  Well, he
is sort of a nice guy, he has a good sense of humor, he obviously would like
very much to get to know Isabelle, he even can make sound romantic his
reasons for letting a matchmaker bring him together with Isabelle.  But he
is just a pickle salesman after all, and Isabelle really has her eye on a
tall, handsome Dutch author, Anton Maes (played by Jeroen Krabbe).  Deep
down, Isabelle knows that Maes will never have time for her and that he
really is not as great a writer as many think him to be.  But he certainly
seems like a better catch than a pickle salesman.  If only she can find a
good way to brush off Sam without feeling too guilty.
     Based on the 1985 play by Susan Sandler has a terrific character
portraits.  Bubbie (i.e., Grandmother) Kantor (played by Reizl Bozyk) is a
wonderful combination of endearing and exasperating.  The matchmaker (played
by Sylvia Miles) fits the stereotype of the pushy, obnoxious matchmaker, but
then what sort of person becomes a matchmaker anyway?  Isabelle herself is a
little flat as a character and it takes her a long time to realize what the
audience knew long before.
     CROSSING DELANCY has some totally superfluous revealing clothing and
explicit sexual language, but the MPAA double-crossed the film and still
gave it a PG.  Do not confuse it with a children's film.  Rate it +2 on the
-4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Stand and Deliver (1987)
          Capsule review:  What kind of a film would appeal both
     to the Hispanic community and to mathematicians?  The true
     story of a math teacher who fights to make mathematicians out
     of barrio kids.  This plot has been done dozens of times as a
     fictional sports story. but rarely this well and rarely with
     a subject that has the immediate appeal that calculus does.
     Rating: +2.
     American Playhouse produces quality feature-length films primarily to
be shown on PBS.  Rare is the year that they have not made a film that
deserves to be at least nominated for Best Picture, though to the best of my
knowledge they have never received any such nomination.  Some of their
better work is released to theaters, though whether it is produced with that
market in mind, I do not know.  However, their films TESTAMENT and EL NORTE
did get shown in theaters well before going to television.  Their current
release is STAND AND DELIVER.
     You have probably seen before the plot of the losing team and the coach
who uses unorthodox techniques and understanding to build the team into
champions.  Things are different here.  First, this is a true story and
second, we are not talking about football or basketball, we are talking
about calculus.  This is the story of how a math teacher in a barrio school
fought to take students who had a hard time learning fractions and turn them
into some of the country's top scorers in the advanced college placement
tests.  Edward James Olmos plays Jaime Escalante, who is willing to play
clean or hit below the belt to taunt his students to make something of
themselves.  His classes are peppered with under-the-breath (and over-)
cutting remarks about math and life in the barrio.  ("Tough guys don't need
math.  Tough guys fry chicken for a living.")
     I guess that STAND AND DELIVER shows one of my childhood fantasies
actually coming true--I always thought that if even the school toughs found
out what math was really like, it would become the cool thing in the school
to be really into math, much like it really was for football.  This film
actually shows that in one very unlikely school, math did become the "in
thing."  But I guess what I find most amazing is that the film was made at
all.  I mean, it's one thing to sell a kid from the barrio on the idea that
math is nifty.  There is intelligence there you can appeal to.  But to sell
calculus to a film producer is something else again.  This fine film could
have been sold only to something like American Playhouse.  Rate it a +2 on
the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for "Star Trek: Voyager" (1995)
[Yes, this is a television pilot, but since it is also a feature-length
movie, I believe a review of it is suitable for
rec.arts.movies.reviews.  -Moderator]
     (Note: Many of the proper names in this review are undoubtedly
misspelled.  They are phoneticly accurate, at least as far as I can
tell.  Hey, I never was too hot with Earth languages.  Put me in front
of an extraterrestrial and I am hopeless.)
     After whole moments of anticipation, the fifth "Star Trek" series
(counting the animated episodes but not counting the films) has come
along and in spite of negative expectations the first episode is at
least mediocre.  Being mediocre it is probably the most impressive
"Star Trek" series premiere ever.
     The approach seems to be an acknowledgement on the part of the
producers that the original series had the most exciting concept.
"Star Trek" and "Star Trek Animated" took place in the frontiers of an
unexplored universe--extra-terra incognita, so to speak.  "Star Trek:
The Next Generation" took place in a universe much more cosmopolitan
with a more widespread Federation.  The "Next Generation" Enterprise
was less like the Golden Hind and than it was like the Queen Elizabeth
II.  "Star Trek: Deep Space Nine" also takes place in a universe that
is settled, but with a mousehole into a not very explored quadrant.
Still, it has not really taken much advantage of the possibility of
unknown civilizations on the other side of the hole.  Instead of an
exploring ship, it really takes place in a port.  The problem is that
all this leaves people hungry for the good old days when the universe
was less settled, back in the Sixties.  At least, that seems to be the
philosophy behind the new series, which uses a huge contrivance to move
the ship, the Voyager, seventy light-millennia away and into unexplored
territory.
     All of the artistic decisions point toward a recreation of aspects
of the first series.  Having success with the character of Spock who
had funny ears, the new series has a lot of alien life forms with funny
ears in funny shapes or in funny places.  But apparently no matter
where your ear are in this universe or what shape they are, the
language they are used to hearing is good, old-fashioned English.
Light from our sun reaching this quadrant would have had to leave our
sun something like 68,000 B.C. but everybody speaks a language that did
not leave Earth until the twentieth century A.D.
     Of course, the first thing that a "Star Trek" fan wants to see in
the new series is the Bridge.  No, not the bridge of the new starship,
but the bridging of the last series into the present one.  The first
episode of "The Next Generation" had DeForest Kelley show up as Old
Bones.  "The Next Generation" Enterprise docked at Deep Space Nine to
christen that series.  And not too originally, the Voyager also docks
at Deep Space Nine for a few nominal moments in the opening episode
until it is clear that the visit is just delaying the real story.  Each
older series lends legitimacy to the new series in that unbroken chain
of "Next Generation"s.  I wonder how will they manage next time with
the Voyager some seventy light-millennia from home?
     The crew of the Voyager is headed by Kate Mulgrew as Captain
Kathryn Janeway, who in the first episode we see in an array of
emotions from tender to tough--probably a wider range than a male
counterpart would have had to portray in the first outing.  Also along
is Tuvak, a black Vulcan, played by Tim Russ, who has the voice and
mannerisms right, but still looks distressingly like some "Saturday
Night Live" parody of a Vulcan.  The new comic relief is Neelix (Ethan
Phillips), a scruffy scavenger with a roguish way.  He looks like
something the cat caught and has been playing with for a week.  Another
member of the crew is B'Elanna Torres (played by Roxann Biggs-Dawson),
half Klingon, half human.  That means she only has subtle ridges over
her eyes where most Klingons look like they have horseshoe crabs glued
to their foreheads.  Then there is Chakotay (Robert Beltran), an
American Indian with a big tattoo on his forehead making him look like
that venerable old Indian Queequeg in MOBY DICK.  Also notable but not
present is Doc Zimmerman (Robert Picardo) a petulant physician who is
present only as a hologram--a perfect character for the 1990s, when
image is everything and substance is purely optional.
     The story starts with a Maquis ship in a STAR-WARS-like blaster
battle with a much bigger ship.  (If you don't know who the Maquis are,
don't worry.  It makes absolutely no difference to the plot who the
heck they are.  I'm not sure I remember myself and I'm reviewing the
episode.)  Suddenly the Maquis ship is plucked out of space by a ray of
some sort.  Cut to the credit sequence.
     Each new series has a more impressive-looking credit sequence.
This one has a theme by Jerry Goldsmith, who writes some of the most
majestic "Star Trek" music, like the theme from STAR TREK: THE MOTION
PICTURE which was reused for "Star Trek: The Next Generation."  The
score is actually by Jay Chattaway, but the theme was composed by
Goldsmith.  The sequence shows the Voyager flying through some
spectacular space scenery in the vacuum of space (except it clearly
does not look like a vacuum).  This is the first we see the new ship
which looks from some angles like a scrawny flying duck with a huge
bill.  Well, too late to change it now.
     The new Voyager, under the command of Janeway (and after a quick
and pointless docking at Deep Space Nine), heads off in search of the
missing Maquis ship and finds itself lost in space and plucked seventy
light-millennia away.  The story from there borrows from a number of
sources, starting with Ray Bradbury's "Mars Is Heaven" and continuing
with pieces of old "Star Trek"s, and even bits from the film TOWERING
INFERNO.  The script by Michael Piller and Jeri Taylor does not produce
great science fiction, but it does demonstrate the dramatic
intelligence by intentionally splitting up the nine major crew members
into groups of two or three to allow the viewer time to become familiar
with them.
     The style of the new series is polished and better than the
writing.  As is traditional in the series, the model effects work is
superb.  It is not as imaginative as some of the Video Toaster graphics
of "Babylon 5," but is still beautiful to look at.  In the "Star Trek"
tradition matte paintings of landscapes are spectacular, though not
always convincing.  Speaking of traditions, the computer still has
Majel Barrett's voice.  The traditional long scene of a shuttle flying
around a new ship, whichever new ship it is, is there but much shorter
than the minutes-long sequence in STAR TREK: THE MOTION PICTURE.  Some
of the effects work is surprisingly understated.  The seventy light-
millenia trip shows up as just a simple generic spacestorm effect.  It
could have been a little more dramatic, considering it provided the
theme for the new series.  The costume design is occasionally a bit
silly.  One group called the Ocampo seem to be wearing scarves or their
collars over the lower part of their faces to give the impression of
Bazooka Joe.
     Until now the series has been trying to make the starship a
character and even gave it Majel Barrett's voice.  The writers have
taken the second step by giving the Voyager something called "bio-
neural circuitry."  One might wonder how much longer it will be before
we have a starship with human emotions ("Oh, please don't make me fire
on that...  Oh, no.  Now you did it.  Uh-oh!  They's firing back.  Will
you put up my shields please?  Ouch!  Hey, dammit, put up my shields
you bozos!")  Some of the science is questionable.  The Voyager travels
seventy light-millennia into unexplored space in seconds and almost
immediately the navigator knows where he is.  For some time the series
has been asking us to accept some peculiar things about hologram
technology and the ability to interact with it.  The Doc Zimmerman
hologram seems to be able to hug humans and hold up physical objects.
Along with the unexplained ability everybody has to understand English,
there seems to be a standard concept of what it means for a character
to live nine years.  Nobody asks anyone how long their years are, nor
even if they would get any useful information in the answer.  How do
you express to an alien who doesn't know how long it takes for your
planet to circle the sun how long a year is?
     There was one great moment in the episode for anyone who has ever
gotten fouled up by an uncooperative computer center.  Captain Janeway
confronts the alien being who has taken her ship and pulled it seventy
light-millennia off course.  Oops, coulda happened to anyone, right?
All she asks is that he undo the damage he has done and send the ship
back.  He stops his banjo-playing, looks her in the eye and whines
"Sending you back is complicated.  I just don't have the time."  I
wonder if he trained some of the computer centers I've worked with.
     Overall impression?  The series is okay and somewhat better than
expected.  But I am still a "Babylon 5" sort of guy.

Title
Review for Bug's Life, A (1998)
     Let's get the expository lump out of the way at the beginning.
All bugs are insects but not all insects are bugs.  Bugs have tube-like
mouthparts and wings that are joined to the body in a sort of thickened
area. Scientists call them "Hemiptera."  Ants, walking sticks, and
certainly spiders are not bugs.  And to further correct, ants have six
legs as we saw in ANTZ (well, sort of), not four as portrayed in A
BUG'S LIFE.  And speaking of inaccuracies, in my review of ANTZ I said
that Pixar and Disney might have to look to their laurels to match the
animation quality of ANTZ.  Well I was wrong; Pixar and Disney are
doing just fine, thank you.  A BUG'S LIFE actually is the more visually
sophisticated of the two animated films, but each has far surpassed TOY
STORY.  There may be more animated figures in some scenes in ANTZ, but
Pixar has the edge on life-like animation and in giving a three-
dimensional look.  They have also made some perceptive improvements in
digital representation light and surface texture.  Facial animation is
also better. In fact looking at the faces of the grasshoppers as they
talk, they really have more texture than a camera would pick up looking
at a real grasshopper.  They have gone into a kind of hyper-reality,
much like the saturated Technicolor of musicals of the 50s created a
sort of hyper-reality.  But since people get a little squeamish looking
too closely at real insects, Pixar seems to reserve this over-texturing
for the villainous grasshoppers and there to make them a somewhat more
repulsive foe.
     Where A BUG'S LIFE has a problem is that it has a less
sophisticated or interesting plot than either TOY STORY or ANTZ.  The
plot is directly or indirectly a rehash of the late Akira Kurosawa's
SEVEN SAMURAI.  The ants of Ant Island could live very well if they
were not obliged to pay a heavy tribute of food each year to a
ferocious band of grasshoppers.  In the colony ant Flik has many ideas
how to do things differently-he even has ideas for how to deal with the
grasshoppers.  The catch is that none of his ideas seems to work very
well.  Flik's idea for how to deal with the grasshoppers is to get
bigger bugs to fight for the ant colony.  So the colony decides to send
someone to find defenders.  And who do they choose?  The ant they can
most spare, Flik.  Our intrepid ant finds defenders, but does not
realize that they are not fighters but flea circus performers.  With
Flik's ideas and with the aid of what they think of as fighter insects,
the colony prepares to defend itself against the cruel grasshoppers.
The grasshopper leader is the nasty Hopper, voiced with real menace by
Kevin Spacey.
     It is tempting to compare this film's weaker plot but impressive
visuals with the current trend of sci-fi films being taken over by
special effects.  But many respected classic films did much the same.
Busby Berkley musicals had real visual style but had relatively bland
and cliched plots.  Then as so frequently now the entertainment was in
what the audience saw, not what the film said.
     It is worthwhile to see A BUG'S LIFE just to see how the animation
technology is progressing. If the story- line is weak at least there
are moments of really good humor, though many are in the closing
credits. It would be interesting to know if ANTZ eats into the profits
of A BUG'S LIFE.  ANTZ seems to have been timed to do just that, but if
so it may have been a miscalculation.  The two films dealing with the
one non- conformist ant in the colony could co-exist at the box-office
much like DEEP IMPACT and ARMAGEDDON have.
     I would rate A BUG'S LIFE a 7 on the 0 to 10 scale and a low +2 on
the -4 to +4 scale.  There are a few scenes that could be frightening
to younger children.
     This film has been released with the short film "Geri's Game"
which won Pixar an Oscar.  It is a funny little short of an old man
playing chess with himself in the park.  It humorously makes the point
that playing chess with yourself as an opponent is not really like
playing a different person.  Actually it could almost be a study of
schizophrenia, though I think that is reading more into the short than
Pixar intends.  One of the more interesting aspects of "Geri's Game" is
to see how far Pixar has progressed in representing computer animation
of human figures.  It is one thing to represent in animation toys and
insects with their rigid surfaces, but it is harder to represent humans
realistically.  Human characters were kept to a minimum in TOY STORY
and are not present at all in A BUG'S LIFE.
     I have one question about the closing credits.  (Hopefully this
will be meaningless to anyone who has not seen the film.)  How genuine
is what we are hearing?  The joke is obviously that the visuals are
false, but the audio track may be genuine.

Title
Review for Hour of the Pig, The (1993)
     The year is 1452 and Paris lawyer Richard Courtois is tired of the
legal entanglements and corruption of city law.  He wants to use his
talents to help common people, so he and his clerk Mathieu travel to
the small town of Abbeville.  There he indeed finds that law is
different, though no better and in some ways a lot weirder.  Rural law
cases involve accusations of witchcraft, devil pacts, and sodomy with
animals.  And the law extends to human and animal alike.  If a farmer
is shown to have had sex with his donkey, both might be hung on the
same gibbet.  Animals may also be called to court to be sworn as
witnesses.  One of Courtois's first cases is a very bizarre "murder
trial," at least by modern standards.  Today such an incident would not
fall under the category of murder, but we are looking at a very
different culture.  Incidentally, the case really did get tried as it
is portrayed in the film according to historical records.  It seems at
first like a ludicrous and trivial court action until Courtois starts
sensing that the state's case is invented and may be a part of a larger
conspiracy.
     THE ADVOCATE is a film with a lot going for it.  First and
foremost is the setting.  Years go by between good films set in so
remote a historical period.  Even without a good plot the historical
detail by itself would keep this film intriguing.  The historic detail
that gives the film its texture and gives a feel of being very well
researched.  The viewer is consistently astonished by the differing
attitudes and life-style of the 1400s.  Unfortunately too often the
attitudes we see are a mix of that century's and our own.  Similarly to
THE NAME OF THE ROSE, the photography often appears inspired by the
master artists of the time like Breugel and Bosch.  The peasants look
grizzled and a bit grotesque.
     But beyond the historical detail the plot is also enjoyable by
itself.  The mystery is not one of the best or most unpredictable, but
it is likely to keep the audience guessing.  THE ADVOCATE is at once an
intriguing mystery film and a well-written drama with comedic
overtones.  One historical detail that the film makes clear is that in
the Middle Ages people were a good deal less sensitive about being seen
without clothing.  That, however, tends to make me suspect it would get
some editing before American public television would show it.  But
clearly it seems intended for some wide audience because of a major
budget and a cast of familiar actors including Colin Firth in the title
role, Ian Holm as a likable but corrupt local priest, Donald Pleasance
as Abbeville's other attorney, Michael Gough as town judge, and Nicol
Williamson thoroughly enjoying his role as a local lord.
     THE ADVOCATE was written and directed by Leslie Megahy, a director
nearly unknown in the United States but who has made several TV movies
for the BBC.  This is his first feature film and deserves attention.
My rating would be a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Seventh Sign, The (1988)
     Following the success of first ROSEMARY'S BABY and the THE EXORCIST,
there were a number of "Bible prophecy" horror films.  In them, the word of
the Bible took on new relevance as young people in them discover that all
the prophecies and strange symbolism are true and perfectly relevant to our
times.  Films like THE SENTINEL, HOLOCAUST 2000 (a.k.a. THE CHOSEN), and the
three-film OMEN series.  After a while they disappeared, only to return
about a decade later with THE SEVENTH SIGN.  As the run of this sort of film
goes, THE SEVENTH SIGN is probably above average.  Even without the big
Hollywood treatment that Twentieth Century Fox gave THE OMEN, this is a nice
suspenseful story well told.
     There are funny things happening in the world.  Off Haiti there are
fish dying and washing up on shore.  In the Negev Desert an entire village
is found frozen.  But  then weird things happen every day.  We see them on
the news over dinner and then they get forgotten.  Abby Quinn (played by
Demi Moore) sees and forgets a lot of news.  Her interests are more worrying
about the baby that she will very soon have.  She also worries about her
husband's career as a criminal defense lawyer (he is played by Michael
Biehn) and about the mysterious boarder (played by Jurgen Prochnow) who has
come to live above her garage.  The audience knows this mysterious figure
has been present at each of the strange events that has happened fulfilling
some sort of mission.  It all has to do with a prophecy of seven signs that
the end of the world is coming.  One of the signs has something to do with
Abby, but what sign, and why?  Well, since even the film is confused about
what the signs are (in fact, it outright contradicts itself), it is not
surprising that Abby does not know the signs.  The story unravels to a nice
piece of fantasy as will a good horror story.
     It is nice to see Demi Moore in a film that calls for her to be a
little more than just a yuppie.  On the other hand, this may be Michael
Biehn's most forgettable role, as a lawyer with little personality.  Not
that he had a lot of personality in TERMINATOR or ALIENS, but there he was
enough action so that you did not notice.  John Heard has a cameo as a
likable Catholic priest, somewhat recreating his role from HEAVEN HELP US.
THE SEVENTH SIGN is not a great horror film.  A year from now it will play
one month on cable (guaranteed!  It's a Tri-Star film) and then probably be
forgotten.  But it is a reasonable little exercise in Bible horror.  Rate it
a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Sexy Beast (2000)
    CAPSULE: Gal is a 50s-ish London cockney gangster who has 
    retired to Spain.  His old associates want him for one last 
    job and send the vicious Don to give him an offer he can't 
    refuse.  A standout performance by Ben Kingsley as Don cannot 
    save what is essentially a set of cliches recycled from old 
    Westerns.  Rating: 4 (0 to 10), 0 (-4 to +4)
Roger Ebert asks in his review OF SEXY BEAST, "Who would have 
guessed that the most savage mad-dog frothing gangster in recent 
movies would be played by...  Ben Kingsley?"  My response would be 
that anyone who has seen Alan Arkin in WAIT UNTIL DARK, Henry 
Fonda in ONCE UPON A TIME IN THE WEST, or Anthony Hopkins in THE 
SILENCE OF THE LAMBS should have guessed it.  They should know 
that the way for a film to create a really creepy sociopath is 
cast someone who generally plays mild, sympathetic, or even 
ineffectual character roles.  The same characteristics that make 
an actor seem gentle in most of his roles can work in his favor 
when a role calls for him to be fierce and vicious.  That is the 
principle that works for Kingsley in SEXY BEAST.
Gary "Gal" Dove (played by Ray Winstone) has retired from a London 
career of crime and is living on a luxurious villa in Spain.  Life 
has become a routine of sunning himself and relaxing.  But his 
paradise is about to be shattered by a one-two-punch.  The first 
punch is a boulder that comes rolling down the hill next to the 
villa.  The second punch comes from Gal's past.  Back in London 
gang boss Teddy Bass (Ian McShane, TV's Lovejoy) is planning to 
break into a safety deposit room in a bank and he wants Gal.  He 
sends his most rabid henchman Don Logan (Ben Kingsley) to fetch 
Gal.  Don will accept any decision Gal makes from "yes" to 
"certainly."  However, if Gal says "no" Don will do whatever it 
takes to turn it into a yes including threatening Guy's ex-porn-
star wife DeeDee (Amanda Redman).  In the meantime Don knows just 
how to get under everybody's skin.  Kingsley makes Don a compact 
package of fury and nastiness.
There are some serious problems in Louis Mellis's and David 
Scinto's script that should have been caught before filming.  When 
we see the actual crime we have no idea why Gal was so important 
to its success.  Beyond an ability to use skin-diving gear, no 
special talents are required of him.  Any local hood could have 
done what Gal is needed for.  Additionally the crime involves 
digging from a swimming pool to the bank vault, flooding the 
vault.  No only could they have let the water out of the pool and 
avoided the complication altogether, but there is by far too much 
water to be accounted for by what was in the pool.
In spite of the provocative title, the story is cliched and overly 
familiar.  I know I have seen all the plot elements of SEXY BEAST 
in old Westerns like THE LAW AND JAKE WADE.  The story is usually 
of the reformed outlaw, a Robert Taylor type, who has hung up his 
guns and is trying for a life of peaceful respectability.  The old 
gang, however, wants to do one more job with their old buddy and 
sends a rabid Richard Widmark type to go and git im.  It is not a 
great plot.  In SEXY BEAST even the plot twists have gray beards.  
Perhaps the film has a little more respectability because it was 
made not as a Western but as a stylish British gangster film.  It 
is an old plot dressed up to look new.
If the plot is old, at least the style is creative.  This is 
director Jonathan Glazer's first film, but he has reputedly done 
some notable TV ads for Guinness Stout.  His style does have some 
unexpected touches including some very odd dream sequences.  
Cinematographer Ivan Bird uses a lot of half lit scenes.  We see 
one side of a person's faces.  But the other side fades into the 
darkness, a sort of metaphor for the half-world these characters 
in-habit.  Half of everything that is happening is also kept 
hidden.
We Yanks will have a hard time with some of the dialog.  At least 
in my theater it was difficult to make out the words with the 
quiet speaking, the heavy accents, and the cockney language.
SEXY BEAST is a very and familiar minor plot lent respectability 
in the US by being done in what is here a still somewhat novel 
genre, the London crime film.  The plot may be new to British 
crime films, but it would be overly familiar as a Western.  
Further respectability comes from Ben Kingsley's high-powered 
performance.  I give it a 4 on the 0 to 10 scale and a 0 on the -4 
to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Havana (1990)
     Gambler Jack Weil (played by Robert Redford) has a piece of advice for
revolutionary Bobby Duran (played by Lena Olin) about how to play roulette.
You should not put all your money on one number.  You go for a more modest
bet, like betting on black.  "You still lose you money, but you lose it more
slowly."  Or another example: Hollywood should bet on a bankable combination
like Sidney Pollack directing Robert Redford in films like THE WAY WE WERE,
THREE DAYS OF THE CONDOR, ELECTRIC HORSEMAN, and OUT OF AFRICA.  Eventually
you will come up double-zero on a $45 million spectacle, but it will take
longer.  Double-zero is essentially what Universal has with HAVANA.  One of
the zeroes is a political thriller that pits the pre-revolutionary scummy
government of Batista against the idealistic supporters of Fidel Castro,
most of whom we know are destined to have a rude awakening in the years to
come.  The other zero is a love story in which the lovers have all the
chemistry of champagne and Miracle Whip*.
     Redford plays Jack Weil, a wise-cracking gambler who sticks to
business, but might have more going on below the surface, much like Rick
Blaine in CASABLANCA.  He becomes the third side of a triangle in which the
other two sides are a married couple of revolutionaries (Lena Olin and Raul
Julia) living a dangerous life, much like Ilsa Lund and Victor Laszlo in
CASABLANCA.  Weil must decide if he will do nothing and let events take
their course, try to steal the woman, or become committed to the cause, much
as Rick does in CASABLANCA.  Now it seems to me that some film other than
HAVANA has used this plot before.  It's on the tip of my mind, but ... oh,
well.  Seriously, one reason that this film does not engage the audience
like CASABLANCA did is that Bogart was an actor who could show pain.
Redford can wince a little.
     Of the love story, the political thriller, and the setting, the setting
wins by default.  Much of that humungous budget went into creating the look
and feel of Havana of 1958.  Others have vouched for its accuracy; I can
vouch only for its believability.  Not that pre-revolutionary Havana was
that interesting a city but, filming in the Dominican Republic, Pollack has
captured at least a believable look.  And at nearly two and a half hours in
length, the film lets you get a long look.  And you might as well look at
the background; you are not missing much in the foreground.  I give this
film a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Object of Beauty, The (1991)
          Capsule review:  A well-crafted comedy with some nice
     dramatic moments and some serious things to say.  This story
     is of the theft of a valuable piece of art from a spendthrift
     American couple living in London.  The story touches a broad
     range of emotions with some of the minor characters more
     interesting than the main ones.  Rating: +2.
     It is fairly easy to make a comedy with an Eddie Murphy or a Bette
Midler mugging away on the screen and a lot of artificial gags.  With a film
like that, you know why it is enjoyable and ten minutes after it is over it
is really over.  It is much harder to make a comedy with solid, three-
dimensional characters in a situation that is not obviously comedic and just
let well-observed characters drive the story.  OBJECT OF BEAUTY is at least
nominally a comedy but it spans a broad range of emotion.  It is a good
story well-told.
     Jake and Tina (played by John Malkovitch and Andie MacDowell) are an
American wheeler-dealer and his girlfriend living together in a posh London
hotel and virtually hemorrhaging money.  The problem is that it is money
that Jake can ill-afford to waste on meals that cost over a hundred pounds.
Jake is hoping for a big return on an investment in cocoa which has been
washed out by a dock strike in Sierra Leone.  He needs money desperately and
wants to sell a valuable Henry Moore sculpture that Tina was given by her
husband Larry.  Tina prefers hiding the object d'art and claiming the
insurance.  Meanwhile the lonely deaf-mute chambermaid (delicately played by
Rudi Davis) finds that this little bronze head is the only solace for the
loneliness of her affliction.  She spirits the head away and keeps it as a
needed friend.  Since Jake and Tina had just discussed hiding the head for
the insurance, each suspects the other has done just that and is holding out
on the other.
     The story then moves between the two worlds.  One is the hotel where
Jake and Tina are finding this new strain destroying their relationship.  It
is also where Jake is finding it increasingly difficult to dodge the hotel
management on the matter of his bad credit while he is still getting them to
pursue the matter of the missing piece of art.  The other world is the
lonely one of Jenny (the chambermaid) and her delinquent brother.  Here what
has been a light comedy gives way to some serious drama including at least
two scenes of real dramatic power.
     The script by Michael Lindsey-Hogg, who also directed, seems to have
attracted a first-rate but oddly matched cast of supporting actors,
including Lolita Davidovich (from BLAZE) as Tina's best friend, veteran
British heavy Joss Ackland as the hotel manager, Bill Paterson (from COMFORT
AND JOY), and Peter Riegert (from ANIMAL HOUSE and CROSSING DELANCEY) as
Tina's real husband.  The script is subtle and rewarding in a way that the
British seem to do far better than the Americans.  This is a rewarding story
with a good balance of comedy and drama.  I rate it +2 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for What's Love Got to Do with It (1993)
     A number of critics considered RAGING BULL to be the best film of the
1980s.  I cannot say I was all that keen on it.  While I will accept that
the acting and the style gave the film a feel of authenticity, the film
really just gave me two hours to be around people I would cross a street to
avoid.  Perhaps even a highway.  I got that same feeling of wanting to get
away from the people in WHAT'S LOVE GOT TO DO WITH IT, without the feel of
authenticity.  This is what I would call a "dirty linen" story, like MOMMIE
DEAREST.  Tina Turner (nee Anna Mae Bullock) got divorced and is now telling
the world what terrible things her husband did and how she remained a sweet,
loving  mother to her children and all the while how terrible she felt.  Not
that I am doubting the accuracy.  I am sure Ike Turner was this bad from
Tina's point of view, and I am sure Tina was a good person from her own
point of view.  Still, she was not an unbiased observer and her character
may be a bit too good to be true albeit a little too naive.
     The story starts with young Anna Mae (played at this age by Rae'ven
Kelly) being dragged by the ear out of a rural church's choir practice
because she insists on jazzing up her singing beyond what passed in churches
in those days.  Apparently it would not be the last time she would be
physically abused for not singing the way someone wanted her to sing.  Anna
Mae goes home only to see her mother leaving home and leaving her in the
care of Anna Mae's grandmother.  Flash forward to 1958 St. Louis and Anna
Mae (now played by Angela Bassett) has come to the city to be with her
mother.  The rage with her sister is rhythm and blues singer Ike Turner
(played by Laurence Fishburne) who, as part of his act, brings women in the
audience up to the stage to sing with him.  Ike hears Anna Mae sing this
way, realizes she is a belter, and sweet-talks her first into joining his
band--named Ike Turner and the Ike-ettes--and then into marrying him.  As
they work together, Ike realizes the power of Anna Mae's voice could be his
ticket to success.  He dumps the "Ike-ettes" from the group's name, redubs
Anna Mae ad Tina, and forms the Ike and Tina Turner Revue.  The operative
wording is that he forms the group since Anna Mae is given little say.  As
they work, more and more of the brutal side of Ike comes out, until he is
beating and even raping his wife.  He insists on running both careers even
though he is making mistakes and getting hooked on narcotics.  Eventually
through a conversion to Buddhism Tina gets the strength to fight back, then
to leave Ike.
     Angela Bassett does a good acting job as a person in Tina Turner's
position, easily winning audience sympathy.  The problem, of course, is that
she does not really resemble Tina Turner and her speaking voice does not
have the same almost-purring quality.  She does lip-sync to Tina Turner's
singing fairly well.  But somehow her appearance keeps her from transforming
into her character the way Denzel Washington transformed into Malcolm X on
the screen.  Laurence (a.k.a. Larry) Fishburne does a good job in a role
that destroys his former nice-guy image.  He also does his own singing.
     I think I might have had more interest in this film had I been a Tina
Turner fan.  But for this one viewer the film rates a low +1 on the -4 to +4
scale.  Fans can adjust accordingly.

Title
Review for Truth About Cats & Dogs, The (1996)
     "The Truth About Cats & Dogs" is a popular radio talk show for pet
owners to call in and ask questions of veterinarian Abby Barnes (played
by Janeane Garofalo of "The Larry Sanders Show").  Abby is intelligent
and very funny, but she feels she is short and plain-looking.
(Garofalo herself is actually attractive, but perhaps is plain by
Hollywood actress standards.)  To put it mildly, Abby is extremely
self-conscious about her looks, particularly when compared to her tall,
blond neighbor Noelle Slusarsky (Uma Thurman).  When a listener to her
program, Brian (Ben Chaplin), becomes interested in Barnes and wants to
set up a rendezvous with her, he needs a description, and on a lark
Abby describes Noelle.  So begins a love triangle in which Brian thinks
he loves a single woman with Abby's personality and Noelle's body.  He
believes Noelle is actually Abby and that Abby is the veterinarian's
friend Donna.  If the basic plot sounds familiar, it borrows no small
amount from Rostand's play "Cyrano de Bergerac" or perhaps that play's
reframing in modern terms, ROXANNE.  The result is the sort of light
romantic comedy with the two women trying to pull off the charade and
keep Brian from suspecting.  But eventually the plot gets beyond the
charade into the question of what is it that is the source of the real
attraction?  Is it the physical beauty of Noelle or is it the
personality of Abby?  The film makes some very serious, albeit sugar-
coated, observations about how our society discriminates by degree of
attractiveness.
     And if one wants to see examples of that discrimination in action,
one need only look at the billing of this film.  Top billing goes to
Uma Thurman who is not the main character, has fewer lines than Abby,
and who has less personality on the screen.  The practical fact is that
Thurman is more of a star, particularly after PULP FICTION.  As such
she has more marquee value.  Viewing audiences are perceived as having
precisely the same set of misplaced values about which the film is
complaining.  Had Janeane Garofalo gotten top billing one might feel a
little better about the film.  This is not to say that Thurman does a
bad job, by any means.  This may well be her best role to date.  She is
in some ways a mirror image of Garofalo's character.  Garofalo is
actually attractive but believes she is ugly.  This may have been an
artifact of bad casting or it may be intentional.  Thurman's character
is relatively bright but has convinced herself that she is all looks
and hairdo with nothing of any substance inside of her.  In any case
Thurman, knowing she has top billing, is content to let Garofalo be the
real star.  And Garofalo easily fills the vacuum with sparkle and wit.
     This is a first produced script by Audrey Wells whose previous
work includes being a jazz disk jockey and producing and directing
political commercials.  Some of her dialogue is very funny, though
often one gets the feeling that real people are not this witty
spontaneously and the conversations are too polished to be credible.
Of course the same complaint could be leveled at Woody Allen's screen
writing.  Probably more bothersome is the character of Brian who seems
to be incredibly dense not to realize that the shorter woman has both
the voice and the quick wit of the woman on the radio.  He seems
perfectly willing to believe that the tall blond who is afraid of his
dog and the radio veterinarian who has explained to him how to handle
and calm that dog could be the same woman.  The fact that Uma Thurman's
character has to consult with Janeane Garofalo's character before
treating a turtle does not seem to tip him off that there is anything
strange going on.
     The film boasts a bouncy score by Howard Shore, who is good when
he does his own composing, but the film relies a little too much on
source music.  Telephones seem to play a large part in THE TRUTH ABOUT
CATS & DOGS and it would not surprise me to hear that this film has
contributed greatly to the sale of cordless phones.  There is even an
advertisement for an identifiable long distance phone company played in
the background of one scene, which seems a somewhat crass touch.
Direction of this somewhat spotty is by Michael Lehmann whose own
career has been spotty, having directed HEATHERS, MEET THE APPLEGATES,
HUDSON HAWK, and AIRHEADS.
     THE TRUTH ABOUT CATS & DOGS could have stressed its more serious
theme a little more, but it is an enjoyable comedy and rates a high +1
on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Vampires (1998)
     VAMPIRES starts out almost in the style of a spaghetti Western
with an attack on a small homestead in New Mexico.  The house has a
nest of vampires and Jack Crow (James Woods) is leading a team of
vampire hunters in to clean them out.  While the initial imagery is a
little over-dramatic, it gives way to what is a fairly decent action
sequence.  That is enough action to last us a while and we could,
director John Carpenter would let us, get to a story line.  But it is
not very long and there is not much plot until the next big action
scene.  Then there is only a bit more of plot before the next action
scene after that.  The plot is kept to a minimum and the interesting
ideas in the plot really get the short end.  And that is something of a
pity because the film, based on the book VAMPIRE$ by John Steakley,
gives us a myth for the origins of vampires and explains why vampires
are so intertwined with religious imagery.  This could be an
interesting departure from the standard vampire film, but Carpenter
decides to tell us about it rather than to show it. What Carpenter
saves his serious screen time for a sequence of spectacular fights
between hunters and vampires.  There is a lot of fighting and lots of
gore.  Anything intriguing is kept to a minimum to so it does not get
in the way of pleasing the action film fans.  This has not always been
Carpenter's style.  His 1981 version of THE THING has action but also
challenges the viewer to do a little thinking about the film's central
science fictional question.
     Jack Crow heads a vampire SWAT team, cleaning up nests of vampires
with high-tech spears and crossbows.  In the early part of the film his
team is wiped out by a particularly mean vampire Valek (Thomas Ian
Griffith) who has been tipped off to who Crow is.  Now Crow team is
gone and he is down to himself and his sidekick Tony Montoya (Daniel
Baldwin).  To make matters worse, he does not know the people on his
own side, Tony and his backers, he can trust.  Meanwhile Jack is sure
the vampires are looking for something that must be hidden somewhere
here in New Mexico.
     If this is sounding like a very tired police corruption plot with
a few obvious substitutions, that's exactly what it is.  The same story
looks just as well with two partner cops looking for a gang of hood who
are themselves looking for a packet of heroin.  But Carpenter goes
against a familiar principle of film: show people, don't tell them.
Just about everything in the plot other than the fights we are told
about in the dialog and not shown.  Fundamental questions in the plot
like where does Crow get his funding, why are the vampires in New
Mexico--what do they want and why do they want it, what is the
connection of the vampires and the Catholic Church, how did Crow come
to be a vampire hunter and why devote his life to it? The answers to
any of these questions could have been dramatized, but instead are
revealed through dialog.
     Now if all this was not bad enough, Carpenter misuses the James
Wood persona.  Woods plays a particular sort of cool lowlife very well.
But Carpenter leads off the film by having Woods do some Sergio-Leone-
style mythic posturing.  While his crew prepares for an attack he
stands staring fixedly through shades at the house that will be his
target.  Woods does not work as a larger than life mythic hero.  That
is not his style and it just does not work very well.  There are some
simple things that Carpenter should be looking for as director that he
misses.  In one scene we are looking at a motel room with dead people
on the floor.  One female corpse is on the floor in front of a chair so
that there is about an inch of daylight between her and the chair.  As
the actress breathes the gap widening and narrowing makes it obvious
her arm is moving up and down.  One also wonders how the existence of
vampires is kept secret.  These vampires do not maintain a low profile.
     There are arguably logical flaws in the film.  There is some
question in my mind whether Carpenter has a consistent policy on what
effect bullets have on vampires.  It would take some rationalization to
explain why in some scenes sunlight has a dramatic effect on vampires,
yet in a scene toward the end a vampire can walk under a burned roof
that lets him be swept by beams of sunlight.
     I suspect that the book on which this film was based was better
thought out.  While I might recommend this film to an action audience I
would say that what I look for in a vampire film VAMPIRES rates a 4 on
the 0 to 10 scale and a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.  Perhaps I will read
the book.

Title
Review for Sunshine (1999)
     SUNSHINE chronicles four generations of the Hungarian
Sonnenschein family, from around the 1870s to recent history.  Three
generations of sons share a common desire to be accepted Hungarians.
They have more loyalty to the country than to their religion.  Each
finds sooner or later that they can deny their religion, but they
cannot become what they are not.  Each new regime uses the family's
Jewish origins as a weapon against them.
     Emmanuel has two sons, Gustave and Ignatz.  He also adopts as
his daughter his niece Valerie.  To his horror, as his sons age they
become romantically interested in Valerie.  Since he has raised all
of them as his children this has the feel of incest.  And there is
some truth to his fears because they are cousins.  But Ignatz and
Valerie as adults (Ralph Fiennes and Jennifer Ehle) are willing to
ignore Emmanuel's wishes and marry.  And Ignatz has a bright legal
mind.  He is willing to give up his religion, change his name to the
non-Jewish name Sors, and surrender his scruples to advance his
legal career in the military, yet he is always limited by the
Hungarian aristocracy who cannot accept a man born as a Jew.
     Ignatz's son Adam (Fiennes again) makes himself the finest
fencer in Hungary.  Even one generation removed from his Jewish
origins, the Hungarian aristocracy still holds his religion against
him.  In the 1936 Olympics he becomes a Hungarian national hero.
And in his success he feels he is at last free of his origins.  He
is three ways exempt from the new Jewish laws that the Nazis bring
on Hungary.  But he discovers all the barriers he has placed between
himself and his religion are to no avail.
     Adam's son Ivan (a third personality for Fiennes), indignant at
the horrific treatment of his father at the hands of the Fascists,
eagerly joins the Communists to embrace their reforms against the
previous regime.  But he is unwilling to learn from the history of
his own family that political regimes come and go, but the same
prejudices remain with all political systems.
     SUNSHINE was written and directed by Istvan Szabo, director of
MEPHISTO and HANUSSEN.  At just three hours it strikes the viewer
not so much as being long for a movie but as being short to
chronicle a family over so many years.  Sadly, there are few media
for a drama whose natural length is something like five hours.
Szabo is able to give us a textured view of Hungary, occasionally
doing it by giving in to artificial devices, especially camera
filters, to suggest the age of chapters.  The change of filters
jarringly announcing the beginning of a new chapter of his story.  A
different filter still is used where there is documentary footage.
In each generation there is a different personality for Fiennes, but
each makes much the same decision to try to fit in and assimilate.
Each has the same pessimism that he must cover his origins and the
same optimism that it will help.  Each generation rebels, but at
last the similarities in the stories are greater than the
differences.   And over it all is watching Valerie, played by
Jennifer Ehle and later Rosemary Harris, in reality daughter and
mother actors.  The choice of Maurice Jarre to score is well in
keeping with its historical sweep.  Lajos Koltai's camera frequently
beautifully recreates Hungary through the 1930s, until there is much
less beauty in Hungary to film.  Viewers should expect some fairly
explicit depictions of love and just as explicit are the depictions
of hatred.
     As rushed as it is this is a film with a sweep of history, a
personal story within the turmoil.  It is a remarkable document and
one worth seeing.  I give it 9 on the 0 to 10 scale and a +3 on the
-4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Brother Sun, Sister Moon (1973)
     There has been a good deal of discussion about unsung films (many of
which among the film fans I know are at least somewhat "sung").  I want to
recommend a film that I have never heard anyone else recommend.  What makes
it even odder is that it is a religious film and I generally hate religious
films.  This one didn't play fair, however: I already loved the film before
I recognized the story or the allusion of the title!  The film is Franco
Zefferelli's 1973 BROTHER SUN, SISTER MOON.  It is one of the most beautiful
films I have ever seen.  Just about any frame of the film, blown up, could
make a beautiful poster for the film.  Music is by popular singer Donovan
and the script bears four names (usually a bad sign), including Zefferelli
and--of all people--Lina Wertmuller.  Some people claim IT'S A WONDERFUL
LIFE always has the power to cheer them up.  Capra's film doesn't do that
for me but this film does.

Title
Review for Mississippi Burning (1988)
[MISSISSIPPI BURNING got its general release on Martin Luther King's birthday
weekend.  This review is posted on Martin Luther King's birthday.  Neither was
accidental. -Moderator]
          Capsule review:  Alan Parker (director of MIDNIGHT
     EXPRESS, THE WALL, and ANGEL HEART) creates a well-detailed,
     though allegedly very fictionalized, account of the FBI
     investigation into the disappearance of three civil rights
     workers from Jessup, Mississippi in 1964.  Gene Hackman's
     performance is complex in a film that is violent but
     rewarding.  Rating: +3.
     Two waterfountains, side-by-side.  One has a sign saying it is for
whites; one says it is for colored.  "Separate but equal."  Except the
whites' fountain is a big, electrically cooled fountain; the blacks'
fountain is a little white porcelain one like you would see in a grade
school.  With the very first shot of MISSISSIPPI BURNING Alan Parker sets
the tone for what is to come and creates a feel for the South in 1964.  And
what is to come is the story of an FBI investigation into the deaths of
three civil rights workers that turned into an all-out war between the FBI
and the Ku Klux Klan.
     Into Jessup, Mississippi come two FBI agents: Anderson (played by Gene
Hackman) and Ward (played by Willem Dafoe).  Ward is in command.  Anderson
knows the territory and how to get things done.  As such they are roughly
similar to the Sean Connery and Kevin Kostner characters in THE
UNTOUCHABLES, but in this case neither is really fully right in his
approach.  The result is a (usually) quiet conflict between Anderson and
Ward as they both fight the Klan and its sympathizers.
     The script gives the greater acting opportunity to Hackman.  His
character seems at first to be jovial and friendly, almost a "good old boy,"
where Dafoe's character is flat and officious.  Hackman's character and his
performance operate at several levels at once.  He has plans within plans
and can be reckless and bloodthirsty in his attempts to get a job done.
Brad Dourif, whose early career had him play mostly innocents in films like
ONE FLEW OVER THE CUCKOO'S NEST and RAGTIME, these days usually plays
vicious heavies in films like CHILD'S PLAY and MISSISSIPPI BURNING.
     Stylistically MISSISSIPPI BURNING may well have been inspired by John
Sayles' 1987 film MATEWAN.  Like Sayles, Parker has created the feel of an
epic inexpensively by careful choice of locale in which to shoot.  As in
MATEWAN, the story is a little too neat to be believed.  Both stories have
the feel of an anecdotal style for mood rather than that of a docu-drama--a
style that undermines the realism.  Even then the mood  itself is damaged at
the end by a small speech by Dafoe followed by the singing of a spiritual.
     The photography, while at times atmospheric, in general is realistic
and includes liberal (if that is the word) doses of violence realistic
enough to bother some viewers.  Parker (or screenwriter Chris Gerolmo) seems
intentionally to put in disorienting scenes that do not immediately make
sense, but which will fit into the puzzle in a few minutes.
     In general MISSISSIPPI BURNING is a skillfully crafted piece of
historical fiction just a little stronger in style than in credibility.
Rate it a +3 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Miyamoto Musashi: Kettô Ganryű-jima (1956)
     Perhaps the most fabled samurai duel ever was the duel between Miyamoto
Musashi and Sasaki Kojiro.  Musashi had been a ronin from an early age.
After the great battle of Sekigahara, he became a notorious bandit until
virtually forced by a Buddhist priest to learn zen.  After that he became a
samurai in service to a lord and traveled the country, winning more than
sixty duels.  Musashi is famous for, among other things, writing GORIN NO
SHO (a.k.a. THE BOOK OF THE FIVE RINGS).  Sasaki Kojiro was a brilliant
young swordsman using unorthodox technique.  Each man had an impressive list
of victories when they faced each other on the shores of Ganryu Island.
     In 1953 and 1954, Hiroshi Inagaki made three films based on the life of
Miyamoto Musashi.  The first one--known variously as THE LEGEND OF MUSASHI,
THE MASTER SWORDSMAN, and MIYAMOTO MUSASHI--tells how Musashi fought in the
battle of Sekigahara, how he became a bandit, and finally how he became a
full-fledged samurai.
     DUEL AT OCHIJOJI TEMPLE (the continuation) finds Musashi's past
catching up with him, forcing him into a great battle against tremendous
odds, as well as a battle with himself in order to follow the way of the
samurai code.  We also meet the enigmatic young swordsman Sasaki Kojiro,
whose name would be ever linked with Musashi's.
     The conclusion, DUEL ON GANRYU ISLAND or MUSASHI AND KOJIRO, tells how
Musashi turns his hand from samurai to farmer.  Part of the story seems to
have been the inspiration for Kurosawa's SEVEN SAMURAI.  Finally Musashi
must meet his young opponent on the beach of Ganryu.
     These are not so much three films as one film in three parts and have
been called SAMURAI I, SAMURAI II, and SAMURAI III.  They total more than
five hours in length and tell a nearly seamless story with complex
characters and situations.  Director Inagaki returned to the story of the
famous duel, incidentally, in 1967.  His KOJIRO also told the story of the
duel, but gave Kojiro's history instead of Musashi's.  One minor problem, at
least for me, is that after the battle of Sekigahara comes the peaceful
early years of the Tokugawa Shogunate.  (Readers of SHOGUN should realize
that Sekigahara was the real name of the great battle in SHOGUN.  Toranaga's
real name was Ieyasu Tokugawa.)  But my point is that these were times of
peace and the duels were not fought over politics but were more like sports
events.  They do not have great historical significance.
     The production was from Toho and fans of 1950s Toho films will
recognize familiar faces such as that of Takashi Shimura, who played the
wise old scientist from the first two Godzilla films, the dying man from
IKIRU, and the lead samurai in SEVEN SAMURAI (the part played by Yul Brynner
in THE MAGNIFICENT SEVEN).  Also present is Akihiko Hirata, whose oxygen
destroyer was the only weapon ever to kill permanently a godzilla and whose
report foretold the coming of the Mysterians.
     This clearly was an expensive production and Inagaki not only used
color at a time when most Japanese films were in black and white, he also
made full and unorthodox use of color with (for example) surrealistically
vivid skies.  Just as Masaki Kobayashi did with the 1964 KWAIDAN and Kenji
Sawara did with 1957's RODAN, Inagaki gets the full effect he can from the
color photography.
     SAMURAI is probably not classic film in the same way as Kurosawa's
samurai films are, but it is a sort of light classic in the way a film such
as HIGH NOON is.  If it shows up at your video store it is certainly worth
seeing.  I rate SAMURAI a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Twelfth Night: Or What You Will (1996)
     This is the film to take a Shakespeare fan to see so he will
understand why so many people do not care for Shakespeare.  Trevor Nunn
put a lot of unconventional touches into this TWELFTH NIGHT.  He took
risks and in many cases demonstrated just how they were risks.  I
previously saw TWELFTH NIGHT performed in a San Jose park by a bunch of
unknowns who passed a hat at the end.  And I saw the Trevor Nunn film
with respected professionals and highly paid name actors.  It is
surprising how much better the play was done in the park.  Nunn is a
director whom I have respected in the past.  He directed the TV version
of THE LIFE AND ADVENTURES OF NICHOLAS NICKLEBY, the film LADY JANE,
and more recently the PBS "Les Miserables in Concert."  Each is good,
and each is downbeat in tone.  Perhaps that is the only tone with which
Nunn feels comfortable, but TWELFTH NIGHT is about as downbeat a
treatment as we could expect from this comedy.
     The first of the problems is that Nunn had moved the story to the
late 19th century for no apparent reason and adding no value to the
story.  A year ago Ian McKellan did a magnificent updating of RICHARD
III, giving the film not just a beautiful look, but adding a great deal
to the meaning of the story.    No reason for the updated setting here
is apparent and in some cases clothing details required by the story
just do not fit with the dress of the characters in the film.  While we
are on the subject of the look of the film, the dim lighting does odd
things to the tone of the film.  Nunn chooses to light very much like
this is a film noir production. There are a few sunlit scenes, but a
great deal of the film seems to take place in semi-darkness with
characters having half of their faces lit, the other half fading into
the darkness of the background. Frequently there is one bright source
of light in a scene and the rest is bathed in black.  In a crime film
it would have worked very nicely because it lends a powerful downbeat
and oppressive feel.  Using that sort of lighting in a light comedy is
creative, but the effect fights what should be the tone of a film with
characters like Sir Toby Belch (played by broad comedic actor Mel
Smith) and Sir Andrew Aguecheek (Richard E. Grant of "Franz Kafka's
It's a Wonderful Life").
     The plot is as complex as many of Shakespeare's comedies.  Viola
and Sebastian are identical twins who are shipwrecked separately in a
place called Illyria.  Each is unaware that the other has survived, and
each goes into the service of one of two rival dukes.  In order to do
this Viola has to dress as and pretend to be a man. She apparently does
it very well since the Countess Olivia (Helena Bonham Carter) falls in
love with her, thinking her to be a man.  You can imagine the
possibilities that a Shakespeare (or for that matter a Mozart) would
see in male and female twins, otherwise identical and now actually
identical since both now appear to be male.  The Bard has his usual fun
with mistaken identities and odd love alliances.   For additional humor
Shakespeare has peppered the plot with characters who often have
humorous names and a subplot involving a puritanical servant, Malvolio
(Nigel Hawthorne).
     Viola is played by Imogen Stubbs who gets surprisingly low billing
considering that she really is the main character.  Her best known role
is as Lucy Steele in SENSE AND SENSIBILITY, though if the reader wants
to make a terrific film discovery, I can suggest her earlier A SUMMER
STORY.  Stubbs has the talent for the role, but has a hard time making
herself even look like a man, much less make herself mistakable for
Stephen Mackintosh, who plays her twin brother Sebastian.  There is one
really stunning performance in the film, and even that is not entirely
obvious until the end: Nigel Hawthorne is actually very good as
Malvolio.  In his last scene he manages to turn much of the play
upside-down.   Another very good actor is used to much less effect.
Ben Kingsley plays a sort of narrator and chorus, Feste.  In the
original he was the court fool, here turned into a wandering minstrel.
This gives Kingsley what I think is his first and hopefully only
singing role.  Rounding out the cast is Helena Bonham Carter in a less
pouting role than most of hers, but not one with which she did a whole
lot.  There is a lot of comedy in the play, but somehow nothing seems
all that funny on the screen, due in large part to the restrained
performances of the cast and the dour feel of the lighting.
     Trevor Nunn's version of TWELFTH NIGHT does some things original
but not a lot that really improve on the material.  I rate it a high 0
on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Truly Madly Deeply (1991)
     (Contains minor spoilers important to explaining the premise.)
     A perennial fantasy film subject is that of ghosts coming back to
affect the lives of the living.  I don't mean the horrific approach of THE
UNINVITED, THE HAUNTING, or THE LEGEND OF HELL HOUSE.  The films I am
talking about have spirits walking among us relatively benignly.  TOPPER is
a good example; so is BEETLEJUICE and DONA FLOR'S TWO HUSBANDS.  The success
of GHOST will probably spawn several more examples in the next year or two.
However, because of timing it seems likely we can ascribe to coincidence the
similarities between GHOST and the BBC film TRULY, MADLY, DEEPLY, though in
some ways the two are quite similar.
     Jamie (played by Alan Rickman) has been dead for a while now, but Nina
(played by Juliet Stevenson) refuses to close that chapter in her life and
get on with the business of living.  She imagines Jamie is still around
giving her advice.  Nina sleepwalks through a life that is shattered and
crumbles more day by day.  Then a spectral Jamie does return and takes up
residence as Nina's secret live-in (if "live" is the right word) lover.  He
explains his presence by quoting Dylan Thomas saying, "And death shall have
no dominion."
     If the plot of TRULY, MADLY, DEEPLY resembles that of GHOST, in style
the two are very different.  There is a lot that GHOST tries to do that
TRULY, MADLY, DEEPLY does not.  The British film is far more sad, slow, and
introspective.  GHOST throws in a major sub-plot of a crime story; it has a
comedy sub-plot with Whoopi Goldberg; it stops and closely examines just
what powers a ghost would and would not have.  It also has its sad and
introspective moments, but they do not last too long.  To pack so much into
a film may be of dubious value, but it is all there.  TRULY, MADLY, DEEPLY
clearly has different priorities and very different pacing.  It takes its
time to build Nina's character, but it glosses over the metaphysics and
there seem to be notable inconsistencies in the nature of ghosts (e.g., at
times the ghosts seem to take care that they cannot be overheard; at other
times it does not seem to bother them).  There is some whimsy, some warm
comedy, and one character who is well-observed, but overall this is a rather
slight film and a disappointment.  I would give it a 0 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Sammy and Rosie Get Laid (1987)
[Note:  a previous review of SAMMY AND ROSIE GET LAID had a few errors.  Hanif
Kureishi was the scriptwriter, not the director (and note the corrected
spelling).  Rosie was played by Frances Barber, not Claire Bloom.  The father's
name was Rafi, not Arif. -ecl]
     Stephen Frears has directed a film that made it as a solid directorial
success to his credit.  He directed MY BEAUTIFUL LAUNDRETTE for British
television.  It was picked up for international release and became one of
the more successful art-house releases of the year, in spite of minor
protests from the Pakistani community.  The film shows Pakistanis in Britain
and the portrayal included positive and negative characterizations.
Frears's second international release is SAMMY AND ROSIE GET LAID.  As might
be imagined, there was something of a stir over the title.  The MPAA refused
to register the film under that title.  Finally SAMMY AND ROSIE GET LAID was
released without an MPAA rating.  Well, was SAMMY AND ROSIE GET LAID worth
the bruhaha?  Not as far as I am concerned.
     Rafi (played by Shashi Kapoor) was a high official in the Pakistani
government who has come to London to live with his son and daughter-in-law:
Sammy and Rosie.  Their marriage is falling apart; each is taking other
lovers as often as possible.  All of the couple's friends seem to be
interested in sex and little else.  Rafi is shocked to see open lesbian
relations among the friends.  But then what right does Rafi have to be
shocked?  While he was in office in Pakistan he ordered brutal tortures
vividly described in detail.  There is a race riot going on outside.  Claire
Bloom has a small part as Rafi's once and current lover.  Her part is,
however, important in that she is the only person in the film who
demonstrates any value as a human being.
     This was not my cup of bile.  Rate it a -1, taking into account its
artistic pretensions.  For entertainment value, it is not up to the stag
films its title is reminiscent of.

Title
Review for Nightmare Before Christmas, The (1993)
          Capsule review:  Tim Burton proves himself a creative
     genius with a film deserving of instant holiday classic
     status.  Just about everything comes together and genuinely
     works in the best holiday film since Alistair Sim starred in
     A CHRISTMAS CAROL.  Rating: +3 (-4 to +4)
     From the on-again off-again career of Tim Burton comes a film so
original and incredibly creative that it genuinely is unlikely to be
surpassed as a holiday film for decades.  While Burton did not actually
direct in this outing (Henry Selick did), Burton produced and wrote the
story, creating the characters.  And THE NIGHTMARE BEFORE CHRISTMAS shows an
unmistakable Burton style.  The entire film is done in beautiful 3-D
animation and is the culmination of the poetic fairy tale style we saw some
of (but not enough) in EDWARD SCISSORHANDS crossed with the tongue-in-cheek
horror-spoof style of "Frankenweenie" and "Vincent."  This film dazzles the
viewer with so many beautiful images that I found just taking my eyes off
the screen to make notes meant I was missing something I wanted to see.  The
style the film kept reminding me of some exceptionally creative Czech films-
--particularly those of Jiri Trnka--and wishing more films like that could
be done elsewhere.  Now a visual style every bit as compelling, perhaps
more, has found its way into an American film.  The fairy tale style that I
liked so much in EDWARD SCISSORHANDS I attributed to Caroline Thompson, a
then first-time screenwriter whose talents I claimed were just what Burton
needed.  I am very pleased that Burton seems to have had the same insight.
Thompson wrote NIGHTMARE's screenplay also and this time she and Burton have
completely fulfilled the promise their pairing showed in that film.  The ten
musical pieces here are written and scored with the clever style and quality
of a Gilbert and Sullivan operetta.
     The story takes place in a land where holidays are born.  One town
makes Halloween each year, another makes Christmas.  The artistic genius of
Halloweentown is one Jack Skellington, a sort of skeleton with a globular
head.  But then everyone in Halloweentown is a horror, that is the spirit of
Halloween.  The town is full of werewolves, vampires, bats, spiders, mad
scientists, and things for which there are no names.  Jack is dissatisfied
with Halloween and stumbles on Christmastown.  He is  enchanted and puzzled
by the idea of Christmas and decides he and his town of horrors can do it
all better.  Halloweentown starts working on putting on a horror-tinged
Christmas.  If that seems a silly plot, well you don't expect a holiday film
is going to have a Dostoyevsky-level story.  Just accept the story and watch
how well it is told.  Regardless of the plot this is a film that you *will*
find rewarding.  Take it from me you may possibly have seen a film like this
before but only rarely, and you have never seen it done so well for 75
minutes.  If you thought THE WIZARD OF OZ was an impressive children's film,
go see THE NIGHTMARE BEFORE CHRISTMAS.  Amazingly to me I give a Christmas
film a rating of +3 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for What Dreams May Come (1998)
     One of my favorite writers is Richard Matheson who represents to
me the Twilight Zone sort of fiction that I enjoyed so much when I was
growing up.  His writing spans science fiction and horror; it spans
books, magazines, TV, and film work.  Stephen King cites Matheson as a
very strong influence on his writing, and justifiably so.  Matheson is
probably the major American writer to take horror and move it from
Transylvanian castles to places like American suburbs.  The only
Matheson novel I have ever not liked was a horrible sugary view of
heaven called WHAT DREAMS MAY COME.  At the time I read it I had
speculated that Matheson had recently lost a loved one and had to get
that death out of his system somehow.  I assumed that his way to do it
was to write a novel that would give him comfort.  It did not do much
for me.  The novel has been published alone and bound with a Matheson
companion novel BID TIME RETURN, basis of the film SOMEWHERE IN TIME.
The two novels together form his sentimental works.
     One is pulled in two very different directions by WHAT DREAMS MAY
COME.  The story is still the treacle that Matheson wrote.  But the
visual imagery is spectacular to use a word that gets used too often
and should be reserved for a film like this.  I have not seen very many
films done this beautifully in my life.  Matheson's novel has been
transformed into a new Divine Comedy for our times.  And like the
original "Divine Comedy" of Dante, the story is wretched and the
imagery is totally enchanting.  (Okay, that is a personal opinion on
Dante).
     Chris Nielsen (played by Robin Williams) and Annie Nielsen
(Annabella Sciorra) have more love in their lives than is really safe
to have.  They love each other so much that it is almost perverse.
They also love 19th century painting.  They love their two children.
They love their pet dog.  But their marriage is marked by tragedy.
Death has claimed first their dog and then their two children.  Four
years after an automobile accident has claimed the two children
physician Chris stops to be a Good Samaritan in a traffic tunnel
accident.  In a flash he is the last in a line deaths that Annie has
had to face.   But the point of view is not Annie's but Chris's.  He
finds himself first in a middle world where his ghost haunts Annie,
then it moves on to heaven.  Chris is guided through the lands of death
by a Virgil-like angel figure named Albert (Cuba Gooding, Jr.).
     And what a place heaven is!  For Chris, heaven is in three
dimensions what a beautiful 19th century painting is in only two.
Everywhere he looks from every angle what he sees is a beautiful
painting.  And who comes bounding up but his dog, no longer old and
feeble but young and vibrant.  Chris loves heaven.  The dog loves
heaven.  Chris will be angelically happy here... at least for the first
two weeks.  We get to see Chris's heaven, we get to see the heaven of
some other people.  And Chris gets to work out his problems.  But then
something happens.  This something will lead Chris on an adventure
seeing more of this metaphysical world including a visit to hell.
     Vincent Ward, director of THE NAVIGATOR and MAP OF THE HUMAN
HEART, gets from both Robin Williams and from Annabella Sciorra
performances that are unselfconsciously unctuous.  Cuba Gooding, Jr.
comes off as benevolent and dull.  But then even the plot twists are
dull and have a "so-what?" feel about them.  Max Von Sydow adds a
Bergman-esque touch appropriate to this world.  (There is one minor
problem I can help the viewer through right now.  When there are
references to the Nielsen's daughter, they are referring to the younger
child.  Marie Nielsen, played by Jessica Brooks Grant, is deceptively
boyish looking but proves to be a girl.)
     But then there are the visuals.  And if you just turn off your
mind and look at the screen, all plot problems can easily be forgiven.
Most artistic visualizations of heaven are saccharine.  People have a
natural interest in hell most visualizations of heaven are not all that
interesting.  This film manages to make heaven almost as interesting as
hell... but in a different way.
     It is really difficult to rate a film with such extremes of
quality.  The story is nothing impressive, but some of the images are
breathtaking.  On balance I have to rate it a 6 on the 0 to 10 scale
and a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Mighty Joe Young (1998)
     The original MIGHTY JOE YOUNG was something of a disappointment
for me.  I think that was because from about age six on one of my
favorite films was KING KONG (1933).  (Incidentally, that is one of the
rare opinions I shared with Adolph Hitler.)  MIGHTY JOE YOUNG (1949)
was a reprise of the same talent.  Its effects were created by the same
master, Willis O'Brien, assisted by a new apprentice, a special effects
technician named Ray Harryhausen.  Harryhausen would become the king of
Hollywood special effects from 1951 to 1977.  But the talent was used
to make a sort of junior King Kong for children.  Stop-motion
animation went the way of flat animation and of comic books to be
associated with children's entertainment.  Serious adults (people like
my parents) did not go to see films that featured stop-motion
animation.  As with the SON OF KONG the special effects became
associated with "cute."  In spite of my diffidence toward the original
MIGHTY JOE YOUNG, I was fairly ambivalent to hear that the classic was
being remade.  My reaction is that the remake is a big improvement in
realistic special effects and the story begins much better.  But
neither film has a whole lot of interest to say about what happens when
an eighteen-foot-tall ape is brought to America.
     As a great nostalgic touch the film opens with the RKO Pictures
logo, just as the original did.  It is an updated logo, but basically
the same radio antenna.  Apparently one of the most creative studios is
still around and in the film business sufficiently to get their name on
this remake of their film.  The new plot introduces poachers to the
story.  While their original had no reference at all to poaching, it
would have been virtually impossible to tell the same story today
without explaining why a baby gorilla would be motherless without
mentioning poaching.  The first third of this film, the part about the
discovery of the ape, is done on an almost adult level.  Linda Purl
plays Dr. Ruth Young--obviously patterned on Dian Fossey--who,
accompanied by her young daughter, Jill, studies gorillas in their
natural habitat.  Ruth and a female gorilla she is studying are both
killed by poachers the same night and young Jill adopts Joe, the
quickly growing baby of the killed gorilla.
     Flash forward twelve years and the giant gorilla is now a local
legend.  Nearly as much a legend is the white woman (played by Charlize
Theron who is actually South African), a grown-up Jill who is the
gorilla's friend.  Gregg O'Hara (Bill Paxton) is in Africa collecting
wild animal blood for a Los Angeles nature conservancy (why is never
explained).  He is temporarily detaining wild animals to collect the
blood when out of the bush comes a huge gorilla and sets one of his
captured cats free.  O'Hara wants to add some giant gorilla blood to
his collection and has his unsavory team of trackers go after the ape.
Not surprisingly, he finds the ape he was trying to catch has caught
him instead.  He is saved only at the last minute by the intervention
of a mysterious woman, Jill.  Now Gregg knows he must track down the
mysterious woman and her gorilla.  Eventually Gregg will find Jill and
convince her that for Joe's own safety against poachers he has to be
taken to a nature conservancy.  He suggests the one he is associated
with in Los Angeles.
     The plot here is not tremendously adult, but it is better fleshed
out and more intelligent than the plot in the original film.  Willis
O'Brien might well have approved of the more complex story line.
Whether he would have approved of the effect would be a different
matter.  O'Brien was bitterly disappointed when a project he started to
do a second KING KONG sequel got out of his hands and eventually
mutated into KING KONG VS. GODZILLA with its man-in-a-gorilla-suit
Kong.  Here again at least in some scenes Joe is played by a man in a
suit.  At least it is a Rick Baker-designed suit that is fairly
convincing where it is used. Deep down it is John Alexander in a much
more realistic suit.  We do not have to ask if effects technician Ray
Harryhausen would have approved.  In the party scene late in the film
the older gentleman reminiscing with his wife are really Harryhausen
and Terry Moore, the star of 1949 version.  While I am on the subject
of self-references the film poster at Graumann's Chinese Theater is
from WAGON MASTER directed by John Ford and starring Ben Johnson.  John
Ford was the executive producer of MIGHTY JOE YOUNG (1949) and Ben
Johnson was Terry Moor's co-star.  Ford and Johnson are no longer with
us so I suppose this was a way of giving them some sort of an
appearance.
     Where the new version may fall short a little of the original is
in the introduction of two nefarious villains with thick foreign
accents.  Their plan to steal the giant ape, dissect him, and sell the
pieces does not seem to make financial sense.  Somehow Charlize Theron
seems to wear a little too much makeup for her character.
     It was a little surprising that Has Zimmer who did African-
flavored score for THE LION KING, and has since been specializing in
scores for films with African themes, was not chosen to do another
African score for them.  It might have something to do with his scoring
the animated THE PRINCE OF EGYPT, a film made in direct competition
with Disney.  Whatever the reason James Horner provided the score and
did an okay job, but people will not be rushing out for the soundtrack.
Also I notice that the film walks something of a narrow path trying not
to put in a bad light the animal conservancy which is, after all, not
all that different from Disney's new Animal Kingdom Park.
     In 1949 the original film was unusual for its day.  Its remake
from almost a half century later in some ways improves on the original.
It special effects have been improved upon to the point of perfection.
But the story is unexceptional, perhaps even overly cliched, for a
modern audience.  On balance I give it a 6 on the 0 to 10 scale and a
+1 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     Included with the film is a Mouseworks Cartoon.  I did not catch
the title but the subject was "extreme sports" as demonstrated by
Goofy.  It was extremely short for a Disney cartoon, being maybe two or
three minutes long.

Title
Review for Heavenly Creatures (1994)
     One of the few remaining "sacred cows" of film is imagination.
Nearly all films about imagination profess reverence.  Currently we
have the remake of MIRACLE ON 34TH STREET telling us how wonderful
childhood imagination is and the original film version made the point
even more strongly.  It is extremely remarkable when we get a film
seriously portraying a downside to imagination.  Films on this theme
include THE CURSE OF THE CAT PEOPLE and EQUUS, but not much else that
comes to mind.  Now an intelligent film has been made on this theme.
Even more surprising is the source, director Peter Jackson who
previously created BAD TASTE, BRAIN DEAD, and DEAD ALIVE.  What is
surprising is not just the theme but that the intelligence from one of
very few filmmakers who up to this film I would have accused of making
films that work only on sheer shock value.
     HEAVENLY CREATURES is a dramatization of a famous New Zealand
tabloid murder from the 1950s.  Life is not easy for Pauline Rieper
(played by Melanie Lynsky), an awkward and insecure schoolgirl from a
working-class family in Christchurch.  She is equally unhappy at home
and school and looks for some magical escape route.  Enter a transfer
student, Juliet Hulme (Kate Winslet), a bright, artistic, and magnetic
English schoolgirl from a cultured academic family.  Juliet immediately
wins Pauline's admiration for being willing to stand up to the
teachers, even correcting the French teacher's grammar.  Friendship
with Juliet awakens Pauline's imagination and intellect.  The two
outward opposites become ever-closer friends, dependent on each other
and even sexually attracted.  Together they concoct an escape fantasy
world of imagination--a middle-European realm they call Borovnia, ruled
by characters they name Charles, Deborah, and their serial killer son
Dielo.  Clay figures Juliet creates of these characters come to life in
their imagination and in startling special effects scenes.
     Jackson's screenplay, which he co-authored with Francis Walsh,
captures the rapid shifts from exhilaration to depression and back.
The two romantically fixate on Mario Lanza as the great tenor and the
king of their fantasy world.  One chance comment from one about Orson
Welles, and he is the paragon of all the world's evils--the prototype
of the mad, knife-wielding Dielo.  And with this same melodrama, they
react when their alarmed parents attempts to separate the two girls.
     The story has much more going on than initially meets the eye.
There are subtle signs of class conflict between the two families.
There is an intellectual elitism in the two girls, very much like the
elitism Maggie Smith's character exploits in THE PRIME OF MISS JEAN
BRODIE.  And, of course, there are the homophobic attitudes of the two
families anxious to separate the two girls who they see as having been
drawn too far into their relationship--with some justification.
     This is a film with more visual creativity than many fantasy
films.  In the imagination of the girls, and on the screen, fields
transform into gardens with giant butterflies and unicorns.  We travel
inside Borovnia--with its golem-like characters based on Juliet's clay
figures.  Jackson keeps his camera constantly moving as if even the
viewer is a hyperkinetic teenager.  Peter Jackson has gone from an
unpromising beginning of making nearly unwatchable films to in one leap
become a talent who deserves watching.  I rate this film +2 on the -4
to +4 scale.  It would be interesting to get the reactions of the film
from the two women who were the subjects.  Pauline Rieper (later
Parker) still lives in New Zealand.  Juliet Hulme is living in Britain
and is now a popular novelist under her current name, Anne Perry.

Title
Review for Forget Paris (1995)
     Every once in a while a love story comes along about two people
that the audience can feel are just made for each other.  They have
just the right chemistry, like Bacall and Bogart.  It can happen any
time from even an unlikely pairing.  So don't feel too bad if you don't
find that chemistry in a film like FORGET PARIS.  FORGET PARIS is the
forgettable new romantic comedy from the usually reliable writing tram
of Lowell Ganz and Babaloo Mandel (of PARENTHOOD and CITY SLICKERS) who
just happened to hit an off film this time.  Being released shortly
after FRENCH KISS by itself might make this a hard film to remember,
but the writing certainly does not help.
     Billy Crystal, the star of WHEN HARRY MET SALLY, is trying to
recapture the success of that film by starring in a similarly themed
film.  This film could even be a missing chapter from that film.  But
this time Crystal also produces, directs, and co-writes the screenplay.
I am no judge of whether he succeeded in capturing the style of the
earlier romantic comedy since neither film did a whole lot for me.
Here the story of Mickey (Billy Crystal) and Ellen (Debra Winger) is
told in flashbacks to the very impressionable Liz (Cynthia Stevenson),
the fiancee of Mickey's friend Andy (Joseph Mantegna).  Her reactions
to this rather dull love story are way over the top.  She provides
roughly the same function that canned laughter provides to a bad TV
sitcom.
     The story covers something like four years in the relationship of
a couple including some hard times.  One would expect a little bit of
aging, but the only real difference we see in Mickey and Ellen is that
there is a lot less chemistry between them at the end than there was at
the beginning.  The relationship undergoes a number of predictable
strains including secrets from their past lives, irritation family
members, jobs that are incompatible, jobs that put the characters under
stress to make life-style changes, and each person just plain not
liking the other's life-style.  Each situation is played for comic
effect and none is as endearing as the character Liz seems to think it
is.
     To pad out the romantic humor the filmmakers have thrown in some
sports humor.  Mickey, it seems, is a basketball referee for the NBA
and one who is none too popular with the fans.  This gives Crystal a
chance to contrast his height to the likes of Kareem Abdul-Jabbar.  The
pairing is not as funny as it is intended and Crystal might do well to
study films like DESIGNING WOMAN to see how to integrate sports into a
comic film.  But some attempts at humor work better than others.  A
sequence involving a pigeon does pay off with some big audience laughs,
but generally the humor is on the level of Mickey telling Ellen that
she must not use his razor to shave hair in any part of her body.
Crystal assumes the incongruity of the scene and his own basic cuteness
will make this a funny scene.  Wrong bet.  There is nothing very
winning about these two people.
     This film needs any two of more appealing characters, bigger
laughs, or a more sympathetic audience.  I rate this a 0 on the -4 to
+4 scale.

Title
Review for Handmaid's Tale, The (1990)
          Capsule review:  THE HANDMAID'S TALE preaches to the
     choir in a rather formulaic look at a dismal possible (if
     unlikely) future where women have no rights.  Robert Duvall's
     worst performance in memory highlights one of the less
     convincing arguments for feminism.  Rating: low 0.
     Back in the 1960s there were a number of science fiction films about
horrible repressive futures.  These films got their vision of the future by
a fairly simple turn-the-crank formula: pick a current hot concern; imagine
a society in which nobody or almost nobody has this concern.  Now what will
society be like with nobody worried about this issue?  Pretty ugly, right?
These films were all pretty much logical descendents of Orwell's novel 1984,
but that did it back when it was still original.  Films along these lines
include SOYLENT GREEN, Z.P.G., FAHRENHEIT 451, and THE LAST CHILD, and I
would also include SILENT RUNNING.  Eventually the public started finding
these exaggerated dystopic futures too dreary, so the ones without much
action died out and the ones with more action became mindless films such as
THE LAST CHASE and finally MAD MAX.  As a literary style it did not go away
and the occasional dystopic film like BRAZIL was still made on slightly more
abstract issues such as bureaucracy.  This year the dystopic science fiction
film is represented by THE HANDMAID'S TALE, about a future brought about by
apathy to feminist issues.
     It has been said that repressive views towards women see them as
madonnas or whores.  In this film, each woman is forced into the roles of
whore, servant, or madonna, wearing uniforms of red, white, or blue,
respectively.  99% of the women were left infertile after the plague.  If
they can afford it, these women become the madonnas; if not, they are
servants.  Those who are fertile become the handmaids.  Their job is to be
surrogate childbearers for the madonnas.  The process by which they come to
bear children starts by sending them to indoctrination centers which use
Orwellian mind control techniques, but which seem to be curiously
ineffective at winning hearts and minds.  From there they are farmed out to
homes where first they are ritually read the Biblical story of infertile
Rachel getting a child with the help of a handmaid.  After that, they are
impregnated in a curious ritual involved lying between the legs of one of
the madonnas while her husband does the dirty deed.
     The film opens with Kate (played by Natasha Richardson), her husband,
and her daughter trying to flee across the border.  Her husband is killed
and she does not know what happened to her daughter.  After the first shock,
all this she takes with a calm regret.  This means that between Margaret
Atwood's book and Harold Pinter's screenplay somebody did not know how
humans behave.  The film follows Kate through her indoctrination into the
society of handmaids and her assignment to the household of callous, selfish
evangelist Serena Joy (played by Faye Dunaway) and her flat, cardboard
husband, the Commander.  This role is quite a departure for Robert Duvall,
who usually acts in his films.  The only film that Duvall was in but
contributed less to was INVASION OF THE BODY SNATCHERS.  To director Volker
Schlondorff does the dubious honor of being the only director ever to wring
an uninteresting performance from Duvall.
     While the film was colorful, with lots of costumes, in many ways the
production values were poor.  In a scene where the main character is holding
yarn, she has two strands when seen from the front and at least six seen an
instant later from the back.  Also at one point a woman gives birth to a
surprisingly clean six-month-old baby.  And speaking of such scenes, for a
film taking a stand against the exploitation of women, this film has more
than its share of half-naked and scantily clad women  and most of the nudity
is gratuitous.
     Director Schlondorff used to direct ABC "After-School Specials" and his
style does not seem to have gotten any more subtle.  I rate this film a low
0 on the -4 to +4 scale.  Unless you embrace any film on a feminist theme, I
do not recommend THE HANDMAID'S TALE.

Title
Review for Junior (1994)
     Ivan Reitman has a spotty background directing comedies.  Films
like MEATBALLS, TWINS, and GHOSTBUSTERS I and II have had good gags but
have been rather thin on story.  DAVE seemed to indicate Reitman was
starting to get a feel for plotting and characters.  It must have been
a fluke, however, since he is back to featherweight comedies with
under-developed characters in JUNIOR.  Once you know that the idea is
to show Schwarzenegger going though the same physical changes that
pregnant women go through, you can probably think of more amusing scene
possibilities than you will actually see in this film.
     Dr. Alexander Hesse is an incredibly well-built scientist with an
Austrian accent and an aversion to babies.  Ironically, he is working
on Expectane, a drug to improve the safety of pregnancies.  When the
FDA decides that the drug needs more testing, Hesse's fast-talking
partner Dr. Larry Arbogast (Danny DeVito), thinks that human testing
will be more convincing.  Arbogast talks Hesse into a surgical
implantation of an egg, but only for the first three months.  Meanwhile
the university has evicted the two scientists from their lab space and
has replaced them with Dr. Diana Reddin (Emma Thompson), a winning but
rather awkward scientist.  Her research unwittingly provides Hesse and
Arbogast with some of the materials they need for their experiment, and
the first male pregnancy is initiated.
     It must have seemed like a comic natural to have the super-
masculine Schwarzenegger in a role with cross-gender implications, but
it is a real mistake.  Gender-crossing films like TOOTSIE and
MRS. DOUBTFIRE have been big successes for other stars, but
Schwarzenegger simply does not project personality the way that a
Dustin Hoffman or a Robin Williams does.  And Reitman intentionally
tones down Schwarzenegger's personality so that later in the film he
can appear to be more "humanized" by the experience.  The problem is
that it takes all of Schwarzenegger's strength to project any
personality at all and later it is hard to work up much interest in the
character even in his unusual predicament.  In TOOTSIE, look how well-
defined a character Hoffman creates even before any of the cross-gender
material.  Besides, Schwarzenegger already bulges oddly and making him
pregnant almost seems redundant.  Actually part of the pleasure of such
a film would be to see how a man struggles with the fatigue of carrying
the additional weight.  This makes an Austrian body-builder perhaps
less appropriate than many other actors would have been.  It is not
clear why Danny DeVito is in this film since he is not at all credible
as a scientist and his comic potential is all but ignored.  It may well
be that the film is trying to play off Reitman's previous success in
TWINS.  Similarly, Frank Langella is around to play a shady university
executive in a story that didn't seem to need a villain.  But he was
good in DAVE so Reitman seems to want to use what has worked before.
     It was obviously assumed that the situation would be so funny that
the writing seems to have been done on autopilot.  This is a film
without any well-developed character in anything but the physical
sense.  It returns again and again to common scenes of pregnancy whose
only humor value is that you are seeing a man going through the
changes.  Once you have seen Arnold complaining that his nipples are
getting sensitive and crying at soap operas, is it still supposed to be
funny to see him eating pickles and ice cream, or is that really justa
variation on the same gag?  I picture writers Kevin Wade and Chris
Conrad just making a checklist of pregnancy cliches and writing a scene
for each.  Time and again opportunities for a funnier and more
believable script are passed up for cheap gags.  At this stage of
development the drug would not have been given a suggestive trade name
like "Expectane,"  it would be called something like "Themoxodil."  To
pick up the pacing, the film throws in slapstick humor, mostly built
around Thompson's clumsiness.  But the slapstick isn't funny and it
sabotages her effort to make her character believable.  Her body
language is the best thing about this film, but the slapstick is
misplaced and even she cannot make it work.
     This is a cookie-cutter formula comedy that drags on what might
have worked as a short skit far too long.  Rate it a -1 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Flatliners (1990)
     Horror films tend to be very derivative.  They take many of the same
themes and rework them over and over.  How different is FRIGHT NIGHT from
DRACULA really?  It is very rare for me to come out of a horror film feeling
I had seen something really new for the horror film.  And, be warned,
usually when I feel have seen something new, most audiences do not like the
films.  In the last ten years there have been five horror films I have liked
in this way.  They are SOMETHING WICKED THIS WAY COMES, LIFEFORCE, PRINCE OF
DARKNESS, LADY IN WHITE, and now FLATLINERS.  FLATLINERS is a mesmerizing
horror thriller about life and death and redemption.  From about two minutes
into the film I was constantly anxious to find out what happens next.  And
when it did happen, I was never disappointed but still never appeased.
     A group of medical students are fascinated by the  brink-of-death
experience that some of their patients have had.  But their curiosity
certainly goes beyond just collecting other peoples' accounts second-hand.
As long as they have the ability to induce death and to bring people back,
why wait for it to happen by chance and to other people.  Why not go off
exploring the undiscovered country for themselves.  As one student says of
the quest to know what is beyond death, "Philosophy failed.  Religion
failed.  Now it's time for medical science to try."  So one tries it and is
brought back  But now things seem different to him and reality is not quite
the same.
     At least in theme FLATLINERS is reminiscent of some of the classic old
Karloff films like Michael Curtiz's THE WALKING DEAD, and where that film
was a little pat in its description of life after death (Karloff just had
time to describe it as "peace" before dying a second time, and more
permanently), this film is only a little less pat in other ways in its
"meaning of death."  However, it is not concentrating so much on what the
other side looks like as on what it is like to have been there and be back.
     This is a movie to see in a theater; it will lose a lot of its visual
impact on the small screen.  Almost the entire film is shot in either
twilight half-tones or at night.  The medical school has got to be the most
baroque in the world.  It would have done credit to any 1930s
expressionistic horror film.  Its architecture is almost gothic with immense
vaulting rooms; dark, dismal corridors; labs with immense statue heads as if
gods were looking on.  Director Joel Schumacher's previous THE LOST BOYS had
little to recommend it but atmosphere.  This time he has better atmosphere
and a far more compelling story to tell.
     Kiefer Sutherland (of LOST BOYS) plays Nelson, who is exploring death
partially for curiosity and partially for glory.  Julia Roberts is Rachel,
who has her own private demons to face.  Roberts has the best developed
character.  Keith Bacon is Davis, who is just a little too good to be true.
Alec Baldwin's younger brother William plays Joe, whose story is somewhat
less interesting than the others and could by itself have been an episode of
"The Hitchhiker."
     FLATLINERS is intelligently filmed and written.  It has irony but
happily not apparently tongue-in-cheek.  In short, it deserves to be a
classic horror film and may well make it.  I rate it a high +2 on the -4 to
+4 scale.

Title
Review for In the Mouth of Madness (1995)
     It is ironic that while the Western seems to be in decline and
horror films just seem to pour onto video store shelves there are more
quality Westerns being made than quality horror films.  The horror
genre is a classic case of bad films driving out the good.  The horror
genre of late has been dominated by gore, splatter, plastic prosthetic
makeup effects, teenage protagonists, predictable jump scenes, and a
tired succession of sequels and remakes.  Imagination and creativity
are becoming increasingly scarce in most horror films.  Now that
impressive visual effects are easy, filmmakers are using them in lieu
of atmosphere, style, and imagination.  One filmmaker who still does
use some style and ideas in his horror is John Carpenter.  While he
falls short of the stature even of David Cronenberg in the same genre,
Carpenter does occasionally turn out a very original piece of horror
like PRINCE OF DARKNESS or THEY LIVE.  IN THE MOUTH OF MADNESS is not
up to those two films, but it is one of his better horror exercises.
     A bit too much of the premise is obvious from the trailer, but the
story concerns an insurance investigator, John Trent (played by Sam
Neill), who has been driven mad by his recent experiences.  Neill gives
a bizarre and quirky impression of madness.  Trent's experiences
involved looking for a missing horror writer, Sutter Cane (Jurgen
Prochnow).  As a publishing executive tells Trent, "You can forget
about Stephen King, Sutter Cane by far outsells him."  (If, in fact, it
is true in the world of the film, one wonders why Trent would have to
be told how popular Cane is.)  The trail to find the horror writer
leads to a small and strange New Hampshire town, Hobbs End--the story
is an expansion of an idea by H. P. Lovecraft but, like PRINCE OF
DARKNESS, contains more than one tip of the hat to Nigel Kneale and his
QUATERMASS AND THE PIT.
     Carpenter recognizes that the most disturbing images do not
require special makeup and visual effects.  Instead his most haunting
scenes involve juxtapositions distorted just slightly out of our
reality.  There is more wrong with Hobbs End than that it seems like it
could be the setting for a horror novel, but what is wrong in the town
is artificial and a letdown after we see how the citizenry of Hobbs End
react to the secret.
     Neill's performance as a madman in the early parts of the film is
a real departure for him, but he gives no signs of a severe strain in
the events leading up to his madness.  Charleton Heston, David Warner,
John Glover, and Bernie Casey have minor roles and are under-utilized,
though Glover is certainly of some interest as a doctor with a tenuous
grip on reality.
     At heart this story is an old idea--the small town that appears
innocent and hides a deeply sinister core, but Carpenter has hung
enough interesting gimmicks on the tale that his fans probably won't
mind.  I give this film a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for People Under the Stairs, The (1992)
     This is not a review--it is a symposium of ideas about THE PEOPLE UNDER
THE STAIRS based on an after-film discussion.  It will contain spoilers in
the same sense that a road sign that says "Bridge Out" is a  spoiler.
   - Kate Pott, acknowledged film viewer, cautions us that it really would
     be unfair on the basis of one psychotic cannibal film to condemn all
     the psychotic cannibal films being made and that many are considerably
     better than THE PEOPLE UNDER THE STAIRS.
   - I think it somewhat politically simplistic for this film to suggest
     that there is sufficient money in the black ghetto for everyone to have
     a high standard of living, but that the money is all going to killer
     psychotic slumlords who, through inbreeding, have become crazy as
     bedbugs.  Even if you accepted that premise, I am not sure that their
     dementia would take the form of kidnapping children for their own and
     then, when the children become unhappy, imprisoning them in the walls
     of a house.
   - Evelyn Leeper points out that this house that appears small on the
     outside would not have walls three to four feet thick.  Much of this
     film takes place within the walls of the house and we can see the
     inside of the walls are excessively spacious.
   - Evelyn pointed out that door-to-door salesmen are a much rarer
     phenomenon than they used to be.  The few salesmen who came to the door
     could not be rendered into sufficient meat to feed the twelve growing
     children living in the walls of the house.
   - I would add that if so many door-to-door salesmen have disappeared it
     would be fairly easy for the police to pinpoint the trouble spot in the
     neighborhood.
   - I was less than pleased with a plot structure in which all but about
     ten minutes of screen time is taken up by two over-extended chases
     through the walls, basement, and roof of a single house.
   - Evelyn was not totally pleased with plot elements like having the
     African-American boy who is the main character mostly trying to earn
     enough money for a cancer operation to save his mother's life (and
     wanting to become a doctor someday) and getting advice from his kindly
     uncle Booker and his somewhat shady friend Leroy.
   - I found that in spite of the fact that our main character has found
     rooms full of money wrested from ghetto tenants, it seems unlikely that
     the explosions at the end of the film would shower only money on the
     neighbors waiting outside.

Title
Review for Widows' Peak (1994)
     The screenplay of WIDOWS' PEAK was written years ago for Maureen
O'Sullivan to play O'Hara and for Mia Farrow to play Broome.  Time
passed and Farrow took the role originally written for her mother.  It
is really a pity it was not cast that way since O'Hara had the fiery
personality of O'Hara.  One side effect is that Farrow has to sound
Irish and Richardson has to sound American.  It would not have been
nearly as difficult for Farrow to sound American and her mother to
sound Irish.  Also, Farrow is far too quiet and introspective for the
role.  Richardson has a teaspoonful more personality, but neither
actress can wrest the audience's attention from Plowright.  Adrian
Dunbar of HEAR MY SONG is present but a real disappointment in a role
that gives him little chance to fulfill the promise he showed in that
film.
     One odd note, the film steals a joke from CASABLANCA.  In a film set
after 1943, it would have been considered a film allusion.  WIDOWS' PEAK is
set in the 1920s and that makes        it a theft.
     SPOILER...SPOILER...SPOILER...SPOILER...

Title
Review for Frankenstein (1993) (TV)
          Capsule review:  This version of Mary Shelley's classic
     novel takes some chances, including actually roughly
     following the plot of the novel, while giving a new
     interpretation of the relationship between Frankenstein and
     his monster.  That would have been a real virtue if the rest
     of the production was not so bland.  As it is, this is a
     disappointingly uninvolving version of the story.  Rating: 0
     (-4 to +4).
     Last autumn we saw Francis Ford Coppola's allegedly accurate adaptation
of Bram Stoker's DRACULA.  It turned out to be more faithful than some of
the better version, particularly in some superficial ways, yet it
transformed the story into one of Dracula trying to regain his lost love, a
rather fundamental departure from the original novel.  While the old
monsters are popular, Ted Turner's organization has financed their version
of FRANKENSTEIN, also claiming to be close to the novel.  Sure enough, the
basic plot and many of its twists are faithful to Mary Shelley, but
producer/director/writer David Wicks has decided--like most people making
film versions of FRANKENSTEIN--to make some fundamental changes to the
story.  Incidentally, their is one almost totally faithful film adaptation.
It is a 1975 Swedish-Irish co-production called VIKTOR FRANKENSTEIN, or on
television, TERROR OF FRANKENSTEIN.  Leon Vitali plays the doctor and Per
Oscarsson is the monster.  Except for one scene with a seance, it is a
literal adaptation from the novel--faithful, but ponderous and dull.  Wicks'
FRANKENSTEIN is a little less faithful, but also only a little less dull.
     The film starts accurately enough with Victor having chased the monster
to the Arctic and being rescued by a ship, then telling his story as a
flashback.  Frankenstein, it turns out, is a great medical scholar, an
exaggeration of Shelley's simple student.  He uses a strange process
something like an early matter duplicator to create a man.  Of course, most
film versions say that the monster was constructed from dead bodies, but
that is a  cinematic invention.  Shelley is intentionally vague about how
the monster is created.  This creation, while unconventional, is in no way
inconsistent with the novel.  From there the plot followed is a rough
approximation of the novel, except for the addition of a strange plot device
that is really a fairly fundamental change to the story.  The monster, being
a sort of matter duplication of Victor, has a physical and psychic link with
his creator.  If the monster is wounded, Victor also gets the same wound.
This transforms the story from its usual allegory of the relationship of God
and Man to one of the two sides of a single person's personality, more like
Jekyll and Hyde.
     The film is generally a fairly lackluster adaptation.  The only
character with real empathy value is the monster himself, played by Randy
Quaid.  His makeup is a real departure from standard interpretations of the
monster.  With his stocky structure and his moustache-less beard, he
resembles something between a troglodyte and a Scottish Highlander--with
burns on his face.  Again Shelley gives us little idea of what the man-made
man looks like, except that he is eight feet tall--which even the large
Randy Quaid cannot appear.  The remainder of the cast, led by Patrick Bergin
in the title role, conveys little emotion and helps to make this version
bland.
     John Cameron's score rarely creates much of a mood either, though its
use of choral voices is somewhat unusual and lend the score much of the
interest value it has.  After a few good Turner productions, including a
very satisfying version of TREASURE ISLAND, this FRANKENSTEIN is a
disappointing and unmemorable production.  (This version can be seen several
times this month on TNT.)  I rate it a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Unbreakable (2000)
     M. Night Shyamalan seems to have one style of cinematography.
He keeps his scenes dark with heavy photographic filters.
Frequently the viewer has to work to make out the image that he is
seeing.  Some of his scenes seem carved out of darkness.  His
writing does much the same.  One needs patience to make out exactly
what he is showing the viewer.  When one finds out what UNBREAKABLE
is really about, it becomes a sly if somewhat dry joke--a view of
the familiar shown in unfamiliar terms making it almost
unrecognizable.
     The story begins following two plot lines.  One involves a baby
born in a Philadelphia hospital with two broken arms and two broken
legs.  It seems that Elijah Price (played as an adult by Samuel
Jackson) was born with a genetic deficiency that makes his bones
very easy to break.  Elijah becomes a dealer in comic book art who
is fixated on the possibility that there might be some people at the
other end of his spectrum who would be almost impossible to harm.
Another plotline involves a man who is the lone survivor of a tragic
railroad accident that killed hundreds of people.  David Dunne
(played by Bruce Willis) is something of a misfit.  His marriage to
Megan Dunne (Robin Wright) is falling apart and he really does not
have much to say to her.  But somebody has something to say to
David.  An anonymous note on his windshield asks him if he has ever
been sick a day in his life.  Come to think of it, has he?  For most
people it would be an easy question to answer, but David cannot
really remember ever being sick.  This makes him anxious to find
this person who seems to know him better than he knows himself.  And
this person seems to think he is unbreakable.
     The great mystery is not whether David can be hurt or not, a
pin could tell that in a few seconds, but where is Shyamalan going
with this buildup and will it be worth it when he gets there?  I
suppose I was delighted that one of two or three possibilities I was
expecting turned out to be the one that was true.  This is a story
that could be told with a lot of fun, but Shyamalan keeps the
proceedings grim and emotions muted to avoid tipping his hand too
soon.  The photography is very much as used in Film Noir and some of
his images are borrowed from comic book art.  One shot is filmed
between the backs of two seats on a train.  To give the feel of
comic book panels the camera moves back and forth to frame one face
and then the other between the seats.  Frequently the camera angles
are strange and disorienting, more than once turning objects
entirely upside-down.  The people we see are cold with their
emotions kept tightly bottled.  The plot unfolds very slowly and
deliberately.  There is one chase in the film and there we are less
concerned at the outcome than we are with whether the character will
hurt himself.
     As he did with THE SIXTH SENSE Bruce Willis gives a careful,
measured performance.  His marriage with the Robin Wright character
seems to have died of the cold because each bottles up any emotions.
It is difficult for the viewer to empathize with either.  Almost all
the emotion in the film is shown by Samuel Jackson and then it is
over abstractions.  He is, for example, angered when a valuable
patron turns out to be buying comic art not for himself but for his
four-year-old son.
     The surprises in this film are more complex than in THE SIXTH
SENSE, but they will be appreciated by a narrower audience.  I would
give this film a 6 on the 0 to 10 scale and a +1 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Her Alibi (1989)
          Capsule review:  Bruce Beresford (BREAKER MORANT, TENDER
     MERCIES) turns his hand to a light comedy-mystery whose most
     severe false steps are when it strays into slapstick.  The
     mystery is predictable.  Rating: +1.
     Australian director Bruce Beresford is not really someone known for
light comedy.  The major films he is known for are DON'S PARTY (1976), THE
MONEY MOVERS (1978), BREAKER MORANT (1980), and TENDER MERCIES (1982).  That
is a pretty somber set of films with the possible exception of parts of
DON'S PARTY.  He certainly is not the first director you would expect to see
doing a  light, romantic comedy-mystery, but that is just what he is doing
in HER ALIBI.
     HER ALIBI does not actually start as a light comedy.  The police find a
murder victim stabbed to death with a pair of scissors and Frank Polito
(played by James Farentino) is investigating.  We are also introduced to
Philip Blackwood (played by Tom Selleck), a mystery writer with a series of
eight or so popular mysteries to his name.  And eight was about the number
of stories he had to tell.  For four years he has been trying to squeeze out
another without success.  Then he sees Nina, a beautiful Romanian woman on
trial for murder, and decides to get involved by telling the police that she
was with him at the time of the murder.  (Do *not* try this trick at home,
boys and girls.)  Polito knows he is lying and warns him that if she murders
Blackwood, the alibi can never be questioned.  Blackwood convinces Nina to
stay at his house but he is torn between infatuation and suspicion.
     Nina is played by the svelte Paulina Porizkova.  HER ALIBI also features
several familiar actors in roles that less familiar actors could have easily
filled.  But it is still enjoyable to see the likes of the durable William
Daniels (THE GRADUATE.  television's CAPTAIN NEMO), Tess Harper, Joan Copeland,
and the ever-sinister Hurd Hatfield (THE PICTURE OF DORIAN GRAY).
     Beresford has a deft hand with drama but his occasional lapses into
slapstick undermine the mood of the film and are neither likable nor
believable.  Colin Higgins' transitions in the comparable FOUL PLAY were
handled much more smoothly.  Beresford does manage to turn an impromptu
haircut into an extremely sensual sequence which is a little surprising--
considering haircuts, I mean.  Another and unfortunately larger sequence
involving a cat is merely a dramatization of an old joke.
     HER ALIBI is a pleasant lightweight piece of entertainment.  Rate it a
+1 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     (FYI: One of my best friends is Romanian.  The Romanian spoken in this
film has the right words but is still barely recognizable as Romanian.)

Title
Review for Moby Dick (1930)
(This was posted previously, but Aaron Sherman's revuew of the current
MOBY DICK indicates that he is curious about the Barrymore version.
Others may be also.)
     This is a true and accurate synopsis of the 1930 film Moby Dick,
starring John Barrymore (as Ahab) and Joan Bennett.  Noble Johnson plays
Queequeg.  It is based on Herman Melville's classic of men and the sea.
  The film opens with the camera moving in for a look at the book
Moby Dick, or The White Whale.  The movie begins, "There never was, nor
ever will be, a braver life than the life of the whaler.  Compared to
the game they hunted the mightiest land beast was but a poodle dog."
[Boy, that Melville!  He sure can write!]
  Fade to the harbor of the New Bedford seaport.  The Mary Anne is
pulling into harbor, all eyes are on the callow young seaman doing
acrobatics on top of the mast.  Why, it's handsome young Ahab showing
off again!  Ahab comes ashore and flirts with some of the girls and
insults others.  ("If they cut into you they'd certainly get plenty of
blubber.")  Ahab sees his brother Derek escorting a new girl in town--
Faith, the parson's daughter--to church.  Ahab is struck with Faith's
beauty but decides to go to the grog shop instead of church.  There Ahab
meets Queequeg, a primitive man who carries an idol he talks to.
Queequeg becomes Ahab's sidekick.  Eventually Ahab does go to church and
flirts with Faith.
  Before long Faith is losing interest in Derek's courting because,
like all the girls, she is intrigued by the handsome Ahab.  As Ahab is
setting sail again Faith tells him that it is he, not Derek, that she
loves.  They agree to marry when Ahab returns.
  Ahab and the Mary Anne are at sea when Ahab sights Moby Dick, the
black whale with a white hump and forehead.  [This allows the use of
stock footage.]  As Ahab and his cronies chase the whale in the long
boat, Ahab takes one risk too many.  The whale turns on Ahab and bites
him.  Ahab loses a leg and it is replaced by a peg.
  When Faith sees Ahab is returning she is overjoyed.  But when she
sees the peg leg she is momentarily shocked and runs away.  Weeks later,
we see Ahab unable to get work as a whaler.  Faith asks Derek to tell
Ahab that she still loves Ahab.  Derek twists the message so Ahab thinks
Faith does not really love him.  Derek then tells Faith that Ahab has
cursed her.
  Ahab goes to sea for seven years, but not as a whaler.  Faith
realizes too late that she should not have trusted Derek.  Eagerly she
awaits Ahab's return.  Eventually Ahab manages to buy his own whaling
ship, the Shanghai Lady.  He sails it back to New Bedford to get a crew
to go after Moby Dick.
  [It should be noted that we are now fifty minutes into a seventy-
five-minute movie and are ready to start telling Melville's story.
Melville tells only the last third of the story, which, of course, is
why Moby Dick is such a thin book.]
  Ahab is unable to get a crew so must shanghai one from the brothels
and grog shops.  The meaner and nastier the crew, the better, he decided
since he really wants revenge on Moby Dick.  Once at sea, however, the
shanghaied crew is surly and unmanageable.  They are cutthroats one and
all.  There is one exception.  It is Derek who was shanghaied onto the
Shanghai Lady with the rest.  Derek finds out his brother Ahab is the
captain, but the mates don't believe it and will not let him see Ahab.
  During a storm Derek decides to break out of the hold to confront
Ahab.  The rest of the crew take this opportunity to mutiny.  With storm
and mutiny raging, Derek finds Ahab at the wheel and accuses him of
intentionally shanghaiing him.  The two fight and Ahab is winning when
Derek throws a knife into Ahab's back.  Queequeg--Ahab's old friend--
picks up Derek and breaks his back.  There is no explanation about what
happened to the mutiny, but it seems to have ended by the next scene.
  Fair weather returns, but Ahab is depressed.  He decides Moby Dick
has beaten him.  "He's licked me, Mr. Stubbs," he says.  Just then Moby
Dick is sighted.  The longboats hit the water.  Moby Dick turns on
Ahab's longboat but Ahab swims to the whale and, demoniacally laughing,
repeatedly stabs the whale with a harpoon.  Moby Dick dies.  We last see
pieces of Moby Dick being cut up on the deck of the Shanghai Lady.
  Ahab and the Shanghai Lady return to New Bedford.  There Ahab
discovers that Faith has waited for him.  The two fall into each other's
arms.

Title
Review for Aladdin (1992)
     I am not a great fan of the animated versions of fairy tales and, in
this case, Arabian Nights tales, as produced by Disney Studios.  I frankly
questioned that proclivity when I saw BEAUTY AND THE BEAST just about a year
ago.  It seemed to me at that point Disney (the studio, not the man) had
learned how to hell a story with complexity and one that worked on multiple
levels.  BEAUTY AND THE BEAST, it seemed to me, was a film that said
something about the human condition.  Now the same company makes ALADDIN.
Is it as good as BEAUTY?  Try asking if it is even as good as THE LITTLE
MERMAID.  This one is a solid disappointment.
     Let us start with the story.  I think we all know the story of Aladdin,
right?  Good.  Will somebody tell it to the good folks at Disney, please.
Disney is often less than faithful to source material.  In this case perhaps
one or two scenes of the story made it to the film.  The screenplay by Ron
Clements and John Musker (who also produced and directed) in fact is almost
a reasonable version of the modern story "The Thief of Baghdad."  The
setting has been moved from China to Arabia for reasons best know to
Clements and Musker.  In this version Aladdin falls in love with the
princess of Aqaba and sets out to win her.  Even telling that story would
not have been a bad idea, but the film goes desperately wrong with its use
of Robin Williams as the genie of the lamp.  When the genie is on the screen
we go from the usual timeless story-telling to a bunch of topical allusions
that may be amusing on first viewing, but will not be a second time.
Williams lampoons Arnold Schwarzenegger, William F. Buckley, Jack Nicholson,
Robert DeNiro, Groucho Marx, and a host of other celebrities.  Williams
totally derails any style that the film has been able to build up.  The
story-telling often just stops dead as Williams does his thing or the film
goes off into slapstick.
     At least there is something positive to say about the art and
animation, some of which is actually quite nice.  There is a cave whose
mouth is the head of a tiger that is both well drawn and well animated.
Backgrounds are intentionally blurred and then focused sharply to shift the
eye of the viewer and give a feeling of depth.  There is a very nice
sequence involving a rolling cylinder--I will not describe how it fits into
the plot. The animation is sufficient but the extremely uneven tone and the
almost total lack of fidelity to the story make this a lesser effort from
Disney.  My rating is 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Indian in the Cupboard, The (1995)
     Omri gets some unusual gifts for his ninth birthday.  His (Asian)
Indian friend Patrick (Rishi Bhat) gave him a toy (American) Indian.
And his brother found a two-foot-high wooden cupboard and gave that to
Omri.  Neither is so great a gift by itself, but together they form a
lot more than the sum of the parts.  Omri locks the Indian in the
cupboard and when morning comes he finds that strange noises are coming
from the cupboard.  When he opens it, there in place of the toy Indian
is a real living Iroquois, just about three inches tall.  Little Bear
(played by Litefoot) is bewildered to find himself plucked from 1761
and the French and Indian Wars.  Even stranger, he is so small and ina
world he does not understand.  Now Omri finds he has responsibility to
do what is right for Little Bear, a miniature Indian who thinks Omri is
a god.  Omri quickly figures out that locking a toy in the cupboard an
odd number of times brings the toy to life; an even number of times and
the toy is just a toy.  The boy wants to keep the magic cupboard a
secret until he know better what to do with his new tiny friend.  But
he tells Patrick, and Patrick is quick to turn a toy cowboy into Boone
(David Keith) a real, but somewhat goofy, cowboy.  Now the two boys
find they must protect the cowboy and Indian from the real world and
from each other.
     This is an adaptation of the popular children's book by Lynne Reid
Banks but the screenplay by Melissa Mathison (THE BLACK STALLION, E.T.)
needs more of a spark to get going.  There is potential in this story
for some interesting relationships.  Omri is, after all, huge compared
to Little Bear, while Little Bear is a warrior and a mature adult,
albeit from another world.  Each could draw on the other's strengths.
But Omri never seems to profit much from the wisdom of Little Bear and
the child remains father to the man.  Little Bear is treated more an
interesting pet than an intelligent adult.  Instead the plot is tied up
with the over-acted Boone, wild and weird, who never becomes much more
than a caricature.  The personalities of the solid and intelligent
Little Bear and the silly Boone never mesh on the screen.
     Seeing this film on the same day I saw the 1957 film THE
INCREDIBLE SHRINKING MAN, I found it clear that visual effects have
come a long way since the 1950s.  Most of the scenes combining
characters of each scale are utterly believable.  There is some problem
with Little Bear being more in focus than his background, but I think
Jack Arnold would have loved to have the effects technology for his
film.  Yet Arnold was able to give far more interest value to his
characters than Frank Oz ever manages here.
     THE INDIAN IN THE CUPBOARD wastes opportunities to use its clever
premise in any but the most superficial ways.  This is a film that
shows more technique than imagination.  I give it a +1 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Blue Sky (1994)
     The year is 1962 and Major Hank Marshall (Tommy Lee Jones), a
nuclear engineer, is advising the U.S. Army on nuclear testing.
Meanwhile his wife Carly (Jessica Lange), a sexually precocious child
in the body of an adult woman, is doing everything she can to embarrass
him.  She sees herself as a Marilyn Monroe type and flirts with
reckless abandon.  She is the main reason Hank has been reassigned from
a pleasant posting in Hawaii to a disagreeable one on an ugly Army base
in Alabama.  Hank tries to keep a lid on the family problems in public
and to keep the two daughters happy, but it is clear their mom needs
more care and is more of a child than the children are.  Hank has
problems at home and with his work.  Hank advocates nuclear underground
testing when his commanders and the Atomic Energy Commission want to
continue atmospheric testing.  At first this seems an odd pairing of
plots.  One plot concerns a family disintegrating because of the wife's
childish behavior and her husband's vain attempts to cover for her and
to maintain an even keel.  The other plot deals with national nuclear
policy.  And it is well into the film before the viewer has much of an
idea where the story could possibly be going with two such diverse
strands of plot.  Eventually they will come together in a story about,
of all things, character.
     This was the last film directed by Tony Richardson, who is best
known for his 1963 TOM JONES and who died three years ago.  It may well
also be the last film we will see from the now long defunct Orion
Pictures.  It is easy to see why this film waited so long for a release
given the intelligence of the scripting and the originality of the
plot.  BLUE SKY was also a little lucky in that like CHINA SYNDROME and
MAROONED, the subject matter happened to become considerably more
topical after the film's completion than at the time the film was made.
     Jessica Lange gets top billing, though her acting shows more than
a little of her character in FRANCES.  She is fleshy and sensual.  But
at the same time she is annoyingly like a spoiled child given to
tantrums, not unlike the character's idol, Marilyn Monroe.  Tommy Lee
Jones gives his character just the right blend of military
officiousness and occasional tenderness.  Powers Boothe, always good,
plays Hank's commanding officer who mixes into Hank's personal life as
well as his professional life.
     Richardson shows a visual sense in some of his more interesting
scene segues.  He takes us from the paradise of a Hawaiian beach to a
nuclear-devastated landscape.  His recreation of the early 60s has just
about the right look, particularly the army base with its rundown
post-war housing.  In short his final film is one of his best in years.
Lange's and Jones's performances and the originality of the story give
this one a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Armageddon (1998)
     They say that any film that opens with an overhead view of a city
has got to be bad.  Another bad opening is the words "A Jerry
Bruckheimer Film."  Bruckheimer's name indicates that it will likely
have more action than sense.  ARMAGEDDON is our second film of the
season to deal with a possible meteor impact on the Earth and it out-
Bruckheimers Bruckheimer.
     What is there to say about the plot?  An asteroid knocked from
orbit is on a collision course with Earth.  Such a collision, we are
told in the pre-credit narration by Charlton Heston, destroyed the
dinosaurs.  (Curiously, the president of the NRA resists suggesting we
could prevent collisions if only we were all armed with large rocks.)
The film gets off with a bang as in the first minutes we see the first
of the mini-meteor showers, all of which seem predominantly to target
land masses and major cities.  (Being fair, there is a line in the
dialog saying that they are hitting a wider area.) Later in the film we
see the destruction of three cities including Shanghai.  The latter
looks like the Aberdeen area of Hong Kong.  (Jerry, there are no junks
in Shanghai any more.  It's a propaganda thing.  They got rid of the
junks.)
     The survival plan is to place a nuclear bomb in the core of the
asteroid.  NASA, in an effort headed by Dan Truman (Billy Bob Thornton)
needs to train its astronauts to drill to the core of the asteroid.
Truman calls in foremost drilling expert Harry Stamper (Bruce Willis)
to train the astronauts and Stamper convinces Truman it would be easier
to train drillers to be astronauts.  With the fate of the Earth in the
balance Truman makes this dubious concession.  Astronauts, it seems,
can be trained to know all they need to know in two weeks, but it takes
a lifetime to know how to be a good driller. So Stamper's drilling crew
are on their way to space.  Of course, first comes the training, with
our high-spirited drilling team making life miserable for the NASA
trainers.  Then after the training comes the even more riotous R&R, and
these drillers are really wild by NASA standards.  At no point does it
seem to dawn on our happy drill team that losing the whole Earth with
its Michelangelos and its Pizza Huts could be a real bummer for all of
them.  Finally comes the dramatic cliche-ridden space mission, complete
with gun threats, a "which-wire-to-clip?" ticking bomb threat, and a
"success-with-two-seconds-to-spare" climax.  It is amazing how much of
GOLDFINGER they could shoehorn into this film.
     That ARMAGEDDON should follow so closely on the heels of the
similar but far more intelligent DEEP IMPACT is a near ironclad
guarantee that ARMAGEDDON will suffer by comparison. Even so the
difference in quality beats the point spread by a gap as big as the
state of Texas.  This film is a sort of THE DIRTY DOZEN IN SPACE, and
if nothing else it proves you can get into space piecing together
nothing but off-the-shelf cliches.  It fact apparently it took six
writers or more to find all the cliches necessary.  The main character
and his crew, for example, are based on the old John Wayne film, THE
HELLFIGHTERS.  There are some scenes of the astronaut training in which
the viewer may not know what is happening or why it is funny without
having seen THE RIGHT STUFF.  ARMAGEDDON, it seems, was not so much
written as assembled after a scavenger hunt.  Then there are the in-
jokes.  Without knowing what films have been released this summer the
viewer may not realize why one character is named Truman and or why the
visual joke with the toy Godzillas.  It is a pity that the film did not
come out next year when the scavengers could have raided DEEP IMPACT to
at least get some idea how Earth people react to impending world-
destruction.  The "we-all-wait-and-pray" reaction shown in this film
seemed hokey when George Pal used it in WHEN WORLDS COLLIDE.  And Pal's
street riots in WAR OF THE WORLDS were more realistic than what we see
in ARMAGEDDON.
     Bruce Willis plays an unflappable expert, always keeping things on
an even keel even in the face of trouble like the world as we know it
possibly coming to an end.  This means that he never has to do much in
the way of acting.  He just plays his usual bland character.  Will
Patton made a memorable Civil-War-esque villain in THE POSTMAN.  Here
as the second in command on the team he does not play so flamboyant a
character, but he is always watchable.  Steve Buscemi and Peter
Stormare who were the mismatched partners in crime in FARGO are
reunited as a wisecracking American driller-astronaut and a burned-out
(in more ways than one) Russian Cosmonaut.  Together the two of them
account for about 87% of the interest value of the crew in space.  Liv
Tyler, playing Stamper's daughter and the lover of another of the
flying drillers, seems to dissolve into a one- woman Greek chorus in
the second half of the film.  She silently looks on, watching the
action from Mission Control and strikes poses.
     More and more we are seeing a style of film editing based on the
comic book.  It made sense for films like THE CROW that were based on
comic books.  Here we have in the action sequences many short cuts,
each showing about what you would see in one panel of a comic.
Sometimes the camera lingers over a single static and over-composed or
melodramatic image, as if one is to pause over the composition.  For
example, Liv Tyler may be standing at attention in front of an American
flag watching her father and her lover blast off.  In another scene we
see just her hand touching a television screen that a moment before
showed what was happening in space and now has only static.  Buried
deep in the film are about fifteen minutes of beautiful state-of-the-
art special effects. These at times reach the level of breathtaking.
But everything else about this film is formula.  The action cliches do
generate the same suspense they always do.  But the thought that went
into DEEP IMPACT only points up the total cynicism about what the
audience wants that went into making this overly familiar mess.  As a
science fiction movie, it has more action than thought.  I give it a 4
on the 0 to 10 scale and a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     Nobody seemed to care much about my comment that the angle of
tipping seemed to vary erratically from scene to scene in TITANIC, but
I will make another comment about the geometry of the action.  When
cities are shown being hit by smaller meteor showers in ARMAGEDDON, the
meteors should be coming in on parallel or near parallel courses.  They
come in from different directions.  Is the idea that they blew apart
and just happen to be converging again?

Title
Review for Perdita Durango (1997)
     CAPSULE: Lots of gunplay, some humor.  The further adventures from
one of the characters from WILD AT HEART.  The title character runs
into a sexy Mexican Santeria priest and they decide to kidnap some
bland Americans and eat them.  Pretty weird stuff.  Rating: 4 (0 to
10), 0 (-4 to +4)
   - Directed by Alex de la Iglesia.
   - Rosie Perez in an obviously very counter-culture film.  Javier
     Bardem also stars as the killer and Santeria priest Romeo
     Doloroso.  Screamin' Jay Hawkins also appears.  Perez plays
     Perdita Durango, the same character played by Isabella Rossellini
     in David Lynch's WILD AT HEART.
   - No characters to identify with.  Main character wants to kidnap
     and eat people to make a statement.
   - Lots of running gags, explosions, gunplay, running gags, cars
     hitting people, and running gags.
   - A little of John Waters-like take on American culture.
   - Colorful but overly long.
   - Obviously a film that got a budget but it is not clear the
     intended audience besides hip midnight crowds.
   - Possibly lost on Canadian or American audience:  Romeo robs a bank
     disguised as Santo, a Mexican movie hero and professional
     wrestler.
   - Simon Boswell's musical score is very dramatic.

Title
Review for Little Odessa (1994)
     Joshua Shapira is back in Brighton Beach.  This is not necessarily
good news for his family.  Joshua's parents came from Russia to Little
Odessa, the Russian Jewish section of Brighton Beach, Brooklyn many
years ago and raised two sons, Joshua and Reuben.  Years ago Joshua
fell in with the organizatsya (Russian Mafia), committed a contract
killing, and fled.  Now he is back for another contract kill.  He wants
to come and go unnoticed by his family, but his younger brother Reuben
hears of his presence and arranges to contact Joshua.  Reuben has
already been skipping school for weeks and hiding the fact from his
parents.  Now he is drawn to the influence of his brother.  Rueben's
father Arkady must try to hold on to his son, but his position is badly
compromised by his own long-standing affair with an immigrant woman.
What follows is not so much the morality play it might sound, but a
bleak and at times violent story of crime in a community that has not
been portrayed in film before.
     The dark spirit of this film is underscored by dim or occasionally
harsh lighting.  In addition, while the film is in English, some of the
dialogue in Yiddish and Russian and not all of the Yiddish is
translated for the audience, occasionally adding to the dark tone of
the film.
     LITTLE ODESSA was written and directed by twenty-five--year-old
James Gray, who already has a very sure hand at directing and has
assembled a surprisingly well-known cast for so young a director's
first film.  Reuben Shapira is played by Edward Furlong, probably best
known from TERMINATOR II, but he also was the main character in A HOME
OF OUR OWN.  Joshua Shapira is played by Tim Roth, who already has a
distinguished career playing creeps of various sorts including the
effete but ruthless Cunningham in ROB ROY and the restaurant-robbing
"Honey-Bunny" in PULP FICTION.  His Joshua is a mass of contradictions,
loving his family but as ready to reach for his gun and point it
between a victim's eyes as he would be to reach for a house key and put
it in a lock.  Maximilian Schell plays Arkady, the immigrant father who
just cannot relate to his two sons.  When they were just small children
he read them CRIME AND PUNISHMENT.  Neither of his sons can respond to
his Old World intellectualism and neither can summon much respect for
him.  Also present in the cast are Moira Kelly and Vanessa Redgrave,
the latter as the main characters' mother dying of cancer.
     One false move seems to be the music assembled by Dana Sano.  It
draws heavily on Russian source music, but much of that is choral
music.  Somehow this conjures up images of the Russian Orthodox Church
and just does not feel like the music of the Russian Jewish community.
While I am willing to be corrected, I suspect that this music would be
no more popular with Russian Jewish immigrants than with any other
immigrants from any other part of Europe.
     LITTLE ODESSA is a complex and disturbing film with a dark tone.
It may have a teenage main character, but it is not a film for young
audiences.  There is a good deal of violence in the film, but it is
more implied than shown and there is very little blood.  This film gets
a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Star Trek: Insurrection (1998)
     Maybe STAR TREK is growing up and what we are seeing with STAR
TREK: INSURRECTION is really a good thing.  For once the Next
Generation crew are not out trying to save the universe from a mad man
trying to destroy it.  The basic issue being discussed is one that gets
seen in American courtrooms every year.  The issue is one of eminent
domain. Does the Federation have the right to relocate a group of six
hundred colonists from a planet and turn that planet into a boon to the
entire human race?  Do the colonists have a right to say they do not
want to give up their planet at the expense of the greater number of
people?  It is an important legal point.  Certainly there are examples
in the past when relocating people has been a great injustice.  What is
at stake are the principles of the Federation.  But do we really care,
given that we are living in a decade when many large institutions seem
to be betraying their founding principles?  The idea that the
Federation of Planets may be no better than many of our own government
agencies is hardly shocking today.
     This principle of possession is an odd basis for what is in large
part an action film.  It certainly is a complex moral issue.  Or it
could have been a complex moral issue if the writers had the courage to
leave it ambiguous.  But not surprisingly they did not have that
courage.  Rest assured that when the movie is over--and in fact from
very early in the film--the viewer will know who the good guys are and
who the bad guys are.  And what is more--I doubt that this is a
spoiler--it is the pretty people who will be the good guys and the ugly
people who will be the bad guys.  So if the themes are a little more
sophisticated than usual, the approach is not.
     The Ba'ku are an advanced race who have abandoned their advanced
technology and returned to a simple life in which they can do simple,
pleasant, creative tasks all day long.  They have found themselves a
planetary Shangri-La that keeps them forever young.  It is the kind of
non-technological utopia where everybody has nice creative tasks like
baking bread or making pottery and nobody within range of the camera
has to do laundry, scrub mildew stains, or clean toilets.  But another
race, the Son'a, are plotting to get control of the Ba'ku's planet so
that the Federation can analyze the magic of the planet.  The Son'a
people look like they were inspired by the Katherine Helmond character
of BRAZIL.  They look like they started human looking but have had too
many facelifts so the flesh is pulled too tightly over their skulls.
It is a kind of nightmare that people must have in affluent
neighborhood of Los Angeles.  There is also something of The Shadow in
them as they and the Federation were able to build a large observation
station within yards of the Ba'ku encampment, all the while clouding
Ba'ku minds so they were never detected.
     The Enterprise crew get involved on the side of the Ba'ku,
defending their right to monopolize the positive effects of their
planet.  Curiously this film almost directly contradicts the theme of
STAR TREK II: THE WRATH OF KHAN in which Spock tells us that the needs
of the many outweigh the needs of the few.
     The actors playing crew of the Enterprise do their standard
competent acting job.  It may take a little while to get up to speed
remembering the personalities of each of the characters as one viewer
told me.  But they step through their roles with performances that are
equally without flaw or excitement.  Even the former great Patrick
Stewart is a competent but pedestrian starship captain. Rejoining the
crew is Michael Dorn as Worf who manages to be assigned to the
Enterprise or to Deep Space Nine, whichever this agent prefers at the
moment.  F. Murray Abraham is the alpha Son'a, but even he cannot put
much passion into his role.  The actors are much upstaged by the usual
exquisite Enterprise effects.  Views of the old starship tacking in and
out of nebulae where this film shows its real artistry.
     The STAR TREK: INSURRECTION might make a decent episode or two of
the TV-series, but it has hardly the makings of a classic film.  It
just is not sufficiently involving.  I give it a 5 on the 0 to 10 scale
and a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Virus (1995) (TV)
     Riding the tide of the current interest in emerging viral diseases
comes an NBC made-for-TV film, VIRUS, broadcast on Monday, May 8.  This
is Roger Young's adaptation of the novel OUTBREAK by Robin Cook with
Armand Mastroianni directing.  People who remember my review of the
recent movie OUTBREAK know I have a very specific interest in fiction
and non-fiction about emerging and extremely virulent diseases,
especially Ebola.  I suppose this is a morbid fascination, but in my
uninformed estimation, and that of a few other people I have read,
viral diseases, mostly being uncovered as Africa develops, constitutea
greater threat to human life than nuclear weapons ever did.  This is in
large part because, for now at least (and contrary to expectation),
humans are smart enough to restrain themselves from loosing the
destruction that a nuclear war would bring.  But a virus does not wait
for human permission to break out.  And the story of the Ebola virus is
far from over.  At the time OUTBREAK was released there had been three
acknowledged outbreaks of Ebola.  Ebola Zaire occurred in an isolated
region and it burned itself out quickly.  In some experts' opinions it
is still not clear why Ebola Sudan did not become a worldwide
catastrophe.  (Ebola Reston, chronicled in Richard Preston's best
seller THE HOT ZONE, apparently had only flu-like symptoms in humans.)
Since OUTBREAK was released there came to light rumors of a fourth
outbreak on the Ivory Coast last November.  And as I write this the
most important news story in the world--though certainly not the best
covered by the news media--is that there is a fifth outbreak of Ebola
in a population center in Zaire.  We are very likely still at the
really early stages of the story of the war between humans and the
Ebola virus.  We still do not know the animal host that serves as its
breeding ground, and it keeps on breeding.  And the forests of the
world may harbor hundreds of such viral diseases with which humans have
yet to make contact.
     Well, on a lighter note we have this film run on NBC, based on the
novel by Robin Cook.  Cook is absolutely the wrong person to write a
good thriller about Ebola.  He writes stories about conspiracies in or
near the medical community.  When you are writing a story about a
disease as dangerous as Ebola is all by itself, you do not need human
bad guys.  That is the same mistake that the film OUTBREAK made.  Here
it is not so much a mistake as a disaster.  While OUTBREAK soured in
the final third, this was a bad film almost from the word "go."  This
is primarily just a reprise of a favorite Hollywood plot of the damsel
fighting the nasty conspiracy or evil people.  Yes, this particular
outbreak of Ebola is brought on as a plot by some nasty villains who
have this reason why they want to see this potential worldwide
cataclysm take place.  The endangered damsel is Dr. Marissa Blumenthal
(played by Nicollette Sheridan), a brilliant new hire at the Center for
Disease Control.  She just happens to be drop-dead beautiful, wears
lots of makeup, and has carefully styled hair.  She looks just exactly
like any intelligent CDC doctor would never look.  And she is very
quickly getting all the plum responsibilities.  Of course there is some
suspicion that is because she is living with the influential Dr. Ralph
Harbuck (William Devane who acted with Sheridan previously on KNOT'S
LANDING).  Her success seems odd because she seems to have to have
explained to her some very obvious safety precautions in the maximum
security lab (like negative air pressure so air blows in rather than
out).  And if you see nothing ridiculous in someone in so important a
position knowing so little, wait until you hear the motive of the
conspirators!  I will not spoil the plot here, but it is a real doozy.
     VIRUS is a poorly conceived thriller that sidesteps everything
that really would be interesting about an Ebola outbreak in favor of an
overused plot.  I would give it a -1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Whole Wide World, The (1996)
[Note that the follow-up is set to rec.arts.sf.written rather than
rec.art.sf.movies.  This was done on purpose.  -Moderator]
     In 1934 Robert E. Howard's friends called him "the best pulp
writer in the whole wide world."  These days that title would more
likely go to Edgar Rice Burroughs or H. P. Lovecraft.  However, in some
order, the next two names probably would be Walter Gibson and Robert
E. Howard.  Howard invented the popular genre of fantasy novel today
called "Sword and Sorcery."  His most popular character is, of course,
Conan of Cimmeria (a.k.a. Conan the Barbarian) who with a powerful
sword and a rudimentary intelligence fights the powers of Black Magic
in a prehistoric world of monsters and sorcerers.  (Of course, the
sword was made more powerful and the intelligence more rudimentary in
the 1982 John Milius film CONAN THE BARBARIAN and its 1984 sequel CONAN
THE DESTROYER, both starring Arnold Schwarzenegger.) But THE WHOLE WIDE
WORLD is not the story of larger-than-life people and huge mystical
events, it is more whimper than bang.  In 1934 a schoolteacher and
aspiring writer, Novalyne Price, met and got to know Bob Howard.  Years
later, in probably the only piece of her writing that ever got any
attention, she told the story of that friendship in a memoir entitled
ONE WHO WALKED ALONE.  That memoir is the basis of THE WHOLE WIDE
WORLD.
     Price (played by Renee Zellweger who currently also has the co-
starring role in JERRY MAGUIRE) is introduced to Howard (Vincent
D'Onofrio) by a mutual friend.  Most of the town of Cross Plains in
rural West Texas think of Howard as being a little strange and
unbalanced.  The truth is that most of the town is probably right.
Howard's life, other than his writing, is owned and jealously guarded
by his sickly mother. Howard takes care of his mother is some ways that
are more personal than most sons would and most of his world revolves
around his mother.  His one outlet is his typewriter where he turns
what are little more than expanded adolescent fantasies into adventure
prose, often shouting out that prose as he writes a story.  Price
intrudes on the relationship between the Howard and his mother to make
friends with the twenty-eight-year- old writer.  She maintains a
relationship that goes little beyond the platonic with the stocky
child-man.  She herself would like to be a good writer in the classic
sense and has a hard time telling Howard that he should aspire to
writing more than his swaggering fantasies.
     The great irony, of course, but one that the narrative never
admits except by its very existence, is that Price is 180 degrees
wrong.  There can be as much art to writing an adolescent fantasy
really well as there can be to describing the real world.  Her own
well-observed description of her dating period is of interest only in
that it sheds light on the forces that formed the pulp fiction she
looked down upon.  On the other hand Howard perhaps in innocence never
doubted that his swaggering stories were the gull-darnedest best
writing around.  And he was, in fact, writing a literature that once it
was rediscovered in the 1960s would never be out of print and would be
an inspiration to generations of writers.  Price's position in the
world of literature today is as a footnote, remembered as the woman who
dated Howard and whose reminiscences gave us a look into his personal
life.  This subtext is more of interest than the actual text of the
film.
     Vincent D'Onofrio is already establish as one of our better
feature actors.  Since he played the doomed Private Pyle in FULL METAL
JACKET he has had an enviable succession of character roles.  Renee
Zellweger is a graduate of horror films who has lucked into having two
star-making roles (JERRY MAGUIRE being the other) on the screen in one
Christmas season.  This is Dan Ireland's first time directing, though
he has produced, or executive-produced, such diverse films as the 1988
film TWISTER, PAPERHOUSE, and WHORE.  He does a reasonable job, though
fails to keep the characters consistently interesting.  Occasionally he
goes in for some hammy photography tricks like crudely darkening a
strip at the top of the screen to create the effect of a darkened sky.
     It is not clear that this film really stands well on its own.  If
it were a work of fiction it would just be a story of the dating
between two people who were not really very interesting in the final
analysis.  THE WHOLE WIDE WORLD gives little feel for the sort of
stories that Howard was writing at the time, except for their
overwhelming silliness and juvenility.  And certainly the stories will
bear that interpretation.  Where the story gets its real impetus is not
from the endings that Price sees in the story, but in the beginnings
that she does not appreciate.  I give this film a high +1 on the -4 to
+4 scale.

Title
Review for Journey to the Center of the Earth (1993) (TV)
     Science fiction year on television continues unabated and now takes a
nose-dive straight down.  JOURNEY TO THE CENTER OF THE EARTH has absolutely
no connection to the story by Jules Verne, as I am sure the spirit of Verne
would want to impress on each and every one of us.
     The plot involves an eccentric scientist (played by F. Murray Abraham)
who believes there is a world inside the Earth.  He builds a mole machine
that looks like the nose of an airplane, a tank tread, and a rocket engine.
He sinks into the unknown.  Ten years later, his nephew is planning his own
mole machine only to discover that a mysterious industrialist has already
built the thing.  It looks like a tube of toothpaste with rockets set
backwards on some tank treads.  A crew of young hunks is chosen and the
whole bunch heads off into the inner earth.  Sound silly?  No, the silliness
is just beginning.  I didn't even mention that the mole machine has a
holographic personality, a woman's head floating in a blue bubble.  Then
there is the piece of the "Book of Knowledge" that looks like an executive's
desk decoration but which was actually spit up by Mt. Vesuvius.  One thing
it does not look like is anything you could call a book.
     Now once inside the Earth--where they get by diving into an erupting
volcano--they find a rather diffident Abominable Snowman whom they teach
English in seconds using an electronic device they happen to have in the
mole machine.  The scholar on the trip wants to name the snowman Daedalus,
which the scholar thinks is the name of a Greek God (Daedalus was a mortal,
not a god).  Everyone else calls the Snowman the supremely inappropriate
name Dallas.  Also in the interior of the Earth are some things that look to
us like manta rays with vampire fangs.  There are also prehistoric
troglodytes and a 3000-year-old mastermind living in something that looks
like a lobster shell being fed by tubes of green fluid.  This is clearly a
series with more imagination than intelligence.
     The look of the series varies a great deal.  Initially there is some
beautiful footage of volcanic eruptions.  The sets of the interior of the
Earth look very plastic.  Perhaps most irritating is the wipe between scenes
and when the program goes to a commercial: the entire picture seems to get
sucked into a hole at the center of the picture, through the miracle of
morph special effects.
     To make a long story short, in the battle for capturing science fiction
fans to new series, JOURNEY TO THE CENTER OF THE EARTH is a non-combatant.
If you missed the pilot, you missed all there is going to be.

Title
Review for Indochine (1992)
          Capsule review:  There is human drama, political
     spectacle, and beautiful scenery in this DR. ZHIVAGO of
     Vietnam.  A story of a love triangle is told against the
     backdrop of the Vietnamese revolt against French imperialism.
     Recommended.  Rating:  +3 (-4 to +4).
     INDOCHINE is a DR. ZHIVAGO for Indochina/Vietnam.  Like DR. ZHIVAGO, it
is an almost melodramatic love triangle story set against the backdrop of a
country in revolution.  It is a story of people living through the death of
one world they knew and the birth of another world where they must survive.
     Eliane (played by Catherine Deneuve) is a very independent French woman
who runs a rubber plantation in French Indochina in the 1930s.  As the film
opens she is attending the funeral of two close Indochinese friends.  She
adopts their young daughter and tries to bring up young Camille (played by
Linh Dan Pham) in the ways of the French aristocracy.  Camille tries to be
French, but we see her as much more the same flesh as the workers that
Eliane occasionally beats.  Into this relationship comes Jean-Baptiste
(played by Vincent Perez), a handsome French naval officer.  Eliane falls
for Jean-Baptiste, having a short passionate affair with him.  Then Jean-
Baptiste saves Camille from a terrorist and mother and daughter discover
that they love the same man.  The tension tears the small family apart and
Camille runs away from home.  Traveling on foot on her own gives Camille a
chance to see what the French colonial power is really doing to her country.
Eventually she becomes a  pawn in the Vietnamese revolt against the French.
     Director Regis Wargnier has an eye for the stunning scenery of Vietnam,
both natural and in the native Vietnamese cultural costumes.  The film takes
its time, 158 minutes, to tell a story that covers a long span in the
characters' lives.  While the film's sympathies are obviously against the
French occupation, the political viewpoint is somewhat understated.
Wargnier's hand is considerably more subtle than Bernardo Bertolucci's was
in films such as 1900 and THE LAST EMPEROR.
     INDOCHINE is intelligent and entertaining, certainly one of the best
films of 1992.  I give it a +3 on the -4 to +4 scale.
[Seen at the Loew's Theater in Red Bank, NJ.]

Title
Review for Kull the Conqueror (1997)
     Last year we had the film THE WHOLE WIDE WORLD tell us about the
personality of Robert E. Howard who from rural Texas spun yarns of
barbarians fighting sorcerers.  His chief character was Conan but some
of his stories were about King Kull and took place in an earlier
never-was.  Kevin Sorbo, who plays TV's Hercules-with-pants stars as
the title barbarian.  The chief problem with this film is that it tells
its story without worry too much what its audience is.  The plot is a
little lightweight for an adult audience and has a little too much
sex-play for a children's film.
     Kull (Kevin Sorbo) is a barbarian fighter come to join an army in
a country with an old and unbalanced king.  The king has several sons
fighting for the throne.  In a fit of anger the old king kills some of
his sons and Kull fights the king to stop him.  Mortally wounded the
old king names the angry barbarian newcomer as his successor.  Suddenly
Kull is a king with new enemies trying to steal his kingdom.  And his
enemies are willing to make bonds with the forces of evil including an
old sorceress, Akivasha (Tia Carrere) who is revived from the dead to
be an ally of the vengeful brothers.
     The film is written by Charles Pogue who gave us DRAGONHEART last
summer.  While it is not a highly ambitious goal to capture Robert E.
Howard's style in a script, he does a reasonable job.  The villains
could have had a little more depth.  Of course one of Kull's better
villains, Thulsa Doom, was borrowed for CONAN THE BARBARIAN.  Conan
lived well after Doom in Howard's pseudo-history.  Here the problem was
the script had times when it was a little hard to follow and there was
perhaps a little too many "Shall I undress now, your highness?" scenes
for a film essentially intended for adolescent audiences.
     Director John Nicoletta makes unfortunately makes little effort to
preserve the period feel and it is here that the film falls down the
most.  The horses are shoed and have bridals that would look too modern
in a Civil War film.  But Nicoletta's biggest mistake is in allowing
Joel Goldsmith's totally misplaced main theme.  It is difficult to
evoke so ancient a period with electric guitars and Joel's attempt is
merely jarring and obnoxious.  The visual effects are not always
convincing, including some bad mattes, but for me that is a small
fault.
     Sorbo is not the most exciting actor in the world.  Charleton
Heston claimed he was cast in a lot of historical films because people
thought he had a historical sort of face.  I am told by one of the
women that Sorbo's great virtue is his pectorals.  But Sorbo does not
really evoke a historical period.  Part of it may be that he never
dresses for the period.  As with the Conan films, there is an odd mix
of cultures and races in the primeval world.  Most of the sets are
Egyptian-looking.  Sorbo's sidekicks include a priest of an unknown
cult played by Litefoot, who played the title role of INDIAN IN THE
CUPBOARD.  Tia Carrere is of Chinese descent, I believe.  Then there is
Harvey Fierstein as a pirate captain.  I cannot honestly say he was
badly cast since had I never seen him before he might have not seemed
all that strange in this role.  For once his gravelly voice might have
made him seem tough.
     Tone down the sex and this might have made a decent matinee film.
As it is there is a lot of sex but no nudity and a lot of violence with
virtually no blood.  I rate this one a high 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Arguing the World (1998)
     ARGUING THE WORLD is a chronicle of political thought in the
United States from the late 1930s though the 1980s.  More precisely it
is a study of four 20th Century political philosophers--Daniel Bell,
Nathan Glazer, Irving Howe, and Irving Kristol--who began their careers
in political philosophy as friends at CCNY, the City College of New
York, in 1937.  They all came from similar backgrounds.  They lived in
New York City where the sidewalks were often decorated with political
street speakers, and even before college each was immersed in political
thought.  One tells how his sister would take him to see Clifford Odets
plays, another how in front of his home were two buildings, the
synagogue and the Young People's Socialist League.  Born into poverty,
all four turned to Marxism as the hope for the poor of the world.  This
was a time when the revolution in Russia was fresh and new.  Many
Americans, from a distance of thousands of miles, thought that
Communism was in the process of saving the Soviet Union.  Take four
young radical thinkers, already drunk with politics, and send them to
CCNY and what develops is just what one would expect.  CCNY was then
one of the radical campuses of the day.  It was boiling over with
excited political debate.  As writer/director Joseph Dorman seems to
imply, the teachers were mediocre, but the best education was to be had
in the cafeteria where there were constant agitated debates.  The room
had a series of alcoves and different groups chose specific alcoves as
their turf.  Alcove One was where the pro-Trotsky students congregated.
Alcove Two was where the pro-Stalin students gathered.  (One wonders
what became of them.)  Another alcove would be the ROTC candidates.
These four Jewish intellectuals were Alcove One regulars.
     ARGUING THE WORLD traces the four through the war years with two
going into the military.  With the conquest of Nazism it seemed that
the world was ready for the Socialist ideal.  However, their view of
Stalin and of Communism changed with the Moscow trials and the purges
and executions of military leaders.  They started founding and/or
writing for magazines like "The Partisan Review" and "Commentary."
Irving Kristol started having a significantly different view from the
others during the McCarthy anti-Communist Movement.  While he did not
think much of Joseph McCarthy as a person, he defended McCarthyism.
     What has been a minor irritation with the film to this point
becomes more obvious and at the same time more serious.  One would not
write a biography of Charles Darwin without a detailed explanation of
evolution.  Dorman does not seem prepared to actually present the
beliefs of his four subjects in any great detail.  While the four
substantially agreed, it would have been useful to be told the
substance of their beliefs, but it was not important to understanding
their history.  But at this point, when they start to diverge in
opinion it becomes frustrating just to be told that Kristol agreed with
McCarthy's goals and Howe did not. These are deep and complex men with
complex ways of thinking, and to reduce their thought to so superficial
a level is a disappointment for the viewer.  Dorman wants to tell us
about the four men but not bother to tell us really who they are.  We
want to know Kristol's reasoning that led to his agreement with
McCarthy.  We want to know the reasoning the others had for their
different viewpoints.
     There is a further dividing of the ways in the 60s protest
movements and particularly in the relationship with the Students for a
Democratic Society.  The SDS was the self-styled successor of the
previous generation's intellectual movement.  But the four saw the SDS
as naive and utopian.  Instead of endorsing the SDS, each found himself
disagreeing with the SDS and Tom Hayden, the leader of the SDS,
attributed this to stodginess and de facto conservatism.
     There was further divergence of opinion based on experience of the
late 60s student protest movements. Nathan Glazer by this point was a
professor at Berkeley where the students were able very much to disrupt
the academic environment with impunity.  Glazer was called upon to
negotiate and in the process lost most of his respect for the
protesters.  His views became more conservative as a result, though not
so far to the right as Kristol's.  Daniel Bell was at Columbia where
the protests were put down with more force by the police and came out
of the experience more left-wing than before.
     Dorman recreates the period with archival footage showing New York
and California at the time of the events, but what is on the screen
frequently is just a scene without much obvious relevance to what is
being said.  There are also interviews with various political figures
who interacted with the four political thinkers. The film is
entertaining and enlightening, but it leaves one wanting to be in on a
discussion among the men to find out what the real differences in their
opinions and reasoning styles were.  Without that there is something
dramatically missing from the film.  I rate ARGUING THE WORLD a 6 on
the 0 to 10 scale and a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Honey, I Blew Up the Kid (1992)
          Capsule review:  Silly but undeniably enjoyable satire
     on 1950s science fiction films has the Szalinski family
     accidentally enlarging their baby to Brobdingnagian
     proportions.  Somewhat better than it really deserves to ne
     Rating: +1 (-4 to +4).  (Relevant diatribe follows the
     review!)
     At the current rate I would expect by the turn of the century the film
industry will have churned out more take-offs, pastiches, and satires of
1950s science fiction films than there were science fiction films made in
the 1950s.  None have ever seemed very good to me, but HONEY, I BLEW UP THE
KID is at least more light-hearted than most.  (Of course, the title may
sound less good-natured than intended, but all the ads make sure everybody
knows in just what sense "blew up" is intended.)  This is, of course, the
sequel to HONEY, I SHRUNK THE KIDS, and though HONEY, I BLEW UP THE KID
began life as a script for an unrelated film BIG BABY, it was worked into a
sequel for the previous film.  Actually, it was to have been much the same
plot as THE AMAZING COLOSSAL MAN with a baby.  Echoes of that film still
abound in the script.
     In the years since the last film, a typical soulless corporation has
taken over Wayne Szalinski's scale-bending projects and is trying to magnify
and reduce objects without much luck.  Rick Moranis as Wayne continues not
to get much respect in spite of being the genius behind it all.  Still, it
is only Wayne that can make things work and even he cannot do exactly what
he wants.  What he accidentally creates is a two-and-a-half-year-old Adam
Szalinski who grows when he passes through electromagnetic flux.
(Conservation of matter?  What's that all about?)  We end up with a ten-
story baby clomping his way through Las Vegas--even the same streets that
Glenn Manning, the COLOSSAL MAN, walked.  This giant, however, is not shot
off of Boulder/Hoover Dam.  There is only a poster of the dam to remind us
of the original.  Incidentally, as well all know, any satire of 1950s
science fiction has to have a small role for either Kenneth Tobey or Dick
Miller.  This time it's Tobey's turn, with him playing a security guard.
     Standards for special effects have come a long way since THE AMAZING
COLOSSAL MAN (special effects in Bert. I. Gordon films were always
particularly bad!).  While in HONEY, I BLEW UP THE KID it rarely is
difficult to tell how an effect was created, there are only a few effects
that genuinely look wrong.  The only really bad effect that I noted was a
full-size model of a baby chest and arm in the background.  The arm just
does not move as wildly as it does in the surrounding scenes.  Kudos should
go to the "Baby Wranglers" listed in the credits, since Adam (played by
Daniel and Joshua Shalikas) seems always to do exactly the right thing at
the right time.  And it is true that the fictional Adam and the real life
Shalikas all seem to be extraordinarily well-behaved.
     My rating for this light-hearted piece of summer fluff is +1 on the -4
to +4 scale.
     I noted with some disappointment that the credits of HONEY, I BLEW UP
THE KID acknowledge similarities to the story "The Attack of the Giant Baby"
by Kit Reed.  CINEFANTASTIQUE reports that after Reed saw a promo for the
film she took the Disney organization to court over similarities to her
story.  Actually the Reed story concentrates on the nastier aspects of
babies and shows them magnified.  If, indeed, Reed thinks she invented and
owns the idea of over-size babies getting loose and causing problems in her
1981 story, I might suggest that she read (or re-read) the 1904 novel THE
FOOD OF THE GODS by H. G. Wells.  The mechanism for creating the giant baby
is in the realm of physics in the new movie.  Reed's mechanism is nearly
identical to Wells's.  That is, she has the baby eat a food with fantastic
growth properties.  I seriously doubt that the Wells estate has taken Reed
to court, and I can tell you for a fact that her story bears no similar
acknowledgement to Wells.  Science fiction has been in the past a field
where people could feel free to play with others' ideas and put new twists
on them.  But I suppose as long as some people in the field have deep
pockets and other people have greed, that can no longer be the case.  Be it
here noted that the concept of giant babies causing problems has somehow
been transferred from the Wells estate to Reed.  Presumably the concept of
time travel is still the property of the Wells estate.  David Brin probably
owes royalties on uplift to either Wells for THE ISLAND OF DR. MOREAU or
Nigel Kneale for QUATERMASS AND THE PIT.  Invisibility and alien invasion
again revert to the Wells estate who effectively own a controlling interest
in modern science fiction.  So it goes.

Title
Review for In Country (1989)
     In the American film industry, lifting a taboo is like opening a
floodgate.  Sex was a taboo for a long time; so was very graphic violence.
Neither seems to be a particularly scarce commodity in current films.
Another subject that filmmakers felt they had to stay away from for a long
time was the Vietnam war.  The assumption was that films about an unpopular
war would probably be unpopular also.  Right into the mid-1980s the film
industry was still making more films about World War II than it was about
Vietnam.  But now there seems to be at least three or four major films a
year about the Vietnam war and if after-effects.  Many are thoughtfully and
intelligently made.  Presently running there is both Brian DePalma's
CASUALTIES OF WAR and Norman Jewison's IN COUNTRY.  The latter has gotten
quite a bit of favorable comment.
     IN COUNTRY is the story of Samantha Hughes (played by Emily Lloyd) who,
in the summer following her high school graduation, begins asking questions
about her father's death in the war.  Samantha lives in the small town of
Hopewell, Kentucky, in amongst several Vietnam veterans, all of whom are
haunted by their war memories and who, in fact, seem to be constantly living
in the shadow of the war.  Samantha is spending the summer with her uncle
Emmett Smith (played very convincingly by Bruce Willis in one of his rare
serious roles).  The climax and culmination of her summer and the film is
her visit, with her uncle and her grandmother, to the Vietnam War Memorial
in Washington DC.
     What makes IN COUNTRY remarkable among all the (respected) Vietnam-
war-related films is how little understanding it really does bring.  The
story is diluted by subplots of Samantha's and her girl friend's romantic
attachments, and more time is spent with an old girlfriend of Emmett's going
after him again.  The latter plot is tangentially related to the war theme,
since Emmett is still too disturbed to relate well to anybody.  But snippet
flashbacks of Emmett's war experiences are just a bit too simple and pat.
The scenes at the Memorial are moving--which is to say manipulative, but in
a good cause--and clearly what the entire film is aiming for.  However,
there is nothing in the scene that brings us closer to the war experience.
Like the Memorial itself, the film brings not so much understanding for the
war veteran as a tribute to the veteran.  That is not so ambitious a goal,
but it is sufficient.  I give the film a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Little Mermaid, The (1989)
          Capsule review:  Disney Studios is clearly trying to
     create a classic for multiple re-releases by repeating the
     formula of some of Disney's most successful animated
     features.  They probably have succeeded.  Rating: high +1.
     Walt Disney Studios built their reputation on animation, first with
Mickey Mouse cartoons and later with their full-length animated features.
Even among their feature-length animated films some seem to be more
respected than others.  The real classics are SNOW WHITE, SLEEPING BEAUTY,
and CINDERELLA.  The second-ranked ones are those such as PINOCCHIO, BAMBI,
and PETER PAN.  Then there are the third-ranked ones such as THE JUNGLE
BOOK, THE FOX AND THE HOUND, and THE SWORD IN THE STONE.  The ones best
regarded are adaptations of well-known German and French fairy tales.  They
each seem to pit a young woman representing the forces of innocence and good
against an older woman who represents decadence and evil.  Often the older
woman also represents the forces of witchcraft.
     THE LITTLE MERMAID represents a return not just to the classic
tradition but also to the classic formula.  Disney Studios is faced with the
competition of Don Bluth--who was bred in the Disney Studios and who left to
form his own competitive animation studios (much as Walter Lantz did
previously).  Intentionally or not, in the holiday season of 1989 we are
having the showdown between Disney and Bluth.  I have not seen Bluth's ALL
DOGS GO TO HEAVEN, but general scuttlebutt is that Disney's classic formula
has resulted in a much better film than Bluth's source.
     THE LITTLE MERMAID is the story--very loosely based on the Hans
Christian Andersen fairy-tale--of Ariel, a mermaid who is fascinated by the
huge ship hulls she sees floating overhead.  She also has a large collection
of half-understood human artifacts salvaged from shipwrecks.  Ariel's
fascination with humans is in direct defiance of her father, King Triton,
who wants Ariel to be happy, but entirely within the confines of his
undersea kingdom.  He has no interest in the "fish-eaters" who walk on two
legs.  Ariel is a minor departure from the heroines of previous Disney fairy
tales in that she is strong-willed and intentionally disobedient.  The film
gives her more character than Snow White or Sleeping Beauty.  Present to
tempt Ariel is this film's villainess, the sea-witch Ursula.  As Ariel is
half girl and half fish, so Ursula is an octopus with a corpulent woman
growing out of its head ... one of Disney's oddest-looking creatures.
     The songs are by Howard Ashman and Alan Menken, who did the music and
lyrics for the musical LITTLE SHOP OF HORRORS.  Their style in both works is
more verse-dialogue spoken to music than the usual song poetry.  It is still
perfectly pleasant but it is immediately recognizable as being in the same
style.  What is a slight disappointment is that the artwork in THE LITTLE
MERMAID is noticeably less detailed than in other Disney classics.  (Each
frame of film IS different.  This is unlike Japanese animation which has
very nice artwork but fairly jerky motion with drawings used for three or
four frames each.)  But the sketches have less detail so were more
economical to draw.
     The result of all this is that in some ways THE LITTLE MERMAID is
reminiscent of the best of Disney, in some ways in seems the victim of
cost-cutting.  It represents an investment in the future by Disney and will
probably be released to theaters several times before it is ever sold on
cassette.  This means if it sounds good you should go to see it in a
theater.  That is the only way to see it.  As for rating, I would give THE
LITTLE MERMAID a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for This Is My Father (1998/I)
     CAPSULE: An American schoolteacher (James Caan) travels to Ireland
to trace a father he never knew.  In uncovering the story he finds the
story of a good simple man and a tragic story of lovers kept apart by
prejudice and intolerance.  Aiden Quinn stars, his brother Paul
directs, and brother Declan photographs.  Rating: 7 (0 to 10), low +2
(-4 to +4)
   - Production of the Quinn Brothers based on the story of their own
     father.
   - Mournful score by Donal Lunny.
   - Kieran Johnson (James Caan) is an unpopular English teacher voted
     among the most boring by his class.  His life at home is equally
     bad with a rebellious son and a bed-ridden mother.  He decides to
     take time to go to Ireland and find out about his father Kieron
     O'Day (Aidan Quinn).  The story he is told puts his own life and
     his problems into perspective.
   - Kieron O'Day is a simple farmer with a hard life.  He romances
     Johnson's mother, played at this age by Moya Farrelly.  This
     arouses the ire of both the local priest (Stephen Rea) and of the
     mother of the woman he loves.
   - Priest is an intolerant man who curses O'Day from the pulpit,
     delivers fire and brimstone sermons, and chases a man from the
     confessional yelling after him "Get out and don't come back to the
     church until you stop doing that."
   - One happy night when out with is love on a beach,  Airplane lands
     with Life Magazine photographer (John Cusack) wanting to rest the
     night and looking for someone to play American football.
   - Nice representation of Irish village life.

Title
Review for Newton Boys, The (1998)
     Neither Sifakis's ENCYCLOPEDIA OF AMERICAN CRIME nor Nash's
BLOODLETTERS AND BAD MEN seems to know the Newtons existed.  What
research I tried to do before seeing the film turned up nothing.  But
the film turns up some corroborating evidence that the story must have
at the very minimum some truth.  Apparently the Newton Gang were the
most successful bank robbers in American history. From 1919 to 1925
this Texas-based gang robbed banks all over the country, eighty in all,
though their biggest job was the three-million-dollar train robbery in
Rondout, Illinois.
     With Andy Warhol being dead, it is hard to imagine a director less
likely to make an atmosphere-heavy period film than Richard Linklater,
director of Generation X films like SLACKER.  Nevertheless, Linklater
breaks from his mold and does a fair job of recreating America of the
early 1920s.  And ironically his Generation X serves him well when
showing members of the gang in their casual moments relaxing in
postures you would never see in a Bogart or Cagney gangster film.
     Willis Newton (played by Matthew McConaughey) is newly out of
prison where he was railroaded for a crime he did not commit.  What
particularly galls him is that friends and neighbors willingly perjured
themselves to abet the railroading.  He decides really to turn to
crime, stealing from the banks and implicitly from the insurance
companies who, he rationalizes, are all crooks anyway.  After helping
someone else with a daylight robbery he decides it is safer to plan his
own crimes and to rob banks only at night.
     Soon Willis is bringing his brothers in to assist him in his
robberies.  Realizing that he knows how to open a square-door safe but
not a round-door one, he has a bank manager list for him all the banks
he knows of that have square-door safes, a list that contains banks all
over the country.  The film takes a very whimsical look at their
crimes.  These are very clearly lucky amateurs who do not know what
they are doing, as we see in several comic scenes.  They seem to have
an incredible run of luck, neither killing anybody nor being killed
themselves.  Willis is the serious planner, brothers Jess (Ethan Hawke)
and Dock (Vincent D'Onofrio) are in it just for the wild times.  Joe
(Skeet Ulrich) is the youngest and most thoughtful of the boys.
Rounding out the gang is Glasscock (Dwight Yoakam).
     McConaughey clearly provides what acting interest there is in the
film and he gives the only performance that is above being just
adequate.  He is a little too handsome and polished for the role.  The
viewer knows this because of the very intelligent device of having
interviews with the real-life Joe and Willis play with the credits--in
the 1970s Willis was interviewed in a documentary and Joe appeared on
the "Tonight Show" in 1980.  The big surprise is how under-utilized
Vincent D'Onofrio is.  He is a fine actor and should have gotten a
meatier role.
     The story of the Newton Boys is apparently a neglected chapter of
American crime.  I cannot verify the accuracy of the film but I can say
it was entertaining.  I would rat it 7 on the 0 to 10 scale and a low
+2 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     In the film there is considerable mention square-door safes and
round-door safes.  The Newtons say they can open square-door safes but
not the round-door ones.  In order to decide what banks they will rob,
they need a list of banks with square-door safes.  What is this all
about?  Well, a square-door safe has a (rectangular) door.  It is like
the door to your home, only it is made of steel so it is a lot
stronger.  But it is still held in place by bolts and it is possible to
get behind the door and sheer the bolt, possibly by blowing the whole
door off its hinges.  A round-door safe does not have hinges.  The door
is a disk with threads around the edge.  The door is a separate piece
which screws out of the safe.  (In the 1953 WAR OF THE WORLDS the ports
on the Martian spacecraft use the same principle.  Remember Paul
Birch's line "It's the damnedest thing the way that's unscrewin'.")  In
place a round screw-in door is just as secure as any other wall of the
safe.  There is no way you can get explosive behind it.  At the time of
THE NEWTON BOYS round-door safes (usually in spherical safes called
"cannonballs") were absolutely secure.  Cannonball safes were
eventually defeated, but only by ignoring the opening mechanism and
cutting right through the wall.

Title
Review for My Cousin Vinny (1992)
     Teenagers Bill Gambini (played by Ralph Macchio) and Stan Rothstein
(played by Mitchell Whitfield) are driving through Alabama on their way to
UCLA.  They drive illegally.  Bill shoplifts a can of tuna.  Then a cop
pulls them over.  The charge is murder.  They need a good lawyer.  The
lawyer they get is just about the world's worst.  Bill's cousin Vinny
(played by Joe Pesci) just passed the bar six weeks before on his sixth try.
He knows nothing about court procedure, and has never even served in a
trial.  But he will work free of charge, so down to Alabama he comes with
his obnoxious bimbo girlfriend (played by Marisa Tomei).  Now Bill and Stan
are surrounded by stereotypes: the whiney girlfriend, the redneck cop, the
silken, ambitious district attorney, the Southern judge who has pre-judged
the case.  About the only person who is not a stereotype is Vinny himself.
Then something funny happens.  The stereotypes start interacting and each
becomes an interesting person.  Even the trial gets interesting.
     Joe Pesci, top-billed for the first time, doesn't quite have enough
charisma to carry the film and Marisa Tomei very nearly steals the film from
him.  Meanwhile Macchio and Whitfield have little to do but stand around and
say, "Oh, gee!"  And of them, it is the lower-billed Whitfield who has the
better role.
     The comedy was written by Dale Launer, who also co-produced.  This film
is on a par with Launer's previous DIRTY ROTTEN SCOUNDRELS though neither
film is up to his RUTHLESS PEOPLE.  MY COUSIN VINNY is a bright, pleasant
comedy with a slightly distorted view of life in the South.  It was directed
by Jonathan Lynn, who wrote and directed the hit British comedy series "Yes,
Minister" and "Yes, Prime Minister."  Pesci's run-ins with the local culture
are reminiscent of DOC HOLLYWOOD, also directed by a Briton.  It is almost
as if filmmakers are deciding that the rural South has gotten a bad rap in
films and are now trying to give it a better image, or at least play off of
expectations of the worse image.  MY COUSIN VINNY is a likeable comedy that
delivers at least most of the goods.  I rate it a high +1 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Dai-bosatsu tôge (1966)
          Capsule review:  Black samurai film noir about a
     psychotic swordsman and several other reprehensible people.
     They all meet a bad end; so does this film, which ends
     ambiguously and with several unresolved subjects.  Rating:
     +1.
     Kihachi Okamoto's 1966 SWORD OF DOOM is aptly named.  The film is about
swords and about doom and about more doom.  This is a relentlessly downbeat
samurai film noir exercise.  It is well photographed--stunningly in some
scenes--but I found myself wishing it would end sooner so I would not have
to watch these people nay more.  At the center of the story is an
essentially mentally deranged swordsman who kills for sport and to perfect
his style and for just about any other reason that comes to mind.  He
learned the technique from his father who invented it, taught it to his son,
and then repented of all the damage it had done.  Tsukue is to have a style
match with Utsugi but, though his technique is superior, he agrees not to
kill Utsugi.  However, when Utsugi's wife Hana comes to Tsukue to beg for
her husband's life, Tsukue again agrees but only if she will have sex with
him.  She reluctantly agrees.  Her husband finds out about the arrangement
and divorces his wife.  In spite of giving his word twice, Tsukue finds
himself compelled by bloodlust to kill Utsugi anyway.  Tsukue take his
opponent's ex-wife whom he maintains in a constant state of fear, even after
she bears him a son.  The film also concerns a beautiful young woman sold by
her mother to a nobleman who uses her sadistically as a sex toy.  When she
is rescued by her uncle, the mother sells her into concubinage.  The major
characters are mostly either vicious or weak.
     Tatsuya Nakadai plays the evil Tsukue as a man possessed by inner
devils.  Outwardly passive-looking, even when fighting, he is a man deep
within himself and yet always at war with the world.  He reminds one of
psychotic performances by Robert Mitchum and Richard Widmark.  The script
claims he kills by an evil technique and that an evil mind is mirrored in an
evil sword.  There are powerful visual images to show the anger in Tsukue in
spite of his passive face.  In one scene he is in a dusty room with one beam
of light from the sun.  He is practicing strokes where the tip of his blade
stops within the beam.  The swirling dust makes the sword look as if it is
smoking.
     I have never failed to enjoy any samurai film, but SWORD OF DOOM comes
as close as any with its bitter and downbeat tone.  Rate it a +1 on the -4
to +4 scale.  (Two additional notes:  Toshiro Mifune plays Shimada, the
teacher of a fighting school who has a mutual fear of Tsukue.  Director
Okamoto went on to direct AKAGE (a.k.a., RED LION) in 1969 and ZATOICHI
MEETS YOJIMBO in 1970.)

Title
Review for Femme de chambre du Titanic, La (1997)
     If I were to look for a film to double-feature with THE
CHAMBERMAID ON THE TITANIC, it would probably be last year's
misunderstood and under-appreciated THE POSTMAN.  Both films are about
unpleasant societies and the transforming and inspiring power of just
the right lie.  In each film the public is more than anxious to be
fooled by the lie that fills a need.
     THE CHAMBERMAID ON THE TITANIC opens in a steel mill town
somewhere in France.  One gets a feel for how harsh life is in the
credit sequence where the pouring of molten steel looks like the core
of a volcano.  Fun in this town is the annual race in which the
runners, sopping wet, carry large sandbags on their backs through
puddles of standing water.  Each then has to climb a hill of cinders to
retrieve a baton only to return to the run.  The winner this time, as
it has been the previous two, is young and handsome Horty (Olivier
Martinez).  This year there is to be a special prize.  The winner gets
a trip to Southampton, England to see the embarkation of the steamship
Titanic.  Actually the prize was to have been two tickets, but the
manager of the mill wants to use the opportunity to attempt to seduce
Horty's wife Zoe (Romane Bohringer).  Unaware of what is happening at
home, Horty goes to Southampton.
     In his hotel Horty meets a beautiful damsel in distress.  Marie
(Aitana Sanchez-Gijon) is to be a chambermaid on the departing ship in
the morning, but she cannot find a room for the night and asks Horty if
she may have his room.  He reluctantly agrees and spends a frustrating
but chaste night in the same bed with the comely woman.  Marie is gone
before he arises and as he watches the Titanic set sail, he notices
that a local photographer captured her picture.  He purchases the
picture and fantasizes about what might have been.
     On his return, Horty's friends hint to him that his wife may have
been seeing the manager.  Jealous of his wife, he retreats to the bar
to enjoy his memories and his photograph of Marie.  When his friends
start pressing him for details, he brags of his romantic adventures,
telling his fantasies as if they were true.  What begins as the
locker-room sort of boasting evolves into a sort of romantic soft-core
pornography.  Ever-increasing crowds of both genders gather each night
to escape their problems and hear the story of the romantic interlude.
     The deceptively simple story touches on not just the mystique of
womanhood, but the will to believe and to a certain extent
commercialization of the arts.  We have a story of the duality of
legend and reality and the will to believe.  THE CHAMBERMAID ON THE
TITANIC, which takes place in Northern France and England, is actually
a Spanish film.  Jose Juan Bigas Luna wrote and directed.  In keeping
with Spanish film, his visuals are not impressive exercises in effects.
His film is more about people than visual images. Luna's special
effects are sufficient to let the viewer know that it is supposed to be
the Titanic in the background of a scene, but he does not let the
spectacle run away with what is actually a simple story. Bigas Luna, a
filmmaker and a painter, has a string of interesting films to his name,
few of which are seen in the US.  Perhaps the best known here is the
sly comedy JAMON, JAMON.  Following his 1996 BAMBOLA, this is the
second of three films he intends to make on the mystique of women.
Olivier Martinez is probably most familiar to American audiences for
the 1994 THE HORSEMAN ON THE ROOF.  The enigmatic beauty of the
chambermaid Marie is provided by Aitana Sanchez-Gijon who is popular in
Spain but best known in this country for A WALK IN THE CLOUDS.
     The middle film in a trilogy is frequently the least of the three
films, but because of the current popularity of romantic stories
involving the Titanic, this one is getting much wider play here.  And
certainly the film deserves to be seen.  I would rate it a 7 on the 0
to 10 scale and a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Six-String Samurai (1998)
     CAPSULE: In a post-holocaust world, a guy who dresses like Buddy
Holly and fights like Sanjuro struggles his way to "Lost Vegas" where
he will be "the King."  No new ideas, no plot, just a string of fights
and music.  Rating: 1 (0 to 10), -2 (-4 to +4)
   - Directed by Lance Mungia.  Starring Jeffery Falcon.  Written (if
     that is the right word) by Mungia and Falcon.
   - The director claims to be a fan of Akira Kurosawa, and imitates
     the fight scenes in some of his films fairly well.  But he has
     missed a very important aspect of Kurasowa'a work.  If you walk
     out of a Kurasowa film for ten minutes the plot will have advanced
     and you will need to do something to catch up.  The plot of this
     film does not advance.  If you walk out of SIX-STRING SAMURAI for
     ten minutes, you will have missed no plot complications beyond
     whom the title character is fighting and you will enriched your
     life by ten minutes.  I recommend at least eight such absences
     during the course of the film.
   - Alternate history in which the USSR defeated the US in a 1957
     atomic war.
   - Music is supplied by The Red Elvises who rely on doing rock
     versions of classical Slavic music.
   - Yet another film in which the props all seem to come from a
     particularly impoverished junkyard.  Costumes seem to be from Good
     Will.
   - Words don't fit characters' lips, as if incompetently redubbed in
     the studio.
   - If there was a nuclear war in 1957, where do the Eisenhower
     dollars come from that one set of baddies are flipping?

Title
Review for Dr. T & the Women (2000)
     DR. T AND THE WOMEN is about a fabulously handsome and
successful gynecologist living and working in the Dallas area.  Dr.
Sullivan Travis, (played by Richard Gere) lives the good life.  He
has a beautiful wife Karen (Farrah Fawcett) and two nice children.
In his practice he treats many attractive women, yet he remains
totally faithful to his wife and family.  In typical Altman fashion
we follow several strands of plot in the lives of T's family, his
patients, and T's relationship with an intriguing woman golf
professional at T's country club.  Problems start to creep into T's
world as Karen Travis childishly takes off her clothes and takes a
swim in the fountain in from of a Godiva chocolate shop in an
upscale mall.  Her doctor diagnoses her case as something called a
Hestia Complex, a mental disease of the wealthy.  Meanwhile as one
daughter plans her upcoming wedding, another seems intent on
disrupting the wedding plans.  And several other plot strands work
themselves out.
     Director Robert Altman is a surprisingly erratic filmmaker even
after all these years and after having made several classics.  There
is a great deal of similarity in all his films--each will have a
large number of familiar actors and a lot of plot strands that all
make a sort of mosaic of life in some part of the country.  Yet each
film will be trying to make some point and the quality of the film
tends to hang on that point and sort of people he is portraying.
Last year this gave us the charming COOKIE'S FORTUNE.  Considerably
less charming and in the final analysis more than a little fatuous
is this film.  What we get is a not very flattering portrait of the
nouveau riche, with women going through women's pursuits of spending
large sums of money, planning weddings, and turning visits to the
gynecologist into one more popular form of entertainment.  It is
hard to imagine women so excited about getting an intimate
examination that they cluster like pigeons turning the doctor's
office into real chaos just for the excitement of being examined.
Somehow even with someone with Richard Gere's looks doing the
examining, this really stretches the imagination.  Meanwhile the
receptionist snorts like a horse and patients plan accidents for
other patients.  While the women are doing this, the guys are doing
really masculine and only marginally more believable pursuits like
shooting skeets (well, golf balls) and going duck hunting.
     Altman has done more interesting work. This film only really
engages the viewer if one is fascinated with this sector of society.
The film generally hovers no further than arm's length from being
sexually titillating.  We see locker room scenes, and gynecological
examinations.  People take off their clothing out behind desks.  We
see Farrah Fawcett nude in a fountain once it is clear she is not
mentally competent.  Altman can do better things than tantalize the
audience.  Most of these patients are treated in a superficial and
not very sympathetic manner.  Many we never see outside the chaos of
the waiting room.  Like MAGNOLIA the story builds to a sort of a
strange climax, though what happens here is much less likely than
what happens in MAGNOLIA.  This is all in service to making a point
that has been made many times before in film.  Altman is no more
intelligent about making that point in this film.  Nor do his
characters have the interest value they had in COOKIE'S FORTUNE.  If
one neither enjoys the theme nor the characters, there is not much
left.
     Altman probably cannot make a film that is totally bad.  His
famous relaxed style of shooting a film attracts too many good
people.  But with a really mediocre script he can waste talent on a
film worth only a 4 on the 0 to 10 scale and a low 0 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Bedazzled (2000)
     I think you can learn a lot about somebody by just knowing what
comedies he finds funny.  Within my top three funniest comedies is
the 1967 BEDAZZLED, a film directed by Stanley Donen, but most of
the humor and creativity came from the erudite British comedy team
of Peter Cook and Dudley Moore who with this film were at the top of
their form.  The humor of that film could be lampooning Christopher
Marlowe's play DOCTOR FAUSTUS (the inspiration for BEDAZZLED) one
moment and then be drolly slapstick the next.  And perhaps the
moment after that it would be presenting some profound insight on
the Bible and religion.  Being so eclectic and literate, the
original is a film that gracefully shows its age but never dates.
It is a comedy that does not need to be remade for modern audiences.
If anything, it needs to be annotated.  Remaking it is a project
that is hazardous from the first.
     In the remake Elliot Richardson (played by Brendan Fraser)
works on a computer help desk.  Most of the people in his office
would apparently prefer solitary confinement to having to deal with
him.  Elliot has a not so secret crush on the demure Allison
(Frances O'Connor) who has worked in the same office for four years
and never even noticed the obnoxious Elliot was there.  Elliot runs
into Allison in a bar and tries to make small talk only to be
snubbed.  But wait, the evening is not over.  There is an absolutely
stunning woman in the bar who seems more than a little interested in
Elliot.  Elliot is skeptical, but no, it turns out she is not a
hooker.  She is something a little bit worse.  She is the Devil
(Elizabeth Hurley) in human form.  And she has a deal for Elliot.
She will give him seven wishes in return for his soul.  With each
wish Elliot can become somebody else.  He can specify what he will
be like, what other people will be like, anything that comes into
his head.  And with each wish, of course, the Devil finds some nasty
way to live up to the letter of the wish but to completely subvert
the spirit.  After all, isn't that what the Devil does?
     First, what was done well about this film?  Some of the jokes
are fairly clever and some (only some) of those are original.  I did
find myself laughing at this film.  The credit sequence gives you a
Devil's eye view of the world and the people in it with little tags
to tell you their deep secrets.  That is a clever idea.  The premise
of the multiple wishes and how the Devil is tricky is done almost as
well as in the earlier film.  With each wish Elliot's appearance
changes to fit the wish and at least some of his appearances are
quite funny.  The Devil's general mischief is not as inspired as it
is in the first film, but several of the jokes are funny.  If the
first film did not exist, this would be at least a clever,
watchable, and enjoyable comedy.
     The problem is that there are places where this film is almost
as good as the original, but many other places where it in no way
comes close.  Almost all of the banter based on the classics of
literature and religion are gone.  In the original the holes in the
main character's wishes made subtle philosophical points.  There is
little such intelligence in this screenplay.  What this film does
offer that the first film did not is some machine guns, a short
chase involving a helicopter, and a large traffic accident, all
fairly common and by now boring stuff.  The ending of the original
was hardly brilliant, but the remake simplifies it and dumbs it down
so that it is maudlin and really betrays the spirit of the film.
     Brendan Fraser's best work was in the serious dramas SCHOOL
TIES and GODS AND MONSTERS, but through practice he is becoming an
accomplished comic actor.  He manages a tour de force playing
several externally different characterizations, reminding one of
Alec Guinness in KIND HEARTS AND CORONETS.  The film's replacement
of the lackluster Peter Cook with the seductive Elizabeth Hurley as
the Devil may be slightly an improvement, but the lackluster was
part of the joke.  One feels that if the Devil could look any way
he/she wanted to, that the choice would be to look like Hurley.
Frances O'Connor needs to do little but be demure and attractive,
and she does little more in her role.  It is interesting that
English-born women were chosen as the two stars of this remake of an
English comedy.
     For me, this attempt was as misguided as would be an attempt to
remake CITIZEN KANE.  The result could have been worse, I suppose,
but naturally my recommendation would be to see the original rather
than the remake.  Still this version gets 5 on the 0 to 10 scale and
a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Highway 61 (1991)
        Pokey Jones (played by Dan McKellar) is the town barber of Pickerel
   Falls, Ontario.  Of course the name Pickerel Falls makes this place sound
   more scenic and exciting than it really is.  Pokey dreams of getting out of
   Pickerel Falls by playing trumpet and as a trumpet player he makes a pretty
   good barber.  Then Pokey's dog, Iggy Pup, finds a frozen body in the bathtub
   in Pokey's backyard.  Pokey is unable to revive the corpse with a hair
   dryer, but becomes famous in Pickerel Falls anyway.  His fame attracts two
   strangers to him.  One is Mr. Skin, who has come to collect the corpse's
   soul.  Uh, Mr. Skin collects souls.  (Skin: "I'll give you $20 for your
   soul."  [long pause]  Wino: "What's the catch?")  Only slightly less strange
   is a roadie who claims the corpse as her brother and wants Pokey to
   transport it and her to New Orleans ... after hiding a rubber tube full of
   drugs down the corpse's esophagus.
        Writer/actor Dan McKellar and director Bruce McDonald are equal
   opportunity filmmakers, laughing at people on both sides of the United
   States-Canadian border, but at the same time making some very pithy
   observations about American popular culture.  A short visit with two music
   video rock stars in a garish fancy mansion may say as much in a few minutes
   as THIS IS SPINAL TAP did in a whole film.  Then there is the father raising
   three talentless daughters to be the next Andrews Sisters.
        The NEW YORK TIMES reports that ROADKILL, a previous collaboration
   between McDonald and McKellar, won best film at the 1989 Toronto Film
   festival and hopefully HIGHWAY 61 will bring more attention to their films.
   They have a fresh eye for examining their world and the ability to
   repeatedly catch their viewer off-guard and off-balance.  This is a small
   independent Canadian film so it will not likely play at the big United
   States multiplexes.  Let's hope it gets distributed on video.  I rate
   HIGHWAY 61 a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Amistad (1997)
     In one of those delightful ironies of history the ship was called
La Amistad--Spanish for "friendship" or "friendliness."  In fact, the
ship was anything but friendly.  Its primary cargo was black people
being brought in chains from Cuba to the United States, a country just
sixty-three years old and whose current President, Martin Van Buren
would be the last President to have been born owing allegiance to the
Crown of England.  In this summer of 1839 off the coast of Cuba some
fifty-three slaves chained up in the hold of the ship would break from
their bonds take control of the ship.  Taking command was Sengbe Pieh
whom the Spanish had renamed Cinque (played with surprising power by
Djimon Hounsou).  His plan was to force the crew of the ship to sail
back to Africa, but they tricked him and instead sailed north up the
coast of the United Stated.  An American Navy man-of-war captured La
Amistad off of Long Island, New York.  The ship could have been hauled
to a New York harbor or to Connecticut.  It was taken to New Haven,
Connecticut to increase the salvage value.  New York law said that
nobody could own anyone else and the blacks on board would be
considered passengers.  Connecticut still allowed slavery and the
blacks were legally cargo that could be sold.
     Steven Spielberg's new film tells the story of the legal battle
that followed the ship Amistad arrival and the question of whether the
blacks on board would be slaves or free men.  It was an issue that made
opponents of current President Van Buren (played in the film version by
Nigel Hawthorne--with no small borrowing from his role in THE MADNESS
OF KING GEORGE) and former President John Quincy Adams (Anthony
Hopkins), now a doddering old man and member of the House of
Representatives.  Van Buren, already unpopular due to a recession
resulting from Andrew Jacksons policies, is anxious to placate
Southern voters who could make the difference in the elections the
following year.  Van Buren also wants to placate Spain's eleven-year-
old Queen Isabella II (Anna Paquin) who believes that the slaves are
Spanish property.  Both sides in the controversy are aware that this
could be a powder keg that would lead the country into a civil war over
the issue of slavery.  Coming to the aid of the blacks are two
abolitionists, former slave Theodore Joadson (Morgan Freeman) and a
Mr. Tappen (Stellan Skarsgard).  They bring aboard a real estate lawyer
named Baldwin (Matthew McConaughey).  But Baldwin has his work cut out
for him.  He has no language in common with his clients and does not
even know if they come from Africa or Cuba, an issue pivotal to the
case.  The screenplay for this film is based on the book BLACK MUTINY
by William Owens and is adapted by David H. Franzoni.  The latter's
only previous screen writing was the story for the Whoopi Goldberg
vehicle JUMPIN' JACK FLASH.  It is rumored that for him to make a
script of this quality he needed the help of perhaps the best current
screenwriter, Steven Zaillian of SCHINDLER'S LIST and LOOKING FOR BOBBY
FISCHER.
     One weakness of this film is that apart from a few very powerful
scenes, AMISTAD is very much a cold account of a court case.  Because
the blacks who are on trial are strong and for the most part silent we
get only rare glimpses at emotions we can share with them.  The viewer
is angered that they are being denied justice but gets very little
understanding for the characters.  Their plight is more compelling than
they themselves are.  Cinque is never a fully three-dimensional person,
though we do see a bit of his self-doubt. The only character who is
anywhere near fully developed is Matthew McConaughey's.  We seem to be
seeing a lot of McConaughey these days, but he is not the most emotive
actor.  Anthony Hopkins plays John Quincy Adams as what old age has
left of a once fascinating man, but who now colorful without being
really interesting.  He bores people with his flowers and plays small
practical jokes in the House of Representatives.  When he gives an
eloquent speech it rates about a 7 where 10 is Lincoln at Gettysburg
and 0 is Steven Seagal anywhere.
     Spielberg had a difficult fight wanting to make SCHINDLER'S LIST
(mostly) in black and white.  Here he creates much of the same effect
by subduing the color scheme in the set design and probably also by
photographic filters.  He then makes the only bright colors of the film
the blood during the mutiny.  In this way he can underscore the
violence of his film in a year of so many bloody films.  Be warned that
in that same violent year perhaps the most jarring scene I remember is
AMISTAD's depiction of a man being killed by a sword.  The mutiny, lit
only by lightning, is the first thing we see in AMISTAD but nonetheless
is the centerpiece of the entire film.  Spielberg does have a nice
visual sense that comes out in this scene and elsewhere showing the
blacks in impressive silhouette to make them look larger.  Spielberg
creates some additional tension by letting the viewer from the start of
the film go a long, long time, perhaps fifteen minutes, without any
English in the dialog or on the screen.  That itself becomes a little
wearing.
     Others of the film's touches I question: the mutineers aboard the
Amistad having fashioned for themselves turbans made from what appear
to be American flags.  It is not clear where they would find what would
be three or four American flags on a Spanish ship.  Also the Capitol
building at this point had a ring of pillars at the top and ended
there.  The actual dome was not added until early in Lincoln's second
term.  We see it, however, fully domed.  Just as the Capitol Building
was incomplete, so was the Supreme Court.  There were eight judges, not
nine.  The latter was pointed out by Gore Vidal in an article for THE
NEW YORKER. Van Buren appears a dithering incompetent.  This is perhaps
unfair.  He was merely a second-rate President having to clean up a
mess left by our first second-rate President, Andrew Jackson.
     The Jewish Steven Spielberg has now made two stirring films on
Black History and one on Jewish History. If he can manage to reconcile
tensions between those two communities he will be deserving of more
than Oscars.  I rate AMISTAD an 8 on the 0 to 10 scale and a high +2 on
the -4 to +4 scale.
     Generally when I review a history film I like to look up the
incidents in multiple history books and add information to my review to
broaden the context and correct misimpressions left by the film.  In
this instance my collection of history books have been nearly unanimous
in omitting the Amistad Incident. Even Howard Zinn's A PEOPLE'S HISTORY
OF THE UNITED STATES which concentrates on injustice and minorities
appears to omit the incident.  Of course, any historian writing a
history is forced to choose the incidents he feels willing to cover,
but it is surprising to see this particular incident so ignored and
rescued from obscurity by Black History courses and by Steven
Spielberg.
     Another touch that is wearing: in general the film is deliberately
paced and comes to a conclusion, then the viewer discovers the film
runs its own stop sign and just keeps going.  It was a pleasant
surprise when Spielberg did that in POLTERGEIST, but here it goes just
a bit too long with too little reward.  It needed a more power behind
the speech by Adams.

Title
Review for Serial Mom (1994)

Title
Review for Only You (1994)
     Faith Corvatch (played by Marisa Tomei) has known since she was a
girl who the right man for her was.  Both a Ouija board and a fortune
teller has told her that the man fated to be her great love was someone
named Damon Bradley.  She has looked for Bradley all her life.  She has
become infatuated with the idea that fate has chosen a mate for her, if
only she can find the elusive Mr. Bradley.
     Eventually she has to give in to the inevitable and find someone
else.  Her fiance, a podiatrist, is not the most romantic choice for a
husband, but Damon Bradleys do not show up every day.  But a few days
before her marriage her husband gets a phone call from a friend on his
way to an international flight to Venice.  The friend's name is Damon
Bradley.  Faith rushes to the airport, but not in time to intercept the
man whom fate has intended for her.  Her only chance to meet the man
promised to her by fate is to go with her best friend Kate, and fly to
Venice to chase down Damon.  After a journey from Pittsburgh to Venice
the fates finally arrange for her to run into Damon on the streets of
Rome.  Damon (played very winningly by Robert Downey Jr.) fall into
each other's arms, love at first sight.  Then Damon makes an admission
about himself that will change their relationship entirely that will
change Faith's mind about him.  Damon will have to prove he really is
the man that the fates have intended for Faith.  For more--far too much
more--information about the plot twists, see the trailer running in
theaters.
     Norman Jewison directs as well as co-produces hoping, possibly,
that the colorful Italian characters and soundtrack music will capture
some of success of his MOONSTRUCK.  That film was about older and,
frankly, better drawn and more interesting characters.  Here the
attempt is not to so much to define characters but to but to create a
very light piece of froth somewhere between SLEEPLESS IN SEATTLE and
ROMAN HOLIDAY--elements borrowed from both are present--and take
advantage of warmly romantic Italian settings and seductive music,
particularly "Some Enchanted Evening" from SOUTH PACIFIC.  Sven
Nykvist's camera captures romantic scenes so that they feel romantic
without being overly Hallmark-ish.
     Marisa Tomei plays her role brash but with more of a fragile
quality than her Oscar-winning role in MY COUSIN VINNY.  Robert Downey
Jr. as her possible perfect romantic mate is a trifle bland but winning
enough to have the audience rooting for him to win her a second time.
More personality is vested in Bonnie Hunt's witty Kate.  Hunt's Kate
seems more than a little like the sort of character Stockard Channing
plays.  Rounding out are the cast Fisher Stevens and Joaquim De Almeida
as Kate's husband and would-be lover.
     This is one Norman Jewison film that will not make much of a
splash, but it is competent and pleasant.  Give it a +1 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Gods Must Be Crazy II, The (1989)
          Capsule review:  "Pleasant" is the word for this
     lightweight African adventure starring N!xau again as the
     benevolent if not always well-understood Xixo, the Kalihari
     Bushman.  Again slapstick and political farce mix in this
     cultural-misunderstanding comedy.  Rating: +2.
     When THE BEAR was released, I said that it was one film that I would
not mind see being turned into a series because the character is interesting
enough that I would not mind every year or so looking in to see what he was
up to.  Now that I have seen two "The Gods Must be Crazy" films, I think I
would enjoy seeing as many of them as Jamie Uys wants to make.  I thought
the 1981 THE GODS MUST BE CRAZY depended a little too much on political
farce and on a brand of comedy that goes back to the silent film days.  But
then perhaps the film industry in Botswana is as young today as the American
film industry was when those gags were popular here.  What really was
excellent about the first film was its view of modern society through the
eyes of a Kalihari Bushman, Xixo (played by N!xau).  In the newer film, Xixo
is back, once again played by N!xau, who is by now running the risk of being
typecast as a Kalihari Bushman and who may never get to play the classic
roles such as the one uncorrupt cop in a big-city police force or the odd
new partner of two policeman chasing down a killer.
     The new plot has nine people running around the Kalihari in small
groups that invariably got split up and  united in various combinations.
You have one adult Bushman, two Bushman children, two soldiers fighting, two
poachers fleeing, one woman lawyer, one lost game warden, and a micro-plane
high up in a tree.  The chaos starts when Xixo's two children find a
poachers' truck and climb on, only to have it start up so that they cannot
get off.  Xixo reads the tracks in the sand, understands what happened, and
sets off to find his children.  Meanwhile, Ann Taylor, a New York Lawyer
(played by Lena Farugia), goes up for a half-hour plane ride with one game
warden and finds herself stranded with another warden and an ultra-light
airplane that is out of fuel.  Also on the loose are two enemy mercenaries:
one African, one Cuban.
     As with the previous film, there is humorous animal footage, though
this time obvious mock-ups of animals are often used and in one scene there
appears to be two men in a rhinoceros suit.  There is also a bit too much
slapstick and fast-motion photography for intended humorous effect.  There
is, alas, less of the Bushman's view of our culture, but the story is
affectionately told and charming if not always convincing.  THE GODS MUST BE
CRAZY II is a likable if lightweight film.  I rate it a +2 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Toxic Avenger, The (1985)
          Capsule review:  This is a feeble parody on super-hero
     comics that seems to have a following purely because it
     knocks New Jersey.  It has crude production values, weak
     humor, and an inexplicable following.
     Generally I am not all that fond of parodies.  A film gets no points
just for being a parody, no matter what it is satirizing.  A parody should
be funny on its own, even if the viewer has never seen the material being
parodied.  One parody that does work is John Landis's first film, a satire
on TROG called SCHLOCK.  The gags in SCHLOCK are funny even if you have
never seen TROG.  One parody that does not make it for this very reason is
THE TOXIC AVENGER.
     Melvin Furd (a name borrowed from MAD magazine satires of the 1950s) is
a 98-pound weakling working as a mop-boy at a health club in Tromaville, New
Jersey, the self-styled "Toxic Capital of the World."  At the club everyone
is good-looking and is a creep in one way or another, and the favorite sport
is tormenting Melvin.  One such prank goes awry and lands Melvin in a vat of
toxic waste which puts Melvin through some changes.  He becomes incredibly
strong like Arnold Schwarzenegger but at the same time he is made deformed
and ugly like, well, Arnold Schwarzenegger.  He then proceeds to set the
world, or at least Tromaville, right.
     The problem is that most of the jokes in THE TOXIC AVENGER are feeble
and predictable.  The jokes are on the level of the health instructor
telling his exercise class to do just what he does, and then someone drops a
snake down his back.  You've seen this gag about thirty times before.  The
film is crudely made with the words often not synchronized with the lips.
     THE TOXIC AVENGER is a funny film for anyone who can laugh for an hour
and a half at the same joke premise with little assistance from the rest of
an amateurish script.  Yes, we all like to knock New Joisey, and none more
than we New Joisey residents, but THE TOXIC AVENGER doesn't do it
particularly creatively.  Rate it a -1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Mulholland Drive (2001)
MULHOLLAND DRIVE did very well at the Cannes Film Festival.  As 
you can see from the rating it did not do very well from me at the 
Toronto International Film Festival.  It may not be clear to the 
viewer why I am so negative on this film for most of the running 
time.  In fact it is an interesting mystery story told on the 
backdrop of the Hollywood film industry.  Toward the end of the 
film I think everything that has been built falls apart.  The film 
was to be a pilot for a TV series but writer and director David 
Lynch did not sell his TV pilot and I think he decided that he 
wanted to do something else with it.  Something else is what he 
did. 
The film opens with a woman (played by Laura Harring) about to be 
killed in a car when a car crash saves her life.  She crawls away 
from the accident with a concussion and finds herself a bungalow 
with an unlocked door to sleep.  Meanwhile young vivacious Betty 
(Naomi Watts) arrives in Hollywood from Canada.  She wants to 
build a career as an actress.  Betty is a little surprised to find 
a woman sleeping in the borrowed bungalow.  She does not know who 
the woman is.  She is even more surprised when the woman awakes 
and does not herself know who she is.  They fix on a name Rita for 
her, but are not sure if this right or not. 
Meanwhile local director Adam Kesher (Justin Theroux) has problems 
of his own.  He is trying to cast one actress for his new film and 
is getting pressure from the producers and from crime figures to 
cast someone else, Cammie Rhodes (Melissa George).  These two 
threads are joined by a third one in which there is a strange and 
comic murder that goes terribly wrong.  There is also a strange 
character called The Cowboy (Monty Montgomery) adding to the 
confusion. 
In what was probably intended for the television pilot the film 
opens with a great vibrancy showing dancing 60s style under the 
credits.  A lot of MULHOLLAND DRIVE starts out fun.  Lynch wants 
you to know he could make an enjoyable stylish film.  He just 
chooses not to.  As with any David Lynch film there is strange 
material added for little reason.  There are no earthworms, but 
there are some decidedly strange David Lynch touches.  The film is 
a little long for the subject matter.  Toward the end it gets into 
some heavier violence and sex scenes, clearly not intended for the 
TV pilot. 
Unfortunately some of the most important comments to make about 
this film would be spoilers.  I will not mention them in the main 
body of the review but I give MULHOLLAND DRIVE a 4 on the 0 to 10 
scale and a low 0 on the -4 to +4 scale. 
MULHOLLAND DRIVE Spoiler Warning.  I have rated this film fairly 
low.  You should read this only after seeing the film or deciding 
that you will not see the film. 
David Lynch is in large part a dark satirist.  Most of his work is 
done in familiar genres but in some way shows their underside.  In 
MULHOLLAND DRIVE I think he is having a laugh at the expense of 
the crime film genre.  What he does with this film is (Are you 
sure you want to read this?) playing off the audience expectations 
that there will be a simple explanation for what is going on.  The 
first 80% of the film he tells a simple multi-thread crime story 
with clues sprinkled throughout.  Then suddenly at the end he 
turns the story on its ear with a large number of clues that 
appear that they should add up to something.  The audience 
expectation is that they will add up.  But he has given clues that 
are self-contradictory.  Lynch wants the audience to argue about 
what they have seen afterward and come up with theories.  In fact, 
the pointers are noticeably contradictory and until I hear a 
better explanation, I think Lynch is merely playing a joke. 
There is a visual curiosity that was popular in the sixties.  Mad 
Magazine called it a Poiuyt.  Other sources called it a Tri-
pronged U-bar.  Look at small portions of it and makes sense.  
Look at the whole figure and it does not.  This film is, in my 
estimation, the cinematic equivalent of a Tri-pronged U-bar. 

Title
Review for Ronin (1998)
     It would be hard to choose the best American political thriller.
Some people would probably pick THE MANCHURIAN CANDIDATE and others
(myself included) would pick SEVEN DAYS IN MAY.  Both those films were
tense exercises in chills.  The two films came out within two years of
each other and both were directed by the same man, John Frankenheimer.
But that was 1962 and 1964 respectively.  For most of the rest of his
career Frankenheimer has turned out some decent films, but has shown
little of the promise that those two thrillers showed.  Each of those
films had memorable characters and a tense plot.  They had almost
nothing in the way of chases or gunplay.  The thrills all came from the
plot.  RONIN is like a film made by another man.  Somewhere behind all
the shooting and explosions and car chases there are the rudiments ofa
plot, but we see only tiny pieces of it.  We get a clue here and one
there as to what is going on but J. D. Zeik's screenplay is a bit
obscure.
     The film begins explaining that a ronin is a masterless samurai.
When a samurai has failed in the job of protecting his master from
death, he becomes a ronin, much like a gunfighter in the American West.
If you miss the opening, do not worry.  This film will explain again
what a ronin is.  Sam (played by Robert De Niro) is the modern
equivalent of a ronin.  He is a free agent who seems to have really
good instincts about how to stay alive the world of a professional
killer.  He clearly was in a dangerous business at one time and now he
seems to be drifting around on his own somewhere in France.  Sam is
recruited from a Montmartre bar by Dierdre (Natascha McElhone of THE
TRUMAN SHOW), an Irish woman, to be part of an action to steal a
mysterious metal case.  Dierdre is very tight-lipped about what is in
the case.  Sam joins a team of four others: Vincent (Jean Reno of THE
PROFESSIONAL/LEON and MISSION IMPOSSIBLE), Spence (Sean Bean, TV's
Richard Sharpe, and also PATRIOT GAMES and GOLDENEYE), and Gregor
(Stellan Skarsgard of BREAKING THE WAVES and GOOD WILL HUNTING).  Also
along is Larry (Skipp Suddeth).  The group seems to know their
business, particularly Sam, but each is in his own way cold and
professional with his own field of expertise.  Their only human side
seems to be in tensions among the members of the team.  The story is
not very easy to follow.  It is never clear who is double-crossing whom
and who is working for whom.  Somehow Russians (who may or may not be
the Russian Mafia) and Irish radicals are involved trying to get their
hands on a certain metal case.
     Some very good actors are involved in this film.  One wonders what
they saw in the script.  The characters are mostly one-dimensional
professional killers.  They know their work, and seeing their thought
patterns adds some interest to the film, but for this group deep
feeling between two people is teaming up with another killer so that
neither is killed.  By the end of the film we never really got to know
anybody.  Maybe that is the secret of why such good actors took parts,
since these are not very demanding characters to create.  In addition
to the above characters the film also features Jonathan Pryce and
Michael Lonsdale (the latter of MOONRAKER and of the superior thriller
THE DAY OF THE JACKAL).
     As a revival of a sort of action film that was popular in the
1960s, I was hoping that there would be something here to grab onto and
enjoy.  Unfortunately there are no deep characters, and little to make
us care who eventually ends up with the metal case or why they want it.
I rate RONIN a 4 on the 0 to 10 scale and a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.
NON-SPOILER: Incidentally, the tale of THE 47 RONIN has been filmed
multiple times, usually under the title CHUSHINGURA or as THE 47 RONIN.
Also one frequently sees in Japanese art the image of a man breaking
down a door with a huge mallet.  This is the first blow of the 47
Ronin.

Title
Review for Whistle Blower, The (1986)
     There's a dark world and a light world.  They co-exist side by side.
Most of us live in the light world and think we have some idea of what is
going on.  Sometimes we do and sometimes we don't.  Sometimes what we think
we know has been a play put on for our benefit by the people who live in the
dark world.  It's the dark world that's real.  That is the theme of a new
film, a murder mystery with espionage overtones, THE WHISTLE BLOWER,
directed by Simon Langton, and based on a novel written by John Hale.
That's an old idea, but it gets a few new wrinkles in this mystery that is
not so much a who-done-it as a what-are-they-doing-and-why.
     Bob Jones (played by Nigel Havers) is a Russian-language translator for
British intelligence.  That is still living in the light world, but he gets
occasional glimpses of what is going on in the dark world.  He is disturbed
by what the Soviets are doing, what the Americans are doing, and what his
own government is doing, all under the cover of state security.  At the very
least, he wants to quit his job.  His father (played by Michael Caine)
thinks he would be foolish to give up a good job in a world that doesn't
seem to be crying for linguists.  But Bob wants to do more.  He wants to
tell the world what sort of thing happens in the intelligence game, to lift
the veil on one small corner of the dark world.  And that could get people
killed.
     THE WHISTLE BLOWER isn't a great mystery, nor does it seem much of a
spy thriller, nor does it really have a strong social comment.  But it does
do a nice job of integrating all three with a sense of irony at times.  It
meshes MISSING with MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE.  If you think about it, these
shouldn't go so well together; perhaps there is more to this film than meets
the eye.  This is one of those films where what each person tries to do
makes sense, but the sum total is a knot of complexity.
     Other familiar faces include John Gielgud, James Fox, and Gordon
Jackson.  (There is also a minor, and perhaps unintentional, in-joke in the
casting of Jackson's superior, a face that will be familiar to people at all
familiar with Jackson's career.)
     THE WHISTLE BLOWER is not a great film, it's not a spell-binding
thriller, and there is little in it you haven't seen before someplace, but
it does skillfully play off of Cold War paranoia.  Give it a +1 on the -4 to
+4 scale.

Title
Review for Bicentennial Man (1999)
     In the year 2005 a father (Sam Neill) surprises his family with
a new robot (Robin Williams) whom his family dubs Andrew.  But there
is more to Andrew than just Asimov's famous Three Laws of Robotics.
The laws make certain that Andrew is benevolent, but he is
considerably more.  He has a streak of creativity and independent
thinking that supposedly robots do not have.  Rather than being an
appliance, he has the rudiments of actually being human.  The family
has two daughters.  One who is simply called Little Miss (Hallie
Kate Eisenberg as a child and Embeth Davidtz as an adult)
immediately takes to Andrew while older daughter Lloyd immediately
wants to see Andrew discredited and destroyed.  The father comes to
take a fatherly interest in Andrew.  We see Andrew doing some very
human things like showing compassion for a spider and trying to
master the complexities of human humor.
     Racial themes enter the story as a human woman comes to love
Andrew and he loves her in return, but Andrew is only a machine
becoming human.  It is years before a real romantic relationship is
possible between him and a human.  But robots are essentially
immortal and as the title implies, we see Andrew over the course of
two hundred years.  This means even though it is a longer than
average film, 131 minutes, it still covers superficially mostly only
the more important events of Andrew's life.  It seems almost as soon
as you meet characters they are old and dying.
     One thing the film does not handle very well is the view of
society during the passage of so much time.  Change is coming to our
society at an accelerated rate.  One need only look at the rate at
which our own society has changed in the last 40 years.  Forced with
showing the changes in society over 200 years or ignoring them, the
producers have almost entirely had to steer clear.  We see minor and
superficial changes, but not nearly the amount we would expect.  We
are left with an uneasy feeling that society has stagnated, but for
some relatively small advances in the sciences relevant to the
story.
     Even when Isaac Asimov's story "The Bicentennial Man" was first
published, it far from original.  Asimov had been writing for years
about benevolent robots who were misunderstood.  Ray Bradbury wrote
the story "I Sing the Body Electric," produced on TWILIGHT ZONE,
about a family getting a grandmotherly robot and learning to love
her.  Asimov combined this and with some more complex themes for his
novel.  However, the wish to become human and the slow transition to
fulfilling that wish was plundered from the novel and used very
publicly in STAR TREK: THE NEXT GENERATION with the character Data.
The viewer has agonized over Data's attempt to learn to deliver
humor and it seems unfair to make the viewer do it again.  That and
much more of Data's difficult road to becoming human is
recapitulated in this film.  Like STAR TREK, this film never
questions the smug assumption that being human is the highest state
of being.  At its best BICENTENNIAL MAN holds up a mirror to show us
what it means to be human.  But where it rings false the writers
fall back on Andrew being a robot.  That makes its observations
undependable.
     Some of the visuals are very good, but some are surprisingly
flawed.  In particular the futuristic skylines are unconvincing.  If
Andrew behaves too much like Data, he also looks a little too much
like C3PO.  Kudos should, however, go to the design of the robot
makeup and mechanism.  The faces maintain the look of metal and
still are expressive to what is perhaps an unrealistic level.
     Not surprisingly, this is Robin Williams's film.  Somehow his
attempts to be a normal human are touching but never as powerful as
Cliff Robertson is in the comparable film CHARLY.  Sam Neill, after
this film and THE DISH, seems to be vying for the title of the
mellowest actor on the screen.  Embeth Davidtz has a harder role
than Williams.  If Williams does not seem quite right, well, he is a
robot.  Davidtz is quite good as a human, which is harder.  Young
Hallie Kate Eisenberg, known for Pepsi and Independent Film Channel
ads, is her usual sweet self falling a little short of being
cloying.  Oliver Platt is always watchable.  Chris Columbus directed
and previously directed Williams in MRS. DOUBTFIRE.  James Horner's
score is unremarkable.
     While this film does not have all the resonance that a film
aimed at an adult audience should have, it should be good for a
young adult audience.  I give it a 6 on the 0 to 10 scale and a +1
on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Moulin Rouge! (2001)
     In making love or in making musicals, you must never doubt your
own abilities.  Once you become self-conscious about how to do it,
you probably cannot any more.  The United States once was unexcelled
at making musicals, from Busby Berkeley to Rogers and Hammerstein
this made lots and most of the best.  Now the feature-length musical
has nearly died in the US except for some weak efforts in recent
years to bring it back.  Woody Allen's EVERYONE SAYS I LOVE YOU was
really a feeble attempt at dabbling in the genre.  More recently
there have been somewhat more successful attempts at the edges of
the genre with SOUTH PARK and O BROTHER, WHERE ART THOU?  On the
other hand, in Australia when it seems appropriate to make a musical
they just dive into it with the apparent natural ease of Rooney and
Garland saying, "Hey, let's put on a show."  Baz Luhrmann, with the
musical STRICTLY BALLROOM under his belt already, dives in with not
just ease but gusto to make the fabulous musical MOULIN ROUGE.  Set
in 1900 Paris, the beauty of the women, the weird characters, the
glamour the fin-de-siecle exuberance are presented in an explosion
of sensory overload.  Luhrmann does some really extraordinary things
with this film.  I like a director who does something unusual those
now boring studio banners at the beginning of the film.  It is a way
to announce that this will be a creative film from the very first
frame.  Luhrmann has some fun with the Fox logo and theme and right
away the viewer realizes this is a film that will have his eyes
glued to the screen.
     The plotting is somewhat familiar, but then most musicals do
not have a really strong plot.  Luhrmann, who both co-writes and
directs, opens the film with a half-hour or more of high-energy
excitement.  We start with fledgling writer, Christian (played by
Ewan McGregor) coming to Paris over his father's objections.  Almost
immediately he has an unconscious Argentinean fall through his
ceiling and in moments is embroiled in writing for the film's title
nitery a show called "Spectacular. Spectacular."  The star of the
show will be singer, courtesan, and toast of Paris, Satine (Nicole
Kidman).  The new show has been created by a small team of artists
led by the diminutive giant Toulouse Lautrec (John Leguizamo) under
the control of the impresario Zidler (Jim Broadbent having a field
day).  This first night Satine is scheduled to seduce the possible
producer for Spectacular Spectacular, the Duke of Worcestor (Richard
Roxburgh), but through a mistake in identity she seduces Christian
instead.  Being young and impressionable he stays seduced and in
love.  But the duke expects that he will get Satine as part of the
deal of producing the play.  From there the story borrows several
plot highlights from Alexander Dumas's CAMILLE.
     The film is marvelously inventive throughout, though after the
first half-hour it slows considerably.  Touches of that first rush
include a terrific visualization of the Green Fairy said to live in
bottles of that green (and literally toxic) intoxicant, absinthe.
The film remains a tribute to Paris and the extravagant musical
throughout, popular in Paris in the 19th and early 20th Century.
Luhrmann uses music not from the period but more modern and familiar
melodies choosing as the centerpiece a peculiar choice, "There Was a
Boy" from the film THE BOY WITH GREEN HAIR.
     The film features a standout performance by Nicole Kidman in a
role that seemed made for her.  She is an icon playing an icon, and
playing it to the hilt.  Ewan McGregor, of TRAINSPOTTING and the
screen's new Obi-Wan Kenobi is more than passable as the film's
lead, though his singing is obviously overdubbed.  Kidman does her
own singing and does it as well as any professional.  Jim Broadbent
is delicious as the strutting and high-stepping impresario Zidler.
Even the frequently irritating John Leguizamo does nicely as
Lautrec.  He does not seem French, of course, but then nobody else
in the cast does either.
     I can list on the fingers of one hand the set of musicals I
actually like as musicals.  I like FIDDLER ON THE ROOF, ROCKY HORROR
PICTURE SHOW, CABARET, and very few others.  Most musicals I bide my
time and wait for the singing to be over.  This is a bide-my-time
sort of musical, but it has its share of other rewards.  Even I can
appreciate its tributes to the stage and screen musical.  I rate it
a 7 on the 0 to 10 scale and a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Secret of Roan Inish, The (1994)
     The scene is an Irish fishing village in the late 1940s, and this
is the sort of story that might be told to children around the hearth.
Fiona (played by Jeni Courtney) goes to live with her grandparents so
she can get away from the city and so that her father can devote his
time to drinking.  There, amid the gulls and the fish and the seals,
she hears mysterious folktales of her family history, especially the
story that one of her relatives had really been a selkie.  A selkie, in
Irish tradition, is a seal who can turn into a human.  The "dark ones"
of her family are really just showing more of their seal heritage.  And
there is the tale of Fiona's own brother who was washed out to sea ina
boat-shaped cradle, but who some say is occasionally still seen.  Fiona
hears the folk stories from her grandfather (Mile Lally) and other
members of her family--"superstition" her grandmother (Eileen Colgan)
calls the stories.  But they send Fiona's imagination racing and the
somber, wet landscapes under what always seems an overcast sky (even
when it looks blue) only set the mood for the mystical and the
supernatural.  Before she is done Fiona's own experience will make for
a new tale to join the others.
     In Ireland this may well work as a family film, but it is a little
hard for American children to follow.  The Irish-American co-production
is written and directed by John Sayles in a style very different from
his MATEWAN or his EIGHT MEN OUT or just about anything else that
Sayles has done.  Sayles has taken as his source Rosalie K. Fry's
children's novel SECRET OF THE RON MOR SKERRY.  Indeed, in the United
States some children will enjoy this film, but the thick, sometimes
impenetrable, Irish accents and the generally somber tone and
photography may make this a children's film that can be appreciated
only by adults.
     Much of the interest value of the film is in its portrait of
fishing village life in Ireland.  The simple hearthside diet of fish
and soup in the thatched houses, the hard work on the fishing boats and
on the shore, and the eternal gray skies combine to make a portrait
that is bleak, but well-observed.  Sayles takes his time telling his
story as a combination of Fiona's experiences and a mosaic of the
stories told to Fiona.  Apparently this structure is hard on some
children.  Several of the children in our audience had to have the plot
details explained to them by parents who were probably having some
problems themselves, at least with the accents.
     Fiona is played by Jeni Courtney who seems already accomplished as
an actress in spite of her young age.  Lally and Colgan are each
enjoyable to watch in each's own way.  Veteran cinematographer Haskell
Wexler has managed some nice animal photography.  Irish music also
helps to set the feel of the film.  Not a bad film, but the story is a
little slow and unambitious.  I give it a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Smoke Signals (1998)
     CAPSULE: An odyssey of two Indians in their early 20s going to
pick up the pickup truck of one's deceased father.  This is a film with
good characters that makes some profound points.  The dialog is very
good.  Rating: 9 (0 to 10), +3 (-4 to +4 scale)
   - Coeur d'Alene Indians of Idaho.
   - Victor Joseph is slightly stereotypical, a tall handsome Indian,
     but bitter about his alcoholic father not being around.
   - Thomas Builds-a-Fire is an original.  He is a sort of nerdy boy
     with braids and glasses.  Rather than playing basketball like his
     friend Victor he watches.  He tells stories, many of which are
     lies.  Victor looks down on him and derides him.  Yet where Victor
     is empty he is full.  His stories are what will sustain his
     people.  They are something that is lasting.
   - The conversations are worth hearing.  (But they are totally wrong
     about John Wayne's teeth.  The claim that you never see John
     Wayne's teeth in a film is totally misinformation.)
   - In 1976 Victor's father Arnold saved Thomas's life when a fire
     burned down his parents' house.
   - Victor's father was an alcoholic.  He left home a few years ago to
     live near Phoenix.  Took up with Suzy Song.
   - As with CHAMBERMAID ON THE TITANIC, a good lie from Thomas seems
     to do more to heal and to build people up than a harsh truth.
   - Local reservation traffic report is more a gossip column.  But
     there is no traffic anyway.
   - Lots of nice little surprises understated.  Many are humorous.
   - Only images of bad Indians on TV.
   - Suzy Song is everything Victor is not.  She embraces life and is
     not bitter.
   - Tom Skerritt has a small role as a threatening policeman.
   - Based on LONE RANGER AND TONTO HAVE A FISTFIGHT IN HEAVEN, a short
     story collection.  This was one of the stories.
   - Really about all fathers and sons.

Title
Review for Serendipity (2001)
    CAPSULE: Familiar-feeling romantic comedy from director Peter 
    Chelsom.  Two people meet, like each other, and leave to fate 
    if they should meet again.  Years later each decides they 
    should be together and start searching for each other with 
    very standard sorts of results.  Fluffy and a lot like things 
    you have seen before.  Rating: 5 (0 to 10), low +1 (-4 to +4)  
A few years ago there was a light romantic comedy called THE NIGHT 
WE NEVER MET.  The point of that film was that two people whom the 
viewer knows are fated to find each other keep missing each other 
by inches.  SERENDIPITY is a reworking of that idea.  It is a 
story of Fate working overtime to have its two main characters 
meet.  Each time the dramatic tension is greater and each time it 
is another near miss.
In a prolog Jonathan Trager (played by John Cusack) and Sara 
Thomas (the attractive Kate Beckinsale of PEARL HARBOR) meet in 
Bloomingdales when each wants to buy the same pair of gloves.  
There is immediate attraction, but each goes his own way.  Then 
the two come together again.  Is it fate that is bringing them 
together?  Sara suggests they test it.  She writes her name and 
address in a book, Jonathan writes his name on the back of a five-
dollar bill.  Sara sells the book Jonathan spends the bill.  Will 
fate bring them back together?  Flash forward a few years and both 
are making plans to be married but neither is totally happy with 
his intended.  Each remembers the one that got away.  Each decides 
to give fate another chance.
Marc Klein's screenplay gives us a pleasurable and amusing froth 
of a romantic comedy, if a little too predictable and undemanding 
to plot.  It is easy enough to come up with any number of 
situations in which people just barely miss each other.  That 
builds a tension of sorts, but the audience has strong 
expectations how it will all turn out.  The viewer knows fate 
rules the lives of the characters since in this case the hand of 
fate is Marc Klein.
Few of the attempts at style or humor work.  Eugene Levy plays 
officious clerk who is more irritating than funny.  Worse to 
create a romantic effect director Peter Chelsom has not just music 
but songs on the music track.  Notable is a cameo role for Buck 
Henry.  There are also several opportunities to fit in the ever-
popular New York City landmarks.
This is a lighthearted and frivolous romantic comedy that will not 
have a lot of appeal beyond audiences specifically looking that 
sort of film.  In other words, though it is a cliche, this is a 
film for people who like this sort of thing.  I rate it a 5 on the 
0 to 10 scale and a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Believers, The (1987)
          Capsule review:  Ugly, unpleasant urban horror film
     about a voodoo-like religion in New York City.  There is
     nothing original or creative and little enjoyable in the
     film.  If John Schlesinger can make films like MIDNIGHT
     COWBOY, that's really what he should be doing.
     There hasn't been a horror film like THE BELIEVERS in a while.  After
ROSEMARY'S BABY, and especially after THE EXORCIST, there were several
horror films in modern--particularly urban--settings.  To make a film seem
more believable and immediate, it was set in a contemporary city setting.
THE SENTINEL worked that way; so did THE WOLFEN.  There was even a weekly
"urban horror" TV series, KOLCHAK: THE NIGHTSTALKER.  Then along came
Stephen King, who usually uses small towns for his settings.  Consciously or
not, film producers followed suit.  Setting is, of course, only one of many
factors in what makes a horror film, but it does a lot to set the tone, and
THE BELIEVERS somehow feels like a throwback to the NIGHTSTALKER series sort
of horror story with definite echoes of ROSEMARY'S BABY and BURN WITCH BURN.
     An African-based religion, Santeria, is creeping into New York City.
Santeria is voodoo-like and calls for blood sacrifices of chickens and other
small animals.  It may also call for human sacrifice.  There have been
bodies of young boys found who appear to have been sacrificed in a brutal
manner.  When a policeman is suspected of taking part in Santerian
ceremonies, Martin Sheen, a police psychologist, is called in.  Sheen
becomes involved in the investigation of the murders.
     THE BELIEVERS does something quite difficult.  In spite of a muddled
and confusing plot, it is predictable.  Just about every surprise in the
film telegraphs itself well in advance.  There is almost nothing original or
inventive in the entire film.  Most of the horror impact of the film comes
from scenes of mutilated animals.  There is one effective makeup effect
which produces as much nausea as fear in the audience.
     Director John Schlesinger had previously done films like BILLY LIAR,
DARLING, FAR FROM THE MADDING CROWD, MIDNIGHT COWBOY, DAY OF THE LOCUST, and
MARATHON MAN.  These are not schlock films!  Schlesinger can make very good
films.  MARATHON MAN shows that he can do very good suspense films.
However, my advice to him would be that less talented directors than him can
do a better job with horror; few can make a MIDNIGHT COWBOY or even a
MARATHON MAN.  He should make films but stay away from horror.  Rate THE
BELIEVERS a -1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Siege, The (1998)
     Earlier this year when John Frankenheimer's RONIN was released I
was reflecting that it was a pity that nobody was making good political
thrillers like his THE MANCHURIAN CANDIDATE and SEVEN DAYS IN MAY.  Now
just a few weeks later I think I actually have the thriller I would
have hoped for from Frankenheimer, but it has come instead from Edward
Zwick who has directed such films as GLORY and LEGENDS OF THE FALL.
But he has not done a political thriller since his excellent 1983 TV
movie SPECIAL BULLETIN, also on the subject of terrorism.
     The nightmare that everyone has feared has finally come about.
Islamic fundamentalist terrorists want to force the hand of the United
States government when a militant religious leader is kidnapped.  The
siege starts with a harmless paint bomb on a cross-town bus and
mysterious anonymous demands to "release him."  Anthony "Hub" Hubbard
(played by Denzel Washington) is an FBI agent working with an anti-
terrorism unit of the New York City Police.  But the investigation
leads him to the mysterious Elise Kraft (Annette Bening).  Kraft is
working for the National Security Agency and the Central Intelligence
Agency, also fighting terrorists.  Somehow she is not willing to be
totally cooperative with the FBI.  Kraft, however, has contacts in the
Islamic community from her days spent in the Middle East.  Hub needs
her contacts and is able to obtain her cooperation without her
confidence.  While the CIA's goals may be the same as the FBI's, their
policies conflict and Hub is surprised how they are more competitors
than they are peers.  Both of their approaches are called into question
when the terrorist acts turn violent and there is more and more public
pressure on the President to counter the terrorists.  The President
declares a State of Emergency and calls in the military.
     Army General William Devereaux (Bruce Willis), a quiet
intellectual with a strong belief in civil liberty, cautions what a
mistake giving control to the Army would be.  As he puts it, "The Army
is a broadsword, not a scalpel."  But there is growing sentiment to do
something about the rising toll from the terrorist attacks and martial
law may be declared.  Now there are three different government factions
superficially cooperating but each struggling for power and pulling in
its own direction.  The issue becomes whether to defend the people at
the expense of their constitutional rights, or to protect the rights at
the expense of public safety.  Middle East foreign policy also comes
into question in interesting and morally ambiguous ways.  While this is
an action film, it never sacrifices the intelligence of the background
story.  While some of the moral issues do get resolved into a right and
a wrong, most are not resolved.  The gray areas of the questions pose
make THE SIEGE more interesting than Zwick's last film.  The much-
lauded COURAGE UNDER FIRE leaves little doubt at the end who is right
and who is wrong.
     Denzel Washington plays a certain kind of role with real
integrity.  But Hub Hubbard is essentially Nathaniel Serling from
COURAGE UNDER FILE or Hunter from CRIMSON TIDE.  Washington's character
of Hubbard is not much of a stretch for him, and is as familiar and
pleasant as a McDonalds hamburger.  I think of him as a better actor
than Bruce Willis, but that certainly is not true in THE SIEGE. Bruce
Willis's General William Devereaux is written as a complex character
and a man with conflicting attitudes and agendas.  Some will look at
his as being a little stiff in this film but underneath there are a lot
of factions warring within this man.  There are a lot of surprises in
Devereaux in this film and Willis makes them believable without
telegraphing them.  Of the roles in which I have seen Willis this
performance is second only to the one in IN COUNTRY.  Annette Bening is
also an enigmatic figure here.  Her alliances and past in the Middle
East has obviously left her very disturbed and both she and Willis
outshine Washington.
     There has been some discussion as to whether this film is unfair
to the Arabic community in this country. The filmmakers took something
of a chance placing the terrorists in a particular ethnic community.
It may not be for me to say, but the film has a balance of positive and
negative people from that community.  It will be interesting to see
what protests result.  This is a film that takes some chances, but I
think that the result is worthwhile.  I give it an 8 on the 0 to 10
scale and a +3 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Ofelas (1987)
          Capsule review:  A thousand-year-old Lapp legend is the
     basis of this short, entertaining, occasionally bloody
     children's film from Lapland that will be entertaining for
     adults also.  How often do you get mystical legends in films
     from Lapland?  Rating: high +1.
     The plot has been done many times before, often but not usually as
well.  But this time there is a good reason for the well-worn plot.  This
time it is an adaptation of a millennium-old legend from Lapland.  In the
Tenth Century the story was considerably newer.
     Aigin, a teenager, returns from hunting one day to see his family's
camp overrun by marauding invaders, the Tchudes.  His parents and his young
sister have been murdered.  There are about eighteen of these Tchudes, all
dressed in black and armed to the teeth with crossbows: the leader's
crossbow is decorated with snarling fangs.  There is no doubt these are
pretty nasty dudes.  One slip and Aigin is running for his life through the
frozen landscape.  He runs for help to a nearby village but rather than help
Aigin they seem more anxious to pack up and run than to fight back.  So
Aigin decides he must fight the Tchudes himself.
     The attraction of THE PATHFINDER is not in the storyline, which would be
as easily fit to a post-Holocaust society and has been many times from ROAD
WARRIOR on.  Where THE PATHFINDER stands out is its depiction of Tenth Century
Lapp culture.  We get little hints of Lapp mysticism and culture.  We learn
superstitions, such as the belief that once you have killed a bear your gaze is
deadly for three days.  The entire story is framed in a mystical context in
which each person has a totem reindeer who appears at pivotal moments in a
person's life.
     This is basically a children's film with a little violence.  That is
more acceptable for children's films in other cultures than it is in ours.
Still, it is a well-constructed and filmed children's story, and one that
adults would enjoy also.  I would rate it a high +1.  At 88 minutes it is a
trifle short, but it is enjoyable.

Title
Review for Soapdish (1991)
     I have come back from three-and-a-half weeks in eastern Europe, so I
have a lot of catching up to do.  I do not really have the time to go out
and see a lot of movies and write reviews.  Oh, I am still seeing movies,
but for a while I will have time to review only the biggees.  I have now
seen three comedies, for none of which did I really plan to do my full
write-up.  But three small reviews can go together to make one article.  I
will review them in order of increasing respect.
     NAKED GUN 2-1/2: THE SMELL OF FEAR is something of a disappointment.
The team of Zucker, Abrahams, and Zucker worked like a well-oiled machine to
make some pretty funny comedies.  Now they have split up and gone in three
directions.  With this film that machine is operating on only one piston,
David Zucker.  He wrote and directed the film without either of the other
two people.  The film has about the same number of jokes, but only about a
third of the laughs and nothing particularly hilarious.  What is worse, the
film tries to be about a serious subject.  In AIRPLANE! the trio was, in
part, saying how silly their own story was.  Even the original NAKED GUN
tried to steer clear of any hint of seriousness.  Here we have a bunch of
just okay jokes hung on a paper-thin plot about a conspiracy against the
environment.  The film has a laugh or two but in general is kind of tired.
I give this one only a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale, though I did enjoy Lloyd
Bochner's allusion to what is probably his most famous role.  (I don't count
that a spoiler, because who remembers Bochner's famous role anyway?)
     Better constructed and with some better gags is SOAPDISH.  This is
occasionally a pretty funny comedy, though never as madcap as intended.  The
story, of course, is about the back-stabbing, the politics, and the personal
crises that go on behind the scenes of a popular soap opera, "The Sun Also
Sets."  Sally Field plays the main character of the program, but will not be
for long if another actress (played by Cathy Moriarty) has anything to do
with it.  The jealous Moriarty constantly flirts with the show's producer
(played by Robert Downey, Jr.), getting him to make decisions that are
driving Field crazy, including bringing back Kevin Kline, who many years
before was Field's on- and off-screen lover.  Whoopi Goldberg brings her
STAR TREK: THE NEXT GENERATION personality to the screen as Field's friend
and confidante as well as the show's writer.  The plot is contrived and this
is hardly a believable picture of how a soap opera is made, but at least the
gags are mostly funny.  I rate it a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.  The best
scene if Kevin Kline's DEATH OF A SALESMAN.
     Not too surprisingly, the best comedy is from the writers of
PARENTHOOD.  Three upper-middle-class Easterners in their late thirties end
up fish out of water in a real cowboy cattle drive.  Yeah, it sounds like
eight different bad movies on cable, except it's not teenagers.  But that
does not mean that this film could not possibly be done right, and writers
Lowell Ganz and Babaloo Mandel do pull this one off with attention to
character and some solid human values.  This is not the kind of script that
Chevy Chase and Dan Aykroyd get, in part because they just do not deserve
it.  This is a film about mid-life crisis and the meaning of friendship.
Once you realize these are characters who have fears and consciences and
feel pain, when there are action scenes they mean much more.  The three are
played by Billy Crystal, Daniel Stern, and Bruno Kirby as childhood friends
who take unusual vacations together.  This time they take a packaged
vacation to learn basic cowboy skills and go on a real cattle drive--more
real than they at first expect.  They have a chance to talk out their
problems and their relationships and learn to operate as a team.  There is a
major character named Norman and Billy Crystal's reaction to Norman's first
appearance makes the best scene of any of these three films, and also is
perhaps the most real.  CITY SLICKERS is worth seeing and rates a +2 on the
-4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Avalon (1990)
          Capsule review:  A loving portrait of a Jewish family in
     post-World-War-II Baltimore makes AVALON one of Barry
     Levinson's best films to date.  Levinson has a real talent
     for dialogue and for creating memorable characters.  This is
     a film to be enjoyed more than once.  Rating: +3.
     Barry Levinson has made such diverse films as THE NATURAL; GOOD
MORNING, VIETNAM; and RAIN MAN.  But he chronically returns to his native
Baltimore to tell the stories of the people he knew when he was growing up.
His first film was the excellent DINER.  TIN MEN was set in part in the same
Baltimore diner, though the story was a cut below his first film.  AVALON is
a very different Baltimore story and rivals THE NATURAL as Levinson's best
work.  AVALON follows the fortunes of an immigrant Jewish family in the
years following World War II.  Central to the story is a grandfather-
grandson relationship, very probably based on Levinson's relationship with
his own grandfather.  The portrait of the family is at once realistic and
endearing.  This is not so much a story with a single conflict that is
resolved in the end, but more a chronicle told in episodes.
     As the film opens, we are in the mind and memory of Sam Krichinsky as
he is remembering and relating to his grandchildren how he came to the
United States in 1914 and settled in the beautiful city of Baltimore.  He
arrived on July 4th and he is telling the story before dinner on
Thanksgiving.  As the family history progresses, it returns again and again
to what the family was doing on those two holidays.  The story is seen very
much through the eyes of young Michael Kaye, Sam's grandson.  Levinson's
Baltimore films all have excellent dialogue which is at the same time
believable and surprisingly entertaining.  Just simple family chit-chat in
Levinson's hands becomes both revealing and endearing.  Michael's father
Jules is a salesman who is mugged in front of Michael.  To keep Jules
entertained as he is recovering his cousin buys the family's first
television set.  This leads to a whole new career of selling first
televisions, then appliances at discount.  The success brings tragedy--at
least as far as Michael is concerned: the family moves to the suburbs.  Soon
conflicts arise that seem serious to the family, but which clearly seem
petty and minor to the viewer.
     Armin Mueller-Stahl (who played a suspected Nazi in THE MUSIC BOX)
plays the patriarchal Sam Krichinsky.  His son Jules is played by Aidan
Quinn.  And Jules's son Michael is played by Elijah Wood.  Elizabeth Perkins
and Joan Plowright help to round out the cast in this loving scrapbook of
the life of a family.  This is certainly one of the most moving and best
films this year.  I give it a +3 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Others, The (2001)
It is difficult to think of something new to do with a ghost 
story.  Just creating atmosphere is really not enough.  Once the 
ghosts start throwing things around and doing physical damage, as 
they did in POLTERGEIST, a ghost story no longer is a ghost story 
as much as it is a monster movie.  On the other hand just leaving 
around clues that something from beyond is around, maybe the 
sound of a woman crying or bloody footprints on the carpet, very 
quickly becomes tiresome.  Even some of the best ghost stories 
diversify.  They function as a ghost story and something else. 
Frequently it is a ghost story and a simple murder mystery as was 
done with THE UNINVITED, THE CHANGELING, and THE LADY IN WHITE. 
WHAT LIES BENEATH was a ghost story that turned into a murder 
mystery that turned into a stalker movie.  (And none of them was 
very good.)  Some of the best just mix character portraits with 
ghost story.  THE INNOCENTS and the original THE HAUNTING do 
that nicely.  Into the latter category comes THE OTHERS.  This is 
a very good ghost story with some very tricky things going on. 
Watching it I think I must have come up with about eight 
different theories to explain what I was seeing.  In the end I 
gave myself about one-third credit for having solved part of the 
puzzle. 
It is late 1945 and Grace (played by Nicole Kidman) lives on one 
of the Channel Islands that the Germans occupied during the war 
that so recently ended.  On this island good weather is just a 
thick gray cloud cover, but sometimes the fog is so thick it 
seeps into the house and seemingly into Grace's soul.  Grace 
lives in a brooding mansion with her two children, both allergic 
to light.   The Germans cut off the electricity and, partially 
for the sake of the children, Grace never restored it. 
To protect the children from light, Grace has very strict rules 
about keeping all but very faint light out of rooms.  This is a 
house that has befriended the darkness and shuns the light. 
These inflexible rules have to be explained in detail to the 
newly arrived hired help.  The old hired help just disappeared 
one day not long ago.  Adding to the mystery is that one of the 
children has been hearing a crying boy at night.  That is just 
the set-up for this story written as well as directed and 
musically scored by Alejandro Amenabar.  And the story he has 
created is tightly written.  Amenabar leaves a lot of details to 
be explained in this puzzle of a script and every mystery is 
explained by the denouement. 
This is a film that in large part is built around the Kidman 
performance.  From the beginning she plays it as an authoritarian 
with many idiosyncratic rules of how to run her house.  Meanwhile 
she traumatizes her children with her matter-of-fact, hellfire- 
and-brimstone religious interpretations.  Amenabar has her made 
up to look very much the way Alfred Hitchcock would have made up 
Grace Kelly, whom she even seems to resemble in this film. 
This is a film sculpted from darkness.  Interior shots are nearly 
almost always half-dark, obscuring part of the picture.  The 
lighting frequently gives the effect of being solely from 
candles.   Exteriors are little brighter with figures receding 
into the thick fog.  The visuals and the story line remain half- 
hidden and enigmatic to the viewer.  The characters are uniformly 
dressed in dark colors or in black. 
THE OTHERS is a stylistically well-controlled and effective ghost 
story.  It relies on mood rather than special effects and 
succeeds admirably.  I rate it a 7 on the 0 to 10 scale and a +2 
on the -4 to +4 scale. 

Title
Review for Road to Glory (2000)
     Typically the first film from a filmmaker or from a country is a
simple one.  One starts with baby steps and learns to walk before one
can run.  Directed and written by Khyentse Norbu, THE CUP is a simple
little story of a tiny piece of the outside world coming to a Tibetan
monastery in exile in Northern India.
     The film opens showing the daily life in a Tibetan monastery.  It
may not be intended but the primary message of these scenes is that the
life of a monk is one of monotony that would drive the rest of us
crazy.  At least there are interesting characters to flesh out the
tedium like a monastery soothsayer who gets little respect from anyone.
In the daily routine there is cooking and prayer and occasional
exercise. Nothing drives home the monotony better than a scene in which
visitors have arrived.  The abbot and some high monks talk to them.
The monks are in the traditional yellow and maroon robes.  The curtains
are in the same yellow as the robes, the luggage is in the same maroon.
One's eye searches in vain for a break in the color scheme.
     The young monks like to play football with anything available. The
quality of life would seem to be stultifyingly dull if it were not for
the young monks' interest in football.  In the case we see it is a Coke
can.  The monks paste on their walls pictures of their football heroes.
Four of the young monks even sneak into town to watch the semi-finals
on TV.  This is all done under the stern but loving eye of Geko (Orgyen
Tobgyal), sort of the vice-principal or house-father of the monastery.
One of the new arrivals gets an idea that perhaps they can rent a TV
and an antenna and see the World Cup Finals from the monastery.  The
question is taken to the old abbot who does not seem to quite
understand the concept of a game.  (He must indeed be and old man to
have forgotten games.  The young monks play them all the time.)
     When the abbot agrees there are but ten hours until the game will
be on.  In that time there are several obstacles to be overcome.  First
of all there is the question of how to pay for the rental.  The must
figure how to move the dish.  Once they have it they must set it up
with no technical experience.  There are come complications as the
greed of the TV dealer almost ruins the night for the young monk who
planned it.  He scalps what money he can from the young monks and
misdirects them.  Norbu seems less than respectful toward Indians.
     The plot of kids sneaking out of boarding school and getting into
trouble has been a staple of films going back at least to silent film.
So have head masters who seemed gruff disciplinarians but at heart love
their charges and are old softies.  Certainly the revelation that holy
people can be interested in something as mundane as sports is not
original either.  In a film from any other origins with this plot would
seem cliched.  Norbu does not give us any new slant beyond the setting.
This is a film that is moderately entertaining but not very original at
all.
     It is, however, the very first feature film from Bhutan.  It might
be fairer to say that it is a Bhutan-Australia co-production.  To
paraphrase Dr. Johnson, it is not Norbu has made a great film, it is
just interesting that Bhutan has made a film at all.  Here Norbu has
given us enough of a look into the daily life of a Tibetan monk to
convince us that that life is not for most of us.  And he has told us a
small, simple, likable story.  The story is based on a real incident we
are told, though the copyright notice at the end denies it.  Still as a
film from Bhutan, it is a good start.  Welcome to the majors.  I rate
it a 6 on the 0 to 10 scale and a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Blade (1998)
     As Blade, the title character, observes just after the climactic
moment of the film, "Some motherfucker's always trying to ice skate
uphill."  That pretty much sums up the film.  It sounds sharp and
polished.  But do not think about it too long.  How many places can you
name where the ice is smooth enough to skate on and goes uphill?  BLADE
is polished, visually very appealing, and enjoyable as an action film.
But do not stop to think about it too hard.  BLADE is at once a good
action film and a bad piece of fantasy.
     This is a dark world in which vampires are something very
different from what used to be in the old Universal horror films.  The
world is basically engaged in a secret three-sided war.  There are
humans, there is the old aristocracy of vampires, and there are the
young rebellious vampires struggling to wrest control from the old
guard.  The older vampires are in a cold war with humans.  Some humans
know of their existence but try to cover it up in an uneasy truce.  The
young vampires know they can take control in a new order that will rule
humans and older vampires.  Tipping the balance in the wars is Blade
(Wesley Snipes), half human, half vampire.  Actually a vampire took his
mother just hours before he would have been born. This was sufficient
to change his DNA--I told you not to think about it too hard--so that
he has all the best parts of humans and all the best parts of vampires.
Actually, saying he has the best powers of both humans and vampires
does not explain him.  It is not clear if it is his human or his
vampire heritage that allow him to get a silver stake in the base of
his neck and seconds later again be a perfect fighting machine.  He
also seems to have the powers of an action hero.
     Visually this is a very striking and polished film.  While it
starts with some overly familiar time lapse effects, it has some well-
filmed fight sequences early on.  I am not an expert on martial arts,
but friends who know considerably more tell me that Snipes does his
stuff very well.  There was some suspicion that the fighting was
speeded up and there is no doubt that special effects were added to the
fight sequences.  But the fighting would not have looked this good
without Snipes knowing his stuff.  Digital effects are integrated
flawlessly with the live action.  Stephen Dorff as Deacon Frost is an
acceptable villain without generating a lot of excitement.  Kris
Kristofferson plays the modern equivalent of Van Helsing.  He provides
the brains, Blade is the muscle.  As far as his acting he does not push
any new buttons or pull any new levers.  With the possible exception of
Snipes, nobody does.  I would say that it is nice to see Udo Kier still
making horror films, but it would not be sincere.  Kier has always had
non-demanding roles and has always been just adequate.  His presence in
a film has always seemed to be a kind of inside joke.
     In many ways this is a good action film.  The fights are exciting.
But the plot is a retread of ideas, several borrowed from Richard
Matheson's novel I AM LEGEND.  There are too many loose ends and open
questions for this to be a really good script.  I give it a 6 on the 0
to 10 scale and a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     Open questions, loose ends, and bad touches from BLADE:
     (Note that this film assumes that there are good scientific
reasons for vampires and they are preternatural not supernatural.  This
means that they have to obey laws of science and logic.)
     Do you have any idea what a horrible, wretched, stinking mess it
would create to pump fresh blood through a sprinkler system?  Where
would someone even get blood in those quantities?
     There is an implication that what gives Blade his powers derives
from his DNA.  Yet he was a vampire just shortly after his mother was
first bitten.  What mechanism could alter the DNA in his body cell-by-
cell in that short time?
     We are told that an autopsied vampire has "odd muscle structure
around the canines."  First of all, wouldn't any muscle structure
around the canines be odd?  If vampires can extend and retract fangs,
where do they go when retracted?  How does the human anatomy
accommodate them without any differences being obvious externally?  How
do newly bitten vampires undergo this extreme dental change?
     Many people learn about the existence of vampires in the course of
the film--the autopsy doctors mentioned above, for example.  In one
street chase we get a quick flash of a vampire who just happens to be
out biting a victim.  Anyone who happened to be on the street at that
time would see it happening.  Also, the victim would presumably
disappear.  With so many people learning of the existence of vampires
so frequently, how could the secret that they exist ever be kept under
wraps?
     Multiple times in the film people in streets wield guns and fire
them but no police come.
     Both Frost's minions and Blade seem awfully cavalier in fighting
around priceless vampire archives going back many thousands of years.
They contain information that both Frost and Blade need.  Wouldn't one
expect they would be handled with a little more care?
     Though we never see Blade have an opportunity to pick it up, he
seems to have gotten out of the archive with just the right scrap of
document.  How did he manage that?
     Blade's contact with his mother was very short.  How does Blade
recognize his mother when he sees her?
     How is it that a 10,000-year-old temple of vampires ended up in
the middle of an American metropolitan city?

Title
Review for Three Seasons (1999)
     THREE SEASONS is an odd melding of Asian film styling with the
story telling of Robert Altman.  Like Altman's SHORT CUTS the film
involves multiple (in this case four) short stories, each developing in
parallel and in close geographical proximity but otherwise mostly
unrelated.  Four plot lines are set in Ho Chi Minh City and begin and
end about the same time.  In one story a cyclo-driver becomes obsessed
with a beautiful prostitute and decides to do whatever it takes to win
her.  (A cyclo is a bicycle modified with a wide passenger seat in
front to be used like a taxi.  One sees them frequently in Southeast
Asia.)  In another plotline a woman comes to the city for a job picking
flowers in a lotus pond and selling them in the city.  She becomes
involved with the recluse who owns the lotus pond.  The third story
involves a street boy who makes his living selling small items like
cigarette lighters from a box.  When his box is stolen he must get it
back again or go hungry.  The fourth plotline involves an American
Vietnam veteran who returns to Ho Chi Minh City driven by conscience to
find his daughter whose mother he abandoned during the war.
     It is very difficult to tell stories of any real plot complexity
in a film that is going to tell four stories in as little as 110
minutes.  If one adds to it that the pacing of this or many Asian
films.  Each of the four stories could probably be told in three or
four sentences.  What is important is not the plot but the texture of
the telling and the feeling for what has become of Saigon after it
became Ho Chi Minh City.  We see a daily life that in some ways is not
that different from what we have in the United States.  The story of
the cyclo-driver and that of the street boy could take place in just
about any big city with few modifications.  The man looking for his
daughter, the least developed of the four stories, might also, but
would be much more likely to occur in Vietnam, with its particular
problem of abandoned mothers.  The story of the lotus pond probably
would not work any place but Asia.
     THREE SEASONS was written and directed by Tony Bui, based on his
own stories. Bui was born in Vietnam, but raised in the US and this
constitutes a return to his parents' land.  It is the first American
independent film shot in Vietnam since the war.  The film stays away
from politics, however, no doubt in part because it had to be passed by
Communist censors and had to play in the United States.  Curiously they
do not seem to object to the film calling the city Saigon rather than
its more politically correct name in Vietnam.  The film plays double
duty as a fiction film and as a documentary look at what Bui saw when
he returned to his country.  Bui has the eye of an artist with much of
the Asian sense of color.  We see this in the cyclo-race that is the
centerpiece of one of the stories and in the sensuous pleasure the
camera takes in the bright red blossoms of a country scene.
     THREE SEASONS--where the title comes from us unclear since it
seemed to me to take place over a much shorter period of time--is what
used to be called a feast for the eyes but remains a simple quiet
little film and not one that says very much.  I rate it a 6 on the 0 to
10 scale and a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for O Brother, Where Art Thou? (2000)
     The 1941 Preston Sturges comedy SULLIVAN'S TRAVELS told of a
movie director who decided that in the hard depression era, fluffy
comedies just were not what the world needed.  He wants to make a
serious film about the down-trodden in the South.  When the director
sees the real world he discovers what the world really needs is more
fluffy comedies like . . . well, like that Preston Sturges guy
makes.  On to the ash heap go his plans to make the serious and
important film O BROTHER, WHERE ART THOU?  Apparently Joel and Ethan
Coen have decided to make a film called O BROTHER, WHERE ART THOU?
after all.  In spite of the dour title it seems that neither
Sullivan nor the Coens could resist the urge to make fluff that
belies the harsh setting.
     The plot is simple enough.  We start with a chain gang working
soulfully in the blistering Mississippi sun.  Somehow three men have
managed to escape (as convicts always seem to from cinematic chain
gangs) and are hiding in a cornfield.  They are hobbled by a chain
around their ankles and betrayed by their telltale broad-striped
prison clothing.  There is Everett Ulysses McGill (played by George
Clooney), Pete Hogwollop (John Turturro), and Delmar O'Donnel (Tim
Blake Nelson.  The story follows them on a short odyssey into the
poor South past sights and though a series of episodes, some of
which will be drawn together in the final reel.  Along the way they
pick up and then lose a black guitarist Tommy Johnson (Chris Thomas
King).  They mix into music, and politics; they see a famous
criminal's getaway, a baptism, and a Klan rally.  In the end they
have multiple whimsical Dei Ex Machinae.  Some of the incidents are
loosely and slightly pretentiously based on episodes of Homer's
Odyssey.  Others are inspired by SULLIVAN'S TRAVELS and perhaps bits
of other films set in the Depression-era South like NIGHT OF THE
HUNTER and FOOLS' PARADE and Davis Grubb stories.
     The Coen Brothers are, of course, some of the most creative
filmmakers going.  This film is released by the unconventional
combination of Touchstone and Universal.  Roger Deakins shot the
entire film with washed out colors to give the film something of a
period feel.  It works, though I am not sure why.  They drop into
scenes 1930s products, particularly hair pomade for the dapper
Ulysses.  They avoided two pitfalls here.  They used no brands
currently available so they respected their film sufficiently to
avoid product placements.  They also avoided that great cliche of
the South, Moon Pies.  One cliche they did not avoid is the
choreographed and slightly too poetic chain gang.  It always seems
like an appeal to social conscience to show men chained up, though
how different is it from children led together through town on a
rope as we see in the latter portion of the film.
     The music by T-Bone Burnett and others becomes an important
element of the film rather than just creating atmosphere for
incidents.  The movie is suffused with the "Old Timey" music of the
period which becomes important in the plot.  There is a repeating
theme of the characters getting into strange circumstances by
following mystical music coming from the woods.  Each time it is
heard the boys will be tested in some way.  Tim Blake Nelson is not
one of the more familiar faces on the screen but manages to stand up
with the more popular Clooney and Turturro, though in the musical
scenes he seems relegated to a distinct third place.  Also along in
much smaller roles are familiar Coen veterans Charles Durning, John
Goodman, and Holly Hunter.
     As a single story, O BROTHER, WHERE ART THOU? just does not
amount to much.  But the individual episodes are entertaining.  I
rate it a 7 on the 0 to 10 scale and a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Bull Durham (1988)
     BULL DURHAM is a kind of comedy we don't see much of any more.  There
are a lot of comedies being made now, but most seem to be of a formula.
Take one or more comics established by being on SATURDAY NIGHT LIVE, SECOND
CITY, etc., and add a script full of jokes you would have to be blind AND
deaf to miss--by definition subtlety means someone might miss a gag.  The
comedies you get then are films like the horribly unfunny SPIES LIKE US,
DRAGNET, and DR. DETROIT.  BULL DURHAM is more like the comedies they made
most of the time in the 1940s and 1950s.  What humor it has is derived from
the interaction of believable personalities in believable situations.  The
only thing keeping BULL DURHAM from being a throwback to the subtler
comedies of the 1940s is several fairly explicit sex scenes.
     BULL DURHAM tells the story of one season in the life of a minor league
ball team, the Durham Bulls.  The team has, among others, a pitcher, Nuke
Laloosh (played by Tim Robbins), who has a hundred-horsepower pitching arm
and a nine-volt brain; a catcher, Crash Davis (well-played by Kevin
Costner); and two groupies.  One groupie is the owner's daughter (played by
Jenny Robertson) and the other, Annie Savoy (played by Susan Sarandon), is
an odd fan who has turned baseball into a sort of religion and has sort of
become a team institution.  Crash has been hired not just to catch, but also
to keep Nuke out of trouble as the big, dumb super-pitcher is groomed for
the majors.  His job is complicated by the attentions of Ms. Savoy, who is
indecisive whether it is the pitcher or the catcher she wants to sleep with.
     BULL DURHAM gives us some tantalizing views of the characters of the
team members and especially the managers, but unfortunately these characters
are never filled out.  Most of the story deals with Sarandon's character
who--for someone with no more status with the team than "fan"--is never far
from the action.  Some of the action she generates herself by tying ball
players to beds and reading to them poetry by Blake and Whitman.  And though
Costner's character is a bit stereotypical--the embittered veteran player--
he plays the role well.  With a rating of +1 on the -4 to +4 scale, it
brings to four the number of sports films I have liked.  (THE NATURAL got a
+3 from me, and IT HAPPENS EVERY SPRING and HOOSIERS got +1s.)

Title
Review for Living Out Loud (1998)
     Judith Nelson (played by Holly Hunter) is a very married woman at
the beginning of LIVING OUT LOUD.  Having quit medical school and
become a nurse while her husband became a cardiologist, she has wound
her whole life around her husband like thread wound on a spool.  When
he leaves her for another woman it is like removing the spool.  What
remains is a confused and knotted jumble without purpose or
organization.  She fantasizes a variety of crazy thoughts including a
suicide that will take her ex-husband and his wife with her.
     Meanwhile we also follow the story of Pat Francato (Danny DeVito),
a widower with a daughter who is very sick.  He plays poker and has
gotten into trouble with loan sharks.  He is the elevator operator in
Judith's apartment building and has taken an interest in her, though he
is painfully slow in getting around to talk to her.  Pat realizes that
an attractive blond like Judith--uh, Holly Hunter is a blond in this
film--would not want a short bald man who is also in trouble.  He
starts pulling his life together.  Judith, on the other hand, is a much
weaker person and will have a much harder time getting on with her
life.  It is not a romance that has much of a chance.  Judith needs
some good advice and finds it in a blues singer at Jasper's, her
favorite nightclub.  Liz Bailey, played majestically by Queen Latifah,
is a mother figure that Judith desperately needs at this crisis in her
life.
     Richard LaGravenese wrote and directed LIVING OUT LOUD taking his
inspiration from two stories by Anton Chekhov, "The Kiss" and "Misery."
(The latter is available at
http://eldred.ne.mediaone.net/ac/misery.htm.).  I did not realize that
as I was watching the film but it explains a lot about the style and
pace of the film.  Not much can be said to happen in the LIVING OUT
LOUD, which creates its characters, and then lets us look at them
almost affixed in one episode of their lives.  When one thinks of
Hunter one first thinks of the supremely organized women she played in
films like BROADCAST NEWS or even RAISING ARIZONA.  Here she is almost
the antithesis of that role.  She is capricious, flighty, and
internally crumbling.  Above all she is self-destructive.  It is really
Hunter's film.  We see a lot less depth in DeVito who is can almost be
summed up with the phrase "nice guy."  There is a great deal in this
film that stretches the viewer's credulity.  Liz Bailey very quickly
becomes a friend and confidant of Judith.  This seems particularly odd
since Judith seems frequently to be more a pest than an honored
customer at Jasper's.  It even seems a little strange that Pat is
interested in Judith, who is obviously trouble.

Title
Review for Twins (1988)
          Capsule review:  Two winning comic actors, DeVito and
     Schwarzenegger, overcome a severely problem-ridden hodge-
     podge of a script to make a comedy that is at least
     enjoyable, if little more.  Rating: 0.
     Hollywood long ago discovered that film formulae carried with them
built-in audiences.  Make a film in the formula, you get the audience.
Frankenstein movies had a built-in audience that was interested in seeing
any film about Frankenstein.  Abbott and Costello comedies had a different
built-in audience.  If you make a film like ABBOTT AND COSTELLO MEET
FRANKENSTEIN you get both audiences.  Never mind the fact that Abbott and
Costello film style is really incompatible with Frankenstein film style.
The technique of crossing formulae was usually restricted to "B" films; "A"
films seemed not to need it.  But in the 1980s, while the distinction
between "B" films and "A" films is much less obvious, most films made are
what used to be "B" films.  And crossing formulae is done in clever ways,
but is more prevalent than ever.  That's why Tom Cruise's young, high-gloss
smoothie characters--teenage audience pleasers--appear opposite serious
characters from serious adult dramas.  In THE COLOR OF MONEY Cruise plays
opposite Paul Newman's Fast Eddie Felsen from the realistic, gritty film THE
HUSTLER.  Then Cruise plays opposite Dustin Hoffman's autistic savant in
RAIN MAN.  These are films trying to bring in more than one pre-made
audience.  But the most blatant formula-mixer in recent history is TWINS.
This film is a Danny DeVito comedy, an Arnold Schwarzenegger action film, a
science fiction film, a warm human relationship film, a crime story, a bit
of CROCODILE DUNDEE, and much more.  How do they fit all these things
together?  Not very well.  TWINS is more a pile of plot elemnets than an
actual story.
     To read the credits, TWINS seems to have been made from two different
scripts and the result was a film with two different plots going on
simultaneously.  One is the story of how two brothers created by a
scientific experiment go out in search of their origins.  The other story is
how DeVito gets involved with industrial espionage, ends up in over his
head, and is rescued by his large, powerful brother.
     The plot of TWINS is full of coincidences which range from unlikely to
absurd.  It has problems of casting: Arnold Schwarzenegger could be the
required age of 35, but DeVito is too old for the part.  It assumes that one
person could  have six different fathers.  That is dubious even with modern
gene-splicing technology, but it is ludicrous with 1953 technology.  And
then the concept of the six fathers is never really used in the plot.  The
climax of the film occurs with DeVito inexplicably knowing how to use a
piece of equipment that does not make any sense even when you know what it
does.  (Sorry, that statement probably will not make sense until you see the
film, but people who have seen the film should know what that is all about.)
The script of this film is a mess.  Any chemistry between DeVito and
Schwarzenegger seems forced, but each has talent as a comic actor in his own
right and that, together with a pacing that keeps things happening, is what
makes the film as watchable as it is.  Rate it a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Heist (2001/I)
One never quite knows what one is going to get with a Mamet film.  
His AMERICAN BUFFALO is a set-bound piece that has very little 
plot.  Sometimes he will tell a story that really moves.  HEIST is 
Mamet doing his most entertaining work.  Unlike his THE SPANISH 
PRISONER, there are no lapses in credibility.  HEIST is probably 
the best Mamet thriller since HOUSE OF GAMES.  It is the kind of 
plot with which you are never sure who will double-cross whom, and 
frequently it is Mamet double-crossing the viewer.  Watching the 
film's team getting around security the viewer is frequently 
asking himself either "what the heck are they doing?" or "why 
didn't anybody think of that before?" 
Appropriately enough HEIST opens with a very clever jewelry store 
job.  It is so clever that one wonders if Mamet really thinks up 
all these ideas himself or if he has help from professional 
magician and con expert Ricky Jay, now a regular actor in Mamet 
films.  This is a robbery that works like a well-oiled machine.  
There is just one problem and it is enough to get Joe Moore 
(played by Gene Hackman) filmed on a security camera.  Now Joe has 
to get out of the business.  It was coming time anyway.  Joe's 
team including Bobby Blane (Delroy Lindo), Fran Moor (Rebecca 
Pidgeon), and Pinky Pincus (Ricky Jay) is going to split up and go 
separate ways.  But crime boss Bergman (Danny DeVito) is pulling 
the strings and he says that Joe and his people have to manage one 
more robbery.  And he has to take along a young kid, the short-
fused Jimmy Silk (Sam Rockwell).  Immediately it is obvious that 
there is more going on than meets the eye. 
Much of what distinguishes HEIST is Mamet's dialog.  Remarkably it 
serves a double purpose.  The robbery team sounds at once very 
professional and at the same time it has Mamet's special feel for 
dialog.  Hackman has lines like "Everybody needs money.  That's 
why they call it money."  Mamet's timing is perfect in the 
direction but terrible in the production.  The plot is 
coincidentally a lot like the plot of the recent THE SCORE, which 
is, in fact, a very similar story.  Both are good films, perhaps 
for some of the same reasons.  But at least on a high level they 
are much the same story.  The other problem with the timing of 
HEIST is that it involves airport security and clever ways to get 
around them.  I saw the film at the Toronto International Film 
Festival on September 12, 2001.  That made the subject matter just 
a little too timely.  My understanding is that the release will be 
delayed. 
My biggest problem with the film is that Rebecca Pidgeon's acting 
at times seems very poor.  It is some kind of Mamet trademark I do 
not understand to have women talk without inflection, as if they 
are just reading the words for the first time.  It is an 
irritation and distracts us from what is otherwise a very good 
thriller.  It is one I rate an 8 on the 0 to 10 scale and a high 
+2 on the -4 to +4 scale. 

Title
Review for Matinee (1993)
     This one is going to be hard for me to be objective about.  I think Joe
Dante may be a couple of years older than I, loved the same films I loved
when I was growing up.  He and I subscribed to the same monster magazines
and probably had the same books in our libraries; we idolized the same
filmmakers; we were both walking encyclopedias about the same films.  Now he
has reached into his past, grabbed it, and put it on film and at the same
time he put a lot of my past forward too.
     It is October 1962 in Key West, Florida, and the second biggest thing
happening in the world is the Cuban Missile Crisis.  People are going crazy
because they might die at any minute.  But right now the big thing happening
is that Lawrence Woolsey is coming to town.  The great William-Castle-like
filmmaker of lousy monster movies is coming to key West to test-market
MANT!, the story of a man turning into a giant ant.  Woolsey is a genius at
promoting his films and uses every trick in the book and some never in any
book to fill the seats with joy buzzers below and frightened kids above.
     MATINEE is a film with a terrific first half.  This is a film that
manages to tie together a teenage love story, a serious anti-war theme, a
satire of science fiction films, and the comic story of Woolsey trying to
have a successful sneak preview.  John Goodman's Woolsey is extremely well-
written, appearing at first to be a stop-at-nothing self-promoter and then
proving to have the char, and natural showmanship of a Will Rogers.  Cathy
Moriarty plays Ruth Corday, a great foil for Woolsey.  She stars in MANT!
and then brazenly has to don a nurse's costume and play the ersatz "nurse in
attendance" at the showing.  All the time she is letting Woolsey know
exactly how stupid the entire proceedings are.  Moriarty is great, but the
role feels as if it was written for Mary Woronov.  Simon Fenton (of THE
POWER OF ONE) plays Gene Loomis, starting in high school and dating for the
first time.  Currently he is coming home to a family terrified of the
missile crisis and worried for the Navy father who is off enforcing the
embargo of Cuba.
     It is a great start, but the screenplay by Charlie Haas falls apart in
the second half.  Much of the logic of the story breaks down with some of
the plot not making sense at all.  No film made in the 1950s ever combined
so many gimmicks to bring in an audience.  But that exaggeration is almost
acceptable compared to the miles-over-the-top lampoon of the 1950s and 1960s
films themselves.  Any film with the budget MANT! required really would have
been better crafted.  The writing might have been dull, but it is unlikely
to have been so melodramatic or vaudevillian.  The distorted style of MANT!
is inconsistent with the rest of the film.
     Part of the fun of MATINEE is picking out all the allusions to 1950s
and 1960s films.  Of course, there are the seat vibrators of THE TINGLER,
the insurance policies of MACABRE, and the monster unveiling of THE FLY, but
see if you can recognize the music borrowed from the 1950s Universal sci-fi
films and even snatches of HOUSE OF FRANKENSTEIN.  Even the "M" in the MANT!
logo is borrowed from THE DEADLY MANTIS.  And the film is peppered with
actors from 1950s films.  Not Kenneth Tobey for once--at least I did not
notice him--but Robert Cornthwaite, Kevin McCarthy (who plays General
Ankrum, a reference to Morris Ankrum who often played upper-rank military
men), and William Schallert.  Also present in nice ironic roles are Dick
Miller and John Sayles.  Sayles, of course, is rarely an actor but he got
his start writing PIRANHA, ALLIGATOR, BATTLE BEYOND THE STARS, and THE
HOWLING, the first and last directed by Dante.
     While I cannot recommend every minute of MATINEE there is enough
pleasure here to make this one well worth seeing.  My rating would be a low
+2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Enemies: A Love Story (1989)
     The Holocaust is over and Herman Broder survived.  Now he is haunted
only by nightmares of the night the Nazis took his wife, Tamara, and
children.  All three had been killed in the death camps, he'd been told.
Now Broder is married to Yadwiga, the Polish servant whose family saved his
life.  Off and on he teaches Yadwiga to be Jewish, though she seems more
earnest about it than he is.  He has an okay job as a ghost writer for a
famous rabbi and he has a good-looking mistress on the side.  That's Masha,
a fiery Jewish woman who also survived the death camps.  For now Broder is
getting by, but soon his mistress will be pregnant and wanting to be
married, and to make matters worse, Broder's first wife survived after all
and this will leave Broder with two wives more than he can handle.
     Paul Mazursky's ENEMIES, A LOVE STORY, based on a story by Isaac
Bashevis Singer, is a surprisingly well-realized comedy-drama with four
characters, one husband and his three wives, all believable and three-
dimensional.  And the fifth character is the post-war Jewish community in
New York, very authentically recreated on the screen--authentic enough that
it brought back memories of when I was very young, not long after this film
is set.
     Broder's three wives are very different types, each with her own
strengths.  Margaret Sophie Stein plays stolid, sincere, and homely Yadwiga,
still half living in the Poland in which she grew up.  She knows her husband
has some hanky-panky going on, but ignores it while she can, thinking that
if she can make herself Jewish enough she can hold on to him.  The
bewitching Lena Olin (of THE UNBEARABLE LIGHTNESS OF BEING) plays Masha,
burning out her life as quickly as she can.  Then there is Anjelica Huston
as Tamara, at first bitterly bent on reclaiming her husband but eventually
transforming herself into a healing force.  And at the center of these women
is Herman himself (played by Ron Silver), confused and indecisive, with a
need to feel he is in control of things, most of which are beyond him.
     There is a lot of film here.  For a film with both comedy and drama,
there is surprisingly much of each.  The comedy does not feel at all forced
and is all very human.  The drama is also very human and at times very
painful.  Maurice Jarre understood the film very well and provided a score
with light klezmer music to underscore the comedy and with sad clarinet
music to underscore the more serious moments.  ENEMIES is one of the better
films of 1989, a year that had more than its share of good films.  I rate it
a high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.  For those who worry about such things,
there is explicit sex and indistinct dialogue.  I didn't mind the former,
but lamented the latter.

Title
Review for Clear and Present Danger (1994)
     When the U.S. Coast Guard intercepts a derelict yacht floating in
American waters, it discovers that it was the scene of a grisly set of
murders.  The victim was a prominent businessman and his family, all
personal friends of U.S. President Bennett (Donald Moffat).  Bennett is
shocked and angry, particularly when investigation proves the murdered
man had financial ties to Columbian drug lords.  Bennett hints to his
security advisors that the time has come to start striking back against
the Columbian drug families.  And the action taken and its results are
the heart of this story.
     Harrison Ford returns as Jack Ryan, and he remains a disappointing
choice.  Ryan is someone who should be alert, perhaps hyper-active, and
should have a youthful appearance to live up to his boy scout image.
Even with his character under fire, Ford seems only 90% awake.  He is
popular with audiences, but his acting is a liability, in my opinion.
Donald Moffat returns to playing a President not unlike his Lyndon
Johnson of THE RIGHT STUFF.  Adding no new tricks to his bag, Harris
Yulin, familiar for many roles as villains, plays National Security
Advisor James Cutter.  Willem Dafoe does not stretch his talents much as
a commando.  Anne Archer repeats her role as Cathy Ryan.  Miguel
Sandoval is a rather winning rich drug lord.  It is probably Moffat and
Sandoval who stand out as the better actors of the film.  But the
emphasis is more on the story than on acting.
     Phillip Noyce, the director of the (recommended) thriller DEAD
CALM, and the less satisfying PATRIOT GAMES does have a better script to
work from in CLEAR AND PRESENT DANGER.  Generally a script credited to
three people will have some problems, but CLEAR AND PRESENT DANGER seems
to suffer from this less than most such films.  That could be because of
who the three people are.  One is John Milius who wrote films like
MAGNUM FORCE, APOCALYPSE NOW, CONAN THE BARBARIAN, and general action
films.  Then there is Donald Stewart, veteran of MISSING and the two
previous Jack Ryan films.  The third writer was Steven Zaillian, whose
screen credits include AWAKENINGS, PATRIOT GAMES, SEARCHING FOR BOBBY
FISCHER, and SCHINDLER'S LIST.  It is an unlikely trio, but it works in
a script that has action and is cerebral.  Somebody at Paramount was
concerned about getting good writing and the screenwriting credits are
as impressive as any of the other credits.
     The script is good, but not perfect.  Toward the end of the film
the action starts becoming a little less intelligent and a little more
action-oriented.  In short, it becomes a little too reminiscent of James
Bond films.  Though an action sequence in the first third is very well
done (if one ignores a touch of cliched slow motion).  This one piece is
the high point of the film and really leaves the audience breathless.
After Ryan escapes from this trap, there is little else he does that is
as impressive.  A sequence intercutting between a formal ceremony and a
bloody massacre perhaps borrows a little heavily from the "Godfather"
films.  Also refreshing in the writing is the presence of a strong and
intelligent woman who is clearly not present for decorative value.  But
what is most impressive in this film is the moral ambiguity of Ryan's
position.  Ryan remains the hero to the audience, but for the first time
in the series, a serious case could be made that he is not acting in the
best interests of the United States.
     Of course the classic spy film series to date has been the James
Bond series.  What I think is often forgotten is that the Bond films all
too often had contrived and simplistic plots.  They were better than
this year's TRUE LIES in that regard, but there was little to engage the
viewer's mind.  The plots were too dependent on chase sequences and
fight scenes.  The other extreme is a story like TINKER, TAILOR,
SOLDIER, SPY in which everything that goes on is cerebral.  The Jack
Ryan films are a happy medium between the two and none more so than
CLEAR AND PRESENT DANGER.
     There are more reasons to prefer Ryan to Bond for spy films.  The
Bond films spend a lot of time on sexual subplots.  It is fun, but it
takes valuable time from the plot.  It is always clear that Ryan's best
working organ is between his ears.  Clancy's Ryan is a happily married
family man who doesn't fool around ... in any sense of the word.  With
that screen time out of the way, the writing has more room for
intelligence (no pun intended).  And unlike in Bond films which have
long chase scenes, one never feels that it is action scenes alone
driving the plot.  The action pieces are there, but they serve the plot
rather than the reverse.  I think I can safely say that CLEAR AND
PRESENT DANGER not only has a more satisfying plot than any of the Bond
films, it is even the best of the Ryan films.  The basic idea of the
last two films could really be told with some justice in one or two
sentences each.  That is most definitely not the case in CLEAR AND
PRESENT DANGER.  The game keeps changing for Jack Ryan through the
entire film.  Rather than this being a two-sided game, there is the kind
of chaos one gets with several sides pulling in different directions.
The script makes clever use of recent U.S. history to tell parts of the
story that there would not be time to tell explicitly in the film.
CLEAR AND PRESENT DANGER is the best spy films in several years.  It
also is as riveting as any Bond film ever made.  I would give CLEAR AND
PRESENT DANGER a high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Phantom, The (1996)
     The legend of The Phantom began in the 16th Century when off the
shores of the Island of Bangalla ("Bengalla" in the film) Singg pirates
captured a British merchantman ship and put all to the sword but for a
young boy, Kit, who dived over the side just in time to see his father
killed.  The boy swam to shore and was rescued by pygmies (not so small
in the film).  The boy swore revenge on the pirate who killed his
beloved father, but days later he found the pirate washed up on shore
dead.  His goal in life gone, he instead devoted his life to fighting
piracy, greed, cruelty, and injustice wherever it occurred.  He swore
that this would be not just his mission, but that of his sons and their
sons.  When he died they would carry on after him.  So began a long
line of Phantoms.  As there always was a Phantom around fighting evil,
even as generations and even centuries passed, the legend grew that The
Phantom could not die.  He could appear to die, but would return ever
and again looking just the same.  He was called "The Man Who Cannot
Die" and "The Ghost Who Walks."  The pygmies kept the secret that The
Phantom was a mortal and gave each Phantom the secrets of their
deadliest hunting poisons.  He made his home Skull Cave in the deep
woods of Bangalla and found other Skull Caves in other parts of the
world including the American Southwest.  From these he could fight
evil-doers everywhere.  But when one Phantom's adventures were ended a
Phantom would always return to Bangalla, his true home.  The pygmies
knew that the day would come when each Phantom would die, usually
violently, and The Phantom's son would be summoned to don the costume
and assume the role of The Phantom.
     I have to admit that even as a child I was not very interested in
The Phantom.  He was just about the least intriguing-looking super-hero
I could think of.  A black mask and a skin-tight purple suit was just
too little costume.  He looked a lot like a professional wrestler.  But
what really unsold me on The Phantom were his garish purple and black
diagonally striped shorts (missing in the film).  Because I thought the
shorts looked silly, the stories probably never got much of a chance to
impress me, though modern critics say that it was one of the better
adventure comic strips.  The Phantom was the creation of Lee Falk, who
previously had created Mandrake the Magician.  The strip began its long
run on February 17, 1936, and sixty years later it was still running.
The strip was adapted into a fifteen-chapter Columbia serial in 1943,
with Tom Tyler playing the title role.  Now, with the character a
little over sixty years old, The Phantom is back on the wide screen in
a story with a strong serial feel.
     The year is 1938 and the world is in turmoil as dictators try to
bring about a New World Order.  The United States has its own would-be
dictator, the ruthless gangster/businessman Xander Drax (played by
Treat Williams).  Drax's plan to is to get power through the use of
supernatural means.  He wants to gain possession of three mystical
jeweled skulls which when brought together will bring their owner about
the same power that the Lost Ark would.  (And this film does borrow
heavily and repeatedly from RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARK, albeit lacking the
style to make it all work.)  As the film opens we see three ruthless
Indiana-Jones-like characters who have tracked the first skull to the
Island of Bengalla (ugh-oh!).  The skull is in a cave somewhere in the
deep woods (UGH-OH!).  But it is safe, you see, because one of the
mercenary explorers had actually killed The Phantom several years
before (Dead meat!!!).  Out of the forest, on a white horse and
followed by the wolf, Devil, comes riding The Phantom.  And so begins
an adventure that will carry The Phantom to New York City and later to
a meeting with the last descendants of the Singg pirates, killers of
the father of the original Phantom.
     Billy Zane is a reasonable actor, best remembered, at least by me,
as the sea-going psychopath in the taut thriller DEAD CALM.  And in the
purple suit he physically looks the part, even without the striped
shorts.  Treat Williams plays his villain with a subtle tongue-in-
cheek.  He does not interpret the role so broadly that he could be in a
Batman film, but he is not really playing it straight either.  Kristy
Swanson, known too well as BUFFY, THE VAMPIRE SLAYER, puts the most
character in her maiden-in-distress that I have seen from her in any
film, but she has a long way to go.  And veteran Patrick McGoohan is
known for underplaying his roles and so fits right in.  Some of the
most interesting faces are in bit parts: a gangster here, a cab driver
there.
     Perhaps the most intriguing part about Jeffrey Boam's script is
its unwillingness to commit to whether The Phantom is supernatural or
not.  The legend is that The Phantom is supernatural and supposedly the
truth is that he is not, but there are bits in the film that imply he
is able to do what no mortal man could.  Does he commune with the ghost
of his father or is it only a memory?  The supernatural certainly
mingles with the natural world in this film.  Some of his abilities
seem to be just on the edge of what is naturally possible, but it could
be just the writing.  Certainly Boam is willing to contrive some absurd
coincidences, particularly having villains fall a little too perfectly
into some set traps.
     One problem with the script is that while it is sort of explained
how The Phantoms find mates to extend their line, it is a little less
clear how the Singg pirates find sufficient mates considering where
they are.  Nor is it really clear why, lacking the dedication of the
Phantoms, they continue their line in the same profession.  And it is a
little hokey having everybody be descendants of originals, repeating
the same battles that have gone on for 400 years.  Many of the scenes
are not staged very well.  When someone swings on a rope, if you watch
the angle that the rope hangs you will see definite continuity errors.
One odd departure from the original suit is the addition of surface
designs.  It is like little black lines were added to accentuate muscle
definition.  One absurd scene has the wolf Devil apparently talking to
The Phantom's white horse and telling the horse where to go to pick up
his master.  The horse then outruns an airplane.  Some horse.  There is
little on-screen violence, but there is a gruesome scene of implied
violence (borrowed from the film THE HORRORS OF THE BLACK MUSEUM).
     In spite of a valiant effort to recreate a feel of the 1930s, THE
PHANTOM never really works perfectly and often not even well.  Then
again the same can be said of the old serials.  And it is good-natured
fun in the style of the old movie serials.  If you did not like THE
SHADOW which had a good deal more panache, it is a good bet you will
not like THE PHANTOM.  For the sake of that fun I give it a high 0 on
the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Love and Death on Long Island (1997)
     Thomas Mann's short intense psychological novel DEATH IN VENICE is
unlikely material for a contemporary comedy-drama.  And while nothing
in the credits or publicity acknowledges the connection, that would
seem that that is the basis for this updated story taking place in
London and Long Island.
     Giles De'Ath (played by John Hurt) is one of the great living
English authors, his ivory tower insulating him from anything modern,
just the way he likes it.  An unlikely series of events puts him in a
movie theater showing a cinematic trifle called HOT PANTS COLLEGE II.
Giles is about to turn away from the film in disgust when he notices
Ronnie Bostock (Jason Priestley).  Bostock is an attractive young actor
who simply put infatuates Giles.
     Now Giles has a reason to get interested in the technology of the
20th Century.  He wants to see all of Bostock's films.  Like a fish out
of water he wades in to try to understand the intricacies of renting
films and of understanding the home video revolution.  He wants to see
every film ever made by Bostock.  And an unpromising assortment it is.
But Giles is unsatisfied by worshipping from afar.  Instead De'Ath
takes a holiday and hops a plane for the United States to find the
actor and then to insinuate himself into Bostock's life.  First he has
to find where Bostock lives.  Then he approaches first Bostock's live-
in girlfriend, Audrey (Fiona Loewi).  And finally he will move in on
Bostock himself.  None of this is easy for the man in both an
unfamiliar place and time.  Audrey is impressed by the stature of this
famous writer so fascinated by her boyfriend, but she little guesses
the trouble it can cause.
     The major attraction of the film is John Hurt's performance, which
manages to combine sinister and pitiable aspects.  He is a stalker
bedeviled by his ignorance of the modern world.  The film is an uneasy
mix of the resulting comic situations with the tragedy of the Thomas
Mann novel.  It is not clear how much comic potential this story could
have had, but Richard Kwietniowski's screenplay and direction seem
leaden.  The humor is just a bit off somehow.  Jason Priestley plays a
callow but empty actor whose questionable career echoes his Priestley's
own.  Fiona Loewi has a little more depth to her part, but it clearly
is Hurt's film for whatever he can salvage from it.
     The film is shot by Oliver Curtis who manages to give three
distinct visual styles to the film, one for London, one for Long
Island, and a third one for the excerpts we see of Bostock's crude
filmography.

Title
Review for Prick Up Your Ears (1987)
          Capsule review:  The true story of the homosexual
     relationship of successful playwright Joe Orton and his
     equally talented but much less successful "wife," Kenneth
     Halliwell.  This is a solid dramatic film and one of the
     year's best.
     It would be nice to feel that success is a matter of talent alone, but
clearly charisma and luck have a hand also.  PRICK UP YOUR EARS is about two
men--lovers--who appear to be about equally talented.  One makes it as an
award-winning playwright; one is doomed to fail at whatever he puts his hand
to.  PRICK UP YOUR EARS is the story of Joe Orton and Kenneth Halliwell's
relationship and how it is affected by Orton's success.  We see the story in
flashback after Halliwell murdered Orton and then committed suicide.
     Orton was a popular playwright whose death in 1967 caused a stir,
particularly after it was revealed that he had had a longstanding homosexual
relationship with Halliwell.  PRICK UP YOUR EARS is based on a biography of
Orton which in turn was based on Orton's diaries.  The film flashes back and
forth as Orton's biographer (played by Wallace Shawn) interviews Orton's
agent, Peggy (played by Vanessa Redgrave).
     The flashbacks themselves jump around in time a bit, but generally tell
the story from when Orton and Halliwell met in acting school to their
deaths.  Though there was not much difference in their ages at the beginning
of their relationship, Halliwell was more sophisticated.  In a dramatic
scene in acting school, Halliwell shows himself to be more imaginative than
his classmates and perhaps a bit disturbed.  He seduces Orton and starts a
life collaborating with him as well as living with him.  After each spends
six months in prison for defacing library books, Peggy takes notice of
Orton's writing and guides him to success while Halliwell is left behind.
     Alfred Molina plays Joe Orton.  Molina previously played sociopath Sid
Vicious in SID AND NANCY.  Joe Orton matures into a very different sort of
person than Sid Vicious.  Based on clips I have seen from SID AND NANCY, I
am as impressed as the critics were with Molina's versatility.  But perhaps
because it is a less appealing role most critics I know of have under-
praised Gary Oldman as Halliwell.  The withering of his self-respect is what
makes this film and he deserves more attention than I am seeing him get.  In
any case, PRICK UP YOUR EARS gets a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.  Look for
Oscar nominations for this film.

Title
Review for Hong faan kui (1995)
     Take this review from whence it comes.  I am absolutely floored by
the mental agility of Thomas More in A MAN FOR ALL SEASONS.  The skill
to fight with agility just has never been one for which I have much
appreciation.  I suppose I am about equally impressed with a good
martial artist and a good juggler.  I can appreciate that each can
perform with what appears to be a high degree of skill.  I will watch
each for the moment they are performing and then move on without
envying or even being impressed too much by either.  So perhaps I am
the wrong person to see a Jackie Chan film, whose plot is little more
than an excuse to string together fighting sequences.
     Keung (Jackie Chan) is a prize-winning martial artist in Hong Kong
who comes to the United States to attend his uncle's wedding.  He
quickly discovers that his uncle intends to sell the Asian grocery the
uncle owns.  Keung find himself attracted to the new owner and decides
to stick around and set up the grocery.  This means defending the woman
from a gang of cartoonish bikers who prey on the grocery.  When one of
the bikers steals some loot from some apparent Mafia types, the fight
becomes a three-way battle.
     One of the problems of the script is that Keung's abilities seem
inconsistent and seem to come and go.  It is unclear why in some scenes
he seems so easily defeated and in others he seems unbeatable.  Nor is
it clear why once the street gang has discovered a winning strategy for
beating Keung, they never again use it against him.  Also, we see early
on that he has only limited ability to dodge flying objects, so
presumably he has even less ability to dodge bullets.  Yet while people
threaten to shoot him, nobody actually tries it, even just to disable
him.  The appearance is that even Jackie Chan does not have moves for
dodging a bullet that look convincing on camera and so the scriptwriter
just does not let the situation arise.
     Beyond the action scenes little attention was paid to production
values.  For just about every other aspect of the film the words that
come to mind are "adequate" or "mediocre."  There is little acting in
the film and what is there is intended only to showcase Jackie Chan.
Far more could be done with Chan, of course.  The man has considerably
more screen presence than either Steven Segal or Jean-Claude Van Damme.
This film does what it can to capitalize off Chan's personality, but a
larger budget, a more polished production, and above all a much better
script are needed to make this a really professional product.
     Ironically, the point of the film that generates the greatest
emotions is the closing credits.  Chan shows outtakes where stunts went
wrong.  It combines some of the best laughs of the film with some of
its most poignant moments.  We see two or three cases of actors
performing stunts that go wrong and ending up being put in the back of
an ambulance.  One wonders if this practice does not frighten away
prospective performers from appearing in so dangerous a film to shoot.
     For those who, like me, have only a limited appreciation for
Chan's athletic moves there is not much that this film offers.  For
people who have similar tastes to mine I rate RUMBLE IN THE BRONX a 0
on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Bugsy (1991)
     Barry Levinson is a director who concentrates on putting myth onto
film.  Most commonly he mythologizes about his roots in Baltimore.  He tells
stories about his family and friends when he was growing up.  Perhaps his
best myth to date is the fantasy-sports story THE NATURAL.  In GOOD MORNING,
VIETNAM his mythical hero was the irreverent disk jockey who bucks the
system.  Perhaps it is not surprising that he would eventually turn to
making films about one of America's two great mythical figures, the cowboy
and the gangster.  However, while cowboy films are on the skids, gangster
films are on the upswing, so he picked a well-known gangster, Benjamin
"Bugsy" Siegel.  (In fact, this film ties in with MOBSTERS earlier this year
in which Siegel was one of the four title characters.  Also, Siegel is
assumed by many to have been the real murderer of Bo Greenberg.  BILLY
BATHGATE begins showing Dutch Schultz committing the crime.  Lucky Luciano
has been a character in all three films; the three gangster films are all
intertwined.)  Levinson chose to tell the story of the ten years from 1937
to 1947, when Siegel was a major crime figure on the West Coast.
     When BUGSY opens, Siegel (played by Warren Beatty) is being sent to Los
Angeles on a twelve-day errand.  Siegel is anxious to get together with
boyhood friend George Raft (played by Joe Mantegna).  Siegel is flush with
easy money and decides to stay in California and buy himself the California
lifestyle.  He does this quite literally.  Being told that a house belonged
to famous opera singer Lawrence Tibbet, it takes Siegel less than five
minutes to more or less force his way in and buy the house from Tibbet.  Two
things capture Bugsy's imagination.  One is a minor actress, Virginia Hill
(played by Annette Bening), and the other is a patch of barren desert where
gambling is legal--it is called Las Vegas.  Siegel decides to master each.
     Beatty plays Siegel as a man of mercurial temperament.  One moment he
can be charming, the next he can be in a murderous rage.  Many of his ideas
are totally off the wall.  He discovers that one of his lovers is married to
a personal friend of Mussolini.  He decides he wants to parlay this into a
plot to murder Mussolini because he does not like what Mussolini stands for.
On the other hand, his plan for a casino and landing strip at Las Vegas was
visionary.
     This is very much Beatty's show.  Bening's Virginia Hill is very much
like Bening's character in THE GRIFTERS.  Harvey Keitel and Joe Mantegna--
both good actors--get seen without much opportunity to act.  On the other
hand, Elliot Gould, usually not such a fine actor, takes a small part as a
forlorn gangster and nearly steals the whole film.  Remarkably, even a great
actor like Ben Kingsley (as Meyer Lansky) comes off wooden and uninteresting
compared to Gould.
     This film has been getting a lot of attention, probably in no small
part due to the look of the set direction and the photography.  The film is
not afraid to show a steamy love scene as just two shadows on a screen.  The
photography catches the neon nights of Los Angeles's center or the foggy
nights of its suburbs.  The film has a well-done if somewhat subdued score
from Ennio Morricone.  Several of his themes are reminiscent of his
UNTOUCHABLES score.  Levinson's direction, however, does not sustain the
mood.  There is, for example, a rather silly scene of Siegel trying to run a
birthday party for his young daughter while having a meeting with the
syndicate in his living room.  It only serves to damage the atmosphere.
     Overall, in spite of several good reports, I have to say that BUGSY is
just a stylish gangster film that generally tells a true story, though some
of its facts are wrong.  I rate it a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     It is clear that somebody somewhere along the line really did some
research on Siegel.  The story as we see it is basically correct, though
there are numerous factual errors.  The major flaw is in how Virginia Hill
is portrayed.  She is supposed to be an actress.  In fact, she was an
Alabama girl who came to Chicago to be a cooch dancer for the 1934 World's
Fair.  After that her occupation seemed to be mistress.  She was handed
around by several well-known gangsters including Frank Nitti, Frank
Costello, and of course, Joey Adonis and Bugsy Siegel, with whom she finally
settled down.  The newspapers labeled her "the Queen of the Mob."  She
wasn't the queen, but she did run errands for the syndicate.  No reference I
can find indicates she ever was an actress.  I know that the New York Times
never listed her in the credits of a film, since her name does not appear in
their directory.
     Siegel did not have a plot to kill Mussolini.  He did travel to Italy
to try to sell Il Duce an experimental explosive which turned out not to
work.  He had to return Mussolini's investment of $40,000.  While there he
met Hermann Goering and Joseph Goebbels.  It is an underworld legend that he
took a dislike to them and started hatching a plot to murder them.  (I found
this story in two different references--honest!)
     Harry "Big Greenie" Greenberg did not go to Los Angeles to ask Siegel's
help.  He went for a place to hide out.  The syndicate found out Big Greenie
was in California and asked Bugsy to arrange his death.  Not content just to
arrange, Siegel took two other men and killed Greenie himself.  They shot
him as he was returning home one day.
     The idea of Bugsy staying in California was that of the syndicate, not
Bugsy himself on a twelve-day trip.  The story of buying the Tibbet house
was fun, but probably untrue, since Bugsy only rented the house.
     The Flamingo did not open on Christmas Day 1946, but the day after.
The turnout was poor, but there were people coming and gambling.  Further,
Bugsy was not killed for several months and by then the casino was starting
to show a profit.  Virginia Hill was probably not bright enough to hide her
embezzling from Siegel.  And even if she was, she was depositing the money
by shuttling frequently to Europe and personally making the deposits.  It
seems unthinkable that Bugsy would not have known and, in fact, planned the
operation.  Virginia was in Europe, not at the Flamingo, June 20, 1947, when
Bugsy was shot.  Bugsy was not alone, however; a friend with whom he had
dinner was present.  The film implies that Hill committed suicide in Austria
as a result of Siegel's death.  Actually, it was nineteen years, several
lovers, and a husband later.

Title
Review for Eve's Bayou (1997)
     The year is supposedly 1962, though there is a timelessness to the
narrative.  Eve Batiste (played by Jurnee Smollett) narrates the story
and begins by saying this is the year that she killed her father.  That
statement hangs over the entire film and gives what seems to be a
series of random remembered incidents a direction, though the viewer is
unsure how figuratively or literally she means she killed her father.
Eve lives on the bayou in the town of Eve's Bayou.  Her father, Louis
(Samuel L. Jackson) is the attractive town doctor who has a tendency to
fool around with his more attractive female patients, cheating on his
wife Roz (Lin Whitfield).  Also in the family are Eve's older sister
Cisely (Meagan Good), her young brother Poo, and Louis's sister Mozelle
Batiste Delacroix (Debbie Morgan).  Louis gives Eve the impression that
he prefers his oldest daughter over her, and Eve feels the sting of
that rejection as well as feeling a little bit left out. One evening
Eve catches her father making love to the wife of a friend and this
starts things changing in the family.  Eve does not want to believe
what she has seen but is only half willing to accept her sister
Cisely's fabricated explanation that it was all innocent.  And the
matter remains in both sisters' minds. Writer/director Kasi Lemmons
makes this one of several stories unfolding at the same time.  Aunt
Mozelle is a seer with psychic abilities to see into the lives of
others, but cannot use her powers to help herself: she has outlived
multiple husbands and blames herself for their deaths.
     The film at no time ties itself to any current events outside of
the community of Eve's Bayou, Louisiana. For that matter, in spite of a
black cast of characters, the subject of race is totally absent.
Virtually the same story could have been told in the white or the
Chinese community, for example, with only minor alterations. One such
modification might have to involve the acceptance of voodoo in this
story.  This is a world in which fortune tellers and psychics are
authentic.  The acceptance of magic is not the main thrust of the film
but it adds to the texture.  An old voodoo priestess seems to be half
sham, yet her magic appears to work. She is nicely played by Diahann
Carroll in a real departure from her squeaky clean image back when she
was one of the first female black leads in a TV show.
     It pretty much goes without saying that Lemmons would get a good
performance from the likes of Carroll and Jackson.  These are well-
established actors who will give good performances as second nature.
It is perhaps a different talent to get good performances from
children.  Getting an acceptable and by-the- numbers performance from
them is not difficult but getting a performance with some depth is a
lot harder, because children frequently are overconfident in front of a
camera and do not know how to control a performance.  As the lead
Smollett has to carry the film without reducing it to a children's
film, and her performance is fully up to adult standards.  She
apparently understands acting and that makes a real difference to the
film.  Meagan Good as the somewhat enigmatic older sister does not have
as much to do, but also gives a very solid performance.  Amy Vincent's
cinematography includes at least a few very effective images and adds
greatly to flavor of the film.
     EVE'S BAYOU is a rich and emotional look at one small community
and is not a bad debut writing and directing effort by Kasi Lemmons.  I
give it a 7 on the 0 to 10 scale and a 2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Toy Story 2 (1999)
     Woody, Buzz Lightyear, and the whole gang of TOY STORY are back in
a sequel that has all the sophisticated special effects and a more
complex story.  The adventure is a little more extravagant.  But even
more important the toys face concerns that will be even more resonant
with the adults in the audience than with the children who would appear
to be the target audience.
     The second TOY STORY opus opens with a space-opera fantasy
featuring that commander of the limitless ether, Buzz Lightyear (voiced
by Tim Allen).  It seems at first out of context but serves stretch the
capabilities of Pixar and to introduce Buzz Lightyear's video game
enemy, the Emperor Zurg.  This sequence soon leads us to a familiar
bedroom where toy owner Andy is headed for Cowboy Camp and planning to
take with him Woody (Tom Hanks).  But it is not to be.  A last minute
injury leaves Woody sidelined on the shelf with an arm nearly coming
off.  Andy's mother makes matters even worse for Woody by reminding
Andy that toys don't last forever.  This stokes Woody's fears of
abandonment.  In fact, a yard sale that very day is planned to remove a
friend from the toys' midst, a penguin squeeze toy.  Woody saves the
penguin only by venturing into the yard sale.  There he is recognized
by a local sleazy toy collector and toy store owner as a valuable
collector's item.  Woody it seems was modeled on a popular cowboy TV
marionette from the 1950s.  Woody in stolen in order to complete a set
for the collector.  Woody it seems has a family he has never known
about--a girlfriend, sidekick, and horse.  They are now a complete set
and can come out of storage and make people happy.  But to do that,
Woody can never return to Andy.  Somebody has to lose.  Children's
films often have characters choose between good and bad, but rarely
between one good cause and another one.
     There are certainly films made with scripts a lot worse than the
first TOY STORY film, but TOY STORY 2 is a much more satisfying script.
This is actually surprising since seven different people worked on the
story and script.  That generally is a very bad sign.  But the script
manages to have some resonance without losing a good sense of humor
including several laugh-out-loud jokes.  There are multiple film
allusions including a very funny one to JURASSIC PARK.  The makers have
recognized that Bo-Peep, the only female toy of the first film, left a
lot to be desired in character complexity.  Jessie (Joan Cusack) as the
toy based on Woody's TV girlfriend has her own agenda.
     Pixar's main stock and trade is, of course, computer animation.
So an important question is how does this film look?  Much of the
animation technique will be familiar from the original TOY STORY.  That
does not break new ground.  Andy looks no more real than he did in the
last film.  That could be attributed to continuity.  But this film adds
two new human characters: Bad guy Al McWhiggin and the Cleaner.  The
Cleaner has just a cameo and looks to be the title character from
Pixar's Academy Award winning short "Geri's Game."  McWhiggin is
overweight, middle-aged, and balding.  He appears to be their most
realistic looking human figure to date.  They also have a nice
dachshund puppy.  Generally Pixar keeps the number of characters with
physically soft surfaces to a minimum as they are probably much harder
to animate.  (Notice that their early character Luxo is make of rigid
pieces.  The bugs of A BUG'S LIFE had shells.)  Attention to detail is
particularly nice.  Apparently their layout artist is usually good and
often excellent.  Note touches abound like that after McWhiggin has
eaten cheese puffs his fingers appear yellow orange.
     Just as the classic BLACK BEAUTY has at its heart the tragic and
cruel ways that insensitive humanity treats horses, TOY STORY 2 shows
that a toy's life is a bleak affair.  While the first TOY STORY saw a
toy's life as being played with or being boringly left on the shelf,
the new film hits at some fairly disturbing material having toy society
echo some of the worst of human society.  Old friendships can be broken
up at the whim of the owner or the owner's parents.  A moment of
careless play leaves Woody without the use of one of his arms.  This
leaves Woody haunted by the fear of what will happen when he is broken
or Andy gets too old to play with him.  There is ahead for him the
oblivion of being dropped into the wastebasket.  But some toys have
even worse things to fear.  Jessie and Stinky Pete have recent memories
of the living oblivion of being in storage in a dark closet.  Stinky
Pete has never even been out of the tight confines of his original
wrapping.  Hiding within the charming children's film is a very dark
and bleak look at the life of toys and disturbing shadows of the human
condition.
     If there is a problem with the new story it is flaws in its logic.
If there is a Prime Directive for living toys it has to be this: Leave
no physical evidence that living toys have been present.  Without
giving details, let me say that the script blatantly violates that
directive.  The humans would realize at the end of this film that
something is going on that is more than meets the eye.  Also this
episode creates questions that it needed to answer.  If Woody were a
character from a 1950s TV show, that would mean that the toy must have
been made in the 1950s.  Woody would have a great deal of previous
life, probably with another owner.  Does he remember this previous
life?  How did a 45 year old toy get into Andy's collection?  The
ending of the film is telegraphed by the logic of what Pixar would and
would not be likely to do with the series.
     TOY STORY 2 is an excellent example of a sequel that is more worth
seeing than the original film.  It most certainly is not a disguised
remake as sequels too often are.  I rate it an 8 on the 0 to 10 scale
and a high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Race for the Double Helix, The (1987) (TV)
     For years the issue has been hotly contested.  How good is British
television really?  I think everyone agrees that some of the best things on
American television came from Britain.  It is hard to beat programs like I,
CLAUDIUS, but they are just a few occasional good programs.  Certainly
British television has its share of stupid situation comedies that do not
get seen over here.  Well, it seems to me that their good programs are so
good that their bad television shows can easily be overlooked.
     Around the middle of September I start thinking back on what was the
best film I have seen the previous summer.  I had pretty well determined it
was to be De Palma's UNTOUCHABLES this year when just under the wire I saw
something better.  And it was a made-for-TV film, made by the BBC for
British television.  The film ran on the Arts and Entertainment cable
station and was called THE RACE FOR THE DOUBLE HELIX.  It featured superb
acting by Jeff Goldblum as James D. Watson and Tim Piggot-Smith as Francis
Crick.  Watson and Crick are the two unconventional scientists who worked
out the structure of DNA.
     The film is about many things.  Among other things, it is about a
conflict between two approaches to science.  You can go for the gold, or
glory in the truth and doing things the right way.  The first approach is
personified by Goldblum's Watson, a boorish Yank who is a duomaniac.  His
goals are to get a girl and a Nobel Prize.  Anything in life that does not
further his attempts at one goal or the other is not to be tolerated.
Espousing the other point of view is Rosalinda Franklin, to whom science is
a turn-the-crank operation of putting enough work into your goal, going from
square one to square two, to square three,...until you have achieved your
goal without once making an intuitive leap.  The film is about the politics
of science and the viewer comes away with an education in how those politics
work as well as one of how the structure of DNA was determined.  It is the
story of how three men won a Nobel Prize based greatly on the work of one
woman who neither got a piece of the prize nor, because she was a woman, was
she even allowed to join the men in the lounge of the building where they
worked.
     THE RACE FOR THE DOUBLE HELIX is a powerful, excellent film.  If this
sort of thing gets shown often on the BBC, I may pack my bag.  Rate it a +3
on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Music of the Spheres (1984)
          Capsule review:  Rock-bottom budget science fiction film
     has little or nothing to offer but some really intriguing
     science fiction ideas.  If you disliked films like LIFEFORCE
     and PRINCE OF DARKNESS, you're going to really hate this one
     and I suggest you watch THE TERMINATOR again instead.  Rating:
     +2.
     One of the oddest science fiction films of the 1960s is CREATION OF THE
HUMANOIDS.  It was an incredible combination of the very good and the very
bad.  It was made on a lemonade-stand budget.  The sets were cheap, the
acting incompetent.  But the script had interesting ideas, mostly based on
Jack Williamson's "Humanoids" stories.  There was some decent drama that led
one to believe this might have made a decent stage play.  It has remained a
"cult film" and a curiosity.  It was quite unique until now.  I think I have
just seen my choice for the "Creation of the Humanoids" of the 1980s.  It
has a classy title, MUSIC OF THE SPHERES; it has some pretty heavy ideas.
going for it.  But the budget is bargain-basement; some of the acting and
all of the special effects are terrible.  Watch it carefully for ten
minutes; if you are not intrigued by the film in that time, shut it off.
     The film is set in a future perhaps a century from now.  The
superpowers have fallen apart of their own weight and after the chaos came
an order controlled by huge biological computers, the largest of which is
called the Beast.  The computers have minds of their own and the only way
they can be controlled or even communicated with is by having a specially
selected human mind-meld with them.  And it is important to have a human
mind-meld with the Beast because the computer is being used to implement a
project to turn three asteroids into solar cells that will beam a constant
supply of energy via microwaves to Earth.  But the Beast seems to be trying
to prevent the project from going ahead.  Do you think I am telling you too
much?  This much all comes out in the first five minutes or so and the ideas
keep coming.
     This is a Canadian film done in English and French with subtitles.  The
cost of the film was reportedly $C110,000 in 1983.  That is almost certainly
less than 1% of what a film like THE TERMINATOR cost, and that's low budget!
Of course, the production values are dirt-cheap and the film needed a
stronger ending.  But ideas are cheap, so this film has more than you can
take in on one viewing.  Where did this thing turn up?  Cable television's
USA station ran it on a late-night counter-culture program called NIGHT
FLIGHT.  I doubt that one in a hundred science fiction fans will even like
the film--be warned.  But for the few who are willing to put up with its
rough edges, I'd rate it a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Galaxy Quest (1999)
     The cast rivalries of "Star Trek" actors, and the conventions of
"Star Trek" as well as "Star Trek" conventions, all get a fairly loving
shellacking in an enjoyable comedy that asks if the cast of "Star Trek"
had to fight real aliens, how well would they do.
     Back in the early 1970s there was a science fiction TV show that
would be immortal to its fans, "Galaxy Quest."  Even today the die-hard
fans want more.  Let's get this part out of the way so we can proceed.
Tim Allen plays Jason Nesmith who on the show played Comdr. Peter
Quincy Taggart.  Alan Rickman plays Alexander Dane who played Dr.
Lazarus of Tev'Meck.  Sigourney Weaver plays Gwen DeMarco who played
Lt. Tawny Madison.  Tony Shalhoub, who does not look the slightest bit
Chinese, plays Fred Kwan who played Tech Sergeant Chen.  And Daryl
Mitchell plays Tommy Webber who played Lt. Laredo.  With each but
possibly Laredo, the writers were clearly thinking of a corresponding
member of the "Star Trek" cast.
     In spite of the fact that Galaxy Quest has been off the air for
many years the cast continues to be a hot item at science fiction media
conventions.  Just about everyone in the cast is tired of being type-
cast, but they have to contend with the fame and popularity they got
from the TV show.  Most tired is Alexander Dane who at one time played
Richard III to raving audiences but now is reduced to repeating the
tire TV show catch-phrases over and over, ad nauseum.  And all are a
little tire of how Jason Nesmith, who played their leader, basks in all
the glory at the conventions and treats the other cast members like
decoration.  He behaves like a rude, ego-centric jerk.  When four teens
in alien costumes ask Nesmith to see their space ship and fight an
alien for them he plays along with the gag.  Then he finds out that
they in truth are aliens, their spaceship is authentic, and their foes
are all too real.  Soon the whole crew is pulled involuntarily into the
adventure.  For once they have no script, no director, no lines, and
they are in real danger.
     As a story about the actors we have come to know so well from
"Star Trek," this film is passable but cliched.  By depending on each
other they build firm relationships of mutual respect.  Outward Bound
probably has hundreds of stories just as moving.  As a space opera
adventure this film is fairly lame.  That is not the point, of course,
but it might have been a better movie with a little more thought about
the adventure.  In general the audience is a step or two ahead of the
characters.  The greatest value of the film is the lampooning of the
"Star Trek" iconography.  And in doing that it is considerably more
adept than anything Mel Brooks has done for a good long time.
     Nobody requires great dramatic scenes in a film like this.  Tim
Allen's acting was more than sufficient and his timing adequate.  He
might have issued one little "To infinity and beyond," if that would
not have been mixing metaphors.  Sigourney Weaver did not have a lot to
do besides wear a tight suit well, which she still can do surprisingly
luster, half-speed performance from character actor Tony Shalhoub.  He
is one of the actors I tend to watch for, but not for the sort of
effort he seemed to give this role.  He looked like he just felt out of
place.
     The ideal length for this material would have been as a ten-minute
skit.  It is impressive that director Dean Parisot kept the chuckles
coming as long as he did.  This is a one-viewing film, but pleasant
enough.  I give it a 6 on the 0 to 10 scale and a +1 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Ghost (1990)
     Things were going really well for Sam Wheat (played by Patrick Swayze).
He had a great new yuppie apartment reclaimed from a really ugly building.
He had a live-in roommate who would have looked like Demi Moore if she would
only have let her hair grow a little.  She is Molly Jensen (played by Demi
Moore).  He had a high-paying job as some sort of funds executive at a major
bank.  His only problem was that he had a stupid name like "Sam Wheat."
Then it all sours when he is killed by a hood on the street and has to get
used to being dead.  You know, it is not all pranks and chains being a
ghost.  First of all, there are very few people who can hear ghosts and who
want to admit they can hear ghosts.  Then you have a really hard time
interacting with matter.  Generally you go right through matter: walls,
tables, doors, subway trains ... it makes no difference.  Floors seem to
stop you but, hey, who wants to invest in a film about a dead bank executive
falling to the center of the earth, right?  Anyway, there is more to Wheat's
killing than  meets the eye and his ghost wants to find out what it is.  His
first big break is finding a kooky spiritualist medium who thinks she is a
fake until she starts hearing the voice of one real ghost.  Oda Mae Brown
(played by Whoopi Goldberg) wants nothing to do with Sam and her newly found
powers.
     Bruce Joel Rubin's script in the hands of Jerry Zucker (who co-wrote
KENTUCKY FRIED MOVIE and co-directed AIRPLANE! and THE NAKED GUN) has some
nice shifts in mood.  These shifts from somber to funny have been criticized
by some critics, but given the subject matter are not unbelievable until the
last five minutes or so.  The ending is saccharine, not unexpectedly, but up
to that point the film's tone follows Wheat's emotions at being dead and,
let's face it, finding yourself dead is one of life's more difficult
moments.  Zucker did not have many somber moments in his previous films but
he handles them well.  There is also a nice erotic scene with clay
sculpture.  There is another love scene that might have broken new ground
for a major release film had Zucker not copped out (much to the indignation
of the audience).  There is also a rather unexpected and nice scene
involving a grungy subway rider.
     GHOST is not really very good as a ghost story.  There is maybe one
decent chilling scene in the film.  Next to LADY IN WHITE or THE UNINVITED
it pales considerably.  But it is reasonable as a slick Hollywood production
with (of course) effects by Industrial Light and Magic.  I rate it a +1 on
the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Universal Soldier (1992)
   - Victor Halpern created the zombie film with the 1932 WHITE ZOMBIE.  He
     pretty much lucked out.  The film is poverty-row all the way.  It has
     cheap sets, low production values, and bad acting.  But some of its
     images are undeniably very effective and it manages the feel of a
     nightmare.  Like CARNIVAL OF SOULS, the film just clicks somehow.  But
     was it luck or skill?  Four years later he made his second zombie film
     and it sank like a stone.  The idea just did not have appeal.  REVOLT
     OF THE ZOMBIES was about bringing dead soldiers back to life as zombies
     so they could be the ultimate fighting soldiers.  So UNIVERSAL SOLDIER
     is the second film that idea has sunk.  Well, admittedly, it is other
     problems that sink UNIVERSAL SOLDIER, but it is interesting that this
     idea was used before.
   - Van Damme is Belgian.  He has a Flemish accent, sort of guttural and
     Germanic.  Maybe I am not that good with accents.  But I can tell you
     his accent is neither Cajun nor Creole.  His parents in the film
     certainly don't have accents like his.  So what gives?  How did he end
     up with this accent?  Maybe we'll be hearing that Arnold Schwarzenegger
     has been cast as Sergeant Rock!
   - I guess Van Damme is now officially Carolco Action Figure(tm).  Carolco
     seems to cut these guys out with cookie cutters.  They seem to be
     martial artists with foreign accents, and the way some people
     habitually smoke after sex, they pun after killing people.  I think
     they got the idea from James Bond films.
   - Nice photography of Hoover/Boulder Dam.  Also it is impressive to see
     someone running down the side.  To me that is more impressive than all
     the acrobatic kicking which mercifully is saved until the final reel.
   - Why does the opening sequence remind me of PLATOON?
   - I guess when you die you forget how to eat, you forget many of your
     polysyllabic words, and you pick up a funny accent.  You learn not to
     worry about your friends getting shot as long as they don't smoke and
     they remember to buckle up.  The after-life must be a lot weirder than
     anyone imagined.

Title
Review for Solomon and Gaenor (1999)
     The poignant setting is a misty, cold mining town in Wales,
1911.  Not unlike the setting of FIDDLER ON THE ROOF the town has
two nearby communities, one Christian, one Jewish.  In the Jewish
community the Lewinsky family is composed of pawnbrokers and cloth
merchants.  Solomon (played by Ioan) is about twenty years old,
good-looking, and enjoys his work as a "pacman"--going into the
Christian section leaving samples of cloth and taking orders for
larger pieces.  When asked, Solomon denies being Jewish, just to
escape trouble.
     Solomon finds himself particularly attracted to one customer, a
woman about his own age Gaenor (Nia Roberts).  As he continues to
see her, professionally and otherwise, hiding his religion.  He
takes the name Sam Livingstone.  Gaenor is from a family of poor
miners.  Her very large brother Crad (Mark Lewis Jones) immediately
takes a dislike to the stranger who he thinks is less than a man
since he does not have callused hands.  But Solomon and Gaenor are
attracted to each other and are willing to risk the consequences.
     The story is very much the star-crossed lover story, but if
that was all there was to this film it would be mundane indeed.
However, writer and director Paul Morrison does not make this the
film expected.  First and foremost, the two main characters are not
totally blameless in their fates.  There is enough fault in the plot
so just about everybody gets a piece.  It would be very easy to
present the Jewish community as blameless and purely the victims of
intolerance as well-meaning literature has done since IVANHOE.  The
Jews do appear more sinned against than sinning, but they are also
at fault and have their own intolerance.  Gaenor is too fast to
accelerate her relationship with Solomon, whom she hardly knows, and
then refuses to tell him when she needs his help.  Even the
countryside comes in for its share of the fault.  Instead of the
lovely pastoral scenes that usually grace this sort of film,
cinematographer Nina Kellgren's camera accents the unpleasant in the
climate and locale: the stony landscapes, the cold, the gray mist,
the fog, and the snow.  People's lives are as bleak as the
countryside.  Everything in the country seems muted blue and gray.
The only bright color is a dress that Solomon sews for Gaenor, red
the color of sin and rebellion.  Early in the film we see the Welsh
taking turns having kitchen baths, using the same dirty water.  They
sleep two in a narrow bed.  The Jewish and Christian community each
has its restrictions an intolerance of the other.  The Christian
religion appears to be as bleak and unforgiving as the landscape,
the seem a little more positive.  The Jews are given a slight edge
here as we see a meeting where they are discussing the importance of
understanding the writings of Dickens.
     Ioan Gruffudd as Solomon seems a little old to be acting in the
irresponsible way that his character does.  Gruffudd is best known,
to me at least, as a young Horatio Hornblower from a series of TV
movies.  Of the two, Nia Roberts as Gaenor seems the better actor.
She exhibits an odd characteristic of brightening up and being more
attractive when Solomon is around.  As tales of star-crossed lovers
frequently are, this is a story of pain and tragedy.  There is more
pain in one of Morrison's fist fights than in all of the fighting
and shooting and killing in THE MATRIX.  Ilona Sekacz's score
combines Jewish and Celtic themes, an unusual combination.

Title
Review for Siunin Wong Fei-hung tsi titmalau (1993)
CROUCHING TIGER, HIDDEN DRAGON was the most successful foreign-
language film ever released in the United States.  It combined a 
story of some sophistication with some historical spectacle and 
more than a little martial arts action including some incredibly 
graceful wirework.  While the market for martial arts films is 
still hot other distributors want to cash in.  Action films like 
THE MUSKETEER are throwing in wirework in places where it does not 
belong.  One previously released film featuring martial arts on 
and off a wire has gotten a new lease on life.  The film is IRON 
MONKEY.  It is a nice polished production from Tsui Hark, who 
produced the CHINESE GHOST STORY films and WICKED CITY.  
Superficially it looks like it is in the same class as CROUCHING 
TIGER, HIDDEN DRAGON.  It has the acrobatics and the elegant 
photography.  But it lacks the plot subtlety.  In fact, the 
plotting bears no small resemblance to an episode from the 
adventures of that American hero from old California, El Zorro. 
In IRON MONKEY, a corrupt governor rules a village and oppresses 
the innocent peasants forcing high taxes on them.  The governor 
needs to tax the peasants mercilessly to support his expensive and 
selfish life style including gourmet food for himself and his nine 
beautiful wives.  The one thorn in the governor's side, beside his 
comically inept captain of the guards, is a masked bandit who, in 
classic tradition, steals from the rich and gives to the poor.  
Wherever there is injustice, Iron Monkey seems to know it and is 
there to flip into action and clobber evildoers with ultra-perfect 
kung fu style.  Nobody knows that Iron Monkey is in reality the 
timid-seeming village doctor and the Monkey's sidekick is the 
doctor's beautiful assistant.  Iron Monkey is put into danger when 
another medical man comes to the village with a son.  In addition 
to the healing arts, they are also secretly expert in the martial 
arts.  They can cure or clobber.  They seem to be good, but their 
loyalties give the impression of being with the evil governor. 
The screenplay, a product of four credited writers, has more than 
a few plot holes and contrivances.  A character only has to claim 
to be oppressed, truthfully or not, and immediately the Iron 
Monkey comes to her aid.  In one case a woman only utters the 
words and the Monkey is there.  To give the film a one-up on other 
martial arts films even the Shao-Lin monks whose heroic virtue is 
lauded in so many martial arts films have been turned to the dark 
side by this evil governor. 
Visually the film has a few problems.  The virtuosity of the 
martial artists is clearly excellent, but too often they rely 
rather obviously on wires to create an impressive appearance.  
Another frequent but too obvious effect is to run the film 
backwards.  Both of these effects are extremely detectable.  
Wooden poles and pillars when struck like with a karate kick seem 
to break in perfectly smooth saw cuts.  One more visual problem in 
a different vein: Orchid, the Iron Monkey's assistant, can dress 
as a man and even wear a fake mustache, but it still is hard to 
believe the evil governor is fooled. 
Director Woo-ping Yuen loses no opportunity to show off Chinese 
dishes.  The governor is fond of shark fin soup.  The guards like 
Dim Sum.  (Is this an anachronism?)  And Orchid likes to make 
piquant meat dishes.  They seem to have people as adept in the 
kitchen arts as others are in the martial arts. 
If distributors are looking for a way to capture the fire of 
CROUCHING TIGER, HIDDEN DRAGON, they will probably have to make 
new film.  IRON MONKEY just is not in the same class.  It is, 
however, just about right for a Saturday matinee.  I rate it a 6 
on the 0 to 10 scale and a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.  FYI: A 
credit at the end says "Remembering Kevin Bartnof."  Who is that?  
Kevin Bartnof died June 30, 2001, at the age of 43.  He had been a 
foley artist (meaning he provided basic sound effects like 
footsteps, doors closing, etc.) on major films like THE ABYSS, 
SCHINDLER'S LIST, THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION, and THE PERFECT STORM. 

Title
Review for Father of the Bride (1991)
          Capsule review:  Mix two parts wedding-planning comedy,
     two parts sweet sentiment, and one part slapstick comedy, and
     you get a sugary, light holiday confection.  Steve Martin
     gives away his daughter and a lot of money at the same time.
     An enjoyable family film.  Rating: +1 (-4 to +4).
     Steve Martin, who showed us the hopes and fears of being a father of
younger children in PARENTHOOD is continuing on that theme with an older
daughter in his update of 1950's FATHER OF THE BRIDE.  He has inherited
Spencer Tracy's philosophizing but little of Tracy's dignity.  This is a
film that pulls in at least three different directions at once as if it just
was not sure what it wanted to be when it grew up.  It tries first and
foremost to be a touching sentimental story of a father coming to terms with
the loss to another man of a daughter whom he loves very much.  At the same
time it wants to be a sort of MR. BLANDINGS BUILDS HIS DREAM HOUSE for
weddings--a film about a simple man discovering how complex and expensive it
is today to put together a wedding.  Then Steve Martin's roots are in
physical and slapstick comedy, so this comedy pulls in that direction also.
The film simply does not work as all three and the physical comedy is
certainly what should have been cut.
     The story is simple enough to be called trite.  George Banks (played by
Steve Martin) talking to the camera tells about his daughter's wedding which
has just taken place and about the five months since his daughter (played by
Kimberly Williams) returned from Rome and announced she had fallen in love
and intended to get married.  Martin reacts with anger and with distrust of
his daughter's choice (played by George Newbern).  We follow the parents to
their first meeting with their daughter's future in-laws.  George turns this
meeting into an embarrassment big enough to last a lifetime.
     Then there are the wedding arrangements themselves.  All arrangements
are made through the services of Franck (played by Martin Short), a somewhat
swishy European with an impenetrable accent.  (I rather hope this film does
not get shown in China.  The average Chinese does not earn enough in eight
months to pay the per-guest cost of this wedding.)  There are hassles over
cost; there is the obligatory lovers' tiff.  There are wedding preparations.
Then the wedding begins and the film loses almost all of its humor and turns
to sentiment so thick you can cut it with a knife.
     Between FATHER OF THE BRIDE and BEAUTY AND THE BEAST, it seems that
Disney is banking very heavily on sentiment this Christmas-time.  But the
characters in FATHER OF THE BRIDE are cartoonish and two-dimensional.  The
real humanity is in the characters in BEAUTY AND THE BEAST.  Steve Martin
and Diane Keaton make a likable married couple in the live-action film, but
they do not have much human complexity.  Kimberly Williams, as their
daughter, is certainly attractive and is as sensual playing basketball as
Nastassia Kinski is dancing.  But this Christmas film is like a chocolate
Easter egg.  It is sugary sweet around the outside and very light because it
is really hollow.  It is worth seeing once.  I rate it a +1 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Idioterne (1998)
     My review of the BLAIR WITCH PROJECT made reference to the fact
that it was very nearly a Dogma 95 film, probably without even trying.
In the September 13 NEW YORKER David Denby makes the same observation.
In the most recent episode of Roger Ebert's review program on TV he
said that JULIEN DONKEY-BOY is a Dogma 95 film.  Now a correspondent
has asked me to explain my take on Dogma 95.  Well, I cannot claim to
be an expert, but here goes.
     Back in the 1960s an issue of MAD MAGAZINE talked about audiences
who went to see foreign films.  Their illustration was an audience
watching a film and the image on the screen was of water with one arm,
limp at the wrist rising above the surface.  In other words they were
watching something depressing.  Even then there was the idea that
European art films were serious, depressing, nihilistic affairs and
American films were somehow lighter.  There was probably some truth to
this.  Most were not as glum as the MAD image would indicate though
maybe Andrzej Wadja's KANAL, which takes place mostly in a sewer, might
be a candidate.  Roberto Rosellini's OPEN CITY is very downbeat also.
It is an anti-Nazi film shot secretly in Rome while it was still
occupied by Nazis.  (I picture Rosellini setting up on the street like
we see the title character do in ED WOOD.  But when he yells "run" his
film crew really had something worth running from.)  American films of
the post-war era like John Wayne westerns were generally lighter fare.
     Flash forward to the 1990s and there is still the division.  We
now have computer techniques to create visuals that are spectacular.
Films have never looked better.  On the other hand, there are very few
films of much substance.  The American film industry is catering in
large degree to the public who spends the most money on films.  That is
people from age 15 to 25.  That audience tends not to like a lot of
deep thought in their films.  So the formula is to aim films at that
range, make them dumb if necessary but very visual, and if the film is
not theatrically marketable, it can go direct to cable or cassette.
There are not many films of any substance being made these days by the
major American studios.  It is too easy to make a nice looking film
without much substance that will appeal to the affluent but not well
discerning audiences.  Compounding the problem is that good filmmakers
like Paul Verhoeven make substantial films in their own country, then
get seduced by the big budgets of the American film industry and never
make a film of real substance again.  A set of European filmmakers have
said that they are not going to make artificial special effects driven
films, they are going to make films in what appears to be the tradition
of Roberto Rosellini.  They will follow a list of ten rules drafted by
Danish filmmaker Lars von Triers:
     I swear to submit to the following set of rules drawn up and
confirmed by DOGMA 95:
     1. Shooting must be done on location. Props and sets must not be
brought in (if a particular prop is necessary for the story, a location
must be chosen where this prop is to be found).
     2. The sound must never be produced apart from the images or vice
versa. (Music must not be used unless it occurs where the scene is
being shot).
     3. The camera must be hand-held. Any movement or immobility
attainable in the hand is permitted. (The film must not take place
where the camera is standing; shooting must take place where the film
takes place).
     4. The film must be in color. Special lighting is not acceptable.
(If there is too little light for exposure the scene must be cut or a
single lamp be attached to the camera).
     6. The film must not contain superficial action. (Murders,
weapons, etc. must not occur.)
     7. Temporal and geographical alienation are forbidden. (That is to
say that the film takes place here and now.)
     Films that already have been made following these conventions
include BREAKING THE WAVES and THE CELEBRATION.  Obviously the mystical
number ten was important in the rules since even von Triers himself has
never followed his own tenth rule.  (Or perhaps is it just not that we
know of.)  THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT, by chance, or perhaps inspired by
the same concerns followed Rules 1 to 7.  And that film's appeal is the
immediacy of its action which is certainly one of the goals of Dogma
95.
     The Dogma 95 directors are in a sense the puritans of the
international film industry.  This is not in the sense that they eschew
sex and naughty words in their films, but they have reacted to what
they see as excesses in the film industry by creating their own strict
set of rules to live by apart from the mainstream.  They want a more
natural, less gimmicky and not by chance a less expensive mode of
filmmaking.  It itself is a gimmick and I am sure even the Dogma 95
filmmakers admire a great many films that break many of their rules.
     Is Dogma 95 in itself a good idea?  One might as well ask if
Cubism is a good idea.  It is a movement that will appeal to some and
not to others.  Most people I talk to do not like Dogma 95 films.  A
common objection is the use of the hand-held camera.  This is not a
device that a filmmaker like Rosellini used because it was not around
in his time.  But he undoubtedly would have appreciated the naturalism
of filming with a box you hold in your hands.  The over-use of hand-
held cameras does lead to motion sickness in some viewers.
     One thing certain is that Dogma 95 strips away from film a lot of
the folderol that distracts from the theme and essence of a film.  Like
other forms of Puritanism it clearly is intended to elevate substance
over style, which is probably a good thing.  And it is not a movement
that is going away after one or two films.  I think it will be with us
for a while at least.

Title
Review for Evil Dead II (1987)
          Capsule review:  There's more budget than logic to this
     stringing together of off-beat and semi-humorous horror
     scenes.  Creative visual concepts abound and the pace is
     frenetic and that makes up for a multitude of sins.
     I guess in some sense THE EVIL DEAD II is the ultimate horror
film...sort of...I guess.  Well, what can I say?  It does not have much of a
plot.  It has very little acting, no stars, little continuity, and no logic.
But it has action, horror, and black humor in massive doses.  Now, THE EVIL
DEAD II did have some plot.  It was not it's strong suit but it was there.
What THE EVIL DEAD boasted most was wit.  An attacking corpse would be
thrown into the fire.  Then some living person would have a bout of remorse
and pull it out of the fire.  The corpse would look up and politely thank
its benefactor for pulling it out of the fire, then continues to try and
kill the living.  I guess there is some wit in a scene like that and some
willingness to experiment with the horror medium.  The sequel is one strange
semi-horror scene after another.
     The plot is that some professor of some sort has translated the
Necronomicon (of H. P. Lovecraft fame).  He recorded an incantation on tape
and now whenever anyone plays the tape it's Anything-Can-Happen-Day.  A
young couple find the cabin and think it might be an ideal trysting place.
Most of one of them is left the next night when the professor's daughter
shows up with a friend and two rather strange locals.  By that point we have
already seen a beheaded corpse climb out of the ground and do a charming
dance with its head.  We've seen a lot more than that, but that would be
telling.  And we will see a whole lot more, but that, too, would be telling.
     The actors of this piece were, I think, chosen for the terrorized looks
they could get on their faces and for how ghoulish they could make
themselves look.  The script is incredibly contrived, including such touches
as having a bridge that would have cost in the millions that leads to
nowhere but a shack in the woods.  I didn't think boondoggles got that big.
For those who like gore and creative off-beat horror, this one's for you.
As a fan of the latter, though not of the former particularly, I will give
this a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.  If you like the bizarre, give it a try.

Title
Review for Just Imagine (1930)
          Capsule review:  This is not a particularly good film.
     It is more of a curio of the science fiction film than a
     genuine entertainment experience.  But visually it is very
     interesting and historically it is the forerunner of several
     bad science fiction films of the 1950s.  Look for several
     familiar props like Flash Gordon's spaceship.  Rating: 0.
     I am to the point now where I have seen the vast majority of the good
science fiction films.  It has been a long time since I have seen a science
fiction film I have never seen before that is more than eighteen months old,
and that is a film to be really enthusiastic about.  With that in mind, I
did not have high expectations for JUST IMAGINE.  I guess that explains why
of a group of five of us who went to see the film as a group, I was the only
one who really thought the film was worth defending.
     JUST IMAGINE is a 1930 American comedy, apparently inspired in part by
METROPOLIS.  The film starts by showing how different 1930 was from 1880,
then proceeds to tell a story set in a 1980 as far advanced from 1930 as
1930 was over 1880.  Airplanes are as common in the skies over the city as
cars used to be in the streets, but these planes have fans in the wings to
allow them to travel slowly or even just hover while the passengers walk on
the wings.  Some changes were not far off the mark.  Rather than towels,
sinks come equipped with electric hand driers.  To give the audience someone
of their own time to identify with, we have a man revived from fifty years
of suspended animation brought on by a lightning strike.  The actor, and as
I remember character, had been a sort of vaudeville comic.  He became a
device for explaining the sights we see, but the main character is a 1980
pilot who must, in a court of law, prove himself more worthy of the girl he
loves than another man is.  The court considers a newspaper publisher more
worthy, so our hero agrees to pilot the first spaceship to Mars.  And what
is on Mars?  Beautiful women.  Yup, this is the forerunner of films such as
CAT WOMEN OF THE MOON, ABBOTT AND COSTELLO GO TO MARS, MISSILE TO THE MOON,
and QUEEN OF OUTER SPACE.  I cannot claim to be that keen on the descendents
of this film, but for a 1930 film, JUST IMAGINE is not too shabby.  Rate it
a flat 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.  I am glad I finally saw it.

Title
Review for Me Myself I (1999)
     Pamela Drury (played by Rachel Griffiths) is an award-winning
journalist.  Thirteen years earlier she nearly married Robert
Dickson (David Roberts), but decided that her career was more
important.  She now looks with envious eyes on her married friends'
lives and she wishes she had made the other decision.  These days
she just finds the dating scene to be depressing and the market just
is not very good any more.  She tries to salve her ego putting up
little index cards that tell her things like "I love and approve of
myself."  On her 30-something birthday she is ready to commit
suicide, but fate seems to step in and stop her at the last moment.
The following day in a moment of carelessness she is hit by a car a
literally knocked into another world.  She is not in heaven or hell,
but a parallel world where she did marry Robert.  There Pamela
meets-well, call her Pamela-2 (also played by Rachel Griffiths).
Pamela-2 has been married for thirteen years to Robert and has a
daughter and two sons by him.  Pamela-2 regrets her decision to
marry and to turn her back on her career.  She gives Pamela the slip
and goes to take her place in the world of the career-Pamela.
Pamela decides to try out the life she spurned.
     Filling in for Pamela-2 is more of a job than Pamela was
expecting, but far easier than it would be in the real world.  There
one must remember what must be hundreds of thousands of bits of
information just so that people are not tipped off that you are no
longer the person you once were.  Pamela finds that as feminists
have been telling us for years, there is a lot of effort and skill
involved in being a housewife.  It would be easy for this film to
turn at this point into a feminist tract, leaving Pamela in awe of
how competent and savvy a housewife really is.  However the script
is a little more even-handed than that.  Being a housewife has its
positive and its negative sides, Pamela finds.  It is full of
moments that just fill Pamela with disgust.  The worst of which is
to clean up after her youngest who is neither toilet trained, nor
able to wipe himself.  Having been in need of sex well back into her
previous life, she is disappointed to realize that the passion is
gone from Pamela-2's marriage and Robert has very little interest in
rekindling it.  But her attitudes about her husband and herself are
due for some radical changes.
     ME MYSELF I is written and directed by Philippa "Pip" Karmel,
set in Sydney, Australia and filmed on a minimal budget which seems
to more than adequately support the script. Rachel Griffiths has an
extremely expressive face which projects emotions very effectively,
particularly her bewilderment at her situation.  Karmel's style
changes as the film proceeds.  Popular music is played loudly over
the soundtrack in the first part of the film, but much less so once
Pamela has made the transition.
     Some people tend to assume that in fantasy anything can happen
and there are few rules that need to be followed.  Actually just
about the opposite is true.  In the real world the apparently
impossible happens frequently.  In fiction authors are bound to be
at least believable, and fantasy writers have the strictest set of
rules of all.  Karmel has failed to observe the logic of her own
world.  Pamela discovers that there is no way to get back to her own
world from the world she was knocked into.  Even the street where
she lived does not exist in the new world.  Yet Pamela-2 seems to be
able to move between the two worlds without trouble.  Pamela's
replacement of Pamela-2 seems all too easy.  After a day or two she
seems to be able to function in the new world without suspicion
being raised.  There would be years of Pamela-2's experience that
would be a complete blank to Pamela.  People whom Pamela-2 would
know, Pamela would have never seen.  Even a tutored double can not
long stand in for the original without detection.  The self-
replacement theme was much better handled in the science fiction
film QUEST FOR LOVE or Akira Kurosawa's historical film KAGEMUSHA.
     In the end, Karmel seems to be telling us that whatever
alternative we have chosen, we will get some advantage and some
disadvantage.  Contrary to Frank Capra's IT'S A WONDERFUL LIFE, the
choices we have made have not all been for the best and the world is
not necessarily better for the choices we have made.  It is merely
different.  Karmel is telling us to stop regretting the past and to
make the best of what decisions we have made.  It is something of a
platitude, but there also is some truth there.  I would give ME
MYSELF I a 6 on the 0 to 10 scale and a high +1 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for FairyTale: A True Story (1997)
     When Richard Adams wrote WATERSHIP DOWN it was not really clear
who his audience would be.  The story seemed too violent for children
and a tale of rabbits looking for a safe warren seemed a little puerile
for adults.  It was a difficult task for Adams to get it published, but
once it was it remained a bestseller for years.  That book
notwithstanding, it is a good idea to know when you are telling a story
whom you expect to be your audience.  FAIRYTALE: A TRUE STORY is a film
that was made without too much thought as to who its audience would be.
As a result it is too slow and deliberate to be a children's film and
it is a bit too logically inconsistent to work well for adults.  The
story tells of how two young girls during World War I produced what
they claimed to be authentic photographs of fairies in an English
country garden.  At the time, the story caused quite a sensation.
Notables including Sir Arthur Conan Doyle and Harry Houdini
investigated the claims and Doyle became convinced.  FAIRYTALE: A TRUE
STORY is a fictionalized account of what happened told from the point
of view that the fairies were real.  To claim this to be a true story
and to have special effects fairies flitting around seems less than
strictly honest, though I suppose the filmmakers are taking the
viewpoint of believers.
     It is a miserable time in 1917 England, with men returning from
the war having been shot to pieces in battle. Nine-year old South
African Frances Griffiths (played by Elizabeth Earl) lost her father in
the war and comes to England to stay with her twelve-year old cousin
Elsie Wright (Florence Hoath).  [Historical note: the actual children's
ages were ten and sixteen respectively according to one source.
However, the "true" story plays better if they are younger.]  Elsie is
also mourning a recent loss, that of her older brother.  The two girls,
shown here as almost being too storybook perfect, build a bond of
friendship.  Then one day when playing in the garden, Frances sees a
fairy.  The fairies will not let themselves be seen by adults, but
Frances and Elsie determine to prove the presence of the fairies by
borrowing Elsie's father's camera and taking a picture.  That is just
what they do and resulting photographs cause a sensation.  Peter
O'Toole plays Sir Arthur Conan Doyle, the creator of the hard-nosed
skeptic Sherlock Holmes, who nevertheless is ready to accept the
photographs as real.  He calls in master illusionist and debunker Harry
Houdini (played very nicely by Harvey Keitel).
     If one looks for it there is some material that is worth
considering in the film.  The story offers us a variety of people in
varying degrees of belief or skepticism and we can see their
motivations for their degree of belief.  Generally it is the people who
have been most injured by reality who are willing to turn from that
reality and embrace the fanciful.  Faith also works better on children
than adults in the film.  And the film seems very accepting of
skepticism.  The most sympathetic adult character is Keitel's Harry
Houdini. O'Toole, on the other hand, is not well-cast as Doyle.
Physically he is wrong to play the short and plumpish writer.  His
character seems too anxious to convince others to believe in the
supernatural, at one point even saying to be skeptical is to show
disrespect to him.
     But where the film is unsettling is in the question of whether the
photographs are genuine or not.  Certainly the film shows you fairies,
so it really says that they are real.  But the photos are the historic
originals or very good facsimiles and while we do not get much chance
to look at them on the wide screen, the originals clearly are fakes.
(Sorry, Sir Arthur.)  It does not take much examination of the original
photographs to conclude that the fairies shown are drawn by hand rather
than photographed from life.  The film suggests that may be the case
also, but never ties that end up.  Of course, there are many ends not
tied up in this film and left for the viewer to decide.  The level of
storytelling is confusing and will be more so for children. The telling
of the story is a little muddled and not helped by thick accents
occasionally obscuring the dialog. Often parallel action is inter-cut
and one time they add a chess game that seems to have nothing to do
with the rest of the story, but they inter-cut it with two pieces of
inter-cut action to create a third one.
     Some script problems and editing problems damage this well-
photographed and acted story of the Cottingly Fairies.  It could have
been a lot better and rates a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Anniversary Party, The (2001)
    CAPSULE: This is a film of characters and interactions rather 
    than pyrotechnics.  The film is driven by the personalities of 
    the characters.  That's good.  What's missing is the reason to 
    care much about these characters and their interactions.  
    That's bad.  The film has a gamut of emotions presented but 
    few rub off on the viewer.  We need not just more films like 
    this but also better films like this.  I would invest interest 
    in Jennifer Jason-Leigh and Alan Cummings not for current 
    value but for growth potential.  Rating: 5 (0 to 10), low +1 
    (-4 to +4)
THE ANNIVERSARY PARTY is a film about characters and 
relationships. Most of what happens in the film is talk.  We have 
seen a number of such film like John Sayles's THE RETURN OF THE 
SECAUCUS SEVEN, Lawrence Kasdan's THE BIG CHILL, and a personal 
favorite, Bruce Beresford's DON'S PARTY.  I am not sure why the 
latter is a favorite of mine unless perhaps because it is 
Australian and has a little bit of that country's politics.  In 
any case these films are perhaps cautionary tales suggesting that 
parties and get-togethers should be kept brief and free from mind-
altering substances to avoid indecent exposure of painful truths 
(and assorted body parts).
THE ANNIVERSARY PARTY does not take place in an exotic local 
(assuming that DON'S PARTY does) unless you consider the suburbs 
of Los Angeles exotic.  The film is produced, directed, and stars 
Alan Cummings and Jennifer Jason Leigh, but sports a hefty 
ensemble of actors from independent films who are anxious to play 
opposite other actors rather than digital effects.
Sally and Joe (played by Jennifer Jason-Leigh and Alan Cummings) 
are celebrating their sixth wedding anniversary, but not 
celebrating six years together.  They have been together only a 
few months of the six years and have just recently gotten together 
again.  They have invited their friends, most of whom they cannot 
stand.  Though the film Joe is to direct has a character based on 
Sally, He has cast a younger actress, Skye (Gwyneth Paltrow), in 
the role and Sally is less than pleased with Skye.  Also among the 
invitees are the neighbors (Denis O'Hare and Mina Badie) with whom 
a thin coat of civility covers a festering feud over the behavior 
of the Tom and Sally's dog.
Where THE ANNIVERARY PARTY failed for me was in my lack of empathy 
for any of the characters.  The script fails to give us much 
reason to care whether these people are going through a bad patch 
or not.  The script seems contrived to set up ironic dramatic 
revelations and superficial insights into people's characters.  
These people are more involving than checkers on a board, but less 
than chess pieces.
There is not much that can be told in a review about a film like 
this because the characters are introduced, they party, and then 
there are ironic plot twists about the characters.  Introducing 
the characters without telling the plot twists is pointless.  
Revealing the plot twists would spoil the experience of seeing the 
film.  Not that what happens is so dramatic, but in a description 
of such a film less is more.
Alan Cumming and Jennifer Jason Leigh have assembled a cast of 
familiar actors including themselves and Paltrow, but also Kevin 
Kline, Phoebe Cates, Jane Adams, John C. Reilly, Jennifer Beals, 
and Parker Posey. If you do the math, not every one of these can 
be use to his full potential.  Each is part of some small subplot 
and each does a little fun acting exercise.  The feel is as if 
Cumming and Leigh wanted to actually throw a party for their 
friends, mixing business and pleasure.  The result is diverting 
enough to eavesdrop upon but really rather un-engaging as a while.
THE ANNIVERSARY PARTY keeps several plots going, each of which 
will be resolved by the end of the party.  Once they are resolved 
the viewer will happily simply drop them.  There is little to 
think about here after the film is over. I rate THE ANNIVERSARY 
PARTY 5 on the 0 to 10 scale and a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.  

Title
Review for Beer Drinker's Guide to Fitness and Filmmaking, The (1989)
     I am on the selection committee for the cinema club at Bell Labs in
Holmdel, due to the tremendous acumen I have shown in my cinematic writing
and because they will allow anyone to help choose the films.  One of the
other members has been pushing for some time to show THE BEER DRINKER'S
GUIDE TO FITNESS AND FILMMAKING.  I don't believe that he has actually seen
the film, but I think he likes the title.  The club has been, on occasion,
willing to humor this member but we have been unable to find a distributor
for the film.  By an odd coincidence the director, Fred G. Sullivan, has
also been unable to find a distributor.  Finally Sullivan has been able to
get the film distributed in a manner that makes maximum use of the clever
title and with minimum distribution risk. It has been released on
videocassette.
     THE BEER DRINKER'S GUIDE TO FITNESS AND FILMMAKING is more a collection
of amateur sound home movies that form more a sort of family journal than a
real story, though in the course of its telling we do learn a lot, perhaps
more than we want, about filmmaker Fred and the Family Sullivan.  Fred made
amateur films most of his life and as an adult is raising a large family in
the Adirondacks on what he can make from his films.  His first feature film
was COLD RIVER, an adaptation of a novel set in the Adirondacks.  It
apparently didn't do much for Fred, who leads a hand-to-mouth existence,
often just after changing diapers.  His children cooperate in misbehaving
for the camera, acting up and badly.  Children do not really make good
actors in spite of the maxim that claims they and dogs are the best.  Fred's
ingenuousness starts to wear a little thin by the middle of the film and the
84 minutes seem like more.  Among the skits he throws in is one of a college
professor who deeply admires his work.  It is a piece of silliness that
could work at the hands of a better filmmaker, but the silliness is not
contagious.  It becomes clear also that Fred finds his own life and his
family cuter than most of the audience will.
     Eventually one really feels like grabbing Fred by the collar and
telling him, "Look, your family is hungry and you are trying to feed them by
selling cute home movies of them.  You really are going to have to find
another line of work."  My rating is a low 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Federal Hill (1995)
     Michael Corrente is a young filmmaker who has financed, written,
and directed his own film.  Both the director's story and the film's
story have a ring of familiarity.  Corrente's history is a parallel of
Barry Levison's.  Each chose as a first film to tell the story of his
small ring of friends, but somewhat fictionalized.  Each made a good
film on a very low budget.  And though Levison had a much better feel
for memorable characters in his DINER than Corrente does with FEDERAL
HILL, each made an impressive first film.  One thing we can conclude is
that Levison grew up in a better neighborhood.  Much of what Corrente
tells of his friends has a sting reminiscent of GOODFELLAS and MEAN
STREETS.
     Ralph, Nicky, Frank, Joey, and Bobby (played respectively by
Nicholas Turturro, Anthony DeSando, Michael Raynor, Robert Tutano, and
Jason Andrews) are friends who grew up together in Federal Hill, the
heavily Italian-American section of Providence, Rhode Island.  Each of
the friends is connected with crime in one way or another.  Ralph robs
houses; Nicky deals cocaine; Bobby is a loser who deals in counterfeit
money and owes the big boys $30,000.  Joey is nearly straight.  He did
time after doing a job with buddies who left him holding the bag.  Now
he has a wife and his worst crime is violating parole by gambling with
his buddies.  Frank is the only one of the guys who is straight and who
tries to keep the others out of trouble.  He can afford to be straight-
--his father is a local boss in the syndicate.  When Nicky meets a
cute, rich Brown student (Libby Langdon, wife of Michael Corrente) he
has visions of marrying her.  But getting in the way is Ralph, a loose
cannon who is getting into bigger crime.  He wants to pull his
housemate and best friend Nicky in with him, but he is willing to
settle for dragging in Bobby.
     The plot of FEDERAL HILL works just a little too predictably and
melodramatically.  Following the well-worn conventions of films like
THE GODFATHER, the plot gets more and more taut as the story proceeds
until it seems inevitable that there will be violence.  The formula is
followed down even to the cooking scene where we learn how to make some
terrific Italian dish (in this case a tempting Aglio e Olio with
Parmesan cheese).
     Whether this film will be a star-maker the way DINER was is still
in question.  Certainly none of the actors in the film has the same
sort of screen presence of the characters of DINER.  Nicholas Turturro,
who gives the film what modest acting flash it has, has gone on to
television work.  Libby Langdon is attractive as Wendy, but she simply
fails to do much with her character beyond what was on the printed page
of the script.  Probably what sets this film apart from others in its
class is the mood effect created by black-and-white photography.
     As a first film this low-budget, semi-autobiographical crime film
is polished and has some interesting moves that make the familiar
aspects seem a little fresher.  The true test for Corrente will be the
second film.  This one gets a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     Perhaps the second film should be THE MAKING OF FEDERAL HILL.
Corrente has a number of interesting stories to tell about how the film
was made.  One of the better ones involves his refusal to use a union
crew in order to save money.  Apparently the local union wanted to hire
an enforcer to break Corrente's legs to teach him a lesson.  "I can't
do that," the enforcer said, "Michael Corrente is my little brother."
"Oh.  Okay," the union rep said.  "Gee, what a small, funny world this
is!"

Title
Review for Mambo Kings, The (1992)
     There are by now *a lot* of films about popular music in the 1950s.
They are nearly all about rock and roll, and treat the coming of rock with
a reverence usually accorded only to major world events.  The impression you
get is that music before rock and roll was all pretty dull stuff like opera
and "How Much Is That Doggie in the Window?" though there are begrudging
nods to jazz.  It is true that Latin music was also very popular in the
Fifties and I do not remember seeing a post-1960 film that has ever
acknowledged that popularity.  THE MAMBO KINGS breaks the mold and tells the
story of a middlingly popular Latin band, their ups and downs.
Unfortunately, there is somebody in your family whose life was every bit as
interesting as the life of Cesar Castillo (as played by Armand Asante).  The
story has some action, but it is almost all in the first ten minutes.  The
rest of the film is just a bland story.
     The year is 1952 and Cesar and Nestor Castillo (the latter played by
Antonio Banderas) are playing good music in a Havana nightclub.
Unfortunately, the boss has eyes for Nestor's girl, Maria.  Maria decides to
go with the boss after some arm-twisting.  The boss is ready to kill Nestor
to be rid of him, and gives this message to Cesar.  Not wanting to see his
brother's throat cut, Cesar convinces Nestor to come with him to New York.
Cesar succeeds in impressing Tito Puente (playing himself forty years
younger), but fate steps in to screw up the Castillos joining Puente's band.
Instead, we see the Castillos forming their own band.  The film follows
their career, their loves, and their disagreements.  The story is at best
lackluster and occasionally descends into soap opera.  This sort of laid-
back story-telling may appeal to fans of THE FABULOUS BAKER BOYS.
     I personally have only limited interest in Latin music so quite
surprised myself by enjoying some of the numbers.  But the story is just too
little about too many things.  It tells of the Castillos' love lives and
their family lives.  It shows them doing a little creating of their music.
It shows them deciding if they should give control to a promoter who could
give them big-time bookings, but who will insist on being a boss.  And we
see them at their day jobs in a meat-packing plant.  Meanwhile, Nestor pines
for his Havana girlfriend, forever rewriting a song dedicated to her.
Armand Asante goes a long way to make this film watchable.  He is a fine
actor, certainly, though I would more recommend that the viewer find his
BELIZAIRE THE CAJUN, which was a much better film that this condensation of
a Pulitzer-Prize-winning novel.  Also notable in the cast are Celia Cruz as
a popular entertainer and Roscoe Lee Browne as the semi-sinister promoter.
     THE MAMBO KINGS starts well, but never really says much of interest.  I
would give it a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Dolores Claiborne (1995)
     A film as hard-going as DOLORES CLAIBORNE is in its first 85
minutes had better work particularly hard to redeem itself in its final
act.  We have a story that is relentlessly downbeat with uniformly
unpleasant characters.  One wonders how this tale could possibly come
out to make this dreary story worth the telling, or the sitting
through.  In fact, this turns out to be a surprisingly moving story
with some fairly powerful emotional overtones and perhaps it even hasa
hero.
     The film opens with two women struggling at the top of a
staircase.  Vera Donovan (played by Judy Parfitt) is thrown down a
flight of stairs and her housekeeper, Dolores Claiborne (Kathy Bates)
chases after her to see the results.  Finding Vera not yet dead Dolores
ransacks the kitchen to find the proper tool to finish the job.  She is
found there standing over the body, marble rolling pin in hand, ready
to strike a death blow, not realizing that the woman at her feet is
already dead from the fall.  And, as it turns out, this may not be the
first fall that Dolores arranged.  Her husband died in an apparent
accidental fall years earlier under very suspicious circumstances.
Police Detective John Mackey (played by Christopher Plummer) would like
to prove the woman with the rolling pin was indeed a multiple killer.
     The drama will have one more major character.  Selena St. George
(Jennifer Jason Leigh), daughter of Dolores Claiborne St. George--is a
successful magazine writer who comes to Bangor to help her mother and
to understand the situation.  In her first visit to her mother in many
years, Selena starts to delve into her mother's life of hard work and
harder knocks.  Dolores herself seems fixated on her own history and
slips all too easily into recollection of the past that intrude on the
present.
     Kathy Bates does a terrific job in the title role, an unglamorous
drudge with long-simmering angers and occasionally a sarcastic wit.
She effectively plays a woman whose personality has been mostly rubbed
away by disappointments and by the total lack of anyone to care for or
about her.  Jennifer Jason Leigh who played journalists with affected
nasal twangs in MRS. PARKER AND THE VICIOUS CIRCLE and THE HUDSUCKER
PROXY, plays yet another journalist and curiously occasionally lapses
into the same nasal twang, though here it is hard to account for where
she might have picked it up.  I have always liked Christopher Plummer
as an actor with some range who is better than his roles.  But most
unusual is David Strathairn as Dolores's abusive husband.  His mild
personality has till now made him seem like another Henry Fonda.
     Director Taylor Hackford uses weather and sky conditions in
unusual ways in this film.  Flashbacks are signified by sunny skies.
Scenes filmed in the present are always shot under dismal gray skies.
Not only does this not make sense literally, it doesn't even make sense
symbolically since the events under the sunny skies seem just as dismal
as those under gray.  Just occasionally Gabriel Beristain's camera
gives us a startlingly colorful sky effect--always in flashbacks, of
course.  One sequence under a total solar eclipse brings a surprising
special effect into a story that at least on the surface does not seem
to need them.
     It is ironic, perhaps, that most of the best films based on
stories by horror writer Stephen King, tend not to be the ones based on
his horror stories.  Of the four best films based on his writing--I
would say subjectively that they were CARRIE, STAND BY ME, THE
SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION, and DOLORES CLAIBORNE--only the first is based on
a horror story.  And I would rate DOLORES CLAIBORNE a low +2 on the -4
to +4 scale.

Title
Review for "Dangerous Life, A" (1988) (mini)
     The title is A DANGEROUS LIFE and if that title seems to be reminiscent
of the title of Peter Weir's popular YEAR OF LIVING DANGEROUSLY, it may not
be just a coincidence.  I suppose the title could refer to it being
dangerous for people that Ferdinand Marcos was alive and in power, or it
could refer to fictional newsman Tony O'Neil's (played by Gary Busey)
occasionally endangered existence covering dramatic events in the
Philippines from the death of Ninoy Aquino to the fall of Marcos and the
presidency of Ninoy's widow Corazon.  Even if the title seems a little
crass, the three-part, nearly six-hour mini-series delivers as a dramatic
political story and at the same time as an historical chronicle.  Because
the title and subject matter conjure memories of YEAR OF LIVING DANGEROUSLY,
A DANGEROUS LIFE invites comparison of the two films.  The Weir film had one
charismatic, enigmatic character, Billy Kwan.  A DANGEROUS LIFE has no
particularly fascinating character in a leading role.  The main characters
are involved in a nominal but dull love triangle.  Who cares?  In virtually
every other regard, A DANGEROUS LIFE is a model for the political chronicle.
It tells a piece of history most of us remember and tells in a dramatic and
engrossing way a detailed history of the fall of Marcos.  And it seems even
more immediate for the extensive use of television news videotape.
     Actually for interest value, the lead parts are eclipsed by that of
Imelda Marcos (played by Tessie Tomas).  Most people think of her as a sort
of international joke, a vain woman who had a huge collection of shoes.
Under Robert Markowitz's direction, she is as hypnotic and deadly as a
cobra, a consummate politician and actress.
     If it seems by the second installment that the story is going overly
long, have faith--the third and final part more than compensates.  One
complaint that could be made is that it is a trifle one-sided.  It does not
protect the United States government, which gets a thorough and very
probably well-deserved lambasting for valuing its Philippine military bases
over the lives of the Filipino people.  But Corazon Aquino is just a little
too saintly and pure.  Making her so perfect makes the film seem a little
manipulative.  But as a fault, this is only a very minor one.  This
production for HBO will inevitably be the first American made-for-television
film to ever make my "Ten-Best-of-the-Year" list.  Rate it a +3 on the -4 to
+4 scale.

Title
Review for Devil's Own, The (1997)
     THE DEVIL'S OWN cost a reported $90-100 million to make.
Ordinarily that is of little interest to me as a viewer since I pay the
about the same ticket price to see it as to see a little inexpensive
independent film.  But it should be noted that this is not a subject
matter that requires a big budget.  Whatever was good in this film was
done far more intelligently but on a television budget in the British
made-for-TV thriller HARRY'S GAME (1982).  With the exception of bigger
(but not more realistic) action scenes THE DEVIL'S OWN offers little
that HARRY'S GAME did not.  (For all I know there may be other equally
good thrillers on this subject from the BBC that just never made it to
this country.  But I do notice that the previous Harrison Ford IRA-
related film, PATRIOT GAMES, borrowed the music of HARRY'S GAME in
apparent homage.)  Perhaps the real virtue of THE DEVIL'S OWN is a
moderately even-handed approach to the politics.  These days it seems
unusual to have a major action film which covers politics and which
does not make it obvious which side is right and which is wrong.
Leaving audiences to wonder about which side to be on in a conflict is
not generally thought to reflect well at the box-office.  It is only a
minor touch in THE DEVIL'S OWN that the story does not come right out
and take sides.  It is the most refreshing touch that it is left to the
viewer to decide.  Perhaps the writers, and there were at least four,
felt that pushing one point of view was not really crucial to tell the
story.
     At a young age Frankie McGuire (to be played as an adult by Brad
Pitt) saw his beloved father gunned down at the dinner table by masked
Protestants.  Two decades later Frankie is an IRA terrorist who has
killed more than twenty people and British Intelligence is trying
desperately to stop him.  Frankie's next project involves stinger
missiles and he has to go to New York to buy them with a large satchel
of money.  A sympathetic judge finds lodging for Frankie at the house
of honest cop Tom O'Meara (Harrison Ford).  Tom, glad to have another
male in a house full of women, has no idea of who Frankie is or what he
is really doing.  The two men are each interested in the other's
country and culture, each surprised at what he discovers.  They begina
friendship that the viewer knows can only end only in violence.
Violence is key word and not all of it is over Northern Ireland
politics.  But the even-handedness in treating these conflicts even
extends to partially justifying a halfworld-ish bar owner and arms
dealer played by Treat Williams.  This is a film of many different
conflicts in which nobody is entirely right or wrong.
     This admittedly is a minority opinion, but Harrison Ford is not a
particularly expressive or charismatic actor.  In spite of his
popularity he has a limited acting range and does not project much
personality beyond weariness.  The same can be said of many other
actors, but few of his repute.  Pitt carries his role with a thick, at
times impenetrable Irish accent, that is reasonably convincing.  Their
friendship could easily devolve into a simple father-and-son
relationship, but it is more complex than that with Ford playing the
innocent compared to the generally more worldly and certainly more
experienced Pitt.  The cinematography by Gordon Willis creates mood by
matching the darkest moods of the characters with dark murky scenes in
Ulster and in New York.
     THE DEVIL'S OWN is more sophisticated and intelligent than most of
the action films in the theaters these days, but this expensive
production is still not up to what the BBC can do on a skittles and
beer budget.  There was little on the screen to justify the enormous
cost of the film.  Still, I rate THE DEVIL'S OWN a high +1 on the -4 to
+4 scale.

Title
Review for Eddie Murphy Raw (1987)
          Capsule review:  Ultimately a very downbeat and bitter
     stand-up comic concert film.  The problem is not that the
     humor is tasteless but that it is not particularly clever.
     RAW is a short film that has occasional laugh-out-loud jokes
     but not enough to make it worthwhile.  Rating: 0.
     I am not sure you can measure a concert film by the same standards by
which you measure other films.  Certainly a lot of the criteria you would
apply to the quality of a  dramatic film just do not apply to a concert
film--considerations like, "Did the plot make sense?"  But then, if one says
a concert film is not a dramatic film, can you really say that MY DINNER
WITH ANDRE is?  It is somewhere in the gray area between drama and concert
film.  Well, one thing that seems to be called a concert film is a filmed
comedy act by a stand-up comic.  (If you look at Webster, a single person
cannot give a concert, it has to be a *concerted* effort.  Eddie Murphy's
RAW just barely squeaks by on a technicality.)
     And if RAW does just squeak by, that is just about the only place it
does squeak.  Generally it tends to roar in language that will never make it
to commercial television.  In fact, part of Murphy's appeal seems to be in
the creative ways he finds to use profanity.  And his appeal is undeniable
and amazing.  He has a line of anti-feminist and anti-homosexual patter that
would do a Grand Wizard proud, and yet it is considered unobjectionable
because it is embedded in profanity, like almonds in a Hershey bar, and
hence is funny.  It can be a strange world.
     RAW begs comparison to other black stand-up comic concert films,
particularly those of Richard Pryor and Bill Cosby.  Even more than of
dramatic films, comparisons of stand-up comics will be a matter of taste,
but for my money Murphy comes in a distinct third.  Of the three comics
Cosby is the funniest.  There is nothing I have ever seen Murphy do that has
had me laughing like Cosby's dentist routine.  From Cosby to Pryor to Murphy
the jokes become more bitter, less creative, more profane, and generally
less funny.  Murphy does a good impression of Cosby telling him to clean up
his act, but the profanity that is Murphy's trademark is the least of his
faults.  Murphy's humor is at bottom very downbeat and often, as when he
describes his bowel movements, just not all that interesting.  Rate RAW a
flat 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for GoodFellas (1990)
     Back in the 1930s Warner Brothers made a reputation for themselves
making gangster films.  That was the heyday of Cagney, Raft, Robinson, and
Bogart.  But I don't remember them ever making a gangster film as realistic
as their current GOODFELLAS.  First of all, GOODFELLAS is "based on a true
story."  It is, in fact, based on the memoir WISE GUY by Nicholas Pileggi,
who co-wrote the screenplay with the film's director, Martin Scorsese.  And
the film is structured like a memoir.  It is long for a film (146 minutes)
and is mostly episodic, with the episodes being somewhat related.
Dramatically it is not structured like SCARFACE with a beginning, a middle,
and a satisfying ending.  Instead, it is structured like a documentary, but
for one puzzling exception.  It starts during an incident in 1970, then in a
flashback, as if reminiscing at that point, tells of Henry Hill's career in
crime since 1955, returns to the 1970 incident and continues the story,
still in recollection style, until about 1980.  What makes it even more
puzzling is that the 1970 incident, while moderately important, is not a
pivotal point in the story.
     This is the story of Henry Hill (played by Ray Liotta), a gangster of
Italian-Irish descent.  Hill is part of a small group of crooks and killers
that is sort of a satellite of the Mafia.  Only those of pure Italian
descent may actually be part of the Mafia.  Hill started at age 13 parking
cars and running errands for a local gangster.  He loves the work and the
respect and feat it brings him from the neighborhood.  From there one thing
leads to another as he hijacks trucks and steals shipments at nearby
Idlewild/Kennedy Airport.  Eventually he is involved in a six million dollar
theft, in murder, and in cocaine.  What looks like an enjoyable life early
on gets more and more serious and nightmarish.  We see life in organized
crime and in the social world surrounding crime.  There is loving attention
paid to Italian food through most of the film.  Scorsese has the texture of
the criminal very believably presented.
     It is clear that life gets more serious for Hill as time progresses,
but Liotta's looks change very little in the course of the film.  His face
is not very expressive, and we have a hard time knowing how he feels at
times.  Jimmy Conway (played by Robert DeNiro) is more expressive and does
seem to change as time goes by.  It is unfortunate that DeNiro accepts top
billing, since he certainly had less than half the screen time that Liotta
has.  DeNiro and Paul Sorvino (as Paully Cicero) play Hill's two bosses and
mentors in crime.  Rounding out the topliners are Joe Pesci as the volatile
gangster Tommy DeVito.  His performance is likely to be the one best
remembered from the film.
     One comes out of GOODFELLAS not feeling greatly entertained but with
the feeling that you have seen an authentic view of modern crime.  I rate it
+2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for James and the Giant Peach (1996)
     Tim Burton makes two types of films.  One type has plots that are
concatenations of really odd scenes, strong on visual composition, but
without much story to glue the scenes together.  His other type of
films are the ones written by Caroline Thompson.  Thompson has a way of
sewing together weird images into a story that has emotional impact.
JAMES AND THE GIANT PEACH is an attempt to follow up the excellent THE
NIGHTMARE BEFORE CHRISTMAS with another weird animation piece.  Perhaps
this time Thompson was off directing her terrific adaptation of BLACK
BEAUTY.  Or perhaps producer Burton may have felt he did not need
Thompson's story since he was adapting a book by Roald Dahl and only
needed to turn it into a script.  In any case her hand is sorely missed
in this film of an animated boy and friends who seem to be magical
giant versions of garden "pests."
     Watching the film, the viewer is never quite sure where the plot
is going in this story with its plot turns that border on a psychedelic
dream with a slight fairy tale quality.  As the story opens, James is a
very contented and well-adjusted little live-action boy.  He is living
happily with his loving parents who promise to take him from England to
see New York City.  Then they are suddenly eaten by a mysterious
mystical rhinoceros.  James is forced to go live with his two aunts,
overly-painted grotesques who seem to hate children and garden pests
about equally.  James, on the other hand, rather likes spiders and
other creepy- crawlies.  His aunts feed him on fish heads and place him
in virtual slavery while they sit around each day admiring themselves
and finding ways to make James more miserable.  Luckily, however, a
mysterious man gives James some magical green glowing crocodile tongues
which when accidentally dropped cause a tree to sprout a peach the size
of a house.  (I'm really not making this up, you know!)  When the peach
opens a hole, James goes in and turns into an animated boy who meets
friends who are a spider, a centipede, a grasshopper, a ladybug, and a
worm.  When the peach gets loose and rolls into the sea, James is off
to try to find New York City with the enthusiastic animals he has met.
Along the way the crew has to fight dangers like mechanical sharks.
     Paul Terry has the title role (well, at least the first half of
the title) and is the main character, but being a child gets eighth
billing.  He gets his revenge by having absolutely no voice when called
on to sing, though he does just fine in the acting scenes.  Top billing
goes to major actors who voiced the animated creatures in the peach,
not that they are really there for anything but marquee value.  The
voices are Simon Callow as the erudite Grasshopper; Richard Dreyfuss as
the cigar-chomping, low-brow centipede; Jane Leeves as the Ladybug;
Susan Sarandon as the resourceful spider; and David Thewlis (of NAKED
and RESTORATION) as the Earthworm.  The writing gives none of these
creatures much personality beyond funny voices and only the most
threadbare of characterizations.  A little better characterization goes
to Joanna Lumley and Miriam Margolyes as the two aunts, though that is
perhaps because we get to see them in live-action.  Also a cameo role
goes to Jack Skellington, the main character of THE NIGHTMARE BEFORE
CHRISTMAS.
     The film does better with its visualization than it does with its
story, but those who were hoping for the detailed careful work of THE
NIGHTMARE BEFORE CHRISTMAS will be disappointed.  The animation in that
film was a genuine tour-de-force, with something interesting happening
in just about every corner of the screen in nearly every frame.  There
were a lot of throw-away humor and clever ideas in the animation that
is just missing from the animation scenes here.  The live-action scenes
have some very nice stylized sets.  Even in the animation scenes there
is a great variety of visual styles from scene to scene.  Be warned
there is a lot in this film that younger children may find frightening.
There is a lot that the adults in the audience will find unusual, but
much of it just does not quite work.  (Be aware there is one more
bizarre little final scene for those who sit though the credits.)
     The story of JAMES AND THE GIANT PEACH is unusual and creative,
often a stylistic plus, but here there just is not very much to chew on
in the story and nobody to really care about.  It is hard to imagine
that the loss that James suffers at the beginning of the film is in any
degree offset by what James gains in the course of the film.  The
story, which I am told varies a great deal from the book, just is not a
very good one.  I rate this film, on the basis of some of the more
interesting visuals, a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Thirteen Days (2000)
     My view of THIRTEEN DAYS is heavily colored by my view of the
Kennedy administration and its Cuban policy in general and in this
incident in particular.  The crisis is just about the only major
Cold War incident when I feel the Soviets were in the right.  It is
not easy to get me to agree with Soviets I might add.  At this point
in history the US had already put nuclear missiles just off the
borders of the Soviet.  They also had complained loudly but really
only complained about a branch of the US government sponsoring an
invasion of Cuba.  Had the tables been reversed we would have
labeled the Bay of Pigs invasion "an act of war," but I suspect the
Soviets were a little fearful of the implications of so doing so and
quite rightly.  Acts of war really require retaliation.  They could
not, however, ignore a second such invasion, so they needed a
deterrent to prevent it from ever happening if for no other reason
than to preserve the peace.  It is the Americans who say, "If you
want peace, prepare for war."  The Soviets looked at the missiles
just over the border in Turkey and saw them as setting a precedent,
they would fortify Cuba.  That would seem a just act.  But instead
of regarding it as such it led to a head to head confrontation.  If
you see the film you will see all the tangible steps to diffuse the
situation are taken by the Soviets.  This we label "Going eyeball to
eyeball with the enemy and the other guy blinked."  Thank goodness
he did blink when we might not have.  I cannot help but feel the
unsung hero of THIRTEEN DAYS is Nikita Khrushchev.  This is just my
interpretation, I am no expert, but it colors my reaction to the
film.
     THIRTEEN DAYS is the story of the Cuban Missile Crisis from the
point of view of Presidential advisor Kenneth O'Donnell (played by
Kevin Costner).  The film is pretty much just a blow-by-blow
recounting of the incidents of the crisis beginning with a spy plane
flying over Cuba and seeing the nuclear missiles the Soviets had
provided the Cubans.  The John F. Kennedy ( played here by Bruce
Greenwood) is told almost immediately.  He calls in his brother
Robert (Steven Culp), his closest confidant.  For the remainder of
the crisis the President seems to have two heads, the Jack head and
the Bobby head.
     Anyone with a knowledge of history knows what happened next,
including the strong policy split between the military and civilians
in government.  The Chiefs of Staff were anxious to take on the
Soviets in a war they assumed they could limit.  Toward the end of
the crisis we realize that the Soviets also have their own divisions
in policy with hawks and doves in the Politburo.  The film is a
constant battle between those who want military solutions and those
who want diplomatic ones with John Kennedy being indecisive between
them, and rightly so.  Kennedy is haunted by his reading of Barbara
Tuchman's THE GUNS OF AUGUST, an account of how both sides behaving
in what at the time appeared logical ways inexorably descended into
the First World War.  That could happen again, this time with
nuclear missiles.
     THIRTEEN DAYS makes some bad stylistic mistakes.  The film
opens with a missile firing and a nuclear explosion.  Then more
missile firing and more big explosions.  Then more of the same.  The
point is, of course, that this sort of exchange is what they will be
trying to avoid.  Frankly I started to find this frequent visual
reminder of the high stakes involved rather annoying.  We all agree
that this is what we are trying to avoid.  We all agree that nuclear
weapons are very, very bad.  But to think clearly we have to avoid
what Kissinger called "scaring ourselves to death."  Showing the
bomb so often in hellish hues of red is a patronizing emotional
argument thrown in among the logical arguments of the film.  A
number of scenes toward the beginning seem for no reason to start
out in black and white and steel blue and fade into the full color
spectrum.  It was not all scenes and the implication may have been
we are taking this from cold-hard records and breathing life into
it.  But I was not sure.  Whatever it was trying to do it was
failing.  The Boston accents were a distraction particularly because
actors were not consistent in the degree of their own accents.
SPARTACUS was not made in Latin with English subtitles.  Director
Roger Donaldson could have toned them down a little and we could
have lived with the inaccuracy.
     On the other hand the film does produce a great feeling of
immediacy without snowing the viewer in detail he does not
understand.  The build of tension is very good in spite of the fact
we all know how it will turn out.  Part of the problem with this
documentary is that it has been done before and is overly familiar.
There was an excellent TV docu-drama in the mid-1970s, THE MISSILES
OF OCTOBER.  There was also at least one good documentary made for
television.  Each was better than THIRTEEN DAYS.
     I think films like this that show us an important event in
history in minute detail are very good, but that THIRTEEN DAYS is a
highly flawed example that makes it fall short of being a really
great film.  I rate it 7 on the 0 to 10 scale and a +2 on the -4 to
+4 scale.  And I still think it picks out the wrong people to be
heroes.

Title
Review for Rock, The (1996)
     A large part of the idea and appeal of Batman in the early days
was that he was a sort of Dracula, the crime fighter.  After all, if
Dracula was so powerful, think what a crime-fighter he would make.
These days action films seem to be about terrorist plots and the kind
of monster that scares people is the psychological kind like Hannibal
Lector, and so is born a plot where someone with the deductive power of
a Hannibal Lector is an anti-terrorist.  (Okay, he is not exactly
Lector, just like Batman was not exactly Dracula, but Lector clearly is
much of the inspiration for the character.)
     General Francis X. Hummel (played by Ed Harris) is one of the most
respected and highly-decorated Marines this country has, but he also
has seen the government betray some of his closest comrades in arms.
Now he has planned and is executing a grandiose extortion scheme to see
justice done and to make a tidy profit for himself.  He is going to
grab some tourists visiting Alcatraz Island and hold them for ransom.
But that is just a part of the plot.  Just to sweeten the kitty, if he
and his men are paid nicely and on time they will refrain from shooting
some of the world's most deadly chemical agent over San Francisco,
thereby horribly killing everybody within the city limits.  A crack FBI
team is to be sent to Alcatraz to release the hostages and to nullify
the chemical weapon.  Chosen for the assignment is an FBI field agent
and chemical expert, the wise-cracking Stanley Goodspeed (Nicholas
Cage).  The team also needs to send an expert on the interior of
Alcatraz.  And, yes, it turns out they have one, but they do not want
anybody to know about him.  He is not an FBI agent; he is a prisoner
and the only man ever to have escaped from Alcatraz, lived, and gone
free.  But he has never had a trial and the government wants nobody
even to know that he exists.  Just the knowledge of why he is
imprisoned could have serious political implications.  His name is
Patrick Mason and if he does not already sound formidable enough, he is
played by Sean Connery!  (Oh, incidentally, as for escaping from the
Rock, there was someone who did escape from Alcatraz and made it to
shore alive.  He was, however, immediately arrested and at least
reportedly he is the only man to have ever made it to shore.)  If this
illegally imprisoned man Mason can be made to help the team that will
go to the island and try to disarm the missiles, they might have a
chance to succeed.  The problem is that Mason is himself a dangerous
weapon and who he really hates is the FBI.
     Nicholas Cage has a unique acting style.  It is hard to mistake
him for any other actor.  He seems to go back and forth between small
independent films and majors, letting the major films finance him while
he goes back and tries something a little different, like LEAVING LAS
VEGAS which netted him an Oscar.  I am unconvinced that he has real
acting range and most of the characters he plays seems to have the same
schmaltzy, half-awake feel.  Here he is playing an action hero, sort
of, and he brings to it much the same feel as his Ben from LEAVING LAS
VEGAS.  Connery is always fun to watch (dragonized or not) and so is Ed
Harris.  There is little in the roles here that any of them gives us
that we have not seen from him before with the exception that Cage has
not play this physical a role before.  This seems to be very much a
by-the-numbers sort of film.  This is Michael Bay's second major film
as director, the previous being BAD BOYS.
     The score is very, very Hans Zimmer, even for a Hans Zimmer score.
Zimmer is joined by Nick Glennie-Smith, but the style is all Zimmer.
If you have heard the music from BACKDRAFT and CRIMSON TIDE, you know
the score.  The pacing of THE ROCK is a little odd.  Not that there is
not always some action either going on or about to happen, but there is
a long section in the first half of the film that seems to forget about
Hummel's plot altogether and concentrate on whether the FBI can deal
with Mason or not.  Yes, there is action going on, but what is on the
mind of the viewer is the main threat from Hummel, and diverting to
long action scenes built around Mason seems a bad plot choice.  Now I
could be wrong about this, but I doubt that Alcatraz has somewhere in
its bowels a mine train and something else that looks like an amusement
park sky-ride.  And this strange furnace with the flame and the
stamping metal did not make a whole lot of sense to me either.  It was
a plot device needed to provide some suspense, but I for one would like
to know a little more about what the intended purpose of this
contraption was.  Alcatraz seems to have more weird rooms in its lower
levels than the Paris Opera House has in THE PHANTOM OF THE OPERA.
John Schwartzman's photography is heavy on colored filters and a smoky
look.
     In short, this is a summer action film that entertains for an
afternoon and then fades away.  Rate it a high +1 on the -4 to +4
scale.
     For those who were wondering after the film who is this Don
Simpson for whose memory THE ROCK is dedicated, he is the producer of
the film.  According to the Internet Movie Database he produced
FLASHDANCE (1983), THIEF OF HEARTS (1984), BEVERLY HILLS COP (1984),
TOP GUN (1986), BEVERLY HILLS COP II (1987), DAYS OF THUNDER (1990),
THE REF (1994), DANGEROUS MINDS (1995), CRIMSON TIDE (1995), BAD BOYS
(1995), and THE ROCK (1996).
     SPOILER... SPOILER... SPOILER... SPOILER... SPOILER... SPOILER...
     There is much toward the end of the film that leaves a sour taste
in one's mouth.  There were contrivances in the plot that just work too
blatantly to smooth off rough edges.  General Hummel was doing what he
thought was right and there certainly were those in the audience who
would probably have agreed.  He was certainly risking his life for a
principle.  The film would have taken some risks by having an
idealistic villain who was not just a fanatic and it would have been a
nice touch to leave the character that way.  But this was not a script
to take any such risks.  The script had to turn him around and make him
change sides at the end so that there was no chance that anybody would
be rooting for the bad guys.  The script had to make sure that by the
end of the film everyone the heroes were fighting were unquestionably
bad.  That makes the ending just a little too neat.  Having Goodspeed
stab himself in the heart (thank you, Mr. Tarantino), roll on the
floor, then drag himself up in a dramatic pose to wave flares at the
approaching planes was just a bit more overripe a climax than the film
needed.  All that was needed at that point was for a Great White Shark
to jump out of the water and start nipping at his toes while a tidal
wave bore down on him from the right.  And does anybody have any idea
how an injection in the heart can stop someone's skin from boiling
off???
     Oh, and by the way, Alcatraz was closed as a prison in 1963 so if
Mason had spent so long in there it would have had to have been well
prior to 1963.  Now for what was he imprisoned and what were the last
words of the film?

Title
Review for White Fang (1991)
     Walt Disney Studios continues to make films that old Walt would have
been proud of.  They are better films than Disney himself was making toward
the end of his life.  While it is not necessarily true of the Touchstone
line, when a film comes out under the Disney title, it is worth seeing.
Films such as NEVER CRY WOLF, THE JOURNEY OF NATTY GANN, and WHITE FANG have
more in common than just the curious link that they all try to vindicate
wolves: they have good scripts with well-crafted dialogue.  Disney's staff
may be among the most accomplished nature photographers in the world.  And
they appear to be the only studio that seems to make sure all their prints
are on high-quality, blemish-free film.  While it probably will not stand
with some of their better efforts of the past, WHITE FANG is fully up to
Disney's photographic and writing standards.
     WHITE FANG has a decent story which takes some of its ideas from the
novel by Jack London.  Perhaps the film's biggest failing is that it really
is very different from the novel.  While the novel linearly follows the
story of the dog, the screenplay follows two often crossing lines, the story
of the dog and the story of a young prospector who has come to the Klondike
to inherit his father's gold mine.  Ethan Hawke plays Jack Conroy, who
slowly learns to survive in the wild with the reluctant tutelage of Alex
Larson (played by Klaus Maria Brandauer).  Disney apparently is not ready
yet to have animals as his main characters the way Annaud did in his film,
THE BEAR.  Speaking of that film, incidentally, Bart the Bear, who played
the big, strong, silent hero of THE BEAR, gets to try his paw at playing a
villain in WHITE FANG.  He has a high old time chewing up the scenery in a
small but important part and, like Brandauer, seems a little too big for his
role as written.  Conroy arrives in the Klondike and climbs the "Golden
Stairway" in an impressive and spectacular scene.  At the top he teams up
with friends of his father, Larson and a delightful old prospector played by
Seymour Cassel.  Then, in a sequence that does not quite make geometric
sense, they cross country but repeatedly run into first a she-wolf and later
her cub.  The hazards of surviving in the spectacular desolation are well
represented in the film.
     The nature photography is flawless, with huge vistas of craggy blue
ice.  Against this backdrop you see the wolves playing and dancing.
Unfortunately, not all the photography is as original as it usually is in a
Disney film.  Whole sequences seem borrowed from THE BEAR and one nice
underwater shot was inspired by THE BLACK STALLION.  The score by Basil
Poledouris, who also scored the current film FLIGHT OF THE INTRUDER, is very
good and in some ways reminiscent of his best score, CONAN THE BARBARIAN.
     My rating for WHITE FANG is a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Microcosmos: Le peuple de l'herbe (1996)
     Few animal documentaries have ever done well as feature films.
Perhaps the last successful feature film about insects was THE
HELLSTROM CHRONICLE, made just over a quarter of a century ago.  But by
anybody's standards MICROCOSMOS is a remarkable documentary.  What we
have is a close-up look at a French meadow on a nice day.  We are here
in a secret garden to appreciate the afternoon of the fauna.  In the
course of the film we are going to spend a pleasant interlude just
admiring the very small forms of life, mostly insects, and learning to
appreciate their beauty and their noble traits.  Occasionally we see
something a big as a pheasant, and it does look grotesquely big and
ungainly as it pecks up unsuspecting ants.  But more often what we are
watching are ladybugs, caterpillars, and the occasional snail.  True
these are mostly animals you found boring in biology class, but in
MICROCOSMOS you will see them like you never saw them before.  This is
a G-rated film that is full of erotic sex and violence like your
teacher would never have wanted you to see.  Your high school would
have never let you observe the chance afternoon encounter and love-
making between two snails.  This is the scene that had members of the
audience panting.  For violence there is a knock down drag out fight
between two beetles that is genuinely exciting, even if you can't tell
one beetle from the other.  Spiders capture grasshoppers, spin webs and
knit them up, then suck their blood. Then there is the sheer beauty and
symmetry of a mosquito emerging from water, stretching its wings and
then disappearing faster than the eye can see.
     In the course of the film some of the creativity of insects is
amazing.  A water spider builds an underwater sanctuary by repeatedly
going to the surface, catching air on her body, returning underneath
the surface to contribute the air to a growing bubble.  When the bubble
is finally large enough, the spider pulls herself and her prey into the
bubble to peacefully enjoy a well-earned under-water meal.  Then there
is the dogged persistence of a scarab beetle rolling a ball of dung up
a hill, accidentally impaling it on a thorn, and then having to figure
out why it will no longer move.  Now admittedly, much of what we see
might be able to see free on NOVA.  But there they probably would
insist on telling you what you were seeing.  But the insects live
perfectly happily without names or words and with the exception of a
sentence or two at the beginning and end of the film the film is just
music and a few humorous sound effects.  There is no shortage of humor
and surprisingly some insects are natural comedians.  For example,
wonder turns to humor as we are watching a long caravan of caterpillars
walking nose to tail.  As they walk they merge with another line of
caterpillars like two traffic lanes merging for a tunnel.  When the
camera pulls back we realize that the line of caterpillars has merged
with itself and in now walking around in a pointless loop.  Or for the
pure amazement of it we watch an ant trying to break through the
surface tension of a drop of water to get a drink from the interior.
     MICROCOSMOS is directed by two French biologists, Claude Nuridsany
and Marie Perennou.  It took three years to shoot with special
photographic equipment that took two years to develop and with a
knowledge of wildlife that took fifteen years to accumulate.  Nuridsany
and Perennou have an incredible savvy for finding the parallels between
animal and human behavior, or just a knowledge of what is beautiful in
the animal world they take us to a prehistoric world with huge and odd
vegetation and strangely-shaped creatures.  They fumble, crawl, and
tumble for 77 minutes.
     MICROCOSMOS is entomological "Candid Camera."  Besides a few
overly corny sound effects, there is little to fault the film on.  I
rate it a high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for While You Were Sleeping (1995)
     Preston Sturges could have had a good time with this story.  John
Turteltaub is no Preston Sturges, but he is at least able to make it
into an amiable comedy.  Sandra Bullock plays Lucy, a drab and lonely
token-booth attendant for the Chicago Transit Authority.  Her life is
dreams.  She dreams of travel,   She dreams of getting a nice boy
friend.  She dreams of having a family.  And Turteltaub dreams of the
audience believing Sandra Bullock as a drab and lonely token-booth
attendant with no boyfriends.  Lucy does have a dream boyfriend, a
well-heeled and handsome man who comes by her CTA station.  One lonely
Christmas the family-less Lucy is working and her dream boyfriend is
mugged on the platform and falls into the path of an approaching train.
Lucy saves his life and takes the unconscious man--Peter as she
discovers his name is (appropriately played by Peter Gallagher)--to a
hospital.  There a careless comment gives a nurse the impression that
Lucy is really the now-comatose Peter's fiancee.  In the sort of comedy
of errors that can occur only in the most contrived of stories, when
Peter's somewhat strange family show up, they hear Lucy referred to as
Peter's fiancee and they also believe it.  Peter's family adopts Lucy
as a prospective family member that they have never met.  Further
complicating matters is that Peter's brother Jack (Bill Pullman) is
skeptical that brother Peter would have gotten engaged to Lucy without
Jack finding out.  He sets out to prove that Lucy is not what she
appears to be.
     This is a film with its heart in the right place, and one with a
good sense of humor.  But it just does not have the polished style ofa
professionally made film.  There are mismatched styles of humor that
often conflict with each other.  Pieces of slapstick are thrown into
what is mostly a comedy of personality.  Much of the humor is built
around the eccentric conversations of Peter's family.  Somehow this
joke just does not work as well as scriptwriters Daniel G. Sullivan and
Frederic Lebow think it does.
     Sandra Bullock has been winning in SPEED and was likable in
DEMOLITION MAN, but here she overplays her personality.  She gives the
kind of performance in which you can read her every emotion, just a
little too exaggerated, on her face.  That works for a while, but the
slight overplaying eventually makes her seem sappy and unctuous.  It
may well have been a director's decision since Peter Gallagher also
seems to have the same problem, though luckily for Gallagher he is not
on the screen and conscious long enough to allow it to become
irritating.  Several good veteran character actors are also present
including Jack Warden, Glynis Johns, and Peter Boyle are present but do
not have sufficient screen time to show us any acting touches that we
have not seen from them many times previously.
     WHILE YOU WERE SLEEPING is no great classic of cinema.  In fact,
to all appearances it no more than a light Christmas programmer that
got delayed in its release.  If it has no great virtues, at least it
has no great faults either.  This piece of feather-light holiday fluff
gets a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Last of the Mohicans, The (1992)
          Capsule review:  Michael Mann's LAST OF THE MOHICANS is
     finally available and while James Fenimore Cooper might
     cavil, this is still a film that teaches a lot about a
     little-dramatized chapter of history.  In some ways it is
     more intriguing in concept than the source novel.  Technical
     credits are good across the board including remarkable
     stylistic restraint coming from Mann.  Rating: high +2 (-4 to
     +4).
     I would say that I am fairly interested in history in general and in
military history in particular.  But not so much the War of the Roses.  That
war just does not strike my imagination.  Why not?  I think I cannot picture
the time.  I cannot picture how the war was fought or how people lived.
Mostly, I cannot remember off-hand seeing a good historical film set in the
War of the Roses.  So it is all just history.  This morning the same was
true of the French and Indian War.  I have even recently read James Fenimore
Cooper's LAST OF THE MOHICANS, but I just could not picture exactly what the
weapons looked like or the style of fighting.  But right now I have strong
visual images of the French and Indian War.  I can picture the cannons and
how they were aimed.  I am amazed at how remarkably quiet skirmishes in the
forests were.  Most of my impressions of the French and Indian War I got
today.  So THE LAST OF THE MOHICANS could be a terrible adaptation of the
Cooper novel--and in some senses it really is--and I would still highly
recommend the film.  And I do.
     Cooper's novel makes strange reading today.  It has the action and
adventure of a Republic serial told in the style of prose fit for an Oxford
economic treatise.  You want to read fast to find out what happens next, but
if you do not struggle you will miss what does happen.  Mark Twain wrote a
famous essay on how unreadable Cooper is.  And there is many times too much
plot in the novel to tell the story accurately in a film.  Michael Mann (who
also directed) and Christopher Crowe wrote a screenplay too close to say it
was only inspired by the novel, but not close enough to call an adaptation.
     The year is 1757 in what is now upper New York state.  The British and
the French are fighting for the continent and each is making alliances with
local Indians tribes.  The British send a small party, led by Major Duncan
Heyward (played by Steven Waddington) to take Cora and Alice Munro (played
by Madeleine Stowe and Jodhi May) to the fort commanded by their father.  As
a guide, they send the Mohawk Magua (played by Wes Studi).  But Magua is not
a Mohawk; he is a hostile Huron who is acting as a French agent.  He leads
the party into an ambush only to have his plot dashed when the Major, Cora,
and Alice are rescued by Hawkeye, Chingachgook, and Uncas (played by Daniel
Day-Lewis, Russell Means, and Eric Schweig, respectively).  In spite of
himself, Hawkeye is attracted to Cora.  So is the Major and so starts a
conflict totally absent from the novel.  A lot of the rest of this film is
about people rushing someplace or other through dangerous territory, but
under the protection of the valiant Hawkeye and his adoptive father and
brother, Chingachgook and Uncas.  The action is good; the love triangle is
not.
     One of my complaints about the often-shown trailer is that we do not
see the title character.  In fact, in the film the action pulls away from
Chingachgook and we do not see much of the character.  It is a combination
of a casting coup and an endorsement of the script to have Russell Means in
the role.  This is Means's first film, but it is far from the first time
that Means has been before the American public.  Means has been a creative
activist for Indian rights who has had a consistent policy of attacking
symbols rather than people in demonstrations.  In 1970 he captured the
Mayflower II on Thanksgiving.  The following year he occupied Mount
Rushmore.  In 1973 he occupied the site of the Wounded Knee massacre of
Indians by United States soldiers.  He is the co-founder of the American
Indian Movement (AIM).  Means castigated recent films such as DANCES WITH
WOLVES, which he found full of cliches and which had all the Indians
speaking the feminine language that only women spoke.  He has nicknamed
THUNDERHEART "South Dakota Burning" for making good guys out of the FBI.  To
have Means consent to appear in the film and to endorse the script is quite
impressive.
     When I think of films that Michael Mann has directed I think of flashy
but not very intelligent style.  I think of THE KEEP and MANHUNTER.  (I have
never seen an episode of his popular television series MIAMI VICE.)  Perhaps
his fans will be disappointed but there are no strange camera angles and no
unnatural use of color.  Many of his scenes come off surprisingly undramatic
but also very credible.  In one scene there is an ambush of a party of
British trooping through a clearing.  It could have been played for great
dramatic impact.  Instead it appears as a sudden commotion that could well
have just been confusing for some of the victims, at least at first.  The
scene is very believable and realistic, if less dramatic than it could be.
And that shows a real improvement in Mann's style.  This film is amazingly
better than anything else I remember seeing from Mann.  While these are not
the most beautiful landscapes in the world, cinematographer Dante Spinotti
plays the natural beauty for as much as is possible.  Trevor Jones and Randy
Edelman have composed a remarkably good score.
     For those familiar with the novel, there are a large number of
variations, some very obviously improvements.  Cooper had Hawkeye totally
loyal to unquestionably good British.  In this version, the British appear
as bad or worse than the French.  They are ready to betray the colonists for
their own ends.  Hawkeye, very reasonably, does not trust the British in the
film and will have more reason not to like them in the course of the story.
Heyward and Hawkeye are good friends in the book.  But the film has Heyward
attracted to Cora instead of to Alice and Hawkeye also loves Cora.  In the
book you have to read between the lines to see a relationship between
Hawkeye and Cora.  Certainly Cooper never had the close personal
conversations between Hawkeye and Cora.  They never talk in the book about
how they feel about anything, much less about each other.  Also, Magua is
very much a one-dimensional character to Cooper and is much more interesting
in the film.
     So in spite of the fact that Michael Mann's film does not work well as
an adaptation of the novel, it is a very good film to watch and from which
to learn a little history.  It lacks some of the dramatic and historic sweep
of this summer's FAR AND AWAY, but it may be the better historical film.  I
would rate THE LAST OF THE MOHICANS a high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Puppet Masters, The (1994)
          Capsule review:  THE PUPPET MASTERS is a no-holds-
     barred alien invasion film.  It is a dark and humorless
     exercise in which virtually every scene advances the war
     between humans and parasitic, mind-controlling aliens.
     Robert Heinlein's 1951 novel comes to the screen in a
     film that takes little time away from the main plot to
     develop its characters, but does strike home with a
     story of a hard-fought battle with a fairly alien and
     devious enemy.  Rating: high +1 (-4 to +4)
     The obvious comparison to make would be between THE PUPPET MASTERS
and the three film versions of Jack Finney's BODY SNATCHERS.  That
would probably not be accurate, however, since this film is about the
aliens possessing humans rather than passing for them.  But the
paranoid, trust-nobody spirit is much like that of those previous
films.
     An alien craft lands in the rural town of Ambrose, Iowa, and
authorities rush in to investigate, only to find that the locals all
now claim that the landing was a hoax.  In this case the authorities
are two agents of a scientific sub-agency of the CIA: Sam (played by
Eric Thal), the head of the agency, and Andrew (Donald Sutherland).
Also along is an expert borrowed from NASA, Mary (Julie Warner).  They
quickly determine that there is good reason to believe the landing was
indeed authentic.  And shortly afterward they also determine that
humans are being mentally possessed by slug-like aliens who hide on
humans' backs and tap into the nervous system to enslave the hosts.
The number of people possessed in this way increases super-
exponentially.
     If one compares THE PUPPET MASTERS to any version of THE BODY
SNATCHERS, one finds the emphasis very different, and, in fact,
different from most other science fiction films.  In the earlier films,
the time is taken to establish who the characters are and to provide a
context for their actions.  This is a film in which things start
happening in the first minute of the film and from that point on
virtually every scene is devoted to the conflict.  The people never
stand around and talk about each other long enough for the script by
Red Elliot, Terry Russo, and David Goyer to develop their character.
This makes for rather flat characters but a very tense film.  Their
script also "downdates" the story, moving it into our present.
Heinlien's 1951 novel set the story in a 2007 when interplanetary
colonization was already well under way.  That and perhaps budget
constraints limit this invasion to just a first foothold in a limited
area.  Perhaps that is more realistic than the novel, but it also
leaves open the unspoken possibility that if it came to a question of
human survival, the alien menace could be ended with a few carefully
placed nuclear weapons.  A few other changes are made to keep the film
consistent with its present or near-future setting.
     Under Stuart Orme's direction THE PUPPET MASTERS is a film that is
fact-paced and yet very dark and somber in tone, reminiscent of John
Sturges's SATAN BUG.  Donald Sutherland plays his role as the head of
the security agency with a sinister dignity.  As a man supposedly
without emotion, he speaks always in hushed tones which only add to the
tension.  Eric Thal, who was Ariel in A STRANGER AMONG US, plays a
character similarly dedicated to his purpose and similarly one-
dimensional.  It must be disheartening for Thal to be the film's
ostenstible main character but to be outacted by ten-inch slugs from
the special effects department.  The slugs, incidentally, are
sufficiently alien and repulsive as well as being reasonably convincing
as effects.  Julie Warner also is given more distress than personality
by the script.  The design of the film goes slightly downhill from a
rather beautiful celestial event at the beginning to scenes of alien
architecture that look a bit cheesey in spots.
     THE PUPPET MASTERS is a nail-biter with some good moments, but
will probably be easily over-shadowed by the upcoming FRANKENSTEIN and
INTERVIEW WITH THE VAMPIRE.  It gets a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Art of Woo, The (2001)
THE ART OF WOO attempts to be one of those films like BREAKFAST AT 
TIFFANY'S in which the audience is rooting for some sweet, 
vulnerable, irresistible woman to work out her problems and to 
find happiness.  The problem is that Helen Lee who writes and 
directs seems to have written Alessa Woo (played by Sook-Yin Lee) 
as neither sweet nor vulnerable and she is quite resistible.
Alessa is a young woman who happens to be a brilliant art dealer 
in the Toronto art scene.  This is some sort of alternate world 
art scene where people pay tens of thousands of dollars for 
paintings by talented beginners and dealers in these paintings fly 
back and forth to places like Switzerland.  One of the most 
knowledgeable of the art dealers is Alessa.  She also happens to 
be the center of adulation of her friends and every party has 
suitors camped outside her window.
Next door to Alessa moves struggling genius artist and Native 
American Ben Crowchild (Adam Beach).  He sees that behind the 
facade that there is really a sad little girl within Alessa who 
really will not be happy with the rich art collector she is 
dating.  Ben gets emotionally involved with Alessa.  (As Alessa so 
delicately puts it, "We were bosom buddies, now we're fuck 
buddies.")  But Alessa will have to decide whether she wants love 
with Ben or wealth with her rich suitor.
The real problem with the film seems to be Helen Lee's inability 
to decide what she wants to be saying.  She undercuts nearly 
everything she wants us to believe about Alessa.  Alessa is 
looking for financial security but she makes decisions about large 
sums of money for her clients.  This appears to be a high profile 
and well-paid job.  We are supposed to care about Alessa's 
feelings, but she coldly refuses to visit her own ailing father.  
Alessa cannot be portrayed as sweet and vulnerable if at an art 
auction she turns into OUR MAN FLINT.
This is a charmless romantic comedy that bets everything it has on 
the appeal of its main character and comes up double-zero.  I rate 
it a 3 on the 0 to 10 scale and a -1 on the -4 to +4 scale. 

Title
Review for Funeral, The (1996)
     In 1936 the Tempio brothers are three small-time criminal
enforcers, first generation immigrants from Italy. Ray (played by
Christopher Walken) is by default the patriarch of the family and
controls the others with a heavy hand.  He is quiet and introspective.
Chez (Chris Penn) is volatile and given to short emotional bursts.  The
youngest was Johnny (Vincent Gallo) who developed a social conscience
and was leaning toward the Communists whose meetings he had visited.  I
say "was" since as the film opens Johnny is being brought into the
house of his brother Ray in a coffin.  Johnny has been murdered and Ray
knows that it is his job to track down the murderer.  This is not
directly for revenge, but because in the philosophy he has been taught
the killer has to eliminate anyone who might be coming after him in
vengeance.  These are the Old Country values that at the age of
thirteen back in Italy Ray was told he must learn to run the family
when his father died.  His responsibilities at that young age included
the cold-blooded execution of a family enemy.  So Ray and Chez must
find out who killed their twenty-two-year-old younger brother.  The
story is told in present action and in extended flashbacks.  The
screenplay by Nicholas St. John delves into the forging of the violent
family with scenes from Ray's childhood and the action in the month or
so leading up to the killing of Johnny.  It also shows how the violence
of the family poisons each remaining brother's family life.  Ray is
married to Jeanette (Annabella Sciorra), as intelligent as her husband
and just as assertive.  She rages against the pain while Chez's wife
Clara (Isabella Rossellini) quietly bears all.  THE FUNERAL is like a
de-romanticized THE GODFATHER on a smaller scale, and often with more
believable conflict and more realistic dialogue.
     Perhaps the biggest surprise of the film was Vincent Gallo's
performance. He plays with a certain tension just beneath the surface
and has a lively performance style and an unforgettable--not to say
"homely"--face. The face and style remind one of the early performances
of John Turturro.  Director Abel Ferrara probably has some of the best
performances of any of his films in THE FUNERAL.  He has overcome some
of the self-indulgent over-acting in films like MS. 45.  Some of the
most effective performances come from the actresses playing the two
wives, Annabella Sciorra and Isabella Rossellini, reacting differently
as they see their lives unraveling as their husbands are pulled into
the events that follow the killing.  Only Christopher Walken, in the
top-billed role, seems a trifle too reserved for the proceedings.
     Nicholas St. John's screenplay has some nice touches.  Each of the
brothers has his own style of idealism and his feeling of how things
ought to be.  These interpretations are based in large part on each's
views of Catholicism and each's responsibility to the family.  Ferrara
has a penchant for melodrama and this film has it, though it has always
been hard to do a gangster films without a least some melodrama.
Ferrara is a sort of outsider as a filmmaker.  He was not aiming at
making one of the great gangster classics, he just wanted to tell a
superficially simple story and create some characters of some depth.
This is not an ambitious film, but there certainly are some nice
touches.  I would give it a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Buffy the Vampire Slayer (1992)
     The one original vampire hunter and the best known was, of course, Van
Helsing from Bram Stoker's DRACULA.  Universal had the character in two
films in the 1930s.  Hammer had at least some character named Van Helsing
(always played by Peter Cushing) in four different films.  It created the
idea that the Van Helsing family took it as a congenital mission to destroy
vampires.  BUFFY THE VAMPIRE SLAYER modifies this idea to say that there are
a chain of women vampire hunters going back to the Middle Ages.  It asks
what would happen if the mantle fell on the shoulders of a Valley Girl who
is less than totally bright (to put it charitably).  Well, perhaps the idea
has possibilities.  We may never know.  What we have gotten is a film that
bears the earmarks of having been made from the first draft of a script,
then edited by someone who was not interested in the material.
     Buffy seems to be majoring in sensual cheerleading at Hemery High
School in the San Fernando Valley.  In the opening sequences we establish
that she is very now and awesome and, in her own words, "vacuous."  Then a
mysterious character named Merrick arrives on the scene and tells Buffy that
she is next in line to be a vampire slayer.  Why does he think it is she?
Why did this honor come to be conveyed on her?  Why ask why?  The
screenwriter didn't.  Though Buffy is skeptical at first, when bodies start
digging their way out of graves, she starts to reconsider.
     So far the plot isn't so bad.  We could stand to have a little more
explanation for what is going on, but this film could still be decent.  Then
BUFFY sours very quickly.  At least the horror aspects of the plot do.  We
get a few scenes of vampires reprised from other films as if borrowing their
scenes also borrows their logic.  There are scenes of the main vampire
(played by Rutger Hauer made up to look like Edgar Allan Poe) catered to by
his assistant (played by Paul Reubens)--the sort of thing you saw in the
later and poorer Hammer films with Mike Raven.  But why is this aristocratic
vampire showing up in Southern California, so near to where this
generation's slayer is being created?  Is it coincidence?  Is there a
reason?  We never know.  It is convenient for the story that he be there, so
he is.  And given that vampires have kept their existence almost entirely
secret all these years, why do they suddenly start acting as openly and
blatantly as Hell's Angels?  Well, the film needed a spectacular third act
and that logic is more important than story logic.  This is a film that
never fails to sacrifice its intelligence when that becomes convenient.
Prime example: to show how dense the teachers are at Hemery High, their
reaction to the vampire attack is to officiously drop detention slips on
each of the victims.  It makes no sense but, hey, maybe it will get a laugh.
     The film does work a little better as a satire of the Valley Girl
lifestyle; perhaps the writers understood that a little better than the
horror aspects.  But even there, there are problems with the basics.  The
plot has Buffy becoming friends with the local rebel who shaves off his
beard for her.  That sounds simple to show in film.  But the beard
disappears before the shaving scene and then returns.  This is a lot more
than a marginal continuity error since the film does focus on the shaving
ritual.  Another problem in script muddling is Buffy's satorial realization
of what an enigmatic statement really means.  The problem is that it is
never explained to the audience.
     BUFFY THE VAMPIRE SLAYER has a little humor that really is funny, some
that is heavy-handed, and some horror film trappings.  Unless publicity
works overtime, BUFFY will quickly zap to its appropriate medium, video.  I
rate this a -1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Evita (1996)
     Eva Peron was dead 26 years before the musical was produced, and
it took nearly as long, 19 more years, for that musical to be filmed.
It is not clear why the film should be made even now or why the people
at Disney thought the American public would be interested in this story
of the attractive, blond, and politically-active wife of a
controversial reformer President who is popular among the poor but
disliked by the rich, the military, and the Right Wing.
     Like the play EVITA, the film opens in 1952 with the announcement
of the death of Eva Peron.  The film then tells in flashback the life
story of Eva, supposedly related by Che (Antonio Banderas).  Che is
every bit as omnipresent here as he was in the musical, but in Alan
Parker's film version he is no longer a research chemist developing an
insecticide, he is now just sort of a one-man voice of public opinion.
(This creates something of a problem with the lyrics of some of the
songs.  They have images of images of dying insects that now seem to
come out of nowhere.)  Eva is the illegitimate daughter of a prosperous
middle class man. Her life is forged in bitterness by her father's
other family refusing to acknowledge her existence or letting her
attend her own father's funeral.  Her being forcibly ejected from the
church is the film's most powerful scene.  At age fifteen, still filled
with venom, she sleeps with popular singer visiting her village.
Seeing this as an opportunity she attaches herself like a lamprey to
the singer forcing him to take her to Buenos Aires. In spite of bad
treatment, she works her way up a human ladder of men, trading her way
up until she allies herself to the powerful and politically ambitious
Colonel Juan Peron (Jonathan Pryce).  Juan unexpectedly finds himself
caught between Eva on one side and the Army and the wealthy of
Argentina on the other.  It is a moot point which side has a greater
loathing of the other.  But "Little Eva" brings with her an
overwhelming payload of political support from the Descamisados--the
poor, "shirtless" workers and Juan rides their support to the
Presidency--a very stormy trip.
     Madonna Louise Ciccone has not had a very distinguished acting
career up to this point but finally seems cast perfectly in a role.
Madonna not only resembles Eva Person, both have notoriety for a
somewhat salacious background.  The biggest drawback to casting Madonna
in the role is that she is 38--five years older than Eva Peron was even
at her death--and the days are long past when Madonna could reasonably
play the fifteen-year-old Eva.  Antonio Banderas is transformed from
chemist into a sort of narrator and Greek chorus and that causes some
problems with his character.  It is not clear what his point of view
means or if it is even consistent.  When Che was envisioned as a real
human, he could change his mind about Eva without it being a story
problem.  But can a narrator or a chorus change his mind in the course
of a story?  It is not usually done.  Ironically the Banderas character
has far more lines than does the much more literal character of Pryce.
Through much of the film Pryce has only to look good.  I was surprised
when Pryce speaks toward the middle of the film and I realized that we
have not heard his voice in quite a while.
     EVITA looks like a very expensive production and Parker has used
his budget very cleverly in some cases to make a film that looks
extremely extravagant.  In some cases it appears he had a whole scene
setup with a crowd on the screen only for the length of one line of a
song.  In fact there are some clever reuses of settings which may or
may not be disguised to offset the cost.  Part of the spectacle was
made possible undoubtedly only because of the comparative low cost of
filming in Argentina and Hungary.  The two sets of scenes flow together
seamlessly.  We get to see some impressively-scaled political rallies
or major street riots. Camerawork is by Darius Khondji who previously
filmed DELICATESSEN, SE7EN, and the amazing CITY OF LOST CHILDREN.  His
camera is at its most impressive in the long-shots.  Too often on the
close-ups are plagued by bad synchronization between the singing and
the lip movements.  Some images go by often too quickly to be
completely understood, including what looks like a sort of surrealistic
ballroom dance on the occasion of the death of Eva.  Webber's and Tim
Rice's play gives us only a superficial view of Peronist politics, but
then one does not expect an operetta to have the historical content of
a GETTYSBURG.  We never really see much of Eva Peron's politics beyond
her allying herself to the Descamisados and avenging herself against
the middle classes.  Andrew Lloyd Webber apparently could not resist
the opportunity to write one new song eligible for the Academy Award
race.  That song is "You Must Love Me," and it you want to hear it you
must listen carefully.  It is such a bland and lackluster piece of
music it can slip right by the viewer unnoticed.  It sounds more like a
bridging piece of music than a song of the caliber of "Don't Cry For
Me, Argentina."
     As a history film, EVITA is limited by the perfunctory musical
script on which it is based, but the look of the film is dazzling.  I
rate the film a high +2 the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Hitcher, The (1986)
[Editor's note: Sites running 2.10 netnews will munge headers of articles in
moderated  groups *not* named mod.something.  If you get my name instead of
Mark Leeper's in the "From:" line, please encourage your S.A. and your feed's
S.A. to upgrade to 2.11.  Thank you.  And now, on to our review... -ecl]
          Capsule review:  Boring actioner about a psychotic
     hitchhiker whom the scriptwriter makes unkillable.
     Contrived, unbelievable, and ultimately dull thriller is one
     more film to waste Rutger Hauer.
     You want a thriller with lots of mindless action, no logic, and a bunch
of fractional-dimensional characters.  Cable this month is running what
passes for entertainment in some quarters.  The film is THE HITCHER and as a
friend of mine would say, it sucks pond water.  Actually I think this one
could turn back a raging river.
     Our main character--I don't think we ever get his name so I will call
him Poor Schnook--is a teenager driving a car from Chicago to San Diego by
way of nearly empty Texas roads.  Schnook picks up a psychotic killer played
by Rutger Hauer, who adds one more implacable killer to his list of roles.
Hauer had better start being more selective in his roles or he will lose the
aura he had from SOLDIER OF ORANGE and BLADERUNNER.  From the point he gets
picked up, Hauer does everything right.  He is always in just the right
place at the right instant.  It is not long before the police think Poor
Schnook is the killer and these are not your ordinary police.  They have
intelligence roughly equivalent to protozoa.  In a scene we see only the
aftermath of, Hauer has wiped out an entire police station with apparently
no more than a knife.  In one carefully choreographed scene, with one bullet
Hauer knocks out one police helicopter and two police cars whose occupants
somehow missed seeing the slowly dropping helicopter fall.  The more
destruction there is, the more the police want to kill Poor Schnook and the
less interested they are in hearing his claims that someone else is
responsible.
     The plot of the innocent bystander who gets in over his head is
standard thriller stuff and can be well done.  The innocent bystander
against the villain who does everything right is an old one.  In a sense THE
HITCHER has the same basic (very basic) plot as NORTH BY NORTHWEST but
instead of the characters and the wit, THE HITCHER gives us just more
mindless action scenes.  Perhaps part of the reason audiences are getting
more unruly is that in a film like NORTH BY NORTHWEST you want to hear what
the characters are saying, while in a film like THE HITCHER it is much less
important.  And one car engine sounds a lot like another.  Rate this one a
-2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Dead Poets Society (1989)
          Capsule review:  Robin Williams plays an unorthodox and
     charismatic teacher branded as dangerous in what is basically
     a retelling of THE PRIME OF MISS JEAN BRODIE told
     sympathetically to the teacher.  Fundamentally good, but it
     has some problems with its narrative style.  Rating: high +1.
     There are lots and lots of films about schools but very few films
really about the teaching process and the influence of a teacher on
students.  Perhaps the best is Ronald Neame's 1969 film THE PRIME OF MISS
JEAN BRODIE, which managed to tighten up the narrative of the Muriel Spark
novel (one of the rare occasions a film adaptation improves greatly on the
novel, incidentally).  Neame's film tells the story of a teacher who
broadens her students' world but at the same time molds them into her own
likeness.  Having myself been greatly influenced by a very charismatic high
school teacher who I think greatly affected my world view, I find THE PRIME
OF MISS JEAN BRODIE hits very close to home for me, though because I liked
this teacher a lot I sometimes try also to see the film from a point of view
sympathetic to Miss Brodie.  What does the story become then?  It becomes
something very much like Peter Weir's new film, DEAD POETS SOCIETY.
     The year is 1959.  The setting is Welton Academy, a very posh and
expensive prep school dedicated to bleaching any sort of non-conformity out
of its students and programming them to be successful, if unimaginative,
social leaders.  The new English teacher is one John Keating, played with as
much control and and reserve as Robin Williams could possibly put into a
performance.  But even Williams's most reserved character could never fit in
as a teacher at a place like Welton.  His Keating uses unorthodox efforts to
get his students to feel the emotion of the they read, and he gets them to
live lives that will allow them to feel their own emotions and the emotions
of the great poets.  Keating's class is a good show, but we know from the
beginning it is a show that will not outlast the season.  As in GOOD
MORNING, VIETNAM, which had a very similar story line: we admire the non-
conformist, but we know he will not be around for long.  DEAD POETS SOCIETY
is his story and the story of his students while he is there.  In
particular, it is the story of a group of friends who form the Dead Poets
Society and sneak out to the woods after hours in order to read poetry and
discuss life.
     And it is in the film's depiction of these meetings that Weir's film
lets us down the most.  We hear a little poetry and we see the lives
changing, but the connection between the two is never clearly drawn.  What
poems are influential and why--a very major question of the film--is never
really explained.  We never really see why the meetings transcend being bull
sessions that have occasional poetry readings.  The real value of these
meetings, so central to the film, is never clear.  Similarly, we are told
one of the members has written a very controversial article for the school
newspaper but we are given only the vaguest idea of what the article said.
And because the exact influence the teacher and the poetry has had on the
students is left as vague as it is, when the film starts following the lives
of the students outside of school hours it rapidly loses interest for me.  I
found myself not really caring whether one of the students would or would
not work up the courage to kiss his current heartthrob.  I found myself just
looking at the nice, misty, snowy photography, and waiting for something of
interest to happen.
     Another problem with the script is that, while Keating is clearly
played for sympathy, he is not entirely such an ideal teacher. Early on he
has his students cut an article on poetry analysis out of their textbooks
and destroy it before they had read more than the first paragraph.  And the
enthusiasm that he can get from his students for this sort of an action
reinforces his similarities to the dangerous Miss Brodie and other dictators
in history who have been more dangerous.  One final complaint: in 1959 the
sort of regimentation that the film complains about may have been a problem.
If anything this country's schools have the opposite problem of insufficient
discipline today.  Weir is preaching to the choir.
     This review has concentrated mostly on the negative aspects of a
basically good film.  Enough reviewers will be telling about the film's good
points.  I was concerned that these flaws might be less likely to be
mentioned.  In a field of films about drugs, car chases, and plastic
monsters, DEAD POETS SOCIETY is a good choice, albeit flawed.  I rate it a
high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Unstrung Heroes (1995)
     It is a lesson we tend to see a lot in the media.  Road Runner
cartoons tell us that technology does not work.  In STAR TREK we learn
that being logical like Spock can be useful but, it is better to be
emotional.  Data teaches us that being human is the ultimate to whicha
machine can aspire.  LITTLE MAN TATE, directed by Jodie Foster, showed
us that child prodigies turn into twisted monsters who concoct
experiments involving "lasers, sulphuric acid, and butterflies."  Now
another actress-turned-director, Diane Keaton, tells us a story of how
in the face of family tragedy, two uncles, even ones with obvious
mental problems, who are emotional are more comforting than a genius
father who insists on being strictly rational.
     In 1962 Steven Lidz (played by Nathan Watt) is the twelve-year-old
product of a loving but strange family.  His father, Sid (John
Turturro), is an inventor and an eccentric genius constantly involving
the children in fanciful creations that never seem to work out.  The
kids at school claim that Steven's father is an alien from another
planet, an idea that Selma Lidz (Andie MacDowell), Steven's mother,
does not completely discount.  But Sid and Selma are so much in love
that Selma overlooks the outright weirdness of her husband.  She is not
quite so willing to overlook the eccentricities of Sid's two very
strange brothers, Danny (Michael Richards) and Arthur (Maury Chaykin).
One is a super-paranoid; the other is just an adult with the mind of a
child.  In day-to-day family life Sid's cold, atheistic rationality is
made bearable for the children by Selma's warm, loving care and
attention.  But when Selma becomes sick and cannot provide that warmth,
the stress of the household becomes too much for young Steven and he
runs away to live with uncles Danny and Arthur.  There he discovers his
uncles were stranger than he ever realized, but also finds them
lovable.
     Just why the craziness of the uncles is so wonderful or why it
transforms Steven is never explained.  And that is an important
weakness of the film.  The anti-rationality of the film would be onlya
minor irritation, but for the film failing to make a case for its side
yet still smugly declaring victory.
     The acting is really not bad, particularly in the performances of
Turturro and Richards as brothers.  And while both performances seem a
little exaggerated, Keaton does manage to suggest common threads in the
two brothers' manias.  Curiously, the male roles are better drawn and
acted than the one major female role.  MacDowell's character is just a
bit too wonderful in a mistaken attempt to make her sickness a little
more tragic.
     But the big mistake of the film is to make so clear that contact
with the crazy uncles was terrific for young Steven without giving the
viewer much reason to understand why it was so good.  Without filling
in that blank the film has no chance to resonate.  The only conclusion
the viewer can draw is that rationality is a cold dead end.  And that
is a theme we see all too often already.  I give this one a high 0 on
the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Big Easy, The (1987)
     Things are happening pretty fast in The Big Easy--that's the town you
and I know as New Orleans.  The Big Easy is called that because things go
pretty slow and easy down there, at least most of the time.  But just now
the police are investigating a gang war that is anything but easy.  Some
hoods--"wise guys," they're called--are getting killed in some pretty nasty
ways.  The police, including Remy McSwain (played by Dennis Quaid), are
investigating.  But the police are themselves being investigated.  The
Assistant District Attorney, Anne Osborne (played by Ellen Barkin), is in
there looking for signs of police corruption.  Now Remy comes from a family
of policeman and they are all good guys, but, like other policemen, they do
take advantage of certain privileges they get for being policemen.  And
that's the kind of thing that Osborne want to know more about.
     THE BIG EASY has three stars: Quaid, Barkin, and New Orleans.  ANGEL
HEART made New Orleans seem a little sinister; THE BIG EASY shows you a
friendlier, happier New Orleans.  With all the slap-happy fun down at the
Police Department, you wonder how anyone ever gets anything done fighting
crime.  Everyone is just a good old boy who loves Cajun music, 'gators, and
Tabasco Sauce.  It is a charming picture whether or not it is true.
     Quiad is likable as McSwain, though his Cajun accent seems a little
forced and varies in intensity from scene to scene.  The odd thing is that
the plot seems fresh and original until the last ten minutes or so.  Then
suddenly things start looking like just about every other police film of the
last five years.  And that is a shame, since that last impression is the one
that stays with you.  THE BIG EASY is good as a travelogue and at least
passable as a police story and as an object lesson in honesty.  Rate the
film a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Monsoon Wedding (2001)
    CAPSULE: The Verma family is having a wedding and all the 
    relatives will come for the multi-day festivities.  Mira 
    Nair's film is pleasant enough with a little human drama, a 
    few family secrets, some sadness and some happiness.  You 
    have seen it all before, but perhaps not from India.  The 
    photography is colorful and the music is very agreeable.  
    Rating: 7 (0 to 10), low +2 (-4 to +4)
Mira Nair previously directed SALAAM BOMBAY and MISSISSIPPI 
MASALA.  Her newest film, written by Sabrina Dhawan, is very 
similar to previous films like BETSY'S WEDDING but it is set in 
New Delhi.  A wealthy family is having a wedding.  An Indian 
wedding is a multi-day affair as much a family reunion as a 
nuptial.  Even more than in the US, it is an excuse for a lavish 
and extravagant family get-together.  The film shows us what the 
family does together and at the same time follows several family 
members' individual story lines.  Aditi Verma is marrying Hemant, 
an Indian engineer working in the US.  She had previously had a 
relationship with Vikram, her supervisor.  Latit, her father 
(played by Naseeruddin Shah), is juggling many problems, not the 
least of which is worrying about the caterer has hired PK Dubey.  
Dubey is a rather eccentric man with a taste for eating the 
marigolds he uses for decoration.  Even Dubey will soon be 
romantically entangled when he becomes interested in Alice, one of 
the family servants.  Several family members arrive giving rise to 
several plotlines involving sex, family secrets, or both.  There 
are heartbreaks and there are people falling in love.  Some of the 
subjects covered are probably near taboo for Indian films.
Western audiences will appreciate a look at unfamiliar Indian 
customs like women painting their hands with henna.  On the other 
hand it was not clear (to me at least) if scenes like the family 
singing together are typical of Indian culture or if they are a 
convention of Indian musical films.  This seems a particularly 
Westernized family with the father wearing American designer 
sweaters and the family speaking mostly English.  The latter will, 
however, help with an international release.
Sabrina Dhawan's screenplay is vibrant with witty dialog.  We have 
seen films with plotting very much like this, but the Indian 
setting makes a great deal of difference.  Director Mira Nair 
calls the film an affirmation of life.  I rate it a 7 on the 0 to 
10 scale and a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Kissing Jessica Stein (2001)
    CAPSULE: The plot is familiar but the writing is usually 
    fresh, funny, and at times moving.  Why can't Jessica find 
    a nice guy?  Is it because she is seeing a nice, and smart, 
    girl?  Heather Juergensen and Jennifer Westfeldt wrote and 
    star in the film based on their own play chronicling the ups 
    and downs of a straight woman who meets the bisexual 
    Ms. Right.  Rating: 6 (0 to 10), +1 (-4 to +4)
This is in many ways a fairly prosaic romantic comedy made only 
slightly less familiar by involving a straight woman who falls 
into a lesbian relationship.  Many of the touches and certainly 
most of the plot twists are things we have seen before.  Jessica 
Stein (played by Jennifer Westfeldt) is a self-assured, successful 
young woman in the New York publishing trade.  The one hole in her 
lifestyle is her dysfunctional love life.  Jessica is having a 
really hard time meeting the right man.  Her mother (Tovah 
Feldshuh) is hoping she will meet the right Jewish guy.  She goes 
from dating one man to the next and they are all losers in one way 
or another and generally not Jessica's intellectual equal.  Then 
she reads a personals ad quoting Rainer Maria Rilke.  Whoever 
placed this ad clearly has a brain.  Unfortunately it is a woman 
seeking another woman, not at all what Jessica has in mind.  Just 
curious to meet the woman who would place such an ad Jessica 
agrees to meet Helen Cooper (Heather Juergensen) with predictable 
results.
The screenplay is written by the two lead actresses based on their 
play "Lipschtick."  As new writers they bring some fresh new 
writing to the film but for the rest they rely on cliche we have 
seen too frequently before.  To show the losers that Jessica has 
been dating they have a montage of dates' faces, each saying 
something stupid.  I saw that for the first time in SHE'S GOTTA 
HAVE IT, but certainly not the last time.  Men in small roles in 
the film are frequently stupid and the contemporary equivalents of 
Stepin Fetchit.  On the other hand an office friend, Hannah Levine 
(not listed in any credits I can find) adds some real life to the 
film.  She seems to be a graduate of the Thelma Ritter School of 
Acting.  Frequently the writing is fresh as when Jessica is naive 
about the mechanics of lesbian sex and Helen has to explain it.
Charles Herman-Wurmfeld directs.  This is not an outstanding film, 
but certainly parts of it work very well.  I rate it a 6 on the 0 
to 10 scale and a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Leaving Las Vegas (1995)
     LEAVING LAS VEGAS is about people on the margins of society.  That
has been done before in films like BARFLY, but it perhaps has never
been done as well as in this film.
     Ben Sanderson (Nicholas Cage) has gone from being a film executive
who drinks too much to a drunk who cannot do anything for a living or
even to save his own life.  Alcohol has replaced his wife, his son, and
now his job.  So he has decided to treat his alcoholism as a fatal
disease, has literally burned the remnant of his previous life behind
him, and has gone to Las Vegas to die in a spree of drinking and
possibly some high living.  Almost immediately on arriving he runs into
(almost literally) prostitute Sera (Elisabeth Shue).  When he sees her
again he hires her but chooses to just talk, telling her his plan to
drink himself to death.  Seeing that he needs care and desperately
needing someone to care about she strikes up a relationship,
overlooking his indifference.  The one ground rule they set is that
neither will try to reform the other.  In a year with many films about
relationships, this is one of the most unique.  At times they relate as
lovers, friends, mother and child, prostitute and pimp, nurse and dying
patient.  Rare is the film where we see so many aspects of a
relationship, or so many different sorts of love.  Why Sera is even
interested in the heartache of falling in love with a man committing
slow-motion suicide is the enigma at the heart of this film.
     Stylistically the film is well-handled although perhaps a bit
slow-paced for some viewers, though those viewers would be unlikely to
come to this film in any case.  One false style move is to have Sera's
character developed by having her open her heart to her analyst.  It is
becoming too easy and too much a cliche to have people in disreputable
professions able to open up only to their analysts like the prostitute
in KLUTE and the hired killer in DIARY OF A HIT MAN.  One indulgence
director Mike Figgis allows himself is cameo roles with familiar
people.  It is something of a tribute to this film but also a
distraction that people like Bob Rafelson and Lou Rawls would agree to
do cameos.  Julian Sand also is present in a small role as Sera's
bizarre Latvian pimp.
     This is a film that does not pull its punches about the lives of
either prostitutes or terminal alcoholics.  The dialogue is often
raunchy and watching Cage's character deteriorate is not an uplifting
experience.  This is an adult film both in the usual sense and for the
fact it is aimed at a thinking, mature audience.  I put off seeing it
for a long time because this is just not the kind of film I generally
want to see.  In spite of that I was impressed sufficiently that it
will inevitably be on my top ten of the year list, probably high.  I
give it a low +3 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Scent of a Woman (1992)
     Curiously, SCENT OF A WOMAN is a film of a man's journey from childhood
to adulthood.  Charlie Simms (played by Chris O'Donnell) goes to a very
upper-class private prep school where the nicest kids are super-snobs and
most others are worse.  Charlie has two problems over Thanksgiving weekend.
In the days just before Thanksgiving he saw some students setting up a prank
that went very wrong.  Now the administration is using both a big carrot and
a big stick to pry out what Charlie knows.  His other problem is Lt. Colonel
Frank Slade (played by Al Pacino).  Charlie has been hired to care for Slade
over the weekend.  Slade is very much like the Jack Nicholson character in A
FEW GOOD MEN, but now a blind alcoholic who hates the world.  What makes the
story curious is that it is Slade who must make the journey to adulthood.
Charlie learns a different lesson, that of seizing opportunity.
     Charlie's job is just simple baby-sitting, but Slade has other ideas.
He drags Charlie to New York City on a mission of Slade's own planning.  As
you could predict, the two men who start by hating each other have
adventures together and learn to respect and admire each other.  Their
togetherness is just what each turns out to need, to nobody's surprise.
     Much has been said about how good Pacino's acting is in SCENT OF A
WOMAN, but in fact he seems to overpower every sentence he speaks.  Like his
character, he forces himself to be the center of attention in every scene
where he appears.  If Chris O'Donnell is remembered for the film, it is for
the scenes where Pacino did not appear.  Incidentally, this film also
exploits the myth that blind people seem to develop their other senses to
super-human levels.  Pacino's Slade can judge the quality of a salute
without actually seeing it.  He also can identify the perfume and even the
soap a woman uses, hence the title of the film.  Bo Goldman's screenplay has
good dialogue but ultimately falls into the not uncommon cinematic irony of
pulling all the familiar strings and pushing all the familiar buttons to
tell the audience not to let themselves be manipulated nor should they
manipulate others.  I give this SCENT OF A WOMAN high +1 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for For the Boys (1991)
          Capsule review:  James Caan and Bette Midler as a USO
     touring comedy team.  For forty-nine years they are America's
     sweethearts on-stage and constantly battling off-stage.  This
     is mostly because he has the values of his time and she has
     the values of our time.  Sobby, sentimental, and
     melodramatic.  Rating: high -1 (-4 to +4).
     Bette Midler originally built her career on being outrageous and
running counter to the culture.  These days she seems more interested in
making soft sentimental films such as BEACHES and her current FOR THE BOYS-
-what at one time were called "women's pictures."  In a sense, that is just
like Dixie Leonard, the character she plays in FOR THE BOYS.  As we see
Dixie over a forty-nine-year interval, she is at first outrageous as an
entertainer, then slowly the world catches up and Dixie has been co-opted
into the mainstream.  In fact, from World War II to the present Dixie never
fails to have and stand up for the values of a woman of the late 1980s.
     Dixie is half of the musical comedy team of Eddie Sparks and Dixie
Leonard.  Sparks and Leonard are an amalgam of several real-life people,
most notably Bob Hope with his penchant for USO tours and becoming a symbol
of support for America's military policy.  There is also something of
Lucille Ball and Desi Arnaz in them as they are considered to be "America's
Sweethearts."  There is a problem with this, however.  Dixie is quick-witted
and sharp-tongued.  In the 1950s the ideal of womanhood presented by the
media was domestic and not all that bright.  (Right now the only notable
pre-1960s exception that comes to mind is Myrna Loy as Nora Charles.)  Eddie
Sparks (played by James Caan) always represents the values of the mainstream
of his time, whatever time that is.  Not too unexpectedly, the two are in
constant conflict with hot war when they are off-stage and cold war when
they are on-stage.  Sparks, however, is outclassed by this woman with a much
quicker mind for gags and who is happy to mix dirty jokes into her patter.
     Structured somewhat like SAME TIME, NEXT YEAR, this film shows us Eddie
and Dixie only at Christmas time, usually during a war and on a USO tour.
We do see them during the Red scare, with Eddie naturally enough bowing to
sponsor pressure to rid the staff of a "controversial" writer and Dixie,
just as naturally, standing up for right and truth.  Eddie always acts from
cowardice or self-interest; Dixie never fails to stand up for some ideal or
other.  And just to be sure the audience sides with Dixie--as if the deck
were not badly enough stacked as it is--Dixie has a likable, outgoing manner
and Eddie is given by Caan all the personality of a starched white shirt.
     The script of FOR THE BOYS leaves no emotional button unpushed.  The
great tragedies in Dixie's life are telegraphed for in advance.  Most of the
story is told as a flashback to an all-style-no-substance network career man
who is so inspired by Dixie's nobility that he is reformed on the spot.  And
if you cannot figure out the conclusion of the film in the first few
minutes, you really are not trying.  Dixie's attitudes are not the only
anachronisms.  In December of 1942 Dixie makes a pun on "Peenemunde."  Even
military intelligence probably did not know about Peenemunde's importance
for another eight months.  (It is a German island that was the development
and launch site for the V-1 and V-2.)
     In some respects the film is not so bad.  It functions very nicely as a
core sample of popular music from 1942 to the present.  Music from each of
the settings punctuates the film.  Special note should be made of the
makeup.  Both Caan and Midler age before our eyes and the transitions are
smooth and believable.  The makeup artist pulled no punches and Midler does
not age well.  My first reaction on seeing the makeup-aged Midler was not
that it did not look right; it was, "My gosh, look how old she's gotten!"
It is rare one can get that natural reaction from ageing makeup.
     But music and makeup do not save this film from being an overlong and
self-congratulatory swipe at the values of the past by the present.  I rate
this film a high -1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Lost World, The (1992)
     Arthur Conan Doyle's novel THE LOST WORLD was only fourteen years
old when it was first adapted to film in 1925, yet the silent version
remains the definitive version.  The story concerns an expedition to a
high South American plateau isolated and insulated from the effects of
evolution, where vicious prehistoric ape-men live together with live
dinosaurs.  Considering the subject matter--the dinosaurs, the ape-men,
the action and adventure--one would think that in the seventy years
since then it would have had much better adaptations, but sadly, with
all its faults, the 1925 film remains the only reasonably faithful
adaptation.  The 1960 version had little respect for the original story
and in addition for dinosaurs it used lizards that were a long way from
resembling the real thing.  I had heard that there was a Canadian
version made, but could not find out much about it until it showed up
in my local video store.
     The film was made in 1992 together with RETURN TO THE LOST WORLD,
a film with the same director and cast.  The director is Timothy Bond
who had directed, in Canada, a chilling 1976 TV-movie, DEADLY HARVEST.
That film depicted in frightening detail the results of a famine coming
to Canada.  The intervening sixteen years must not have been good for
Bond's directorial style.  The realistic style of that film is just
what is missing from his new THE LOST WORLD.
     The film actually starts fairly well with reporter Edward Malone
(played by Eric McCormack) looking for a dangerous assignment and being
sent to interview the obstreperous Dr. George Edward Challenger (John
Rhys-Davies).  Sequences here are taken directly from the book and
raise hopes for a faithful adaptation.  Things start going wrong when
the script moves the lost plateau from South America to Central Africa.
This was done, no doubt, because the filmmakers got a better deal
shooting in Zimbabwe than they could have gotten shooting on the
Amazon.  The story then replaces Doyle's game-hunting Lord John Roxton
with conservationist suffragette and wildlife photographer, Jenny
Nielson (Tamara Gorski) and a thirteen-year-old cub reporter Jim
(Darren Peter Mercer).  Doyle's version of Professor Challenger would
absolutely not abide a woman or a child on the expedition, but someone
felt the film needed kid-identification value as well as a female
role-model.  In this version Challenger is impressed by the plucky
proto-feminist.  In fact, just about everybody turns out to be
wonderful in this version.  Challenger turns out to be wonderful, his
bitter competitor Summerlee turns out to be wonderful.  The wildlife of
Africa is wonderful.  The Africans the expedition runs into are
wonderful.  The rubbery dinosaurs are wonderful.  (Well, the herbivores
are and the carnivores never pose much of a threat.)  The ape-men on
the plateau would never think of throwing their enemies over the sides
of the plateau the way Doyle had envisioned them.  They aren't really
ape-men either, but enlightened primitives who just need to be
understood.  There is one nasty villain in the film--you'll know him
right away because he isn't pretty like the other people.  He's a white
(albeit Hispanic) male, of course.  You can tell just by looking at him
that he is a villain.  It is amazing that this film can be as faithful
to the plot of the novel as it is and at the same time be so lacking in
the novel's dramatic tension.  The story has the right shape, but every
sharp edge has been rounded off and sanded down.
     The effects work is spotty.  A carnivore head at one point is
actually fairly good, but a baby pterodactyl that shows up more often
is horribly cutsey and looks like something out of a cartoon.  At least
the 1960 version never got your hopes up that it would be a good film.
It is bad from the first scene.  The fact that the 1992 film really
does have a few good moments only makes the film more frustrating.  I
rate this version a low 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Mosura (1996)
     I was in Tokyo in October of 1996 and found myself walking by the
offices of the Toho Corporation.  I was delighted to see a two-foot-
high sculpture of Gojira (whom we gringos call Godzilla).  Who else but
Toho would erect a statue to commemorate a movie monster?  However,
Gojira (and kaiju films in general) have done well for Toho.  ("Kaiju"
is Japanese for "monster" and kaiju films are their own genre in
Japan.)
     Continuing my walk, nearby I saw a beautiful poster for the
upcoming film MOSURA.  Aficionados will recall that Gojira II is now
dead and Gojira III is just getting his first set of fins and his
earliest puffs of breath are already powerful enough to fry doughnuts.
So while he grows to full-size we are getting a hiatus on Gojira films
and Toho is returning to its second favorite monster, the good-guy
monster Mosura (a.k.a. Mothra).  The poster showed a giant Mosura
behind the Earth against a background of space.  I would have loved to
get a copy of that poster and even more I wanted to see the film, but
I knew I had to be patient.  It took a few years for the film to be
released on DVD and videocassette.  It is now available and not at all
what I or probably anyone else expected from Toho.  It is a
frequently-charming fantasy aimed at younger children.  Unfortunately
it has a plot that even adults might have trouble following.
     While Gojira has been a creature belonging to the realm of science
fiction, the Toho people have always seemed to imply that Mosura
belongs to worlds of magic and fantasy.  She never seemed like a
prehistoric animal and she is controlled by two fairy-like women.  But
the fantasy element of Mosura was never explored as it is with this new
MOSURA.  While science fiction and fantasy seem to sit uneasily with
each other, it should be remembered that it is not unusual for American
films to mix the science-fictional Frankenstein monster with the purely
supernatural Dracula and the Wolf Man.
     The story is about two young children, Tykee and his younger
sister Wakaba.  Their father is important in a company logging a
Japanese forest and incidentally displacing many innocent, dewy-eyed
animals.  In the course of clearing the forest they find a rock shrine
which fans will recognize as being in the shape of the circular symbol
for Mosura.  They remove a small medallion embedded in the stone,
unwittingly opening a passage to a fairyland beneath.  The father gives
the medallion to Wakaba, unaware that an evil fairy Belvera, riding a
squirrel-sized flying dragon, will reclaim it and use it to release
DesGhidorah.  DesGhidorah is a somewhat cuter version of Toho monster
Ghidorah.  Sixty-five million years ago, DesGhidorah came from space
and killed off the dinosaurs by sucking the life from the planet Earth.
Belvera releases DesGhidorah from the Earth to repeat his misdeeds.
     Defending Earth we have two good fairies Moll and Lara.  They have
the power to call on the Mosuras.  Mosuras are giant moths bigger than
airliners and the caterpillars that grow into them.  There is also a
small Mosura only a foot across.  Most of these creatures have appeared
in previous Toho films but, perhaps to play well with a younger
audience, they have been softened here.  Mosura is much more plush and
cuddly looking than she has ever looked in the past.  DesGhidorah's
faces (did I mention that DesGhidorah has three heads?) are rounded and
shortened to look less frightening than Ghidorah of previous films.
Even the music is softened from the usual brassy marches.  This film's
score is inspired more than usual by John Williams and less by John
Philip Sousa.
     One wonders how this story fits in with other kaiju films from
Toho.  Why does nobody recognize Mosura from previous bouts with the
Japan Defense Forces?  Does nobody notice that DesGhidorah looks a lot
like Ghidorah?  Similarly, a problem particularly of late in Toho films
is their propensity to have just about anything happen without an
explanation.  If Mosura is to have a new power you just see Mosura
using it without benefit of logic or explanation.  If a new kind of
creature is to be introduced, it is just there.  Suddenly there are
tiny Mosuras around.  The problem is that if anything can happen, there
is much less interest value in the story.  Even fantasy needs some
rules.
     Mosura is in some ways a poor choice for a hero monster.  Gojira
expresses emotions--even Radon (Rodan) expresses emotion.  Mosura has
two eyes like bicycle reflector disks and a mouth like the business end
of an alligator clip.  This makes the giant moth forever enigmatic.
She is even more so for being a moth.  The real face of Mosura is that
of her soul-mate.  Her soul-mate is has been a single creature with two
bodies.  These are the two tiny "Cosmos" or "Peanuts."  Two fairies
that dress identically, sing and even speak in unison, and are
indistinguishable from each other.  They have a mystical control over
Mosura never explained.  In the new Mosura the Cosmos are two fairies
who for the first time look different, dress differently, and one,
Moll, dominates the other Lora, they still sing in unison, however, and
with three songs they seem to sing entirely too much.
     There are really two reasons to see MOSURA.  You may be genuine
fan of kaiju films with or without Gojira.  Or you may want to see what
Toho can do with color and with form when they are at their best.  In
either case you will find the unexpected in this film.  MOSURA is not
really a good film, but there are moments that are well worth seeing.
And the kids might like the rest of the film.  I give it a 5 on the 0
to 10 scale and a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     Incidentally, MOSURA is the first part of a trilogy of films.
Rumor has it that MOSURA 3 is this best of the trilogy, but it has yet
to be released in this country.  MOSURA 2 is available.  The plot has
Belvera again trying to destroy the Earth by releasing a rather
uninteresting monster from ancient Mu.  Visually it has fewer scenes of
striking beauty.  There are a few, but not many.  The best scene is an
ancient fortress rising from the sea.  But overall MOSURA 2 is a
disappointment after the few enough virtues of MOSURA.  Again the
monster is a symbol of what happens when you do not take care of
nature.  Mosura is a giant Mother Nature.  There are again lots of
things happening without explanation so there is no reason ever to fear
for Mosura.  The writers will always invent some reason why Mosura will
survive and win.  The film is a definite step down from MOSURA.

Title
Review for eXistenZ (1999)
     While there is much in "eXistenZ" that harkens back to VIDEODROME,
the film is new and fresh.  It is a big night for Antenna Research, a
leading virtual-reality game company.  They are ready to start the
last round of tests for their new reality-bending game eXistenZ.  They
do not want to say what makes eXistenZ so different,  but it is a
distinct step beyond other virtual reality games that also tap directly
into the nervous system through jacks in the base of the spine.
eXistenZ is something of a breakthrough.  It is so new that the demo of
eXistenZ will be done by the inventor of eXistenZ, the queen of game
designers Allegra Geller (Jennifer Jason Leigh).  But something is
wrong.  The competition has gotten an agent into the crowd and he
nearly assassinates Geller with a strange handgun made of living
matter.  Ted Pikul (Jude Law), who is providing security, takes Allegra
to safety at a local motel.  But Allegra has to test her eXistenZ
gamepod, containing the only complete version of the game.  (It is
worth in the tens of millions of dollars and she keeps the only copy in
her pocket.  Right.)  That means she needs a playing partner.  But Ted
does not have the jack at the base of his spine and is less than
anxious to get one.  Luckily there is a local gas station attendant
(deliciously played by Willem Defoe) who installs jacks as a sideline.
And for Ted a strange new world is about to open.
     David Cronenberg makes some of the most bizarre films of any
popular filmmaker. What is remarkable is that the more his films get
strange the more he crosses over to a mainstream audience.  It was not
enough that he had the weird alien medical instruments that he had in
DEAD RINGERS, here he takes things a step further and makes all the
machinery of the games, the game pods and the connecting cables, out of
organic material.  One does not so much flip a switch as massage and
caress it.  Connections are not made by cables but by umbilical cords.
Cronenberg comes dangerously close to alienating his viewer by
disgusting him.  But ingeniously he keeps the tone just light and
freakily witty enough that the viewer happily goes along for the ride.
But the wit is never so over the top to turn the "eXistenZ" into a
farce.  When I saw the film the audience seemed to be enjoying the film
immensely.  Cronenberg's problems are not with his audience but with
his financial backers.  Reportedly the major studios that could have
financed "eXistenZ" found the plot to be "too non-linear."  They were
absolutely right that as the plot goes skin-diving through layers of
reality things do get a bit complex, but that is much of the fun of the
film.  The non-linearity works for the film, not against it.
     Early in her career I found Jennifer Jason Leigh's roles to be an
irritating combination of ingenue and counter-culture.  She was sort of
the Homecoming Queen with a gun from Julie Brown's song.  But as her
collection of offbeat characters increases I am beginning to appreciate
what an accomplished character actress she has become.  Here she gives
a well-balanced performance that is generally perfect for the
Cronenberg material.  Jude Law of GATTACA and MIDNIGHT IN THE GARDEN OF
GOOD AND EVIL plays the understandably bewildered protagonist pulled
into the worlds of reality switching and being implanted with strange
impulses.  Along for the ride are Ian Holm with a thick accent.  Also
present is Don McKellar, the actor who seems to be as ubiquitous in
Canadian film these days as Denholm Elliot was at one time in British
film.
     "eXistenZ" is nearly as complex as the current THE MATRIX, but it
has real characters and a plot involving three-dimensional people with
motivations rather than with martial arts skills.  For the right
audience the film is a kick.  I rate the film an 8 on the 0 to 10 scale
and a high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Deceivers, The (1988)
          Capsule review:  Fun swashbuckler about a fascinating
     historical incident.  Pierce Brosnan goes undercover in India
     in 1825 to investigate the Cult of Kali that murdered
     millions of people in ritual killings.  Merchant/Ivory (A
     ROOM WITH A VIEW) effectively remake the good STRANGLERS OF
     BOMBAY and do it better.  Rating: +3.
     We have seen quite a number of films about the British in India, films
like GANDHI, A PASSAGE TO INDIA, THE FAR PAVILIONS, and JEWEL IN THE CROWN.
These films have had absolutely nothing positive to say about the British.
As often as not it is the British themselves who are British-bashing over
India.  That is all well and good--most people agree that Britain's rule was
pretty bad--but the question is, was it so unmitigatedly bad?  Was there
nothing worthwhile that Britain did?  I have asked this question of a number
of Indians in this country and have gotten two different answers.  One
answer was that British rule WAS entirely exploitation.  The other answer
was that the British did two things for India.  The two things were that
they built railroads and that they suppressed the Cult of the Black Mother.
Most people understand the concept of railroads.  What was the Cult of the
Black Mother?  Well, that is the subject of a new film from the Anglo-Indian
production company Merchant/Ivory, makers of films such as SHAKESPEARE
WALLAH, A ROOM WITH A VIEW, and MAURICE.
     First of all, do not trust my opinion on this film.  I am a big fan of
an old film made by Hammer Films called STRANGLERS OF BOMBAY.  Not that I
trust its historical accuracy but it is a great horror film/swashbuckler.
THE DECEIVERS is a virtual remake on a bigger budget.  It has more action
and more thrills and as one can expect from Merchant/Ivory, it is better
acted and scripted.  It is a film I wanted to see made.  But for one silly
deus ex machina scene near the end, it has just the perfect feel for this
sort of film, a sort of film that has not been made for several years.
     The Cult of the Black Mother, also known as the Cult of Kali--whose
initiates were called Thuggees (from which we get the word "thug") or
Deceivers--was a secret society of adherents to a religion that believed
their goddess wanted them to murder.  They would pretend to be pilgrims and
humbly travel with parties they would meet on the road.  In the dark of
night, at a given signal, they would whip out cloths and strangle their
entire host's party so fast that their victims would never know anything was
awry until they felt themselves being strangled.  (Incidentally, I was not a
fan of INDIANA JONES AND THE TEMPLE OF DOOM, but I still claim it did not
slander Indians.  It had as its villains disciples of Kali and I would
contend that, like Nazis, they are pretty much unslanderable.)  The film
claims the Thuggee cult murdered two million Indians and that may well be a
low figure.  Travelers would just disappear and nobody would know why, so
any statistics are just vague guesses.  In addition, when a husband
disappeared very often the wife would often commit ritual suicide to join
her husband.  The fate of the children might well be in question and there
could well be more deaths.  Murdering two million people directly could
indirectly cause the death of many, many more.  Surprisingly little has been
written about this relatively small cult whose toll in human misery is a
significant fraction of that caused by the Third Reich.
     Well, that is mostly background.  What is the film itself about?
William Savage (played by Pierce Brosnan) is the tax collector of a region
in which a woman wishes to commit a suicide of suttee, a ritual in which a
widow joins her husband.  Savage takes part in a ruse to dissuade the
woman's suicide only to happen upon the scene of a Thuggee killing.
Investigating the mass murder he has witnessed, he discovers just how big a
conspiracy it is a part of.  Risking his career, he disguises himself as an
Indian and joins a local band.  The not very descriptive titles THE
DECEIVERS conceals a thumping good adventure yarn that is enjoyable and
which is fairly consistent with what (admittedly little) I know about the
Cult of the Black Mother.
     Hey, I had fun with this film.  I like films that show me some Asian
culture.  I like a good film, particularly in the tradition of the
swashbucklers.  I will give it a +3 on the -4 to +4 scale.  But get someone
else's opinion.

Title
Review for Vanya on 42nd Street (1994)
     This is a play within a play, though there is little in the outer
play to do much but to explain why the classic Russian play is being
done in modern dress and with virtually no set design.  A group of
actors get together in an old theater to perform Anton Chekhov's "Uncle
Vanya" for a tiny audience.  The film starts with a few external shots
of the streets around the theater, perhaps to get some motion and
action into the otherwise static film.  Once the play begins, it is
performed on one set which it leaves only for a minute or so at
intermission.  Even that would not matter as much for some playwrights,
but Chekhov wrote for a different culture, and audiences used to fast-
paced action plays by the likes of William Shakespeare may find the
style here a bit off-putting.  Chekhov is wont to have actors get their
turn in the conversation at speaking and not give up the floor for a
good five minutes.  The dialogue for this version was written by David
Mamet.  Mamet himself is used to giving characters short and choppy
dialogue, as he did in OLEANNA, and letting the actors speak for so
long may have been a bit of a strain on him.
     In the inner play Serybryakov (George Gaynes) is an incompetent
and talentless academic, successful without ever really understanding
his own supposed field of expertise.  His entire household sacrificed
to support him in his career, doing all the little low-profile clerical
tasks so that he could spend his time teaching and writing about art
that he did not really understand.  Now he has retired and spends his
days in writing about nothing at all and rudely demanding obeisance and
care from his household.  His beautiful second wife Yelena (Julianne
Moore) and Sonya his homely daughter from his first marriage (Brooke
Smith) tend to his whims.  Also tending is Vanya (Wallace Shawn), the
cynical and embittered brother of the professor's first wife.  Yelena
is lovelessly loyal to Serybryakov but is aware of the wistful,
unrequited love of her by both Vanya and Dr. Astrov (Larry Pine), the
physician who comes to the estate to treat the old professor.  In the
meantime, Sonya has fallen for Dr. Astrov.  With faster pacing these
tangled loves might have led to melodrama.  Instead it is preparation
for entanglement to come.
     Wallace Shawn, like Woody Allen, has one of those faces that is
hard to take seriously.  To some extent that acts as a hindrance to him
in this film, but less so than in many other dramatic roles.  But it is
part of the character Vanya's dilemma that he is not considered and
taken seriously.  Vanya is really something of a non-entity in his own
household and putting a man with a comical face in the role cuts a
little from the drama but also adds additional meaning to the story.
Julianne Moore, who plays Yelena looks like Jane Curtin and sounds like
Diane Keaton.  The former does not hurt all that much, but her
performance reminds one too much of Keaton in LOVE AND DEATH, which
makes a burlesque of just the sort of drama that Chekhov wrote.
     Somehow the technical credits show surprising unevenness.  Declan
Quinn's camera work is more irritation than art.  He frames scenes
badly, at times slicing off part of an actor's face.  Other times all
the action will be on one side of the frame while the rest of the frame
seems wasted.  During some speeches the camera seems distractingly
unsteady as if it is being hand-held.  All of this may have been
intentional, but if so the reason was not apparent.  Continuity is
poorly maintained.  At one point a character plays solitaire and when
seen from different angles there are different cards on the table.
Again there filmmaker may be saying that it is what is being spoken
that is important and not details like care for continuity.  It could
be a stylistic touch like e.e.cummings writing in lower case, but iF sO
iT dID nOT cONVEY aNY sPECIAL mEANING.  For that matter, if this is
supposed to be a stage play with no technical embellishments we are
seeing, we need some explanation as to why we can hear Yelena's
thoughts without her lips moving.
     There is little in this film that one could not get from seeing a
more traditional performance of the Chekhov play.  What is good the
film owes to Chekhov.  Because the play is good, the film gets a low +2
on the -4 to +4 scale.  But a more traditional performance with the
same actors would have gotten a higher rating.

Title
Review for House of the Spirits, The (1993)

Title
Review for L.A. Story (1991)
     In STARDUST MEMORIES, the aliens tell Woody Allen, "We like your films,
especially the 'earlier, funnier' ones."  It is a running gag.  Everybody in
STARDUST MEMORIES likes Allen's "earlier, funnier" films.  Actually, even
outside of STARDUST MEMORIES, people seem to prefer Allen's earlier style,
but Allen does not want to go back to it.  That makes it fair game for other
filmmakers.  With L. A. STORY, Steve Martin is filling that void, picking up
the earl Allen style.  We have a film with a slight plot which is really
mostly an excuse to tie together small skits, jokes, and sight gags about
life in Los Angeles.  Martin, who scripted, is every bit as loving of his
Los Angeles, in spite of its faults, as Woody Allen is of New York City (and
speaking as someone living in the New York area, with just as much reason).
     Martin plays Harris Telemacher who in spite of his Ph.D. is a sort of
television clown weather man.  He breaks up with his mistress who is selfish
and uninteresting and begins dating a 23-year-old nymphette, but he really
wants to win a British journalist (played by Victoria Tennant) who is in
town to write an elitist, snobby, put-down article about Los Angeles.
Unfortunately, she finds both the town and its goofy weather man entirely
charming, each in spite of its little quirks.  But Harris has problems
deciding what he really wants romantically and going for it.  Then from the
most unexpected source, a mystical force takes control of Harris's life and
pushes it in the right direction.  While the style is archeo-Allen, the plot
is really neo-Allen and there is more than a little similarity between the
plot of L. A. STORY and a film like PLAY IT AGAIN, SAM or even the current
ALICE.
     But L. A. STORY's attraction is not so much plot as sidebar humor.
Martin takes affectionate swipes at traffic congestion, earthquakes, the
superficiality of the people, crime, and a lot more.  Here and there Martin
swipes a scene from some well-known source.  Knowing some very basic French
and Spanish will be of some assistance too.
     Steve Martin deserves additional credit for letting someone else, Mick
Johnson, direct L. A. STORY.  All too often when the star of a film writes
the screenplay, he feels he should direct also.  Many good actors have a
very hard time directing themselves, though they do not realize how hard a
time they had until the film is released.  Gene Wilder is one actor who
cannot direct himself, for example.  By letting someone else direct, Martin
can concentrate on his performance.  And his performance is fine in this
slight but funny comedy.  I rate it a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Home for the Holidays (1995)
     Most romantic comedies are about strong, emotionally secure people
finding each other.  A WHILE YOU WERE SLEEPING or a PLAY IT AGAIN SAM
may be about someone superficially shy, but you will rarely see a
character have serious problems holding his/her life together.
Divorcee Claudia Larson (played by Holly Hunter) is to that point.  She
has lost a job she loved and her sixteen-year-old daughter has confided
that this Thanksgiving weekend she is ready to have sex with her boy
friend.  Claudia is also catching cold and though she hates planes she
has to fly from Chicago home to Baltimore.  Claudia has lost control of
her life just when she has to go through the annual trial of
Thanksgiving dinner with her eccentric family.  Holly Hunter usually
plays self-assured women and her performance makes the freshly written
and acted early part of the film the high point.  However, as the film
starts focusing on more characters and as Claudia finds her way back to
peace of mind, the film loses its creative bite.  Instead it finds its
way to the easy route of a well-worn romantic comedy.
     The Larson family is a study in contrasts and odd personalities.
Mother Adele (Anne Bancroft) is cold and needling and tries to be
always in control.  Father Henry (Charles Durning) is a late-in-life
romantic finding odd moments to dance with his wife and play the organ,
but has lost the capacity to be serious.  Brother Tommy (Robert Downey,
Jr.)  is a consummate but often obnoxious clown.  His pranks are
amusing for a short time, then start to grate on the characters and the
audience.  Tommy is gay and has brought a bemused friend (Dylan
McDermott) to the party.  Sister Joanne (Cynthia Stevenson) is an
upwardly mobile yuppie striving for a starchy respectability.  Aunt
Gladys (a skeletal Geraldine Chaplin) is getting a little strange in
several ways at once.  They will come together, clown around with each
other, get on each other's nerves, and make some painful admissions to
each other.  The contact will strengthen some relationships and show up
weaknesses in others.
     Jodie Foster's LITTLE MAN TATE was a heavy-handed and misplaced
argument against the fostering of intellect in children.  HOME FOR THE
HOLIDAYS's study in relationships works considerably better while that
study is really what it wants to be.  It falters only toward the end
trying to force a happy ending.  Even the chaotic Thanksgiving dinner,
the showpiece of the film, manages to show more humanity than farce.
Richter's script, based on a short story by Chris Radant, goes a little
overboard in some of its characterizations, especially those of Tommy
and Adele, and the dialogue is interesting, but not always believable.
Nor is it really believable that this family lets so much hang out ata
family get-together.

Title
Review for Frantic (1988)
      Richard Walker (played by Harrison Ford) is in Paris for a medical
 convention.  He banters with his wife on the way to the hotel, checks in,
 and takes a shower.  When he comes out of the shower his wife seems to have
 stepped out.  Room service brings in an ordered breakfast and Walker eats
 it and takes a nap.  When he wakes up, still no wife.  He goes to the lobby
 to look for her.  One by one, he checks out possibilities of what could
 have happened to her.  Soon his worst fears are confirmed.  He learns that
 she has been kidnapped.  The police are surly; the American authorities can
 do nothing.  Walker has to take matters into his own hands.  This is not
 too original a plot and, in truth, much of FRANTIC has a ring of
 familiarity.  In some ways it follows the classic style of a Hitchcock
 thriller.  The one-word title, the innocent bystander hero, a genuine
 McGuffin, even rooftop struggles.  Where it strays from being Hitchcockian
 is in its nearly humorless approach and its cold-fish hero.  Harrison Ford
 is nowhere near a personable one as a Cary Grant or a James Stewart.  That
 makes the acting a few steps closer to reality, but the viewer is left to
 guess what the character must be feeling rather than feeling with the
 character.  We are drawn to Harrison Ford, but at arm's length.  With
 Hitchcock and the right actor we would actually be living the adventure
 with the character.  On the other hand, with most Hitchcock films it would
 be easier to pick holes in the plot.  Even a VERTIGO has a plot that
 entirely hinges on a man recognizing a specific Spanish villa from a
 description from somebody's dream.  Following the initial events that set
 the action of FRANTIC in motion, events follow a suspenseful but logical
 course.  (The major unexplained point of the film is how an action that was
 not intended to be a kidnapping--and seemingly could easily have avoided
 being turned into one--was so botched.)
      Ford's search for his missing wife takes him to, if not Paris's
 underbelly, at least somewhere below Paris's waist.  His best clue leads
 him to Michelle, a sinuous drugged punker played by Emmanuelle Seigner, who
 provides a somewhat less innocent bystander to the plot and provides the
 attractive female lead required in any Roman-Polanski-directed film.  As a
 cliche-buster, however, Walker reacts with total disinterest to Michelle's
 attempts at seduction.  First, last, and always, he is in this to get back
 his wife (played by Betty Buckley, who played a sympathetic teacher in
 CARRIE, a sympathetic mother in EIGHT IS ENOUGH, and an unsympathetic
 singer in TENDER MERCIES).
      FRANTIC is a surprisingly straightforward thriller from director and
 co-scripter Roman Polanski, who is usually known for for more convoluted
 and psychological storylines.  Rate it a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Big (1988)
     Every once in a while the Law of Averages works especially well or
poorly for filmmakers.  Columbia made MAROONED just before Apollo 13 and THE
CHINA SYNDROME just before Three-Mile Island.  On the other hand, three
different filmmakers independently decided to make the films PLACES IN THE
HEART, COUNTRY, and THE RIVER a few seasons back, all "save-the-farm" films.
Of late it has been "child-and-adult-changing-places" films.  In little more
than a year, we have seen LIKE FATHER, LIKE SON; VICE VERSA; and 18 AGAIN.
Now Tom Hanks joins the ranks of Dudley Moore, Judge Reinhold, and George
Burns, playing a younger person in an older person's body.
     Well, the first major difference is that this is not two people
changing places.  The story is not really two stories of people adapting to
sudden age change.  Instead we have a 13-year-old suddenly finding himself
about twice that age.  Josh Baldwin finds a mysterious wish-granting machine
at a carnival.  After this point the story gets more realistic and at the
same time less so.  Josh's own mother thinks the older version of him
(played by Tom Hanks) is a kidnapper and he has to flee, with the help of a
friend, to Manhattan.  He is a child who for the first time is seeing the
gritty real world without the protection of his parents.  Then the realism
dissolves as he enters the business world and finds his winning, boyish ways
open doors for him.  Previous versions of the idea have children in older
bodies trying to seem normal and failing miserably or at least humorously.
Hanks wears silly-looking clothing and acts like a kid and in some sort of
film blanc manner it all works out for him as if he was Chauncey Gardner
from BEING THERE.  His secret boyhood catapults him to success in business
and love in the toy business.  None of this is very believable.  And on top
of that, the ball of string that I collected as a boy may have had more
loose ends than BIG, but I doubt it.
     Supporting Hanks is Elizabeth Perkins, who played a second banana role
in ...ABOUT LAST NIGHT.  As the woman intrigued by the boyish Hanks, she
reminds one at times of Debra Winger and at other times of Jill Clayburgh.
Also on hand are the venerable Robert Loggia (whose second career in film
seems more successful than his first) and John Heard, who tarnishes some of
his earlier nice-guy roles playing an ambitious executive.  And who can
forget the grungy hotel clerk played by Rockets Redglare?  And the whole
production is directed by Penny Marshall--formerly of LAVERNE AND SHIRLEY.
I would say BIG is a step up from her first film, JUMPIN' JACK FLASH, but it
still gets just a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Murder in the First (1995)
     Back in the 1930s and 1940s Warner Brothers was known for its
crime and gangster films.  And while they were generally indictments of
Organized Crime, Warner Brothers also occasionally would make a film
such as I WAS A FUGITIVE FROM A CHAIN GANG criticizing the barbarities
of the system.  In that tradition and considerably stronger is MURDER
IN THE FIRST, also from Warner Brothers.  This is a fictionalized story
of an actual case history of petty thief Henri Young (played by Kevin
Bacon) sent to the maximum security Alcatraz Federal prison because
they had space and he had stolen $5 from a post office.  After an
escape attempt he is placed in solitary confinement in a nearly pitch
black underground cell for 38 months--19 days should be the maximum.
During the confinement he is tortured brutally and reduced to little
more than an animal.  He is abused by Associate Warden Glenn (Gary
Oldman) who takes the escape attempt as a personal affront.  Glenn's
sadistic torture and his diatribes are reminiscent of Amon Goeth in
SCHINDLER'S LIST,  Upon release from solitary, Young is manipulated
into murdering the only other prisoner survivor of their four-man
escape attempt.
     Young is assigned a Public Defender, a young lawyer who is given
the case only because it is absolutely hopeless.  James Stamphill
(Christian Slater) has in Young a client who was seen to commit the
crime by two hundred convicts and who refuses to talk to Stamphill or
even react to his presence.  And Stamphill is under strong pressure to
lose the case.  MURDER IN THE FIRST is a harrowing and powerful drama
set in a Kafkaesque world of omnipresent abuses of power and trust.
With the possible exception of the judge (R. Lee Ermey) just about
everybody in this film in a position of power abuses that power.
Bosses verbally abuse their employees, prison officials and guards
abuse and torture the inmates, trolley car conductors abuse their
customers, even family members exploit each other.  The script by Dan
Gordon has a strong anti-establishment message and a powerful noir-ish
tone.
     Top-billed Christian Slater does his best to hold on to the film
but he is still just Christian Slater in a 1940s business suit.  Slater
never conveys more than muted emotions at the best of times.  In this
film he is acting with Gary Oldman, the Robert Duvall of his
generation.  Oldman nearly always turns in a terrific performance, and
as the sadistic Glenn he is genuinely chilling.  Kevin Bacon is
generally not so impressive, but this is the best role of his career so
far.  Robbed of his soul by the cruelty of 38 months of unspeakable
tortures, harrowingly portrayed in the first half hour of the film, he
is little more than a wounded automaton.
     Director Marc Rocco has a style that verges on the
expressionistic.  He uses a very dark and bleak photography throughout
the film.  Nearly all of the scenes, particularly in and around
Alcatraz, are painted in grays, blues, and blacks to underscore the
somber noir-ish feel.  Rocco gets the downbeat feel he would have had
in black and white.  Or perhaps he gets it more so because the viewer
is aware that these depressing tones are in full color.  The only time
we see much color at the prison is a shot through some colorful weeds
up at the gray prison.  But even more noticeable than the artificial
color scheme is the use of the camera.  Fred Murphy's camera gives us
overhead shots, sideways shots, pan shots, dolly shots, track shots,
steadicam shots and a few shots there may not even be names for.
Initially it seemed to be showing Young's disorientation because of his
confinement in darkness, but the lively and active camera lasts through
the whole film.  In mock 1940s newsreels we are treated to hand-held
camera shots that I thought were not invented until decades later.
This and the pretentious usage of Christ images during Young's
suffering add a mild irritant of pretentiousness.
     This is a powerful message film at a time when most films'
strongest statement is political correctness.  MURDER IN THE FIRST gets
a high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Alice (1990)
     Woody Allen's work is getting spotty these days.  It was once true that
an Allen film could be depended on to be worth seeing.  He cannot be faulted
for a CRIMES AND MISDEMEANORS and at least HANNAH AND HER SISTERS was a
popular success, but every once in a while one of his films goes really
wrong.  It is hard to imagine Allen thought he could make anything great out
of the material in A MIDSUMMER SEX COMEDY.  It was surprising the film was
at all watchable.  But BROADWAY DANNY ROSE left one feeling more could have
been done with the material.  And that feeling is a lot stronger with ALICE.
This is a film that has an intriguing concept and a terrific cast, yet ends
up as dry and uninteresting as its title.
     The title character is played by Mia Farrow.  Farrow's performances are
an acquired taste, but to the best of my knowledge Woody Allen is the only
one who has ever acquired it.  Alice is the air-headed wife of a very
successful executive when she is given magical means to examine her life,
the lives of her friends, and her relationship with her family.  What she
discovers is that she does not like her husband, for good reason.  She does
like her sister, with whom she has had a difficult relationship.  She sort
of likes a man to whom she has been attracted (played by Joe Mantegna).
Eventually her life comes together in a hokey and stereotyped way.
     And how does she get the means to examine her life?  She has back pain
and goes to a mysterious doctor in Chinatown (played by Keye Luke, who
incidentally died of a stroke on January 12).  Dr. Yang treats her with
opium and magic herbs that give her the power to see ghosts or become
invisible or change her personality.  In spite of the fact that Yang is
benevolent, this is all Fu Manchu stuff, and Allen should be ashamed to
write it into a film.
     There are, of course, a few good lines in the script to remind us that
Allen could be writing good comedy if that was what he wanted to do.  It is
hard to find a good role for Bernadette Peters, but she does have a very
good comic scene in this film.  And a single scene is all that many of the
name actors got in this effort.  Cameo actors include Gwen Verdon, Cybill
Shepherd, Julie Kavner, Patrick O'Neal, and Bob Balaban.  Alec Baldwin has a
small role as a ghost who is usually seen in shadows.  And there are a lot
of shadows in this dark film--dark in color and often in tone.  I rate this
one a disappointing low 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Bombay (1995)
[Administrivia: I am back; thanks to Alan Wexelblat for handling the
moderation chores while I was on vacation.  -Evelyn Leeper]
     The vast majority of Indian films are weak exploitation films
intended to entertain mass audiences, and rare is the film made for the
domestic Indian market that looks intelligently at a serious issue.
People in India usually do not go to the movie theater to be edified by
a film with serious meanings.  That is why a film like BOMBAY is so
unusual and is touring international film festivals.  It performs a
balancing act trying to please the entertainment audiences and at the
same time trying to be an indictment of the violence of the 1993
religious riots in Bombay.  Trying to do both, it is not altogether
successful at either.  There are nightmarish depictions of the riots
that presumably will bother the entertainment-oriented audience.
Still, in the examination of its real issues it betrays itself twice,
first in putting the serious themes so late in the film and then in
treating those themes overly simplistically.  To an American audience
it will seem that BOMBAY mixes 1990s violence with a simplified view of
the issues of racial intolerance much like the United States might have
had in the 1950s.  It does not look very deeply at the causes of the
religious differences for fear of appearing to take sides.  Instead, it
limits its message to saying simply that violence is wrong and whatever
the religious differences they are, rioting is not the way to resolve
them.  That is an important statement but not all that profound.
Effectively India has discovered the politically correct film.  One of
the film's reviewers called this India's SCHINDLER'S LIST.  The
comparison applies only if comparing BOMBAY to other Indian films.
     Our story starts like a classic "Romeo and Juliet" plot.  Young
Hindu boy Shekhar Misra (played by Aruind Swami) loves Muslim girl
Shaila Banu (Manisha Koirala).  He knows his family will never approve-
--his father does not like even Northern Hindus, much less Moslems--but
he goes ahead and courts her.  When his family objects too strongly he
flees to Bombay and sends for Banu.  Bombay initially represents the
anonymity and tolerance of a cosmopolitan city.  However, their love
has already caused a feud between the two families and it continues in
their absence.  While the plot takes a comic turn of the newlyweds
unable to find privacy to be together in Bombay, the reluctant
fathers-in-law escalate a feud.  This is all done with a light touch,
but soon the theme of intolerance will be handled more shockingly.  The
city of Bombay is about to be torn apart by riots, and the film will
get a good deal more serious.
     Western critics discussing BOMBAY find it odd that a light comedy
turns into an angry political indictment.  The original film was
probably an even stranger combination.  The version we are seeing is
reportedly cut down from a version in which there were also the
traditional love songs mixed in.  There are some light musical
interludes in what is being shown but not the popular songs that were
probably in the original.  It might be a mistake to attribute the
combination to the originality of writer and director Mani Ratnam.  It
is much more a convention of Indian domestic films that all films are
musicals and comedies.  As an example, KHAL-NAAIKAA, a remake of the
American horror film THE HAND THAT ROCKS THE CRADLE, was very close to
the original except for the seemingly incongruous injection of comedy
and musical sequences into the story.  But in spite of this, what does
come through is often moving, though at times not as subtle as a
Western viewer might like.  At times the action stops as a character
make speeches for tolerance.  But what other critics are finding fresh
and original is, in fact, a cultural difference and almost inevitable
in Indian domestic films.  Incidentally, I noted the credit included a
dance director in spite of the fact that there was no real dance in the
version we saw.
     The camera work for BOMBAY is a little showy.  Several simple
effects are used including slow-motion, scenes rushing past the camera,
and strobe effects as well as subjective hand-held camera shots.
     Also, the film might have been a bit better with a screen or two
at the beginning explaining the basis of the conflict and the name ofa
political group referenced in the film.  This would serve a double
purpose.  It would not only help foreign audiences understand the
conflict, it would also bind the film together by promising that there
will be serious political material coming up.  There certainly was some
question why, for example, the Moslems in the film are so opposed to a
particular temple to Ram being built.  While most of what goes on
becomes clear from context, most Western viewers could do with a few
notes.
     While the basic subject matter is contrived, this is certainly the
best Indian domestic film in years.  Rate it a low +2 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Keeping the Faith (2000)
     It is not easy to write a film about a romantic triangle and not
cover territory that has been covered by countless other romantic
triangle films like HIS GIRL FRIDAY and THE PHILADELPHIA STORY.  Stuart
Blumberg's script for KEEPING THE FAITH does it by filling in what
would be dull spaces with insight and comedy about Judaism and
Catholicism.  Two of the three main characters are clergymen wanting to
try unconventional approaches to make their services more enjoyable,
relevant, and in general more inviting.  Each has to buck an
establishment tied to more traditional approaches to religious
services.  The two men's presence pits the more conservative and
generally older members of their congregations against a younger
generation more open to newer ideas.  KEEPING THE FAITH can flit back
and forth from the main plotline to the religious subplots and never
get dull.  On the whole the film mixes two parts humor with one part
seriousness.  And one thing that sets this film apart from so many
other films is just that the jokes really are funny.  It is unusual
these days to find a writer who can be funny without sacrificing taste.
Perhaps there will be small numbers of Catholics and Jews that will be
uncomfortable with some of the "new approaches," but it is done in a
much more loving fashion than similar sorts of humor in last year's
DOGMA.
     Back in Junior High both Jake Schram and Brian Finn became fast
friends with cute and plucky Anna Reilly.  Sadly, after a year or so
Anna had to move away.  Jake and Brian both had ideas on how to make
their respective religions more fun and more relevant.  Jake (Ben
Stiller) became a rabbi and Brian (Edward Norton) becomes a priest.
Each tries to modernize his religion, sometimes with surprising and
unorthodox results.  Brian mixes services with stand-up comedy.  Jake
mixes new forms of music into the Jewish service.  Then comes the day
that Anna Reilly (Jenna Elfman) contacts Brian and tells him she is
returning to New York.  Anna, who has matured into a stunning beauty is
now a workaholic repairing businesses.  She is addicted to her cell
phone.  The story goes back and forth between the two men's religious
careers and their attraction to the woman both love, but who is
forbidden to each of them.  Jake is looking for a wife, but is only
willing to marry a Jew.  Brian is Anna's religion, but the vows of his
priesthood force him to remain celibate.  Like a Seinfeld episode, for
a long time nothing much happens but the characters discussing their
situation.  But Anna's attraction is too great to resist forever.  Each
of the men must gauge how deeply he feels about Anna and how deeply
about his religion.
     It was claimed that watching just Spencer Tracy listening was more
interesting than watching other actors speak.  That seems to have been
a lesson learned by Jenna Elfman.  If the name is familiar, she is
married to a nephew of film composer Danny Elfman.  Jenna Elfman never
just stands waiting for her next line.  She is inconstant motion and
reacts to every line spoken.  This is just the sort of actor other
actors hate to play opposite since she grabs the attention of most of
the audience, certainly most of the males.  Edward Norton demonstrated
in PRIMAL FEAR, AMERICAN HISTORY X, and THE FIGHT CLUB that he can do
some dynamic personalities.  But in KEEPING THE FAITH he comes off just
a bit bland.  Ben Stiller is more serious here than in films like
SOMETHING ABOUT MARY, but he carries the serious moments as well as the
comic ones.  In addition there are some veteran actors in smaller roles
including Anne Bancroft, Ron Rifkin, and Eli Wallach.  There is even a
small role for director Milos Forman.
     Anastos N. Michos gives us some moderately good photography of New
York and this film gives us a counter-example to the usual wisdom that
no good film ever starts with an overhead shot of New York.  One
quibble: one of the women Jake dates is a Jewish news commentator who
specializes in the Middle East and frequently is sent to Iraq and
Libya.  I do not believe that Jewish women get a lot of cooperation in
the Arabic countries in the Middle East.
     This is a film that beats a lot of odds to be an intelligent
romantic comedy that is constantly entertaining.  While the end seems a
little strained, it is better than one might expect.  I rate it a 7 on
the 0 to 10 scale and a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Fugitive, The (1993)
     In September 1967 Dr. Richard Kimble found his wife murdered my a one-
armed man who escaped.  Kimble was found guilty of the murder and sentenced
to die.  But as police Lt. Philip Gerard was taking him to prison, the train
they were riding in derailed and Kimble was able to escape.  For three years
Kimble tracked the one-armed man and Gerard tracked Kimble.  Or at least
that was the premise of the television series THE FUGITIVE. that starred
David Janssen and Barry Morse.  THE FUGITIVE is also the name of a fast-
paced new film very loosely based on the twenty-six-year-old television
series.  In fact, the film version owes as much or more to Alfred Hitchcock
thrillers such as THE 39 STEPS, THE SABOTEUR, and NORTH BY NORTHWEST as it
does to the old Quinn-Martin series.  That series, itself intended as a
variation on Victor Hugo's LES MISERABLES, had a leisurely pace which is
just not the style of this tight and tense 127-minutes film.  There is very
little of the "nice guy mixing in people's lives" premise of the television
series in the new film.  The series was light on the murder aspect and the
film has more motivation behind the murder than three years of the
television show had.
     At least superficially, the film has the same premise.  Dr. Richard
Kimble (played by Harrison Ford, apparently still a little befuddled from
the brain injury in REGARDING HENRY) comes home from surgery late one night
to find his wife dead and a one-armed man in his house.  Nobody is
particularly convinced by Kimble's story and he ends up headed for Death
Row.  On the way there is an attempted escape and a bus crash, and then a
train comes along and slams into the bus.  This spectacular chain of events
leaves wide open an opportunity to escape as well as the mouths and eyes of
the audience.  Called in on the case is U.S. Marshal Samuel Gerard
(substituting for police Lt. Philip Gerard, and played irascibly,
irreverently by Tommy Lee Jones).  And the chase has everything but the
laid-back style of the television series.  In the series Kimble would
typically befriend someone and after he saves their marriage , they would
help him escape.  In the film Gerard is much closer on the trail and the
escapes are much more physically challenging.
     I think Harrison Ford is miscast in this and many of his films.  He
plays characters who are very sharp but he always appears on the bland edge
of confusion.  Admittedly, he has a right to be as dazed as he appears,
after the events of the film, but at the same time he is supposedly making
clever deductions.  Tommy Lee Jones may be playing an honest cop--uh, sorry,
U.S. marshal--but he steals the film right from under Ford.  He really can
play with the mind of the viewer by saying just the right unexpected comment
at just the right moment.  And nearly as sarcastic is Joe Pantoliano as
Cosmo Renfro, assisting Gerard.  Pantoliano is a character actor who manages
to make small parts get noticed.  Sela Ward plays Kimble's wife and appears
to be the perfect reward for all the hard work of medical school.
     THE FUGITIVE is a terrific thriller that may stretch the credulity of
the audience at times, but leaves them well-entertained for better than two
hours.  I give it a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.
        ***HEAVY SPOILER*** ***HEAVY SPOILER*** ***HEAVY SPOILER***
     Here we have yet another mystery in which the solution does not quite
explain the mystery.  Apparently the drug company is involved with the plot
since they have lent security people to it.  It makes no sense that they
would do that without knowing the drug was faulty.  But a drug company is
not the same as General Motors.  It is *very* dependent on a good name
because the doctors who prescribe its products are a very cautious lot.  So
if you are a drug company, you might try to cover up the negligence of
letting a faulty drug get on the market, but you would be really cautious
about what has not yet been released.  Any possibility of scandal is very,
very strongly avoided.  At least, that is my understanding.  The story
holds together neither if you assume the drug company knew nor if you assume
it doesn't.

Title
Review for U Turn (1997)
     There is nothing superior about Superior, Arizona, an all but dead
town with a few people living in the carcass.  Small time hood Bobby
Cooper, played by Sean Penn, has engine trouble and must pull into
Superior to get his car fixed.  The one garage near town is run by a
desert rat of a mechanic (Billy Bob Thornton) who gives more trouble
than service.  Cooper leaves his car and goes into town and after a
bizarre interchange with a blind half-Indian beggar (a well-disguised
Jon Voight) he gets himself involved with attractive Grace McKenna
(Jennifer Lopez of SELENA).  Too late he finds she has a husband Jake
(Nick Nolte whose performance owes a lot to Bruce Dern).  Soon Jake and
Grace are each trying to embroil Cooper in a plot to kill the other.
If that were not enough of a problem there are people coming to town to
collect on a bad debt.  And to further complicate matters a local bully
wants to show how tough he is by beating up Cooper.  Cooper cannot
expect too much help from the town's unfriendly Sheriff Potter (Powers
Booth).  This seems to be a fly-speck town where everybody either has a
dark secret or is working full time on getting one, and too many of
these plots involve Cooper.  Most of the plot twists are telegraphed as
the film wends its way to a rather bloody and violent last reel.  But
by this point we do not care particularly what happens to Cooper who is
not particularly likable, even less smart, and who basically floats
like a cork and generally is acted upon rather than acting himself.
     In general this film is top-heavy with style touches that add to
uneven effect where less might have been considerably more.  John
Ridley's script based on his novel STRAY DOGS might have made a more
effective as a low-budget independent film with fewer self-indulgent
style experiments.  Oliver Stone has just a bit too much fun here
laughing a little too hard at exaggerated eccentrics for us to really
take the story seriously and the light-hearted score by Ennio Morricone
is a little too flippant.  Stone under-utilizes expensive actors where
unknowns might have worked a lot better.
     Since NATURAL BORN KILLERS weird camera effects have been a Stone
hallmark.  Even NIXON had to have a few weird visual effects and here
there are more than the story needs.  The film opens with Cooper
driving down a road under credits that look like they were scratched
into the film.  There are repeated images of vultures showing how
little sympathy this corner of Arizona has for the weak or unprepared.
Robert Richardson's cinematography experiments with film stocks as much
as it does with light.  He will drop into black and white and then jump
to a grainy super-saturation of color.  None of this does much to help
the mood of the film.
     U-TURN is one of those films in the middle ground.  Its flaws are
in large part ones we could overlook in a new filmmaker and still say
he is promising.  From a now major filmmaker like Oliver Stone, it
probably must be considered just a minor effort and perhaps a false
step.  I give it a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Matrix, The (1999)
     THE MATRIX is a tough film to review for many different reasons.
In the first place, what can one say about the basic concept without
revealing too much?  The entire premise of the film is something of a
surprise.  I will say that it is fair to say that things are not as
they seem at the beginning of the film, but saying anything more than
that about the premise could conceivably damage the viewer's enjoyment
of the film.  In this story the actuality is really very different from
being what it seems to be.  Philip K. Dick would have been right at
home in THE MATRIX with his frequent stories of reality being turned
inside out.  I believe there was an episode of the newer series of THE
TWILIGHT ZONE on this concept, but this is its first treatment in
detail in a feature-length film.
     Neo, the main character (played by Keanu Reaves), has this gut
feeling that there is something different that is going on beyond with
everybody seems to know.  It is something VERY different.  Neo wakes up
one morning with a phone call from the mysterious Trinity (Carrie
Anne-Moss) Trinity seems to be something like a hacker with what
frequently look like magical powers--powers like an ability jump
amazing distances.  Trinity takes her orders from someone even more
elusive and mysterious, the nearly omniscient super-hacker Morpheus
(Laurence Fishburne).  The government is trying to track down the
hackers Trinity and Morpheus, and sends to recruit Neo some agents who
look a lot like the title characters in MEN IN BLACK.  Neo is given the
choice of helping to capture Morpheus or of being enslaved by strange
forces.  Soon it is not clear to Neo what is real and what is in his
dreams.  But when he throws in his lot with Morpheus and Trinity,
things become even stranger.  And then they become a lot stranger
still.
     THE MATRIX is written and directed by brothers Andy and Larry
Wachowski who previously demonstrated that they could write and direct
a nice compact and tightly plotted thriller with BOUND.  There is,
sadly, little that is compact or tightly plotted about THE MATRIX.
This is a film just chock full of martial arts fights, shootouts, and
bomb explosions.  But the Wachowskis spend very little screen time
fleshing out their main characters or getting us to care too much what
happens to them.  We know they stand between the world and some really
nasty fate.  Presumably if they lose, the people in the audience lose
also.  But that is not the same thing as making us really care if these
people live or die. Keanu Reeves sees to be is a sort of stupor through
much of the film.  That is not unrealistic considering the
circumstances but it certainly kills his empathy value.  The characters
get themselves in and out of danger without ever creating dramatic
tension.
     Somehow in BOUND the Wachowski Brothers did a much better job of
getting the audience to identify with their primary characters.
Unfortunately, the two brothers were far more concerned about the look
of the film than about making the audience empathize with Trinity or
Neo or even Morpheus.  This film shows the main characters getting lots
of action, having lots of fights, but never giving us any reason to
care who wins and who loses those fights.
     The exquisite look of the film, frequently variations in visual
themes of blacks and reds, is created by cinematographer Bill Pope, who
previously filmed DARKMAN, ARMY OF DARKNESS, CLUELESS, and BOUND.
Perhaps part of Pope's inspiration was the noir-ish world of DARK CITY.
His photography nicely shows off the stunts and martial arts work of
Hong Kong director Wu-ping Yuen, here just a stunt coordinator and a
martial arts instructor. But all too often Yuen seems to be soaking up
screen time.  It seems a pity that this film has such an audacious
concept and ends up with so many fights that could have been taken from
any simple police procedural plot.  It is a little insulting to the
audience to present some of the more interesting ideas and then to
treat them on such a superficial level, almost as if the script did not
realize how good its own ideas were.  THE MATRIX could have done so
much more to engage the intellect and not simply a gut reaction.
     When there was so much potential for an intelligent story here the
Wachowski Brothers have opted to spend most of their screen time on
mindless action.  This is a good martial arts film and action film in a
world already overflowing with martial arts and action films.  It
should please the vast bulk of the audience who want to see it Friday
night, have a good time, and have forgotten about it by Saturday
morning.  Those who would want an intelligent and thoughtful piece of
science fiction will be more tantalized and frustrated than gratified.
I rate THE MATRIX a 6 on the 0 to 10 scale and a high +1 on the -4 to
+4 scale.

Title
Review for Tombstone (1993)
     So many films have been made about Wyatt Earp and the famous gunfight
at the O.K. Corral that it almost qualifies as its own subgenre of the
Western.  Films such as TOMBSTONE, THE TOWN TOO TOUGH TO DIE; MY DARLING
CLEMENTINE; GUNFIGHT AT THE O.K. CORRAL; HOUR OF THE GUN; and DOC have
reenacted the gunfight with little respect for the truth.  Almost none agree
on what happened and each is certainly correct that all the others got the
facts wrong.  It may come as a surprise to some that the Earps were no
paragons of virtue any more than the Clantons were and that there were no
crew members of the Starship Enterprise present.  In fact, this dirty little
gunfight lasted under three minutes and was no more dramatic nor much
different in character than gang gunfights that take place in the streets of
New York City frequently.  However, somehow this particular gunfight has
become legend and has been dramatized inaccurately many times.  One of the
problems that films have had is that the gunfight itself is most famous part
of the Earp-Clanton conflict, yet it happened toward the middle of the
proceedings, and it settled very little.  That makes it difficult to build a
film around.  Kevin Jarre has written a script that gets a lot of the facts
right, a lot of the facts wrong, and almost nearly accurately tells what
happened leading up to the gunfight.  Unfortunately, from there on it plays
even more fast and loose with even what is known happened after the
gunfight.  Or at least it gives way to legend, speculation, and to its own
outright fictionalizing.
     The early 1880s was a time of colorful gunfighters in Arizona.  This is
a story that involves some of the most famous.  The plot begins with Curly
Bill Brocius (Powers Booth) and his gang including Johnny Ringo (Michael
Biehn) shooting up a Mexican wedding.  At the same time three Earp Brothers
are settling down in Tombstone, Arizona to find peace.  Wyatt particularly
wants to live peacefully, so he waits until he is in town for at least ten
minutes before he starts making enemies.  One of the ways Wyatt makes
enemies is by renewing his friendship with Doc Holliday and thereby
inheriting Holliday's numerous enemies, but Wyatt was talented at making
enemies all by himself.  Wyatt also meets and falls for Josephine Marcus, a
free-thinking Jewish actress from San Francisco, stealing her from her
lover, the County Sheriff Johnny Behan.  Though under-stressed in the film,
this was also a cause of much of the trouble that was to come.
     Kurt Russell is only a moderate actor but under George Cosmatos'
direction he gives a reasonable and even understated performance as Wyatt.
That means he brings to the role less baggage than does Val Kilmer in the
somewhat more flamboyant role of Doc Holliday.  Holliday was sickly, but
Kilmer is a bit too close to death for a bit too much of this film.  Kilmer
starts being too hard to believe.  Dana Delany is less attractive than the
real Josephine Marcus, based on available photos, but she does exude a
charming spontaneity.  Powers Booth as Curly Bill Brocius and Michael Biehn
as the Latin-spouting Johnny Ringo are colorful but have little opportunity
to be engaging.  Charleton Heston and Harry Carey, Jr., are around as a tip
of the hat to classic Westerns, but neither has a very important role.
Perhaps for the same reason Robert Mitchum narrates the film.
     Moments of this film are genuinely exciting, though more because of
style than plot.  The opening has films of the old West, mixed with footage
of the original THE GREAT TRAIN ROBBERY, and a fake shot or two of Kurt
Russell as Earp, all in scratchy prints and on narrow screen.  Jumping from
that to wide screen and color is an impressive touch very similar to one at
the beginning of ROAD WARRIOR.  It will, however, lose that impact on video.
And the film does have a few dramatic scenes internally like the requisite
sunsets.  But it takes more than style to tell the story and in some ways
the storytelling is muddled.  At times perhaps it sacrifices dramatic effect
for accuracy.  For example, it has not concentrated on the Clantons and
McLaurys until the famous gunfight, so it is not clear why they are so
important as to merit the shoot-out when it comes.
     This is an entertaining retelling of the story, often with insight into
the principal participants.  Director Cosmatos only occasionally raises the
story to actual excitement.  Overall, I would give the film a high +1 on the
-4 to +4 scale.
FURTHER COMMENTS ON HISTORIC ACCURACY: (Some spoilers follow.)
     A great deal has been written about the event covered by this film and
while the Old West is not a particular interest of mine, I did do some
reading about this famous gunfight and about Wyatt Earp during and after a
recent trip to Arizona.  Similar interests served me well in reviewing the
recent GERONIMO: AN AMERICAN LEGEND.
     Jarre's script gets as much wrong as right in this story.  But still
that is a far better average than most films about Tombstone.  Wyatt is
shown to be a peaceful man who just wants to retire in Tombstone.  Sheriff
Behan does not even know he is coming.  In truth Earp played either side of
the law that suited his fancy.  He had been a horse thief, a bunco artist, a
card cheat, and worse.  At the time he went to Tombstone it is true that he
had recently basked in a reputation as a lawman.   Actually he was more a
sort of hired thug for the law in a number of cow towns, usually using his
fists more than guns.  But he had little respect for the law itself except
as a meal ticket and was occasionally thrown out of jobs for taking bribes.
The script is correct in that he had been in only one real gunfight before
the events of the story though many were to come.  The film has Wyatt making
the unlikely decision to settle in Tombstone and Sheriff Behan surprised
that he has come.  Actually Wyatt came to Tombstone invited by Behan.  He
came actually hoping to replace Behan as Sheriff, could not, and took the
job of deputy (not just before the gunfight as the film says).  If he could
not steal Behan's job he could and did steal Behan's lover, Ms. Marcus.
     Wyatt more or less abandoned his own common law wife, Mattie, who was
loyal and *not* a drug addict.  She, however, did have to become a
prostitute to support herself after being abandoned and committed suicide
shortly thereafter at the age of 30.  Incidentally, Wyatt himself was part
owner of several whorehouses, as were other members of the Earp family.
     The major historic failure of the film was that there was no mention of
the Wells Fargo stagecoach robbery that Earp accused the Clanton's of and
the Clanton's accused Doc Holliday of.  For that matter the importance of
the Clanton family was understated.  Brocius and Ringo were only loose
allies of the Clantons who were the Earp's main enemies.
     Holliday's lover is called Kate so I presume that she was intended to
be Big Nose Katie Elder.  Apparently they got a much more attractive woman
for the role than the actual person.  That is probably true for all the
women but Josephine Marcus, who was the one woman of the story who really
would still be attractive by today's standards.
     I have been in the Birdcage Theater, now a tourist museum, and they
obviously had a VERY accurate reproduction.  I doubt those scenes were shot
in the real theater, but the reproduction is so accurate it is difficult to
tell.  Similarly the Corral itself looked just about perfect.  This film had
as accurate a dramatization of the gunfight at the O.K. Corral as I
remember.  The dialog is taken from court testimony.  When I get the film on
video I will run it in slow motion and see if the action follows the court
testimony also.
     It is a little difficult to get hard facts on what happened after the
famous gunfight due to the prevalence of liars on each side of the conflict.
That is what makes legends, I suppose.  Many people believe that Johnny
Ringo committed suicide and that was what the court ruled, though there is
good evidence he was murdered.  (Wyatt, years later, claimed he had killed
Ringo, but Wyatt lied *a lot*.)
     So overall, the accuracy could have been *a lot* better and could have
been *a lot* worse.

Title
Review for To Die for (1995)
     The screen has had a lot of smart and beautiful but cold and
calculating women.  They lurk in films like DOUBLE INDEMNITY, PRETTY
POISON, and THE LAST SEDUCTION.  Gus Van Zant's TO DIE FOR suggests
that most of us in the TV generation can no longer detect smart and it
is enough just to be beautiful.  The film is in large part a portrait
of Suzanne Stone (played by Nicole Kidman), who is a breathtaking but
pompous and clueless woman with the personality of a spider.  The film
opens with the media swarming over a sensational, sex-related crime in
the aptly-named backwater town of Little Hope, New Hampshire.  In
scatter-shot scenes we see a montage of interviews with Suzanne, with
her sister-in-law, and one with her parents and in-laws all discussing
a combination crime and sex scandal.  Eventually we start seeing the
pieces of the story in flashback.  Suzanne, the beautiful daughter from
a WASPy family marries the cutest boy in town (Matt Dillon), the bar-
tending son of a restaurateur.  Both families had misgivings over the
marriage, but Larry is awestruck by the china-doll beauty and Suzanne
is hard to say no to.  When Suzanne gets a job as the weather girl at a
local cable station, she has visions of becoming another Barbara
Walters (whom she slyly puts down for being Jewish).  When Larry, her
husband, starts hinting that it is time to have children, Suzanne
decides she has married unwisely and begins planning how to correct the
situation, perhaps with the help of three scruffy, disaffected teens
she is interviewing for a documentary.
     Nicole Kidman has to play Suzanne Stone as a difficult combination
of stupid and savvy.  She spouts naive pop-philosophy and empty
aphorisms and yet is able to succeed at what she wants, mostly because
of her good looks.  I would hope it was a difficult combination for
Ms. Kidman to play.  Matt Dillon glides through his role as her
husband without much apparent effort.  Standing out considerably more
are Illeana Douglas and especially Dan Hedaya as Larry's sister and
father.  There are few actors who can express suppressed rage (and
occasionally unsuppressed rage) as well as Hedaya.  Also a particularly
good casting decision was to have Joaquin Phoenix, Casey Affleck, and
Alison Folland as the three not-too-bright teenagers.  All three, but
particularly Phoenix, look like real teenagers on the street rather
than actors, and that is a much needed effect to make the story work.
In fact, Phoenix and Folland prove to be actors more talented than one
might expect from their new-comer status.
     The telling of the story starts very strong and its jibes are both
on target and laugh-out-loud funny.  But the tone of the film subtly
alters during the course of the film and while the plot is tied up at
the end, the climax is just a bit quiet and under-powered for the rest
of the film.

Title
Review for Delicatessen (1991)
          Capsule review:  Weird and morbid comedy about life in
     some strange post-Holocaust future.  Cannibals and
     vegetarians battle in a world where the only meat available
     is from other people.  Meanwhile, life goes on in a strange
     apartment house over a delicatessen.  Offbeat is putting it
     mildly.  Rating: high +1 (-4 to +4).
     The time is the future, perhaps ten years after it all went bad.  The
sky is thick yellow fog.  Humans have two legs and frogs have four, but the
only other animals left alive have six or eight.  Legal tender is bags of
lentils or corn.  And something else has disappeared with the world we knew.
What is missing is something like sanity.  With so few animals around,
society has been broken into two classes, vegetarians and those who have
taken to heart the adage that one man's meat is another man's person, so to
speak.  The setting is an apartment house standing over one of the few
remaining delicatessens.  And only rarely does the delicatessen have meat.
In the apartment there are the long-term residents and the transients.  The
transients do not so much move out as disappear.  And as their luck would
have it, they always disappear just in time to miss one of the meat days at
the delicatessen.
     In the apartment building live a typical bunch of people.  There is the
supremely myopic cello player who has nearly given up on finding a husband.
There are two men who make those toy cylinders that when turned upside down
moo like a cow used to.  Then there is the nice woman who hears voices
telling her to commit suicide.  She tries to oblige in complex and creative
ways.  Fortunately or not, her Rube-Goldberg-like suicide mechanisms just
don't work.  Into this old neighborhood moves an ex-circus clown ear-marked
to be literally dead meat.  Somehow he evades the butcher's knife and falls
for the nearly blind cello player.
     With many a supremely gruesome twist and turn, this film is a logical
descendent of the British film THE BED-SITTING ROOM and the French LE
DERNIER COMBAT--two very strange slice-of-post-holocaust-life black
comedies.  And it perhaps is the most entertaining of the three.  Some of
its visual style is also reminiscent of BRAZIL.  the style is mostly short
gag scenes that eventually add up to a plot which in the final third is
somewhere between madcap and frenetic.  This is a film for particularly
morbid tastes in comedy.  I give it a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Screamers (1995)
     Most of Philip K.  Dick's science fiction deals with paranoia
about reality not being what it seems, or people who are not what they
seem, or just something sinister going on behind the curtain.  Films
that have been based on his writing include BLADE RUNNER, about
androids that look human, and TOTAL RECALL, about a reality that may be
coming off a tape.  Paranoia has its place in SCREAMERS also, though
more in later portions of the film.  The film is based on Dick's 1953
story "Second Variety."
     That original story was set on Earth in a disastrous war with
Russia, but to keep the story current the setting has been moved to the
planet Sirius 6B where the 2078 war is with the "New Economic Block."
The best American weapon is a "screamer," a small robot that attacks
from just under the surface of the ground.  It tunnels with lightning
speed, pops out of the ground, and with the same speed rabidly attacks
with whirling blades and deafening screams.  The Alliance soldiers,
most of whom are Americans, have special devices that prevent them from
being detected by the screamers.  The problem is that screamers have
themselves become intelligent and are creating new varieties of
screamer radically different from what came before them.  And they are
unaware that compatibility with the detection jammers were an important
part of their original design.  The new models attack anybody.
     The original story has been adapted by Dan O'Bannon (a creative
force behind ALIEN) and Miguel Tejada-Flores (writer of FRIGHT NIGHT,
PART II).  The problem with SCREAMERS is that the original story, while
obvious film fodder, just does not have a lot of ideas that have not
already been plundered for other films.  The Dick story itself borrows
much of its paranoia from stories like John Campbell's "Who Goes
There?" which has already been adapted twice to film.  Had SCREAMERS
been made in 1980 it would have achieved classic status.  But the
thrills offered by "Second Variety" are too little and too late--years
late.  Ironically, SCREAMERS will appeal mostly to people in widely
separate groups.  It will seem best to those open to science fiction
action films without much experience with them.  And it will appeal to
super die-hard Dick fans.  The range that stretches between including
most science fiction fans will find too little that is new or
interesting about the film.
     The director is Canadian Christian Duguay, who did most of his
filming on the snowy landscapes of Quebec and in the grungy sets that
are now so cliched for post-holocaust and futuristic stories.  Coming
out at the same time as the releases of CITY OF LOST CHILDREN and 12
MONKEYS only makes the sets look more impoverished than they normally
would.  The only really familiar actor is Peter Weller, who seems to be
majoring in playing stories about paranoia and general weirdness.
     SCREAMERS is a low-budget film that has a few expensive
explosions, but the matte artist simply does not seem to be able to do
convincing work.  This adaptation of Philip K. Dick's "Second Variety"
offers far too little variety from what has come before and comes in
second to far too many films.  Rate it a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.
Sources for Philip K. Dick's "Second Variety" include:
THE BEST OF PHILIP K. DICK edited by John Brunner
SPECTRUM 2 edited by Kingsley Amis and Robert Conquest
THE VARIABLE MAN by Philip K. Dick
THE YEARS BEST SCIENCE FICTION NOVELS: 1954 edited by Bleiler and Dikty

Title
Review for Tin Men (1987)
          Capsule review:  Chronicle of two aluminum-siding
     salesmen's personal and self-destructive feud is often very
     funny, sometimes serious, but always engrossing.  This is a
     well-made comedy-drama by the director of DINER and THE
     NATURAL.
     Barry Levinson is quite a good director with films to his name like
CATHOLICS, AND JUSTICE FOR ALL, DINER, and THE NATURAL.  His latest film,
which he wrote and directed, is TIN MEN, a new comedy from Touchstone Films,
who seem to be able to turn out a film really worth seeing every month or
so.  They still have OUTRAGEOUS FORTUNE playing in theaters, and they have
followed it up with TIN MEN, a much more serious comedy, perhaps even a
comedy-drama.  The film stars two members of the Touchstone repertory
company, Richard Dreyfus and Danny DeVito.
     TIN MEN is a study in childishness, selfishness, and mania.  BB
(Dreyfus) and Tilley (DeVito) are both tin men.  "Tin men" is slang for
aluminum-siding salesman, and like the origin of the name "tin men," these
men really have no heart.  As director Levinson shows the business (and he
should know--his father was a tin man) selling aluminum siding is sleazy
enough to make professional wrestling seem honest and forthright by
comparison.  BB and Tilley have a car accident, damaging each of their
Cadillacs, and before long they are totally consumed with the lust for
revenge.  At first the war is funny, sometimes very much so.  But soon it is
clear that neither man cares about who is hurt along the way any more than
either man cares who is hurt by their business ethics.  The government is
investigating and closing down salesmen with disreputable business practices
and the days of BB's and Tilley's flim-flamming customers are soon to come
to an end.  But their hatred of each other, because they are so similar,
seems to be the only thing on each tin man's mind.
     Levinson's ear for dialogue is superb.  Conversations he throws in are
often more interesting than the plot.  He has carefully re-created the
Baltimore of 1962, just as he did for DINER.  With TIN MEN he has created
two memorable if not likable characters and an entire world to put them in.
Rate this a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.  Not up to DINER or THE NATURAL, but a
quality film nonetheless.

Title
Review for Edward Scissorhands (1990)
     Tim Burton has been emblematic of what has been going wrong with
popular films since STAR WARS.  Burton has a very strong visual sense, but a
weak story-telling ability.  His BATMAN had a beautiful vision of a dark and
mordant Gotham City, but the story itself was weak and even then there were
gaps in the telling.  His earlier BEETLEJUICE had a less developed visual
sense but even worse story-telling.  One moment characters would find
themselves floating around the room or compelled to sing calypso, and a
moment later they would be apparently overlooking the incident like they
would a burp.  In both films (as well as PEE WEE'S BIG ADVENTURE) there are
nice scenes but they are just not well sewn together.
     My guess is that something very interesting happened with Burton's
EDWARD SCISSORHANDS.  Burton told his rather Oz-ian idea about a boy with
scissors for hands to one Caroline Thompson.  As she says, "The minute he
said to me, It was so resonant and so powerful and such a clear expression
of feelings that it just set the whole thing off.  The story is about not
being able to touch anything, about feeling that everything you touch turns
to tatters.  It's about being awkward."  Remarkably, that was the story she
was able to write and the chemistry between her story-telling ability and
Burton's visual sense make a film orders of magnitude better than anything
Burton has done without her.
     Aside from some creative play in the very first frames of the film, the
first remarkable thing about the story is the setting.  You have a John
Waters suburbia jammed together with a Jean Cocteau fairy tale castle.  On
the hill, everything is magic and unworldly, while the valley wallows in
20th century pop culture and bad taste.  One day the Avon Lady (played by
Diane Wiest) crosses the boundary and drives up the hill in the quest for
new customers.  There she finds the sad and lonely Edward Scissorhands, a
dough-cutting machine incompletely transformed into a real boy, by a kindly
old scientist-wizard.  The wizard is a sort of likable Rotwang played by
Burton's childhood idol Vincent Price.  Our Avon Lady brings this enchanted
creature to the less-than-enchanting suburbia where Edward (played,
incidentally, by rock singer Johnny Depp) attempts to adapt and apply his
talents to modern life.  Edward faces a public who has a thin veneer of
xenophilia over a deeper core of xenophobia.  Further complicating matters,
he must face his own sexual repression and stigma when attracted to Kim
(played by Winona Ryder), the pretty daughter of the Avon Lady.
     EDWARD SCISSORHANDS misses being a great fantasy--and I think it does
miss it only marginally--by spending too much time in the John Waters world
and complicating the plot with Edward having an unexplained power to unlock
doors and hence being used in an illegal plot by Kim's boyfriend Jim.  Jim
is played by Anthony Michael Hall, and the years have not been kind to poor
Anthony, I'm afraid.  They have robbed him of his teenage ungainliness and
left him a rather ordinary-looking adult with little screen chemistry.
     EDWARD SCISSORHANDS still needs a little of the fine-tuning that could
have made it a classic film of a tragic hero of the order of PHANTOM OF THE
OPERA.  But it works for many of the same reasons PHANTOM does, with its own
tragic hero suffering stigma and sexual repression.  I am told that Burton
likes to work over and over with the same actors--one reason why Michael
Keaton was Batman--and I hope he feels the same about screenwriters.  I want
to see more of what Burton and Thompson can do together.  I really doubted
that I would ever give any Burton film a high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.  But
Burton has finally found the magic.

Title
Review for Nuovo cinema Paradiso (1988)
     It is just after World War II in Giancaldo, a small town in Sicily.
Life is hard, troubles are large, and most pleasures are small.  One
pleasure is big, bigger than the richest man in town.  It is the big screen
down at the Cinema Paradiso.  The big screen tells big stories, stories of
tortured love, action stories, musicals with big production numbers.  And in
front of the big screen is a small boy, Toto.  To Toto there is school,
there is sleep, there is work, there is food, and there are movies.  The
first four are mundane and leave Toto in Giancaldo.  Movies are magical and
can take him any place in the world, from the houses of the rich to the Wild
West.  To Toto not just the stories are magical but the theater is also,
with its bright beam coming from a sculptured lion's mouth.  Toto has even
sneaked a look at the machine that makes the picture and at old Alfredo, the
irritable man who runs the machine that makes the movies.  For Toto to get
closer to the movies he will have to make friends with Alfredo and maybe
learn how Alfredo runs the projector.
     Thus begins a life-long friendship between young Salvatore--called
Toto--and Alfredo the poor projectionist.  And the friendship is built
around the love both have for the movies.  Set against the backdrop of the
Sicilian peasant village the story shows Salvatore himself become a
projectionist; we see him grow up and fall in love.  The story is told in
flashback as it is remembered by the adult Salvatore on the night that he
has heard of Alfredo's death.
     CINEMA PARADISO, directed and written by Giuseppe Tornetore, is full of
loving detail about the post-war movie exhibition business and has many
endearing portraits of the Sicilian peasants who mob the theater to get a
touch of something that transcends their unglamorous lives.  Ennio Morricone
scored this film, originally three hours in length, shown in Italy at two
and a half hours in 1988, and cut to about two hours for American audiences.
This is a sentimental and endearing film that will be well remembered.  I
rate it a low +3 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     (Note for those who have seen the film, spoiler for those who have not:
The following is a quote from the VARIETY 11/23/88 review of the film, then
called NUOVO CINEMA PARADISO.  It reveals an important plot twist edited out
of the version released in this country.  "[Salvatore] returns to Sicily for
Alfredo's funeral and finds his long lost love, now played by Brigitte
Fossey.  Amid many tears, Salvatore learns it was his blind friend who broke
up this one, true romance of his life."  In fact, it was a weakness of the
film that that loose end was never tied up.  Apparently the American
distributor did not want Alfredo to be made less sympathetic, though anybody
who steals pieces of films is not particularly sympathetic as far as I am
concerned.)

Title
Review for Speed (1994)

Title
Review for Species (1995)
     Two years ago Ben Kingsley played in what is arguably one of the
best films ever made.  It is hard to imagine the same actor now taking
a role as an amoral scientist who helps to create what turns out to be
a shape-changing were-alien who cruises singles bars in Los Angeles.
And he is not the only good actor in the film, SPECIES also features
Forest Whitaker and Alfred Molina.  That is a lot of acting talent
marshalled to film a really disappointing script from Dennis Feldman
which borrows from a lot of other sources but more than a little from
the TV play and book A FOR ANDROMEDA by Fred Hoyle.  Feldman's
screenplays--notably GOLDEN CHILD--usually start with good concepts,
but he does not know what to do with them.
     Since the 1970s we have been broadcasting into space signals about
ourselves including some rudimentary information about our biological
makeup.  That much is based on fact, though the information we give
about DNA is as true of a garden slug as it is of a human, so it is not
a lot of information about ourselves.  This film says that we have been
sending a biological blueprint of humans and have been receiving
similar messages back for two years including a biological blueprint
for an alien race.  (That limits the source to the Centauri system,
Barnard's Star, Wolf 359, HD95735, Sirius, UV Ceti, and Ross 154,
incidentally.)  The government has had Dr. Xavier Fitch (played by
Kingsley) build the DNA specified in the message and combine it with
human DNA.  The scientific absurdities then come thick and fast.  The
resulting creature is neither non-viable nor even a crossbreed, but
rather a shape-shifter that can appear to be either a beautiful woman
or one of several ugly alien forms.  The timing is not right for the
twenty-ish were-alien to have matured so we are told that she developed
in a mere six months (reminiscent of the film EMBRYO).  The six months
were enough to bring her to the apparent age of a teenager.  Then she
goes on an eating binge and spins a cocoon only to emerge an adult.
(Incidentally, even the binge does not seem sufficient to provide the
mass needed to build the cocoon.)  The resulting adult (former model
Natasha Henstridge) seems to be both beautiful and an incredibly quick
study at learning how to fit into our society.  It is never clear how
Sil, as she is called--first as "the Sil" and then just as "Sil"--knows
all she does about our society, but she seems to have absorbed the
knowledge someplace.  Meanwhile a task force of private citizens is
drafted by the government to track down the were-alien.  The team
includes some sort of exterminator (Michael Madsen) whom the government
has used before for top secret missions.  And also included is a
psychic empath--as if the government has a ready stock on call.  So
much is left unexplained that while some films call for a sequel or a
prequel, this one could handily use an inquel.
     Director Roger Donaldson has spiced up the film with more than its
share of action and thrills, but all too often the action takes the
form of a chase like any film with a more human quarry.  Or the action
might be someone being skewered through the walls of a restroom.  Then
to add a thrill or two there are false jump scenes thrown in.  I will
not spoil even the false jumps, but one involves a ridiculously
unrealistic piece of animal behavior.
     Kingsley and Whitaker are each too professional to turn in
performances that are not good, but Donaldson must not have been a very
demanding director and nobody else is particularly noticeable.  Oddly
this includes Alfredo Molina who probably would have done more with his
role had it been possible.  The script fails to develop the characters
much at all beyond throwing in a little romance among a lot of sex and
nudity.
     While the design of the alien creature is by H. R. Giger, the
surreal artist who is best known as the designer of the creature in
ALIEN, most looks at the alien creature take place in dreamlike
sequences.  Toward the end we actually see it, but it is a
disappointment.
     While this film could have been an effective exploration of two
species in conflict, too often the script takes an easy and familiar
path rather than explore new science fictional territory.  The
absurdities might have been acceptable with more originality, but what
this film offers is just not what I am looking for in a science fiction
film.  I give this one -1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Hunchback of Notre Dame, The (1996)
     By any objective standards, point for point, this is the best
animated film that has come from Disney Studios.  It has the best
animation, the most complex story, and even the most interesting
characters of any Disney Studios animated film.  The reason that this
film is getting flak--and I am not saying that it is not fully
deserved--is that the violence that the Disney people invariably do to
the story is this time being done to a different type of story.  It is
a story with which many people have both a passing acquaintance and,
even more important, a certain respect.  This is an adaptation of the
often-filmed 1831 novel NOTRE DAME DE PARIS by Victor Hugo.  But this
time when the Disney people turn the characters inside-out, totally
distorting them, and there is a sizable proportion of the audience who
know what is going on.
     There is a canonical version of the story of Aladdin--the one
translated by Sir Richard Burton from the Arabic--but few people
actually know the details of the plot.  So if the Disney film moves the
setting from China to Arabia and bases the story more on "The Thief of
Bagdad" than on the original Burton version, few people notice or care.
But just about every review I have written of a Disney animated film
contains the complaint someplace that the story is not accurate to the
original story on which it is based.  This time around the Disney
people have chosen a classic that is cynical, misanthropic, and
extremely angry (not unlike the emotions I felt when I first heard that
Disney would be doing HUNCHBACK.)  But having resigned myself to seeing
a novel I really like being desecrated on the screen, the film that
Disney Studios have made is about as well-made as that studio has ever
done.  And it is not as if the classic Charles Laughton version was
tremendously accurate to the novel either.  It distorted the Hugo badly
also, though nowhere nearly as badly as the new animated film.
     This version is something of a saddlepoint, being on one hand the
worst adaptation of the five well-known English language versions of
novel.  (I have not seen the two French versions nor the 1917 version
THE DARLING OF PARIS with Theda Bara--and I am not sure I want to.)
And yet, in my opinion at least, this is the best Disney animated film
to date, beating out even BEAUTY AND THE BEAST. This is the darkest-
themed of any of the Disney films and has some of the most complex
characters, for what that is worth.  There is little wrong with this
film that could not have been fixed by re-titling it BELL-RINGER OF
NOTRE DAME, changing all the character names, and saying that this was
"suggested by" NOTRE DAME DE PARIS.
     Though never stated in the film, the year is 1482, during the
reign of Louis XI.  In this version Quasimodo is cutely deformed in
much the same way a troll doll is.  He lives in seclusion (though not
in deafness) because he is forbidden to leave Notre Dame by his harsh
guardian, Judge Frollo, and because he is shy, being stigmatized by his
deformity.  In this version, the people of Paris are unknowingly cruel
to him when they first see him close up, but are basically good at
heart.  The cathedral is run by people who are also good, and the chief
evil in Paris is Judge Frollo.  Quasimodo's only friends have been
three gargoyles who come to life just for him, not unlike the tiger toy
in "Calvin and Hobbes."  But risking rejection, Quasimodo makes friends
with the rambunctious and buxom gypsy woman Esmeralda and the dashing
and noble Phoebus, Captain of the Guards and a man with a strong sense
of morality and chivalry.  Even in just this much plot the story has
been horribly and painfully twisted.
     The screenplay--by five people, always a bad sign--invariably
finds the most vulnerable places to undermine Hugo's story and to
distort nearly everything about it.  It is almost impressive how they
take such liberties as they do and still leave the story at least
recognizable with so much of the screen story just the reverse of the
Hugo novel.  For example, Esmeralda has one quick moment of shock when
she realizes that the ugliness of "Quasi" is not just a mask, and from
that point on she has nothing but admiration from him.  "You are a
surprise from every angle," she sings.  It took a great deal of sugar-
coating to make the story innocuous enough that it could be a Disney
film.  And still it is the darkest and most powerful of Disney's
animated features, which is perhaps not saying very much.
     As bad as the distortion of the novel is, the writers have some
powerful scenes.  Where Frollo describes the Gypsies as being vermin,
like ants crawling under a stone, the scene has the power of some of
the anti- Jewish propaganda films of Nazi Germany.  There is a terrific
scene of the sexually-frustrated Frollo seeing images of Esmeralda in a
fire that very nicely gets across to even fairly young children the
thorny concept that Frollo's hatred of Esmeralda springs from his own
desire for her.  And the script also borrows from other film versions.
There is a scene where Esmeralda prays in the Cathedral for nothing for
herself, but for God to help her people.  This scene was invented for
the 1939 film version, but is the basis for a musical number in this
film.
     Being fair, Disney's HUNCHBACK OF NOTRE DAME is also a technical
marvel.  The Disney animators are no longer trying to make a computer
animated film look like it was entirely hand-drawn.  Instead they are
mixing in images of such technical perfection they could only have been
created by computer.  Gone is the feeling of just six or seven planes
of flat images.  The images now create a heightened sense of depth that
is far too perfect to be done by hand.  This film has jaw-dropping
scenes that could never be filmed in live-action on animated without a
computer.  When Quasimodo swings down over the heads of the crowd to
rescue Esmeralda and the viewer goes with him arching down, it is one
of the most spectacular animated sequences in any feature film.  Still
that scene is flawed, perhaps intentionally.  It does have the problem
that everybody in the crown seems to be the same height to give the
feel of a plane of heads.  But it is a terrific image, nevertheless.
There are some other problems with the animation.  Once again a
different team animates each major character.  But the styles of
animation do not quite match.  While Phoebus has a natural, rotoscoped
look about him, Quasimodo has a flatter look and feel.  When the two
walk together they do not look right.  It almost looks like a human
walking with a Toon.  Nor is the artwork particularly original.  In
face Frollo looks far too much like the witch from SLEEPING BEAUTY
turned into a man.  And Esmeralda looks ... well, like Disney animators
have lost their innocence and are now into drawing heroines with big
breasts.
     There is a lot of film here for a short 86 minutes, a lot that is
terrific and a lot that is terrible.  On balance I give THE HUNCHBACK
OF NOTRE DAME a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.  I wish Disney had stuck
to a lesser-known and lesser-loved book.

Title
Review for Mulino delle donne di pietra, Il (1960)
     This film has been one I had been curious about for decades.  I
finally sprang for a copy from Sinister Cinema.  It is a French-
Italian production though it takes place near Amsterdam.  A writer
comes to a small town to write an article on what the locals call
"the Mill of the Stone Women."  It is no longer a functioning mill.
The inside has been turned into a clockwork display with moving
stone statues of women in sadistically macabre poses.  The writer
becomes entranced with the owner's beautiful but fatally ill
daughter.  The story is slow-paced but atmospheric.  Many of the
visual images are striking and make good use of images of stone
statuary.  The acting is not engaging and is further hampered by
poor dubbing.  The twisted interior of the mill recalls the
expressionism of early German and American horror films.  MILL OF
THE STONE WOMEN, Mario Bava's BLACK SUNDAY, and Roger Corman's HOUSE
OF USHER are stylistically similar though all were made in 1960.
The setting is unusual but the plot when one finds out what is going
on is one very commonly used in 1960s horror films from Europe.
There are some decent touches, but not enough to put this film on
anybody's must see list.  I rate it a 5 on the 0 to 10 scale and a
high 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Ghosts of Mars (2001)
    CAPSULE: In 2176 on the planet Mars police taking into custody
    an accused murderer face the title menace.  There is a lot of
    fighting and not a whole lot of story otherwise.  John
    Carpenter reprises so many ideas from his previous films,
    especially ASSAULT ON PRECINCT 13, that the new film comes off
    as his homage to himself.  Rating: 4 (0 to 10), 0 (-4 to +4).
John Carpenter apparently believes that action scenes in which
people fight something horrible are the same as horror scenes.
For a writer and director of horror films, supposedly an expert on
horror, it is a very bad mistake to make.  GHOSTS OF MARS is
called a horror movie, but it is more just a drawn out fight
between humans and a surprisingly low-powered alien menace.  In
addition if anybody but John Carpenter had made GHOSTS OF MARS,
Carpenter would have grounds to sue.  This film is just chock full
of pieces taken from ASSAULT ON PRECINCT 13, THE THING, and PRINCE
OF DARKNESS.  It is, in fact, surprising that Carpenter managed to
fit so many pieces of his previous work into this film in such an
admittedly novel way.  But that still does not make for a really
good science fiction experience.
GHOSTS OF MARS takes place in the year 2176.  Mars has been mostly
terraformed so that humans can walk on the surface without
breathing gear (which is good for the film's budget).  It is never
mentioned, but the gravity on Mars has been increased somehow to
earth-normal, again making it easier to film.  Society has changed
a bit by that time, but it has advanced surprisingly little.
Apparently the culture has changed so that women are much more in
positions of control.  And from Carpenter's view, women have
really made a mess of things.  Society has stagnated under female
control so that beyond some minor technological advances society
has changed less in 175 years than we might expect it to change in
ten.
The basic plot of GHOSTS OF MARS has much in common with that of
ASSAULT ON PRECINCT 13 except that Precinct 9 (yes, Precinct 9)
has been replaced by a somewhat tacky looking rundown Martian
mining colony.  Instead of having the criminal "Napolean" Wilson,
this film has the criminal "Desolation" Williams.  Instead of
facing hoodlums with automatic weapons the police face, well,
ghosts of Mars.  Because the ghosts are somewhat alien in nature
they should behave in some alien manner, but they essentially
behave as human savages, in another lapse of imagination.  The
story is told in flashback, flashback within flashback, and
flashback within flashback within flashback.
GHOSTS OF MARS takes place entirely at night and is filmed almost
entirely in tones of red, yellow, and black.  Carpenter manages to
give us a powerful opening scene, showing a mining train rushing
through the Martian night to the sound of music with a heavy beat.
Sadly what follows is not really up to the buildup.  The terror he
creates looks a little too much like fugitive wannabes from the
rock band Kiss.  His idea of building suspense is having a bunch
of sudden jump scenes that sucker the viewer into thinking
something scary is happening and then prove to be just something
boring.  These are standard haunted house film shock effects that
require no great talent to give the audience.  Somewhat newer but
also unimpressive are the CGI digital decapitations in some of the
fights.
Within a short stretch of time we have seen the release of MISSION
TO MARS, RED PLANET, and GHOSTS OF MARS.  After MISSION TO MARS
was panned by too many reviewers it looks better and better and
better as time goes by.  I rate GHOSTS OF MARS a 4 on the 0 to 10
scale and a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.
Following the movie I showed my wife, who liked GHOSTS OF MARS
moderately more than I did, Carpenter's classic ASSAULT ON
PRECINCT 13.  Her comment is that it was seeing the same film
twice.

Title
Review for Magnolia (1999)
     In INTOLERANCE, D. W. Griffith told four different historical
stories at the same time, cutting from one to the other.  Each of the
stories builds to a fast-paced climax.  In MAGNOLIA, Paul Thomas
Anderson tells several stories each just tangentially connected to the
others.  Yet the stories and where they are going are all independent.
What is strange about these stories is that they are all synchronized.
Each story builds to a tense moment (or what appears to be intended to
be a tense moment) but then lets the tension dissolve.  While the
tension dissipates one character starts singing a song and in each
plotline the major characters sing along, even though they are not in
the same scene.  Then toward the end the stories each build to a tense
moment again.  It is almost as if the characters are somehow
psychically linked.  This creates some strange effects.  The stories
are about empty desperate people with dysfunctional relationships.  The
strands have varying degrees of bizarre content.  We have the story of
a dying man Earl Partridge (Jason Robards) wanting to get in touch with
his son and make amends.  Phil Parma (Philip Seymour Hoffman) is his
nurse who is frantic to help Partridge achieve his final goal.
Partridge's young wife Linda (Julianne Moore) is getting more and more
anxious as Partridge dies, but for an unsuspected reason.  Frank Mackey
(Tom Cruise) runs the kinds of self-help seminar that businesses like
so much, but he aims his at teaching disaffected men how to be real
shit-heels in dealing with women in an angry backlash to women's lib.
Officer Jim Kurring (John C. Reilly) is a patrolman who has a need to
feel he is making the world a better place.  Jimmy Gator (Philip Baker
Hall) hosts a popular children's TV quiz show that really exploits and
destroys children as we see from the stories of current quiz kid
Stanley Spector (Jeremy Blackman) and former quiz kid Donnie Smith
(William H. Macy).  The film juggles all these stories for over three
hours, but even after all this time not one story is resolved
satisfactorily.  Each story moves toward a single bizarre common
climax, but it is not one that seems to do much but derail each story.
The common climax itself is ambiguous in many ways and it fails to
really tie up any of the stories.  The film seems to be built around
strange events and weird history, but it really has little to do with
the content of the stories, though they all are connected in part by
one weird event.
     MAGNOLIA will probably bring some much deserved attention to Paul
Thomas Anderson, though in my opinion his two previous films, HARD
EIGHT and BOOGIE NIGHTS were better told stories.  It is interesting
that one starts to look forward to actors from Anderson's company.
John C. Reilly seems to be a standard fixture.  Particularly notable is
Philip Baker Hall who gave a mesmerizing performance from the first
scene of HARD EIGHT.  Here he several of the characters are
mesmerizing, but that characteristic is not really used.
     As studies of characters these stories are each worth following.
As well-rounded stories with a beginning, middle and end, they leave
something to be desired.  But the film is willing to do the unexpected
and that helps make the film worth sitting through.  I rate it a 7 on
the 0 to 10 scale and a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     During the strange climactic event of the film we get multiple
messages from the filmmaker that the event we are seeing really does
happen.  And in actual fact, it does.  Since Biblical times rains of
frogs have been interpreted as signs of displeasure of the gods.  It
is, however, a perfectly natural, if somewhat unnerving, phenomenon.
The cause is associated with whirlwinds.  We know that tornadoes over
land can rip up land and even objects of some size from the ground and
hurl them into the air, holding them aloft.  The reader may remember
the unfortunate cow in TWISTER.  Smaller objects can be hurled high
into the atmosphere and then be kept aloft by the updrafts for
surprisingly long periods of time much as hail and chunks of ice are.
When the whirlwind is over water, animals near the surface, frequently
fish and frogs, may suffer the same fate.  Essentially they are
vacuumed up by the whirlwind, held aloft by updrafts, and finally
dropped elsewhere.
     So while the rain is possible, some doubts do creep in.  The rain
of frogs depicted in this film may be of greater scale than I had
pictured for a rain of frogs.  It seems unlikely the frogs would still
be alive when dropped.  It is not clear that geographic conditions are
right for Los Angeles to have this sort of phenomenon.  (Frankly I have
no idea on these points.)  Otherwise the event was quite believable.
What we see in this film is much more credible than the phenomena we
saw in VOLCANO.
     In the film it is left ambiguous if the rain is a sign from God
since there are many references to Exodus 8:2. "And the frogs shall
come up both on thee and upon thy people, and upon all thy servants."
However a rain of frogs, though it feels Biblical, is most definitely
NOT a Biblical portent.  Note that the previous verse says "And the
river shall bring forth frogs abundantly which shall go up...," so the
Bible is referring not to a rain but to an infestation from the river.
The only other reference to frogs in the Bible is as a symbol for
uncleanness in Revelation 16:13.

Title
Review for Pillow Book, The (1996)
     Peter Greenaway is a filmmaker who often expects a lot from his
audience and takes chances.  The downside of taking chances is that
sometimes you lose.  THE PILLOW BOOK is one of his losses.  This is a
film that is pretty to look at and one which does a lot of strange and
unexpected things with the visual style.  But the story is over-blown,
over-long, overly-obscure, and overly melodramatic.
     The basis and inspiration for Greenaway's latest film is the
original Pillow Book of Sei Shonagon, published in Heian period, the
late 10th Century Japan.  The original was a collection of poetry,
reminiscences--some amorous, lists, and anecdotes all relevant to court
life of the time.  Greenaway's film inspired by that book is the story
of Nagiko (played by Vivian Wu), a modern woman who one millennium
later is collecting her own set of experiences, mostly erotic, inspired
by Sei, bur also by her own fascination with body painting.  Nagiko's
fascination stems from her father's annual ritual of on her birthday
painting text on her face and neck and retelling of how God made people
out of clay.  In his myth God painted each of them, naming them in the
process.  If He approved of his work he also signed it.
     Nagiko grows with an erotic fascination with having text painted
on her body.  Her first requirement of a lover is that he be a good
calligrapher, painting nearly anything on her body in any language.  In
flashbacks, often in only one small part of the screen, we see how her
father was betrayed by his publisher who also forced her into marriage
with his nephew.  The husband proves to be a cruel and insensitive man
who is also a lousy calligrapher in bed.  The film has a problem in
that most viewers from a European background are uneducated in the
subtleties of Japanese calligraphy and will not know good work from
work not so good.  Nagiko eventually finds love in the arms of Scotsman
Jerome (Ewan McGregor of EMMA and of course TRAINSPOTTING--any young
Scottish actor you see these days is probably from TRAINSPOTTING).  But
when the publisher's hand reaches again into her life, she decides it
is time for a particularly appropriate retribution.
     In the tradition of his PROSPERO'S BOOKS Greenaway plays with his
screen composition.  He varies the size and shape of the screen.  He
will inlay as many as four smaller frames with action into a full-sized
fifth frame, now reduced to a cross.  Greenaway works to combine the
texture of the original Pillow Book on paper with his own updated
version of the story.  The result is hypnotic but eventually the slow
and deliberate pacing and the repetition begin to wear on the audience.
Nagiko's attempts to recreate the painting experience of her early
youth in erotic terms almost reminds one of Jack Nicholson's stylized
erotic ritual toward the end of CARNAL KNOWLEDGE.  The pretensions of
Greenaway's style become a liability when there is too long for too
little story.  In the final analysis the story seems more an erotic
dream than an intelligent narrative.  Occasional pieces of wit do
leaven the story, but they require careful observation and are of a
very dry humor.  One example: characters in the film are painted with
texts meaningful to them, and apparently in the same vain a van is
painted with road maps, the texts that it follows.
     Greenaway's films are rich with style, but style without a good
plot can be as bad as plot without style.  I found his recent THE BABY
OF MACON far more rewarding.  Greenaway taking on Japanese culture
should have been a good deal more insightful and less tedious.  I rate
it a -1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Alien Nation (1988)
     These days Hollywood science fiction films really need a high budget.
And they need imagination.  Science fiction films need a budget because the
cost of automobile parts has soared.  Car chases are not exciting unless
lots of cars get smashed up, lots of shattered windshields get sprinkled
over the street, and lots of great makeup effects of people smashed up in
the cars.  That costs money.  Then filmmakers need imagination to design new
kinds of guns that the audience has not seen before.  Gunfights with the
same old sorts of guns get boring.  Hollywood has come to see that science
fiction fans want to see new guns in science fiction film gunfights.  ALIEN
NATION is a science fiction film that has the car crashes and the new guns
that fans demand.  And I hope they are happy with what they got.  I suspect
that they will be because ALIEN NATION's basic story usually does very well
whenever it shows up in a film, four or five times a year.
     As the film starts, the "Newcomers" have been on Earth for three years.
Newcomers are aliens who arrived on Earth and were accepted much like, and
to the same degree as, many other ethnic groups.  In fact, the film glosses
almost totally over how much more different an alien species would be from
us than a new and even unfamiliar human ethnic group would be.  There are
references to a very different physiology but they sure look a lot like
humans over 95% of their bodies.  In fact, the camera lingers longingly over
the very human-like breasts of the women.  Now, nobody really knows why
human women have globular breasts that even our closest primate relatives do
not.  And compared to these Newcomers, even daffodils are close relatives,
yet the Newcomers' female breasts are similar enough that our main character
gets a thrill fondling them.  Well, it is just that kind of film.
     But I am digressing.  The aliens live in very human-like ghettos and
have very human-like sorts of problems.  Towards the end of the film we
learn a few more differences, but for most of the film you could easily
substitute "Chinese" for "alien" and could tell the same story.  And
undoubtedly someone has since it is a story that has been done so frequently
in the past.  The story is the "mismatched police partners."  You have seen
it before.  It may not have been called 48 HOURS, RED HEAT, or LETHAL
WEAPON.  There are enough of them to turn listing examples into a party
game.  Yes, there is initial friction between the partners; yes, they come
to like each other.  It is all there, complete with bugs gunfights and car
chases.
     James Caan does a reasonable job as Matthew Sykes, whose old partner is
killed by insidious aliens.  Mandy Patinkin is enjoyable to watch as Sam
Francisco--named that by an insensitive immigration official.  But then it
cannot be really hard for them to play parts that have been done so many
times before.  The film also features in cameo roles lots of products you
can buy in your local grocery store.  The alien makeup is all right if
scientifically unlikely, and all other visual effects of the film have tires
and fenders or bullets.
     What was purported to be the year's biggest science fiction film is a
huge disappointment.  Rate it a -1 in the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Strange Days (1995)
     The best science fiction film of the 1980s was the first 2/3 of
the film BRAINSTORM.  This was an excellent look at how one invention
could transform humanity.  The invention was the means to record a
person's thoughts and sensory input and to play it back for someone
else so the second person has exactly the same experience.  The last
third of BRAINSTORM shows the signs of rapid rewriting of the script
after one of the major actors died.  In the world of the film resulting
transformation of society could have been the subject of twenty
excellent sequels without ever covering the same topic twice.  For a
while watching STRANGE DAYS I thought I was seeing the first of those
sequels and it was great.  But the feeling just did not last.
     Lenny Nero (played by Ralph Fiennes) traffics in contraband
experience, recorded on little CD-ROMs and capable of being played
back.  If you want the experience of making love to a beautiful woman
or of committing a violent crime, you can buy it from Lenny and play it
back as often as you like, repeating it over and over.  If you have no
legs and miss the experience of running on the beach, as long as some
human can have the experience, you can also.  As Lenny says, "This
isn't 'television, only better'"  This is the real thing.  The only
problem is the technology and materials are illegal.  People record
their experiences and sell them to Lenny who sells them to other
people.  Lenny has a bag full of contraband experiences (not unlike the
handkerchief full of souls in "The Devil and Daniel Webster").  He
plies his trade in the netherworld of a disintegrating Los Angeles.  So
what do writers James Cameron and Jay Cocks do with the idea?  One of
these little experience CD-ROMs has a recording of an experience that
some people would like hushed up and others would want to make public.
Full stop on the ideas.  Now we have high-energy chases, sex scenes,
martial arts fights, gunplay, shocking revelations, rock music
performances, smashing windshields, graphic rapes, betrayals, murders,
cover-ups, and a totally daffy ending with several progressively
sillier climaxes.  Not surprisingly Los Angeles is much like today,
only worse, in the last days of the second-to-last year of this
century.  (Yes, the second-to-last.  Cameron and Cox seem to think that
in spite of the fact that the first millennium started with the year 1
and the second one started with the year 1001, for some reason we will
start the third one in the year 2000.  We won't.)
     Ralph Fiennes and Tom Sizemore are fairly good as low-life heroes,
and what is cyberpunk without its low-life heroes?  Angela Bassett is
not quite up to a role that calls for her to have both the natural
wisdom of a Solomon and the martial arts skills of a Chuck Norris.  It
isn't her fault, but the script falls just short of implying she can
walk on water.  Juliette Lewis show more flesh than acting talent as an
old girlfriend of Lenny's.
     The style of the film is fast-paced and will certainly be hard for
some audiences to follow, at least in the earlier, more interesting
parts of the film.  The editing is fast, but not always skillful.
Occasionally it borders on the confusing, but this is supposed to be a
bewildering future.  Katheryn Bigelow directs it with some of the same
style she used in TV's WILD PALMS.  That film was three hours and
seemed longer; this one is nearly two-and-a-half hours and seems just
as long.
     This is a film that builds something intriguing and interesting
and then spoils it all in the last hour and fifty minutes.  The real
problem is that STRANGE DAYS tries to be an action film, a martial arts
film, a film about race, and a science fiction film while using a plot
that with minor substitutions would be a cable-bait mystery.  I wonder
if the nearness of the time-setting of this film will get 20th Century
Fox thinking about the fact they soon need a new name for their studio.
Then again, with disappointments like this one, maybe they won't.  In
spite of a great start, this one gets a high -1 on the -4 to +4 scale.
At one point I thought it might get a +3.

Title
Review for Moby Dick (1930)
     This is a true and accurate synopsis of the 1930 film MOBY DICK,
starring John Barrymore (as Ahab) and Joan Bennett.  Noble Johnson plays
Queequeg.  It is based on Herman Melville's classic of men and the sea.
     The film opens with the camera moving in for a look at the book MOBY
DICK, OR THE WHITE WHALE.  The novel begins, "There never was, nor ever will
be, a braver life than the life of the whaler.  Compared to the game they
hunted the mightiest land beast was but a poodle dog."  [Boy, that Melville!
He sure can write!]
     Fade to the harbor of the New Bedford seaport.  The Mary Anne is
pulling into harbor, all eyes are on the callow young seaman doing
acrobatics on top of the mast.  Why, it's handsome young Ahab showing off
again!  Ahab comes ashore and flirts with some of the girls and insults
others.  ("If they cut into you they'd certainly get plenty of blubber.")
Ahab sees his brother Derek escorting a new girl in town--Faith, the
parson's daughter--to church.  Ahab is struck with Faith's beauty but
decides to go to the grog shop instead of church.  There Ahab meets
Queequeg, a primitive man who carries an idol he talks to.  Queequeg becomes
Ahab's sidekick.  Eventually Ahab does go to church and flirts with Faith.
     Before long Faith is losing interest in Derek's courting because, like
all the girls, she is intrigued by the handsome Ahab.  As Ahab is setting
sail again Faith tells him that it is he, not Derek, that she loves.  They
agree to marry when Ahab returns.
     Ahab and the Mary Anne are at sea when Ahab sights Moby Dick, the black
whale with a white hump and forehead.  [This allows the use of stock
footage.]  As Ahab and his cronies chase the whale in the long boat, Ahab
takes one risk too many.  The whale turns on Ahab and bites him.  Ahab loses
a leg and it is replaced by a peg.
     When Faith sees Ahab is returning she is overjoyed.  But when she sees
the peg leg she is momentarily shocked and runs away.  Weeks later, we see
Ahab unable to get work as a whaler.  Faith asks Derek to tell Ahab that she
still loves Ahab.  Derek twists the message so Ahab thinks Faith does not
really love him.  Derek then tells Faith that Ahab has cursed her.
     Ahab goes to sea for seven years, but not as a whaler.  Faith realizes
too late that she should not have trusted Derek.  Eagerly she awaits Ahab's
return.  Eventually Ahab manages to buy his own whaling ship, the Shanghai
Lady.  He sails it back to New Bedford to get a crew to go after Moby Dick.
     [It should be noted that we are now fifty minutes into a seventy-five-
minute movie and are ready to start telling Melville's story.  Melville
tells only the last third of the story, which, of course, is why MOBY DICK
is such a thin book.]
     Ahab is unable to get a crew so must shanghai one from the brothels and
grog shops.  The meaner and nastier the crew, the better, he decided since
he really wants revenge on Moby Dick.  Once at sea, however, the shanghaied
crew is surly and unmanageable.  They are cutthroats one and all.  There is
one exception.  It is Derek who was shanghaied onto the Shanghai Lady with
the rest.  Derek finds out his brother Ahab is the captain, but the mates
don't believe it and will not let him see Ahab.
     During a storm Derek decides to break out of the hold to confront Ahab.
The rest of the crew take this opportunity to mutiny.  With storm and mutiny
raging, Derek finds Ahab at the wheel and accuses him of intentionally
shanghaiing him.  The two fight and Ahab is winning when Derek throws a
knife into Ahab's back.  Queequeg--Ahab's old friend--picks up Derek and
breaks his back.  There is no explanation about what happened to the mutiny,
but it seems to have ended by the next scene.
     Fair weather returns, but Ahab is depressed.  He decides Moby Dick has
beaten him.  "He's licked me, Mr. Stubbs," he says.  Just then Moby Dick is
sighted.  The longboats hit the water.  Moby Dick turns on Ahab's longboat
but Ahab swims to the whale and, demoniacally laughing, repeatedly stabs the
whale with a harpoon.  Moby Dick dies.  We last see pieces of Moby Dick
being cut up on the deck of the Shanghai Lady.
     Ahab and the Shanghai Lady return to New Bedford.  There Ahab discovers
that Faith has waited for him.  The two fall into each other's arms.

Title
Review for Mary Reilly (1996)
     Robert Louis Stevenson's "Strange Case of Dr. Jekyll and Mr. Hyde"
was inspired by schizophrenics that Stevenson had studied and also by
Edinburgh's notorious Deacon William Brodie--pious churchman and
respected councilman by day and house burglar by night.  (Jean Brodie
claims him as a relative toward the end of the film THE PRIME OF MISS
JEAN BRODIE.)  Stevenson wanted to write first a horror story and
second a parable about the latent beast in all of us.  Valerie Martin's
novel MARY REILLY retold the story from the point of view of Jekyll's
maid, a character whom Stevenson neglected to mention.  The newer novel
transformed the story into a parable about the latent beast in all men
and the cruelty of men toward women, peppering the story with bits of
male misogyny from sources having nothing to do with Edward Hyde.
Though subtlety was not a great concern of the book, what there was
excised by Christopher Hampton's screenplay, directed by Stephen
Frears.  The resulting film is relentlessly downbeat and dark.  It is
as dark literally as it is in tone, seemingly set in a London that
offers two kinds of weather: night and fog.
     Mary Reilly (played by Julia Roberts) is a new housemaid at
Dr. Henry Jekyll's household.  Jekyll (John Malkovich) takes a
particular interest in her for the interesting scars on her arms and
neck and later for the unusual fact that she could read.  The household
is run by the authoritarian and domineering butler Poole who likes Mary
even less for the interest that his master shows her.  Mary is a gentle
sort inordinately bothered by simple everyday household chores like
skinning and slicing a live and wriggling eel.  The camera shows us
this spectacle in loving detail just as it shows us the carcasses of
skinned meat hanging in the market street.  But in spite of these minor
annoyances Mary likes the Jekyll household and receives from Jekyll
unexpected kindness, considering that he is a man.  It is in fact the
only male kindness in the film.  So things are really going the best
that Mary has ever had them go for her, which is not saying very much.
Then one day Jekyll announces that his assistant Edward Hyde
(Malkovich) is to be given access to the house.
     Hyde, when we finally see him, is a genuine let-down.  This has
got to be the least differentiated Jekyll/Hyde pairing in cinema
history.  Jekyll has a short, light mustache and beard; Hyde has
shoulder- length dark hair.  No obvious attempt was made to make them
sound at all different.  In a dim light one could easily confuse one
for the other, which is unfortunate because dim light is something this
film has in great abundance.  Perhaps one other difference is
discernible: Jekyll is the one that seems half asleep, perhaps
exhausted from the labors of his research.  Hyde seems at least mostly
awake.  The weakness of the performance is particularly puzzling in
that Malkovich under Frears direction previously gave us such a
compelling Valmont in DANGEROUS LIAISONS (also written by Hampton).
     Julia Roberts does not look Victorian somehow and at least at
first looks highly out of place in a maid's uniform.  It takes a while
to see her in this role and not think of previous roles she has played
rather than as the Victorian chambermaid.  Two fine actors under-used
here are Glenn Close, almost unrecognizable as mistress of a bordello.
(I believe the bordello is totally the invention of Valerie Martin's
novel, incidentally.)  Only slightly better used is Michael Gambon as
Mary's nightmarish father.  Gambon is a fine actor, best known perhaps
for the British TV mini-series "The Singing Detective."
     A peculiarity of this film is that to understand what is going on,
one should already know the Stevenson story, yet if one knows the
story, the new film is almost totally redundant.  The film builds to
its surprise revelation fully realizing that the vast majority of
viewers entered the theater already knowing what is to be revealed.  By
telling the story from the housemaid's point of view, the most dramatic
scene of the story has to happen off-stage.  This robs the film of most
of the story's dramatic impact.  The pay-off scene is postponed until
much later in the story.  When we do see it, the good news is that it
is done in a totally original manner, like no way it has been done
before in any screen adaptation.  The bad news is that nobody in their
right mind would have wanted to do it this way.  The way it is done
adds very greatly to the implausibility of the story.  It may well be
the worst touch in the film.
     George Fenton wrote a score as downbeat as the sunless visuals
with occasional touches on the strings very reminiscent of Bernard
Herrmann.  Curiously, this film played in the same theater opposite
MUPPET TREASURE ISLAND.  Stevenson is not having a very good year.  I
may not be either.  I give this a -1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Space Cowboys (2000)
     THE RIGHT STUFF told how U.S. Air Force test pilots who had the
so-called "right stuff" were nevertheless washed out of the space
program by the government bureaucracy.  That film was almost
certainly the inspiration for SPACE COWBOYS in which four of those
pilots, now in their seventies fly an important shuttle mission for
NASA.  The film opens with the four young test pilots, guys with the
smarts and the guts it takes to save themselves in an emergency,
being frustrated in their dreams to fly in space.  Locked out are
Frank Corvin, Tank Sullivan, Jerry O'Neil, and Hawk Hawkins, all
commanded by the marginally competent Bob Gerson.
     Flash forward to the present.  The Russian communications
satellite Ikon, dating back to the cold war era, is in a decaying
orbit.  For reasons not being clearly explained by anyone it is very
important that the satellite be placed back into a healthy orbit.
High people in both the American and Russian governments are anxious
that it not be allowed to simply re-enter the atmosphere as its
current course will take it.  A NASA mission is being headed by Sara
Holland (Marcia Gay Harden) under the management of program veteran
Bob Gerson (James Cromwell) to repair the guidance system and put
the satellite back in orbit.  Retired pilot Frank Corvin (Clint
Eastwood), previously washed out of the space program, designed a
guidance system in the Sixties and it is the one that was used
aboard the Ikon.  He is asked to come out of retirement and help
repair the Ikon's guidance system.  Frank asks the obvious question:
what is his guidance system doing aboard a Soviet satellite sent up
during the Cold War?  He does not get an answer.  Corvin's deal for
NASA: They can have his help only if his 1960s team of four pilots
get to fly the mission.  Gerson's response: they can go if they can
get through training.
     Corvin collects the other three members.  There is Tank
Sullivan (James Garner), now a Baptist minister.  Jerry O'Neil
(Donald Sutherland) now engineers roller-coasters, and Hawk Hawkins
(Tommy Lee Jones) flies biplanes.  Corvin reassembles the somewhat
startled and bemused team and they begin their training.  When it is
clear that they cannot possibly get through the training through
fair means, they resort to foul.  Somewhat irksome is the unlikely
device that the nearly blind Jerry O'Neil is able to bluff his way
so that nobody suspects.  The training is a major part of the movie.
The actual mission does not begin until about ninety minutes into
the film.  All the while the mystery of this enigmatic Soviet
satellite deepens as the questions begin to pile up.
     At the center of the story is Eastwood, not the world's most
emotive actor, and Tommy Lee Jones.  Donald Sutherland as an aging
Lothario who bluffs his way around his near-blindness.  Garner's
trademark is his low-key quietly amused performances.  Here he it
works against him as he frequently melts into the scenery in the
presence of the other major actors.  Marsha Gay Harden is a good
choice for the mission planner.  Many actresses would look a little
too glamorous in the role and she gives the impression of being more
an intelligent, no-nonsense sort of person.  William Devane, who in
other films frequently shows little more characterization than a
funny way of talking, for once has a role that he can sink his teeth
into as the gum-chewing Mission Control.
     Nicely handled is the prologue set in the 1960s.  It would be
impossible to make the cast look so many decades younger.  The
characters are played by look-alike actors with the real actors
voices processed to sound younger.  The sequence does not entirely
work to convince the audience these are the same people, but it is
close enough for the viewer to go with it.  The younger version of
Eastwood (Toby Stephens) looks close enough to Eastwood that there
may have been some digital processing going on.  In general the
space special effects are kept conservative and inexpensive.  Stock
footage seems to be used where possible.  But this film is not an
effects extravaganza.  You probably do not go to a film like this
dazzling effect, for excitement, or even believability in the
adventure.  You want to see the interplay of four elder stars, each
with proven comic flair from earlier films.  As expected they
deliver.
     SPACE COWBOYS will probably be classified by most people as a
science fiction film, though there is not much in it to make it
science fiction any more.  But it is a well-crafted film with an
accent on characters.  I rate it a 7 on the 0 to 10 scale and a low
+2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Far and Away (1992)
     (Spoiler warning: This film could not be adequately described without
telling more of the plot than I usually like to tell.  It is clear early on
where this film is going.  However, if you prefer not to read details of the
plot, be warned.)
     The summer is off to a roaring start with the return of a type of film
we have not seen in a while, a big sprawling spectacular historical novel in
cinematic form.  This is a film in the grand tradition of epics like THE
UNTAMED, which took Tyrone Power and Susan Howard from Ireland to a trek
across South Africa with the Boers.  It is rare enough these days to see an
historical film set in another century.  FAR AND AWAY sweeps the audience
from the tenant unrest in Ireland in 1892 to the Irish slums of Boston to a
brief sequence in the Ozarks and finally to the Oklahoma land rush.  The
land rush race of 1893 is eye-poppingly brought to the screen on a scale
rarely seen on films any more.  Along the way the viewer gets a pleasurable
history lesson about conditions in Ireland, Boston, and Oklahoma of a
century ago.  FAR AND AWAY is *a lot* of film.  It is 140 minutes of story.
     The story opens in western Ireland.  There tenant farmers live and die
in abject poverty, owing everything they have to absentee landlords.  Many
of these landlords never even saw the properties that made them rich.
Joseph Donelly (played surprisingly well by Tom Cruise) has dreams of
escaping his poverty and owning his own lands.  His dreams change when the
rent collector indirectly kills Donelly's father and then intentionally
burns Donelly's home.  Donelly leaves home, intending to find and murder his
landlord Daniel Christie (played by Robert Prosky).  Christie turns out to
be a likable fellow and Donelly a completely incompetent assassin.  Soon
Donelly is a patient being cared for by Christie's family in Christie's own
house.  Donelly particularly is interested in Shannon Christie (played by
Nicole Kidman--Cruise's real-life wife).  Shannon fancies herself a very
modern woman and has dreams of running away to America, where they are
giving away free land in Oklahoma and where she can be the equal of any man.
It is no surprise to the audience that she is eventually off to America with
part of the family treasure and with Donelly in tow as a sort of servant--at
least that is what she thinks he is.
     The longest chapter of the story is set in the Irish immigrant slums of
Boston, where the couple go from riches to rags to riches and back to rags.
The historical re-creation here is beautifully done.  We see the immigrant
population and the brothels.  Donelly and Shannon are forced to pose as
brother and sister and share a room in a brothel.  Shannon plucks chickens
and barely makes enough money to cover the rent, while Donelly is adopted by
a local bully (played by Colm Meany of STAR TREK: THE NEXT GENERATION) and
groomed as a bare-knuckle boxer.  Donelly has a meteoric career as a boxer-
-reminiscent of too many other of Cruise's films.  Eventually the couple is
dragged apart by poverty.  Donelly tries a minor stint laying railroad track
in the Ozarks before he decides to head west and find his land in Oklahoma.
They once again meet up for the largest and most famous of the Oklahoma land
rushes, the Cherokee Strip race.  (Ever wonder what Cherokee Strip Day
commemorated?)  The Cherokee Strip was a six-million-acre strip of land
between Kansas and Oklahoma bought from the Cherokee Nation for $8,500,000.
It was partitioned into plots of land, and at noon on Saturday, September
16, 1893, the race for land began.  The first person to get to one of the
plots and replace the marker flag in it with his own flag owned it.  One to
a customer.  This was the best known of the Oklahoma land rushes, attracting
100,000 settlers ("boomers").  A settler could be shot for being a "sooner,"
cheating and going to a plot of land sooner than noon.  Sooners are,
however, commemorated in the state nickname: The Sooner State.  The Cherokee
Strip land rush has been depicted in films several times before--most
notably in the 1931 film CIMARRON, based on the novel by Edna Ferber and
which won the Oscar for best picture.  However, for once budget constraints
seem to have been a small issue.  Aerial shots of the rushing boomers
indicate the land rush was recreated for FAR AND AWAY on a massive scale.
     While the film has the feel of a novel, it was in fact based on an
original screenplay.  The screenplay was done by co-producer Bob Dolman.  It
was based on a story by Dolman and by director Ron Howard.  This is purely a
Hollywood product, story and screenplay, which makes it all the more
surprising that the result is so pleasing.  There are a few false moves, the
worst coming in the final seconds of the film, but general the writing is
quite good.
     Tom Cruise does well with a script that involves many of his talents.
Both his boxing and his horse-riding are surprisingly good and done in large
part apparently without doubles.  The Irish accent at first seems strange
coming from Cruise, but only because his own inflection is familiar.  Had I
not seen him before, I would probably accept the Irish accent as his own.
Kidman's talents also seem more than sufficient for her role.  Robert Prosky
never turns in a bad performance, of course.
     Because there is so much to see in this film, it was shot on extra-wide
65mm film stock.  That would not be uncommon for a special-effects-oriented
film but is most unusual for a film with few or no visual effects.  Just one
more reason FAR AND AWAY is a good buy in a movie ticket.
     Kudos to Ron Howard for the best and most entertaining film I have seen
so far this year.  I give it a +3 on the -4 to +4 scale.  It's nice to be
enthusiastic about a Hollywood studio film once in a while.

Title
Review for Witches, The (1990)
          Capsule review:  Jim Henson's last film is a charming
     modern fairy tale of a boy foiling a plot by the witches of
     England.  It captures some of the fun horror of traditional
     fairy tales.  Unfortunately, it loses some of its inspiration
     about mid-film.  The story would be ideally suited to
     animation and doing it in live action is an impressive if not
     altogether necessary feat.  Rating: low +2.
     The perfect medium for showing imaginative images visually is
animation.  With animation, if you can visualize it, you can put it on a
screen.  1973's FANTASTIC PLANET, while lacking in story values, may well be
the most visually imaginative science fiction film ever made.  Unfortunately
for animated fantasy, STAR WARS came out four years later and showed that
imaginative live action was coming of age and animated fantasy became a
sideshow.  Only the Japanese seem to recognize the possibilities of
animation as a medium for fantasy, and even in Japan fantastic animation is
falling short of the real potential of the medium.  In the United States and
Europe audiences want live action even if it is at the expense of
imagination.  Films such as BATMAN and DICK TRACY are trying to impress the
world with how well they can overcome problems that would not even arise
with animation.  DICK TRACY was able to make some expensive boxoffice stars
really look much like the comic strip characters.  BATMAN was less
successful visually in making Jack Nicholson look like the Joker.  Both of
these films could have had better stories and looked absolutely perfect had
they been animated, but they would have died at the boxoffice.  Audiences
really want live action and are quite willing to sacrifice story values and
imagination for the thrill of seeing things done in live action.
     THE WITCHES is a fine new live-action fantasy film that almost matches
in imagination and charm what Walt Disney was able to do with animation back
in the 1940s.
     Fairy tales are not all sweetness and fun, and they are not just for
children.  Most fairy tales are horror stories told on a level that all ages
can appreciate them.  And that is just what THE WITCHES is.  From the very
beginning this film lays down some blood-curdling folklore about witches.
Some of it is really the stuff paranoia is made of.  Witches can live right
next door, they smell children from great distances, they have no toes.
Take note, those of you who feel children must be protected from the sort of
scary stories that children have been raised on from time immemorial.  The
stories are told to young Luke (played by Jasen Fisher) by his Norwegian
grandmother (played by Swedish actor/director Mai Zettering) and it is a
good thing she told him.  He shortly has to fight a convocation of the
witches of England in their plot to turn all English children into mice.
And shortly is how he has to fight them, since he is one of the first two
children turned into mice.
     Jim Henson used his Muppet technology to portray the mouse Luke when he
does something non-mouselike.  When a trained mouse can be used, it is.  The
problem there is that the Muppet mouse has a cute face that the real mouse
apparently found very difficult to mimic.  The combining of realistic mouse
movements with a humanlike personality for the mouse would be, of course,
much simpler for Disney to do in animation than it was for Henson to do in
live action, and the result would have been much more successful.  The
makeup for the witches is similarly nicely executed.  Anjelica Huston's
Grand High Witch makeup fails to convince totally that this is really the
face of a living being, but it is well-detailed.
     THE WITCHES is, and is likely to remain, Nicholas Roeg's only
children's film.  (He claims he made it for his own newly-born child.)
Allan Scott's script, based on the novel by Roald Dahl, raises some
gooseflesh early on, but loses much of its power to chill once Luke is a
cute mouse and the story concentrates more on his mission than on the horror
of the witches.  Scott also manages to throw in some double entendres
clearly not intended for the younger audience.  In smaller roles there is
Rowan Atkinson (television's Black Adder) as a hotel manager clearly of the
Basil Fawlty style.  Bill Peterson (Dickie Bird in Bill Forsyte's COMFORT
AND JOY) plays the father of a mouse who once was a gluttonous child.
     It would be unfair to down-rate this film because it is not doing
anything to advance animated film.  The film as it stands *is* charming and
works (at least generally) in live action.  It is a nice fantasy and
deserves some credit for not aiming specifically at a youth or teenage
market.  It is just a decent fantasy film that is there for whatever
audience it finds.  I rate it a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Memoirs of an Invisible Man (1992)
          Capsule review:  It is unusual to find a film of quality
     and style being released outside the summer fluff season.
     Generally pretty good special effects from ILM are the real
     star of this very lightweight sci-fi (as opposed to science
     fiction) adventure.  Rating: high 0 (-4 to +4).
     Stories of people with the ability to make themselves invisible (and
the power this gives them) go back to ancient Greece.  Perseus had a cap of
invisibility, Gyges made himself king with a ring of invisibility,
H. G. Wells questioned just how powerful a totally transparent man could be
in THE INVISIBLE MAN.  (Wells, incidentally, recognized that a totally
invisible eye would not focus and hence would be blind.  The serum in his
novel leaves the lenses of the eye intact and Wells says, questionably, that
his invisible man just has to take care that the lenses of his eyes are not
seen.)
     Early silent films would occasionally have people turn invisible,
usually for comic visual effect.  1933 brought Universal's adaptation of
Wells's novel and a whole series with it using the special effects of Arthur
Edelson.  Since then there have been only occasional films with invisible
people.  Mexico made a series of "Invisible Man" films; there have been two
television series claiming to be based on the Wells.  Films  like THE
INVISIBLE BOY, THE AMAZING TRANSPARENT MAN, and THE INVISIBLE DR. MABUSE
have used the gimmick.  The 1970s television series with David McCallum was
an early application of bluescreen for the effect.  The latest film version
is MEMOIRS OF AN INVISIBLE MAN based on the novel by H. F. Saint and
directed by John Carpenter.
     Like most of the people Chevy Chase plays, Nick Holloway is in the
wrong place at the wrong time.  In Nick's case the wrong place is
Magnescopics, a high-tech research lab.  The wrong time is when their fusion
experiment goes awry.  (Computer experts beware.  You will NOT like the
scene that shows how the experiment went wrong.  VOYAGE TO THE BOTTOM OF THE
SEA fans might like it, though.)  Through some freak accident, large
portions of the building are rendered invisible.  So is Nick.  What is the
most pedestrian and predictable plot that could come out of this beginning.
Yup!  You got it.  Sam Neill plays the villainous CIA operative who wants to
get hold of Nick and use him as a weapon.  Can one man with the power of
invisibility outwit a CIA assassin who has a whole brigade of men in suits
and sunglasses with guns?  The suspense is terrible and the writing not much
better.  Of course, this is a part made for Chevy Chase since it involves a
lot of falling down and knocking into things.  One of the things he bumps
into is Alice Munro (played by Darryl Hannah) who does not really take much
of an active part in the story.  She is there more to react and to give the
audience someone attractive to look at.  They certainly don't have Chase to
look at.
     Industrial Light and Magic no doubt was anxious to see what their
technology could add to Edelson's invention for the 1933 film.  Edelson's
approach was to put an actor in a black suit so that nothing showed, then
put visible pieces of clothing on the actor and film it against a black
background.  The negative would then be nearly transparent except for the
visible clothing.  Superimposing this on a scene of a room and then printing
the result would give a look of empty clothing.  Bluescreen--ILM's
specialty--is a refinement of this process using video technology.  ILM's
imagination shows with some new invisibility effects, the nicest being a
mask of facepaint visible from front and back.
     The special effects are about the only thing to see this film for.
Well, ..., perhaps there is a little original playing with the concept of
invisibility, but not enough to make it worthwhile.  I give this film a high
0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Bellman and True (1987)
     One tends to think of the United States for crime films.  (I
distinguish between crime films and detective films; a crime film is seen
mostly from the criminal's point of view.)  Having had a large piece of
English-speaking crime, we have also been readier to make crime films than
has England.  yet there have always been a number of modest little crime
films made in England.  Films like LEAGUE OF GENTLEMEN, THE LONG ARM, THE
LAVENDER HILL MOB, and THE LADYKILLERS have been likable but have not gotten
much attention.  More recently some better films have been made, including
THE LONG GOOD FRIDAY and MONA LISA.  BELLMAN AND TRUE is a throwback to the
earlier, more modest British heist films.
     Bernard Hill plays Hiller, an electronics systems analyst who has
accepted a 1000-pound advance to pas bank data to some criminals.  Unable to
deliver the data in any form but on magnetic tape, he runs away, only to be
kidnapped (along with his stepson) by the people he was fleeing.  They want
more than their money back: they want an electronics expert to help them rob
a bank.  The film is about evenly divided between the story of the heist and
Hiller's relationship with his son as they are caught up in the robbery
scheme.
     Frankly, being an engineer myself, I have a fondness for films in which
engineering plays an important part and even tips the scales.  THE DAM
BUSTERS--one of my favorite war films--is as much a film about solving
wartime engineering problems as it is about soldiering.  In a sense
engineering is the core of F/X.  Engineering plays as big a role in this
heist film as it does in the very enjoyable Australian heist film MALCOLM.
One sequence in the film, in fact, appears to be a direct theft from
MALCOLM.  In a few places, the engineering in BELLMAN AND TRUE seems to have
gotten the facts wrong or underestimated the time to put together a
sophisticated piece of toy robotics, but that can be forgiven.
     The serious engineering problems, and the reason I really have to
qualify my recommendation, is in the production, not the story.  The simple
fact is that the film needed subtitles.  I had little trouble cutting
through the thick Cockney accents of THE LONG GOOD FRIDAY or MONA LISA.  But
I missed just too darn much of BELLMAN AND TRUE because the soundtrack
seemed muddled.  there are some clever and witty lines in the film, but some
can be made out only by comparing notes with others.  So as much of the film
as I could understand I rate a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Gladiator (2000)
     It has been many years since we have had a film about ancient
Rome of the sort we have gotten from Ridley Scott, and in some ways
we have never had a film like this.  This is a sort of post-modern
ancient Rome.  I expected to love the giant battle scenes.  But they
start early in the film and my eye kept rebelling at what it was
seeing.  Something was wrong with the images I was seeing.  Scott
has always played with his visual images.  He used to shoot through
incense to create an odd filtered effect.  In GLADIATOR he was doing
a lot more.  I cannot authoritatively say what Scott was doing but
it looked like images in the background were filmed normally, images
in the foreground were moving more jerkily.  I could be wrong, but
it seemed that instead of the foreground images being different each
frame, they were kept on the screen for a count of two or perhaps
even three frames each.  This is impossible to do with normal
filming but it is quite possible with digital processing of images.
For me the irritation is about the same as if there was a buzz on
the soundtrack.  I suppose Scott may have felt that it enhanced the
mythic effect.  Time and again images in the film felt like they had
been tampered with and were somehow off-kilter.  Perhaps I was
over-sensitive, but it was an annoyance that just had to be ignored.
     Of course, Ridley Scott does odd experiments with the visuals.
In this film he frequently plays with fog or smoke.  Other times he
uses backgrounds that look more like postcards than reality.  The
film is heavy on sunrises and sunsets.  Other scenes play with
color.
     The film covers the same historic interval and figures as THE
FALL OF THE ROMAN EMPIRE (1964) and some of the incidents of this
film are borrowed from that rather than history.  Even the fictional
character Livius in the 1964 was carried over as the hero Maximus.
The emperor Marcus Aurelius (Richard Harris) is off in snowy
Germania where he is in the last stages of victory over the
barbarians.  His general Maximus (Russell Crowe) is "unleashing
hell" against the last stronghold of resistance.  Unleashing hell is
releasing the kind of power one probably would have thought required
modern weapons.  The scene fully justifies the fear that most of the
world at that time had of the Romans.  But the most powerful
position in the known world is about to change hands.
     Philosopher and gentle soul Marcus Aurelius wants to restore
the Republic that Julius Caesar abolished.  He knows his son
Commodus is too anxious for power to restore the republic so Marcus
plans to name Maximus as his successor, entrusting him to return the
republic.  But when Marcus breaks this news to Commodus, Commodus
murders his father.  To complete the task he also has a contingent
of men take Maximus to be murdered and another to kill his family.
The general does not die so easily, however.  The attempt to kill
Maximus only leaves him wounded and wandering, then collected as a
slave.  The slave is purchased by a wise old gladiator-turned-
freeman and gladiator-dealer Proximo (Oliver Reed in his last and
probably best role).  The gladiator, now called "the Spaniard" is
sent to Rome to fight before Emperor Commodus, where he hopes he may
work his revenge.  Tired of the war, tired of seeing death, and
disillusioned about the causes he has fought for, the gladiator is
sent to Rome to fight and die in front of audiences anxious to see
death.
     The plot borrows from THE TEN COMMANDMENTS the ruler who
creates jealousy in his son by choosing another as an heir.  It
borrows from BEN HUR the blood feud of old close friends.  There is
even a line borrowed from THE UNTOUCHABLES.  Of course, there is a
lot of SPARTACUS and THE FALL OF THE ROMAN EMPIRE.  The major plot
elements are not new.  But most of what is borrowed is from films of
the last generation.  And some of what is new, like the Ken-
Russell-style surrealistic scenes, seems far more out of place than
they would seem in a film of modern setting.
     Ridley Scott is a reasonable action director with a good feel
for integrating actors with special visual effects.  Somehow Russell
Crowe seems out of place in an ancient setting.  It took a while to
get used to him.  Joaquin Phoenix is actually a little too dignified
and reserved the psychotic Commodus.  For once an actor could have
chewed the scenery and been more faithful to the history books.  It
seems almost cliche to say that an actor who died in the production
gave one of his best performances, but it is true of Oliver Reed who
finally has overcome the stiffness of his earlier acting.  Connie
Nielsen as Lucilla is appealing, though it is a little strange to
see the demure actress cast in the role that in 1964 went to Sophia
Loren.  Derek Jacobi plays a Senator trying to preserve the Senate.
The score by Hans Zimmer is not one of his most memorable.  He is
quick to capitalize on a minor location in Africa, probably because
the LION KING composer is not known for his German or Latin musical
themes.
     With a few reservations for Scott's visual style this is
pleasant return of a type of film we have not seen made since the
60s.  I rate it an 8 on the 0 to 10 scale and a high +2 on the -4 to
+4 scale.
     This film grossly misrepresents the Emperor Commodus whose
actual wacko quotient rivaled Caligula's and Nero's.  The real
Commodus renamed the months of the year to be his twelve titles so
that he might be worshipped each month.  He renamed Rome "The Colony
of Commodus."  He identified himself with Hercules and he would
dress for the role in lion skins and would beat prisoners to death
with a large wooden club.  He would fight in amphitheater as a
gladiator, but would give his opponent a nearly useless lead sword.
Commodus would slaughter animals in the ring, including elephants
and giraffes.  He would behead ostriches with arrows headed with
crescent razors.  All this could have been shown in GLADIATOR and
would have been quite cinematic.  Instead he is reserved and almost
dignified.  As Roman Emperors go, Commodus as portrayed in GLADIATOR
might almost have been respectable.
     It should be noted Commodus showed far more tolerance of
Christians than his father Marcus Aurelius had.  His motives are
open to speculation.
     Eventually those closest to him grew tired of living in the
fear of his capricious displeasure and the immediate death that
might follow.  A conspiracy, likely headed by his mistress Marcia,
poisoned his drink one day on his return from hunting.  When he fell
asleep rather than dying a young wrestler, Narcissus, strangled him
without him resisting.
     Both GLADIATOR and THE FALL OF THE ROMAN EMPIRE, however, have
him die in a dramatic sword fight with the former general of the
German campaign.  In both that general was also a former friend of
Commodus favored for emperor by Marcus Aurelius over Commodus.
Actually Marcus Aurelius had publicly named Commodus his heir and
there is not likely to be any historic record that Marcus favored
anyone else.
     As has been pointed out in the arena the signals were not
thumbs up or thumbs down, it was thumb hidden in fist for life,
thumb sticking out for death.  But the first responsibility of the
director is to communicate hat is going on.  The actors are speaking
English, but they have to speak the audience's language.  The
audience knows thumbs up and thumbs down.
     So there are inaccuracies, but if one waits to the end of the
credits the film clearly says that some of the characters are real
but that the story is fiction.  With that in mind the accuracy of
this film is not at all bad.

Title
Review for In the Name of the Father (1993)
          Capsule review:  This is the true story of the victims
     of a conspiracy by British police to scapegoat eleven
     innocent people, many from a single family, for an IRA
     bombing.  The main character spent fifteen years in prison
     before an enterprising lawyer uncovered the conspiracy and
     was able to overturn the conviction.  Pete Postlethwaite is
     particularly effective as the main character's father who is
     imprisoned in the same cell as his son.  Rating: low +3 (-4
     to +4).
     In 1974 eleven people from Belfast were sentenced to prison for an IRA
bombing of a Surrey pub--four charged with the bombing itself, seven with
complicity.  Fifteen years later that conviction was proven in court to be a
gross miscarriage of justice.  Though this conviction could not have been
obtained without a conspiracy to subvert justice and knowingly to scapegoat
innocent people, the British government has yet to acknowledge wrong-doing.
IN THE NAME OF THE FATHER tells the whole story of one of the men falsely
imprisoned from his background several months before the bombing to his
eventual exoneration.  Daniel Day-Lewis plays Gerry Conlon, a petty thief
who was in the wrong place at the wrong time and is railroaded to prison
along with several members of his family.  Gerry, who has never been able to
get along with his stern father Giuseppe (Pete Postlethwaite), finds he now
must share not a house but a small cell with that father.  Where the film
could have bogged down as standard prison movie fare we find an engrossing
father-son relationship that gives more meaning and poignancy to the court
proceedings that will eventually clear the names of both father and son.
The insertion of this father-son theme would seem contrived in a fictional
account, but since it is true, the film uses it well.
     It almost goes without saying that Daniel Day-Lewis's performance turns
in a good performance.  He is a first rank actor.  Surprisingly, Emma
Thompson is considerably less memorable in a script that does not use her
considerable acting ability.  The real surprise is Pete Postlethwaite as
Guiseppe.  He had roles in ALIEN 3, HAMLET, WATERLAND and with Day-Lewis in
THE LAST OF THE MOHICANS, but none was particularly memorable.  This film
may be a breakthrough for him as a man of character and older values trying
to impart those values to his son.  The relationship that the two are able
to forge only when locked in together is one of the most moving features of
the film.
     Jim Sheridan, who previously directed Daniel Day-Lewis in MY LEFT FOOT,
both directed and co-wrote the screenplay.  Even though the film is 132
minutes, it tells a complete story and never bogs down.  Instead it gets
more engrossing as we come to see more of the pain inflicted by the
miscarriage the degree of wrong-doing on the part of the police.  By the end
of the film Sheridan has really roused the passions of the audience.
     This is a well-crafted film in all regards.  While self-critical
British films are not really a rarity, this is probably among the most
powerful.  I would give this film a low +3 on the -4 to +4 scale and will
almost definitely include it among the top ten films of 1993.

Title
Review for Dirty Rotten Scoundrels (1988)
          Capsule review:  Enjoyable remake of BEDTIME STORY with
     only minor variations.  The contest for ascendency between
     two gigolos still makes a very funny comedy, perhaps more so
     because it has less competition than the story had in 1964.
     It is much like seeing a new production of a play you once
     enjoyed.  It loses a point for borrowing so but from the
     original but still rates a +1.
     Back in 1964 Ralph Levy, a television director, made the first of only
two theatrical films he was to make before returning to television.  BEDTIME
STORY was for the time a minor and somewhat fluffy comedy about two gigolos'
contest to see which one would have to leave a French Riviera town too small
to support more than one gigolo.  There was Lawrence, played by David Niven,
who had made Beaumont-sur-Mer his private hunting ground for finding rich
women to fleece.  And then there was Freddy, a brash young American soldier
with no respect for the culture and no affection for the women he was
preying on.  Freddy was one of Marlon Brando's most memorable roles and
perhaps the only time Brando ever got to play broad comedy.  And Brando was
hilarious throughout the film, but particularly when Freddy was pretending
to be Ruprecht, who was the retarded product of too much inbreeding of
nobility.
     With only minor changes to most of the script--if memory serves, most
of the film even has the same dialogue--the script has been effectively
recycled to make DIRTY ROTTEN SCOUNDRELS.  BEDTIME STORY's script was by
Stanley Shapiro (who also produced that film) and Paul Henning.  DIRTY
ROTTEN SCOUNDRELS' executive producer Dale Launer cut some scenes (including
a few of the better gags), rewrote the ending, and put his name in front of
the other two for screen credit.  The story remains the same.  Whoever can
be the first to charm $50,000 from visiting soap queen Janet earns the right
to rule the roost in Beaumont-sur-Mer.  The loser must leave town.  The new
director, Frank Oz, does little with the principle characters that Levy did
not.  Michael Caine, the new Lawrence, plays his role surprisingly David-
Niven-ish, right down to the thin moustache.  Frank Oz seems to have known
what he wanted from the part but his ideas were formed by seeing the earlier
film.  Steve Martin puts a little more of his own interpretation into
Freddy, but in places like the Ruprecht scenes he is more mimicking Brando
than creating his own character.
     What is surprising about seeing the remake is how good the writing
seems to be today.  In 1964 one would have hardly considered BEDTIME STORY
to have had a really well-crafted script.  Yet today that same script seems
to be much closer to the caliber of A FISH CALLED WANDA than to that of
BEETLEJUICE or SCROOGED.  It deals in genuinely funny situations, not just
funny personalities.  What was ordinary writing in 1964 is well above
average in 1988.  Had this been a completely original script, DIRTY ROTTEN
SCOUNDRELS would have gotten an easy +2.  As it stands it still gets a high
+1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Star Trek VI: The Undiscovered Country (1991)
[I am posting five reviews of STAR TREK VI.  I could easily swamp the group
with reviews of this movie, so I will probably not post any more unless
they say something very different than those posted here (e.g., a review
of the fashions in STAR TREK VI :-) ).  Followups are directed to
rec.arts.startrek to keep the discussion in the appropriate group.
-Moderator]
     Dearly beloved, we are gathered for the final adventure of the original
crew of the starship Enterprise.  The remote control has been passed to a
new generation who are less and less interested in seeing swash-buckling
heroes the age of their grandparents.  And if the truth be known, Captain
Kirk, Scotty, and Uhura are all sporting spare tires around the middle these
days.  Bones looks old.  Spock seems to be ageing the best of the original
crew and comes the closest to still being dashing.  I guess on at least some
level that is not surprising.  We always knew there was something very
different about Spock and it just sort of rubbed off on Leonard Nimoy.
     So what sort of adventure is the final outing?  The title implies that
the plot in a major way involves "death--the undiscover'd country, from
whose bourn no traveller returns," an allusion to the "To be or not to be"
speech from Act III, Scene 1 of HAMLET.  So did the filmmakers have the
courage to kill off someone we loved and make that death meaningful, or did
they find some way to cop out?  Well, that would be telling!  In any case,
the main story is an end-of-the-Cold-War thriller, much like THE PACKAGE but
reset in the "Star Trek" universe.
     When the film opens, a Klingon Chernobyl incident has convinced the
evil empire that the time has come for perestroika.  On each side there are
hard-liners who still live with the paranoia of the past, and new-liners who
want to see a reconciliation and a new universe order.  One Federation
hard-liner is that crusty old Cold Warrior, Captain James Kirk (played
somewhat against type by William Shatner).  One of the new-liners is an old
associate of his, Commander Spock (played this time around by Leonard
Nimoy).  The plot then proceeds to set up a fairly intriguing mystery and
puzzle.  An incident occurs that seems totally inexplicable.  Kirk is framed
to appear to have sabotaged the peace.  This is the high point of the film.
Unfortunately, the mystery's solution is very unconvincing.  It is nearly as
bad as the strategy puzzle in STAR TREK II: THE WRATH OF KHAN.  That one was
solved by the scriptwriter saying, "Oh, didn't you know?  The Enterprise has
the power to shut down the shields on other federation ships!"  The solution
to the puzzle here is not as bad as that of the WRATH OF KHAN problem, but
it is bad.  I will explain why in a spoiler after the review.
     Other touches were irritating, like repeated allusions to both
Shakespeare and Sherlock Holmes.  It is a strange and unlikely touch that
Klingons revere William Shakespeare and even claim him as a Klingon.
     With the exception of one violent scene in zero gravity the special
effects are not particularly new or creative, though many of the exteriors
in space are still quite beautiful.  Occasionally narrow-angle shots were
used when showing a new locale on a planet.  This was probably to save on
the creation of sets since less would be within the range of the camera, but
it is a stark contrast to earlier chapters.
     Two problems in casting were minor problems.  The first was an
unaccountable resemblance between the Klingon David Warner played in STAR
TREK VI and the kidnapped diplomat he played in STAR TREK V.  Also,
Christian Slater plays the kid who has won a contest and got to play in a
scene of a real "Star Trek" movie.  He has one brief, no-talent-needed
scene.
     Spoiler: For two reasons I think that the solution to the mystery
torpedo problem is bad.  First, it assumes a new piece of technology to come
along at a perfect but unlikely moment.  That is possible but it seems a
plot contrivance.  What bothers me more is the geometry of the situation.  A
photon torpedo travels in a straight line.  If that line does not intersect
your torpedo tubes, it was not your torpedo.  It would be hard to position
another torpedo tube so the trajectory could be close enough to fool the
bridge.  Ideally the attackers would want to be in front of your torpedo
tubes, but they could not because of the instantaneous loss of cloaking.
Their would have to position themselves so that their torpedo would fly in
just the right plane.  Even then, if the trajectory was observed from
elsewhere on the Enterprise, the jig would have been up.  If the victim ship
were watching the Enterprise, they would have seen an impossible torpedo
trajectory and also, for an instant, the ship that was firing on them.
     Question: if a shape-changer wanted to prove she was a shape changer,
wouldn't she just change her shape?  Evelyn asked this one.

Title
Review for Mrs. Brown (1997)
     In 1861 Prince Albert, husband to Queen Victoria, died and the
Queen went into mourning where she stayed for the rest of her life.
For three years she did little but grieve.  Clothes each day were set
out for Albert, who fortunately never appeared to put them on.  She had
few responsibilities as Queen, but she ignored even them.  And the
public missed their view of royalty.  The Times labeled her "The Great
Absentee."  Finally she did appear for the opening of parliament but
apparently in such a depressed state that it was said that she should
not have bothered.
     Then a servant from Scotland, John Brown, came to Windsor to serve
her there in the position of gillie, a sort of attendant.  In spite
of--or perhaps because of--his candor he was able to pull her out of
her doldrums. He became a confidante and a friend, though at least
according to the account in the film MRS. BROWN he never had much power
over her other than the power of common sense.  Nevertheless Victoria's
unwillingness to return to the full level of her responsibilities
combine with her friendship with him gave the public the opinion that
he had a good deal more power than he actually had, suggesting that he
was her master and she was his mistress.  The crisis ended when the
wisdom of Disraeli prevailed and the Queen began showing up more
frequently in public and the people got their taste of royalty.
     This is the story of that relationship written by Jeremy Brock and
directed by John Madden for broadcast on the BBC and on PBS's
MASTERPIECE THEATER. Queen Victoria is played by Judi Dench who has a
long history of Shakespearean acting, but perhaps is most easily
recognized as James Bond's new M from GOLDENEYE.  Billy Connolly plays
the beefy John Brown with full mustache and beard (the original had
only the beard).  As the film opens Victoria is behaving not so much
like a queen as like a spoiled child who refuses to cooperate with
anyone because of the monumental loss of Prince Albert.  She is also
angered that Albert died with the title Queen's Consort rather than
King.  The early part of the story is very reminiscent of the film
PASSION FISH.  Brown insists that the Queen needs fresh air and
manipulates her into riding. In his company she regains some of her
will to return to life.  Brown is less than an idealist, however.  He
uses his friendship with the Queen for power in the Royal household.
He drinks heavily and while he is willing be candid with the Queen, in
any disagreement with others, he will back up the Queen's side like a
yes man.  This earns him enemies in high places.
     Victoria has returned to the stream of life but she is willing to
go only so far.  She will go to Balmoral in Scotland to take in the
Scottish scenery, but she does not want to return to England and her
social responsibilities.  Antony Sher plays young and sharp-witted
Benjamin Disraeli, not yet a friend of Victoria, nor is he deserving to
be.  He dubs Victoria Mrs. Brown.  But his wisdom prevails.
     Richard Greatrex's camera keeps the style of the film physically
subdued.  The production is painted in large part in blacks, browns and
deep reds.  Much of the film takes place in half-dark rooms and often
Greatrex will film a character in shadow.  The film's most interesting
sequence is just showing Victoria and her two daughters going swimming
and seeing what modesty was common in those days for royalty as her
enclosed cart backs up to the lake on a rope arrangement so that she
may step down the steps into the water. Then she steps out covered from
neck to foot.  MRS. BROWN offers very credible look at the powerful
people in England in the mid to late 1800s, but it lacks any real
dramatic punch.  There are no great secrets and much of the
relationship between Brown and Victoria remains unknown and presumably
lost with Brown's diary.  The film lacks dramatic punch and when it is
all over the viewer is left to wonder what was the point.  I rate it a
+1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Jing cha gu shi IV: Jian dan ren wu (1996)
     The Hong-Kong-based Jackie Chan has been making a rather free-form
series of crime films which are best known as his POLICE STORY films.
Depending on how you count them, FIRST STRIKE is either the fourth or
fifth film in this series.  It is probably the fourth, but another
film, PROJECT S, was released as if it were part of the POLICE STORY
series and called by alternate titles that include POLICE STORY 4 and
SUPERCOP 2.  That almost makes sense because SUPERCOP was an alternate
title of POLICE STORY 3. In general, the more titles a film can be
given the more people who will see it a second time not realizing they
have seen it before.  In any case, this time around Chan is departing
from the police motif and making a sort of poor man's James Bond film.
And he has the action scenes down pretty well.  In fact, his film has
better stunts than most Bond films.  The only problem is that at a time
when the James Bond plots are deteriorating, they are still better and
much more complex than a Chan plot.  Chan's film is little more than an
excuse to string together a series of admittedly pretty exciting action
scenes.  One has the distinct feeling that the stunts are planned
first, then a plot is written to connect the stunts.  Not that Chan is
not a wonder to watch.  When Chan gets going he is a marvel of grace
and at times his stunts are difficult to believe.  But while this film
tries to be like a Bond film--not all that ambitious a goal,
particularly of late--FIRST STRIKE is less like a spy film than it is
like a collection of circus acts.
     It would almost be a mistake to say that FIRST STRIKE has a plot.
Basically there is just enough so that Chan can get into a series of
fights.  Jackie (played by Jackie Chan for the first time under
something approaching his own name) has performed well in a mission for
the CIA and they have decided to ask him to go on another mission
almost as a perk.  Jackie is to fly from Hong Kong to Ukraine, just
watching a beautiful woman whom the CIA is following.  Once he gets to
the far end he can have a short vacation at the expense of the CIA.
But at the far end he finds there is more involved in the case than he
expected when he sees what appears to be a kidnapping.  Soon Chan is
chasing through snow pursued by soldiers in white parkas and what looks
like white hockey masks.  Not long after he is fighting muscle-bound
assassins proportioned like TV's The Tick.  There are a few
complications in the plot, a few silly comedy situations, and a few
fights using props at hand.  While the centerpiece of RUMBLE IN THE
BRONX was a fight involving a grocery basket, this time he does
considerably more with a folding ladder.
     What Chan is making are not films in the traditional sense.
Instead he is showing off for the camera, taking risks that probably no
other actor making films today would dare.  And Chan makes no secret of
the fact that a lot of times things go awry as he is filming and he
goes through a lot of physical pain to create the stunts he is showing
us.  More frequently than most other actors would tolerate, things go
very wrong and he comes near to physical injury.  When he jumps off a
cliff and grabs for the skid of a helicopter I think we know that it is
probably not a real cliff, but also that there is a real physical
danger to Chan to even shoot the scene.  We watch him with a
fascination that is almost perverse as he takes one dangerous risk
after another and that is the real soul of his films, knowing we are
seeing real danger.  And so nobody doubts that Chan is taking real
risks, he includes his out-takes collection at the end to prove how
close he really came near to serious injuries.  In what plot there is,
the characters other than Chan become props almost as much as the
inanimate objects around which he flows.  Nobody does much acting in
one of his films and Chan does little but a little mugging for the
camera.  Chan is the only character who has a chance to be a character
and he does not take that acting part of his work seriously.
     FIRST STRIKE--there is no explanation of the title of the film, by
the way--is a lampoon of a Bond film and J. Peter Robinson plays along
at times giving us imitation John Barry music, but something short of
the real thing.  Chan has some comic talent and appears to enjoy living
dangerously.  But most of what it would take to make this film really
tick is still missing.  I rate FIRST STRIKE a high 0 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Shanghai Noon (2000)
     Even worse than the spy genre, the Western genre is in clear
decline.  The film industry has lost the recipe for making good
riveting Westerns.  Now they can make only repetitive parodies that
mock the conventions of the Western and which do not have the soul
that made Westerns great.  The features that used to come cheap--the
horses and the scenery--now make Westerns prohibitively expensive to
make.  Perhaps the Western will return with digitized horses and
blue screen sunsets, who knows?  I spared myself last year's THE
WILD, WILD WEST, but SHANGHAI NOON looked moderately better.  It
probably was.
     Bringing a Chinese martial artist to the Old West has some of
the same possibilities as bringing a samurai in the only partially
successful mixture of genres of RED SUN (1971).  Sure enough, this
film has all the standard Western cliches we could have listed
BEFORE seeing the film.  We have a moving train robbery (only
slightly less cliched is the fact it is committed by amateurs and
incompetents).  We have a visit to a cathouse.  We have an escape
from an evil sheriff's jail.  We have a visit to an Indian village.
And, of course, there is a saloon brawl.  And there is a showdown on
a town street.  Miles Millar and Alfred Gough seem to have written
the script with a checklist.  Each cliche circumstance is revisited
with an eye toward how it might be a little different if a comic
Chinese martial artist involved.  Even so nothing more creative than
a three-way fistfight is attempted.  There are also wide vistas
filmed to stirring music whetting our appetites for a real Western,
but the film only reminds us that the film industry has lost that
particular ability.
     The film opens in Beijing, in the Forbidden City.  Chon Wang
(played by Jackie Chan) is a hapless member of the Imperial Guard,
charged with scrubbing floors and protecting Princess Pei Pei (Lucy
Alexis Liu).  The princess, wishing to avoid an arranged marriage,
agrees to be taken to Carson City, Nevada.  Along the way she
realizes that her companion is really kidnapping her.  Wang is sent
to Nevada with his uncle to rescue her.  The uncle is killed when
the train is robbed by a band of inept train robbers.  Chon teams
with their leader Roy O'Bannon (Owen Wilson) in an attempt to save
the princess.  What does all this have to do with Shanghai or noon?
Not a thing.  But by giving the film a pointless name the writers
could squeeze one more joke out.  Many of the gags will be familiar
including the "horsing around" of a trained horse.  One weakness of
the script is the dependency on one character, who shall remain
nameless here, who gets the characters out of several nasty patches,
but otherwise seems never to be around.  This is just too easy an
answer for how the main characters are going to escape their
problems.
     In spite of the rather unimaginative plotting and scripting
Owen Wilson and Jackie Chan each turn in engaging performances.
Remarkably, Wilson holds his own against Chan, perhaps even making
himself the more interesting character.  The stress is less on
Chan's martial arts than in his classic films.  These fights still
seem very orchestrated.  I have no doubts that if Chan got into a
real fight he would probably still give a very good account of
himself, but I suspect it would look very different from the
stylized and contrived fights he has in his films.  These are
choreographed to show off his natural grace.
     Daniel Mindel's cinematography is frequently quite good, though
many of his effects are overly familiar.  When bullets shot through
a wall each gave rise to a column of light in BLOOD SIMPLE, it was
an impressive effect.  Now it is over-used and once again here we
see it used.  He does get some nice Nevada landscapes and it is hard
not to make the Forbidden City in Beijing look impressive.  Oh, and
yes, I can confirm what Jackie Chan fans already know.  The viewer
should sit through the credits to see the out-takes from the
filming.
     Overall SHANGHAI NOON this is just a passable entertainment
which gets from me a rating of 5 on the 0 to 10 scale and a low +1
on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Stealing Home (1988)
          Capsule review:  Can spoiled rich kid Billy Wyatt take
     only a half-step in downward mobility by playing minor league
     baseball, or will he spend the rest of his life living with
     cocktail waitresses in motels.  Can he decide what to do with
     the ashes of the only woman who ever really meant anything to
     him?  Does anyone really care?  Nicely photographed, well
     edited, but diffuse.  Rating: 0.
     STEALING HOME is the story of Billy Wyatt at three times in his life.
Billy remembers the story in a set of flashbacks as he remembers the woman
who was his best friend and his greatest inspiration.  She is Katie Chandler
(played by Jodie Foster) who back when Billy was ten was his 16-year-old
babysitter.  The intermixed flashbacks, moving forward and backward in time,
follow his memories of his learning of her suicide six months earlier and of
her bewildering request that it be him who decides what to do with her
ashes.  That established, Billy starts thinking about his whole relationship
with Katie.  We see Billy as a boy, as a teenager, and as a man as he pieces
together his history with her, culminating in the all-important decision(?)
of where to sprinkle her oxidized remains.  Of course, the decision of
whether he will live all this life off his wealthy mother's money--do you
believe Blair Brown of ALTERED STATES and CONTINENTAL DIVIDE is already
playing a mother with a grown son?--or whether he grow up and make something
of himself by playing minor league baseball is also important.
     I cannot say this film has a whole lot of anything.  For the teenage-
Billy scenes, STEALING HOME tastes a little like SUMMER OF '42 concentrate.
It seems that Billy's best friend is infatuated with a woman he sees on the
beach and, under cover of dark each night, he goes to stare in her bedroom
window.  It is not really clear what all this has to do with Billy's
relationship with Katie, but then Billy's reminiscences do not seem to be
coming from a well-ordered mind and if they didn't get off the subject there
would not be enough material here to fill a full-length film.
     Just as the story is a bit diffuse, so are Mark Harmon's and William
McNamara's performances as Billy, man and boy.  Trying to play a sort of
worldly teen and woman, Jodie Foster is not going to be impressing anyone.
This is a film that is as soft and sweet as a bowl of Maypo.  Recommended to
nostalgiphiles only.  Rate it a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Indiana Jones and the Last Crusade (1989)
     It is no real secret.  The Hollywood wonder-boy of twelve summers ago
and much of the time since, George Lucas, is hurting for money.  Things have
not really panned out for him.  HOWARD THE DUCK, which featured the greatest
technological duck special effects the screen has ever seen, laid an egg.
And it was NOT a golden egg.  That was only one of several projects that
have enhanced neither Lucas's fortune nor his reputation.  Lucas needs a
hit.  That much seems to be fact.  My opinion is that Lucas knows how to
have a pit if all he wants is a hit rather than trying something new and
original.  He just makes another one of his series films.  It takes too long
to do a STAR WARS film, so he did another Indiana Jones film instead.  The
one drawback is INDIANA JONES AND THE TEMPLE OF DOOM was a disappointment
and done much more in the Spielberg style than in the style Lucas put into
RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARK.  Spielberg directs all the Indy films, of course,
but I suspect some of the exaggerated cartoonish feel of the second film was
Spielberg's.  And many of the fans preferred the style of the first film.
All Lucas really needed for a hit was to do again what he did with RAIDERS.
And he did.  The style of the first film is back.  Welcome back.
     INDIANA JONES AND THE LAST CRUSADE semi-fulfills Lucas's unrealistic
promise that each episode would be a prequel to the one made before it.
Harrison Ford is not getting younger.  So of the three films, this takes
place the latest, but there is an extended flashback in which we learn a lot
of H=how Indiana Jones became Indiana Jones.  The young Indy is played by
River Phoenix, who almost resembles a young Harrison Ford, and in fact
played Ford's son in MOSQUITO COAST.  In Indy's early adventure we see where
he got a lot of what he becomes and even what he wears.  When he gets older
we also get introduced to his father (voiced, and in later scenes played, by
Sean Connery).  Indy is once again after a Biblical treasure.  Earlier it
was the greatest prize of the Old Testament, the Ark of the Covenant.  This
time it is the greatest prize of the New testament, the Holy Grail.
     Do you remember what you liked about the first film?  If you said Karen
Allen, you are out of luck.  This time Indy's female sidekick is Elsa
Schneider (played by Alison Doody), the most attractive of the traveling
companions of the three films, but also the one with the least real
personality.  That means in this aspect, as in most aspects, this is better
than the second Indy film but not up to the original.  If you said you liked
just about anything else about the original--the gritty chases, the fights,
the baroque Nazi military equipment, the ancient sites that are gamuts of
booby traps, the snakes, whatever--you are in luck.  It is all back and
more.  You also get Indy's love/hate relationship with his father.  You get
to see more of Sallah and Marcus Brody (played by John Rhys-Davies and
Denholm Elliot respectively).  One disappointment is that they did a Nigel-
Bruce on Denholm Elliot's character (i.e., they turned a perfectly serious
and interesting character into a buffoon).  But for almost any reason that
you liked the first Indy film, you will also like the third.  On the -4 to
+4 scale, I give RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARK a +3, INDIANA JONES AND THE TEMPLE
OF DOOM a flat 0, and INDIANA JONES AND THE LAST CRUSADE a high +2, missing
a +3 only for its lack of originality.

Title
Review for Me, Myself & Irene (2000)
     The American public was introduced to the subject of split
personality with the 1957 film THE THREE FACES OF EVE.  Two years
later Hitchcock used the concept for horror impact in PSYCHO.  Since
then the concept has frequently been used in comedy, but rarely
well.  Steve Martin may have come the closest to a good comedy about
multiple personality in ALL OF ME (though technically speaking that
was more about spirit possession).  With that possible exception the
concept has never been used effectively in comedy.  ME, MYSELF, &
IRENE is not an exception.
     Charlie Bailygates (played by Jim Carrey) is a gentle soul who
happens to be a Rhode Island State Trooper.  How he manages is
unclear because people just laugh at him and figuratively walk all
over him.  The whole town knows he is a soft touch and a nice guy.
And they rudely take advantage of his good nature.  Even after his
wife runs off with another man leaving him with three children he
still cannot express his sorrow and anger.  When it finally does
come out it is as a fully formed second personality, Hank.  But when
Charlie is asked to escort Irene (Renee Zellweger) to New York and
they runs afoul of some corrupt police, the extra personality comes
in handy.
     This film spreads itself thinly among three goals.  It wants to
be a chase film about police corruption, it wants to be a comedy
about split personality, and it wants to mix in as many crude jokes
as it can--the cruder the better.  The three tasks are really more
than it can handle well.  We find out various people who are
involved with the police corruption, but it is never explained what
it all about.  The schizophrenia plot is not very creative in its
ideas and certainly leaves room for a sequel with all new jokes
(Heaven help us).  The scatological humor could work well with
sufficient shock value, but even that is wearing thin.  It can spice
up a film that has enough else going for it, but by itself it does
not make the film worth seeing.  Less might very well be a little
more here.  Basically they need a plot that stands without the shock
jokes.  This one does not.
     Jim Carrey will never be in the Dustin Hoffman range of actors
in anything but paycheck, but here he has returned to the shock
humor that gave him his start.  He manages well as a physical
comedian but the gags are stale.  Renee Zellweger plays his
bewildered foil in the kind of role Terri Garr used to take so well.
She has already done better and more challenging work.  We have the
super-mellow Robert Forster who does not have a lot to do as Jim
Carrey's superior in the state troopers.  Almost directly opposite
is Chris Cooper, who is getting a lot of roles these days.  Where
Forster seem so imperturbable, Cooper always looks like he is
holding back a storm of emotion.  He is probably wishing he could
get more roles like OCTOBER SKY.  I know I am.
     This is standard summer fluff and probably not a film that will
win any new fans for the Farrelly brothers comedies.  I give it 4 on
the 0 to 10 scale and a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.  (If you see it,
stay through the credits.)

Title
Review for Gorillas in the Mist (1988)
          Capsule review:  A substantial and provocative film,
     GORILLAS IN THE MIST tells us the story of Dian Fossey, who
     made herself one of the leading experts on mountain gorillas
     and who fought for their preservation.  Rating: +2.
     GORILLAS IN THE MIST is the biography of Dian Fossey, a physical
therapist who dropped her entire life and went to live in Central Africa to
study gorillas.  It is the story of a passage from being a naive and selfish
young dilettante to being a lion of a woman, fighting for the survival of
the mountain gorillas of Rwanda.
     As the film opens, there is little admirable about Dian Fossey (played
by Sigourney Weaver).  She rudely arrives in the middle of a lecture by the
famous Dr. Louis Leakey (played by Ian Cuthbertson).  She even borrows a
pencil for notes and apparently does not return it.  She doggedly follows
Leakey, however, to persuade him to hire her to use her therapy skills to
take a gorilla census.  After a series of misadventures, she discovers the
skills to approach gorillas and even to make unprecedented physical contact
with them.  This minor victory and a new-found instinct to protect the
gorilla family she comes to know transforms her from a shallow amateur to a
woman with a cause.  Almost immediately she recognizes the dangers that
others of her species pose to her new-found family, and she finds clever and
crafty ways to outsmart the poachers who prey on the gorillas.
     For a while Fossey considers a relationship with a NATIONAL GEOGRAPHIC
photographer who has come to do a story on her work.  And there is where the
film makes its biggest mistake.  At this point the film decides to
concentrate on the mating habits of humans.  Director Michael Apted wastes
the unique locale and the characters to tell a rather dull love story that
goes on entirely too long.  Luckily it does not become the major thrust of
GORILLAS IN THE MIST.
     After this rather annoying diversion the film returns to the main
storyline.  GORILLAS IN THE MIST is at its best when it shows how Fossey
learned about the gorillas or how she fought poachers to help preserve the
species, not when it concentrates on the love life.
     GORILLAS IN THE MIST is something of a departure for director Michael
Apted, whose best known film is the remarkable 28 UP, the documentary that
interviews the same group of people at ages 7, 14, 21, and 28.  Yet both
films show an interest in how apes and men inherit what they are and what
they will become. Interestingly the film's associate producer and the source
of its special effects is Rick Baker,  a superb creator of makeup
specializing in realistic portrayals of apes.  Almost undoubtedly he also
acted in the film though his name is not listed among the "mimes" in the
credits.  (He proves once more that the shoddy ape work he did in the title
role of the 1976 KING KONG was forced on him and below his standards.)
     At its worst GORILLAS IN THE MIST is no worse than mediocre and it does
achieve moments of magnificence.  Rate it a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Ever After (1998)
     One thing the world did not need was yet another telling of the
Cinderella story, particularly one that gives Cinderella the values and
qualities of a 1990s woman.  Given that that is true, and that the
story has been much revised, this is at least a watchable version that
benefits from a sumptuous production.  Normally it is bad policy for a
filmmaker to adapt a famous story and then to revise it.  However, in
this case there is a framing sequence in which an old woman, a Grand
Dame, is telling the Grimm Brothers what really happened and proving it
by showing them the actual glass slipper that apparently had been in
her family for a long time.  Saying that she is going to tell "what
really happened" covers a multitude of revisions to the classic story
and even a few anachronisms.  While a film like ROBIN HOOD, PRINCE OF
THIEVES claims to be the story of Robin Hood and then tells its own
story, EVER AFTER starts right out by saying the Grimm Brothers had it
wrong.  There is even a nod to the historical fact that in the original
Grimm story the shoe is a fur slipper.  The story was mistranslated to
English and "fur" became "glass," words that I am told sound similar in
French.
     Once we are past the framing sequence the scene shifts to 16th
Century France where a widower father, Auguste (played by Jeroen
Krabbe) very deeply loves his precocious eight-year-old daughter
Danielle (Anna Maguire).  So that his daughter will have a family he
marries the enigmatic Rodmilla (Angelica Huston).  Very soon after the
marriage Auguste dies.  Flash forward ten years and the household under
Rodmilla's rule has a very definite pecking order.  Danielle (now Drew
Barrymore) is basically just a servant.  In a rather nice variation on
tradition only one of the stepsisters, Marguerite, is beautiful, vain,
and cruel.  The other sister, Jacqueline, is rather plain, but decent
and sympathetic to her stepsister.  Her heart is good though she rarely
has the courage to say anything.  Jacqueline is just one position above
Danielle in the house pecking order.  Everything in the house is ruled
over by Rodmilla, who sees things her own way.  As she goes back on a
promise she says, "Nothing is final until you are dead.  And then I am
sure God negotiates."
     To rescue a house servant, Danielle must pose as a woman of the
court and in that guise she captures the attention of Prince Henry
(Dougray Scott).  He is amazed that this woman is willing to argue with
her prince.  And he is more amazed that when she argues she invariably
wins.  For once it seems that what a prince finds stimulating is a
woman's intellect, not her looks.  This variation on the traditional
fairy tale has among its revisions that there is no fairy godmother
protecting Cinderella.  Instead, visiting court is none other than
Leonardo da Vinci (Patrick Godfrey) and he comes off nearly as magical.
I guess that Leonardo was about as close as you could get to wizardry
in the 1500s without it actually being wizardry.
     Drew Barrymore is reasonable as Danielle, though neither the
director nor the camera really coaxes much deep pain or emotion from
her.  She has a sort of hurt-child look that might be acceptable for
this role, but does not quite work in the scenes in which she is
supposed to be a formidable fighter or look stunning.  Speaking of
stunning, the stepmother is also supposed to be attractive according to
the script and while Angelica Houston is a good character actor, it is
never clear why Auguste is so taken with her.  Her acting does have the
fairy tale villain feel, however, an artifact of films like THE
WITCHES.  And she does qualify as one of the better features of this
film.  Dougray Scott is something of a surprise.  Initially he comes
off as just a handsome hunk without a lot of acting talent.  But he
does have a very expressive face, when he bothers to use it.  That
could make him a very enjoyable comic actor in the style of Hugh
Laurie.  Also along for the ride is Timothy West, one of those solid
British actors who will always turn in a quality performance.  Having
Jeanne Moreau in the framing sequence does a lot for the film.  She
certainly is one of the great ladies of French cinema.
     EVER AFTER is something of a surprise.  Nothing great here, but it
is a pleasant film to watch and is nicely visualized.  I give it a 6 on
the 0 to 10 scale and a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Orlando (1992)
          Capsule review:  This is a critically acclaimed
     adaptation of the novel by Virginia Woolf, but while it is
     visually beautiful, the story is empty.  This is a story
     about someone who has lived for ten times my age through
     fascinating periods of history--lived for some period as a
     man and some as a woman--yet who seems to have learned
     nothing beyond the superficial and has none but the blandest
     insights to share.  Rating: 0 (-4 to +4).
     It has been said that youth is wasted on the wrong people.  In ORLANDO
we see eternal youth wasted on absolutely the wrong person.  We are led to
believe that Orlando is immortal due to a promise he made to Queen Elizabeth
that he would remain forever young, and his later conversion to a female is
due to some unknown mystical process (perhaps similar to the process Gregor
Samsa encountered).  Actually, this film supports the interpretation that
Orlando is so slightly invested in living at all that s/he never uses up the
life he was born with.  Orlando is barely alive at all, much less male or
female, so shifting from one to the other seems hardly surprising.  Tilda
Swinton manages this feat of seeming barely alive with a face that is
drained of color and nearly impassive.  Her reactions are entirely performed
by widening or narrowing her eyes while leaving the rest of her face
deadpan--the same acting technique that Bud Cort used in much of HAROLD AND
MAUDE.  In face, it can be an effective technique that leaves the audience
to read their own interpretation into the expression.
     The story is, of course, that the handsome Orlando is a favorite of a
near-death Elizabeth I.  The aging queen is played by Quentin Crisp in what
is apparently a casting pun.  In short episodes Orlando has an ill-fated
love affair with a visiting Russian noblewoman and an ambassadorship to
someplace in Central Asia.  He then falls into a coma and wakes up a woman.
"Same person; no difference at all, just a different sex," she tells the
audience after having almost no reaction to her gender flip-flop.  It does,
however, raise her consciousness on women's issues.  I will not ruin the
story and tell how it ends except to say it is not really a story, nor does
it have an end.  It does, however, take Orlando to a time in the 1990s--or
certainly in the last quarter of this century--must require some license in
adapting Virginia Woolf's 1928 novel.
     ORLANDO is a novel adaptation for the 1990s.  The visual imagery far
outstrips the plot.  The film has superb camerawork and terrific costume
designs.  Tilda Swinton is often upstaged by her own clothing, which is as
over-stated as her performance is under-stated.  The film is really not a
lot more than a series of historical tableaux.  It is like walking through a
museum of British dress of the last four centuries.
     This film has been very popular with critics, and perhaps I was looking
for another film, but the absurdity of the story bothered me.  Not the
fantasy premise of the deathless person moving through the ages or even the
changing of sex, but for the idea that Orlando could have lived so long and
apparently remained so vapid and lacking in insight.  This is apparently a
person who takes a long, long, long time to learn anything.  Twice she is in
love relationships.  They are very parallel relationships, or even the same
relationship, that she goes through once as a man and once as a woman.  Yet
there is no sign that she recognizes the situation and she says nothing
insightful about it at all.
     ORLANDO is a short ninety-three minutes.  Some scenes seem to go on too
long and when it is over one feels that not much has happened.  When it was
over I had the distinct feeling that neither I nor Orlando had learned much
from the extraordinary experience.  I rate this one a 0 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Tomorrow Never Dies (1997)
     If one looks at FROM RUSSIA WITH LOVE, there is a lot that
happening in the film.  The plot involves British intelligence, Russian
intelligence, Turkish intelligence, and SPECTRE.  Within SPECTRE there
are competing agents chess champion Kronstein vs. Rosa Klebb.  There is
a false seduction and other double crosses.  There are also fights and
chases, but they are each relatively short in duration.  When Bond
fights Grant it is a believable fight and Grant is dispatched in three
or four minutes.  Then the plot starts moving forward again.  The
result was that FROM RUSSIA WITH LOVE was a James Bond thriller.  If
you have James Bond captured by the nasties and twenty minutes later he
is still escaping and the plot is still at a standstill, it does not
matter how many cars have been blown up, how many people have been
shot, or how many helicopters have crashed.  What you have may be a
James Bond action film, but it is not a thriller.  If Bond has to do
some clever deductive work to realize what the villain is up to, you
may have a thriller.  If Bond's success just happens because by
coincidence he is in the right place at the right time, you might have
an action film, but you do not have a thriller.  TOMORROW NEVER DIES
has an unfortunate shortage of plot complexity.  It is an action film
with James Bond, but it is not a James Bond thriller.
     After a shaky start in his first film, Pierce Brosnan is every bit
the James Bond that Roger Moore was, for whatever that is worth.
TOMORROW NEVER DIES reminds on of a Roger Moore Bond film.  After a
mostly irrelevant opening sequence we have a British battleship first
buzzed by Chinese MiGs, then chewed up by some sort of mechanical
device that combines aspects of a torpedo, a tunnel borer, and a
lamprey.  It goes to the bottom much like the Titanic, the film about
which was released in the same weekend.  (I wonder if the allusion
could have been intentional.)  The British and Chinese governments are
on the point of war and James Bond is sent off to figure out another
puzzle.  It seems that while sea-water was still leaking into the
battleship, news of the attack had already leaked out.  It was on the
news channel before anyone could have possibly known unless they knew
in advance the attack was to happen.  The news channel is ruled over by
magnate Elliot Carver (played by Jonathan Pryce).  Pryce seems to
comprise the worst aspects of Ted Turner, Rupert Murdoch, Bill Gates,
and a lamprey.  Can it be that Carver is actually creating the news--
WAG THE DOG style--for his own ends?  Wait till you hear the reasons
why!  But Bond has to get his information pumping Paris Carver (Teri
Hatcher), former Bond lover and now Mrs. Elliot Carver.  The plot works
like a too-well-oiled machine taking us from one fifteen-minute action
sequence to one that is possibly twenty minutes without ever slowing
down for the audience to ask if it all makes sense, which it does not.
     Along for the ride this time are Judi Dench as M, trying to look
as much as possible like Bernard Lee with two X-chromosomes and
frighteningly succeeding.  Desmond Llewelyn is trying to give the
impression that a job in the Secret Service is for life.  He is
probably there mostly for continuity as is Joe Don Baker's superfluous
Jack Wade, formerly of GOLDENEYE.  Jonathan Pryce is a great actor who
makes a nearly colorless Bond villain.  Two characters are not
colorless and should have been used to considerably advantage.  One was
a Chinese agent played by Malaysian actress Michelle Yeoh, a sort of
female Jackie Chan who could well have out-performed Brosnan in the
action scenes.  The other was a terrific small role for Vincent
Schiavelli as Dr. Kaufman, expert in torture and other infamous arts.
Schiavelli has one short delectable scene in a role that cried out to
be expanded.  Also there is a totally lackluster and boring acting job
by Bond's car.  The scenes in which the car appears look like second
rate automobile ads, which by an odd coincidence is exactly what they
are.  (I would not mention that here, but since the filmmakers accepted
all that nice money from the manufacturer to pose the car so much more
carefully than they pose any of the human characters, I feel obliged to
review the car's performance.)
     As a director Roger Spottiswoode is, well, spotty.  His UNDER FIRE
was a very solid political film.  His made for cable adaptation of AND
THE BAND PLAYED ON was a high-point of its year.  Let us not, however,
dwell on his STOP! OR MY MOM WILL SHOOT.  As a director of a Bond film
he was only middling successful.  He should have exerted more control
on the script, making it more intelligent and refusing the product
placements.  David Arnold has written an acceptably John Barry-sounding
score built around Barry's James Bond theme (credited falsely to Monty
Norman).
     TOMORROW NEVER DIES is below average for the Bond films to date.
They never even bother to tell the viewer what the title means.  I rate
the new Bond film a 5 on the 0 to 10 scale and a high 0 on the -4 to +4
scale

Title
Review for Household Saints (1993)
     If a miracle happened today, would we believe it?  Would we explain it
away?  How would people react?  That is the theme of Nancy Savoca's
HOUSEHOLD SAINTS.  The story is about two generations of a family and takes
place over twenty-one years or so.  To aid in the suspension of disbelief
the story is told in flashback as a neighborhood legend by an old Italian
couple.  The inner story starts around 1949, taking place in New York's
Little Italy.  Joseph Santangelo (played by Vincent D'Onofrio) wins
Catherine Falconetti (Tracey Ullman) in a game of pinochle.  But winning
turns out to be one thing and collecting something else.  It seems unlikely
that these people would be married this way, but it seems the hand of some
sort of fate is pushing them onward.  The story dwells on their problems of
home life: Joseph's superstitious mother (Judith Malina) hates her
daughter-in-law; Catherine's brother is bewitched and obsessed by Puccini's
MADAME BUTTERFLY and devotes his life to getting a wife who Japanese or
Chinese--a distinction of which he in unaware.  Yet all of this seems
directed toward getting Teresa Santangelo born or forming her saintly
character.  As a young girl (Rachael Bella; older she is played by homely
but angelic Lili Taylor) she sees John Brahm's THE MIRACLE OF OUR LADY OF
FATIMA and decides to devote her life to being like the saint in that film.
The film then follows the first eighteen years of the life of the woman who
may or may not be a saint.
     This is a slow and atmospheric film that takes a long time to develop
its story, but getting to the main story is as interesting as being there.
There are details of life in Little Italy told with a sort of magical
realism.  In humorous contrast to films that focus in on the details of
sumptuous meals, here we see the meal that an inexperienced Catherine makes
under protest.  In spite of the best intentions inexperience dominates and
for once an Italian meal on screen looks less than totally appetizing.
     Perhaps central to the story is the examination of three kinds of faith
represented by three generations of Santangelo women.  For Teresa's
grandmother faith seems entwined with the dark superstitions of the old
country.  Catherine found faith later in life, frightened into it by her
mother-in-law, and her faith is thin.  Teresa's faith is innocent and pure
and it is spurred by mystical visions perhaps from neurosis induced by her
upbringing, or perhaps they are genuine miraculous events.  And each woman
responds to life differently--each somewhat strangely--based on her own
brand of faith.
     While I am personally skeptical about the existence of true saints, I
found that if I went with the flow and thought of this as a fantasy film,
there was more than enough to keep me interested here both in an exploration
into a religious viewpoint and as a window onto the community in Little
Italy.  My rating would be a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Copycat (1995)
          Capsule review:  Released too close to SEVEN and
     suffering heavily by comparison, this is the story of
     another serial killer with a theme to his killings.  In
     this case the killer is imitating famous serial killers
     of the past.  But here the killer's personal theme is
     more McGuffin and less the driving force of the plot.
     Too much of this film falls into the realm of "woman in
     distress versus stalker" cliche.  Over-rated
     performances by Weaver and Hunter are sufficient, but
     not memorable.  Rating: low +1 (-4 to +4).
     As serial killer films go, COPYCAT is above average in gloss and
suspense, but it was disastrous to release it just a few weeks after
SEVEN.  What this film does best, SEVEN did even better.  Both were
about serial killers whose crimes formed a pattern.  In SEVEN that
pattern really drove the plot, in this film the theme makes the
killings more interesting, but it is much less essential to the plot.
While that film had a dark atmosphere of impending evil, this film is
slick and wastes the viewer's time with familiar sequences of the
killer stalking and terrorizing his victim in traditional fashion.
     Popular crime psychologist Helen Hudson (played by Sigourney
Weaver) is severely traumatized by an all-too-close encounter with
killer Daryll Lee Cullum (Harry Connick, Jr.).  She has retreated into
her overly-gorgeous apartment and refuses to leave.  A little over a
year later there is another serial killer and hard-as-nails police
detective M. J. Monahan (Holly Hunter) reluctantly enlists Hudson's
help to hunt down the killer.  Unfortunately the killer has decided
that Hudson is the victim he most wants to see as a trophy.  While he
recreates the crimes of the great serial killers of the past he is also
zeroing in on Hudson.  Like Rex Stout, Hudson tries to solve the crime
without ever leaving her apartment but her agoraphobia also makes hera
sitting target for the killer.
     If it sounds too much like every other serial killer film on
cable, the story is a bit more complex, but not a lot.  There is some
interest value in Hunter's performance as the tough cop.  If it were a
man in the role it would not merit a second glance, but the casting of
Hunter gives this film a bit more attention than it really deserves.
This story of a formula killer is written by Ann Biderman and David
Madsen, themselves no slouches in following formulae.  How do they
express that Hudson has a sterile intellect?  She listens to opera, of
course.  How do they turn up the tension?  Well, have the killer stalk
Hudson while she is vulnerable in the shower.  How do we make the
killer a formidable opponent?  Well give him any talent or ability he
needs to carry the plot.  This is a man who is a technical expert, an
expert housebreaker, a terrific computer hacker, and someone who can
arrange convenient coincidences as the occasion requires.  He seems
clever by mandate of the scriptwriter, not because he impresses us with
his thought processes.  Director Jon Amiel is not known for suspense
work in the past, his best known work being TV's "The Singing
Detective" and SOMMERSBY.  His first foray into suspense just pushes a
lot of familiar buttons.
     COPYCAT may not be a copycat film, but much too much has been done
before and much too much of the tense climactic sequence is
telegraphed.  This is a disappointing low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Presumed Innocent (1990)
          Capsule review:  A tightly plotted mystery that often
     threatens to leave loose ends and them very cleverly ties
     them all together.  Harrison Ford again plays a cipher the
     audience is not intended to understand (but how many more
     such roles can he find?).  Recommended for Agatha Christie
     fans.  Rating: high +2.
     At the risk of starting this review with a (very mild) spoiler, I
will say that not until the final seconds of this film does one
recognize what a clever and well-constructed plot this film really has.
In the tradition of the best of Agatha Christie a tight and complex knot
comes apart with one deceptively simple tug.  The story of PRESUMED
INNOCENT is not told in an Agatha Christie storybook style at all.
Instead it is told with a harder and more realistic edge.  The backdrop
is the highly politicized office of the Prosecuting Attorney.  Harrison
Ford plays Rusty Sabich, an assistant to the Prosecuting Attorney
investigating the rape-murder of an attractive and ambitious co-worker.
But his investigation is cut short by a political reversal that not only
leaves the investigation in another Prosecutor's hands, but also leaves
Rusty the prime suspect for the crime.
     The one dramatic problem with the film is that the audience is
intentionally placed outside the action.  Through the whole film, much
more than is necessary or even realistic, Rusty Sabich is an enigma.
The audience is desperate to hear his side of the accusation, but
frustratingly it is kept from us.  We get details about Sabich about as
frequently and easily as the rival prosecutor does.  And matters are not
helped by having Harrison Ford in the role.  Ford plays the role
extremely blandly and woodenly.  Even as a man going through some
serious crises, it is very hard to believe Ford as a successful attorney
and assistant to the Prosecutor.
     Alan Pakula directed PRESUMED INNOCENT from a script that is very
tightly written by Frank Pierson and Pakula.  It builds its view of what
actually happened a bit at a time, with a very slow, painstaking
introduction of clues, much like Pakula's ALL THE PRESIDENT'S MEN.
Brian Dennehy plays the Chief Prosecutor Raymond Horgan and honkers down
in his role with his usual apparent ease.  Raul Julia plays Sabich's
attorney as just a bit dishonest.  Bonnie Bedelia plays Rusty's wife and
Greta Scaachi plays the victim whom we see a lot considering her short
screen time.
     PRESUMED INNOCENT is a real attention-holder that is solid plot and
no filler.  I rate it a high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Mystic Pizza (1988)
          Capsule review:  The lives of two sisters and a friend,
     pizza parlor waitresses, is not original and the individual
     stories are predictable, but as a whole it is a satisfying
     slice-of-life film and worth seeing.  Rating: low +2.
     MYSTIC PIZZA is a sort of a THE BEST OF EVERYTHING for the Eighties.  I
guess that in itself is something of a surprise: that someone is making a
THE BEST OF EVERYTHING in the Eighties.  It is not a film with much flash.
It is just a quiet (dare I say it?) soap opera about three young women who
waitress together in a pizza parlor and share each other's lives.  There are
the two sisters Kat and Daisy and their friend Jojo.  Kat is the serious
sort.  She is holding down several jobs to try to earn enough to take
advantage of a scholarship from Yale.  Her sister Daisy is affable,
attractive, and shoots a mean game of pool.  She is looking to have a little
bit of fun and to live a little.  Jojo wants to be like Daisy.  Having
canceled out on her wedding day, she wants sex with her boyfriend but no
commitments.  MYSTIC PIZZA is really three stories, one for each woman,
braided together into a single story.
     Of the three stories the film concentrates mostly on the sisters'
stories; neither is particularly original.  Kat babysits for the daughter of
a handsome young architect who happens to be a Yale graduate and whose wife
is off in Europe.  You can plot this one yourself.  Daisy has a relationship
with a rich law student with a checkered past and a bigoted family.  Perhaps
you cannot plot this one yourself, but it is unlikely you will be very
surprised either.
     So the individual stories are not much to see the film for.  But this
is one of those films where the whole is considerably more than the sum of
its parts.  For one thing, there are few enough films that show women who
are friends and how their friendship works, and at times does not work.
     MYSTIC PIZZA is not one of the year's best films--though I think at
least one critic was claiming that it was--but at a time when so many films
look alike it is a surprisingly satisfying film to watch and enjoy and
hopefully is a sign of more adult films (no, I mean *literally* adult films)
being made.  Rate it a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     (Oh, a side note: New York City restaurants offered a dinner to go with
viewing BABETTE'S FEAST, but it was about $100 a plate.  After seeing
TAMPOPO I could not find a Japanese noodle house nearby.  For those of you
who want to coordinate a movie and dinner, this is the film!)

Title
Review for Player, The (1992)
          Capsule review:  A new film about how back-stabbing and
     unforgiving Hollywood is, from the director of BUFFALO BILL
     AND THE INDIANS, QUINTET, and POPEYE.  There are some nice
     self-referential touches but over all the film is just a
     little too much into muck-raking.  Rating: +1 (-4 to +4).
     Hollywood's worst-kept secret is that there is a lot wrong with the
film industry.  It seems that everybody who has ever had everything to do
with film-making cannot wait to tell anyone who will listen how everybody
else in Hollywood--especially a close friend or co-worker--is a back-
stabber.  The key quote from last year's documentary NAKED HOLLYWOOD was
that Hollywood is a town in which people wish you well only if you are
dying.  People just love to write about Hollywood Babylon.  I suspect that
the Hollywood restaurants have to close at noon for lack of business
considering how many people "can never do lunch in this town again."  And
nobody loves stories of how bad things are in Hollywood as much as people
actually in the industry.  They hear the stories, they tell the stories,
they build the stories into tall tales and folklore.  I seriously doubt that
there is much wrong with the film industry that is not wrong with the auto
industry, or the chemical industry, or the clothing industry.  It is just
that of these industries only the film industry's primary business is
telling stories.  Hollywood has always turned out a lot of bad films and a
few very good films.  It certainly appears that there are fewer good films
coming out than there are were at one time.  But how many theatrical films
these days are as bad as a "Blondie" or "Mexican Spitfire" film?  For that
matter, how many pre-1950s films have the impact of THE KILLING FIELDS?  I
guess that is why I have never had a strong interest in Hollywood's dirty
linen.  And even in the days I think Hollywood was its greatest, it was
making films about how far Hollywood had deteriorated.  SUNSET BOULEVARD was
a pretty good dirty linen film.  THE BAD AND THE BEAUTIFUL, ALL ABOUT EVE,
HOLLYWOOD BOULEVARD, THE BIG PICTURE, BARTON FINK, and THE PLAYER are all
decent Hollywood dirty linen films.  But THE PLAYER is what I should be
writing about.
     THE PLAYER is a deep-focus film.  You are expected to keep an eye both
on the foreground and the background.  In the foreground we have a story of
murder in the film industry; in the background we see Hollywood with all of
its faults and blemishes.  We hear writer Mitchell Tolkin's criticism of the
film industry coming a bit at a time out of dozens of mouths.  They describe
a typical bad film.  And sure enough the foreground story has everything the
characters in the background complain about.  The film moves in a tight
circle describing all the faults of modern Hollywood films and then
exemplifying them.
     Tim Robbins plays Griffin Mill, a somewhat slimey film executive being
eased out to make way for Larry Levy (played by Peter Gallagher), another
slimey executive.  This might be enough to put Griffin's nerves on edge, but
Griffin is also getting sinister postcards with death threats because of the
shabby way he has treated writers.  It is when Griffin decides to try to
play detective and find the angry writer that he really becomes embroiled.
     THE PLAYER is not just about the film industry, it is about film
itself.  Wherever Griffin goes, he is surrounded by film posters and lobby
cards that match his mood or the plot.  There are references to the long
tracking shots of TOUCH OF EVIL and ABSOLUTE BEGINNERS during a long
tracking shot in THE PLAYER.  And there are the now famous cameo
appearances.  VARIETY lists 65 famous people who play themselves in this
film.  Identifying people in the background becomes a major distraction.
     Robert Altman has through most of his career been a maverick filmmaker,
but I cannot help feeling that this film is a little ungracious albeit with
good nature.  Altman has done some good films and a few real stinkers.  He
certainly cannot blame the failure of QUINTET on the studio trying too hard
to make it commercial.  And even after having made losers, he seems always
to find work.  This alone shows that the film industry has not always been
so unkind to him.  And on top of that, THE PLAYER was made only a short time
after a similar and in some ways better film, Christopher Guest's THE BIG
PICTURE.  That film is recommended for fans of THE PLAYER.  I rate Altman's
film just a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Faust (1994)
          Capsule review:  Bizarre--to say the least--
     surrealistic semi-live-action, semi-animated retelling
     of the story of Faust from avant-garde Czech animator
     Jan Svankmajer.  Much of this film is irritating and
     off-putting.  There are, however, some funny moments and
     a lot of moments that just make no sense at all.  The
     film is at its most enjoyable when it is the least
     creative and is just quoting from one of several
     classical versions of the story: Marlowe, Goethe,
     Gounod, etc.  Rating: high 0 (-4 to +4)
     The film starts slowly even for a version of Faust.  A very
typical man, no Doctor Faustus by any means, comes out of a subway
tunnel and is given a leaflet with a mystical symbol and a map.  That
night there is a strange chicken in his room.  It leaves goose
droppings on the floor that he cleans up before he makes himself a
modest dinner.  In the center of his loaf of bread he finds an egg
which he cracks open to find empty.  As he opens the egg there is
thunder in the room and objects move around by themselves.  What does
all this have to do with telling the Faust story?  Not a darn thing
that I can figure out.  It is some mystical or pseudo-symbolic folderol
that Czech animator Jan Svankmajer uses to start this story that he
both wrote and directed.  It is not at all clear that episodes like the
egg scene help us to understand anything about the issues of the story.
     Our Everyman, played by Petr Cepek, recovers from the surprise of
the night before (or rather does not even notice it or he finds it
unremarkable) and follows the map to a theater, where the story of
Faust is being put on either as live action or in marionettes.  With
scenes contributed by the marionettes and by full-size actors, with
scenes going on backstage or entirely out of the theater, we piece
together bits of the classic story or at least of the Czech revision of
the story.  For example, our Everyman--Faust, it appears--starts
exploring this weird building and finds a back room with scientific
glassware and books.  In a retort he finds a clay baby.  For no obvious
reason our Faust copies a formula from the book and shoves it in the
clay baby's mouth.  The baby comes to life.  But while its body stays
the same the head reforms itself into more mature and older versions of
the same head--Faust's head we realize--until it turns into a skull.
Faust pulls out the paper.  After the fact we realize that Faust is
supposed to have made a golem in this version,  Well, in all versions
Faust was supposedly a learned man.  Presumably this version has the
knowledge to make a golem.  Svankmajer is Czech, and particularly in
Prague, people are very aware of golem legends.  But it is only after
the fact that this was supposed to be a scene from the Faust story and
not just something obscure like the hollow egg scene.
     There are certainly some creative scenes, particularly ones
involving the marionettes.  Svankmajer was earlier in his career a
puppetmaster, and this version relies heavily on puppetry.  But this is
mostly a version of Faust for the music video generation with a bit of
a Monty Python feel and not a whole lot of the original legend left.
At no point can Svankmajer's storytelling be said to be coherent.  We
are left with more of an ego piece than the classic legend deserves.
There is nothing wrong with telling a classical story in a new and
creative manner, but it is a mistake when the style gets in the way of
the storytelling.  This needlessly obscure version of the classic Faust
gets a high 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Jungle Book, The (1994)
     An old cartoon shows someone asking "Do you like Kipling?" and
getting the response "I don't know, I never Kipled."  Certainly there
is not much Kipling going on in Disney's sumptuous second film
nominally based on Rudyard Kipling's THE JUNGLE BOOKS.  [Am I the only
one who thinks the book's title was in the plural?]  Indeed, while
Kipling might enjoy the new film for its stupendous vision of India,
with the exception of recognizing a few character names, mostly
animals, he would find little in this film to remind him of his own
writings either in plot or style.  Besides Mowgli himself, the major
characters of his Mowgli stories are all animals; in the film the
animals are minor characters.  The new film gives a (highly inaccurate)
origin for Mowgli and then entirely skips over the period that the book
covers and returns to Mowgli as an adult (now played by Jason Scott
Lee).   Mowgli has picked up martial arts someplace and is now ready to
interact with the Man-pack.  In fact when he does what we have has is
much more the plotting of a Tarzan movie with the setting moved to
India.  But even if that is so, admittedly it is a highly watchable
Tarzan movie.
     In the Kipling, Mowgli is a baby who has strayed from his village
and nearly killed by Shere Khan, the great tiger.  The Man-cub is
raised by wolves.  In the new film version, Mowgli is about five years
old and already has facility handling elephants when he is separated
from his caravan and thought to have been killed.  Why he has never
returned to civilization remains unexplained since he seems to have a
city with a major fort just a day or two's walk away.  However, he
remains in his jungle until he sees and is attracted to Catherine (Lena
Headly), the beautiful daughter of the commander of the fort (Sam
Neill).  She is already being courted by a handsome young soldier (Cary
Elwes) who is a favorite of the commander, but of course the audience
knows that he is a treacherous cad and a bounder to boot.  When the
nasty young soldier realizes that Mowgli must know the way to a
legendary lost treasure city, all the expected happens.
     On top of the plotting being sophomoric, it is didactic.
Kipling's animals live by the Law of the Jungle, a complex and logical
code which includes rules like not to kill Man as well as rules like
when it is legal to take another's prey.  In this version it is changed
into modernistic rules of conservation.  The major rule is "do not kill
what you cannot eat."  And the animals enforce these rules on humans.
In fact, Mowgli is first stranded in the jungle when Shere Khan attacks
his caravan because the travelers had killed more animals than they
could eat.  (This is an heroic and selfless action for Shere Khan ...
totally out of character.)  The heroes of THE JUNGLE BOOK all seem to
have late 20th Century American values while the villains are all
politically incorrect.
     Another interesting problem with the film is the placing of jungle
so near the fort.  (In fact, the fortress is Jodhpur's breath-taking
Meherangarh Fort.  Having explored the 15th Century fort myself--
perhaps the term "walled city" is more accurate--I can tell you the
name Meherangarh, or "majestic," is no exaggeration.  But perhaps the
film makes that obvious.)  Even if the fort is supposed to be just some
generic fort, the architecture is Rajasthani.  You will probably see
that style only in dry country a very long distance from any tropical
jungle such as we see in other parts of this story.  The decision to
film the fort over-looking Jodhpur is purely an aesthetic one.  This is
a very beautifully photographed film.  The clarity and detail of the
shots and the use of color may be the best of any film I have seen this
year.  Disney Studios has a reputation for making high-quality prints.
The score by the underrated Basil Polidouris only adds to the lush and
rich texture.
     The acting, as directed by Stephen Sommers, is generally
acceptable though Jason Scott Lee is an odd casting choice for Mowgli.
He does not look so much Indian as Oriental.  Cary Elwes makes a
reasonable villain who snidely personifies all that was wrong with the
British Raj.  Unfortunately, some of the worst acting comes from the
animals who just followed direction without worrying about their
careers--more is the pity.  The apes in particular behave like
fugitives from the Cheetah School of Bad Animal Acting.  And I wonder
what an orangutan is doing in the jungles of India.  Rudyard Kipling
treated the animals as characters but in this film the apes are sort of
a Greek chorus and the rest are little more than additional fists for
Mowgli to use against his enemies.
     Taken as a Tarzan film or a sequel to the Kipling story, this is a
watchable children's film.  But putting Kipling's name over the title
is gross mis-representation.  The pity is that such care was taken with
the visual aspects of a film so betrayed by the scripting.  Parts of
this film are terrific, parts are just awful.  On balance this one gets
a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for "Mahabharata, The" (1989) (mini)
          Capsule review:  One of the great stories of world
     literature--fifteen times the length of the BIBLE--comes to
     the screen in a supremely boiled-down CLASSICS ILLUSTRATED
     format.  Rating: low +1.
     One of the great classics of Western literature is the ILIAD, an
account told in poetry of a great war in which the gods participated.  The
telling has deep mythic meanings.  Virtually the same description applies to
the great classic of Indian literature, the MAHABHARATA.  The mammoth poem
of 90,000 couplets is told in eighteen volumes and is fifteen times as long
as the BIBLE.  It was written roughly around the time the NEW TESTAMENT was.
The story traces the causes and fighting of a civil war in the land of
Kurus.  The land was captured by the blind man Dhrtarastra.  Being blind, he
was considered unfit to rule and gave the kingdom to his younger brother
Pandu, who ruled for only a short time before returning Kurus to his
brother.  Each of the brothers had sons, each by supernatural means, and the
two sets of cousins grew up together.  Each group of cousins eventually
claims Kurus.  The two groups go to war with each other in spite of the
reluctance of Arjuna, the leader of the sons of Pandu, to make war on
members of his own family.  Sound familiar?  Right.  This is the war that
was the setting for the BHAGAVAD-GITA.  In fact, the GITA was adapted into
the MAHABHARATA.  (Hey, I'm impressed you picked up on that.  You must be a
whole bunch more erudite than you look!)
     Peter Brook produced THE MAHABHARATA as a nine-hour play and as two
films, a 321-minute version for television and a 171-minute version
theatrical version.  Brook's work in film is perhaps a little too similar to
his stage work.  This is a story that really cries out for spectacle as
giant armies fight.  Instead Brook puts his camera right into the action so
we never see more than a tiny piece of the action.
     Doing a story fifteen BIBLEs long in a film, even a film almost three
hours, is a feat that is just barely possible and perhaps just a tad
misguided.  I knew the basic story going into the theater and I still found
myself at a loss to remember all the important characters and relationships.
Perhaps the proper medium for this film is on videotape that can be stopped
and replayed, allowing the viewer to make notes.
     This film was funded by an incredible list of organizations including
Finnish public television, American public television. Britain's Channel 4,
and a bunch more I either did not recognize or cannot remember.  Perhaps it
was for that reason that Brook has the very odd racial mixture he has in the
casting.  Presumably the story should be told mostly with Indians.  Instead
it is told with Indians, Chinese, Blacks, Americans, British, Italians, and
probably several more.  With most of the characters coming from one family,
this is a distraction at best and occasionally adds confusion.  And
confusion is one thing this telling has in more than sufficient quantities.
     It is somehow understating the case to call THE MAHABHARATA an
ambitious failure.  To bring a great work of such length to the screen you
must cut very, very much more than you leave in.  What remains you have to
force-feed your audience at a rate faster than most can assimilate it.  Many
in my audience gave up and there was a notable rash of watch-checking.  It
is a good introduction to one of the great works of world literature but it
is scarcely more than an introduction.  The adaptation, written by Jean-
Claude Carriere, gives us at once not enough and far too much.  As a mix of
very good, mediocre, and misguided, I would prefer not to rate it, but if I
must, I would give it a low +1.

Title
Review for Dead Ringers (1988)
          Capsule review:  David Cronenberg's latest is an
     adaptation of the novel TWINS by Wood and Geasland with
     Jeremy Irons playing twin brothers.  The acting and the
     technical work are good but the storyline is slow, muddled,
     confusing, and self-contradictory.  Rating: 0.
     Every two or three films David Cronenberg takes another few steps up
the ladder of recognition.  His STEREO and CRIMES OF THE FUTURE are
experiments that went wrong.  I did not find them worth watching.  Then came
SHIVERS (a.k.a. THE PARASITE MURDERS, a.k.a. THEY CAME FROM WITHIN), RABID,
AND THE BROOD.  These are diverting for horror film buffs, but not actually
good films.  SCANNERS and VIDEODROME were actually good and earned him a
respectable following in his own genre.  With THE DEAD ZONE, THE FLY, and
DEAD RINGERS, he is building respect from general audiences.  In fact, until
very near the end DEAD RINGERS is not really a horror film at all.  It is
something else; perhaps "surreal" comes the closest to describing it.  In
other ways it is unlike other Cronenberg.  Of all Cronenberg's major films
only THE DEAD ZONE has less blood and less observable deformity.  Note that
the deformity does not fit into the plot, but seems sort of plastered on
and, unlike in most Cronenberg films, is limited solely to dialogue and some
absurd renderings of medical instruments.  One wonders if the mutation plot
was even in the source of the story (TWINS by Bari Wood and Jack Geasland).
     The story is about identical twin gynecologists (Beverly Mantle (played
by Jeremy Irons) and his brother Elliot (played by Jeremy Irons).  These
twins are so identical that even people who know them well cannot tell them
apart (partially due to the fact they they even have facial marks in the
same places).  (Of the two actors, Irons is probably the more charismatic
and often shamelessly steals scenes from Irons.  From childhood Beverly and
Elliot have shared interests, classes, experiences, even lovers.  They
imitate each other so well that they can hand lovers back and forth without
the lovers suspecting.  Then a new lover comes along, Film star Clare Niveau
(played by Genevieve Bujold) who discovers she has been handed off.  She
chooses one of the twins over the other and that asymmetry opens a Pandora's
box in the brothers' relationship.
     DEAD RINGERS is a spotty affair that sometimes makes sense and
sometimes does not.  Irons does as good a job of split-screen acting as has
ever been done.  And makes no mistake, that is difficult acting.  Nobody
nominated for an acting Oscar this year will have worked harder than Irons,
yet the chances are virtually non-existent that Irons will get industry
recognition for his part in DEAD RINGERS.  But the plot of the film is
plodding and ponderous.  Some things that happen are never very well
explained.  In some scenes it is unclear which brother we are seeing.  The
final scene of the film is flatly impossible given what has led up to it.
Because of the flaws, this gets a low 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for It Could Happen to You (1994)
     IT COULD HAPPEN TO YOU is claimed to be based on fact both
internally and in the publicity.  In actual fact, just about none of it
is true, but the basic situation of a policeman sharing a lottery ticket
as a tip and then splitting the payoff when the ticket actually wins.
Jane Anderson's screenplay takes that situation as a springboard to tell
a fable about greed and unselfishness.  Surprisingly, the invented story
is not all that far from credibility.
     Charlie Lang (played by Nicolas Cage) is a good, honest cop who
lives the kind of life that a good honest cop can expect to live.  He
has a one-bedroom apartment, a lot of aggravation, and a dissatisfied
wife Muriel (Rosie Perez) who is getting ready to give up on Charlie and
look for something new.  One day Charlie buys a lottery ticket.  Then
getting a cup of coffee he finds he does not have money for a tip so
promises to split any lottery winnings with his waitress, Yvonne Biasi
(Bridget Fonda).  When the ticket wins to the tune of four million
dollars Charlie's wife Muriel wants Charlie to keep all the money for
themselves.  Charlie insists repeatedly that a promise is a promise and
splits the money with Yvonne.
     As Charlie discovers, winning the lottery completely changes who
you are and how people relate to you.  Charlie and Yvonne find kindred
spirits in each other, each wanting to spend much of the money
unselfishly. They also begin getting interested in each other.  Muriel,
on the other hand,  wants to enjoy every dollar spending on herself.
What is more, she wants all four million.  What results is neither
entirely expected or unrealistic.  On top of this is a rather pleasant
love story in which Cage and Fonda work very well together on the
screen.
     And Fonda and Cage are something of a surprise as a screen couple.
Cage has overcome the goopy kid roles he has played in the past and
carries the film reasonably well as a leading man.  He has, of course,
worked with director Andrew Bergman before in HONEYMOON IN VEGAS.  Fonda
is captivating with a winning smile and a more winning acting talent.
Slightly misjudged is Rosie Perez whose grating voice was somehow an
asset when she played the traumatized plane passenger in FEARLESS, but
here, playing a human cockroach, she seems just insufferable on the
screen.  Also disappointing is the limiting of Stanley Tucci to three
scenes as Yvonne's wandering husband.  Tucci is a rubber-faced actor who
proved he had a great deal of comic potential as Alec Baldwin's best
friend in PRELUDE TO A KISS.
     Anderson's screenplay has a lot of what was good in older Frank
Capra films.  Unfortunately Capra films were far from perfect and an
unrealistic turn of events toward the end of the film is lifted straight
from a Frank Capra film.  What is oddly missing is the attention to
well-observed character development that one would find in a Capra film.
It is odd because Anderson proved she was good at creating charactersin
THE POSITIVELY TRUE ADVENTURES OF THE ALLEGED TEXAS CHEERLEADER-
MURDERING MOM for HBO.  Here, instead of developing the minor characters
the screenwriter actually seemed to be working with a checklist to make
sure a wide variety of ethnic minorities were represented in the film.
Also the telling of the story with a narrator seems to be a false move
on the part of the author.
     IT COULD HAPPEN TO YOU is not a great film, but it is an enjoyable
love story and a pleasant change from much gun-blazing summer
entertainment available in the theaters right now.  I would give it a
high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Switch (1991)
     I think everybody knows that Blake Edwards is a successful filmmaker.
I get the impression that he retreated into Beverly Hills some time around
when hula hoops were in and he has not stepped out into the real world
since.  That is fine by me.  He writes funny movies like the Clouseau films
set in a never-Never-Land-Europe or set in his hermetically sealed world
where you can go to one store to buy clothes and spend $41,000, and where if
you catch someone by surprise she has only $3000 in her purse.  (These are
plot elements from SWITCH.)  That is fine.  Edwards bragging about how much
money people in his class have is no worse than Bob Fosse bragging about how
much sex he gets in ALL THAT JAZZ.  Edwards has made a lot of people laugh
and he is welcome to his world.  Where the rub comes is where he starts
making comedies with supposed social relevance.  In SWITCH, Edwards tackles
the thorny issue of male chauvinism in an Edwards-Never-Land among his usual
assortment of under-dressed buxom women and mannequin men.  The sexism in
his world is the blatant stupid sexism of boors and is of an entirely
different character from the subtle and ambiguous sexism that occurs in my
world.
     Steve Brooks (played by Perry King) is successful in advertising.
("Advertising" is Hollywood shorthand for he isn't a policeman and he
doesn't make films.  Ever notice how often advertising shows up as an
occupation in films.  How many films can you name where the main character
is in plumbing supply or auto parts or has made a career of software
engineering?  How many people work for a corporation with more than one
level of management above them?)  Brooks is going about his humdrum life--he
is having a hot tub party with three naked women--when he is murdered.
Heaven, appalled by his sexism, sends him back to earth where he must stay
until he can find a woman to like him.  But he is sent back as a woman.
This situation has a lot of possibilities, some comedic, some silly, some
interesting, some controversial.  Edwards toys with most of the
possibilities, but flinches every time he gets too close to ideas that might
be interesting or controversial.  Mostly we see Amanda Brooks (Ellen Barkin
as the female reincarnation) feeling herself, feeling other women, and
wearing skirts too short and sitting with her legs apart like a man so the
camera can get crotch shots.  Most irritating is the misfire running gag of
her stumbling around on high-heeled shoes.  It is intended to get funnier
each time and it simply gets more and more annoying.  Apparently high-heeled
shoes are the only kind women wear in Edwards-Never-Land.  Barkin goes
through the movie oscillating between playing a really boorish male
chauvinist and getting fed up with men treating her the way she treats
women.  Edwards's idea of what sexism is about seems to be more connected
with men who get too much sex or who proposition strange women in the
street, actions more common in Edwards-Never-Land than in my world.  It does
not seem to have much to do with equal pay for equal work or even about
filmmakers doing films about naked women in hot tubs.  Incidentally, equal
pay is notably NOT and issue in this film.  The main character is paid more
as a woman than she was as a man for the same job.
     SWITCH is a film that leaves a very bad taste in your mouth, and more
so the more you think about the film.  SWITCH this one off.  For the sake of
a good, if not very well-chosen, acting job by Barkin and for some
competence in being entertaining I rate this film a charitable -1 on the -4
to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Truman Show, The (1998)
     There was a time when Australian Peter Weir made strange and
quirky films like THE CARS THAT ATE PARIS, THE PLUMBER, and THE LAST
WAVE.  But Weir lost that level of creativity at some point. His films
were more professional and perhaps more polished, but they were closer
to Hollywood fare.  At most they had just a small whiff of the strange
his earlier films had.  It has been a long time since Weir made a film
as enthralling philosophically as THE TRUMAN SHOW.  Weir looks at the
media and what it is doing to both the viewer and the person under
media scrutiny.  The film also takes a playful look at the relationship
between humanity and God.
     Truman Burbank (played by Jim Carrey) is now thirty and through
his whole life he has been off-camera only in his most private moments.
In some unspecified number of years, in the future people all over the
world tune in to watch THE TRUMAN SHOW and track how his life is
progressing.  As sort of a cross between AN AMERICAN FAMILY and CANDID
CAMERA, "The Truman Show" follows one character through his every day
and even his every move.  Truman has no idea that he is being watched.
If he knew it would spoil the entire project.  And a phenomenal
investment has been put into creating the huge domed studio the size of
a town with cameras everywhere to relay to the world everything that
happens to Truman.
     The whole project is the brainchild of the godlike producer
Christof (Ed Harris).  No effort has been spared to build the
unbelievable domed studio or to ingrain phobias into Truman so that he
is afraid to stray too far from his home.  As part of the latter effort
we see a visit to a travel agent who has decorated her office with
marvelous anti-travel posters.  Christof has programmed nearly
everything that has ever happened to Truman.  Christof has cast the
important people in Truman's life including his supposed parents and
his wife Meryl (Laura Linney of TALES OF THE CITY).  Meryl's
responsibilities include keeping Truman in line and unsuspecting,
delivering charming commercials for sponsors' products placed into
Truman's world, and above all to keep smiling.  But things are getting
a little difficult for Meryl as Christof's production staff gets a
little sloppy: lights fall from a clear sky and supposedly dead
characters from Truman's past find their way back onto the show set.
Truman is starting to get suspicious that there is something not right
about his reality.
     Does Jim Carrey do a good job of playing Truman Burbank?  That is
a very difficult question to answer.  At first brush it would seem not.
Carrey is his usual weird and does his trademarked brand of clowning
around.  Is this the way someone raised on camera with scripted
experience would behave?  Probably not, but it is unclear how he would
behave.  He almost certainly would lean to some form of weird.  Whether
this is one way he could be weird is hard to tell.  The constantly
smiling Laura Linney is at first charming and quickly becomes grating,
but again these are unusual circumstances.  She would not behave like
an actress because this is like almost no acting job has ever been.
She would have to be constantly improvising and be onstage 16 to 24
hours a day, year in and year out.  Her role would have to be her
primary life. Perhaps her little Stepford wife is precisely what would
result.  Rounding out the major characters is Ed Harris as the de facto
god of Truman's world.  Harris takes his role in a quiet understated
manner and does a fine job.
     I would have loved to have seen THE TRUMAN SHOW cold, having no
idea what the film was about. Unfortunately the ads give much too much
away.  There is a slow build to where the viewer is told the
information in the trailer.  Much of the mystery of Andrew Niccol's
script (as complex as his script for GATTACA) is lost.  One of the big
holes, however, is that this is a much less believable story if taken
literally rather than as allegory.  One must believe that there are
thousands of actors in Truman's world who are just waiting months or
years to be cued.  There are probably parts of Truman's town that he
never visits, but the actors have to be prepared if he does.  Fantastic
preparedness must be arranged for contingencies that probably will
never occur.  In addition, the number of cameras needed to produce THE
TRUMAN SHOW must be literally phenomenal.  At one point Christof
estimates that 5000 cameras are used to cover all the places that
Truman might possibly go.  A little back of the envelope calculation
will show that figure has got to be orders of magnitude low without a
fair risk of losing Truman.  The town as shown must be about nine
square miles and then Truman goes off into the woods in the course of
the film.  The logistics of setting up and running this pseudo-town
seem more and more complex the more one thinks about them.  But again,
this is more a religious allegory than a science fiction story to be
taken literally.  Niccol has a lot of fun playing with the various
features of the artificial sky as a recurrent theme in the film, but
also giving the film a sort of medieval cosmology.
     Music is by Burkhart (von) Dallwitz and seems to consist mostly of
easy listening and classical music on a sort of celestial, New Age
theme.  The idea for THE TRUMAN SHOW is one that has been done in
science fiction several times previously.  Then there are ideas
borrowed from other sources like the 60s TV show THE PRISONER.  I would
rate THE TRUMAN SHOW an 8 on the 0 to 10 scale and a high +2 on the -4
to +4 scale.  This is Weir's best film since THE LAST WAVE by a wide
margin.

Title
Review for Hoop Dreams (1994)
          Capsule review:  Surprisingly engaging documentary
     that follows two promising inner-city basketball players
     from high school recruiting to freshman year at college.
     The story is surprising both in its completeness and the
     dramatic power it has, considering it is not a script
     that could be planned in advance.  Rating: +2 (-4 to
     +4).
     How does a documentary film like this get made?  If a director
has a script in front of him, he can be fairly certain that there will
be some measure of drama coming out of the film he is shooting.  A
documentary about the Third Reich has got to give its director the
relative security of being able to scan all the materials and assure
himself that there is a story worth telling.  But how did producers
Fred Marx, Steve James, and Peter Gilbert know that if they started
filming two promising junior-high-school level basketball players for
four or five years that at the end of the time they would have a film
with the dramatic impact of HOOP DREAMS?  This is a documentary that
sustains interest for its entire 174-minute length.
     The film follows the high school careers of William Gates and
Arthur Agee, two black Chicago boys, promising hoopsters, drafted by
St.  Joseph's, a suburban Catholic high school that has a strong
emphasis on basketball.  They are in the same program that developed
star player Isiah Thomas.  Both boys have learned to spell success
"NBA."  William comes to St. Joseph's on full scholarship, paid by a
patron who holds a high position at the Encyclopedia Britannica.
Arthur is not so lucky; he is on half scholarship with his family
paying the balance.  This difference will prove to have far-reaching
effects on Arthur's high school basketball.  Arthur's father becomes a
crack addict, turns to crime, and is sent to prison. The Agees are
unable to pay the school's tuition and Arthur is thrown out and must go
instead to Marshall, a local all-black school.  Despondent over family
problems, Arthur has a very poor sophomore year while William prospers
only to be brought low by a knee injury.  The camera follows the story
of the two players and the pressures to win that they face.  Without a
word of commentary the film stingingly indicts high schools and
colleges that treat athletes like commodities.  High schools programs
treat athletes as if winning were everything; colleges treat them as if
money is everything and winning is the way to get it.
     250 hours of film were shot to provide the filmmakers with enough
material to tell a complete and detailed story. Even so, one is often
surprised that the camera was present and filming at what are often
very personal moments.  We get a good deal more of both the Agee and
Gates families than one would ever expect they would agree to.  There
are surprisinglyly unflattering portraits of people like Gene
Pingatore, the St. Joseph's basketball coach, and recruiters from
schools like Marquette.
     You do not have to be a basketball fan to find this a remarkable
documentary about much more in American life than basketball.  I myself
have no interest in the game and I give the film a +2 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Muse, The (1999)
     In his new film Albert Brooks plays a screenwriter who can still
write funny material but is losing his "edge."  He does not know what
it means to be losing his edge, but he is losing it nonetheless.
Sadly, the script of THE MUSE itself is often very funny, but Brooks
seems to be losing his own edge.  The Albert Brooks edge was to be able
to write dialog that is both funny and true.  In LOST IN AMERICA when
his wife gambles away "the nest egg," part of the punishment that
Brooks thinks of on the spur of the moment is she is no longer allowed
to use the words "nest" or "egg."  She must order fried THINGS for
breakfast.  If she sees a bird's home she must call it a round STICK.
This is very funny material because it is so ridiculous and at the same
time so possible.  But that very real sort of humor is missing from THE
MUSE.  In this film that kind of dialog is lost in all the sarcasm.
     Stephen Phillips (Albert Brooks) is a Hollywood screenwriter who
may be just getting to be past his prime.  When his latest script is
rejected he starts worrying about how to feed his family.  He goes to
his friend, the fabulously successful screenwriter Jack Warrick (Jeff
Bridges).  But who is this beautiful woman kissing Jack good-bye?  It
isn't his wife.  This is a side of Jack that Stephen has not seen
before.  Eventually Jack admits reluctantly that this woman is not his
mistress but really his muse.  Literally she is a muse.  She is one of
the nine daughters of Zeus.  If you treat her like a queen she will
inspire you to your most creative ideas and your best work.  Stephen
decides that he has nothing to lose and decides to make her his muse.
Her name is Sarah.
     Stephen starts seeing the Sarah (Sharon Stone) and taking up the
responsibility of keeping her happy.  Things that appeal to her tastes
do not come cheaply.  It costs tens of thousands of dollars a week to
keep her in the style to which she expects to live.  But she apparently
is the real thing and Stephen starts getting story ideas that may all
be worth the effort of keeping the pampered, spoiled, conscienceless
brat happy at all hours of the night with expensive snacks.  He will
indulge her even if it wrecks his marriage.  And it nearly does as his
wife Laura (Andie MacDowell) foolishly jumps to the conclusion her
husband is having an affair and then (surprise!) she very cleverly
realizes that explanation does not explain the strange behavior.  Again
the film parallel its own story when Stephen complains that his new
screenplay is lacking a third act and then he chooses one that seems
tacked on.  The ending is clearly the weakest part of the film.  Brooks
ties things up, but not in at all a satisfying way.
     Sharon Stone clearly is enjoying herself behaving pampered and
spoiled the way most people secretly would like to be.  Brooks is his
usual irritable character, but he has played this character too often
before.  He has also arranged an impressive lineup of familiar film
personalities to flesh out his story.
     What is unfortunate about THE MUSE is that Brooks walked right by
the best use of his concept and he never even noticed it.  The real
story is not the Muse's relationship with Stephen Phillips.  The story
to tell is how does a Muse establish herself in a cynical town like
Hollywood.  How does she make her first conquests?  How is her
reputation established?  This may be a story more in the realm of
Thorne Smith, but it is certainly where the interesting ideas are.  THE
MUSE is rated PG-13 for language and a moment of totally pointless
gratuitous nudity that apparently is present only to avoid a PG rating.
Speaking of rating, I give THE MUSE a 5 on the 0 to 10 scale and a low
+1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Hearts in Atlantis (2001)
    CAPSULE: In 1960 an eleven-year-old forms a friendship with 
    an elderly man who boards at his house.  Scott Hicks directs 
    with a great deal of period feel.  Anthony Hopkins stars as 
    the mysterious Ted Brautigan.  The story is told 
    sentimentally and well until the script or perhaps the story 
    falters in the final reel.  Rating: 7 (0 to 10), low +2 
    (-4 to +4) 
Stephen King made his reputation on writing horror and that still 
seems to be the major portion of his output.  These days, however, 
the films made from his horror stories are definitely of secondary 
quality to those that do not have  strong fantasy content.  King 
is better when he concentrates on human drama than on the 
supernatural.  This film based on only one part of his novel 
HEARTS IN ATLANTIS basically ignores most, though not all, of the 
fantasy elements of the book. 
Robert Garfield (played by David Morse) is a photographer 
returning to the neighborhood where he grew up.  He is visiting 
the funeral of a childhood friend.  He asks about Carol Gerber, 
the girl who was the other close friend, only to discover that she 
had recently passed away.  Robert thinks back to 1960 when he was 
eleven.  Bobby (played just a little too maturely by Anton 
Yelchin) lived with his widowed mother.  Then boarder Ted 
Brautigan (Anthony Hopkins) comes to live with the Garfields.  
Though his mother takes an immediate dislike to him, for Bobby the 
boarder opens up new worlds.  Ted turns Bobby onto the world of 
literature and forever changes Bobby's outlook on the world. 
Bobby and Ted's relationship is made difficult by Bobby's mother 
(Hope Davis), a woman who makes all the wrong decisions in her own 
life and blames the result on others.  She has poisoned Bobby's 
mind against his dead father suspects the worst of Ted.  Bobby's 
mother is right about Ted in at least one regard.  There is 
something not normal about the recluse.  He seems to have psychic 
powers that tell him things about the future.  And Ted is on the 
run from men who know about those powers and want to use them.  
The book's fantasy element is much reduced in the William Goldman 
(MARATHON MAN, THE PRINCESS BRIDE) adaptation of one section of 
the book by Stephen King.  Scott Hicks who directed SHINE and SNOW 
FALLING ON CEDARS directs here.  In general his style is nostalgic 
and romanticized, though he somewhat unimaginatively creates a lot 
of the mood by playing the popular music of the 1960 period.  Also 
though the cars we see seem a bit old for the setting.  Goldman's 
or King's view of the "good kids" is a little too Simon Pure and 
cliched as he follows them down railroad tracks and swimming at 
the local water hole, slaking their thirsts with the carton of 
milk they brought along.  Nobody I remember was that good a kid.  
Once he has lulled us into this idyllic view of 1960 the 
introduction of some nasty violence in the latter part of the film 
comes as something of a shock. 
HEARTS IN ATLANTIS is a Castle Rock Entertainment production.  
They do the best adaptations of Stephen King, including the now 
classic THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION.  HEARTS IN ATLANTIS is a cut 
below that film, but still a good production.  I rate it 7 on the 
0 to 10 scale and a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale. 

Title
Review for Arachnophobia (1990)
     One tends to expect new ideas in films from Steven Spielberg's Amblin
Entertainment.  And with Disney Enterprises starting a new film branch,
Hollywood Pictures, you would expect something fairly original to inaugurate
the new label.  That makes it all the more puzzling that this collaboration
between Amblin Entertainment and Hollywood Pictures would be a plot that was
already old when Spielberg made CLOSE ENCOUNTERS OF THE THIRD KIND .  There
have already been so many "Invasion of the Killer Vermin" films that one
more is no novelty.  In other films we have seen people threatened by
infestations of spiders, ants, birds, slugs, rats, bats, feral dogs, bears,
even frogs.   (Don't ask me how you make a threat out of a frog; I saw the
film and still don't know.  You have to be pretty desperate for phobias to
make a film about killer frogs!)  However well a new film of this type is
done, and ARACHNOPHOBIA was nicely executed, there is not much new you can
put into a film about a small town threatened by an infestation of deadly
spiders.
     The idea of the film is that there is a prehistoric breed of spider--
one with a very different social structure from what modern spiders have--
living isolated in the jungles of Venezuela.  This breed of spider has a
"king" and a bunch of drones, much like bees have with a queen and drones.
That is something of a stretch since spiders are much more closely related
to sea crustaceans than they are to insects.  A plot device that could have
been devised by Rube Goldberg takes the king spider and drops him (quite
literally) into the backyard of a new doctor in a small California town.
Dr.~Ross Jennings (played by Jeff Daniels) has a bugaboo about spiders and
the fact that he has a barn full of them is only one of the many problems he
is facing as a result of moving to Canaima, California, from San Francisco.
There are, in fact, many elements of the plot that executive producer Steven
Spielberg might have found extremely familiar.  We have one lone man, who is
not really accepted by his town, who has to convince disbelieving officials
that they have a problem.  He has his own phobias to overcome, but the love
of his family, charmingly portrayed, convinces him that he has to overcome
his fears and see that the problem gets solved.  Luckily he has a
knowledgeable expert he can call on to help him out and to explain to the
audience how scary the situation really is.  Surely all this must have rung
a bell somewhere in Spielberg's memory.
     What is nice about the film is that it takes the time to develop
characters so that the audience has some understanding and empathy invested
in them.  That too makes the film seem as if it were really a 1970s film.
The viewer gets to know the people who are threatened by the spiders--not as
well as you get to know the Brodie family in JAWS, but far better than you
know anyone in most current horror films.  Nobody follows the new popular
formula of being introduced and making vacuous or stereotyped conversation,
then being quickly dispatched to nobody's regret.
     The effects work usually is believable, though occasionally a spider
just does not scramble right.  A fair number of live spiders were also sued
and unfortunately the film bears no endorsement of the filming practices by
any humane society.
     ARACHNOPHOBIA is entertaining and has some genuinely creepy moments,
but lacks anything that really distinguishes it from other films with very
similar plots and approaches.  I give it a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Sholay (1975)
     When the film SHOLAY was released in 1975 it at first appeared
not to attract much of an audience in India.  Word of mouth grew,
however, until it was the highest grossing and most profitable Hindi
film ever made.  It had a theatrical run of over seven years in
Bombay and five years in Delhi.  Today there are Indians who will
unabashedly call it one of the finest films ever made.  While the
film takes place in its present, it is basically a reframing of
SEVEN SAMURAI and THE MAGNIFICENT SEVEN, retold with two heroes
instead of seven.  Directed by Ramesh Sippy who picked up many of
the conventions of American Westerns and especially form the Italian
Westerns of Sergio Leone.  Madhya Pradesh in Central India and a few
other areas in India are perhaps the only places in the world where
there are still conditions so similar to the American West.  There,
at least according to my informant, gangs of dacoits still ride
horses in rocky terrain and live relatively free of the law
enforcement.  It is a strange mix of times to see bandits on horses
and people in contemporary dress on modern motorcycles.  I am
informed that the view of village life in India is very accurate.
SHOLAY, whose name means "sparks of fire," follows the conventions
of Indian neighborhood films.  That means it has several songs in
production numbers, it has generous doses of comedy.  And the film
is in the range of 190 minutes long.
     Thakur Baldev Singh (played by Sanjeev Kumar) has a problem.
As a Thakur--sort of the equivalent of what in England was a
squire--he is responsible to protect his village from the ravages of
a the gang of the bandit named Gabbar Singh (Amjad Khan).  To do
this he wishes to enlist the aid of two of the worst thieves in the
country, Veeru (Dharmendru) and Jai (Amitabh Bachchan).  The Thakur
has dealt with them before when he was not the police force and he
knows them to be decent men and good fighters who are his best
chance to defeat Gabbar Singh.  He hires them to capture Gabbar
alive.
     In flashbacks we see that the Thakur previously was to bring
the two to prison via train.  When the train was attacked by bandits
the two escaped from his chains, fought off the bandits, and then
turned themselves into the authorities rather than let the policeman
die of his wounds.
     As is frequently the case is Westerns the most memorable
character is the villain.  Think of Calvera in THE MAGNIFICENT SEVEN
or Hannibal Lector in THE SILENCE OF THE LAMBS.  In India Gabbar
Singh has taken on a life of his own.  Indian children memorize his
lines.  He is has become one of the most popular screen villains of
all time for reasons that must be only partially clear to outsiders.
He certainly has personality, though perhaps not all of it
transcends the language barrier.
     Making this a Hindi film are the usual standard touches.  In
the course of the three-hour-plus film there are five production
number songs.  An early one is a colorful number set during the Holi
holiday.  At this holiday Indians throw large volumes of brightly-
colored powders into the air and at each other, which certainly is
visually colorful.  Another production number toward the end of the
film is a bit sadistic and makes the audience involuntarily wince.
Music is by R. D. Burman, but its quality is a little hard to
measure by Western standards.  The music and the comedy tend to pad
out what in the West we would make into a more focused and intense
film.  Some of the comedy is rather bizarre including a scene in
prison in which the warden has chosen one of the most hated
personalities of this century on whom to model his looks and
actions.
     A number of pieces of the style are reminiscent of Sergio Leone
films.  Some scenes are drawn out for the greatest amount of drama,
but will be done almost silently with one irrelevant sound
dominating (e.g. the repetitive squeaking of a swing).  In one scene
several people are shot in a sort of massacre, but rather than
showing the carnage, each time the action stops in a freeze-frame
for a second or two.  When the father of the house comes to see the
bodies, each is covered in a sheet, but as he stands looking the
wind comes and one at a time blows the sheet away leaving a body.
In another scene a man is aiming a gun at a defenseless boy.  There
is a quick jump to a train venting steam with the same explosive
sound.  These are very evocative scenes and these touches give parts
of the film a definite Italian Western feel.  That part of India has
landscapes much like the American West anyway.  It is odd to find
such good work in the same film that has some of the silly comic
musical numbers that this film has.  There some of the comic editing
features under-cranked cameras and touches one would more associate
with "The Monkees."
     The non-Indian wishing to try Indian neighborhood entertainment
films could do worse than to begin sampling with SHOLAY.  Though it
may seem uneven, like the British "curate's egg," parts of it are
excellent. I rate it 6 on the 0 to 10 scale and a high +1 on the -4
to +4 scale.  The film is now available on DVD.  (Thanks to Lax
Madapati for showing me and giving me extensive background
information on this film.)

Title
Review for Chocolat (2000)
     Lasse Hallstrom's new film is a parable about believing in
oneself and even more on getting a little joy from life.  It is a
contrived story in which the good guys are a little too good and the
bad guys are obvious.  But its message is disarming and sweetened
with tempting visions of chocolate that seduce the viewer.  But it
is getting a following in a time when so many of the popular films
are pushing nihilism and showing violence.
     In a little French village life is painted like the village
itself in tones of brown and gray.  Everyone knows his place and
knows exactly what is expected of him.  Those who forget their
responsibilities are quickly reminded.  Pleasure is for the most
part to be deferred for the next life.  Instead life is piety and
submission.  But in 1959, as Lent is approaching, a mysterious woman
Vianne (Juliette Binoche) arrives in town with her daughter and in
the shadow of the church at the beginning of Lent sets up a
chocolate shop.  Vianne is immediately countered by the forces of
convention and of self-denial.  These forces are marshalled and lead
by the town's mayor the Comte de Reynard (fine comic actor Alfred
Molina).  Slyly Reynard affirms his number-one position by turning
the townspeople against Vianne and the change she is bringing.  He
and Vianne are poles apart and the little French town is
figuratively and nearly literally not big enough for the two of
them.
     At the same time some who are lower in the town's pecking order
are giving in to the temptations of self-indulgence and even
breaking from their established places.  The respectable people of
the town side with the mayor, but the marginal people, those who
normally get swept aside, become friends with Vianne and find they
enjoy her sweet chocolate and her easy friendship.  For those in the
middle, between the mayor and Vianne, there is the constant
temptation of all that chocolate.  One of the women who joins the
circle of friends is Josephine Muscat (Lina Olin) whose brutish
husband Serge (Peter Stormare, who played the quiet killer in FARGO)
owns the local saloon and beats Josephine when he is drunk.  Another
of Vianne's circle is an old woman, Armande Voizin (Judi Dench),
nearly disowned by her family.
     While CHOCOLAT is not ultimately negative on religion, the
alliance between the young priest and the mayor is looked on as one
of the negative forces in the town.  Too often the local priest
takes a cold and unfriendly stance.  The pleasures of chocolate are
said to be evil.  A dog, we are told, has no soul.  But the rules of
Lent still apply to the dog.  The historic town hero is remembered
for having turned out the Huguenots.  In the end the film is a
little pat, even for the parable that it is.  The ending is a little
contrived and not quite believable.
     There seem to be two major themes in the photography (at
least).  One is the color in the town.  It is drab grays and browns
until Vianne arrives in her bright red cloak and hood.  Echoing
ideas of PLEASANTVILLE, though in a more subtle fashion, Vianne
brings color to the village.  Her shop is bright with color, while
the rest of the town is muted in color.  Vianne has the courage to
break from the dismal color scheme and bring some life to the
village.  The other theme is tempting the audience with luscious
photography of chocolate.  Like BABETTE'S FEAST and LIKE WATER FOR
CHOCOLATE, this is a film that seduces the viewer with its
photography of food.
     CHOCOLAT is generating some controversy; it seems to be a film
people either love or hate.  For my part I rate it a 7 on the 0 to
10 scale and a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Miami Rhapsody (1995)
     David Frankel, who wrote and directed MIAMI RHAPSODY, has a style
much too close to Woody Allen's to be a coincidence.  He starts with a
jazz song, Louis Armstrong's rendition of "Just One of Those Things,"
under fairly plain-looking credits.  Allen would use white on black,
Frankel uses lavender on black, but it clearly is a conscious
imitation.  And the dialogue has the main character making just the
sort of wisecracks that Woody Allen would write.  And at least an
imitation of Allen at his most creative would be amusing.
Unfortunately, the story is slight and more than a little boring.  Part
of the problem is that the whole plot can be described in two
sentences.  I will not divulge the second sentence here, but the first
is that Gwyn Marcus (Sarah Jessica Parker) cannot commit to her
relationship with her fiance because every other couple she knows hasa
relationship that is falling apart because of infidelity.  The plot,
told in flashback and flashbacks-within-flashbacks goes through one
relationship after another, mostly in her own family, and each
relationship has one or both people fooling around on the side.  The
plot has more detail than that, of course, but it all adds up to Gwyn's
unwillingness to commit in her relationship.  Parker's Gwyn narrates
the film staring right into the camera, then popping into connecting
dramatized anecdotes about her family.  Her father (Paul Mazursky),
himself a philanderer, correctly suspects her mother of infidelity.
The mother is played by Mia Farrow who appears in this imitation Woody
Allen film purely for the artistic challenge of the role, no doubt.
Other flashbacks show Gwyn's siblings, each totally self-absorbed and
happy to cheat on any relationship he or she has.
     Sarah Jessica Parker is clearly a Woody-Allen-like character,
alternately indignant and sarcastic.  One can almost hear Allen's
delivery of some of her lines.  But she has a good delivery and a
screen presence that may get noticed after this film.  Antonio Banderas
plays Antonio, the male nurse of Gwyn's grandmother who gets involved
with the weird relationships in the Marcus family.  Gil Bellows is
Gwyn's fiance, who seems likable enough in the role as just about the
only decent person in the film, but he does not have a lot to do.
Kevin Pollak is also memorable as Gwyn's older brother who leaves his
own pregnant wife for the wife of his business partner.
     Perhaps MIAMI RHAPSODY could have worked better as a comedy with
more likable characters.  Instead there is a cold satisfaction in the
poetic justice that these characters are screwing up their lives and
will likely continue to do so.  In spite of the warm Miami settings,
this is a cold comedy about people it is hard to like or care about.
The story is told with affection for this family, but Frankel is not
yet a good enough writer to make us care for his characters.  This film
gets a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Project X (1987)
     The last time I watched John Badham's film WARGAMES (at least I hope it
was the last time!), I counted what I thought were technical errors in the
film.  I came up with an average of one every 120 seconds.  When I read that
the scripters of WARGAMES had produced a new film, PROJECT X, my excitement
knew very strict bounds.  In fact, I was not excited at all.  When I heard
that in this film Matthew Broderick was causing trouble at an Air Force base
on which experimentation was being done on intelligent chimpanzees, I said
to myself, "I even know that story.  I have seen it done as a play on PBS
and read it at least twice."  It had to be almost the same story as Paul
Zindel's "Let Me Hear You Whisper."  That play dealt with a cleaning-woman
at a soul-less research institute.  Scientists are trying to teach a dolphin
to speak, but it will talk only to the cleaning-woman and then only when
nobody else is around.  Our cleaning-woman is incensed at the lack of co-
operation on the dolphin's part until she learns what defense uses the
scientists will make of the dolphin if it does learn to talk.  After that,
her goal is to help the dolphin escape.
     So I avoided seeing PROJECT X until it came down to $1.25.  Then I
decided it was worth that just to see a remake of the Zindel play.  My
reaction: if Paul Zindel were Harlan Ellison, he would now be the major
stockholder of Twentieth Century Fox.  PROJECT X was not the close remake I
was expecting, but the two stories are awfully parallel.  But in spite of
that, I have to admit I really did like PROJECT X and consider it a far
better and far more believable film that WARGAMES.
     The film follows one chimp, Virgil, from being trapped in the wild
through being taught sign language by Teri (played by Helen Hunt) until
Teri's grant is canceled, to being taken to an Air Force base for
experimentation purposes.  There, a ne'er-do-well Air Force brat, Jimmy
(played by Broderick) is given the job of caring for the chimpanzee subjects
and discovers that Virgil can talk sign language.  Then the relationship
between the two grows and the story follows predictable routes.
     PROJECT X could have gone wrong in a dozen different ways, but it
doesn't.  The chimps are not entirely believable--a little too human--but
are likable without being cutesey.  The film manages to give them distinct
personalities, no small feat.  While the science of WARGAMES seemed
ridiculous, PROJECT X is considerably more credible.  the experiment being
performed might not have been performed in exactly the way it is portrayed,
but I suspect that similar experiments actually have been done, and perhaps
as early as the 50s.  What is hardest to believe about the experiment is
that the Air Force would not already have all the data they need along the
lines of the results of PROJECT X.
     Director Jonathan Kaplan will be familiar to people who saw the
documentary "Roger Corman: Hollywood's Wild Angel."  In a humorous
interview, Kaplan tells how Corman gave him his first feature film to direct
(NIGHT CALL NURSES) and his second (THE STUDENT TEACHERS).  Kaplan slowly
worked his way up with WHITE LINE FEVER.  His most recent films, such as
OVER THE EDGE and HEART LIKE A WHEEL, have gained much better acceptance.
He was chosen to direct her because of his ability to "do spectacular action
sequences on a low budget," according to producer Walter Parkes.
     Though insufficiently original in plot, PROJECT X tells a fairly good
story well, gets a good acting jobs out of a bunch of apes, and is
surprisingly affecting.  Rate it a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Othello (1995)
     When adapting Shakespeare to the screen there are conflicts
involved that the Bard never knew about.  He wrote in an artificially
poetic Elizabethan English that conveys better to a 20th century
audience than many people realize, but still requires acting skill to
help get the idea across.  He also intended his plays to be an
afternoon's entertainment that would last a lot longer than a standard
film.  Most film adaptations are nowhere near accurate representations
of the plays.  They are usually trimmed down, and often lines and even
scenes are given out of order.  There seems to be a particular respect
for Shakespearean actors because it is no easy matter to make the
original prose flow naturally.  Orson Welles was a master filmmaker who
had more experience than perhaps anyone else did at adapting the great
works of literature to other media.  But if you look at his own
adaptation of OTHELLO one sees a tremendous visual style and only the
barest respect getting the original play on film.
     Kenneth Branagh has a better understanding than most about how to
do cinematic adaptations of Shakespeare and did about as good a job as
is possible for any director in his MUCH ADO ABOUT NOTHING.  As an
actor he has an expressive face and conveys by just slight exaggeration
many of the ideas in his face.  It takes extreme skill to do that
without making the performance hammy and unrealistic, but Branagh is
has the kind of face that allows him to convey much of the meaning.  In
MUCH ADO and now in OTHELLO one can almost tell what he is saying
without hearing the words.
     Unfortunately, in OTHELLO he is not directing, so is responsible
for only his own performance.  His acting is not shared by the other
performers in OTHELLO making the understanding of this film much more
labored than that of MUCH ADO.  Laurence Fishburne does a reasonable
but much more traditional Othello, conveying all the emotion, but
without Branagh's articulation.
     Unfortunately acting honors go only to these two.  For once the
two name actors really are the best thing on the screen.  Irene Jacob
is fetching as Desdemona, but her line readings are uninspiring.  Much
of the end of the play should work on pity for the wrongly accused
Desdemona, but she just does not convey enough emotion to have us feel
a lot of sympathy for her character.  Other performances, with the
possible exception of Anna Patrick as Emilia, get the lines read but
are indifferent.
     The play has moments of visual style as we might expect from
Oliver Parker.  Parker does not have much experience as director but is
a familiar face acting in Clive Barker horror films, which themselves
depend more on visual impact than on story.  Occasionally we wonder why
Parker dwells so long on a single scene.  Even the very first scene, a
gondola slowly making its way past the camera, seems to go on too long
and then pay off with only a very trite image.  Feeling the need for a
little action he adds a minor chase scene, apprehending Iago, at the
end.
     This is a film that will be remembered as "1995's OTHELLO," not
"The OTHELLO" in the same sense that MUCH ADO ABOUT NOTHING is the
interpretation for our generation.  I give it a +1 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Lola rennt (1998)
     It has been suggested that history is a random walk affected by
uncountably many tiny events, most too small to even notice.  Chaos
theory suggests that tiny changes lead to immense differences later in
time.  RUN, LOLA, RUN is a very clever low-budget film from Germany in
which explores this idea.  We see Lola (played by Franka Potente with
day-glow red hair) live the same twenty or so minutes of crisis in
three different ways (though each involves running a great deal).  And
we see how the outcome is different because of those choices.
     Lola has lived with her boyfriend Manni (Moritz Bleibtreu) for
about a year when the crisis takes place.  Manni has a job acting as
courier in a drug deal.  In a moment of confusion Manni leaves a bag
with 100,000 Deutsche Marks (roughly $50,000) on a subway.  In a few
minutes Manni will have to face his bosses.  If he is without the
money, he will probably be killed for his mistake.  Rather than do
that, Manni decides he will probably take his chances robbing a
grocery. In a moment of panic he calls Lola and tells her what he is
going to do in just twenty minutes.  If Lola can get to him in twenty
minutes with 100,000 Marks, he will abort his planned robbery.  What
does Lola do?  In three different futures she handles the situation in
three somewhat different ways and things turn out differently because
of her efforts.
     In the opening this film, written and directed by Tom Tykwer,
talks about universal questions and suggests that this film will be
driving at some answers. However any conclusions that RUN, LOLA, RUN
draws are really suspect.  The individual stories are contrived in many
ways.  Some coincidences are acceptable, but there are too many to make
these three futures believable.  In a cinematic version of snapshots we
see the future for some of the tangential characters and it seems very
different based on how Lola runs past the person. No mechanism for what
is causing the differences is shown.  In addition, Lola has some
strange power that can only be called a "magical shriek" that has
powers never explained.  It makes the film a fantasy, in spite of
otherwise realistic treatment of the alternate worlds.  So in some
senses this film is not as good as SLIDING DOORS, another film, far
from perfect, on a very similar theme.  And another problem is that the
timing seems inconsistent between segments.  If the first story took
twenty minutes, they other two should have taken considerably longer.
But even more serious is the fact we do not really get to know the main
characters very well.  Nobody's character is particularly well
developed or made more comprehensible in the course of the film.
     On the other hand, this film effortlessly shifts gears among film,
video, and animation.  The use of the different media probably allowed
for some budget savings in what is clearly a low-budget film.  The only
time that the budget becomes an obvious problem is when the subtitles
in the United States version are white on a white background making
them impossible to read.  The pace of even the opening credits are
enough to leave the viewer panting.  It seems to be an amalgam of many
different cinematic styles, and the film makes that work.  We learn a
great deal about some of the characters by seeing them in the same
situation but handling it three different ways.
     RUN, LOLA, RUN is an unexpectedly provocative film that will be
remembered as a curious novelty, if for no other reason.  I rate it a6
on the 0 to 10 scale and a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Total Recall (1990)
          Capsule review:  Violence, chases, thoughtful plotting,
     special effects, gore, Arnold Schwarzenegger, a few
     intelligent ideas.  They don't all seem as if they could be
     in one film.  Nobody will be totally happy with TOTAL RECALL,
     but there is a surprising degree of good science fiction in
     what could be Arnold Schwarzenegger's most intelligent
     fantasy film to date.  Rating: +2.
     I have to say that I usually am not very impressed by action or
violence in films.  How much variation is there in chase scenes from one
film to the next?  To my mind there is almost none other than the
background scenery changing.  The same goes for violence.  There are
about as many ways to tear apart a human as there are to carve a turkey.
It is a special effect that has been done so many times in film that it
no longer is of any interest to me to see it.  I am well aware that
there are people who can enjoy chases and violence in film after film
and enjoy them every time, just as there are people who listen to the
"Top 40" radio stations and can enjoy hearing the same songs over and
over.  Chase scenes and violence to me seem like unimaginative filler.
In addition and amazingly, I find I have this weird psychic ability to
know at the beginning of a fight scene who is going to win the fight.
If there are four armed thugs taking on an unarmed Arnold
Schwarzenegger, psychic vibrations tell me at the beginning of the fight
who is going to win.  The vibrations work for chase scenes also and
there, too, they remove much of the suspense.
     There have been a number of films that have tried to marry action
to a science fiction plot.  They have been films such as THE TERMINATOR,
PREDATOR, THEY LIVE, and ROBOCOP.  I consistently like them less than
the general public does and it is more than likely because the action
and violence scenes have so little value for me.  What I think I am
really rating is the science fiction film that frames the action and
violence-- often making for a much shorter film.  Take the action and
violence from the four films I mentioned and none is a particularly good
science fiction film.  Only THEY LIVE has a particularly engaging
premise.  That may be because THEY LIVE is an adaptation of a
pre-existing, published science fiction story so to some extent the
story has stood on its own.  TOTAL RECALL is a new action film also
based on an existing science fiction story and starring Arnold
Schwarzenegger.
     An Arnold Schwarzenegger action film based on a story by Philip
K. Dick sounds almost like a contradiction in terms.  Dick writes
cerebral--not to say neurotic--science fiction about people who
generally seem to live inside their heads.  You could not fit
Schwarzenegger into a Dick story with a crowbar.  The main character of
Dick's "We Can Remember It for You Wholesale" is a mousy, hen-pecked
government clerk.  Changes were inevitable if the story was to be made
into an action vehicle and vast changes were indeed made.  Yet the
screenplay has retained much of the  plot and most of the engaging ideas
of the story before going off in its own direction.  Even when it does
diverge, some of the concepts it adds are thoughtful and intelligent.
Of course, some unfortunately are not.  I know of nobody who actually
liked the last ten minutes or so of the film.  Like many films, TOTAL
RECALL was damaged by somebody's idea of a big finish.
     This is a story with a lot of twists, particularly early on when it
is still being faithful to the original story.  This means that I cannot
be very informative about the plot, but I can say that it starts out
being about a sort of an average 21st century man with big muscles and
an unusual problem.  He keeps dreaming about Mars.  There is nothing in
life Doug Quaid wants more than to go to Mars.  (In the story his name
was Doug Quail, but it was changed, possibly because it sounded too much
like Dan Quayle.)  Unfortunately, only relatively few people can go to
the mining colonies on Mars and Quaid is not one.  Well, the next best
thing to being there is having *been* there.  The difference between
having been there and not is having the memories.  In this future world
a company called REKALL can put artificial memories into your head more
vivid and believable than real memories.  So Quaid agrees to buy an
artificial memory of Mars--just a minor adjustment to his reality.  But
any Philip K.  Dick fan can tell you things go awry when you start
adjusting reality.  They certainly do for Quaid.  The script is a
remarkable piece of work that allows the viewer to look at the altering
of reality to be a minor plot complication in an action film or it could
be what the film is all about.  My wife came up with reasonable internal
evidence that the surface interpretation of what happens in the film is
wrong and another interpretation of the reality is correct.  Clearly the
script is richer than one usually expects from a Schwarzenegger action
chase film.
     Visually there are some very unconvincing effects and some very
nice ones.  Some of the model work is below average for Industrial Light
& Magic and Dream Quest, but there are some very impressive sights also.
Audiences seem to enjoy the subway security station as an effect
different from what ILM and DQ have done in the past.  the special
effects have been described as "eye-popping," a pun that will be
appreciated in the first five minutes of the film but also an accurate
one.  That brings us to the gore.  This film is directed by Dutchman
Paul Verhoeven.  He is generally good but uses a very great deal of gore
and violence, particularly in his later films.  This is a very violent
film and viewers should go expecting that.  Also go expecting to see a
lot of familiar brand names that helped to finance the film.  (Of
course, Dick mentions a typewriter company by name in the original
story, so there are precedents.)
     In summary, TOTAL RECALL is a lot of different films.  It should
please pretty much anyone who likes science fiction films.  It should
have a broad range of appeal on many levels.  I rate it a +2 on the -4
to +4 scale.
     [The novelette "We Can Remember It for You Wholesale" can be found
in the following magazines, collections, and anthologies:
   - MAGAZINE OF FANTASY & SCIENCE FICTION, April 1966
   - MAGAZINE OF FANTASY & SCIENCE FICTION, 30th Anniversary Issue
   - THE PRESERVING MACHINE by Philip K. Dick
   - ALPHA 5 edited by Robert Silverberg
   - THE BEST FROM FANTASY & SCIENCE FICTION 16 edited by Edward L. Ferman
   - EARTH IN TRANSIT edited by Sheila Schwartz
   - NEBULA AWARD STORIES 2 edited by Brian W. Aldiss and Harry Harrison
   - THE ROAD TO SCIENCE FICTION, edited by James E. Gunn
   - TWENTY YEARS OF FANTASY & SCIENCE FICTION edited by Edward L. Ferman
     and Robert P. Mills
   - WORLD'S BEST SCIENCE FICTION: 1967 edited by Donald A. Wollheim and
     Terry Carr]

Title
Review for Mission: Impossible (1996)
     For seven years, from September 1966 to September 1973, perhaps
the best-written program on television was "Mission: Impossible."  The
program leveraged off the popularity of the James Bond films, but in
fact, the writing and style was more like 1973's Best Picture, THE
STING.  Virtually every episode was of the same format.  The Impossible
Mission Force would be given some task to perform.  The instructions
would come on perhaps the most famous television prop of those years,
the self-destructing tape found in some mysterious location.  The team
leader would thoughtfully dig through a stack of dossiers of possible
candidates for the mission though, with the exception of the occasional
guest star, the team he chose would almost always be identical to the
team he chose the previous week.  And then the team would go into
action.  Most of the program would then be the IMF doing a sequence of
mysterious activities, obviously with purposeful intent.  Each episode
was a puzzle and a mystery.  But instead of being a who-done-it, it
would be a what's-going-on.  Pieces of a sort of Rube Goldberg machine
were being assembled.  The viewer might have no idea what the pieces
added up to and why they solved the initial problem.  Then at the end
the machine was set in motion.  In fascinating detail all the pieces
would fall into place.  We could use a real MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE movie.
We did not get it.  Instead we got a second-rate mystery film on an
espionage backdrop with one good tense sequence and a tepid James
Bond-style finale.
     Twenty-three years after we last saw him, Jim Phelps (now played
by Jon Voight instead of Peter Graves) is still around running
operations for IMF, the Impossible Mission Force.  He has a new team
featuring the talents of the hard-edged Ethan Hunt (Tom Cruise playing
an E. Howard Hunt-like character with a few new characterization
wrinkles for Cruise).  The mission as the film begins is to stymie an
attempt to steal a list of agents with the code-names and real name.
This is the kind of mission that the IMF should be able to do with
their eyes closed.  This time, however, there are unexpected turns for
the IMF and Hunt finds he must on his own solve a mystery and face a
mission on his own.  Even with this basis the puzzle format of the
original series could have been honored.  The script could have
followed a mysterious sequence of preparations for the tasks he has to
perform, but that is approach is thrown out.  Instead we hear what his
objective is--and it does sound very difficult--and then we just follow
him as he does it.  There are no hints as to how he will perform that
task, we just watch has he does it.  The only real puzzle for the
viewer is to guess who is doing what to whom, and it is not made very
difficult.  The clue that leads to the solution of the mystery is an
extreme contrivance involving a character senselessly giving himself
away.  Perhaps somebody thought that modern audiences might not take
well to being asked to puzzle about something that is not
straightforward and simple.
     Tom Cruise does get a chance to burn a little in anger and to show
a little confusion, but in general his character is internalized and
this is not a difficult character to play.  This might have been a good
role for Kevin Spacey to play.  Second billing goes to the Jon Voight
whose Jim Phelps overshadows much of the film though he quickly
disappears from sight.  Somewhat more memorable is Vanessa Redgrave as
a mysterious woman from the dark side of the night world.  Cruise is
teamed with Emmanuelle Beart of MANON OF THE SPRINGS, UN COEUR EN
HIVER, and more recently NELLY ET MONSIEUR ARNAUD.  Beart is a talented
actress, but this is not her kind of role and she brings nothing to it.
Danny Elfman does bring something to the musical score, but mostly his
touch is not needed.  I got a genuine chill down my spine with the
spectacular opening rendition of Lalo Schifrin theme done with a full
orchestra.  For me that was the high point of the film.  One of the
low-points with the disco version under the closing credits.
     In the final analysis, the big fault of MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE is
that the title makes promises that the script cannot fulfill.  There
are better spy films that have come and gone with far less fanfare.
Perhaps this would have worked better if Zallian had followed through
and written the script.  A better script would have gone a long way to
improving this film.  I rate it a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Philadelphia (1993)
     Andrew Beckett (played by Tom Hanks) is a successful lawyer for a
prestigious Philadelphia law firm.  He is clearly something of a hotshot
whom his firm has working for lucrative clients.  He also is gay and
discovers that he has AIDS.  When the first visible signs of his disease
appear he is fired over an alleged incident of incompetence.  He decides to
sue his former firm for wrongful dismissal.  The only lawyer he can get is a
flashy ambulance-chaser who is also an anti-gay bigot, Joe Miller, played by
Denzel Washington.  These two little-guys take on the big-guy law firm and
the result is the predictable courtroom battle which becomes a major media
event.  Beckett and Miller must slug it out with the legal giant in a
courtroom battle that Beckett may not live to see resolved.
     While the story is only too straightforward, the telling is not.  The
script by Ron Nyswaner has the feel of a stage play adapted to the screen
without sufficient consideration for the differences in the medium.  The
story will jump forward six weeks and then jump to a flashback to show
events that took place in that time.  At one point the evil law firm seems
to have dug up information that only Hanks and one of his lovers would have
known, but there is no explanation of how they know what they know.  Yet
with such a good case they make damaging admissions on the witness stand
without any thought of the reaction.
     There are major dramatic scenes that we would expect to see but which
are omitted.  We never see Beckett's immediate reaction to being told he has
AIDS, yet Demme takes screen time to give us an extended montage of street
scenes of Philadelphia and a helicopter ride around the rooftop statue of
William Penn.  Equally out of place is Hanks' extended and melodramatic
description of the beautiful aria "La Mamma Morta" from the third act of
Catalani's ANDREA CHENIER.  It is shot from odd angles at Hanks--Demme seems
to use a lot of strange camera angles in this film, bathed melodramatically
in red light from an unknown source.  Apparently Director Jonathan Demme
needed show Beckett was a man of deep passion while at the same time not
risking showing on the screen Beckett's passion for his lover Miguel, played
by Antonio Banderas.  In fact, there is virtually nothing in the film about
Beckett's private gay life, though we get to see a lot of his biological
family and the love and support he gets from his mother, played by Joanne
Woodward.
     Tom Hanks will probably be considered at Oscar time, though his
performance owes a good deal to his makeup artist.  Still his performance
was at least decent.  Neither Jason Robards, as the head of the law firm,
nor Denzel Washington seemed to be bringing much to their roles to
distinguish this performance from any of their others.  Joanne Woodward is
given about four scenes and may well be present only to lend her moral
support to the production.
     I suppose that Demme should be lauded for making a major Hollywood film
on the subject of AIDS, but PHILADELPHIA pales beside LONGTIME COMPANION and
this year's AND THE BAND PLAYED ON.  The best of intentions clearly went at
least somewhat awry.  My rating would be a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Jay and Silent Bob Strike Back (2001)
    CAPSULE: The running gag pair of characters from all of Kevin
    Smith's films gets their own movie.  The gags are sporadically
    funny.  It is more than occasionally funny for teens who are
    fond of scatological humor and anti-gay jokes.  The plot is
    weak and  the leads are not a particularly funny comic team.
    The little inside jokes and digs at other entertainment and
    particularly at Kevin Smith films are the best features of the
    film.  Sadly for me they were just not funny enough to make the
    film worth watching.  This feels like the high school skit that
    that the principal would not let the kids do on talent night.
    (And it turns out he had very good reasons.)  Rating: 4
    (0 to 10), low 0 (-4 to +4)
A film needs a plot.  It needs characters for empathy value.  It
needs a story and an emotional center.  If a film is just a chain
of jokes it can only be so good and any entertainment value will
succeed or fail based on how funny the jokes are.  Kevin Smith has
now made two satisfying films, CLERKS and CHASING AMY.  With DOGMA
he tried to make a philosophical religious comedy and mixed with a
madcap romp.  Peter Cook and Dudley Moore did that very
successfully with their BEDAZZLED.  But getting the combination to
work is very hard to do right and Kevin Smith's fecal monsters in
DOGMA were not the way to do it.  His remaining two films,
MALLRATS and his new JAY AND SILENT BOB STRIKE BACK are aimed
squarely at a teenage audience.  JAY AND SILENT BOB STRIKE BACK is
a compendium of gay jokes, penis jokes, flatulence jokes, film
pastiches, and in-jokes.  How funny the jokes are will be a
subjective call.  For me, the vast majority of the jokes were just
not very funny.  There was not enough cleverness or variety.  It
is funny at most once or twice to accuse someone of being gay.
Penis jokes work only so many times.
Showing up as minor characters in every Kevin Smith film Jay and
Silent Bob were a clever pair of human running gags.  They were
sort of the modern equivalents of Naunton Wayne and Basil Radford,
the comic duo who showed up satirizing the English middle class in
several good British post-war films including DEAD OF NIGHT, THE
LADY VANISHES, and PASSPORT TO PIMLICO.  Jay and Silent Bob were
originally supposedly typical Generation X stoners.  As the series
wore on they had larger and larger parts.  In JAY AND SILENT BOB
STRIKE BACK they are the leads.
Jay and Silent Bob (played by Jason Mewes and Kevin Smith) are
chased away from the front of the convenience store where they
were dealing drugs in CLERKS.  This leaves them at loose ends.
They are not sure what would be worthwhile to do with their lives
when they hear that a comic book with characters visually modeled
on them will be adapted into a movie.  They decide to devote their
lives to wrecking the movie or getting some of that big movie
industry cash.  So it is off to Hollywood to shake down the movie
company and having adventures along the way.  The film is mostly
about their adventures on the road and when they get to Hollywood
The problem with this comedy team is that neither really pulls his
weight to make the film funny.  Silent Bob, being silent, can only
contribute to the comedy by reacting with that very expressive
face of his.  This makes his piece of the comedy even less than a
straight man like a Dean Martin or Bud Abbott would have.  Jay has
to be the comic.  He could carry the load for both if he were
extremely inventive.  The problem is that he is not sufficiently
funny.  He is too bland to be the comic half and his lines just do
not show any comic flair.  So Jay and Silent Bob are a long way
from being a successful comic team.  Their starring roles and the
low humor make this a comedy for those young at mind and for
people who can laugh at gags they have seen before--sometimes just
minutes before.
Like DOGMA before it, but definitely not like CHASING AMY, this
film feels more like an amateurish skit than a real movie.
Certainly neither the plot nor the characters are at all
involving.  They are excuses for gags, many of which still fall
flat.  It is DOGMA without any of the humorous theological
content.  The film does not offer much to an adult audience.  I
rate it 4 on the 0 to 10 scale and a low 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Hello Again (1987)
          Capsule review:  Director Frank Perry is best at making
     odd, thought-provoking dramas.  His attempt at making a light
     comedy in the Touchstone tradition is less than a roaring
     success.  Shelley Long plays a woman magically brought back
     from the dead who has to get back into life.  Nobody's
     reactions are believable.  Rating: 0.
     A few months ago, when OUTRAGEOUS FORTUNE was released, I wrote about
what I expected would be fondly remembered as "the Touchstone comedies."
They were a set of formula comedies, but each was fairly enjoyable.  Well,
the formula is already starting to wear a little thin.  HELLO AGAIN has a
below-par script, some spotty acting, and very little in the way of humor.
For the first eighty minutes or so the story seems aimless but amiable, then
suddenly things do start to happen, but nothing very good.
     Lucy Chadman (one of a number of nearly identical characters Shelley
Long has played) has a bland existence as the wife of a Long Island plastic
surgeon.  About the only thing really unusual in her life is the year she
was dead before her occult-loving sister brought her back to life.  The
repercussions are not unlike those in MY FAVORITE YEAR and MOVE OVER,
DARLING in which supposedly dead wives prove to be alive.  Chadman finds her
husband has married her mercenary best friend (played by Sela Ward, who is
nowhere nearly as striking as she was in NOTHING IN COMMON).  People react
in different ways to Chadman's return and each reaction rings false.  This
could have been a very emotional comedy, but Susan Isaacs's script keeps
sabotaging itself.  Long's character is supposed to be incredibly clumsy for
no other reason than to throw in a little gratuitous slapstick.  It may work
with some slapstick actors, but Long is incredibly inept at acting inept.
Her pratfalls all seem mechanical and staged.  In fact, the film has the
feel of having been written for Chevy Chase and then modified for a female
lead.
     What makes the film even more disappointing is the track record of its
director and writer, Frank Perry and Susan Isaacs, who were also responsible
for COMPROMISING POSITIONS.  Perry's earlier works, incidentally, include
films stranger and more memorable than HELLO AGAIN, including DAVID AND
LISA, LADYBUG LADYBUG, THE SWIMMER, MAN ON A SWING, and RANCHO DELUXE.  In
such company HELLO AGAIN will be quickly forgotten.  Rate it a low 0 on the
-4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Quiz Show (1994)
          Capsule review:  QUIZ SHOW is an intellectual EIGHT
     MEN OUT.  It is an in-depth look at an almost forgotten
     scandal that made national headlines back in 1958.  Once
     the public realized that TV quiz shows were rigged to
     promote ratings, they would never look at television in
     quite the same way again.  Robert Redford directs from a
     terrific, ironic screenplay.  Rating: low +3 (-4 to +4)
     In 1958 the biggest things on television were the TV quiz shows.
They were a national craze of rarely matched proportions.  One producer
had four highly-rated quiz shows: "Dotto," "Twenty-one," "The $64,000
Question," and "The $64,000 Challenge."  Edward Hilgemeier Jr. was a
daytime "Dotto" standby contestant who was never actually chosen to
appear, but was waiting to appear if he was needed.  A woman waiting to
appear was chosen and she went on-stage leaving behind a small
notebook.  Hilgemeier read the notebook and found some odd notes.  The
woman contestant won that night against a man who was a former winner,
but all the answers she gave were in the little notebook.  Hilgemeier
went to the man she defeated and showed him the notebook.  The two then
complained to the producers and each was given a bribe to forget about
the notebook.  But Hilgemeier found out the actual contestant was paid
$4000 for his silence, he had gotten only a $1500 bribe.  This struck
Mr. Hilgemeier as unfair and he no longer felt bound to keep silent.
Soon the New York State attorney was involved.  Little attention was
paid to the story until a second contestant confirmed Hilgemeier's
claims.  This was a disgruntled former winner on "Twenty-one" named
Herbert W. Stempel.  He joined Hilgemeier to claim that the game show
he was on was also fixed.  Hilgemeier was a complete unknown but
millions of viewers knew Stempel and now the story was news.  The
result was a three-year national scandal that would rock the TV
industry and the country as well as tarnishing the name of one of the
most respected families in American academics.
     To tell the story in 130 minutes in QUIZ SHOW, those three years
have been somewhat simplified and scoped down to seem like less than
one year.  But the result is yet another powerfully-scripted and
beautifully made film co-produced and directed by Robert Redford.  The
film is like an ALL THE PRESIDENT'S MEN or EIGHT MEN OUT for the first
television generation.
     Why was it considered important to control the results on quiz
shows?  The most commonly heard explanation is a shrug and the comment
"This is television."  Indeed television was and is treated as if it is
a different reality and this scandal and its aftermath helped the
industry define just what television is.
     When the film opens the sponsor is unhappy that the reigning
champion on "Twenty-one" Stempel (played by John Turturo) is a Jew, and
one with a Queens accent and bad teeth.  The time has come to get a new
champion.  About this time Charles Van Doren (Ralph Fiennes) is
applying to be a "Dotto" contestant.  Van Doren comes from a family of
well-known scholarly academics.  Van Doren has just the WASPy style and
background that the show producers Enright and Freedman (David Paymer
and Hank Azaria) would like their champion to have.  But they need to
control him and ask will he play along and take answers?  "What would
Kant say?" Van Doren muses.  "He'd agree!" the producers tell him
confidently.  Van Doren and Stempel allow themselves to be manipulated
into cooperating with the rigging.  But when Stempel is first
humiliated by having to miss an easy question and then feels he is not
being properly rewarded he decides to take action.  The story is told
by Richard Goodwin (Rob Morrow), an idealistic Harvard grad student in
a low-paid job on House Subcommittee on Legislative Oversight who led
the investigation.  Incidentally, after the uproar the real Goodwin
wrote a book about the scandal and now is one of the producers of this
film based on the book.
     With the possible exception of THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION, QUIZ SHOW
has the best script of any film I have seen this year.  Paul Attanasio
has written a screenplay full of often very funny ironic humor.  It is
also packed with contrasts and conflicts.  Beyond the obvious contrast
of honesty and dishonesty, we have a father-son conflict with Mark Van
Doren (played by Paul Scofield) representing the values and honor of
the family while Charles at once tries to live up to and rebel from
those values.  There is the high academic standard that the father hold
up for the family and the son who is only a disappointingly very good.
There is a conflict between the academic culture of the Van Dorens and
the mass culture that television and the quiz shows represent.  We see
the wealth of the aristocratic Van Dorens and the cheap and disarrayed
home of the Stempels.  There is a perceived anti-Semitism in the
viewing public to which the Jewish game show producers pander in their
decision to take Stempel off the show.  And there is just a moment of
negative reaction at the Van Doren when they hear that their guest,
Dick Goodwin, is from the predominantly Jewish town Brookline.  The
script also contrasts the slow money world of campus teaching with the
fast-money world of television where a college instructor who used to
earn under $90 a week but lives a quiet scholarly life can earn
thousands in one night at the cost of a life of fame and constant
tension.  All of these individual conflicts continue at the same time
in the script.
     As someone who considers SCHINDLER'S LIST and A MAN FOR ALL
SEASONS to be the two best films he has ever seen, seeing Paul Scofield
and Ralph Fiennes on the screen together as father and son is a special
experience in itself.  No character is really the main character of
QUIZ SHOW, but Ralph Fiennes's Charles Van Doren is the character we
learn most about.  And  Fiennes certainly cuts a trimmer and more
dashing figure than he did in SCHINDLER'S LIST.  He has not quite
mastered an American accent, but here one ascribes his tones to perhaps
having been educated abroad.  Scofield is very dignified as his father,
but it is hard not to see a lot of Thomas More's quick mind and starchy
correctness in his Mark Van Doren.  John Turturo is adequately abrasive
as his course vulgarian from Queens.  One of the biggest surprises is
David Paymer's slimeball executive.  He has usually played simpy nice-
guy roles and it is nice to see him in a role into which he can put a
little power.  Barry Levinson, who directed Redford in THE NATURAL, is
cast as Dave Garroway, long-time host of the "Today Show."  The two men
are entirely different types and one wonders why there was such an
inappropriate piece of casting.  Levinson gives the roles about the
same authenticity that Sylvester Stallone could give to playing Ronald
Coleman.  Martin Scorsese is also present playing a very high executive
for Geritol, but at least here nobody knows what a Geritol executive is
supposed to look like.
     Michael Ballhaus was director of photography and here one of the
big mistakes was made.  The entire film is shot in a tiresome yellow
filter to create some sort of period feel and in addition most scenes
seem dominated by the color brown, probably for the same reason.  The
effect is artificial and irritating, though it might have worked better
with a lighter filter.
     A few minor quibbles with the script: In a crowded restaurant quiz
show producer Dan Enright has a heated discussion with Stempel over
arranging for Stempel to lose.  It is very difficult to believe Enright
would be so indiscrete.  Levinson raises his hand in a gesture somewhat
like the one that Dave Garroway would use, but Garroway would say
"Peace."  Levinson merely raises his hand.  And frankly I do not
remember NBC using the peacock until the 60s, though I could be
misremembering.
     Still, this is a great script and a very good look at a nearly
forgotten, but nontheless influential American scandal.  I give it a
low +3 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Brassed Off (1996)
     Since the 1950s the British have certainly known how to make
modest but affecting films in ways that American filmmakers rarely
attempt.  Some simple comedies from the post-war era gave us eloquent
and loving pictures of British village life still memorable today.
That tradition is strong in BRASSED OFF, but mostly in the first half
of the film.  Director/writer Mark Herman hooks the audience with a
light comic view of the mining village of Grimely, but increasingly the
replaces the comedy with serious drama.  We see the village having its
most difficult times with the pit closings of the Margaret Thatcher
administration.  Finally, with the viewer hooked and caring about the
characters, the film gets in its angry speech about the policy of pit
closings of Thatcher's Tory party.  Not that it is a total surprise
with the opening of the film making some angry remarks about closing
mines to replace with nuclear power plants.
     The heart of the Yorkshire town of Grimely is its colliery.
('Ere.  of Grimely--well, most of it anyway--is the Grimely Colliery
Brass Band.  The band has been around for a hundred years.  But these
are hard times for Grimely.  The company looks like it might close the
colliery and if there really is a pit closing, the whole town might
just as well dry up and blow away.  Already there are those in the band
who are so depressed about what is happening to the town that they are
ready to quit the band.  Band leader Danny (Pete Postlethwaite, the
currently best thing about THE LOST WORLD: JURASSIC PARK) cannot
believe that people in the town will let the band die, even if the mine
goes under.  Just as the band is starting to founder, new life is
breathed into it by a new member.  Gloria (the radiant Tara
Fitzgerald), granddaughter of a former great band member, returns to
the town of her birth with her grandfather's flugelhorn.  The first
woman ever in the Grimely Colliery Brass Band plays the flugelhorn as
well as her grandfather did.  Suddenly the band starts looking and
sounding better to the band members.  While the future of the town is
souring, the men are distracted for a few hours a week by music and a
little flirting.  And of course some of the wives are jealous.  But
things grow grimmer in Grimely as the company offers a job buyout.
While some band members are sacrificing food for music, most of the
town is looking at whether they want to mortgage the future of the town
in the buyout or hope the mines are not closed.  Mark Herman has a feel
for the humanity of the people, no doubt based on his youth in
Yorkshire.
     Pete Postlethwaite is one of the British actors who does a great
job and nobody seems to make much of a fuss about.  He had major roles
in films such as IN THE NAME OF THE FATHER, or bit parts in films such
as THE USUAL SUSPECTS.  His bicycle-riding band leader in denial about
how serious the town's problems are is entirely different from roles he
has done before.  Tara Fitzgerald is a decent actress, and though I
have not seen her in any really demanding roles, she is certainly a joy
to watch.  Ewan McGregor, like Postlethwaite, is also in two current
films, this and THE PILLOW BOOK.  And with his Scottish name it goes
without saying that he was in TRAINSPOTTING.  Veteran character actor
Jim Carter (THE ADVOCATE, BLACK BEAUTY, and RICHARD III), looking like
a heavy-set Leonard Rossiter, usually can be counted on for a bit a
color.
     Americans will be at a slight disadvantage in seeing BRASSED OFF.
They will be informed at the outset what a colliery is, but the
Yorkshire accent takes a little getting used to.  What very likely were
some funny lines will go past viewers not quick enough to pick up what
is said.  Curiously the anti-Tory sentiments may hit home from
similarities in policy between the Conservative Tories and the
Republican Party.  But the political arguments will lose a little
impact since coal-mining is shown to be a dangerous profession which
shortens lives.  The viewer may decide that it is just as well that the
next generation is saved from going into the pits and instead is forced
to find other work.
     Not surprisingly, the score by Trevor Jones is big and brassy with
some nice brass renditions of popular light classical themes.  The
score is played by the Grimethorpe Colliery Band who also supplied
extras for the story's band.  No doubt Grimely is based in no small
part on Grimethorpe.  This is a film that has more than a few moving
moments and it worth looking for.  There is more to this film than the
trailers would lead one to think.  I rate it a low +2 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Q & A (1990)
     I generally claim that a film can tell the same story you could tell in
forty to sixty pages of prose.  That rule is not infallible.  Q & A is a
long film (at 132 minutes) but it is amazing how much happens in the course
of this realistic thriller looking at police and politics.  It is difficult
to believe this hard-edged film could have been directed by the same man who
last year directed the much softer FAMILY BUSINESS.  Q & A is complex and
frankly, difficult to follow, with many more major characters than one
expects to see in a film.  It is nice to see a film that does not talk down
to its audience even if perhaps it goes a little far in the other direction.
Not making the film any easier to follow, much of the dialogue is spoken in
(realistically) thick accents.
     Q & A opens with policeman Mike Brennan (played by Nick Nolte)
murdering a Puerto Rican drug pusher and then intimidating witnesses into
saying the dead man pulled a gun on him.  Called in purportedly to
investigate (but actually to whitewash) is Al Reilly (played by Timothy
Hutton), the new D.A.'s assistant.  Reilly was formerly a policeman and the
son of a much-loved legend on the police force.  The case does look simple
enough to start with, but a friend tips off Reilly that there may be more
going on than is immediately apparent.  The more Reilly digs the more he
finds.  His chief subject, Brennan, is a big, easy man instantly likable and
quickly detestable.  He has an open love of crude, though often funny,
ethnic jokes that soon gives way to an obvious racism.  Brennan is finding
himself in an increasingly multi-ethnic, multi-racial New York and resents
how things have changed since the "good old days."  In fact, there are many
ethnic and other minorities represented in the plot--virtually every
important character is from a minority--and the hatred each group has for
the others is part of what the story is about.  The plot involves Irish,
Italians, Puerto Ricans, gays, and Jews--Sephardic and Ashkenazic.  The plot
also involves a D.A.~with higher political aspirations (played by Patrick
O'Neal) and a drug runner (played by Armand Asante) involved with both the
victim and with Reilly's former fiancee.  There is no chance I can do a
reasonable job of explaining a complex and highly inter-woven plot such as Q
& A in a paragraph or two.
     Q & A has a very downbeat feel to it, without the sorts of heroes this
sort of film would usually have.  Lumet is not trying to make us like his
characters but instead just wants us to see the way things are.  It is set
in a New York City that is as easily recognizable by the feel as by the
buildings.  The music is by Rube'n Blades, who also wrote the song under the
titles.  (Blades, incidentally, is reportedly very likely to announce soon
his candidacy for the presidency of Panama.)  For Lumet Q & A represents a
return to a more serious style of filmmaking, such as his PRINCE OF THE
CITY.  I rate it a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for My Family (1995)
     Several films made for PBS's American Playhouse have been quality
motion pictures and beat most theatrical fare by a wide margin.
Eventually American Playhouse started giving theatrical release to some
of their productions before having them appear on television.  One of
their earlier and  definitely one of their better productions was EL
NORTE.  It was the story of a brother and sister who flee Guatemala and
its politics and illegally enter the United States.  That film was
written and directed by Gregory Nava.  With many of the same resonances
Nava has co-written and directed MY FAMILY.  Unfortunately, while this
film, also made in part for American Playhouse, is by no means a bad or
even a mediocre film, it fails to show the strength of EL NORTE.  MY
FAMILY is the story of three generations of the Mexican-American
Sanchez family told as a mosaic of individual stories.  The real
problem is that most of the individual stories are well-worn and
familiar.  The film tells how as a boy Jose Sanchez walked from his
home in Mexico to Los Angeles when the border was just a line drawn in
the sand.  Taking a gardening job at a wealthy home, he meets and
marries Maria (Jenny Gago).  He believes himself to be safe and secure
in the United States, but the hand of United States Immigration reaches
out and separates his family.  The bitterness of this injustice and the
rage it causes reaches out and destroys two of the Sanchez sons.  The
two boys are Chucho (played by Esai Morales) and Jimmy (played by Jimmy
Smits).  Almost a generation apart, young Jimmy idolizes Chucho.
Chucho becomes a likable and relatively benign Pachuco gang member,
just slightly on the shady side of the law.  He is severely punished
for legal offenses for which a richer man would have received a much
less harsh treatment.  Young Jimmy sees what happens to his beloved
older brother and grows to have an immense pent-up rage from the
injustices done to his family.  He is a rebel without any real cause
until time gives him something he wants to fight for.
     What is right with this film is that it is a moving look at a
community under-represented in film.  What is wrong is that the writing
is several notches below EL NORTE.  Too often the film tries to be
whimsical when a more serious approach would have been more effective.
Nava undercuts the realism of the drama scenes that are just a bit
funnier than they should have been, occasionally even unkindly turning
characters into caricatures.  And even the light dusting of the
supernatural does not help the credibility either.  And it seems to me
that when an old couple look at each other and sum up saying "It's been
a good life," it has to be because either they expect their lives or
the film to end in the next few minutes.
     Jimmy Smits has never been my favorite actor, but this is
certainly the closest he has ever come to being a powerful actor in a
serious dramatic role.  Esai Morales and Eduardo Lopez Rojas, the
latter as the adult Jose, coast through their roles without having to
show much emotional range.  Jenny Gago, on the other hand, carries much
more of the film than her low fourth-billing status would indicate.
Edward James Olmos and Mary Steenburgen have small parts.  The latter
seems to be present only to provide one of the film's two sympathetic
Anglos.
     I cannot say that there were not moments when MY FAMILY brought a
tear to my eye, so Nava must have been doing something right.  But as
epics about ethnic families go, other films have given us fresher and
more compelling material.  I give this a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Month by the Lake, A (1995)
     Miss Bentley (played by Vanessa Redgrave) has been coming to Lake
Como for vacation since she was a little girl.  When she was young,
many English vacationed in Lake Como, but of late there are few other
English vacationing here.  This year she is the only person from home
until a new mystery man arrives.  Major Paul Winslow (Edward Fox) is
more boy than man, but Miss Bentley is interested in the dashing-
looking Englishman.  But then so is Miss Beaumont (Uma Thurman), the
newly arrived American nanny for an Italian family.  The two compete
for Winslow's attentions, Beaumont with her youth and a seemingly
effortless flirtation, Bentley with what might almost be called a
campaign.  Against the background of the pleasant Italian scenery the
two play out their game.
     This all sounds like it could be done very broadly and could be
quite funny.  Or it could just bask in the sunshine and lovely natural
setting and somehow end up being magical like ENCHANTED APRIL was.
Neither is really the case.  Trevor Bentham`s screenplay, based on the
novelette by H. E. Bates leans more toward understatement.  Winslow is
such a silly man that one wonders why the women are trying so hard.
Beaumont is young and attractive, but empty and shallow.  The only
strong emotion in the film is Bentley's desperation for the man who may
be her last chance ever to marry.  Perhaps buried in this film is an
allegory about the effortless brashness of America and a more serious
and more conflict-bound Europe, but if so, there is not much to the
metaphor.  More likely this is just an effort to tell a leisurely story
in a leisurely setting.  If the latter it true, it is a little too much
leisure, and the viewer starts looking for the political conflict that
must be present in 1937 Italy.  In fact, for 1937 Italy, the Lake Como
area must be among the least interesting places to be in the country.
When Bentley sees a Fascist parade and nearly gets into serious trouble
for photographing it, the film seems to perk up a bit in the hope that
something of some import will happen.  But the moment is quickly
fleeting and the story returns from a battle of ideas to a battle of
flirtations.  It is not surprising that more is not made of the pre-war
politics since the original Bates story was set around 1960, or so I
have been told.
     Director John Irvin is best know recently for his WIDOWS' PEAK, a
film that I found even more predictable than A MONTH BY THE LAKE, but
at least it had a story to predict.  Vanessa Redgrave does what she can
with the silly woman she plays, but it cannot have been one of her
favorite roles.  I know there are people in the world someplace who
think that Uma Thurman is talented and very attractive just like I know
there are people who think liver and onions is delicious.  It is hard
for me to be keen on either.  Going back to A ROOM WITH A VIEW, we have
seen quite a few prestige British period pieces playing the art house
circuit.  H. E. Bates is unfortunately no E. M. Forster and A MONTH BY
THE LAKE is no ROOM WITH A VIEW.  Rate it a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Interview with the Vampire: The Vampire Chronicles (1994)
     It seems a natural to write a vampire story from the point of view
of the vampire and to really explore what it must be like to be a
vampire.  It must have been done in pulp fiction, though I am not
specifically aware of any such story.  Fred Saberhagen tried it in 1975
with THE DRACULA TAPE.  But the idea became a sensation with 1976's
INTERVIEW WITH THE VAMPIRE by Anne Rice.  This smoky, sensual novel of
the relationship between the new vampire Louis and the sublimely amoral
Vampire Lestat struck a responsive chord with readers.  Since then Rice
has become second only to Bram Stoker for popularity of her vampire
fiction.
     Neil Jordan has directed the new film version of INTERVIEW WITH
THE VAMPIRE.  At first look, it seems a long stretch from his popular
MONA LISA and THE CRYING GAME.  In fact, viewers who like this film
should also see his earlier COMPANY OF WOLVES and vice versa.  Each is
a unique, dreamlike, and Freudean exploration of the supernatural.
That film was a very creative retelling of Little Red Riding Hood as a
sort of sexual werewolf story.  The two films should almost be seen as
a pair.
     The story begins in 1791 as Louis (played by Brad Pitt) is a
plantation owner who has lost his family and thinks he has nothing left
to live for.  What he gets is not death but instead is undeath, the
gift--if "gift" is the right word--of the Vampire Lestat (Tom Cruise).
The two take up living together--if "living" is the right word--on
Louis's plantation as Lestat helps Louis through the hardest transition
of his life--if "life" ... well, you get the idea.  Much of the story
is just how Louis adapts to his new state.  Eventually Louis is fed up
Lestat's indiscriminate killing of humans.  He would leave, but Lestat
binds him by making the eleven-year-old Claudia a vampire and the third
member of the family.  Now Claudia will forever have the body of a
child--well, a child with an impervious body and sharp teeth--while her
mind matures to that of an adult.
     The pacing Anne Rice's story, fairly faithfully rendered since
Rice herself scripted, is paradoxically both slow and fast.  Years seem
to go by very quickly to immortals who never change.   But the story
has an almost Tennessee Williams feel of characters working out deep
emotional problems.  (Williams, incidentally, started out in the horror
genre himself.  Some of his plays, like SUDDENLY LAST SUMMER, still
show the hand of the horror writer.  This film may well represent the
sort of thing he might have written had he continued.)  The story give
us a sensory portrait of how the world is different for the Undead.
Much of the film is just concerned introspectively with the condition
of being a vampire and with the inter-relationships of the vampires.
Lestat accepts his condition and happily goes about the business of
killing.  Louis is more moral and detests his parasitic inclinations.
Claudia is torn between the ways of the two.  This is not to say that
the entire film is cerebral.  There certainly is some action and the
plot does advance.  But Jordan intentionally makes plot second to
style.  His story is told with dramatic visual style which takes full
advantage of moody settings in New Orleans and Paris.  The photography
is by Philippe Rousselot, who is known for atmospheric pieces like
DIVA, HENRY & JUNE, and SOMMERSBY.
     As far as to acting, I would say honors to all, but  the most
amazing acting award goes to Kirsten Dunst as Claudia.  Anna Paquin won
an Oscar for far less interesting acting in THE PIANO.  I do not know
the age of Dunst, but she has to play all the emotions of an adult
woman in the body of an eleven-year-old.  It sounds like an impossible
casting job.  Amazingly, Dunst has an adult's acting talent while she
still looks the part of a child.  I would not surprised if we end up
hearing a lot of her in the years to come.  Of course there was the
whole brouhaha over Tom Cruise in the role of Lestat.  Rice was at
first very vocal against the casting choice, then later claims to have
said that she liked Cruise in the role.  I went through the same set of
emotions.  This is a major departure for Cruise and he plays Lestat
with just the right air of flippancy.  It is hard to understand how
anyone saw it initially, but Cruise is just about perfect for Lestat.
Brad Pitt as Louis is fine, as the sometimes bewildered and sometimes
vengeful, but always well-intentioned vampire who at least nominally
the main character.  In smaller roles we have Christian Slater, Stephen
Rea (who was also in Jordan's CRYING GAME) and Antonio Banderas.
Whatever faults the film has, it is not in the acting.
     Neil Jordan seems to make one good film after another on the theme
of the sub-culture of people who live outside normal society.  As his
films go, this is not one of his best efforts.  But as far as an
exploration of the world of the undead, Anne Rice has nothing to
complain about.  This film get a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Mediterraneo (1991)
     It's an old story really.  The conqueror conquers the land, stays, and
then the land conquers the conqueror.  It happened many times in Chinese
history.  It is really what LOCAL HERO and DANCES WITH WOLVES were about.
There are references to it happening in James Michener's HAWAII  (There are
probably better examples.)  In MEDITERRANEO, set during World War II, eight
fairly incompetent Italian soldiers are sent to secure a small Greek island.
An enemy attack destroys their boat and incompetence destroys the radio.
There is nothing they can do but secure the island for Italy and wait out
the war with almost no responsibility.  Over the course of three years they
become more Greek than Italian.
     This is an amiable and likable comedy that won the Academy Award for
Best Foreign-Language Film of 1991.  While many of the situations are
cliched, the film never appears to be trying to be more than it actually is.
The Italians are led by Lt. Montini (played by Claudio Bigagli), who wants
to make art, not war.  Considerably more aggressive is Sgt. Lo Russo (played
by Diego Abatantuono), who is anxious to get on with the war but will settle
for soccer.  If the film has any message it is that people can learn to
adapt to good climate, beautiful scenery, dance, easy sex, soccer, drugs,
and no responsibility.
     One place the film does have a problem is in the passage of time.  What
seems to the viewer to be a couple of months the dialogue tells us is three
years.  Then again, good climate, beautiful scenery, dance, easy sex,
soccer, drugs, and no responsibility might easily make three years feel like
two months.  MEDITERRANEO is directed by Gabriele Salvatores, who previously
directed MARRAKECH EXPRESS and TURNE.  This one is guaranteed to lower your
blood pressure.  I rate it a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for World Is Not Enough, The (1999)
     There is a spectrum of styles for the plots of Bond films.  On one
hand you can Style I in which you have comic book super-villains who
are trying literally to destroy the whole world; you can have women
with dirty-joke names (e.g., Pussy Galore); you can have clues that
fall into Bond's lap by coincidences or by villain over-confidence, so
it looks like Bond always knows what he is doing; Bond always has just
the right gizmo to get out of a nasty situation; Bond never gets
injured or always heals in seconds; and the villain destroyed when Bond
pulls one conveniently located switch.  DR. NO started this trend and
it is not surprising that it seems childish.  Ian Fleming actually
wrote the plot of DR. NO first for Captain Jamaica his planned
childrens television show.  When Captain Jamaica did not sell he
rewrote the story as a supposedly adult spy novel in his then fledgling
James Bond series.
     On the other hand you can have Style II spy story.  That puts Bond
into the shadowy half-world of international espionage where he wants
to get a microfilm that tells with whom Iraq is making secret treaties;
Bond does not know who his friends are and who his enemies are; when a
bullet hits his arm it is out of action for the rest of the story; Bond
has to think very fast frequently; and occasionally Bond makes very
wrong decisions.  FROM RUSSIA WITH LOVE was an effort to move in that
direction, though John LeCarre or Len Deighton writes more in that
style.  There are people who just love the Style I Bond films and they
are an easy formula to write.  I prefer the latter and subjectively
placing a Bond film on this spectrum is how I judge if it is a good
film or not.  THE WORLD IS NOT ENOUGH has been released with much less
hype than most Bond films, and while it is still closer to the
unrealistic style of story, it still is more realistic than most Bond
films.
     In Spain James Bond (Pierce Brosnan) is picking up a stash of
money recovered from a mission that killed an MI6 agent.  He is
betrayed and nearly killed, though his life is saved by the
intervention of a mysterious sniper.  Bond returns the money to its
industrialist owner only to find out the money was booby-trapped to
explode and kill its rightful owner.  Explode it does rather
spectacularly giving rise to an impressive boat chase.  The money had
been ransom for the industrialist's daughter Elektra (Sophie Marceau).
Bond realizes that the means to kill the industrialist required not
only the money and an assassin a short distance away to trigger it, it
also required that the industrialist be wearing a special doctored
lapel pin.  This implies that the victim must have been betrayed from
within his own organization.  Bond immediately realizes that anyone who
would use such an arcane, inconvenient, and telltale mechanism to try
to kill someone and still get it to work must be impressive indeed.
That implies that his next victim might be Elektra who slipped through
the assassins fingers once already.  Elektra is continuing her father's
project to build an oil pipeline across Western Asia.  Bond discovers
the terrorist who kidnapped her is an ex-KGB agent whom a bullet in the
brain has left unable to feel pain This makes the assassin, Renard
stronger every day.  Bond dons a cover as a businessman and goes in to
protect Electra only to have her see through his cover in seconds.  She
is a strong-willed woman and highly capable woman with no intention of
cooperating with Bond.  But he still determines to protect her.
     This film makes several concessions to realism previous Brosnan
Bond films would not.  Bond gets hurt several times in this film and at
least for a short time it slows him down.  He also makes mistakes
trusting the wrong people.  Bond deduces that the briefcase of money is
a trap, but it is not soon enough to prevent the murder plan from going
through.  Hence Bond is more fallible than in previous films.  The
villain's plan is more flamboyant than simply embarrassing the British
Secret Service and killing Bond as it was in FROM RUSSIA WITH LOVE, but
the plotter and the plot are far less exaggerated than Hugo Drax and
his plan in MOONRAKER.  This also is an improvement.  And more than in
recent films it takes Bond a while to sort out good guys from bad guys.
The ending is more tense than spectacular.  These criteria do not
guarantee a good Bond film, but certainly it is more intelligent than
Bond films have been of late.
     Traditionally Michael Apted's documentaries have been much better
than his fiction films.  But here his touch does nothing but good for
the Bond series.  Either Pierce Brosnan is starting to get the hang of
being Bond or I am just starting to think of him that way, but he seems
more natural than he has in the past.  Robert Carlyle as the assassin
Renard is acceptable in a role very different from his in THE FULL
MONTY or TRAINSPOTTING.  He did not need the bullet in the head gimmick
to be a good villain.  Sophie Marceau and Denise Richards are
acceptable in their roles.  Some critics have found it unrealistic to
have Denise Richards with shorts and bare midriff as a nuclear
scientist disarming warheads.  To me that just means the critics are
more out of touch with the world than are the filmmakers.  That job
would probably be taken by someone just out of graduate school and
Richards is reasonable in the part.  Less reasonable is John Cleese as
R, the buffoon successor to Q.  Casting Cleese is a step in the wrong
direction.  The series already has plenty of chuckles and needs more
credibility.
     Usually the best part of a Bond film is the artistic opening
credit sequence which used to be done by Maurice Binder.  The visuals
in this one are on the theme of oil and seeing women in the crude in
the nude has all the taste of women mud-wrestling.  Most Bond films
take place in exotic settings which serve as product placement for
tourist destinations.  Even Istanbul seems unromantic in this film and
Azerbaijan is not vying very hard for tourist dollars.
     MINOR SPOILERS... MINOR SPOILERS... MINOR SPOILERS... MINOR
SPOILERS...
     THE WORLD IS NOT ENOUGH uses a lot of the trademark Bond touches.
Somehow the gun-sight opening at the beginning of a new Bond film still
always packs a bit of a thrill.  In this film Bond is once again a
womanizer, which probably was some of the fun of the earliest Bonds.
Traditions I could do without include the extended skiing sequences and
the tiresome running gag that Bond is so often caught having sex in the
final scene.  Ideas in this one that seem foolish include a pair of
special glasses whose power seems ridiculous.  I am not an expert but
it would take some convincing for me to believe the loss of one source
of oil would so badly affect Britain.  They do have sources in a lot of
other places, including the North Sea.  It would take even more
convincing that anyone would want to hold a half-grapefruit-sized
hemisphere of weapons-grade plutonium in their bare hand.

Title
Review for School Ties (1992)
     In 1955 St. Matthews is an extremely elite private prep school in New
England.  Graduate from St. Matthews and you are practically assured that
you will make it into an Ivy League college and go on to a distinguished or
at least comfortable career.  One of the students sums up the philosophy of
life at St. Matthews: "We do the things they tell us to and they give us the
good life."  But there is something that St. Matthews finds most
distressing.  For three years straight they have lost the big football game
to their rival school and the alumni are tired of it.  So the school has
broken the code.  They have let the coach recruit a ringer, a great high
school quarterback as well as an excellent scholar even if the boy is,
unfortunately, a Jew.  But David Greene (played by Brendan Fraser) has been
cautioned by his father and his new coach to let his religion remain his
little secret.
     Where DEAD POETS SOCIETY is about the pressures of posh prep schools
and the wondrous joy of learning English literature, SCHOOL TIES is about
the pressures and the dark underside of blooming bigotry and the old boy
system for preserving class barriers.  It is dark in tone, dark in
photography, and a much more real film than is DEAD POETS SOCIETY.  Greene
has been given mixed signals by his father (played by Ed Lauter, cast very
counter to type).  His father has told him to fit in, but also to maintain
his religious traditions.  At first, there is little anti-Semitism: a
comment here, a joke there.  Greene turns out to be a great student and a
superb athlete and just the kind of guy that everyone wants to be friends
with, including the visiting girls.  It is, in fact, a fault of  Dick Wolf's
or Darryl Ponicsan's script that Greene is just a little too good to be
believed.  But when tensions do arise through no fault of Greene's and the
secret of his religion is revealed, his classmates show their cliquishness
and religious bigotry.
     Music was provided by Maurice Jarre (and, yes, there is a brief scene
of a train).  Jarre's score is a bit more somber than his DEAD POETS SOCIETY
score.  Similarly, the camerawork is also somber and casts a grayish tinge
through the film.  Photography is by Freddie Francis--perhaps the greatest
cinemagraphic stylist alive.  His style lets him down only during the
football scenes where he uses cliched slow motion  and repeated motion.  The
film is directed by Robert Mandel.
     Minor flaws in the script--including the Jewish boy being just a bit
too perfect and also an unsatisfying climactic scene--rob what could have
been a great film, but still leave a very good film.  I rate SCHOOL TIES a
low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Big Kahuna, The (1999)
     When American playwrights want to have a character in a
frustrating, thankless occupation they usually pick that of
salesman.  We have had Arthur Miller's DEATH OF A SALESMAN, William
Inge's DARK AT THE TOP OF THE STAIRS, and David Mamet's GLENGARRY
GLEN ROSS.  Roger Rueff has taken a crack at the same field with his
stage play "The Big Kahuna," which he has now adapted for the
screen.  The plot of THE BIG KAHUNA is fairly minimal.  Two veteran
salesmen and a young representative from research come to a Wichita
hotel to sell industrial lubricants.  The three bounce off each
other as they talk about life, love, business, religion, death, and
each's history.  Almost the entire play takes place in one room with
little more than trimmings taking place outside the room.
     Lodestar Laboratories has sent three salesmen to a fancy hotel
hosting a convention in Wichita.  The three are to run a hospitality
suite.  Phil Cooper (Danny DeVito in one of his best roles ever) has
brought Tom Walker (Peter Facinelli) to his first convention.
Walker is not really a salesman, but was borrowed from R&D because
he had the right sort of image.  The pair is almost directly joined
by the supremely cynical Larry Mann (Kevin Spacey, reprising the
more nasty parts of his personality from AMERICAN BEAUTY), a
salesman with the personality of a thundercloud.  Larry goes
immediately into an angry tantrum because the food Phil has ordered
is not fine enough and the suite of rooms is not big enough.
Observing in timid fear is Bob.  As the three talk we eventually
find out about each of them.  Larry is intentionally crude and cruel
to get a reaction and to get his own way.  He has an unpleasant way
of turning a friendly conversation into a cross-examination.  He
analyzes and examines people around him like specimens on a slide.
Phil is nearly burned out and used up.  Divorced, he lives alone and
nurtures a death wish.  Placid and less intolerant than his long-
time partner Larry, he quietly sits and reads PENTHOUSE magazine
while Larry's storms blow over.  His job is most of his life now.
Young Bob is a Baptist with an urge to draw Christ into every
conversation.
     For any play that is really a filmed conversation, the rules of
plotting are different from most films.  The author only has to keep
the characters together long enough so something interesting comes
out of their mouths.  And THE BIG KAHUNA is a lot closer in style to
WHO'S AFRAID OF VIRGINIA WOOLF and MY DINNER WITH ANDRE than it is
to most films you will see in a theater today.  The film sinks or
swims by how interesting the conversation is and what it tells us
about the people having it.  For much of THE BIG KAHUNA the style is
like the old Sunday morning TV plays that showed modern people in
distress and at the end of a half hour they would smugly point to
religion as the ultimate problem solver.  This almost seemed to be a
longer version of one of those plays.  Toward the end even Bob's
religious fervor comes under attack with a few well-placed verbal
shots.
     The play is written with more symmetry and stylistic
contrivance than is at first apparent.  Each character has a secret
fantasy we see enacted.  The dialog is good dialog and is
engrossing, but that is not the same thing as realistic dialog.
(Ask William Shakespeare.)  In this case the Rueff contrives to have
each of the characters laid bare to the audience.
     This is a film that will not be for all tastes, nor will it
bring in the audiences that an action film would, but it has its
rewards.  If it does not do great boxoffice, at least the production
costs were small.  I rate it 7 on the 0 to 10 scale and a +2 on the
-4 to +4 scale.
     Oh, and the great monologue of advice at the end of the film.
That is "Everybody's Free (To Wear Sunscreen)" by Mary Smich and
read by Baz Luhrmann, and you can find the words at
http://www.thepositivemind.com/HTML/Sunscreen.html

Title
Review for Three Kings (1999)
     It is in the hours after the cease-fire in the Persian Gulf War.
Iraq is still in a state of chaos and barbarity even as the war ebbs
from it.  We focus on volunteer soldiers, none of whom actually fought
but jubilant over the victory. Nevertheless their duty continues as
captured Iraqi soldiers are being strip-searched before being
interned.  One is found carrying a map in a well-protected place.
Sergeant Troy Barlow (played by Mark Wahlberg), Staff Sergeant Chief
Elgin (Ice Cube), and Private Conrad Vig (Spike Jonze) realize that the
map must show where the Iraqis have hidden gold bullion looted from
Kuwait.  They decide to make a little extra-curricular expedition to
liberate the gold for their own purposes.  Special Forces Captain
Archie Gates (George Clooney) has been escorting TV journalist Adriana
Cruz (Nora Dunn), but when he gets wind of the treasure map he decides
to ditch Cruz and push his way into the expedition and a share of the
gold.
     The village where the gold has been stored is a hotbed of Iraqi
rebels who have been promised American support if they would fight
against Saddam.  They are overjoyed to find four armed Americans show
up at last to help them defend themselves.  However despair returns to
them when Iraqi soldiers show up.  The leader of the soldiers offers
the Americans a compromise.  The yanks can take the gold and leave the
rebels to the Iraqi army.  They even are happy to help the Americans
load "Saddam's gold" onto the American vehicles in order to be rid of
the conquering army and to proceed with their sadistic duty against the
rebels.  The Americans are only too happy with the deal until Gates
realizes what his complicity in the betrayal of Iraqi rebels will mean.
He decides he cannot leave the villagers to their fate.  This sets in
motion the most deadly chapter of the war for the four volunteers.
     Essentially the plot could have been a Western with just a few
substitutions. However the plot is less important than the background
of THREE KINGS.  The film really becomes a serious political
examination of Americans in the war, America's clumsy and dangerous
foreign policy, and just how it affects other cultures.  In it bleak
characterization of political policy it stands with films like THE
KILLING FIELDS.  In the eyes of this film as the Iraqi government
suppresses and tortures its own people, the Americans blunder around in
quest of low oil prices.  Meanwhile opportunistic news reporters fight
for new stories of what is happening, losing interest once a story has
already been covered by someone else, trying to get ahead in the world
of news industry politics.  And even while this is happening people
like the Iraqis struggle to get American style appliances like blenders
and cellular phones in the callous struggle for another culture's idea
of the good life.  This is very dark and very angry.
     Adding to the deliberate pain of watching the film is the
photography of Thomas Newton Sigel (who filmed THE USUAL SUSPECTS).  He
intentionally washes out the color to give a feel of the hot sun to the
Mexican locales standing in for the Iraqi desert.  Occasionally the
photography becomes a bit gimmicky, predominantly in the more violent
scenes.  David O. Russell directs his own screenplay to be certain to
get each little angry note.  The Iraqi rebels come off the best, but
American policy, the Kuwaiti consumerism, the supposed stupidity of
American Southerners, and the Army bureaucracy, all get their turn
under fire.
     THREE KINGS may not be a pleasant film to watch, but it is
intelligent and certainly has to be the best film about the Persian
Gulf War yet.  I give it an 8 on the 0 to 10 scale and a high +2 on the
-4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Sex, Lies, and Videotape (1989)
          Capsule review:  An intense film about a cold, sterile
     marriage that is put under pressure by the husband's mistress
     and by his college roommate who now makes a hobby of
     interviewing women about their sex lives.  An award-winning
     film made on a shoestring budget. Rating: high +1.
     SEX, LIES, AND VIDEOTAPE is an independent production that could well be a
hit like EASY RIDER was.  Both films were longer on style than on budget yet
used their low budget to give the film a more authentic feel.  Just as the
youth movement used EASY RIDER to define itself to itself, yuppies may will
find this film defining their feelings about sex for themselves.
     At the core of the film are Ann and John Millany, played by Andie
MacDowell and Peter Gallagher.  They lead a sterile, colorless life together,
each married to the other's image as a status symbol.  Neither has much passion
or even affection for the other.  In very proper fashion Ann regularly sees a
sterile, colorless therapist with whom she discusses her sterile, colorless sex
life.  But John is seeing another woman on the side, one who does not think of
sex as if it were a spider that crawled into her house.  And Ann is puzzled by
Graham (played by James Spader), an old friend of John's who now makes his
hobby interviewing women privately about their sex lives.  This activity as a
symptom of Graham's disturbance forms the psychological basis of the story.
     SEX, LIES, AND VIDEOTAPE is an intense film about people with sexual
problems.  It is more about attitudes and discussion about sex than it is about
sex itself.  The film has a cold sexual tension that is mostly devoid of
eroticism.  Viewers will leave having less of an urge to have sex than to talk
about it.  In fact, for better or worse the film is very likely to spawn a fad
for amateur Kenseys all across the country to go out interviewing people about
their sex lives.
     First time writer and director Steven Soderbergh undoubtedly made a very
hot commodity for a modest $1.2 million budget.  He creates not so much
characters we have some feeling for as a set of walking case histories that are
intriguing without being appealing.  The characters have a depth that saves
what would otherwise be a very soap-opera-ish plot  While I cannot say that
detailed films about people's sex lives are really my cup of tea, I would still
rate SEX, LIES, AND VIDEOTAPE a high +1.

Title
Review for Vie ręvée des anges, La (1998)
THE DREAMLIFE OF ANGELS is basically a simple slice-of-life story told
at a leisurely pace.  Twenty-one year old Isa (Elodie Bouchez) comes to
the town of Lille in the north part of France to be near her boyfriend
only to find out he is out of the country working on a construction
job.  With no money and no place to live she barely makes enough to feed
herself by cutting pictures from magazines and turning them into
greeting cards and religious decorations which she sells on the street
claiming the proceeds are for charity.  She spends her time freeloading
and getting into trouble.  For a few weeks she lives without a home
begging from strangers.  During a stint in an abortive attempt at a job
in a sewing factory she befriends Marie (Natacha Regnier) and moves
into an apartment that Marie is looking after for Sandine, a comatose
woman that neither Iso nor Marie has actually met.  Marie feels little
gratitude to Sandine, but Isa feels some responsibility to their
unwitting benefactor and spends hours in the hospital reading to the
unconscious Sandine.  Isa and Marie meet and make friends with two
working class men, Fredo and Charly (Jo Prestia and Patrick Mercado),
who do security at concerts and work as club bouncers.  The two remain
only occasionally romantic friends.  But then Marie meets and gets
involved with Chris (Gregoire Colin), the attractive young owner of two
up-scale bars.  Isa does not think much of Chris and believes that Marie
is reaching beyond her station.  She is certain that Marie will only be
hurt in the end.
Though not nearly as disturbed as the woman returned from the dead she
plays in J'AIMERAIS PAS CREVER UN DIMANCHE, Bouchez plays Isa as punk
and sassy, yet with a sincere and caring core.  Isa lavishes hours of
care and attention on Sandine, but shies away from receiving any
gratitude for the effort.  Regnier plays Marie as a romantic in spite of
herself, lacking either in free will or sense.
Erick Zonca, who co-wrote the screenplay as well as directed, has given
us a detailed and three-dimensional picture of two very marginalized
women.  His Isa and Marie just get by, frequently by stealing, with very
little thought for the future.  They are not the most likable
characters, but they are probably much like women that can be found in
any city.  Zonca does not romanticize and makes little attempt to
excuse, but they are very believable and very real people.  One is
reminded both of THE 400 BLOWS in the earlier parts of the film and of
"La Boheme" later.  His deliberate pacing may well end up being more
frustrating in the US than in his native France.  And it would be one
thing if the pacing were used to add depth to the characters.
Frequently they are involved in some activity that tells us little
about their character beyond that Isa is not particularly fastidious
with her nail polish.
Overall there is really about a half-hour or perhaps an hour's worth of
story here spread thinly over 113 minutes.  While the title is not quite
as sarcastic and bitter as ANOTHER DAY IN PARADISE, this is not a world
to which the viewer may want to contribute so much time.  I give the
film 5 on the 0 to 10 scale and a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Age of Innocence, The (1993)
          Capsule review:  Martin Scorsese's adaptation of the
     Edith Wharton novel is like a beautiful, detailed painting of
     an entire period, yet it remains static and uninvolving.  The
     characters seem to be all bland and mostly convention-bound.
     By the time we can work up any pathos for the principals, it
     is too late.  Rating: low +1 (-4 to +4).
     Somehow one of the last things we would have expected from Martin
Scorsese is is a foray into the Merchant-Ivory territory of adapting the
early-20th Century social novel.  That is exactly the field he is entering
with THE AGE OF INNOCENCE, but his results are of mixed quality.  He has
created a beautiful recreation of 1870s New York City high society and the
bloodlessness that it required from its denizens, but in doing that so well,
he has created characters that it is hard to care very much for and their
story is considerably less engaging as a result.
     The story is of a love triangle that flies in the face of he
conventions of society.  Daniel Day-Lewis plays Newland Archer, a handsome
and intelligent young lawyer engaged to May Welland, a lovely childlike
woman played by Winona Ryder.  Newland meets and is struck by May's cousin,
Countess Ellen Olenska (played by Michelle Pfeiffer).  The Countess is
rebounding from the scandal of having left her husband, a Polish Count, but
upper-class society will not let her forget her past.  Newland slowly
realizes that he really loves the countess and that she loves him, but he
cannot decide if he is willing to fly in the face of convention.  And for
roughly two hours of screentime this latter-day Hamlet remains indecisive.
Certainly things happen in that time, but this heart of the story does not
advance until it is over.
     What we get in that static two hours is a beautiful depiction of
society in that time and place.  Lavish detail shows us what parties were
like, what food was eaten at lavish social dinners, what table arrangement
there was, what the streets looked like (though many of the exteriors had
unconvincing matte paintings that called attention to themselves).  Watching
this film reminded me a lot of my visit to the Victoria and Albert Museum in
London.  A segment of society is perfectly preserved in this film.
     The visuals, however, are almost unused in telling the story.  This
story is almost literally a novel on film.  The story is told in words in
dialog and narration.  The narration is by Joanne Woodward, and is said to
be a late enhancement to clarify the plotline after editing the film down to
136 minutes.  In any case this is a film that genuinely requires
concentration on the dialog and a good memory for character names.  There
are a lot of characters in the book and Jay Cocks and Martin Scorsese did
not pare them down by many in the screenplay.  The film boasts an impressive
cast including Richard E. Grant, Alec McCowan, Geraldine Chaplin (could this
be a sly nod to plot similarities in DR. ZHIVAGO?), Mary Beth Hurt, Sian
Phillips, Michael Gough, Alexis Smith, Jonathan Pryce, and Robert Sean
Leonard.
     Notable also is another great opening credit sequence by the master
photographer of such sequences, Saul Bass (and Elaine Bass).  Saul Bass is
the Michelangelo of film credit sequences.
     There is a lot that works in THE AGE OF INNOCENCE and a few very basic
and important aspects that fail.  This is an accurate adaptation of a
classic novel not well suited to film adaptation.  My rating would be a low
+1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for True Lies (1994)
          Capsule review:  This is a mindless situation comedy
     crossed with an even more mindless action film aimed at
     an undemanding audience.  Some of the gags work, more
     often the improbabilities make one yearn for the
     comparative logic, maturity, and subtlety of even THE MAN
     FROM U.N.C.L.E.   Rating: high -1 (-4 to +4).  Spoiler
     section following the review discusses about some
     improbabilities.
     Back when I was in second grade I had fantasies of leading a double
life as a seven-year-old and as a secret crime-fighter.  Boy, it would
really surprise my teacher when she found out who I was when my alter-
ego rescued her from certain death at the hands of evil-doers!  Today I
compliment myself by saying my fantasies were more intelligent than TRUE
LIES.  But deep in my heart I have to be honest.  I know the my
childhood fantasies were childish on only on a par with the new
Schwarzenegger film.
     Harry Tasker (Arnold Schwarzenegger) is a James Bond style spy
(undoubtedly because he is so inconspicuous, particularly among Austrian
body-builders.)  He spends his days having shoot-outs with terrorists
and discretely engaging in wild chases all over Washington DC.  His wife
Helen (Jamie Lee Curtis) never seems to notice the cuts, scrapes,
bruises, and occasional gunshot wounds he must be getting.  She thinks
he is a boring computer salesman.  His daughter Dana (Eliza Dushku)
thinks the old man is pretty dull stuff too.  Boy, are they in for some
surprises when they find out who he really is!  Meanwhile there are
terrorists called the Crimson Jihad, headed by Aziz (Art Malik) and
assisted by Juno (Tia Carrere) who plan to hold up the United States to
nuclear blackmail.  And boy, are they in for some surprises too!  Boy,
what a whiz-bang plot!
     Somewhere there was the seed here for what might have been a good
comedy--in fact, it is loosely based on a French farce called LA TOTALE.
But like Schwarzenegger himself, the film was over-powered by an excess
of excess and just has too many scenes that require the audience to turn
down its thought processes and go along for the ride.  I found my mind
did not have a setting low enough for some of the shenanigans.  On a spy
film credibility scale from Matt Helm to George Smiley, this one weighs
in on the dumb side of Maxwell Smart.  The spy story is just the most
rudimentary "get captured by baddies and fight your way out" plot.
     And just being stupid might be forgivable, but this film is also
mean-spirited and sadistic.  The film asks us to believe that when Helen
knows Harry's secrets she will love him more.  In fact, Harry has
revealed himself to be a vicious sadist toward both his wife and an
acquaintance of hers in ways that also abuse his position as a spy.
Harry is just not a very likable person.  And frankly at times this is
just not a very likable film.  When it is at its best it is at the
mediocrity level of COMMANDO--the sort of film where entire ammo dumps
can be fired at the hero and he never gets a scratch.  But when it also
takes a light-hearted view of its hero terrorizing his wife and others,
TRUE LIES can get unintentionally ugly.
     This is not to say there are not a few funny moments in the film
and a few nice stunts.  Production design is by Peter Lamont who worked
on fourteen different James Bond films and this film borrows more than a
few little touches from Bond films.  Our first view of Tasker, taking
off a wet-suit to reveal neatly pressed evening clothes, is a touch
lifted directly from GOLDFINGER.  Much of the Bond wit is present here.
But Schwarzenegger is nowhere near the actor that Connery or Dalton is.
Curtis can act a little, but does not get a chance in this film that
reduces her to the status of "dumb broad" and "victim."
     This is a film with impressive effects work, the usual jaw-dropping
stunt work, and some fairly witty scenes.  At 141 minutes it can fit
that in and still have room for a lot of very childish storytelling.
The trailer for the film give away free just about everything worthwhile
that this film has to offer.  It certainly seems to be pleasing some
people, including some I respect, but I can give it no better a high -1
on the -4 to +4 scale.
     Last May there was a national scandal about someone on the
President's staff using a helicopter for a quick trip to a golf course.
In TRUE LIES Harry, without authorization, calls assault forces to
intimidate people he doesn't like and to demolish personal property.  He
borrows high-security facilities to play a vicious practical joke on his
wife.  I have to believe that the use of these interrogation rooms would
be closely monitored and that this sort of irresponsibility would end
his career right then.  The situation then continues with that
ridiculous scene in the hotel room. Helen does not recognize that the
silhouette looks like her husband of fifteen years.  It is a little hard
to mistake that Schwarzenegger torso.  Meanwhile Harry has guessed in
advance exactly what words his wife would say and with what timing and
has it recorded on a little tape recorder with such perfect fidelity
that Helen cannot tell it isn't the man in front of her speaking.
     For a heroic character to be of any interest he has to in some way
be vulnerable.  How exciting is it really to see crooks shooting at
Superman?  Harry Tasker goes through the whole film and his worst injury
is getting socked by Helen.  Helen wipes out a dozen terrorists by
accidentally dropping a machine gun down a flight of about twelve
stairs.  In the time it takes to fall three or four waves of terrorists
arrive at the stairs, are mowed down and have time to fall down.  Helen
also makes it through the film uninjured.  Even the worst of the Bond
films do not resort to contrivances this absurd.
     Admittedly some of this is intended as parody but it is hard to mix
scenes of mental torture with light parody and make it work.  This is
just not a film that works.

Title
Review for Wall Street (1987)
          Capsule review:  Oliver Stone's film about his father's
     profession.  It does the difficult task of making the world
     of finance interesting.  In the final analysis it is just a
     reworking of Rod Serling's teleplay and film PATTERNS.  The
     coming attraction was put together with more skill than the
     film was.  Rating: 0.
     There's an old television ad for a business magazine that shows a sword
fight in a board room.  The idea was to show that business is exciting
stuff, that companies fight it out like Robin Hood and the Sheriff.  Some ad
agency just came to the realization that while a lot that is exciting
happens, it is tough to show that on film.  Most of the excitement comes
from numbers on a board.  That is what killed ROLLOVER a few years back.  At
least initially you had to get interested enough in numbers.  The last
half-hour made ROLLOVER a lot better if not downright worth seeing.  It is
tough to get people really into a movie about finance.  Oliver Stone
actually manages to keep the audience interested.  He also tells a pretty
good story, or at least retells a pretty good story.  The original--assuming
it was original even then--is Rod Serling's PATTERNS.
     Charlie Sheen plays Bud Fox, an ambitious young stockbroker who really
wants to make it to the top.  The top is Gordon Gekko (played by Michael
Douglas).  Gekko deals in billions of dollars every year.  He buys and sells
companies but he needs information and promises to make Fox rich along the
way if Fox will get him information.  Fox knows a lot of what he is being
asked to do illegal but necessary to get to the top.  You can pretty much
figure out the film from that.
     On hand as Fox's father Carl is Martin Sheen of all people.  Carl is
not like Bud.  He is a hard-working union man who does not understand his
son's career.  This part is not borrowed from the Serling, but enough
working class fathers not understanding non-working-class sons is a well-
worn cliche.
     Like Oliver Stone's PLATOON, WALL STREET was inspired by Stone's
personal history.  Stone's father was a stockbroker so Stone grew up knowing
about the tensions and pressures of stock trading, perhaps the swashbuckling
aspect of it.  It is a pity his father didn't tell him a more interesting
and original story he could adapt into a film.  Rate it a 0 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Biloxi Blues (1988)
          Capsule review:  Matthew Broderick recreates his stage
     role as Eugene Jerome, who goes to boot camp in Mississippi.
     The film's greatest virtue is the portrayal of the troubled
     and enigmatic platoon sergeant.  It's greatest fault is that
     the enigma is side-stepped rather than solved.  Still, this
     is a credible view of a World War II army boot camp.  Rating:
     high +1.
     There are lots of comedies about life in the military.  There are films
like MR. ROBERTS, STALAG 17, BUCK PRIVATES, STRIPES, and PRIVATE BENJAMIN.
The first two may have been written by someone who actually had been in the
military.  Somehow the last three show very little sign that anyone in their
production knew or cared what army life was about.  STRIPES is a Bill Murray
comedy set in the Army as opposed to be an army comedy starring Bill Murray.
No problem.  Bill Murray has lots of fans and one setting for his comedy is
as good as another.  But I can see a MR. ROBERTS or a STALAG 17 over and
over.  Watching STRIPES once--while reading a magazine--was plenty for me.
Whoever wrote it had a really solid understanding of Bill Murray humor.  The
writer of MR. ROBERTS gave more of an impression of knowing the military.
Someone else who had been in the military and knew it was Neil Simon.  His
BILOXI BLUES is not shallow, is not stereotyped, and gives the feel that
much of it might have happened.
     BILOXI BLUES follows the boot camp experiences of Eugene Morris Jerome
(played by Matthew Broderick) and his interactions with his sergeant (played
by Christopher Walken) and the other men in his platoon, especially Arnold
Epstein, an intellectual, the barracks butt, and the only Jew in the platoon
apart from Jerome himself.  But the character who steals the show is the
sergeant.  His enigmatic and idiosyncratic ways of building discipline are
the core of the film and overhang nearly every scene.  His character is,
unfortunately, much too easily dismissed by the events of the climax of the
film, so we never really come to understand him.  The mystery of why he
chooses such odd and intriguing lessons of discipline is never adequately
explained.
     BILOXI BLUES is not a great military comedy, but it is probably the
best thing director Mike Nichols has done in quite a long time.  Neil Simon
adapted--and rumor has it, greatly modified--his own autobiographical play.
At least three actors repeat their stage roles.  Besides Broderick, Penelope
Ann Miller returns to the part of Jerome's first love and Matt Mulhern
repeats as Jerome's sometime-nemesis Wykowski.  But even in this modified
version one has the feeling that this film is based on something real, not
fabricated as a backdrop.  Rate it a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Geung si sin sang (1985)
     I recently have had a much appreciated opportunity to see three horror
films from Hong Kong: MR. VAMPIRE, A CHINESE GHOST STORY, and CHINESE GHOST
STORY II.  They were fun films, somewhat similar to each other in approach.
Each was heavy on the comedy aspects.  Generally I don't care much for
comedy in horror, particularly slapstick.  But I am told that Chinese
audiences really expect it and it would not be a Chinese horror film without
being tongue-in-cheek.  While horror does not get in the way of the comedy,
in my opinion comedy often damages or destroys the impact of the horror.  In
each of these films the result is a horror film that works no better (though
certainly no worse) than ABBOTT AND COSTELLO MEET FRANKENSTEIN.  While these
films have the pacing that a KWAIDAN lacks, they could afford take
themselves a little more seriously like KWAIDAN does.  Perhaps what I would
enjoy most is something between the Hong Kong approach and the KWAIDAN
approach.  It would be nice if Hong Kong were making films of the style of
Hammer Films of Britain, but that just isn't their style and probably not
what their audiences want.
     MR. VAMPIRE--which would more aptly be called MR. HOPPING GHOST--has
the novelty of adding a new folklore monster to the horror film, at least
new to us Americans.  I have, though, read a little about Chinese Hopping
Ghosts.  The idea is that in most dead the Po--that is the soul--has
departed for the next world.  But some corpses die with unfinished business,
for example if the body has not been buried in the corpse's home town.  In
such circumstances the Po will stay in the corpse, which will then not
decay.  For even more the corpse may get up and walk.  And when it walks it
will have superhuman strength and will kill any mortals it can get its hands
on.  Rigor mortis will, however, make the stiff, well ... stiff.  It will be
too stiff to walk, but will be able to manage a hop.  That is why a hopping
ghost hops.  So as an American seeing MR. VAMPIRE you have to be part
cultural detective as well as being a film fan.  But some of the images are
as eerie for me as they would be for someone raised with the culture.  Some
perhaps even more so since they are such alien images.  The film opens with
a scene of a row of hopping ghosts standing in a monastery, each with a
prayer paper seemingly tacked over its face.  I suspect it is as weird for
me, not knowing what it meant as it would be for someone who did.  Perhaps a
bit more.
     Some of the fun of seeing this film, and it is fun though faint
subtitles also make it also hard work, is in trying to figure out the rules
that apply to hopping ghosts.  If you are being stalked you can make
yourself safe as long as you neither move nor breathe.  Apparently they home
in on their victim's breath.  (How long can YOU hold your breath?)  They can
be stopped by putting some sort of inscription on a piece of paper and
attaching it to the hopping ghost's forehead.  I don't know what the
inscription says since I don't read Chinese, but I think it is a kind of
death prayer.  They cannot walk on uncooked sticky rice, probably because it
absorbs things around it (which is why restaurants will put some rice in
with the salt in shakers).  They are repelled by inscriptions written with a
mixture of Chinese ink and chicken blood.  You kill them by burning them
coffin and all.  So they do have some characteristics in common with cinema
vampires but they are not vampiric--they do not seem to suck blood.  Instead
they strangle and mutilate.
     I will say a bit less about CHINESE GHOST STORY 1 & 2 since they are a
somewhat better known in this country already.  In some ways they borrow a
lot from the EVIL DEAD films but they have a panache all their own.  A sort
of ne'er-do-well happens upon a haunted monastery and soon is facing ghosts
and Chinese demons.  Eventually he is has a guide through this world in the
form of a Taoist master who sings an amusing song that is a sort of
commercial for Tao.  They are sucked into another world where mythical
figures battle.  It is fast paced with variable special effects but always
watchable.  Again the worst touch is the poor subtitles, but much of the
action transcends the language barrier.  Again, as with MR. VAMPIRE, there
is a disadvantage for the Western viewer in that the rules of this universe
are foreign.  But like spiciness in some Chinese food, for some the
foreign-ness of the mythology will be a disadvantage and for others it will
be the main advantage and the greatest attraction.
     When I was about six years old there was a foreign-language movie
theater in the town I lived in.  I think it was Polish, but I don't remember
for sure.  And I found that frustrating because I imagined they had their
equivalent of Godzilla films and I was missing them because there was this
language barrier between me and the films.  As I got older many of these
mis-impressions became obvious to me and I realized I wasn't missing a whole
lot of great monster movies because I knew only one language.  Well, what I
am discovering is that my fears were not so foolish, they just were
premature.  Today in Asia there are a lot of good fantasy films being made,
many of which just are not making it to America for years or perhaps never
make it.  So far there are relatively few films I would miss, but the number
is clearly growing.

Title
Review for Working Girl (1988)
          Capsule review:  WORKING GIRL will probably be the film
     with which Melanie Griffith breaks through to stardom and
     genuine name recognition.  She plays a secretary who
     discovers that her boss (Sigourney Weaver) has stolen her
     idea and decides to put the idea over herself.  Rating: low
     +2.
     Tess McGill is one of hundreds of secretaries in a Manhattan brokerage
house.  She has gone to night school to learn the business and what she
hopes will set her apart is her drive to get ahead.  Her company holds out
the carrot to her that she may someday get a better job, but it is clear
from her modish mini-skirted dress, her excessive jewelry and makeup, and
her long hair that she is just not the type of person who makes it into the
upper echelons.  One evening she discovers that her boyfriend is cheating on
her and that her boss is using her and stealing her ideas for a client's
investments.  Fed up, she decides to get serious about the business.  She
cuts her hair, dresses for a higher class, passes herself off as being at
her boss's level, and goes out to pitch her ideas for herself.  WORKING GIRL
is the story of the elaborate ruse and the effects it has on Tess, her boss,
and a foundering executive at the client's business.
     Just as Tess was competent but never got any special notice until she
pulled her business coup, Melanie Griffith (who plays Tess) did not get any
particular recognition until WORKING GIRL.  She was a familiar face who had
been seen in several films: NIGHT MOVES, the all too rarely seen SMILE, ONE
ON ONE, BODY DOUBLE, STORMY MONDAY, and THE MILAGRO BEANFIELD WAR.  Her only
role that really got critical attention was that of Lulu in Jonathan Demme's
SOMETHING WILD.  I suspect that with WORKING GIRL she has made herself a
recognizable star.  WORKING GIRL is her film even if Fox unconscionably
gives her third billing.  Second billing goes to Sigourney Weaver as her
boss and adversary.  Weaver plays a slick shark of an executive who uses
every dirty trick, including sex, to fight the fight.  This is the first
time I have seen her play a villain.  Top billing goes to Harrison Ford who
is just barely one of the major characters of the film.  (Perhaps as a
subtle protest to the billing, Sigourney Weaver has been quoted as saying,
"I loved the idea of playing a supporting role with Melanie the star.")
     WORKING GIRL was directed by Mike Nichols with a little less bite than
his films usually have.  Of course, Nichols' best-loved film is THE GRADUATE
and generally his films (like CATCH 22, WHO'S AFRAID OF VIRGINIA WOOLF?,
CARNAL KNOWLEDGE, and SILKWOOD) make a social statement.  The social
statement here is "do not exploit you fellow workers" and "you should fight
to get ahead," not unlike the moral of Colin Higgins' comparable--but not as
good--9 TO 5.  Where SILKWOOD was negative on big business, WORKING GIRL
concentrates on both faults and virtues.  Rate it a low +2 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Memphis Belle (1990)
          Capsule review:  Disappointing and undoubtedly
     fictionalized account of the twenty-fifth mission of the
     first B-17 crew to reach that number and be sent home.  Eight
     real B-17s were used and they deserve billing above the likes
     of Matthew Modine, Eric Stoltz, and John Lithgow.  Rating: low
     +1 (-4 to +4).
     Undeniably there is some truth to this story.  The Memphis Belle really
was the first B-17 Flying Fortress to complete twenty-five missions and
hence win its flight crew an opportunity to go home and sit out the rest of
the war in celebrity and with relatively cushy assignments.  Hence there
really was a twenty-fifth mission of the Memphis Belle.  Whether the first
twenty-four missions were as routine as suggested in the film and the
twenty-fifth was as dangerous ... that I am somewhat skeptical about.  I
take most of the film with more than one grain of salt.  The drama is pat;
the characters are stereotypes.  In fact, the script candidly tells you that
the characters are going to be stereotypes.  "There's always one guy who's
very religious, always one guy from Cleveland," we are told in the first
scene.  So of course we have these cliched characters here.  This is *not*
TWELVE O'CLOCK HIGH and it is not one of the great adventure films about
World War II.  It is, however, a very nice film to look at.  The music and
the decoration have a nice feel of 1943, even if one can argue that the
party is a bit lavish for a humble air base.  But the real visual splendor
is in seeing genuine B-17s taking off and flying together.  I think most
people get some sort of a charge out of seeing airplanes flying and there is
a lot of flying in this film.
     Basically Memphis Belle details for the viewer several of the more
common hazards of bombing runs over Germany.  You see air battles; you see
near-misses, light collisions, and heavy collisions.  You see flying through
a shower of flak.  You see people getting shot up and mid-air surgery.
Mostly you see a lot of scenes you have seen in other films.  Yet somehow
the film falls short of actually generating real excitement or tension.  We
know the Belle is going to get back and the characters are not real enough
and certainly not endearing enough for us really to worry about their
individual safety.  The film has a few too many contrived touches even to
have a feel of authenticity.  It has fliers mistaking tomato soup for blood.
It has a dog who recognizes the sound of his master's plane engines.
Touches like these get in the way of the audience taking the story very
seriously.
     This is a pretty film to watch but both too shallow in its drama and
too unexceptional in its action really to engage an audience.  I give it a
low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Field of Dreams (1989)
          Capsule review:  A complex and witty fantasy film that
     features great performances by James Earl Jones and Kevin
     Costner.  Even if you do not like our (stupid) national
     pastime, this film about ghosts of the White Sox and a quest
     is a solidly entertaining fantasy.  Rating: low +3.
     I do not like baseball.  And because I do not like baseball, baseball
films do not work on me as well as they do on other people.  Most baseball
movies assume that there is something somehow noble about playing baseball.
I don't buy that.  A good baseball for me is one that would still be good if
you substituted professional wrestling as the game.  PRIDE OF THE YANKEES
just does not stack up very well under this criterion.  You have to consider
baseball important to respect Gehrig.  BULL DURHAM is an okay but not great
character comedy.  BANG THE DRUM SLOWLY would still be a good study of the
relationship of two men.  I find that even with no respect for baseball, THE
NATURAL remains a fine fantasy allegory of talent and treachery, of darkness
and light.  Now another baseball fantasy has come along with enough human
values, enough fine acting, and a good enough script that it is well worth
seeing even if (like me) you hate baseball.  FIELD OF DREAMS is a real
surprise: a (usually) genuine piece of quality writing for the screen.
     Kevin Costner plays Ray Kinsella: a would-be ball player's son, a
college activist in the late 1960s, and now an Iowa farmer.  One day while
working in the field he hears a disembodied voice tell him, "If you build
it, he will come."  After days of puzzling over hearing the message
repeated, he has a vision that the "he" is Shoeless Joe Jackson of the White
Sox (and, incidentally, of EIGHT MEN OUT), a personal hero of Ray's dead
father.  "It" seems to refer to a baseball diamond to be placed in Ray's
cornfield.  In time, the eight convicted White Sox have been wished out of
the cornfield and are playing baseball in the field.  Then another message
comes and Ray finds himself on a mysterious mission to Boston to find
controversial 1960s writer Terence Mann, supremely played by James Earl
Jones. Jones's performance is quirky and brilliant.  Mann's first meeting
with Ray is worth the ticket price all by itself.  Ray continues his
ridiculous set of tasks and quests until at the end it all comes together
and makes sense.
     Faults?  Well, over the rest of the story there is superimposed a
rather prosaic "save the farm" plot that gets into the way of some of the
better story-telling.  Then toward the end of the film there is a rather
gratuitous piece of cheap suspense.  It is needed for the larger plot--
almost every shot in this film is--but the actual cause of the suspense
seems forced.  Universal has taken a chance on an intelligent fantasy film
with a complex script and has made one of the best films of the year.  I
would give it a low +3 on the -4 to +4 scale.  Pity it was about baseball.

Title
Review for Anne Frank Remembered (1995)
     When I write a review of a film, particularly a historical film, I
often try to give context for the story in the film.  I try to create a
frame to surround the film telling many of the incidental things that
would be of interest to a viewer.  That is what the feature-length
documentary ANNE FRANK REMEMBERED does for the book THE DIARY OF ANNE
FRANK and its dramatic adaptations.  It generally assumes that the
viewer has read or seen some version of the true story of the Jewish
family that hid from the Nazis for two years in the cramped attic of an
Amsterdam factory.  Instead of having extensive excerpts from the book,
this account tells the viewer nearly everything else of value to
someone who is experiencing the story.  It starts with the background
of the Frank family, their lives and especially their times.  Anecdotes
are told of Anne's school experiences.  The film tells how the Frank
family went into hiding and gives a quick summary of their lives those
two years in the stifling attic.  There Anne's closest confidant was
the diary she had been given on her 13th birthday.  After telling how
the family was betrayed and captured it goes into detail about their
lives and the lives of people they knew in the camps.  It tells of the
death of Anne Frank and her sister.  The liberation, the re-discovery
of the diary, its publishing, public reaction, the play the film, and
authenticity challenges are all covered.  This is everything known
about the story Anne Frank and her diary that one cannot get from the
book itself.
     Jon Blair, who previously made the documentary SCHINDLER, had to
be not just skillful but extraordinarily lucky to find some of the
material presented.  Details about Anne and her personal life are
presented by Hanneli Goslar, Anne's friend from age four.  They were
separated by Anne's hiding, but she coincidentally was able to find
Anne when they both were interned at Bergen-Belsen concentration camp
and was nearby when Anne died.  One interview brings out the mixed
emotions toward Anne of Peter Pepper, the son of the dentist who shared
Anne's hiding place and whom Anne dubbed Dr. Idiot.  During the period
of hiding Anne seemed to conflict with every adult in the attic except
her beloved father and these conflicts seem to make her even more real.
Blair is even able to interview one of the burglars who preyed on the
factory below the attic.  In Anne's accounts of these incidents the
Franks could do nothing but wait in silence for the criminals to leave
for fear of letting be known their presence.  The one major question
that Blair must leave unanswered is who it was who eventually betrayed
the hiding place of the Frank family.
     Blair recreates in harrowing detail the life that Anne must have
led in the camps and the fates of the people who hid in the attic.
Only Otto Frank survived, but there is information and eyewitness
accounts of what happened to most of the people from the attic.  Blair
documents how Anne's spirit was broken as she went from Westerbrook to
Auschwitz to her death from disease at Bergen-Belsen.  Blair speculates
that had she held on to that spirit she could have survived the month
between her death and liberation.
     Blair mixes 1940s footage with material he shot and interviews
with people who are now dead.  Some of the people he brought together
for the first time since the 1940s.  The film is narrated by Kenneth
Branagh and selections are read from the diary by Glenn Close.  While
the photography is mostly understated, there is occasionally a haunting
image in the photography.  One shot makes the tower over the railroad
entrance to Auschwitz look extraordinarily like the head of some giant
ogre with glowing eyes from some fairy tale that could not match for
violence what actually took place here.
     I suppose I would rate ANNE FRANK REMEMBERED a +3 on the -4 to +4
scale, though I have not given it the same sort of thought I usually
give a rating.  I take the subject of the Holocaust very seriously and
would have a very hard time objectively comparing this film to, say,
RICHARD III or THE GODFATHER.

Title
Review for Jurassic Park (1993)
          Capsule review:  As few films in the past have ever
     managed to do, Steven Spielberg has tapped into the mother
     lode of human dreams and sense of wonder.  Michael Crichton's
     story may be "Westworld" with dinosaurs, but for once the
     biotechnology and the special effects are phenomenal.
     Rating: high +3.
     When Apollo 11 touched down on the moon, I got this funny feeling in my
back and in the back of my neck.  This was where a dream that I'd had became
a reality.  The feeling was one of "Oh boy!  Here we go!" and one of real
anticipation.  In Michael Crichton's novel JURASSIC PARK, a little girl drew
a very detailed picture of the animal that had bitten her.  And the expert
looked at the picture and identified it as a known type of lizard.  But
several of the details were wrong in her picture and that type of lizard was
not known to bite people.  But the case was closed.  And then someone else
looks at the picture and says, "Whose kid drew the dinosaur?"  And even
though it was just a story, I got that same "Oh boy!  Here we go!"  So I was
hoping that sequence would make it to the film.  It didn't.  Instead,
paleontologist Alan Grant (played by Sam Neill), not knowing what the
Jurassic Park concept is all about, suddenly sees an incredibly majestic
sight that is undoubtedly something he had dreamed of his entire life and he
is so overcome with joy and excitement and wonder that he has to look away.
And I was feeling just about the same thing the character was.  "Oh boy!
Here we go!"  Who hasn't dreamed about getting the dinosaurs back?  Now you
can indulge that fantasy for two hours and people are going to flock to do
it.
     Michael Crichton's story itself is really a variant on WESTWORLD.  A
theme park is created with genuine dinosaurs, resurrected thanks to the
magic of DNA cloning from blood found in mosquitoes who sucked on dinosaurs
and then were preserved in amber.  Two paleontologists, a mathematician, and
a lawyer come to certify that the park is real and safe.  Of course it turns
out that the park is very, very real but just a bit lacking in the safe
category.  Neill's Grant epitomizes the stereotype of the soft scientist who
does not get along with machines, even seatbelts.  Laura Dern plays Ellie
Sattler, a second paleontologist who lives and works with Grant, every bit
his equal.  Like Grant she is at first enchanted by the island where live
dinosaurs live, but soon discovers that live dinosaurs have their downside
also.  Jeff Goldblum has many of the best lines as an obnoxious but witty
chaos mathematician.  He uses her acerbic wit to point out just what can go
wrong with the implementation of billionaire entrepreneur John Hammond's
(Richard Attenborough's) plan for the park.  Attenborough finds a human side
to Hammond that is not apparent in the book.  Instead of a vicious maniac
for success, he is more enthusiastic but likable.  Other familiar faces
include Bob Peck (who has done some excellent work in the past, including
the BBC's EDGE OF DARKNESS), Martin Ferrero, and Wayne Knight.
     As enjoyable as Crichton's story is, there is much that cannot be fully
appreciated without actually seeing it.  No description can come close to
the visual impact of this film.  It has been suggested that JURASSIC PARK
ranks with STAR WARS and KING KONG (1933) as a giant leap in representing
images on the screen.  However, there is actually little here that is really
a breakthrough in technology, though virtually every effect that has ever
been used to show dinosaurs on the screen was resurrected and perhaps
refined.  There are hand puppets, dinosaur suits, stop-motion, and computer
graphics, seamlessly and flawlessly integrated.  It took about four decades,
but somebody has finally surpassed Ray Harryhausen at showing dinosaurs on
the screen.  It no longer is easy to tell that this effect is stop-motion
and that one was a computer image, and the dinosaurs look as if they were in
the scene with the people, not rear projections.  Clearly inspired both by
the work of Ray Harryhausen and by a recent revolution in scientific
dinosaur art and paleontology, these dinosaurs show a lot of anatomy,
including the wrinkles, the breathing, the bone structure, and often
tremendous scale.  They do not drag their tails on the ground and even the
heaviest sauropods will rear up on their hind legs to reach the tops of
trees.  The one major aspect of modern dinosaur art technical speculation
that was left behind is choice of color.  The fossil record, of course, is
silent on the color of dinosaurs and some artists these days suggest that it
is likely that dinosaurs were brightly colored, but JURASSIC PARK's
dinosaurs are dully colored.  Still, the film does give a real air of
authenticity.  When the credits say no animals were hurt in the filming, one
wonders, "How did they film that scene without killing that velociraptor?"
     It is a tribute to the special effects that in some of the horror
scenes I was genuinely tense.  A really good film will make me tense, though
I have not been actually frightened by a film since I was nine years old.
(And just as an aside, I treasure those moments when I was young and
actually frightened by film.  I did even then, especially being terrified by
WAR OF THE WORLDS before I was three years old.  I am very thankful that
nobody "protected" ME from them.)  But along with the horror are also the
moments of joy and wonder.  I am pleased that the John Williams score
concentrates on the wonder, not the horror of having the dinosaurs return.
It would be nice if that wonder might push some younger viewers into fields
such as paleontology that pay off in sense of wonder and fulfillment of
curiosity, even if they are not as financially rewarding.  It helps that
JURASSIC PARK is reasonably scientifically accurate.  Most skepticism seems
to center around a belief that dinosaur DNA would  deteriorate in amber over
the tens and hundreds of millions of years.  You could not really clone DNA
that old.  But even that is open to conjecture.  What does seem odd is that
at one point early in the script one of the scientists surprisingly fins a
supposedly extinct leaf from something other than a tree.  I do not think
that's its presence is explained by the premise of cloning.
     The script does include reasonable debates as to whether this
particular scientific wonder is really what the world needs.  Because it is
a disaster story, of course the anti-science side has the upper hand, though
not all the anti-science articles are convincing.  The theme voiced by the
mathematician that life WILL find a way to survive at first is a warning
that the dinosaurs will not be contained, but eventually applies to the
people as well.
     The script was co-authored by Crichton, and David Koepp with more than
a little humor borrowed from such diverse sources as Buster Keaton and Gary
Larson, as well as a few jokes of their own.  In total, this is one of the
most enjoyable adventure films in years.  I rate it a high +3 on the -4 to
+4 scale, but then I am biased toward science fiction.

Title
Review for Cold Comfort Farm (1995) (TV)
     With the death of her father, the thoroughly-modern Flora Poste
(played by Kate Beckinsale) must find some other relatives off of whom
to live.  Little knowing what she is letting herself in for she chooses
to live with her Aunt's family at dark and mordant Cold Comfort Farm.
She hopes to collect enough experience to write a novel.  The farm is a
queer and moody, dirty place with many a dark secret left too long to
fester.  And as the smoky vortex of black emotion reaches out to engulf
the poor, innocent Flora, with a knowing smile she effortlessly stamps
it flat.  The plot, based on the 1932 novel by Stella Gibbons, is
basically one elaborate joke.  It says that all the Gothic evil as
described in the old potboilers is no match for the spunk and pluck of
a modern woman.  Nevertheless, though it is obvious early that that is
where the film is headed, it does tell its particular joke with a great
deal of style and wit.  The film is a co-production of the BBC and
Thames television, a remake of the BBC's memorable 1971 production
which starred a terrific Alastair Sim as Amos Starkadder, the apparent
master of Cold Comfort Farm and self-styled hellfire preacher of the
local sect of "Quiverers."  In this version no less an actor than Ian
McKellen takes the role, but sadly falls considerably short of (at
least my memories of) the original performance.  The real head of the
Starkadder household, however, is Flora's Aunt Ada (Sheila Burrell) who
stays hidden, never leaving her room, as she broods endlessly about an
incident in her youth when she saw "something nasty in the woodshed."
That incident and the effect it had on the Starkadder family hangs over
the entire film.  There is clearly a collision course shared by this
iron matriarch of the household, determined to maintain her power,
letting nothing change and her young niece Flora determined to set the
household right, at least right by her own definition.
     This is a somewhat surprising film to come from John Schlesinger,
best known for directing thrillers like MARATHON MAN, THE BELIEVERS,
and PACIFIC HEIGHTS.  Here he has great fun poking holes in the
melodrama created by writers like the Brontes and Thomas Hardy and even
by his own film, FAR FROM THE MADDING CROWD.  On the other hand, his
high society London scenes smack a little more of the elegant vacuity
of the upper crust in P. G. Wodehouse's stories.  Notable also in the
cast are Eileen Atkins as Ada's perpetually fretful daughter Judith and
Rufus Sewell as her handsome and overly-lusty son Seth Starkadder.
Even on the wide screen, this film has the look and feel of a
television production and it has it even more so for having already
been produced by the BBC once before.  Nevertheless, it feels like a
quality TV production and Schlesinger manages a wry wit throughout.
American audiences may have some trouble understanding the thick
British accent in which most of the dialog is spoken.  I give it a high
+1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Fried Green Tomatoes (1991)
     "Fried Green Tomatoes" is the name for two different recipes.  One
is a Southern dish I have never tried but it is reputedly delicious--it
looks a lot like fried eggplant.  It is also the name for a stew or
goulash made from pieces of old movies about the South, and politically
correct films about women learning to be independent.  It is sweetened
with little bits of comedy thrown in and there is a dash of bittersweet
tragedy.  The recipe apparently calls for two small storylines rather
than one big one.  This dish turns out to be palatable, even enjoyable,
though a little light for my taste.  Its flavor was just a little
over-familiar and it left me hungry for just a bit more.
     The film opens with a truck being dredged from an Alabama river in
the late 1930s.  We then flash forward to what may be the present or
what may be a decade or so back.  (We do eventually find out why the
truck is important, but it is questionable why we open with that scene.)
Evelyn and Ed Couch (played by Kathy Bates and Gailand Sartain) find
themselves passing through the little town of Whistle Stop on the way to
a nursing home to visit Ed's cantankerous aunt.  (The name "Couch" was
chosen, no doubt, because Evelyn and Ed are each a bit over-stuffed.)
At the nursing home Evelyn meets Ninny Threadgoode (played by Jessica
Tandy) and the two begin to talk.  Ninny tells Evelyn a story of the
past in Alabama.  On repeated visits that story becomes much longer and,
in fact, it is the main body of the film.  In flashback we see the story
of the life-long friendship of Idgie Threadgoode (played by Mary Stuart
Masterson) and Ruth Jamison (played by Mary-Louise Parker).  The story
develops as parallel plots.  One plot is that of Evelyn finding her own
identity and getting past her late-mid-life crisis.  The other is the
story of Idgie and Ruth, two liberated women who run the Whistle Stop
Cafe in the small Alabama town of Whistle Stop.  The story is nothing
greatly original.  Not too surprisingly, the issue of racism rears its
pointed, hooded head.  There is a murder subplot and a lot of human
drama in the story of the two close friends.  Meanwhile, Evelyn tries to
find herself through a "Total Womanhood" program, but finally finds
identity through Idgie's and Ruth's liberated example.  The film is a
sort of adult SONG OF THE SOUTH.
     Of course the film is not too adult.  In Fannie Flagg's original
novel, FRIED GREEN TOMATOES AT THE WHISTLE STOP CAFE, Idgie and Ruth
have a lesbian relationship.  In the screenplay by director Jon Avnet
and Fannie Flagg, the relationship is down-played and left as a matter
for speculation.  The real problem with the screenplay is that *too
much* must have been left out.  Spreading the film's 130 minutes between
two stories does not leave sufficient time to give either a satisfying
telling.  This was a light entertaining novel with humorous vignettes
lampooning the South, much as we would expect from comedian Flagg, but
also with some substance, particularly in the flashbacks.  The vignettes
in Evelyn's story just take too much time from what substance there
might have been in the flashback.  I rate FRIED GREEN TOMATOES a high +1
on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Gettysburg (1993)
          Capsule review:  This film of military history contains
     more authentic military history than any other film I have
     ever seen.  The film itself is more than four hours and very
     little seems to be fiction.  Perhaps a little is
     speculation, but the highest proportion of time is
     reenactment of the most important battle in United States
     history.  Rating: +3 (-4 to +4)
     As usual when I see an historical film, I will go home afterward and
pick up many historical accounts of the event and pick holes in what I have
seen on the screen.  I have not yet read Shelby Foote's account of the
battle of Gettysburg (which is about 120 pages), but I have read several
shorter accounts.  What I have discovered is that the film contradicts no
account any more than the accounts contradict each other.  And that is not
surprising since by all accounts writer/director Ronald F. Maxwell, after
basing his script on a Pulitzer Prize winning novel, THE KILLER ANGELS by
Michael Shaara, allowed his small army of historical experts to be tyrants
over the production of the film.  What made it to the screen is what the
experts agreed happened.  What STAR WARS was to the special effects film,
GETTYSBURG is to the historical film.  Nobody who sees the film and later
reads account of the battle can come away without the feeling of having
witnessed the battle already and without remembering a flood of images from
the film.  As far as how well the actors look and dress like people of the
Civil War the film gets an A+.  For the degree to which each major actor
looks like the actual person he is portraying the grade is a not-too-shabby
B+.  (The opening credits show the original and the actor and invite
comparison.)  Why not higher?  Well for example at the time of his most
familiar photographs, Lee had a fuller beard than Martin Sheen sports.  That
is the sort of variation you get.  Of course nobody mentions how full Lee's
beard was at the time of Gettysburg so perhaps I am underrating the film.
But if I can find no less picayune quibble than the length of a beard in a
254-minute historical film, I am not just impressed, I am floored.
     The actors are often familiar, if you can make them out under the heavy
beards typical of the Civil War period.  (The presence of women,
incidentally, is limited to a count of two and a screentime of about six
seconds.)  But actors seem to be chosen more for proven acting ability than
for marquee value.  The players include Tom Berenger as Lt. Longstreet,
Martin Sheen as Gen. Lee, Stephen Lang as Maj. Gen. Pickett, the late
Richard Jordan as Brig. Gen. Armistead, Jeff Daniels as Col. Chamberlain,
Sam Elliot as Brig. Gen. Buford, and Kevin Conway (whom I thought had been
dead for at least a couple years) as the what I would guess was an
interpolated character, Sgt. Buster Kilrain.
     Gettysburg was the climax of the Civil War as Midway was the climax of
the war in the Pacific.  And I found myself comparing this film to the film
MIDWAY as I watched it.  MIDWAY is only five minutes longer than half of
GETTYSBURG's length, yet for that film a whole fictional plot of "human
interest" was added about an American commander's son in love with a
Japanese-American woman.  Apparently the filmmakers thought that so much
history was too much for the viewer.  In GETTYSBURG with the exception of a
few conversations to broaden the characters, and a rhetorical speech added
here and there, what we see is all documented history and ironically the
film is more and not less compelling as a result.
     From the point of view of the film five men were responsible for the
South going from a winning war to a losing war with this one battle.  For
the North, Buford created the strategy and Chamberlain defended the weak
flank.  For the South, Jeb Stuart chose to raid rather then reconnoiter,
Ewell failed to attack at a strategic moment, and Lee's ego told him to
fight the battle even on the enemy's terms because winning would almost
certainly bring the end of the war.  Of these the most screen time is
devoted to Chamberlain who, torn with self-doubt, shows himself to
nonetheless represent both heroism and decency.
     GETTYSBURG was reportedly made as a television mini-series and at some
point was redirected to the big screen.  It will certainly lose much of the
impact of its huge cast when translated to the small screen.  In incredible
list of historical reenactment societies apparently volunteered to act as
extras and to reenact the battle.  The men participating in Pickett's charge
form a very long wall that will not be nearly as impressive when the flanks
are cut for television's aspect ratio.  On the other hand, getting the film
on video will allow the stopping of the film and reading from historical
sources about the various actions being depicted.  My initial reaction to
the film was that it must have cut out a lot of what was really happening to
concentrate only on Buford's defense of the high ground the first day,
Chamberlain's defense of the flank the second day, and Pickett's charge the
third day.  The first source I saw that described the battle in any detail
listed three important actions and they were exactly the ones chosen by the
filmmakers.  This engaging film is almost a textbook about the battle and
because at the same time it is so enthralling, this is one of best and
perhaps in some respects is the best historical feature film ever made.
Nothing quite like this has ever been done at this length and done this
elaborately, so it is all the more impressive.  My rating is +3 on the -4 to
+4 scale.

Title
Review for Nadja (1994)
     NADJA seems to want to be a serious art film and at the same time
a spoof of the vampire film.  The result is a film that is occasionally
amusing but more often just drags.  The story borrows a great deal from
Lambert Hillyer's 1936 film DRACULA'S DAUGHTER and NADJA moves only
fast enough to be an actual retelling of that story and not one iota
faster.  It is filmed in black and white with three levels of clarity.
There are sharp clear scenes, blurry scenes, and a few Pixelvision
scenes.  The blurry and Pixel shots initially seem to be subjective
from the vampire's point of view, but it is not long before there are
shots with gratuitous blur that clearly are not from anybody's point of
view.  They are just blurry for the sheer joy of using the camera
effect.  Some of the dialogue is also there for the effect.  How else
can one explain lines like "Love is voluntary.  Love is like rabies"?
     Elina Lowensohn plays the the title role of Nadja, the daughter of
Dracula unliving in New York City.  Dracula is also in town, but there
he is staked by a rather Bohemian Van Helsing (Peter Fonda).  This
vampire hunter wears his hair well below his shoulders and goes
everywhere walking a bicycle.  The death of her famous father comes as
a release to Nadja who has been hoping to be free of his domination in
order to lead a more normal life.
     The film is not without a sense of some style.  Lowensohn is
impressive looking in a hood and cape in much the same way that Gloria
Holden was in the original.  Almereyda used her previously in his
ANOTHER GIRL, ANOTHER PLANET and she does have an exotic look.  But her
delivery of lines is rather disaffected and lifeless, ironically just
what this vampire does not need.   Suzy Amis, who played the title role
in THE BALLAD OF LITTLE JO and THE USUAL SUSPECTS plays a nurse who is
caring for Nadja's brother and who will eventually be caught up in
Nadja's predations.
     When the film drags, it is of some interest just to see how the
original was mapped to the new film.  The Irving Pichel role of Sandor
is back, but here he is called Renfield, though his function is more
that of Sandor in 1936 film than that of Renfield in the 1930 DRACULA.
Another victim is called Lucy (played by an actress named Galaxy Craze,
believe it or not), again as an allusion to the 1930 film.  A policeman
in the original is replaced by David Lynch to not nearly so comic an
effect.  Lynch is also executive producer as well as having the even
more ambiguous title of "presenter."
     Perhaps the film shows the most style when the setting moves to
Transylvania.  Almereyda's use of locations in New York to give the
impression of Rumania is more clever than convincing, almost as if they
were improvisational.
     While it is nice to see an occasional horror film making the art
house circuit, this story of the undead just needs more life in the
long middle section of the film.  I give it a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Eve of Destruction (1991)
     EVE OF DESTRUCTION is the sort of science fiction film that nobody
minds if you call "sci-fi."  It is an action film with a poorly thought-out
science fiction premise that happens on a few nice ideas, but generally
wastes them.  It seems that missiles are not a very subtle way to place a
nuclear bomb.  Instead, the government is going to use a robot who, short of
surgery, cannot be distinguished from an attractive blonde.  Inside the
robot's chest is a nuclear bomb about the size of a soup can.  Inside the
robot's head are many of its inventor's memories, experiences, and
attitudes.  In front of this head is the inventor's face.  The inventor is
Dr. Eve Simmons and the robot's name is Eve VIII.  So the robot really is
the Eve of Destruction (get it?).  Baghdad would know something was up if we
shot a nuclear missile at them, I guess, but would never notice anything
strange if a tall, leggy blond walked into town.  Eve VIII is being tested-
-with full nuclear capability!--in real world situations such as going to
the bank.  Suddenly she runs into the unexpected, her temporary controller
is killed, and she starts running lose in the real world like a female
Terminator.  She is following instructions programmed into her head but also
enjoying new-found toys such as Uzi machine guns.  Anti-terrorist Jim
McQuade (played by Gregory Hines) and Eve Simmons (played by Renee
Soutendijk) must team up to out-fight and out-think the robot.
     Nice things could still be done with this idea, but nothing really
interesting comes out of it.  A little if made of the idea that the woman
and the robot will have some of the same thoughts, but mostly it is a
contrivance to make the needle a little easier to find in the haystack and
at the same time to make it a little more dangerous.  Eve VIII takes
particular exception to being called "bitch" and always uses it as a trigger
to go violent.  The audience knows that via repetitions, but Dr. Simmons
shows no sign of knowing it.  And when late in the film, McQuade seems to
know the trigger, we can only conclude that he learned it reading the
script.
     The robot is made of some material that is not greatly damaged in a
seventy-mile-per-hour impact, but still feels real in a slow breast fondle.
That's the material rocket scientists have been looking for for years!
     There is occasionally a little fun here, but overall the film is mostly
for a drive-in-style audience.  I rate it a -1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Antz (1998)
     CAPSULE: The story is okay in a Disney sort of way, but the star
is the state-of-the-art computer animation in this film that shows life
in an insect colony from the Dreamworks.  The mass scenes are
impressive and the individual ants are expressive.  Voices include
Woody Allen, Sylvester Stallone, and Gene Hackman.  Rating: 7 (0 to
10), low +2 (-4 to +4)
   - Voices also include Sharon Stone, Christopher Walken, Danny
     Glover, Dan Aykroyd, and Anne Bancroft.  Part of the game is in
     recognizing the voices.
   - Story involves a worker ant who does not want to be one of a sea
     of ants, he wants to be an individual.  Masquerading as a soldier
     ant he sees war first hand.  Meanwhile the general of the soldier
     ants is making plans to massacre the whole nest and go off to
     found his own colony.
   - Do not believe any entomology you see represented here.  Most is
     wrong.  I believe male ants basically fertilize the queen and die.
     The termites don't look like real termites.  They look less like
     real termites than the ants look like ants.
   - There is some irony in the ants all deciding en masse that they
     are individuals.
   - In some ways this is STARSHIP TROOPERS as seen from the other
     side.
   - Most of the animation sequences seem more complex than TOY STORY,
     though the story is not really as good perhaps. This could spark a
     race for most complex scenes.  There is a tremendous amount
     happening in some of these scenes as a sea of ants, each
     individually animated, swarm onto the enemy.  Pixar and Disney may
     have to look to their laurels.
   - Could be frightening for younger children.

Title
Review for Titus (1999)
     Personally I think I need to see another production of HAMLET
about as much as I need to see another production of A CHRISTMAS CAROL.
Which is to say, not very much at all.  The same few number of
Shakespeare's plays seem to be done over and over.  The value of seeing
Shakespeare's good plays is somewhat compromised by their over-
familiarity.  There may be a lot more of interest in seeing one of his
minor plays that never get seen.  Of Shakespeare's 39 plays (the
current count) it seems only a handful regularly produced.  Most of the
rest are rarely seen.
     TITUS ANDRONICUS is nearly universally considered to be
Shakespeare's worst play.  It is a horror tale of revenge as a Roman
noble and a captured Goth Queen wreck terrible revenge on each other in
Imperial Rome.  Academician Harold Bloom suggest that the play was
never meant to be taken seriously and was Shakespeare's attempt to
lampoon the pre-Grand-Guignol blood and thunder plays popular in his
day.  Humble film reviewer Mark Leeper suggests that Bloom may have it
backwards.  It may well be an effort to demonstrate that even violent
horror plays of the time might be written with poetry, grace, and
magic.  Is it so different from Stanley Kubrick attempting a Stephen
King horror story complete with elevators flooded in torrents of blood?
TITUS is reminiscent of Peter Greenway doing what could be a TALES FROM
THE CRYPT episode in operatic style in THE COOK, THE THIEF, HIS WIFE,
AND HER LOVER.  In any case TITUS ANDRONICUS is a play rarely performed
and though it will not be for all tastes it is one that for many of us
should be seen because it is a hoot.
     In ancient Rome soldier and noble Titus Andronicus (Anthony
Hopkins) returns from the wars with the Goths bringing with him the
Goth queen Tamora (Jessica Lange) and her three remaining sons.  Titus
has lost twenty-one sons and has only four left.  He orders the ritual
execution of one of Tamora's sons as a final act of vengeance.  Chance
makes Tamora the wife of the new emperor Saturninus and she will have
a gruesome revenge against Titus only to have him exact an even
sterner vengeance against him.
     Julie Taymor, who adapted THE LION KING for the live stage,
adapted the play and directed with a strange visual sense that cuts
across the centuries.  This is a world that combines the legions of
ancient Rome and vehicles and clothing of 1930s Fascist Italy.
Taymor's visual sense lies somewhere between Fellini's SATYRICON and
the Planet Mongo in a sort of filthy corruption of former splendor.  As
Tamora's vengeance seems to involve body part--heads, hands, tongues--
so too there are body parts sculpted in stone as a recurring theme in
many of the visuals.
     Taymor opens the film with the image of a child playing with toy
Roman soldiers.  The boy is dragged from a modern kitchen to a pavilion
in Rome where human-sized toy soldiers march in mechanized lock step.
This maybe suggesting that the play's violent plot is the product of a
child's imagination.  However she does fill the film with a generous
dose of surreal dream sequences and obscure symbolism that would leave
Shakespeare terminally confused.  I suppose she could claim that she is
not making the film for HIM.
     Jessica Lange, who started her career unable to fulfill even the
most demands of the damsel in distress in the 1976 KING KONG is now one
of the most talented American actresses and is now more than equal to
Shakespearean roles.  Her Tamora physically evokes the visage of a
Gorgon.  In spite of a few role choices of late that I believe even she
regrets, she is now back on track taking difficult roles and doing them
well.  Hopkins has the reputation, but he plays Titus entirely too
blandly, falling back on some Hannibal Lector mannerisms in the hope
they evoke chills.  For my money Lange stole the film from under him.
Alan Cumming is hardly memorable as Saturninus.  He may be remembered
as the pen-clicking Russian computer hacker from GOLDENEYE.  Aaron,
played here by Harry Lennix, is not very believable, due more to
Shakespeare's writing than his acting.  Like the Jew of Malta in
Marlowe's play he lives just to be evil.  Few people see themselves as
just living to cause trouble.
     TITUS is probably not going to be remembered as one of the great
Shakespeare films.  It is more a novelty, a Shakespearean horror tale.
How often do we get a TITUS CHAINSAW MASSACRE or a TWELFTH NIGHT OF THE
LIVING DEAD?  I give it an 8 on the 0 to 10 scale and a +3 on the -4 to
+4 scale.

Title
Review for Godzilla (1998)
     In 1954 there was an anti-American uproar in Japan.  A Japanese
fishing boat had unknowingly caught fish contaminated by an American
nuclear test.  The fishermen had been sickened but not in time to stop
the fish from going to market. Japanese newspapers called the incident
another American atomic attack on Japan.  The Toho film company took
outrage from this incident as inspiration.  That combined with the
recent successes of the film THE BEAST FROM 20,000 FATHOMS and the re-
release of KING KONG inspired them to make their own monster movie.
This was the bleak and very angry film GOJIRA.  In the story Gojira was
a mythical beast identified with a 200-foot radioactive dinosaur who
comes out of the Pacific.  Made on a very small post-war budget, it
very ingeniously stretched some inexpensive special effects to massive
effect.  Some of the sets initially used wax miniatures of large
structures to save money.  Under harsh studio lights these props wilted
and melted.  As an inspiration an aerosol spray was added to the hand
puppet that was Gojira's head together with the wilt effect combined so
Gojira had breath that would fry chicken.
     American film entrepreneur Joseph E. Levine saw GOJIRA and seemed
oblivious to the anti-American tenor of the film.  He crudely added
additional footage with American actor Raymond Burr.  The name "GOJIRA"
probably sounded too Japanese for a country that had so recently been
fought a vicious war with Japan, so the name of the monster was
slightly modified to be less Japanese sounding but to still fit the
same lip movements.  The resulting film was redubbed GODZILLA, KING OF
THE MONSTERS. The Americans turned this little anti-American film into
a big international success, the first such success that there had ever
been in the Japanese film industry.  Godzilla has remained an enduring
character in Japanese film, even as the character has been repeatedly
modified.  Two series of monster films have been built around him.
Finally it was decided little more could be milked from the character,
and Toho killed him off and licensed the copyright to be used by other
studios.  Roland Emmerich who made the films STARGATE and INDEPENDENCE
DAY apparently wanted to do his own giant monster film.  No name they
could give their creature would have the marquee value of calling their
beast Godzilla.
     While the new Godzilla may indeed have been inspired by Toho's
monster, the thing that they have ended up with has more differences
than similarities.  The new Godzilla is a mutant marine iguana owing
its unusual genetics to French nuclear testing in French Polynesia.
(Incidentally, there are no marine lizards in French Polynesia.  The
only marine lizard in the world is the marine iguana, and it is found
only in the Galapagos Islands.)  The creature, who would appear to be
about a hundred feet high, with powerful enough hind legs that it walks
bipedally, though bent over.  The massive creature destroys a number of
boats on its way from Polynesia to New York City, fulfilling a mission
of his own.
     Called in to investigate is Dr. Nick Tatopoulos (Matthew
Broderick), an expert in atomic mutation called from a three-year study
of earthworm mutation at Chernobyl.  Nick follows in the wake of
destruction left by the never-seen titanic beast destroying ships.
Also following in the wake seems to be a sort of French secret agent,
Philippe Roche played Jean Reno of LEON (in the US: THE PROFESSIONAL)
and of MISSION IMPOSSIBLE.
     A full scale Godzilla movie with the sort of quality special
effects that the Japanese could not afford to lavish on the film was,
at least for me, an exciting idea.  Unfortunately, this was not the
film I was hoping for.  The approach of GODZILLA is intended to be in
large part comic, but only Jean Reno manages to make the humor really
funny.  Michael Lerner plays New York City Mayor Ebert and is made up
to look like Roger Ebert.  His assistant is Gene and looks just enough
like Gene Siskel for us to realize that that is the point of the joke.
But the joke just falls flat as often as it is used.  As with
INDEPENDENCE DAY there are several scenes that are homage to previous
films, also just not very amusing.  The film painfully lacks logic.
People do some totally unmotivated actions to keep the plot going,
though it often slows to a snail's pace.  Or the plot will move forward
by contrivance.  Nico suddenly get the urge to do a very specialized
chemical test on Godzilla's blood.  It turns out he is looking for a
result he apparently had no reason to suspect and which on the face of
it seems impossible.  But of course it turns out to be just the key
chemical test to move the plot forward.  Many of the effects and the
thrill scenes are borrowed directly from JURASSIC PARK.  The love story
awkwardly thrown into the mix is totally superfluous.  The empty
plotting and failed humor attempts are certainly not new to Godzilla
films, but it was hoped that they would be left behind with the low-
budget special effects flaws.
     The Japanese I have talked to have been anxious to see what
GODZILLA was to be like with good effects and a serious plot.  I am
sorry to say that I expect that they will be disappointed.  I rate this
one a disappointing 4 on the 0 to 10 scale and a low 0 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Red Rock West (1992)

Title
Review for Lair of the White Worm, The (1988)
     Some of the most stylish and interesting horror are those directed by
Terence Fisher.  Fisher's films include HORROR OF DRACULA, KISS OF THE
VAMPIRE, ISLAND OF TERROR, and THE DEVIL'S BRIDE (a.k.a. THE DEVIL RIDES
OUT).  Some have said that Fisher is to horror films what Hitchcock is to
suspense.  Any year is a banner year for horror fans when two Terence Fisher
films come out.  1988 is such a year--well, sort of.  Lamentably, Fisher
died several years ago, but if the term Hitchcockian can be applied to films
done in his style, you should be able to do the same thing with Fisher.  For
Fisher, making horror films was an art.  Making films about razor gloves or
hockey-masked killers and mass-producing those is at best a craft and barely
that.  But 1988 can boast two films in the best traditions of Fisher, both
made by filmmakers with much better reputations.  THE DECEIVERS was directed
by James Ivory and LAIR OF THE WHITE WORM was directed by Ken Russell.
     Russell like to spice his films with sequences of near-hallucinatory
images.  Sometimes that works, as it did in ALTERED STATES or THE DEVILS.
Sometimes it is a complete non sequitur, as in CRIMES OF PASSION.  He let
weirdness totally take hold of his last film, GOTHIC, but with LAIR OF THE
WHITE WORM he is back telling a story reasonably linearly.  And while it is
not his most ambitious project, making a 1960s-style horror film--and doing
it well--is better than trying to do a biography of Tchaikovsky and trashing
it as badly as Russell did with THE MUSIC LOVERS.  In this case, Russell's
source was the Bram Stoker novel of the same title.  Stoker also wrote JEWEL
OF THE SEVEN STARS, which was adapted into THE MUMMY'S SHROUD and THE
AWAKENING.  And, oh yes, he wrote a book called DRACULA which, if I
remember, has been the basis of a few films.
     Since before the Garden of Eden the god of the Bible has been at war
with the primal snake god Dionin.  Through the ages various snake cults have
flourished and, where necessary, opposed Christianity (as well as Conan!).
A disciple of Dionin--thousands of years old, thanks to clean living and the
power of the snake god--has set up shop on the English countryside where
legend has it a great "worm" was slain by a Lord D'Ampton after it had
feasted on people and cows.  Since then there had been disappearances in the
region, but not enough to cause too much fuss until the discovery of the
skull of some inexplicable animal is found by a Scottish visitor.  Then
things start to happen.
     Surprisingly for a film by Russell, LAIR OF THE WHITE WORM is, if
anything, a bit lightweight.  But it is a well-crafted horror film.  He
finds surprising places to hint at snake shapes in the film, from a water
hose to the insignia on a policeman's collar.  Amanda Donohoe makes a
superbly sensuous villainess and is always marvelous to watch, but never
more so than when she is seducing an unlucky but eager Boy Scout for the
greater glory of Dionin.  LAIR OF THE WHITE WORM will probably be my
favorite Ken Russell film.  I sat through it twice and had a great time both
viewings.  Rate it a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Rocketeer, The (1991)
[Follow-ups directed to rec.arts.movies.  -Moderator]
     I recognize that there are some films that it is hard for me to be
objective about and all I can do is state my prejudices at the beginning of
my review.  I think I was about five years old when Saturday morning
television ran COMMANDO CODY, SKY MARSHALL OF THE UNIVERSE.  At five years
of age I decided that I really liked something I later learned to call
"science fiction" and everything I have ever really been interested in since
has been an out-branching from that root.  For years, I dreamed of somehow
getting a rocket suit like Commando Cody's.  Not being a graphic novel fan,
I never heard of THE ROCKETEER, released ten years ago.  However, seeing the
stand-up poster for THE ROCKETEER several months ago brought a flood of
memories and I knew even then this was a film that I would have a hard time
being objective about.  And the film turned out to be much better than I
expected even then.
     The setting is 1934 Los Angeles.  The title character is Cliff Secord,
played a bit too callow and pure by Bill Campbell.  Secord is a flying ace
who, through rather contrived circumstances, comes into possession of a
stolen rocket suit designed by Howard Hughes (played by Terry O'Quinn).
Lots of people want this suit for lots of different reasons, but it is
Secord who has the suit and who reluctantly lets it make him into a
superhero.  The main villain who wants to get his slimey hands on the suit
is handsome film star Neville Sinclair, a character based on allegations
that have been made about Errol Flynn.  Sinclair is played by Timothy
Dalton.  The basic plot is very basic and is a negative aspect of the film.
     But while the plot is pretty humdrum, much of the writing is not.  Like
David Mamet's "Water Engine," THE ROCKETEER ties together many pieces of
1930s and 1940s popular culture into a single story.  For little details to
throw into the story, THE ROCKETEER draws heavily on Hollywood icons, on
then-contemporary world events, and on details of aviation history.  Through
Rick Baker's make-up we get one final film in which Rondo Hatton plays the
heavy.  There is a witty reference to the famous Hollywood sign over
Hollywood.  There are allusions to the Hindenburg, here called the
Luxembourg.  As a rather canny inside joke, a small piece of animation is
done in the style used in Frank Capra's "Why We Fight" films.  The joke is
that Capra's animation, like the film THE ROCKETEER, was a product of Disney
Studios.  And of course there are the classic planes of the period, provided
in part by the heavy involvement of Howard Hughes as a major character.
Also we see the classic art deco and just plain weird Los Angeles
architecture.  For example, the Bulldog Diner is shaped like a giant
bulldog.  The flying suit itself is art deco.  All these elements combine to
make a fascinatingly detailed film that constantly challenges the viewer
with more than meets the eye.
     Special effects are charmingly provided by Industrial Light and Magic.
They are generally fairly good with the ironic exception of the flying suit
sequences, which are not quite visually believable and which would in real
life rip our rocket man apart with whiplash.  The script's weak points are
the occasional lapses into self-satire, the overly complex interrelations of
the villains, and a sequence in a nightclub that drags on much too long.
With those exceptions, one has to say that THE ROCKETEER is a very nicely
crafted film offering entertainment on many levels.  This is one of those
rare films you can truly say the whole family should enjoy.  I give it a
high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Beyond Rangoon (1995)
     It is August, 1988, and Laura Bowman (Patricia Arquette) has lost
her husband and son to crime in the United States.  Shell-shocked and
feeling she has little left to live for, she has agreed to accompany
her sister on a tour of Southeast Asia.  In Rangoon she loses her
passport while visiting a mesmerizing pro-democracy rally.  Forced to
remain in Burma while her group goes on to Thailand, she finds herself
getting in deeper and deeper trouble until she is on the run across
country, chased by the military police.  Along the way she has seen
more of the day-to-day brutality of the Burmese government than the
military can afford to have her report to the outside world.
Accompanying her is a pro-democracy ex-college professor U Aung Ko
(played by U Aung Ko).
     When setting a story against a strongly political backdrop the
decision must always be made of how much of the issues to lay before
the audience.  BEYOND RANGOON may not be of the caliber of THE KILLING
FIELDS, an obvious film to compare this one with for more than its
Southeast Asia setting.  But BEYOND RANGOON is well ahead of the
cliched THUNDERHEART or A DRY WHITE SEASON.  For political films this
one is close to (and perhaps just a notch below) UNDER FIRE.  Yes, it
has a lot of chase scenes and hair-breadth escapes, but it also is a
fairly good introduction to the state of Burma under a military
dictatorship.
     Hans Zimmer can add one more exotic musical score to his resume,
and while this one is not as lyrical as some of his previous work, it
certainly works in the film.  Boorman's visual sense stands him in good
stead with a few small lapses in judgement.  One such lapse is a scene
involving mirrors that calls too much attention to itself.  Another odd
distraction has one character (a Burmese-speaking policeman who comes
to a hotel), whose words do not fit his lip movements, like in a badly
dubbed movie.
     Patricia Arquette seems to have the acting range of Keanu Reeves,
but as someone who has been through some trying emotional experiences
before and during the course of the film, that may be all that would be
expected of the character.  U Aung Ko has a likeable worldly air.
Since the actor and the character have the same name, one wonders if
the script told his real background.  Frances McDormand and Spaulding
Gray get second and third billing for what must have been contractual
reasons, though they are quickly out of the film.
     While one might question the depth of the political thought that
went into the scripting of this film, the film is certainly suspenseful
and should be pleasing for most viewers.  It should be noted that this
film did what a Nobel Peace Prize could not: it got the Burmese
government to free Aung San Suu Kyi.  I give this one a +2 on the -4 to
+4 scale.

Title
Review for Mr In-Between (2001)
This is the best British gangster film since THE LONG GOOD FRIDAY.  
Jon Bennet (played by Andrew Howard) is an extremely good 
assassin.  As such he is probably an evil man but it does not 
worry him.  He has become an unquestioning weapon.  He is in the 
employ of a kingpin (David Calder) far more evil than he is.  But 
even assassins have innocent pasts.  He runs into an old from 
school days and he is married to a mutual girl friend from school.  
Complicating matters is that they live near where he had a recent 
job and their young daughter may have seen him at the crime. 
A big piece of what makes this film work is the depiction of the 
kingpin.  Calder is a familiar actor in Britain, though not 
frequently seen in the US.  He was seen in THE WORLD IS NOT 
ENOUGH.  Here he creates one of the best screen villains in recent 
years.  He is at once seductive and repellent like a beautiful 
venomous snake.  His lair is underground, apparently in a sewer, 
where he lives like the king of sewer rats.  It is the kingpin who 
pulls the strings that will control Bennet's life. 
Paul Sarossy who directs spent most of his career as a 
cinematographer and like the kingpin's lair, he has molded images 
of class and style out of the darkness.  By using semi-darkness 
and letting the colors of deep blue and black dominate every scene 
he makes the film visually as ominous as anything in this nether 
world.  This is a world that is cold and unfriendly. 
Sorossy creates a world of violence much more by what we hear than 
what we see.  This is a film with a great deal of physical 
violence occurring just out of reach.  We see very little but we 
hear a great deal more and we imagine more than that. 
The screenplay is by Peter Waddington based on the novel by Neil 
Cross, but it is Sarossy's film all the way.  It creates indelible 
images of evil.  I rate it an 8 on the 0 to 10 scale and a low +3 
on the -4 to +4 scale.  (I do hope they do not use the tagline 
"Don't mess with Mr. In-between.")

Title
Review for Chaplin (1992)
     In 1931 Charlie Chaplin invited Albert Einstein to see a private
screening of Chaplin's new CITY LIGHTS.  When passersby cheered the two men,
Chaplin turned to Einstein and said, "The people are applauding you because
none of them understands you and applauding me because everybody understands
me."  Getting an understanding of a good, simple man was Richard
Attenborough's goal in CHAPLIN much as it was in his GANDHI.  CHAPLIN is, of
course, a long overdue cinematic tribute to the man most easily pointed to
as the greatest screen comic of all time.  In 144 minutes Attenborough
attempts to cover the entire career of Chaplin from about age four to age
eighty-three.  Eighty is a lot to cover. This leads to some problems with
pacing in which some periods are covered much too quickly and others, less
interesting, are shown in too much detail.
     The biography is told mostly in flashback that opens with the Chaplin
family's grinding poverty in London at the end of the 19th Century.
Charlie's mother supports the two of them and Charlie's older brother by a
failing career singing in music halls.  When she is no longer young enough
to please an audience, Charlie finds he has some talent in front of an
audience, but not enough talent to earn what it would take to keep his
family together, nor enough to keep himself out of the workhouse.  In his
suffering and despair the film makes only too clear the roots of Chaplin's
bittersweet comedy.  The film tracks his music hall career, his first love,
and his trip to America to try to prosper.  It is, perhaps, a weakness of
the screenplay by William Boyd, Bryan Forbes, and William Goldman that
Chaplin is so incredibly understandable and so obviously a product of this
early existence.  His efforts to ease suffering and his womanizing all seem
to come from attempts to recapture what little was good in his youth and to
help others avoid the suffering he had experienced.
     The scene shifts to America with Dan Aykroyd playing an extremely
vulgar Mack Sennett.  There Chaplin invents his tramp character.  (The film
takes some liberties here.  The tramp actually first showed up in a humorous
documentary about a children's auto race.  Supposedly a funny-looking
observer keeps walking in front of the camera.  Within two years that funny
little pest would be one of the most famous people in the world.) After all
that Charlie has been through it would be nice to see how he reacts as
success starts coming to him.  What should have been the most exciting part
of the film was covered in two or three scenes in which Chaplin goes from
being a clever new comic to "the most famous man in the world."
     Now scandalously rich, as perhaps the screen's first real star and
certainly the first superstar, Charlie tries to make everything that went
wrong in his youth now go right, only to find that dream impossible.  The
film traces the rest of his career, his many marriages, and his friendship
with Douglas Fairbanks (whose natural flamboyance actor Kevin Kline can only
barely reflect).  Particularly interesting is the discussion over how to
make the transition to sound and why Chaplin insisted on making what were
essentially silent films well into the sound era.  Also we see why he made
THE GREAT DICTATOR and why he insisted it would be the final film for his
tramp.  Chaplin's conflict with J. Edgar Hoover also gets attention.
     Attenborough's Chaplin is every bit as tragic as the character he
played.  Robert Downey, Jr., plays him as a man of terrible self-doubts, a
man who can have a room full of admiring fans and if one drunk does not like
him, he will fall into depression.  He is a man who had many dreams and of
them the only one that came true was his wish for success.
     CHAPLIN is one of those films where major stars are satisfied with
small roles just to part of the tribute.  Among them are Anthony Hopkins,
Penelope Ann Miller, James Woods, and Robert Stephens.  Geraldine Chaplin
plays her own grandmother, Hannah Chaplin.  Downey is surprisingly
satisfying as Chaplin.  One does not really expect Downey to make Chaplin's
slapstick funny for a 1990s audience.  Downey appears to be fully up to the
physical demands of Chaplin's humor and somehow manages to make silent film
gags still very funny.  In make-up he really looks like Chaplin's tramp.
(Of course, people have different ideas of exactly what the tramp looks
like.  Once when Chaplin was in Monte Carlo they were having a Charlie
Chaplin look-a-like contest.  He entered the contest incognito but was only
able to cop third place.)  Playing an older Chaplin, however, Downey's
make-up lets him down.  Also, a segment of the film shot in the style of a
Keystone Cops film does not work well.
     It is very difficult in judging a tribute film to separate the quality
of the film itself from the appropriateness of the tribute.  If one likes
what Malcolm X or Gandhi stood for, it is difficult not to like their
biographical films more for that reason.  However, even if it is just Robert
Downey, Jr., playing Chaplin, he can kick a bully with a panache and a class
that Jean-Claude Van Damme or Steven Segal can barely even dream of.  With
that warning about my subjectivity, I will rate this one a +2 on the -4 to
+4 scale.

Title
Review for Oscar (1991)
     Fifteen years ago Sylvester Stallone became a major star with a single
film, ROCKY.  Since then he has made nothing but macho action films.  But
surely now he realizes that he cannot keep playing low-personality action
figures on the screen.  Even John Wayne discovered he had to put some acting
and character into his roles.  And Wayne was considered more charismatic on
the screen than Stallone.  So the time has come for Stallone to cross over
into comedy.  His choice of comedy shows unexpectedly good taste.  It is not
only a very funny comedy, but it is a comedy unlike comedies that have been
made for many years.  Although originally written in French in 1958, it is
very much in the style of some of Frank Capra's screwier comedies, such as
ARSENIC AND OLD LACE and YOU CAN'T TAKE IT WITH YOU.  It also takes some
chances in that it has the claustrophobic feel of a filmed stage play: 95%
of it takes place in one house and much of that is just in the course of one
morning.  But it is such a gem of a stage play that it may just do the trick
for Stallone.
     The plot defies describing in any detail, since a big part of the fun
is just making the plot more and more convoluted, until the characters
themselves are totally bewildered about what is going on.  The film opens
with a surprisingly unfunny scene between mobster "Snaps" Provolone
(Stallone) and his dying father (played by Kirk Douglas).  Almost
undoubtedly this scene was written just for the film, since it is poorly
written and it does not take place in the Provolone house, as most of the
rest of the film does.  Poppa makes Snaps promise to go straight.  Flash to
a charming credit sequence featuring what looks like a Puppetoon opera
singer singing the "Largo al factotum" from Rossini's BARBER OF SEVILLE.
Flash to a month later and Snaps's morning starts with an unexpected meeting
with his accountant, who admits that he has been embezzling from Snaps but
explains it is all okay because he will soon be one of the family since he
wants to marry Snaps's daughter.  Except it turns out to be a daughter that
Snaps does not happen to have.  Well, sort of.  If that sounds a little
strange, you ain't heard nothing yet.  That is just how it starts.  Give the
film another five minutes and stranger will happen still.
     The heart of this film is an incredible array of minor characters, some
very funny, far too many to mention.  The film is well chosen to let the bit
parts do the most to pull the film along and place small demands on the
leading man, who appears to be up to the small demands that are placed on
him, and even if he were not, the pacing, the script, and the minor
characters would still make this film worth seeing.  OSCAR makes it as one
of the funniest comedies in a long time.  I give it a +2 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Falling Down (1993)
     Life is a sort of social contract.  You put in your work at school and
then in your career.  You pay your dues and you expect to be paid back with
a reasonable level of happiness.  You expect to reap the rewards of your
work.  You expect to live in a society where the rules seem to make sense
and where justice prevails.  And, of course, all those expectations are in
varying degrees wrong.  If you walk places where you have a right to walk,
you are very liable to be beaten and robbed.  If you go into a convenience
store, you very often find prices are just too darn high.  The hamburger may
look good and juicy in the picture, but when you actually get it, it is
flat, dried out, and unsavory.
     Michael Douglas plays "D-Fens," a 30-something nerd with a crewcut who
by his accounting is just not getting his fair share out of life.  His
marriage has gone sour, his career has gone sour, and life just seems to
have picked him to dump on.  On a  hot day in Los Angeles with traffic at a
total standstill, he abandons his car and sets off on foot to get to his
daughter's birthday party and at the same time just let everybody know that
he is fed up.  Today he is going to make sure he gets satisfaction.
Overcharge him, and be prepared to have him take your store apart.  Push him
and he is going to push back.  Cheat him only in peril of your life.  Then
there is Prendergast (played by Robert Duvall).  On Prendergast's last day
of police work, he becomes fascinated by a string of incidents that he can
plot in a line on a map.  Somebody is fighting back against all the
indignities of life, the same ones that frustrate Prendergast, and
Prendergast has to stop him before he gets in serious trouble.
     FALLING DOWN is an angry howl against the deterioration in the quality
of life we all face.  Joel Schumacher directing from Ebbe Roe Smith's script
has created a villain cut from the same cloth as Bernard Goetz.  It is hard
not to sympathize with Douglas's angry man.  It would be easy to identify
Douglas's character with one political wing or the other, but as he goes
from venting his anger on a Korean grocer, to Latino gang members, to a
neo-Nazi, and finally to rich, selfish, over-paid whites, we see Douglas as
surprisingly center-of-the-road.  He is a Moderate who has run fresh out of
moderation.  This is a protest film that could have been made in the 1960s.
(My wife, I, and Vincent Canby independently thought to compare it to THE
SWIMMER.) Only toward the end does FALLING DOWN lose its power and become
somewhat prosaic.  But the film is angry and takes chances few Hollywood
films are anxious to take anymore.  I rate it a high +1 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Chances Are (1989)
     The light supernatural comedy-fantasy has been around for a long time,
having its greatest flourish in the late 1930s and early 1940s with the film
versions of Thorne Smith's books, particularly the "Topper" series and
TURNABOUT.  I doubt that there has been a year since the 1940s that has not
had one and probably several, from ONE TOUCH OF VENUS to BIG.  But lately,
perhaps in part due to the so-called "New Age" thinking, there has been an
upswing in the number of whimsical comedies on supernatural themes such as
soul transference and reincarnation.  The "turnabout" films in which the
protagonists trade bodies have almost become their own sub-genre.  The
latest entry in the supernatural derby (last time I checked) is CHANCES ARE.
     The prologue introduces us to newlyweds Louie and Corinne Jeffries
(played by Christopher McDonald and Cybill Shepherd).  They are passionately
in love.  Louie's best friend, Philip Train (played by Ryan O'Neal), also
loves Corinne, but from a proper distance.  Louie loves Corinne so much he
cannot worry about minor things like crossing streets safely, which is how
he comes to be in Heaven asking to be reincarnated as close as possible to
Corinne.  Flash forward twenty-four years and Louie is now in his next life
as Yale journalism graduate Alex Finch (played by Robert Downey, Jr.).
Through an odd, not to say absurd, set of coincidences, Alex finds himself
in the house he used to own, looking at the woman who used to be his wife,
and it all comes back to him.
     CHANCES ARE is unpretentious and whimsical.  When he first realizes the
joke that fate has played on him, Alex completely loses all his self-control
in a way that seems totally out of character.  Previously having shown
himself to be a quick thinker, it is unlikely that he would so totally go
incoherent without ever asking himself, "How must this behavior look to
other people?"  One curious novelty of this film is that Cybill Shepherd
comes off as doing a reasonable acting job.  I think this works by contrast
to Robert Downey, Jr., who is not yet an accomplished actor by anybody's
definition.  Then there's Ryan O'Neal, who can display the whole range of
emotions from "A" to "A.5."  Like Downey, O'Neal started his career playing
good-looking youths, but already Downey has more dramatic range than O'Neal.
     CHANCES ARE is a pleasant but unoriginal television-quality film.  I
rate it a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Impostors, The (1998)
     CAPSULE: Roughly 60 years after its heyday, the farce returns.
Stanley Tucci wrote, directed, and stars in a very funny movie about
two out of work actors on a boat.  It is not exactly like Laurel and
Hardy, not just like the Marx Brothers, but it is in that vein.  And I
did laugh, which is rare these days.  Rating: 7 (0 to 10), 2 (-4 to +4)
   - I first noticed Stanley Tucci in PRELUDE TO A KISS where I thought
     he was very funny.  Since then I have been watching for him.  But
     THE IMPOSTERS is like nothing he has made before and like very few
     films made since the 40s.  The only other true farce I remember
     from recent year is BRAIN DONORS and that was almost entirely
     taken from the Marx Brothers school.  THE IMPOSTERS is a new and
     very funny comedy team of Platt and Tucci.  It is hard to know if
     comedy will be funny for other people.  Currently people are
     laughing uproariously at THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY which did
     not do very much for me.  Other films like OSCAR and THE CHEAP
     DETECTIVE crack me up but are not successful comedies at the
     boxoffice.  So take it from whence it comes.  THE IMPOSTERS did
     make me laugh very hard at times.  Not many comedies make me
     laugh.
   - Tucci co-produced, wrote, directed, and starred in the film.
   - Cast includes Oliver Platt, Stanley Tucci, Alfred Molina, Lily
     Taylor, Steve Buscemi, Tony Shalhoub, Teagle, F. Bougere, Campbell
     Scott, and Isabella Rossellini.
   - The language and one or two modestly sexual situations are not in
     the classical farce tradition.
   - Out-of-work actors are given tickets to see HAMLET with a
     particularly hammy actor.  When Maurice (Platt) insults the actor
     they are chased hide in a packing crate and find themselves loaded
     onto an ocean liner.  From there a large number of subplots start
     working themselves out, GRAND HOTEL style with the help of Maurice
     and Arthur (Tucci).
   - Steve Buscemi sings???????
   - Bizarre scenes as the two seem to get into a fight at an outdoor
     restaurant.
   - An unexpected and uncredited role near the beginning.
   - Campbell Scott as a German crewmember is very funny.
   - The shooting title was SHIP OF FOOLS.  I saw that it was being
     filmed and expected a remake of the Catherine Anne Porter.  Uh,
     not quite.

Title
Review for Midnight in the Garden of Good and Evil (1997)
     I saw this film well after most people saw it, and it still was
nothing like what I expected.  I knew it was a murder story dealing
with the well-to-do in Savannah, Georgia, society.  I expected it to be
dark and very serious and dealing with festering family relationships.
However, I do not remember a 1997 film that had me laughing so much.
The comedy elements of this film are delightful, the characters I
expected initially I would end up hating in this expose turn out to be
likable and some even endearing.  If anything the comic elements of
this film reminded me of a more smartly written MY COUSIN VINNY or
perhaps DOC HOLLYWOOD.
     Town and Country Magazine has wanted for years to cover the annual
Christmas party of society baron Jim Williams (Kevin Spacey) of
Savannah.  He finally has given permission and they have sent John
Kelso (John Cusack).  At least two surprises await Kelso.  One is the
number of eccentrics Kelso finds in one small space of Savannah.  One
man, for the best of reasons, gives a daily walk to an empty dog
collar. Another has several real pets on tethers, but they are all
horseflies.  The other surprise Kelso finds is that he is the stand-
offish one, and the upper crust of society are anxious to pull him into
their circle and be friendly.  The only sour note is a bitter scene he
notes between Williams and a Billy, low-class apparent houseboy.  After
the party Kelso goes to bed with more writing material than he
bargained for, and is awakened in the middle of the night to see a
fleet of police cars at the Williams mansion.  Billy had returned after
the party and had a run-in with Williams that left Billy dead.  Kelso
quits Town and Country and decides to write a book about the trial and
Savannah in general.  He also becomes a de facto member of the Williams
defense team.  He gets embroiled in more local eccentrics, mostly
friendly, and tries to unravel for himself what happened the night of
the killing.
     Director Clint Eastwood takes his time, and 155 minutes of ours,
unraveling the story of the hidden secrets of modern Savannah society,
many of which would have been shocking in the 1950s.  Both the type of
character Williams is and his being played by the usually sinister
Kevin Spacey makes this smart, suave, affable, yet candid man a real
pleasure to see on the screen.  John Cusack is serviceable as the
point-of-view character, but not the most watchable actor on the
screen.  The actor who surpasses expectations is Australian actor Jack
Thompson as Williams's lawyer Sonny Seilor.  Some may remember Thompson
as the supportive father of a gay son in THE SUM OF US.  Of a more
comic turn is Savannah personality The Lady Chablis whose minor secret
seemed obvious to me before the character even appeared on-screen.  I
strongly suspected just hearing Chablis's voice through a door.  It is
something of a false note when characters in the film are surprised.
     After I was bored by THE BRIDGES OF MADISON COUNTY, I was not
expecting a lot from MIDNIGHT IN THE GARDEN OF GOOD AND EVIL.  Now I am
sorry I was not able to see the film until after I made my top ten list
of last year.  The film was a true unexpected pleasure.  I rate it an8
on the 0 to 10 scale and a high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Iron & Silk (1990)
     I have visited thirty-two countries other than my own, but none have
had such an impact on me as China during my 1982 visit.  This was just the
tail end of Mao's China.  In most of the places we saw everyone still
dressed in the Mao suits and caps.  Some of the cities I visited had been
open to Westerners for only a year and you only had to be non-Chinese to be
treated as a celebrity.  The Chinese were not shy about their curiosity
about Westerners either.  In many cities in the north we would have crowds
five and six deep around our bus, just to be able to look in the windows.
Parents held up youngsters to see into the bus.  People still talked very
sadly about the horrible disaster that recently had struck their country.
It was a man-made disaster called a "cultural revolution."  In 1982 this was
one China.  The China of five years later seemed another China altogether,
with Western styles, new fancy hotels, Coca-Cola, and Reeboks.  In their
words, they were "letting a thousand flowers bloom."  Two years later at
Tienanmen Square there was yet another China.  Truly a country that
comprises one quarter of humanity changes little in any but the superficial
face it shows to foreigners, but that face to visiting foreigners it makes a
big difference and it is a very different China to them.
     As something of a coincidence, the 1982 China I saw was also seen by
Mark Salzman.  He graduated from Yale that year and went to fulfill a dream
he had had.  He was a martial arts film enthusiast as a teenager and he went
to live in China and to try to study martial arts if possible.  The
ostensible reason for his visit was to teach English at the Hunan Medical
College in Changsha, but he also wanted to learn martial arts in the
classical manner.  After a two-year stay he returned to the United States
and wrote a book about his experiences in China, IRON AND SILK.  With
Shirley Sun, he co-authored a screenplay based on his book.  He returned to
China with Sun to film the screenplay.  This time he went to Hangzhou, which
stood in for Changsha in the film.  Sun produced and directed; Salzman
starred.  The day after the film was completed, as VARIETY reports, the
Chinese military moved on Tienanmen Square and crushed a student rebellion
and a thousand flowers.
     The film shuttles back and forth among several subplots which are not
entirely independent.  We see Mark's relationship to his class and his
teaching.  He is a teacher teaching teachers English and in turn being
taught by them about Chinese culture and the Chinese people.  Through one of
the members of his class, Mark meets a great and famous martial arts
instructor, Teacher Pan (played by Pan Qingfu, a.k.a. Teacher Pan--yes, both
Mark and Pan play themselves).  Pan is pleased by the interest of the
American but at first wants no part of teaching a spoiled foreigner who is
unwilling to "eat bitter."  A third subplot has Mark attracted to a young
woman with a taste for English literature.  And a  fourth subplot deals with
Mark just learning about the ageless culture and the current government.
     The stereotypic plot for such a story would have the foreigner and the
local Chinese misunderstanding each other and conflicting at first, then
learning to like each other.  Ironically, that is just the reverse of what
happens.  In the early part of his visit, Mark's relationships with the
Chinese are characterized by friendly cultural curiosity on both sides.  The
one early ominous note is that the teachers in Mark's class who had earlier
learned Russian were ordered not just to learn English, but to forget their
Russian.  Mark drops this detail gleefully without reflecting how firmly it
indicates that the government can vengefully turn against a foreign
nationality and how powerfully they can order the people to follow suit.
Eventually Salzman comes to realize, or at least believe, that the
government wants foreigners to believe that the country is open to new
ideas, but at the same time it is determined to force the people to reject
change.  There is almost no mention of political differences until well into
the film when suddenly Mark discovers that some of his closest friends are
under heavy censure for showing too much interest in Western ways.
     Most of what is wrong with IRON AND SILK is in the iron part of the
film: the martial arts.  Salzman's martial arts accomplishments are
impressive without being all that interesting.  Entirely too much screen
time is spent on showing uninteresting martial arts demonstrations and with
characters, particularly Salzman himself, showing off for the camera.  Also
Salzman uses a cutesy touch--scenes from old martial arts movies intercut in
the film to show what he is thinking.  A similar touch is used on a cable
situation comedy currently, but it undercuts the atmosphere of the otherwise
serious film.
     Salzman makes a surprising and disturbing mistake in the script when he
tells his girlfriend that he wanted to learn Chinese so he would be able to
speak to a quarter of the world.  In fact, he speaks Mandarin and nowhere
near all people who speak a dialect of Chinese speak Mandarin.  Mandarin and
Cantonese are as different as are English and German.  Written Chinese is a
different matter, I believe.  There is basically only one written Chinese
language and that all dialects share, but there are several spoken dialects
that might as well be different languages.
     I did find that the film reminded me much of my trip.  I did not visit
Changsha, but I did visit Hangzhou and the film very nicely captured the
feel of that beautiful city.  The highest compliment I can pay IRON AND SILK
is that not only did my visit help me to understand the film, the film
helped me to understand better my visit.  In spite of excessive martial arts
sequences this is the best film I have seen this year.  I give it a low +3
on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for What Happened Was... (1994)
     I had never been to a film festival before and I was curious what
made them click.  Is it just a lot of films being shown various
places?  Are there any central activities?  How does it work?
     Well, first some large numbers.  People who attend the full
festival get their choice of 250 films to see.  There are roughly
300,000 attendees.  Four movie theaters participate but because two are
large multiplexes there are as many as eleven different films showing
at the same time and perhaps a twelfth if you include the free
screenings of films in the park.  Filmmakers from all over the world
provide films and on one screen you may have a real mixed bag of films
showing in one day.  A typical theater will show in one day:
     DINNER'S ON THE TABLE (Canadian)
     LES AMOUREUX (French)
     BANDIT QUEEN (Indian)
     FAUT PAS RIRE DU BONHEUR (French)
     I LOVE YOU ROSA (Turkish)
     NOT ANGELS BUT ANGELS (Czech)
     SHE LIVES TO RIDE (US made-for-TV)
     Uh, monolinguals like myself have to be a little careful.  I
wanted to see a film about Joan of Arc and then Evelyn noticed it was
just in French.  Of course they seem geared to boorish US visitors:
their description of the film explained who Joan of Arc was.  (It turns
out education seems to be failing Canadians just like it is failing US
people.  If anything, you see more people listing prices like .99 cents
here than you see in the US.
     There are two handbooks of the festival.  There is a free handout
with schedules at the various theaters and an index so that you can
find when a given film is playing.  It also has a page or two of
descriptions of the film, but not nearly enough.  For C$16 you get a
catalog of films 3/4-inch thick and heavier than you might want to
carry around.  It has a page on each of the feature films.  The printed
materials are poorly designed.  If you look through the catalog and a
film looks interesting, but you are not sure it will be in English you
have to go to the handout and look up in the index to see when the film
is playing.  But that is only a time and date.  You then have eleven
different listings to search to find which theater is showing the film
you want.  (Evelyn points out that there the index does tell you in an
encoded form which theater has the film, but I am just slowly catching
on.)  Then you look at that listing to find the language.  Some are
English, some are French with English subtitles.  You might have picked
a film that is in Dutch with French subtitles.  It is not quite that
bad because you can look at the title of the film and usually can guess
what language the film will be in and usually the non-English films
will have English subtitles.  But the listings could be a lot more
convenient to use.
     Oh, and you are currently reading not just the best description of
the rules of how the fest works--well, that goes without saying--you
are reading the only one.  We have not found in French or in English
any explanation of how things work at the festival.  We missed the
first night's film because we did not know about exchanging tickets in
advance, but that is getting a bit ahead of myself.
     Tickets for the showings (other than three or four free films
shown out of doors--mostly concert films like the director's cut of
WOODSTOCK) are inexpensive compared to evening tickets at home.  They
are C$6.50 individually or C$45 for a book of ten.  (In US currency
$5.08 and $35.16 respectively.)  You basically have to pick up tickets
in advance or risk the film selling out.  Evelyn assumed that only if
you pay the C$6.50 you can reserve a place at the film.  That made all
the difference.  She thought that if they "sold out" all their seats
with individual tickets, nobody could get in using tickets from the
ticket books.  By this misunderstanding that is what happened Thursday
night, the first night of the festival.  They had two featured films,
KABLOONAK and NATURAL BORN KILLERS.  We did not know we could get
advanced tickets with the book so both were sold out.  Instead we went
to another film, one not showing as part of the festival, but playing
at a non-participating theater to the same audience.  It is:
     This is a 1992 Swedish documentary (in German--perhaps for German
television?) by Peter Cohen examining Hitler's philosophy and National
Socialism as an aesthetic movement and an attempt to impose by force a
single aesthetic sensibility on the world.  It was a fanatical effort
by any Procrustian means necessary to make the world fit his personal
idea of what is beauty.  Hitler's aesthetic was, it is suggested, built
on three pillars: the town where he was born, Wagner, and Classical
art.
     Cohen sees the entire political career of Hitler from this point
of view.  Hitler was a failed painter and architect who saw the
collapse of the world coming led by degenerate art and tolerance of
what he personally considered ugly.  His inspiration was Rienzi, a
knight in a Wagnerian opera who wanted to return to the grandeur of
Mediterranean Classical cultures but was betrayed.  According to Hitler
the Classical age was entirely beautiful, but that the protection and
preservation of so-called "genetic defectives" like the mentally and
physically handicapped as well as Jews was a threat to what he saw as
an ever-diminishing proportion of the population who were people of
pure and untainted blood.  He considered himself "a political Robert
Koch" ferreting out the impure genetic microbes in society and
restoring society to health.  He brought 45% of German physicians into
the Nazi party and then had them institute programs of what he called
"euthanasia" to murder those who had impure blood.
     Cohen's Hitler did not want art that pointed to social ills in his
new world.  The only acceptable art would portray man as noble and
living in harmony with an idealized nature.  He himself designed the
uniforms, insignia, and standards of his followers.  Part of his plan
was to make over Berlin as a fantastic futuristic city based on
Classical artistic principles decorated with huge statues, thirty feet
tall or higher.  Part of the design was that even the ruins should
outdo Roman and Greek ruins in magnificence.  Cohen shows us all this
with remarkable new documentary footage and places more familiar
footage in a new context.
     At first it seems a trivialization of Nazism to consider it an
aesthetic movement--an attempt to beautify the world.  It also at first
glance seems to be literally adding insult to injury for Hitler's
victims.  This certainly is not the point of view of the of
ARCHITECTURE OF DOOM and Cohen's interpretation only serves to make
Hitler seem more perverted.  He fashions himself a heroic exterminator
of pests without giving any thought to the equalizing of humans to
lice, rats, and insects in his attempts to get to his idealized vision
of a squeaky clean world.  This film serves as an admonition to those
who would regulate art forms like rock and rap the extremes to which it
is possible to go and how destructive the results can be when carried
to fascist extremes.  I am not accusing those who would limit and
censor lyrics of going to the extremes of a Hitler, but there may be
similarities in the impulses and the film is a warning against trying
too hard to re-form the world to fit some idealized view of how things
should be.
     This film is a major reinterpretation of history, but it is not
clear that any really useful conclusions can be drawn from it.  Does it
make a difference whether people are murdered from a motive of hatred
or aesthetics?  In fact, might it not even be the same thing?  While
the value of ARCHITECTURE OF DOOM's conclusions might be questioned, it
is a totally engrossing documentary which has a lot of very striking
archival footage.  I rate it a high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     At this writing it is the second day of the festival.   Montreal
is a city that has, if anything, more panhandlers than Manhattan.  They
are a much narrower ethnic mix, but Rue Ste. Catherine seems to draw
them.  Ste. Catherine is the center of the festival.  All the theaters
are on Ste. Catherine or are a short distance off of it on a side
street.
     Waiting in line for our second film we talked to a gentleman from
the Bronx who told us what was wrong with the festival.  We told him
what films had looked interesting and he told us what bad taste in
films we had.  Ah, New Yorkers!  Well, he has to get in line if he
wants to insult my taste.  Come to think of it, he did.
     On our way in we got had news and good news.  The bad news was
that they did not just take coupons from the book for entrance, we had
to go back and pick up tickets for the specific film.  The good news
was that Evelyn was wrong and we could get advance tickets with our
book coupons.  We had erroneously bestowed upon ourselves the status of
second-class citizens because we had bought tickets in bulk.  Well, no
problem.  We probably saw a better film--although a really bad print--
as a result.
     THE ADVENTURES OF PRISCILLA, QUEEN OF THE DESERT
     This is a film that has gotten a lot of favorable critical comment
and that is in large part because it is a nice pleasant enjoyable film
that takes no chances beyond those obvious in the premise.  The story
is of three drag queens making a journey across the Australian desert
from Sydney to Alice Springs to make a performance engagement.  Knowing
that, about two-thirds of the script more or less writes itself on
auto-pilot.  Of course they run into bigots along the way and have a
violent scene with them.  Of course their gaudy show clothing looks
really strange on the backdrop of the desert.  Of course there are
conflicts among the three and some deep realizations along the way.  Of
course aborigines, children, and other people pure of heart accept them
without a second thought and it is mostly their parents and boozy men
in bars who have problems accepting them.  Of course every love song
will have a second interpretation when sung by this crowd.  (It is not
unlike the game of adding the phrase "in bed" to fortune cookie
fortunes.) This film is about as daring as wearing white socks with
black shoes and is certainly in no worse taste.  That aside, many of
the cliches it uses are cliches because they are entertaining and this
film that wants so much to be shocking is nothing more than light,
pleasant entertainment.
     Felicia, Mitzi, and Bernadette, born respectively Adam, Anthony,
and Ralph, played respectively by Guy Pearce, Hugo Weaving, and Terence
Stamp, dress in gaudy women's show clothing and mouth the lyrics of
popular songs.  Hey, it's a living.  The first two are drag queens
while Bernadette is a transsexual.  They have to get to Alice Springs
for an engagement so Felicia buys an old tour bus and christens it
"Priscilla, Queen of the Desert."  Tensions are constantly present as
they try to outdo each other in being catty to each other.  But the
first real strain on their relationship comes when Mitzi admits to
having a wife in Alice Springs.  Not too unpredictably the bus breaks
down and getting going again is a minor adventure in itself.
     Director Stephen Elliott has very little insightful to tell us
about drag queens.  I would like to assume that these people are
somewhat deeper than this film's slightly insulting behavior.  One, for
example, has as her great ambition to climb to the top of King's Canyon
in drag.  Elliott can tell his audience that this is an innocent enough
ambition but isn't he being insulting by making his character so
superficial?  Much has been made of the departure this film is for
Terence Stamp.  Until now he has played mostly straight-laced anal-
retentives.  Bernadette is not straight-laced but if anything she is
even more anal-retentive than Stamp's usual characters.
     This film is really little more daring than having Whoopi Goldberg
dress as a nun.  Unless you reject the well-labeled premise from the
start, you will probably find this a surprisingly wholesome feel-good
sort of film, a little strong on manipulation and weak on credibility
in spots, but rarely failing to entertain.  I found it to be about a +1
on the -4 to +4 scale.
     After the film we queued up to get the tickets for upcoming
showings.  We got near the door to enter the theater when an employee
of the theater came to fold the line with posts and velvet ropes.  One
placed a post to my left about two feet from the door and attached a
rope to it going back and another hooked to the doors to its left.
"That's not right," I thought.  The line shouldn't have a bend here.
This is where the line should end.  A second employee came out, saw the
same thing we did and tried to explain to the first why what he was
doing would not work.  The first employee went off to take down the
first rope.  The wiser rolled his eyes in an expression that
transcended the language barrier.  Eventually we got in and got tickets
for everything else we wanted to see.  Though it did not at first
appear so, Luck of Leeper was positive for once.  The weather could be
nicer, I suppose.  But ARCHITECTURE OF DOOM seemed to have
reverberations in PRISCILLA and also in our next film.
     There are many accusation made these days about the Jewish people.
It is claimed that they controlled the State Department... totally
untrue.  It is claimed they control banking and finance... also an
invention.  It is claimed they control the film industry.  Well, that
one really was true at one time.  They didn't just control it, they
WERE the film industry.  Jews invented it, often risking all they had
on it.  The major studios were all founded by Jews before there was a
film industry.  But unique among the major studios was Warner Brothers.
It was actually owned by a family.  They made running a studio a family
business.
     JACK L. WARNER is a television documentary made for one of the
Turner stations, written and directed by Gregory Orr, the son of a
step-daughter of Warner.  It covers much the same territory as the book
HOLLYWOOD BE THY NAME by Cass Sperling, another grandchild of Warner.
Orr's documentary style is workman-like, but the film benefits from
particularly interesting subject matter.  Warner's career spans the
film industry from the time of Edison's Kinetiscopes up through the
film 1776.
     The brothers were four of the five sons of a Polish shoemaker who
came to America fleeing the oppression of Cossacks.  The fledgling
cinema industry was the last of several businesses the boys tried,
first projecting, then exhibiting, then distributing, and finally
making films.  They might have remained just a minor studio that would
have quickly died but for their gamble on sound which made them into a
major studio.  The documentary covers their carving out a niche of
films appealing to the common people without the high gloss of an MGM.
Crime and gangster films were their mainstay.
     But while Jack was trying to appeal to the common viewer, his
second wife was building his house into a palace and price was no
object.  Orr says the studio made the first anti-Nazi feature film,
CONFESSIONS OF A NAZI SPY.  At the request of FDR they also made the
pro-Russian MISSION TO MOSCOW.  It was a favor they would come to
regret.  The film covers the war period, the decline in the post-war
era, Jack's cooperation with HUAC, and the power struggles at the
studio with their roots in the earliest family days.
     The documentary gets off to a slow start with Orr telling his
childhood reminiscences of the Warner mansion and showing an amateur
film he made as a boy.  That is the worst touch of the film and it is
over quickly enough.  But Orr continues to put himself too much into
the film.  There is also a disorienting effect from Orr taking events
in semi-chronological order, but straying once in a while.  We hear
CASABLANCA discussed before we are told about the studio's response to
the US getting involved in the war.
     Orr uses interviews of people famous and not so famous who knew
Jack Warner.  But the greatest insights come from Neal Gabler who seems
to put Warner into a context better than Orr can.  Also, of course,
there is a wealth of documentary footage, old home movies, and of
course clips from the films made.
     Gabler's insights include observations that the United States
seems to have gotten its image of itself from movies created by
outsiders, recent immigrants mostly.  Warner in particular made film
about characters a lot like himself: short, feisty underdogs, often
recently emigrated from Europe.  That description fits Cagney,
Robinson, Raft, and Muni.  Gabler cites the conflicts between Harry
Warner with his Old World ways and Jack Warner who was more a product
of the Americas.  This conflict is reflected in the rabbi and his son
in THE JAZZ SINGER.
     JACK L. WARNER, THE LAST MOGUL is nothing great, but how wrong can
it go in covering so much of the history of the American film industry
through one of its most pivotal figures?  It gets a tremendous boost
from the cinematic interest value.  My rating would be a low +1 on the
-4 to +4 scale.
     Montreal is a very good restaurant town.  There is a really good
ethnic mix of restaurants.  Dinners out so far have been "Smoked meat
Pizzaghetti."  For a Yankee like myself that name had the greatest
number of mysteries to unravel.  That turns out to be more segregated
than the title implies.  "Pizzaghetti" is just a small pizza with a
side of spaghetti.  For local food, a great favorite seems to be the
mysteriously named "smoked meat."  I am not used to ordering anything
with a name so vague.  (Even "hot dog" is specific if not accurate.)
Smoked meat turns out to be what we would call "corned beef."  At least
I hope so.  I think there was a horror film once called MOTEL HELL in
which food was similarly just called "meat" without being more
specific.  The meat turned out to be what the pirates used to call
"long pork" or "long John."  How many readers of TREASURE ISLAND
recognize the delicious irony of having a ship's cook named Long John
Silver?  But that is one heck of a digression.  Our second night was
had Arab fast food and our third night we had a nice meal of Hungarian
food.
     Our third day we again got to the theater early.  This time we met
while waiting a very kindred spirit.  He is into exotic cuisine,
philosophy, know mathematics, and of course he likes cinema.  Herb
Louis was his name (or perhaps Lewis) and he is the former head of a
philosophy department at a Canadian university.  He made some
restaurant recommendations that we will probably use.  I made a
reference to Evariste Galois and he knew a fair amount about him.
     The town is Amerigua, perhaps in Paraguay.  Maybe eighteen years
ago when it was little more than a few dirt farms, Colonel Banderas
murdered a discontented activist farmer in front of the eyes of the
farmer's family under the pretext that the farmer was a Communist.
Everisto, the farmer's young son, responded by attacking the Colonel,
then fleeing the country.  There have been many changes since then.
Now the country, while every bit as corrupt, pays lip service to the
ideals of democracy.  Still, the entire village lives in the shadow of
Colonel Banderas, now an important national figure.  Rather than justa
few farms Amerigua looks like a town.  It has a town hall; it has a
radio station.
     This is a big day in Amerigua.  There will be a big beauty pageant
in the evening where the village will choose the most beautiful woman
in the village.  Colonel Banderas has decided in the name of democracy
that just the right woman should win and will tell the judges whom they
must choose, once he finally makes up his mind if it should be his
daughter, his son's fiance, or his mistress.  Important people will be
coming to Amerigua, some on the morning train, and a Japanese diplomat
will be coming to town to be one of the judges.  The concert will be
sponsored by several international companies who trade in this country.
     But for a short prologue, the entire film takes place in one day
as we get to meet the village.  First we meet Innocencio, a nerdish
young radio reporter never seen without huge large earphones and a huge
microphone.  We see the preparations for the big day, and petty
political squabbles over what should be the color of the welcoming
carpet.  The various contestants waking up for the big day.  Front-
runner for the competition is Maria (who looks very much like Mary
Elizabeth Mastrantonio) engaged to the Colonel's son and due to be
married the same day as she vies for the title of Miss Amerigua.
Carmen, the Colonel's daughter is willful and spoiled.  Rosa,
Everisto's sister who does not get along with her mother, is now the
Colonel's mistress willing to do all she needs to in order to get out
of Amerigua.  Then there is Reencarnacion, the gay hairdresser with a
penchant for Tarot and the supernatural.
     There is something about a beauty pageant that reveals greed,
hypocrisy, superficiality, and vanity.  Something about women vying to
be chosen as the most beautiful just seems a natural target for satire.
Much of this film is reminiscent of Michael Ritchie's underrated SMILE.
But this film mixes into the cocktail heavy doses of politics and even
some fantasy.  This film is written in the style of magical realism in
which minor fantasy elements get mixed into the plot.  Minor touches
include a harp that refuses to be played and a bust that makes comments
on what it sees.
     Luis Vera's MISS AMERIGUA is a good satiric comedy, at times quite
funny, that deserves release in the US.  It needs a better job of
English subtitling, but with that it could do very nicely on the art
house circuit in the US.  I would rate it a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     The Desjardins Center is a shopping mall that also is a sort of
center of the film festival's activities.  An open area in the center
is given over to displays of film posters of films in the festival,
film art, and press conferences.  The film art look as lot like the
media art one sees in the art shows of science fiction conventions.  We
saw a conference with Michael Austin and Mark Abraham talking about
their film PRINCESS CARABOO.  The area was really full, but that was
because the second press conference scheduled was some American
comedian and actor named Steve Martin.  Uh, lest you be confused I
hasten to point out that is the actor's name and it has nothing to do
with the character Steve Martin, who was played by Raymond Burr in the
film classic GODZILLA, KING OF THE MONSTERS.  Apparently this comedian
picked the same name for recognition value.  The story for PRINCESS
CARABOO is apparently true, though some of the press questioned if
things could have happened like shown in the early 19th century.
     The next film is one that I do not expect to be of quite so higha
quality as the ones I have seen to this point.  I have a special
interest in fantasy films so I am curious to see anything new in that
field.  The catalog said a some intriguing things about TOM THUMB, but
how good can it be on that subject?
     The film BRAINSTORM had as one of the details of its plot that
there existed a tape such that if the person merely saw the tape it
could result in permanent psychosis.  Until I saw THE SECRET ADVENTURES
OF TOM THUMB I doubted that such a thing could exist.  This is a very
grim and dark fairy tale reminiscent of ERASERHEAD done with the
animation of NIGHTMARE BEFORE CHRISTMAS.  The film is mostly done in
model animation with some pixilated live-action and though the film is
only 61 minutes, it has the feel of a nightmare that goes on a lot
longer.
     The story takes place in a grimy fly-ridden future.  A mistake in
an artificial insemination factory leaves fly organs in a bottle of
sperm.  The result is that a laborer and his wife give birth to child
only six inches high.  They name him Tom.  Their joy is only short-
lived as two faceless Kafka-esque government agents break into the
laborers' flat and steal the child, taking him to a scientific lab
where sadistic experiments are performed on him.  Tom escapes down a
waste drain with the help of some bizarre skeleton creature he
befriends at the lab.  In the outside world he finds a race of small
people almost his scale.  They wage constant war against the humans--or
"giants" as they call them--who, oblivious to their existence, come
tramping through their neighborhoods causing terrible destruction.
     This film is mostly the creation of Dave Borthwick who directed,
wrote, and edited the film.  Together with Frank Passingham he also
animated the film and did the photography with animation techniques
very reminiscent of Czech films.  Here he creates a bleak and grimy
world of huge fascistic government agencies, troglodyte wage-slave
laborer citizens, and a secret society of tiny people.  His little
people live in constant terror of the oblivious humans.  In short, this
is a very good job of creating a very good film that is darn
discomforting to watch and that can be recommended to only a razor-
narrow audience.  THE SECRET ADVENTURES was my kind of film and I could
only barely stand the images I was seeing.  See this one if you dare
but don't bring your mother or your kids.  While I say that, I cannot
imagine where this film will find a distribution even in video stores.
It is too short to play as a feature film, too downbeat to show to
children, and too animated to get an adult audience.  This is a
challenging film but not totally without its rewards.  I rate it a high
+1 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     To fill out the time with a somewhat lighter film from the same
producers, Richard Hutchinson and his Bolexbrothers Ltd. have included
the nine-minute piece, "The Biz," which uses live-action people with
animated masks covering their faces.  This animated film is about a
cocktail party to honor Ed, whose new film was just screened to rave
reviews.  We see that various people who talk to Ed at the party.  The
masks help to show us what Ed is thinking and help to characterize the
other guests.  It also seems made for the BBC and would be a good film
to have included in one of Expanded Entertainment's International
Tournees of Animation.
     That was better than I expected it to be.  I suppose the fact that
the films are pre-screened and have to be selected will mean that it is
more likely that the films will be good.  Certainly I am averaging
higher ratings for films that I see here than I would for films I see
at home.  I have yet to see a film I have not liked.  Of course I have
to break that streak tonight since I will be going to a film I gave up
on after fifteen minutes the last time I tried it.  I will be going to
the free showing of WOODSTOCK.  Concert films are definitely not my
thing.  Certainly rock concerts film are not.  But before that I will
be seeing one of the most highly-recommended films showing here this
year.
     This is a film that already has rally stripes.  Tom Noonan wrote,
directed and starred in this film which he made for only $300,000 and
took only eleven days to shoot it.  They finished editing the film just
hours short of the deadline for entering it in the Sundance Film
Festival.  But the effort to get the film done in time was repaid.  At
Sundance it won the Waldo Salt screenwriting award and Grand Jury
prize.  Samuel Goldwyn snapped it up for an immediate profit.  Noonan's
face may be familiar to filmgoers for other films in which he has
acted.  He has played psychopathic killers in films like MANHUNTER (the
earlier of the two "Hannibal Lector films") and THE LAST ACTION HERO.
It is good to see him in a more normal role.
     WHAT HAPPENED WAS... is basically a one-act play for two people
produced as a film.  But for a few scenes at the beginning, the film is
all one scene taking place as it happens in front of the camera.  This,
however, is not to imply the film was made in a single take but it does
give the film a certain immediacy.  A woman has invited a co-worker to
her Manhattan apartment for dinner.  Both work in a legal office,
Jackie as a secretary, Michael as a paralegal.  She has been impressed
by his sense of humor and is intrigued by his apparent working on some
secret project of his own.  She has invited him to a candlelight dinner
at her apartment.  The evening begins very awkwardly.  Each has a
talent for choosing just the wrong thing to say to the other.  The date
appears not to be working out at all.  But on and off the wine seems to
be loosening each other up.  They begin trading confidences and
dropping defenses.  Eventually each will know more about the other than
either of them really want.
     Tom Noonan's Michael is controlled and systematic.  Karen Sillas's
Jackie lives with emotional tides that Michael has been able to
suppress in himself.  He is mechanical and she is disturbed.  Noonan's
script gives hints as to how each has gotten that way, but in the end
much is left to conjecture.  Both performances have impressive
authenticity.  My one complaint would be that film is not really the
proper medium for this script.  More appropriate would be the live
stage.  Noonan's direction intentionally makes little use of the
advantages that cinema has over the live stage while it certainly could
benefit from the additional intensity and immediacy that live
performances would have given it.  Making the film more cinematic would
probably have further sacrificed the immediacy.  Noonan at least does
not repeat Hitchcock's error in ROPE of trying to create immediacy by
simulating a single take.  In ROPE Hitchcock apparently realized the
technique became a distraction and he did not repeat his error in DIAL
M FOR MURDER.  Occasionally Noonan misjudges the pacing of his
material, but his direction was usually on-target.
     In spite of the critical acclaim this film is getting, it is not
nearly as original as the rumor mill would have it.  It was reminiscent
of other dramatic works and very similar to a play produced on PBS in
the 60s called, if memory serves, "Birdbath."  While falling short of
my expectations for the film, I would still give it a respectable high
+1 on the -4 to +4 scale.  You won't see much else like it in the
theaters soon.
     This is where a lot of people are going to discover they do not
agree with my taste, if they haven't already.
     Worm's-eye-view editorial: Traditional musical instruments do not
put out a sound that can be heard very great distances.  This is why
electrical amplification was invented.  It was intended to reflect with
fidelity the sound that the musical instruments were making.  They did
that within their designed range of amplification.  Go outside that
range and the sound would be distorted.  Often what you would get would
be a loud howl much like the howls of a person in pain.  Music is
supposed to evoke an emotional response in the listener.  But not every
sound that evokes an emotional response is music.  These howls which
had a definite pitch and which did evoke emotional responses--like
music did--came to be considered music.  Many musicians used electronic
distortion as an integral part of their music.  What helped immensely
with the acceptance of this sort of noise as music is that it often
carried with it a political message that was popular, even if less than
eloquent or more rhetorical than well-reasoned.  This is not to say the
message was wrong, but these were not very good arguments for their
point of view.  Jimi Hendrix did a version of the "Star-Spangled
Banner" at Woodstock that was made up entirely of electronic howls.  At
a time when America was probably making serious ethical mistakes
Hendricks was saying less-than-eloquently, "America bad!"  Atrocious
noise from someone who agrees with your politics does not constitute
music.
     Following WHAT HAPPENED WAS... we went to see what remained of the
director's cut of WOODSTOCK.  This was an outdoor showing and the area
was packed.  We sat on a hill to the side and watched.  We heard
basically something with a beat and a lot of audio distortion.  Joan
Baez then sang about Joe Hill.  I am not all that fond of her music,
but it does have melody.  However I did tell Evelyn that she should
decide if we stay or walk out, and the next performer was another
distortion artist whose beat we could feel on our backs as we went in
the opposite direction.

Title
Review for Cool World (1992)
   - The title has *got* to be a joke.  This is the ugliest and most uncool
     world I can imagine.  Gabriel Byrne must be mis-cast since he just does
     not seem freak-o enough to have imagined this world.  The parallel
     world would have anyone screaming to get out after fifteen minutes.
   - The idea that comic artists are really seeing a parallel universe is an
     old one.  I seem to remember in the 1960s they claimed that the current
     Flash lived in the same universe as the artists who drew the old Flash
     (the one with the Mercury helmet).  but the old Flash was really in a
     parallel universe.  And I'm pretty sure the idea goes at least as far
     back as 1930s fantasy.
   - Cardboard scenery seems out of place.  Cool World should be made of
     pure animation and live action.  The cardboard scenery makes no sense.
   - There are a few clever little satires on other animated films and
     perhaps a good line or two, but the incoherent story just is not very
     interesting.  It's a pity, since at least initially the concept seemed
     more complex and interesting than that of WHO FRAMED ROGER RABBIT.
   - Harris in 1945 is seeing a world that is in a cartoon style that would
     not be invented for another twenty years.  He would be used to
     animation of the Fleischer and Disney schools.  That should make the
     Cool World seem even more alien to him.

Title
Review for Small Time Crooks (2000)
     Woody Allen has been riding on his reputation for several of
his most recent films.  After several good films in the 1980s,
crowned by CRIMES AND MISDEMEANORS, his 1990s film crop seemed one
disappointment after another.  At least in my opinion, BULLETS OVER
BROADWAY was his only above average film in that time.  SMALL TIME
CROOKS is the best film he has done since BULLETS OVER BROADWAY.  It
still is a lackluster situation comedy that leaves one feeling one
has seen a Honeymooners comedy.
     Ray Winkler (played by Woody Allen) is just what the title
calls him, a small time crook.  He constantly bickers with his wife
Frenchy (Tracy Ullman), a former exotic dancer, who verbally bests
him at every turn.  Currently Ray has a plan for how to get big
money.  He knows of a bank that has an abandoned pizzeria just two
door down.  The pizzeria is for rent and he and some of his friends
intend to rent the building and to use the basement as a start point
to tunnel into the bank.  Frenchy tells him that he and his henchmen
are just too stupid to pull the plan off.  But she finally agrees to
provide a front for the gang.  She will run a cookie store out of
the building above the building where they are digging.  Things go
from bad to worse for the boys since none of them knows how to dig a
tunnel or to follow the map that tells them where to dig.  The
bumblers seem to make every possible mistake.  Causing even more
problems is the cookie-baking operation which is rapidly becoming
more effort than digging the tunnel.  The team brings in May (Elaine
May), a half-witted cousin of Frenchy, to help with the cookie
operation.  This makes things only worse.  Still an odd turn of
events leaves the Winklers with a great deal of money.  Suddenly
they are thrust into high society, but Frenchy is afraid that her
low origins have left her, well, vulgar.  She decides she and Ray
must learn about culture.  Ray feels more at home playing poker.
The issue will eventually drive a wedge between the two.
     Indeed, any plot which juxtaposes the nouveau riche with older
money will invite some interpretation as social criticism.  Allen,
however, is no F. Scott Fitzgerald and a 96-minute film is not the
best medium for such comparisons in any case.  We see a very small
spectrum of the old money people and their reactions to the
Winklers.  However most of the points made are subtle or blunted.
Whatever insights are gained are small payoff for even so short a
story.  The writing is at its best, and still not so very good, when
the Winklers are bickering.  This writing is not really funny, but
it is occasionally smart and the lines come fast.
     Tracy Ullman is probably Allen's best acting partner in quite a
while.  As the harpy-turned-social-climber she is the best thing
about this film.  Second best is not even Allen but Elaine May.  The
character May plays is by now a familiar one for her, but it is
still a pleasure to see her acting.  There are those who say that
the writing of SMALL TIME CROOKS is like the old Woody Allen.  It
does not strike me that way, but there is one reminder of the older
Allen films.  Once again Allen is playing a loser and that is really
what he does best.  It may not be the real Woody Allen, but he is at
his funniest as nebbish, not as a winner.  The film is full of
distinguished-looking people playing the denizens of high society
whom I feel I should have recognized.  I didn't.
     It is hard to walk out of SMALL TIME CROOKS believing I had
seen a film I will remember in another month.  For one afternoon
there was some amusement.  I rate it a 5 on the 0 to 10 scale and a
low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Mother (1996/II)
     There is a very selective appeal to Albert Brooks comedies.  They
are low-budget, intelligently written pieces in which the humor mostly
comes from dialogue.  Like Woody Allen, Brooks usually plays an
intelligent neurotic and the comedy ordinarily comes from the dialogue
as it does in a Woody Allen comedy.  Where Brooks differs is that his
characters speak in a much more natural manner than Allen's and his
humor is more subtle.  Also his comedies often take a little longer to
settle in.  It is hard to judge on a first viewing how funny an Albert
Brooks comedy will be the second time around.  Usually like a
Thanksgiving turkey they are a feast the first time around but are not
at their best until the second or third partaking.  Then some of his
gags take on classic proportions.  Bits like forbidding Julie Hagerty
to use the words "nest" or "egg" are hilarious and at the same time
ring very true.
     That said, MOTHER is just a bit substandard for a Brooks-directed
comedy.  Brooks usually uses as a format the experiment that fails--the
good idea gone awry.  Of five Brooks comedies, only DEFENDING YOUR LIFE
does not fall into this "it seemed like a good idea at the time"
pattern.  In MODERN ROMANCE the Brooks character decides to break up
with a woman and then finds the single life is not all he was
expecting.  LOST IN AMERICA involved a wealthy advertising executive
who drops out, buys a Winnebago, and tries to live on the road.  This
time around, in what could have almost been a sequel to MODERN ROMANCE,
John Henderson (Brooks) is a man who cannot deal with the women in his
life.  To understand why he returns to the home of his mother (Debbie
Reynolds) to live in his old bedroom, decorated just like the old days,
in an attempt to discover what he will learn.  What he finds is that
his mother is hard to live with.  Eventually he discovers why his
relationship with his mother has been strained. But while the reason
satisfies him, it turns out to be a not very satisfying or even
interesting contrivance. Most people I know have problems to some
degree in dealing with their parents not unlike those in this film, but
Brooks's rather pat explanation for his case just does not explain very
much of the problem.  If the mother-son problems are dispelled a little
too easily, at least the script does not place all the blame on the
mother.  Beatrice Henderson comes off as an intelligent and self-
reliant woman who can run her own life just fine, thank you, and who
once raised two bright kids, John and his brother (Rob Morrow of QUIZ
SHOW).
     While I have come to expect a fair amount of a Brooks comedy,
somehow here his timing seemed just a bit off.  A scene early in the
film has John rearranging the one chair that his divorce has left him
in a large empty living room.  He tries the chair in four places before
deciding that it worked best where it was.  The joke takes too much
screen time for way too little payoff.  This is not the sort of
perceptive humor we expect from Brooks.  Later, when he is in his
mother's home, the film tries to milk as much humor as possible from
his mother freezing a big chunk of cheese and a salad.  These gags are
more miss than hit in this film's hit-and-miss humor.  On the other
hand, there is some perceptive humor in Beatrice's repeated references
to writer John's lack of Stephen-King-like success in his writing
profession and the greater success of her other son, the sports agent.
There are a number of very clever gags including a very impressively
managed allusion to the film THE GRADUATE--telling any more would spoil
it.  Like Woody Allen, Brooks seems to play the same character from
film to film.  Reynolds is, of course, a veteran actress.  She holds
her own against Brooks.  One minor gripe: in MODERN ROMANCE the
character was editing a science fiction film, in this film John is a
science fiction writer, but in each film he seems to be very
condescending toward science fiction.  In his most recent novel they
talk about the character "with the big head" and the one "with the big
hand."  It is hard to imagine he could make a living writing science
fiction if he is writing at the level suggested in the film.
     Since Brooks directs a comedy only once in about five years, it is
a pity that this film is so frequently not up to his usual standard.
His comedy about a mother and son learning about each other could have
been a lot more memorable than this one was, but there are still more
laugh-out-loud gags than most comedies, and there is a bit of a
statement here also, so I give MOTHER a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Seven Years in Tibet (1997)
     For millennia Tibet has been protected from intrusion by the
tallest guards in the world, the Himalayan Mountains.  There in the 7th
Century A.D. a culture all but unremembered first mixed with Chinese
culture. Until relatively recent history it was a culture that was so
isolated that it could go its own way and not be very much influenced
by any other culture in the world.  SEVEN YEARS IN TIBET tells the true
story of two Austrian climbers who happened to be in Tibet during its
years of fastest change, probably the only Europeans in the country at
the time.
     In Austria of 1939 lives Heinrich Harrer (played by Brad Pitt), a
world-renowned Olympic athlete, a member of the Nazi Party as a matter
of style, and a totally selfish boy-man.  He abandons his pregnant
wife--who is nearly due to give birth--over her objection and he goes
on a four-month climbing expedition in the Himalayas.  His first shock
is to discover that the expedition will be led by an awkward-looking
climber, Peter Aufschnaiter (David Thewlis).
     Harrer determines to undermine the ungainly man's authority and to
make himself the star of the expedition for the press.  His little
battle only gets him into trouble, first of the sides of the mountain
to be climbed, then when war breaks out in Europe the troop of climbers
are captured by the British in India and imprisoned in a POW camp.
Harrer fights a two-front war against the British imprisoning him and
against Aufschnaiter's authority.  Eventually Harrer and Aufschnaiter
escape from the camp, lead the British a chase through India, and flee
across the border into Tibet, a country officially closed to
foreigners.  The two lie their way into the capital city of Lhasa, a
beautiful mountainside city forbidden to any non-Tibetans.  After some
time there dealing with the bureaucracy of monks, Harrer is given
counsel with the Dalai Lama.  The great lama, still a young boy, finds
he likes the brash German.  Harrer becomes a friend, confidant, and
teacher to the boy.  The warm relationship between the two forms the
core of the film.  But their relationship is cut off when the country
is virtually stolen by invading Chinese Communist troops.
     There has been discussion on whether this was a good role for Brad
Pitt or not.  As the supercilious Heinrich who finds his humanity by
loving Tibet, Pitt was fairly believable.  I had the feeling that if I
had never seen him before I would not have thought twice about whether
this part was right for him.  In fact associations with previous films
were about the only thing that got in the way of the credibility of the
story. We have people like Victor Wong of THE JOY LUCK CLUB and BIG
TROUBLE IN LITTLE CHINA; Mako of CONAN THE BARBARIAN; and B. D. Wong,
whom we saw around the incubator in JURASSIC PARK and flitting around
in FATHER OF THE BRIDE.  It almost makes the film seem less Asian to
see these actors present.  David Thewlis has turned in one good
performance after another over the last four years since he stood out
in Mike Leigh's NAKED.  The Dalai Lama, played by three boys of varying
age, seems not so much a font of wisdom as an unending source of simple
straightforward curiosity, mostly about Western culture.  Jetsun Pema,
who plays the Dalai Lama's mother is in reality the Dalai Lama's
sister.  The film is directed by Jean-Jacques Annaud, who directed THE
NAME OF THE ROSE and THE BEAR.  As with the former, the setting is main
attraction of the film.
     One disappoint of the film is that the actual time covered in
Tibet is shortened by a long introductory section.  The screenplay by
Becky Johnston spends nearly half of the film just getting Harrer and
Aufschnaiter to Lhasa so that the story from that point forward seems
rushed.  Most of the adventure, however, is in the first hour, with
some harrowing scenes of mountain climbing.  The stories of escapes,
bound by the truth, seem almost cliched.  John Williams spices the
score with eerie Tibetan music.  I rate the film a +2 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Untouchables, The (1987)
     There are lots of ways to make a gangster film.  You can make it as
realistic as THE GODFATHER or as romanticized as A POCKET FULL OF MIRACLES.
You can do a BONNIE AND CLYDE where the crooks are giants and the cops are
midgets, or you can make the crooks vermin and the cops squeaky-clean
personifications of purity and virtue as was done in THE FBI STORY and the
TV show THE UNTOUCHABLES.  Brian DePalma did one gangster already with tiny
cops and giant hoods, his violent but engrossing remake of SCARFACE.  He has
returned to the gangster film with a movie based on the UNTOUCHABLES TV
series and the book by Elliot Ness and Oscar Fraley that the TV series was
based on.  His approach is romanticized to the point of being mythic.  The
hoods are big and the cops are giants.  Even a mousy accountant for the
Treasury Department who is impressed into service turns out to be a giant.
And a film adaptation of a TV show surprisingly turns out to be giant too.
     The story should come as no surprise to anyone.  An ambitious Treasury
agent,Elliot Ness (played by Kevin Costner), comes to Chicago to bring down
an oily Al Capone (played by Robert DeNiro).  When he realizes he is still
wet behind the ears, he calls for the assistance of one  good Irish cop
(played by Sean Connery) and, with the help of a few friends, they set about
hewing down the biggest tree in the underworld jungle.  When the film works
best, mostly in the first half of the film, it is a positive joy.  Toward
the second half, I started to realize what I was enjoying is a story about
the groovy side of the Secret Police and that Connery's honest and pure
philosophy of law enforcement was actually a pretty scary thing.
     But David Mamet's screenplay captures the fun of the TV series.  When
Ness drives a huge snowplow through warehouse doors to smash up shipments of
illegal booze, you know you're watching the real thing eight times bigger
than life.  Though, admittedly, the film's most exciting sequence harks back
more to Westerns than to gangster films.  And the whole package is done to a
score by Ennio Morricone, sometimes tense, sometimes flamboyant, sometimes
arrogant.
     Now, as for the film's accuracy, yes, there really was an Elliot Ness
and he was a Treasury agent.  There really was an Al Capone and a Frank
Nitti and they were crooks.  And Al Capone really was indicted for income
tax evasion.  Of course, most people knew all that already, and Mamet and
DePalma are counting on most people knowing no more than that, because just
about everything else is wrong.  Ness's accomplishments were exaggerated by
newspaper accounts of the day and much more so by his autobiography and by
the TV show.  Nobody has ever portrayed Frank Nitti accurately in anything.
Nitti was one of Capone's lieutenants whom the newspapers thought ran
Capone's gang when Capone went to jail.  That squares with neither the TV
nor the film version.  Capone's representation is neither accurate nor
inaccurate.  We just don't see much of his strategy in the film.
     But with all its faults, THE UNTOUCHABLES is a big film, an exciting
film, and it will likely be the big film of the summer.  Rate it a +2 on the
-4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Mumford (1999)
     Films like PLEASANTVILLE have questioned time-honored American
small town values.  But traditionally American films have given us
idealized representations of American small town life.  Generally in
American films small towns are where good people live and work.  Films
like SHADOW OF A DOUBT have intentionally shown small town life as
really being the American ideal. Hitchcock intentionally played up the
theme in SHADOW OF A DOUBT to show wartime audiences that small town
life was what Americans were fighting for.  Films like DOC HOLLYWOOD
press the idea that if you get to know the American small town you are
bound to like it and the people in it.  MUMFORD is a similar film
extolling the virtues of the small town life.  DOC HOLLYWOOD was about
the outsider trying to leave the small town but falling in love with
the town instead.  MUMFORD is a variation in which the outsider already
loves the town and really wants to stay in the small town in spite of
forces to make him leave.
     MUMFORD opens with a sequence that looks like it was from some
luscious, steamy 1940s James M. Cain film adaptation.  Are we in the
right movie?  Yes.  We are in the fantasy life of the Mumford town
pharmacist.  The strong, handsome young man of the fantasy turns out to
be plump, balding and nearly blind in real life. He is on the couch
talking to bland, handsome psychologist Dr. Mumford (played by Lorn
Dean).  Doc Mumford is disarmingly pleasant and affable.
     Through most of the first third of the film we get to know the
unorthodox doctor and about six of his cases.  We watch how he goes
about treating them.  Among them are Althea Brockett (Mary McDonnell)
who lives in luxury but is becoming a compulsive buyer.  Young Skip
Skipperton (Jason Lee) skateboards through traffic and runs the most
successful modem company in the world.  Emotionally he is still a child
just looking for a buddy with whom to talk and play catch.  Then there
is Sofie Crisp (Hope Davis) an attractive divorcee who is living with
her parents and developing Chronic Fatigue Syndrome.  Mumford's
treatment in each case seems to be in equal parts pleasant conversation
and intuitive pop psychology.  Sooner or later he seems to get each of
his patients up to a nice place in the hills he knows of that has an
impressive overlook of the town. Kasdan's approach to getting to the
story is as unhurried and even as pleasant as life in the American
small town of the title.
     Ernest Delbanco (David Paymer) and Phyllis Sheeler (Jane Adams), a
psychiatrist and a psychologist, do not mind that the newcomer is more
successful than they are, but have some reservations about his style.
But we too start to notice something a little off in the psychologist's
style.  In shooting the breeze with his patients Mumford may
indiscreetly talk about his other cases.  Often his comments to his
patients are a little more direct and frank than we might expect.  He
bones up on the Internet for some surprisingly basic psychological
information.  He also takes an immediate dislike to town lawyer Lionel
Dillard (Martin Short).  It may well be that Doc Mumford may have some
problems of his own, psychological and otherwise.
     In telling his story, Kasdan uses some unorthodox approaches.  The
primary story line is delayed well into the film and then only half-
heartedly visited now and again.  What drives the film is not the pace
of the plot.  Instead, one wants to see each of the cases Dr. Mumford
is treating and how a simple intuitive approach works to solve
problems.  Nor is the cast a particularly high-powered one.  Loren
Dean, who played the title role in BILLY BATHGATE and was an
investigator in GATTACA, is likeable and inoffensive, but he borders on
being insipid and never generates much dramatic tension.  Alfre Woodard
is under-used as a friend and neighbor of Doc Mumford.  Woodard
previously shared with Mary McDonnell the films BLUE CHIPS, PASSION
FISH, and GRAND CANYON.  Martin Short is slightly abrasive as the town
lawyer.  Jason Lee as town entrepreneur may be familiar as the clueless
Banky from CHASING AMY.
     This will not be one of Kasdan's more memorable scripts, but it is
certainly a pleasant way to spend an hour or two.  I rate it a 6 on the
0 to 10 scale and a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Smoke (1995)
     All is not what it seems with SMOKE.  This is not a film that is
about the people who know Auggie Wren, though one could be fooled into
thinking that really was the subject of the film.  Really this is a
film about story-telling and what makes a good story.  Like SHORT CUTS,
SMOKE is a collection of short stories.  It has no main plot but rather
several subplots unfolding at the same time, mostly revolving around
the wise and worldly Auggie Wren, operator of the Brooklyn Cigar
Company, a small smoke shop.  Auggie runs into a broad cross-section of
humanity while running the shop and he is a natural-born story-teller.
One has the feeling, though the film never says it, that we are seeing
not reality but Auggie's enhanced versions of the stories.  Each story
seems a little too much like a polished Auggie story to be taken
literally.  Only as we get toward the end of the film do we get an
inkling about why that is and while it is open to interpretation, in my
opinion it is probably that we are one more level removed from the
characters than we are in most films.  Auggie is telling us these
stories in his own style.  And we might expect that sort of subtle
playfulness from a screenplay by Paul Auster, the author of the
enigmatic novel THE MUSIC OF CHANCE, recently adapted to film.  Auster
is also the author of "Auggie Wren's Christmas Story," which actually
appears in the film, though there it is written by the character Paul
Benjamin (a penname Auster has used).  So apparently Auster has written
himself into the story or perhaps he is just subtly playing with us
again.
     The film has a complex chain of simple stories.  Auggie (played
casually with open shirt by Harvey Keitel) has a favorite customer Paul
(William Hurt), a once-good writer who has not been able to get his
life together since the loss of his wife.  His life is saved by
troubled black teenager Rashid (Harold Perrineau, Jr.) who later sets
out to find his (Rashid's) missing father Cyrus (Forest Whitaker).
Meanwhile Auggie's ex-lover Ruby (Stockard Channing) shows up with
demands on Auggie.
     Auster has a hypnotic story telling style that makes the viewer
want to just go along for the ride, though after the fact the stories
seem more contrived than they originally seemed.  There are certain
symmetries in the stories, reminiscent of those that director Wayne
Wang had in his previous film THE JOY LUCK CLUB.  Certain plot elements
show up repeatedly in the stories.  Parent-child relationships seem to
show up in many different forms.  Stolen goods that end up going for a
good purpose is another repeated plot element.
     Adam Holender's camerawork manages to capture a certain charm to
the streets of what could have been a tense area of New York.  And
Wang's style combines with Auster's style and Rachel Portman's music to
make this a warm, if somewhat paradoxical film.  I give it a high +1 on
the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Abbaleh, Bo L'Luna Park (1994)
     Our fourth day is starting a bit rainy.  The nice thing about a
film festival is that if we get tired of all this cinema we can,
without guilt, just say "the heck with it" and go to the movies.  In
line for MESMER I am holding an umbrella over my head and Evelyn's.
There is room for a third so I edge over to include the woman ahead of
us in line.  We start a conversation and she is a Peruvian.  Her
husband who went off to get a pass to the film works for the National
Film Board of Canada and we get to talk with him about the board.  We
are particularly fond of Canadian animation like "Hot Stuff" and "The
Big Snit."  One of the things I ask to know a little more about is a
character who seems to run through a lot of Canadian animation.  It is
a cat who has shown up in many different National Film Board animations
and of late I have seen even on bags of potato chips.  That strikes me
as odd since the different filmmakers rarely use the same invented
character.  Apparently the cat was introduced in "The Cat Came Back,"
which I assume is based on the song about the unwanted cat who keeps
returning to his owner after the owner tries more and more desperate
measures to be rid of the thing.  The cat was used in other animations
and now seems to be a trademark of films in a given style from the Film
Board.  The Board is a non-profit government agency and which ran into
some controversy when private companies wanted to start using the cat
figure, like the potato chip company.  I imagine the controversy was
not what to do with the profits, though that entered into it, but would
this appear to be a government endorsement.
     Present for the premiere of MESMER were director Roger
Spottiswoode and Alan Rickman.  Rickman was very popular with the
audience.  He is a major film actor after playing in a particularly
good villain in DIE HARD, as well as appearing in CELLO (a.k.a. TRULY,
MADLY, DEEPLY), and the somewhat over-the-top sheriff in ROBIN HOOD,
PRINCE OF THIEVES.  (Though in that film Rickman had Costner to act as
a lightning rod.  Most audiences found it jarring to have Costner talk
with an American accent.  He certainly should have known what the
English accent sounds like.  It is what Nazis or ancient Greeks and
Romans sound like in so many films.  In any case it is probably
Rickman's worst performance, though the fault is more in that wretched
script.)
     Of course, having the director or even an actor on hand to discuss
the film could be very interesting, but that is what the press
conferences are for.  I guess that the audience likes to just see the
people involved with a film.  Ironically, actors are more popular than
directors.  Audiences get a real thrill seeing actors in their three-
dimensional form, particularly someone like Rickman who has been good
in some popular roles.  The directors come and say a few words and
usually disappear.  I suppose some can be looking at audience reaction
and some may go off for coffee.  Only a couple that I have seen so far
have been answering questions about the film afterward and I think that
the theaters discourage that behavior, since they have to follow a
schedule.  Generally the introductions are short.  Rickman welcomed the
audience in French and then translated into English saying "I THINK I
just said..."
     [A note on the following.  This review is being written at the
Montreal Film Festival.  I do not have materials to research Franz
Anton Mesmer so what dubious historical knowledge I have of Mesmer, I
have to take from the film.]  Roger Spottiswoode has directed films as
good as UNDER FIRE and last year's AND THE BAND PLAYED ON.  His lesser
films include TURNER AND HOOCH and STOP OR MY MOM WILL SHOOT.  His
latest is an odd film about one of history's more enigmatic
personalities, Franz Anton Mesmer, whose name has passed into common
usage for "mesmerism," a word used synonymously with "hypnotism."  It
is not clear, however, that the force Mesmer called "animal magnetism"
is hypnotism.  In Dennis Potter's screenplay what Mesmer uses does not
appear to be hypnotism or really any other technique as applied today.
Just how he cures pain is something mystical that would probably today
be ascribed to "power of suggestion."  But this had to have been a real
revelation in a time when the recommended treatment for hysteria-
related ailment was slicing the patient's arm and bleeding the patient
until he was no longer strong enough to be hysterical.
     The film opens with a tribunal of Paris doctors examining the
heretical techniques of Mesmer.  Unfortunately, the unfriendly medical
tribunal of hide-bound doctors is an all-too-familiar film stereotype
going back to the Frederic March DR. JEKYLL AND MR. HYDE.  It starts
the film on a false note.  Mesmer is apparently reviewing in his memory
his own career and most of the story is told in flashback--also a bit
cliched.
     We find ourselves in Vienna sometime in the 1770s.  Mesmer is
already a controversial character: he cures the poor, or at least tries
to, in mystical ceremonies that often seem to work.  His approach is so
radically different from those of his contemporaries that he is
considered to be a charlatan.  Yet surprisingly often his methods are
effective.  Since Mesmer offers his services to the poor free and
rarely has a paying patient he must operate on funds provided by his
wealthy wife.  His wife and his dim-witted son or stepson are losing
their respect for the unsuccessful Mesmer.
     At a recital, famous blind pianist Marie Therese Paradis has a
hysterical fit.  The physicians want to bleed her right there in front
of the recital audience, but Mesmer finds he can calm her with his
mystical "animal magnetism" techniques.  Paradis becomes Mesmer's
patient and develops an emotional need for his attention and
treatments.  Parallels could be drawn to religious cults and indeed the
script sees Mesmer not so much as a hypnotist as perhaps a faith
healer.  The plot centers on Mesmer's treatment of Paradis and later
his career in a decadent Paris where he specializes in helping the rich
with complex mystical ceremonies.  Finally the French medical
establishment, no more receptive than the Austrians, calls upon Mesmer
to prove he is not a charlatan.  Through much of the film I found
myself wondering where Mesmer's theories had originated.
     There are several problems with the script, but absolutely nothing
wrong with Rickman's performance.  Mesmer should be charismatic and
hypnotic--in a word, "mesmerizing"--and pulls off his performance with
aplomb.  With the proper handling of the film, this could be Rickman's
best remembered performance.  Amanda Ooms as Maria Therese Paradis
brings to her role a sort of otherworldly quality.  Michael Nyman's
score is not memorable but it does create a proper mood.
     Spottiswoode occasionally seems to exaggerate on the side of the
melodramatic, though when dealing with a figure like Mesmer, can one be
sure?  Scenes of his cure techniques have a wild madhouse feel.  There
are sensationalist and bloody scenes of opening veins and bleeding
patients of a style one might find from Hammer Films of Britain.
     This is a spotty film with moments of real intelligence as well as
moment of pure sensationalism.  Initially I gave it a lower rating, but
on consideration I would rate it a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.
Dennis Potter, considered an influential force in British drama,
unfortunately did not live to see the film based on his script
completed.  He died last May.
     A word or two about the ideas of this film that might constitutea
spoiler.  For me the techniques used by Mesmer are so bizarre a major
attraction of the film would have been to find out the origin of
Mesmer's ideas.  Dennis Potter's script apparently was written
intending to tantalize the viewer with just that specific question.  He
structures the film to save that revelation for the final lines of the
film and then answers the question with a fascinating paradox.  It is
almost as if power of suggestion invented itself.  Mesmer is so
convinced that pain could not exist without a means to alleviate it
that he has used power of suggestion on himself to convince himself
there must be something like power of suggestion.  The other
interesting question the script plays with is, if you do not cure a
patient, but only make the patient imagine that he is cured, have you
not in fact cured the patient?  As a personal example I suffer badly
from the common cold unless I take Vitamin C.  If I do take the vitamin
the cold is usually very light by comparison.  I am told that VitaminC
does not help a cold, to which I respond it may be true, but I really
value the illusion that it is helping.
     MESMER played with "Intact," a short film by Turkish director
Seyhan Cecilya Derin.  It is about a Turkish woman whose family has
arranged a marriage for her falsely convincing her intended that she is
still a virgin.  Now they are arranging a medical operation to give him
the illusion that she was.  The main character is not happy being
treated as a commodity but meets another Turkish woman at the clinic
who has a different outlook on the operation.  The film touches on
themes of personal freedom and self-worth.
     I probably would have like to go for the press conference at 2PM
but we had tickets for MEN LIE opposite it.
     The title pretty much tells it all in this hypocritical anti-male
diatribe packaged as a light comedy.  John Andrew Gallagher has turned
from making the kinds of films cable services run at midnight to a
feature-length diatribe which brings less and not more understanding to
his issue.
     There are basically three kinds of scenes in MEN LIE.  There are
interview scenes with women claiming that men are shitheels.  There are
scenes of men weakly defending their behaving like shitheels.  And
there is the wafer-thin story of Scott (played by Doug DeLuca) who acts
like a shitheel after getting advice from other shitheels on how it is
done.  The joke that keeps repeating itself is to have a woman say
Scott will act like a jerk and then, sure enough, the script has him do
just that.  If the same film were made with women as the target or
blacks or just about any ethnic group it would be obvious that this
film is hate propaganda, but by targeting men it can be considered a
blow for women's liberation and will find a ready and even anxious, if
not very discerning, audience.
     (What little story there is the following paragraph may spoil.)
Scott has a perfect girlfriend, Jill (played by Ellia Thompson), but
like a jerk he cheats on her every chance he gets.  His uncle, who is
an unsavory lawyer, gives him a lot of advice on how to be a more
competent jerk.  Jill's friends warn her that Scott is a jerk and a
louse, but Jill foolishly loves Scott.  She catches him once, but he
apologizes then continues to cheat.  When she catches him a second
time, she ends their relationship.  Scott says he has learned a lesson
but is a jerk with his next girlfriend as well.  That's not a very
exciting plot, but it really is all there is to this film.  Repeatedly
the laughs come from Scott doing exactly what one of his detractors
predicted.  Supposed laughs also come from men using supposedly
standard male tactics like Scott blaming Jill's anger on PMS.
     Being fair, there are two male characters in the film who seem to
be presented in a positive light.  There are no women who are portrayed
as being anything worse than gullible or angry.  Also in fairness, the
stereotypical male jerk as presented does have some basis in reality,
but men do not have a monopoly on being jerks, and the stereotypes here
have no more validity than other ethnic hate-stereotypes.
     Generally the acting is sufficient, but there are at least two
scenes in which it was jarringly bad.  This is a bad film that is
riding a political wave that is just about the only thing that would
make it acceptable to anyone.  By far this is the worst film I have
seen at this festival.
     Some of the few on-target jokes in the film concern a character
who insists on seeing female nudity in the films he rents from
videostores.  Gallagher may not be happy about this form of
exploitation, but, hey, business is business so he includes exploitive
sex scenes in this film.  I wonder if he also felt bad about
exploitation of women when he made BEACH HOUSE and POSED FOR MURDER.
     MEN LIE has crude production values, a very flat plot, and perhaps
a chuckle or two.  For the sake of a couple of decent chuckles I rate
this one a low -1 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     That answers my question about whether or not being shown at the
festival guarantees that a film will be good.  Somebody must have liked
it--it got a good review from Joe Leydon of "The Houston Post."  I
don't know who that is.
     The evening film was THE ADVOCATE and it was introduced by Leslie
Megahey, the writer director and by Lysette Anthony.  She had a
smallish comic role in the film.  I know the name, but don't remember
where I have seen her before.  Oh, to have Internet access here!
     The year is 1452 and Paris lawyer Richard Courtois is tired of the
legal entanglements and corruption of city law.  He wants to use his
talents to help common people, so he and his clerk Mathieu travel to
the small town of Abbeville.  There he indeed finds that law is
different, though no better and in some ways a lot weirder.  Rural law
cases involve accusations of witchcraft, devil pacts, and sodomy with
animals.  And the law extends to human and animal alike.  If a farmer
is shown to have had sex with his donkey, both might be hung on the
same gibbet.  Animals may also be called to court to be sworn as
witnesses.  One of Courtois's first cases is a very bizarre "murder
trial," at least by modern standards.  Today such an incident would not
fall under the category of murder, but we are looking at a very
different culture.  Incidentally, the case really did get tried as it
is portrayed in the film according to historical records.  It seems at
first like a ludicrous and trivial court action until Courtois starts
sensing that the state's case is invented and may be a part of a larger
conspiracy.
     THE ADVOCATE is a film with a lot going for it.  First and
foremost is the setting.  Years go by between good films set in so
remote a historical period.  Even without a good plot the historical
detail by itself would keep this film intriguing.  The historic detail
that gives the film its texture and gives a feel of being very well
researched.  The viewer is consistently astonished by the differing
attitudes and life-style of the 1400s.  Unfortunately too often the
attitudes we see are a mix of that century's and our own.  Similarly to
THE NAME OF THE ROSE, the photography often appears inspired by the
master artists of the time like Breugel and Bosch.  The peasants look
grizzled and a bit grotesque.
     But beyond the historical detail the plot is also enjoyable by
itself.  The mystery is not one of the best or most unpredictable, but
it is likely to keep the audience guessing.  THE ADVOCATE is at once an
intriguing mystery film and a well-written drama with comedic
overtones.  One historical detail that the film makes clear is that in
the Middle Ages people were a good deal less sensitive about being seen
without clothing.  That, however, tends to make me suspect it would get
some editing before American public television would show it.  But
clearly it seems intended for some wide audience because of a major
budget and a cast of familiar actors including Colin Firth in the title
role, Ian Holm as a likable but corrupt local priest, Donald Pleasance
as Abbeville's other attorney, Michael Gough as town judge, and Nicol
Williamson thoroughly enjoying his role as a local lord.
     THE ADVOCATE was written and directed by Leslie Megahy, a director
nearly unknown in the United States but who has made several TV movies
for the BBC.  This is his first feature film and deserves attention.
My rating would be a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     That was probably the best film so far.  Certainly it was the most
enjoyable, though MESMER left me with more to think about.  It is a
pity that there are not more Medieval mystery films like THE NAME OF
THE ROSE and THE ADVOCATE.  I guess it is surprising there aren't more
considering how often you hear about Medieval mystery plays; it is
surprising more have not been made into films.  [On the Internet that
last line is e-mail bait.  I expect a megabyte or two of e-mail from
well-meaning but humorless people explaining to me what a Medieval
mystery play is and about eight items explaining to me what an idiot I
am for not knowing!]
     The fourth day started with THE STORY OF YUNNAN.  From this point
on we did not learn anything especially novel about the fest, so the
balance of reviews follow.
     Mainland Chinese films are generally a fairly bleak lot.  On the
whole life in China is fairly harsh.  Between the living conditions and
the politics, the people in their own films do not seem to lead very
happy lives.  It is unusual to find a Chinese film that is uplifting or
inspiring, but THE STORY OF YUNNAN, directed by Zhang Nuanxing, is a
sort of Chinese KEYS TO THE KINGDOM.  Shizu, a Japanese woman, was
living with her family in Manchuria when the Japanese lost the war.  In
the ensuing chaos she finds herself alone in a hostile country.  She
attempts cutting her wrists, but is stopped by a sympathetic Chinese
soldier who sends her to a hospital.  Two years later she is a hospital
nurse and again meets the soldier.   They marry, but the soldier is
forced to leave the army for marrying a Japanese.  He takes her to his
home in Yunnan province, only to sicken on the way and die upon
reaching his home.  Shizu is now all alone in a village where the
superstitious people blame her for the death and want to punish her to
placate ghosts.  [Bad subtitling make it appear they actually wanted to
throw her in the fire, but I am assured by the director that was not
her intent with the scene.]  Things could not seem more bleak.
     From this inauspicious beginning, Shuzi will build herself into
the one most important person, a matriarch, in the community.  She will
help to banish superstition and bring enlightened ways to the mountain
village.  In a story told all too fast she remains in spite of
suspicion of her background, government attempts to send her back to
Japan, and the Cultural Revolution.  Finally she is reunited with her
family in Japan and must make some final difficult choices.
     Nuanxing in 97 minutes takes the viewer from a village with
centuries-old rituals and customs to a Japan with cellular phones and
huge department stores.  Through the eyes of one woman we see the
modernization of Asia.  Her film is curiously positive on the former
enemy Japanese.  It is a Japanese, not the government, woman who brings
modern knowledge to the village. The government is portrayed as being
well-meaning if occasionally officious.  Shizu's Japanese family are
shown positively in spite of their participation in the Chinese
occupation.  Part of the intention of the film seems to be to mend
fences with the Japanese.
     The worst fault of Nuanxing's film is its sketchiness.  To cover
so many years in 97 minutes the film has to let one or two scenes cover
three or four years.  There is often a feel that scenes are rushed.
Perhaps to save time or perhaps to make this film more acceptable with
the government, after the first few days Shuzi is accepted a little too
easily in her new village.  The script is determined not to assign any
fault and not to have villains.  This film could easily used another 30
minutes of screen time.  The film is at its best when it is showing
village life.  It shows customs like fertility dances that one rarely
sees in Chinese films but which add texture to the picture of village
life.
     THE STORY OF YUNNAN is the director's statement of women's values.
It is unique for a film from China.  I give it a +2 on the -4 to +4
scale.
     The film was accompanied by a short "Schrei der Erde" ("Cry of the
Earth") by Arvo Blechstein.  Blechstein created last year's Oscar-
winning "Black Rider."  This film is a tribute to French painter Jean-
Francois Millet.  It also has an ecological comment.  It is, however,
less involving and more serious than "Black Rider."
     In a near-future world recreational drugs have become passe.
Those who want drug-like kicks have electrodes surgically attached to
their brains and tap directly into cyberspace.  This is a very
dangerous form of entertainment, worse than drugs, but with a greater
and more exciting variety experiences that the mind can tap into.  Of
course a lot of this is only rumor in Child Support, the prison-like
orphanage run by the state.  Teenager Su decides to escape Child
Support and her escape is aided by Kon, a stranger whose truck she
uses.  Before long she is getting to know Kon better and discovers he
is up to his frontal lobes in the illegal "trode trade."  But Kon's
partners are up to something incomprehensibly big concerning something
called the "eternatrode" that offers a kind of immortality in
cyberspace.  The head of the team, the mysterious and aptly-named
Olderman is particularly intrigued by Su and her ability to see in her
dreams visions of the mysterious "Shadowfaces," beings that seem to
have a life of their own, but until Su came along only in cyberspace.
     That is the basis for a visionary but curiously unengaging
cyberpunk science fiction film.  One of the features of the cyberpunk
writing style is an interesting use of language and here the dialog is
all written in a style given the cliched name of "futurespeak."  In
futurespeak the language is permuted in odd ways that take the viewera
few minutes to get used to.  Show up late to a meeting and you might
say "Sorry for my late self-delivery."  Instead of "Kon, can I ask you
something?"  "I'm trying to sleep." the dialog comes out "Kon, question
and answer phase."  "No, I have my sleep lids on."  As someone once
said, prediction is difficult, particularly about the future, but I
would hazard a guess that technology will get to the point shown in the
film long before language would evolve as much as it appears to have
done in this film.
     CYBERTEENS IN LOVE is a low-budget quickie made on grant money.
The film makes use of computer graphics where possible to create visual
effects cheaply, though even now many of those effects are passe.
Beyond that it is a weak melodrama with a plot that could have come
from a 50's exploitation drive-in movie but given a new lease on life
by the addition of science fiction concepts.  Those concepts all too
often come out in the dialog rather than showing them to us on the
screen.  Because of the obvious budget constraints we have a film that
shows more promise than quality.  That also goes for the acting talents
of Justine Priestly as Su and Martin Cummins as Kon.  Occasionally
their acting rings hollow; more often they just fail to be interesting.
     This is the first feature film in high definition Sony Digital
Betacam format with a 9x16 aspect ratio.  Generally the format is
fairly good, but it still looks like video, particularly when there are
near-horizontal lines in the image being filmed.  The scan lines are
still all too evident to give this image the quality of a celluloid
one.
     There are some concepts in the film, but the viewer has to meet
them more than halfway.  Stretches of the film are talky and dull.
There are lots of ideas in the film but few are intriguing.  I give
CYBERTEENS IN LOVE a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     This is a random collection of five short films that have been
submitted to the festival.  As far as I can tell they will be shown
together no place else.  And they are very different from each other,
but the mind does tend to look for patterns even in random data and
various pairings make for interesting contrasts.  [Short films I
generally rate as poor, fair, good, very good, or excellent.]
     "Tall Stories": This is a light animated film with a little boy
talking about his house and family while an older man talks about his
home as a child and keeps playing "one-ups-manship" talking about how
everything he had was better.  The punchline is in finding out what
exactly is going on.  Rating: fair
     "Ignotus": This is a nice, ironic little horror film from Spain.
Two obnoxious punk rockers, lost on the Spanish countryside find an old
village.  They are taken for saints by the locals because their punk
spikes look so much like the golden spikes of light on the heads of
statues of saints.  The locals worship them as they would saints and
the rockers think they have lucked into something pretty good.  But
being taken for a saint is not necessarily such a good thing.  This is
a story with a Rod Serling feel.  Rating: good
     "Death in Venice, CA": The title says it all.  This is a retelling
of the Thomas Mann story with the site relocated in Venice, California.
The effect is much the same as doing Shakespeare in modern dress.
Something is lost in the atmosphere, something is gained in supposed
identification value and relevance.  This is a long and introspective
half hour.  An author visits his sister-in-law and finds himself
fixated on his nephew Sebastian.  As a curious touch the main character
is familiar with the writing of Mann, but does not recognize that he is
living out one of Mann's most famous stories.  Rating: good.
     "The Train": Perhaps this one just caught me in the right mood.
For a twenty-five-minute film Mike Mathis's film is one impressive
piece of cinema.  It is introspective like "Death in Venice, CA" but
realistically rather than in a literary sense.  It is a horror story,
but far more believable than "Ignotus" and apparently could well be
based on a true incident.  "The Train" is told mostly in flashback two
years after the events of the story.  The main character, Eddie, was
working with his brother Jim in a trainyard.  Eddie should be doing his
job, but untrained Jim is filling in for him and involved in a
horrifying accident of a type that was common in 50s trainyards.  Jim
who feels fine, is told he has just minutes to live.  He can die
instantly and painlessly, or painfully over a fifteen-minute interval.
Jim has just minutes to say goodbye to his life.  Eddie has years to
make peace with himself or not.  This is a very powerful story and a
deeply affecting film. Rating: excellent.
     "Tick... Tick... Tick...":  This is quite a nice little thriller.
A man, a woman, and a bomb are tied up together in an abandoned shack.
Obviously somebody is not happy with them.  But can they figure out
what is going on and can they escape before the bomb goes off?  The
film combines suspense and a puzzle for the viewer.  Rating: very good.
     I had gone to this in the hopes that it would be similar to ARIA,
a single cohesive film in which different respected directors would see
what they could do given a single theme in this case working on a
sensual story rather than showing what they see when they hear opera
music.  Well, I was half right.  It certainly was major directors, but
with each piece just a minute or two short of a half hour, this had the
feel of a series of episodes made for cable.  My major complaint is
that of these three half-hour erotic tales, the first two are not
erotic and the third is not a tale.
     "The Insatiable Mrs. Kirsch" (co-written and directed by Ken
Russell): This film is surprisingly tame given that it was directed by
the uninhibited Mr. Russell.  The story might almost be out of Somerset
Maugham.  Simon Shepherd plays a writer escaping from the world to
write at an exclusive hotel.  There he finds himself completely fixated
on the beautiful Mrs. Kirsch who seems like the most oversexed woman he
has ever seen.  She seems to eat only long and narrow food, like corn-
on-the-cob and sausages, she frequents sex-shops, and much more.  The
author decides to take advantage of the situation leading to the
obvious plot twist.  The story is quite predictable.  Rating: fair
     "Vrooom! Vroom! Vroooom!" (written and directed by Melvin Van
Peebles):  This one has a sort of "Twilight Zone" feel.  Leroy is the
lonely kid who never gets the girls.  The other kids are all singing
and dancing and waving body parts at each other, but Leroy is alone.
Then Leroy saves an old witch-woman from being hit by a car.  For this
she grants him a wish.  He would like a motorcycle and a girl, but he
gets only one wish.  The witch-woman, however, finds a way to grant
both wishes with a single wish, but with bad results.  Rating: fair
     "Touch Me" (co-written and directed by Paul Cox):  Sarah is an
artist.  Christine is a nude model.  Sarah gives art classes.
Christine models nude in Sarah's classes.  Sarah has a student who
thinks he is Toulouse-Lautrec.  He faxes her poems with obscene
artwork.  Christine has a boyfriend who does not understand her.  Sarah
and Christine spend a weekend together in the country.  They chase
horses.  They take showers and sit in front of a fire.  Christine gets
muddy and Sara cleans her off.  Sarah gets another fax from her
student.  It isn't a great story, but it is the only one they have.
There is a lot of very sensual photography but little dramatic
resolution at the end.  There also seems to be little theme except take
love where you find it.  Rating: fair
     Itzik Finkelstein would like to be a big time wheeler-dealer.
Unfortunately his big-time deals all fall through and the wheel has a
flat.  Itzik is a total failure and has a chip on his shoulder against
everyone who has ever wronged him, which he thinks is pretty much
everybody in his life.  Itzik would like to take his vengeance on the
world, but what are the chances for a poor slob who couldn't hit the
floor with his hat in three tries?
     Then, as luck would have it, a mystical cult from the bowels of
the Earth decides that the world must be destroyed to be saved.  They
send an all-powerful invisible monk to give Itzik the power to kill
with impunity.  The time has come for Itzik to wreak his terrible
revenge.
     THE REVENGE OF ITZIK FINKELSTEIN is a slyly written comedy from
Israel with more than a little similarity to Peter Cook's's BEDAZZLED.
Not too surprisingly Itzik's hate-tour of the villains of his past is
less than the killing spree that he at first envisioned.  Instead Itzik
has an opportunity to reevaluate the values he has been given by others
that he thinks have led to his sorry state.  As his attitudes change,
his self-image and others' images of him change.
     Argentina-born director Enrique Rottenberg emigrated to Israel in
1963 and has produced films previously but is directing for the first
time.  He co-authored the screenplay with Estaban Gottfried, basing it
on the story "La Venganza de Beta Sanchez" and moving the setting to
Israel.  Gottfried appeared in the film in the role of the invisible
monk.  The film won seven Israeli Oscars including Best Picture, Best
Director, and Best Screenplay.
     Moshe Ivgi's Itzik Finkelstein can be very funny, but some of the
more verbal humor seems to be lost in the subtitling.  He does however
show considerable personality.  Gottfried's monk is well-written but
flatly played.
     Not all of the screenplay's humor is in the best of taste, and
often humor is more vulgar than funny.  Then again, perhaps more humor
would come across to people more fluent in Hebrew.  I would rate this
one a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     Aki Kaurismaki is a Finnish director generally known for very
downbeat films like ARIEL.  He did try his hand at comedy, however,
with somewhat spotty results with THE LENINGRAD COWBOYS GO AMERICA.
That film told the story of a hapless rock band either from Finland or
someplace very cold in the Soviet Union touring the United States on
the cheap.  The band is actually played by a Finnish comic rock group
called the Sleepy Sleepers, but the film seems to imply the characters
might be Russian.  Their trademark is pompadours that stick out a foot
in front of their heads like unicorn horns and pointed shoes that stick
out just as far.
     A sequel was made (word of mouth is that it is not very good) and
the third film featuring the Cowboys is a concert film.  This one
magnifies the incongruity of the first film by matching the rock band
with the Red Army Chorus and Dance Ensemble.  The Chorus and Dance
Ensemble was always a bit of an incongruity itself.  As a branch of the
Soviet Army, they were responsible to preserve beautiful Russian folk
singing and dancing and to bring them to the world.  Even people who
hated the Soviets would buy records of their Army Chorus and Band
because the music was good.  The whole existence of the chorus was a
bit of an anomaly, sort of smoothing over the conjoining of Slavic
traditions to Soviet militarism.
     This film opens with a solemn diplomatic scene.  It is apparently
the signing, under a watchful poster of Lenin, of a contract for the
Red Army Ensemble to have a concert with the Leningrad Cowboys.  We
then flash to the concert itself, which took place on in front of an
audience of 50,000 on June 12, 1993.  The resulting film is full of
ironic humor with more than a little touch of sadness.  There is a
little hint of lost traditional values in seeing Russian women in
traditional folk finery doing traditional Russian dancing to the sound
of "My... my... my... Delilah."  A buffoonish Cowboy and a squat folk
singer in full Soviet military uniform arm-in-arm sing "So Happy
Together."  This is more than a concert, it is a comment on the closing
of the cold war and the coming of new values, with little respect for
the old.
     The Red Army seems more able to enhance the popular music than
vice versa.  For traditional songs like "The Volga Boat Man" and
"Kalinka" the Cowboys are able only to clown around a little awkwardly
on stage.  The Russians lend far more to the popular lyrics
contributing the sound of a full orchestra and chorus to music usually
carried by five or six performers.  Their clowning is more like adding
snatches to the old Soviet National Anthem to "Gimme All Your Lovin'"
Some how they also add poignancy to "Those Were the Days."
     This is a short film, only 55 minutes, with a good sense of humor
and a lot of perhaps overly familiar music.  Perhaps the music is just
not as important as the subtext.  On the scale of short films, I would
rate it a very good.
     Carl Nielsen is considered the greatest Danish musical composer.
The famous post-Romantic composer wrote the story of his youth in his
autobiographical MY CHILDHOOD (1927).  Erik Clausen has now adapted
Nielson's memoir of his youth into the film CARL, MY CHILDHOOD
SYMPHONY.   As the title implies, we see a set of reminiscences from a
poor but not particularly sad childhood.  As a set of remembrances we
get an episodic montage that is more than the sum of its parts.
     The film covers Nielsen, who was born in 1865, at three periods of
his youth.  The 1871 segment has Dog of Flanders feel.  We are
introduced to young Carl as a boy of only six, but we see the seeds of
a budding genius in him.  The son of a very poor artist and musician,
the boy herds geese.  In one sequence the six-year-old leaves his
geese, spellbound by the sound of a young piano student playing.  When
the girl gives up in frustration, he sneaks into the strange house just
to see the piano.  His father is angry when he hears of his son's
trespass, but he appeases his son's curiosity about music by giving him
a violin to play with.  The boy takes to the violin as a favorite toy
and soon is able to make real music with it, preferring to compose his
own tunes over playing other people's music.
     The young Carl makes friends through his music with people of his
village including a blind musician and a cobbler.  Carl meets a sister
whom he never knew he had when she returns home to die of consumption.
Carl builds a relationship with an older brother who Carl thinks is
even more musically gifted only to have Carl accidentally injure the
brother and end what he thinks might have been a brilliant career.
Though his family and friends suffer from poverty and disease, the film
seen from Carl's eyes never gives in to self-pity.  The film does not
have the structure of a single directed story, but more that of a lot
of little reminiscences that go to form a single piece, much as many
themes go to form a symphony.
     The film develops Carl's character through two more chapters.  In
1879 Carl joins the army as a bugle boy.  He hides his violin skill and
learns the cornet, plays in a military band with near clashes, meets
more colorful characters.  But in his youthful enthusiasm for his music
he remains oblivious to much that goes on around him.  By the third
chapter in 1883 he has a more mature outlook on life.  This section is
more introspective with Nielsen falling in love and finally coming toa
better understanding of himself and his friends.
     CARL could easily have made a social or political point like so
many other films about people who grew in poverty.  CARL seems almost
aimless in not sending some similar message.  But that was not
Clausen's point in making the film.  This is a story of a man with a
destiny, and it is that destiny that binds the film together, seeing
how the mind of Nielsen came together.  This is a film of awe, not
anger.  And as such, it is the best musical biography to come along in
years, rating a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     This documentary by Nitza Gonan is an uneasy mix.  One documentary
combines a tearful visit to the Auschwitz death camp and scenes from
the main character's stand-up comedy act.  That is as uneasy a mix asI
can imagine.
     Mordechai Vilozny lost both parents of his parents in the
Holocaust and a large part of himself, though he managed to survive and
emigrate to Israel.  He has walled off that part of his life and never
discussed it with his children Schmuel and Shoshanna.  In 1993 he is
returning to Poland to visit the sites of his childhood and to see
where his parents were murdered.  Schmuel, now an actor and a stand-up
comic has resented his father's unwillingness to share Holocaust
experiences.  The film is about the effect of the journey on the three
people and in a broader sense the effect of the Holocaust on the second
generation of survivors.
     Schmuel is really the main focus, rather than his father, which
somewhat detracts from the film since he seems a rather unpleasant
character.  One tends to agree with him when he dismisses skinheads as
"idiots" but it seems a tactless comment.  However his jibes at the
expense of a Polish soldier who will be taking part in a memorial to
victims of the Holocaust seems less than fair.  Some of his style is
reminiscent of Michael Moore, but not as funny.  He also expresses some
anger at auditioning but not being chosen to act in SCHINDLER'S LIST.
He says that he is actually a piece of the Holocaust and many of the
actors chosen were not.  It would be more accurate to say his father
was a piece of the Holocaust.  In a later visit to Auschwitz he pockets
a standoff insulator from the electronic fence as a souvenir.
     Some of his shots seem unreasonable.  He shows us some skinhead
graffiti ("same hatreds, same graffiti") and then shows us a peasant
woman who claims there is no anti-Semitism in Poland.  Clearly denying
the anti-Semitism is factually incorrect, but it seems a very human
thing for a peasant woman to try to deny it.  She is hardly going to
start giving case histories for the camera.
     The film's best sequence is the visit to Auschwitz, where
Mordechai finds records of his father.  Even here the camera is more
interested in Schmuel than in his father.  By this point the viewer is
far more interested in the father's experience than the son's.  The
sequence is certainly touching, but could have been a lot better.
     The documentary was apparently made for Israeli TV and then poorly
subtitled into English.  Some subtitles are flashed on the screen for
as little as three-quarters of a second.  There are long and pointless
sequences like Schmuel's "walk to beach like Fellini," which seems like
nothing more than showing Schmuel strut and hum a Fellini-esque tune.
It seems like three minutes of screentime are wasted on this eminently
cuttable sequence.
     This documentary showed potential, but it could have been handled
in a much better way.  I would give it a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     Mick (played by Tony LaPaglia) is at the top of his profession.
His profession is eliminating people his employers think are
inconvenient.  He has just finished a big and important job that at
first went wrong.  An old friend Archie (played by Matt Craven) had
been part of the hit and had nearly wrecked everything, but Mick had
salvaged things, finishing the job, and for now he deserves a rest.
But his boss George (Peter Boyle) comes to him with an emergency.  A
woman has to be killed that very night and Mick is the only person who
can be depended on.  But, George mysteriously assures Mick, she knows
about the hit and will cooperate.  All Mick has to do is pull the
trigger.  And the odd thing is, he seems to be right.  Fiona (Mimi
Rogers) is an extremely intelligent and attractive woman who is
entirely blase about the fact that she is about to be murdered.  And
thus begins a very odd few hours in the lives of Mick, Fiona, and
Archie.
     Gordon Melbourne has written the kind of script that keeps the
viewer guessing what exactly is happening and where the film is going.
While in premise there are similarities to DIARY OF A HITMAN, which may
well have been part of the inspiration for KILLER, Melbourne has his
own ideas on what to do with the premise.  One is never sure what plot
details will be important.  Fiona gets Mick and Archie talking about
the business of murder.  Is she looking for something specific or is it
natural curiosity?  She also seems extremely friendly to Mick, all the
while seeming to be walking into her own murder with both eyes open.
Why does she do what she is doing?  Mick has been successful to this
point as a hit man and he even explain to Archie his philosophy of
exactly what it takes to do his job right, but in one night he has
fallen in love and has developed a conscience about killing.  And that
puts a whole new twist on the game that it has never had before.
     While Tony LaPaglia is a generally good actor, his is the most
straightforward of the three main characters.  Mimi Rogers carries much
more of the load of making the film work.  She has to be the most
desirable woman on the screen since Kathleen Turner in BODY HEAT.
Under Mark Malone's direction she manages quite nicely.  Matt Craven,
as the incompetent hitman wanting so much to succeed does an excellent
job of projecting both comic and tragic dimensions of his character.
     Mark Malone is directing for the first time, though previously he
co-wrote DEAD OF WINTER and SIGNS OF LIFE.  His KILLER is slickly
produced and it works reasonably well.  My rating is high +1 on the -4
to +4 scale.
     Pablo Torre's film THE SILENT MOVIE LOVER is an atmospheric
melodrama from Argentina that is reminiscent of Billy Wilder's SUNSET
BOULEVARD, but is even stranger.  It is the story of a boy coming of
age and of a silent film star near the end of his days.
     Paulito is a fatherless boy living in an apartment with his
beautiful mother.  Money is always a problem and he has to turn to
stealing from neighbors and giving the proceeds to his mother who does
not question the "miracle" of money appearing in her drawers.  A local
girl teases Pailito and abuses him with dark sexual games.  Finally
Paulito's mother gets work living and working in a mortuary and playing
the piano.  The mortician is an intense and aging silent film star who
cannot let go of the past.  He looks and moves as if he were constantly
in front of the silent film camera.  Even the architecture of his
funeral parlor is that of movie palaces of the 1920s and his funeral
send-offs, performed in silence except for Schubert on the piano, are
spectacular silent film scenes.
     The old film star, Ralph, who went to Hollywood back in the days
when there was demand for Latins following the death of Valentino.  By
blackmailing Keaton he is able to break into the movies and become a
great film star, only to lose everything with the coming of sound.  We
are told Ralph's story with classic Hollywood documentary and film
footage supplemented with antiqued new film footage of Ralph as a young
man.  In a marvelous way, like the characters, once we are pulled into
the claustrophobic film palace mortuary, we get out only through the
movies.  When suddenly we find ourselves out on a big river reminiscent
of CREATURE FROM THE BLACK LAGOON, we are momentarily shocked and it
feels very out of place.  The characters must feel the same and that
too is part of the story.  The pacing of THE SILENT MOVIE LOVER is
slow, deliberate, and very atmospheric, like a silent film.  The style
of telling is probably better than the value of the story itself.
     Pablo Torre, who wrote and directed THE SILENT MOVIE LOVER, is the
son of film director Leopaldo Torre Nielson.  Until this point Pablo
has been a novelist and this is his first film as director.
     THE SILENT FILM LOVER is heavy with atmosphere, and is enjoyable
as a reminder of the early days of cinema, but the plot is
dissatisfying.  I rate it a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Incident at Oglala (1992)
     In April of 1992 I reviewed THUNDERHEART, one of a pair of films made
by British filmmaker Michael Apted about the Lakota Indians of the Pine
Ridge Indian Reservation in South Dakota.  I was and remain fairly negative
on THUNDERHEART because, as I said in my review, the story-telling was not
very good.  I see the story as being extremely cliche-ridden and weak.  I
did--and still do--think Apted's implication that Indian magic really works
weakened rather than strengthened the film.  (This was not intended as and
anti-Indian sentiment, as I feel the same way about any magic in a non-
fantasy film.  As a strict empiricist, I just do not believe in the
supernatural, religious or otherwise.)  At the time I expressed my belief
that THUNDERHEART was the wrong film for the right movement and I expressed
my hopes that INCIDENT AT OGLALA would be better.  It is.
     In spite of Apted having more experience with fiction films, his
fiction films are often melodramatic.  His more political films seem to give
loaded arguments, making the villains dehumanized nasties.  His INCIDENT AT
OGLALA is a solid piece of political argument that cuts right to the bone.
It has its "good guys" and "bad guys" also, but they are condemned by their
own words and by the testimony of people actually involved in the incidents.
It is the authenticity of the documentary style rather than the whim of a
fiction scriptwriter in complete control that makes INCIDENT AT OGLALA so
much better than THUNDERHEART.
     The fundamental conflict documented in INCIDENT AT OGLALA is the
conflict between the traditionalist Indians and those more for assimilation
into the dominant society.  In 1975 the two groups were so much in conflict
that the Pine Ridge Reservation became a literal battlefield with both sides
killing each other in a reign of terror that claimed over sixty victims,
mostly traditionalists.  The FBI aligned itself with the assimilationist
Indians.  On June 26, 1975, two FBI agents were killed in the violence.
INCIDENT AT OGLALA is the story of that shoot-out, what led up to it, and
the aftermath.  One man, Leonard Peltier, went to prison and is serving two
consecutive life sentences.  The film gives apparently strong evidence that
Peltier was railroaded.  Major witnesses are discredited.  Evidence used in
the trial is apparently shown to have been falsified.  In general, the
argument is very forceful.
     INCIDENT AT OGLALA is a powerful piece of documentary filmmaking, far
better than Apted's companion film.  The evidence shown here seems more than
ample to justify a re-trial, so much so that it undermines somewhat Apted's
argument.  It is hard to believe the entire judicial system up to the
Supreme Court is so corrupt that this weight of evidence would be
insufficient to justify a re-trial.  Like JFK, while it is not totally
convincing, it certainly raises questions that should be answered.  I give
it a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Year of the Comet (1992)
     Penelope Ann Miller plays Margaret Harwood, a savvy wine expert who has
had to fight to be given any responsibility in her faily's fine wine
business.  The first serious task she is given is to travel to a castle on
the Isle of Skye and to inventory the castle's wine cellar her father has
purchased.  The good news is that the cellar turns out to have the most
valuable wine bottle in the world--not to mention one of the biggest.  It is
a three-foot tall bottle of Chateau Lafitte from 1811, the "Year of the
Comet."  Unfortunately, the castle also houses a comic-book-style villain
Philippe (played by Louis Jourdan) who is doing something scientific and
evil elsewhere in the castle.  Soon also on hand at the castle is Oliver
Plexico, the agent of the purchaser of the wine bottle.  Based on one
previous experience, Margaret finds Oliver to be just about the most
obnoxious man in the world.  Guess who she has to have as an ally in her
escape from the clutches of Philippe.
     I have to admit being anxious to see this film from the moment I heard
the story and screenplay were by William Goldman.  Goldman is probably best
known for THE PRINCESS BRIDE, but he also has been responsible for the
novels and screenplays of NO WAY TO TREAT A LADY, MARATHON MAN, and MAGIC.
He also wrote the screenplays for BUTCH CASSIDY AND THE SUNDANCE KID, THE
GREAT WALDO PEPPER, ALL THE PRESIDENT'S MEN, and A BRIDGE TOO FAR.  His name
almost guarantees good writing.  Almost.  This is way below par Goldman with
flat uninteresting heroes and far-fetched villains.  The film was directed
by Peter Yates (BULLITT, BREAKING AWAY, THE DEEP, THE FRIENDS OF EDDIE
COYLE), who claims to have had in mind a Cary Grant/Grace Kelly sort of
adventure with younger stars.  Unfortunately, Ms. Miller is no Grace Kelly
and Tim Daly as Plexico is even further from Cary Grant.  The action is more
predictable than exciting.  The scenery does add a little needed gloss.
Scotland is certainly beautiful and Southern France at least looks pleasant.
But as romantic thrillers go, YEAR OF THE COMET is warm beer.  I rate it a 0
on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for A.I. Artificial Intelligence (2001)
    CAPSULE: A very short story is expanded into a longish but 
    powerful film about time, durability, and purpose of existence 
    by the combined efforts of the late Stanley Kubrick and of 
    Steven Spielberg.  There are some very nice sequences in this 
    film, but overall it is stylistically uneven.  The story of 
    the robot that wanted to be human is getting a little 
    hackneyed for this film to really work throughout.  Though 
    some of the views of the future are very powerful.  Rating: 9 
    (0 to 10), +3 (-4 to +4)
Permanence is a major theme of A.I.  I am told a glass bottle takes a 
million years to biodegrade.  The purpose of that existence may end 
after a month--essentially its first moments of life, but the bottle 
goes on.  Its whole reason for existence is just the barest beginning 
of its journey.  This is bad for the environment, but not really for 
the bottle because it has no feelings.  But what if a machine could be 
given feelings and told to love one person?  What happens to a machine 
that has emotions, but also longevity far greater than that of its 
reason for existence?  And can a machine really have feelings?  If not, 
why not since an accumulation of biological cells, what a human is, can 
have feelings?  These questions are the heart of A.I.
A.I. was a project developed by Stanley Kubrick going back to the 
early 1990s.  It used as a springboard the 1969 short story "Super-toys 
Last All Summer Long," by Brian W. Aldiss.  (A copy of the story can 
currently be found at http://www.visual-memory.co.uk/amk/doc/0068.html.) 
I am not sure I understand why Kubrick saw so much potential in this 
particular story.  It seems to me to be a variation on an episode on "The 
Lateness of the Hour," an episode of THE TWILIGHT ZONE.  (The story in 
the film seems to lean more toward a different episode, "I Sing the Body 
Electric.") However, Arthur C. Clarke's "The Sentinel" would also seem an 
unpromising source and it made one of the classics of cinema 2001: A SPACE 
ODYSSEY.
Much as he had previously done with Clarke for 2001: A SPACE ODYSSEY, 
Kubrick wanted to partner with Brian Aldiss on the project of adapting 
his story.  Together they looked at a lot of variations on the 
narrative, none of which where suitable to Kubrick.  Kubrick then 
called in Clarke as his partner, but they could not agree where the 
story should go.  Kubrick tried science fiction author Bob Shaw, but 
Kubrick did not have a film until he brought in Ian Watson.  Allegedly 
when Kubrick thought the time was right he arranged a two-film deal, 
one film on the subject of sex, one returning to the science fiction 
field where he had enjoyed working in the past.  Those films were, of 
course, EYES WIDE SHUT and A.I.  Unfortunately, Kubrick lived only long 
enough to complete the former and to get the project moving on the 
latter.  Enter Steven Spielberg to inherit the A.I. project and bring 
it to completion.  Now, of course, it is unclear what is Kubrick's 
contribution and what is Spielberg's, but the resulting film is very 
different from either director's previous work.
Whatever the truth is on who contributed what, the film is wildly 
uneven in style like a landscape painted by a committee.  That is not 
necessarily a bad thing, it just makes the future world seem a bit 
schizophrenic.  It uses a variation on the Aldiss story as a core, but 
abruptly goes off in other directions.  There is even some feeling that 
the story was being held back by spending too much time on the Aldiss 
themes.
One might speculate that Kubrick filmed the first and last sections of 
the film and Spielberg did only the middle section.  Certainly acting 
styles seem that way.  In the first part of the film people appear 
pensive and insular in their own shells.  Not unlike the characters in 
2001:  A SPACE ODYSSEY, people just do not seem to be connecting with 
each other.  The middle section of the film is set in a frenetic world 
like from TOTAL RECALL OF BLADERUNNER BEYOND THUNDERDOME.  The viewer 
should be warned that this is a film of about two and a half hours.  
Parts of the film, particularly toward the end when the pace slows, 
seem drawn out as it is.  If the viewer is expecting the film to wrap 
up, the final reel may seem interminable.
The story follows David (played by Haley Joel Osment), the first and 
only robot who has been given a capacity to love.  David is built for a 
couple, Monica and Henry Swinton (Francis O'Connor and Sam Robards), 
whose own son Martin is in a frozen state.  At first Monica wants no 
part of an artificial surrogate son, but that resolve starts to 
crumble.  The story takes off from there.  This is a lot like the plot 
of BICENTENNIAL MAN or Ray Bradbury's "I Sing the Body Electric," but 
the story goes places that those stories do not.  It would be a spoiler 
to say how, but eventually we are introduced a friend for David, a 
Gigolobot named Gigolo Joe, programmed to dance through life as he 
performs his Gigolo function.  That programming cannot be dropped even 
when he is on the run for his life.  Like David's, his programming 
outlives its purpose.
Spielberg (or whoever) did a fairly good job of setting the story in 
some indeterminate future.  For once an automobile looks like it might 
have come from a future world.  In the first part the whole world seems 
subdued.  We go from one scene shot with a filter to give a hazy image, 
then we go to another scene with a lot of fractured pieces coming 
together.  A crisper image is used for the middle section of the film 
and toward the end the camera returns to a soft focus.  David, the main 
character, has a special makeup that makes his skin look glossy like 
smooth plastic.  Most of the film is shot in cold lifeless colors, 
though there are some reds and earth tones in the middle section of the 
film.  The middle section also has a faster pace with images suddenly 
coming very fast at the viewer.  It is like going from sensory 
deprivation to sensory overload.  The final part of the film is again 
slow and introspective.  Most Dreamworks films work an image of the 
moon into the story someplace, more or less as their trademark.  A.I.  
goes a little overboard in giving us a moon image that is hard to miss.
Several celebrity voices are used in the film, though frequently they 
are only subliminally noticeable.  I recognized Robin Williams as the 
voice of a futuristic vending machine, but reading the end-credits I 
realized I had missed several of the others.  It should make for an 
interesting game for owners of the future DVD to search out the other 
voices.
Steven Spielberg was perhaps a very good choice as a replacement for 
Kubrick.  A director of some stature was needed, but also because few 
directors could handle the poignancy of the final parts of the story.  
The film has already been criticized for its sentimentality, but the 
emotion is precisely the point.  Spielberg is one of the few directors 
of mass audience films who are not afraid to put emotion into a film 
when it is appropriate.  The critics who complain about Spielberg's 
sentimentality would rob cinema of much of its impact.  The final 
dilemma of this film is an emotional one and that is how the story 
should be told.  I rate A.I. a 9 on the 0 to 10 scale and a +3 on the  
-4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Toy Story (1995)
     For years one of the more interesting aspects of the annual
tournees of animation was to see the developments in computer
animation.  An early example--early meaning 1986--from Pixar was "Luxo,
Jr." in which metal lamps behaved in human ways.  Pixar started life in
1979 as a division of Lucasfilm but became an independent company in
1986.  The Luxo lamps were ideal for early attempts at computer
animation since they were articulated collections of rigid pieces.
Certainly in computer animation rigid body movement is easier to
describe to a program than is the movement of something soft and
pliable.  In fact, Pixar has done a lot of showing toys and other
inanimate objects coming to life since if they come off too rigid it
can look like part of the characterization.  With that in mind it is
not difficult to understand why their first feature film is a story in
which toys are the main characters and humans play a relatively small
role and are not the center of attention.  Different animation
techniques have different advantages, but TOY STORY is certainly a
milestone in computer animation.  Pixar still has to prove that their
animation techniques are more versatile than Will Vinton's clay
animation or the Puppetoons of the 1940s and 1950s.  In fact, their
style is very like the results of Puppetoon animation.  There is
nothing wrong with what they do here, but they need to be thinking
about how to get more variety in their themes, particularly if they
want to be more than hi-tech Puppetoons.
     That said, the film is certainly as watchable for the adults in
the audience as for the children.  We are not talking Merchant-Ivory
level here but the adults should appreciate most of what is aimed at
the kids and there is some intelligence in the humor (including a very
nice bit about the origin of religions--hot stuff for a Disney family
film).  The story deals with a collection of toys owned by young Andy.
What Andy does not know is that when he is not watching, the toys come
to life and live lives of their own (a very familiar fantasy theme).
Andy's current favorite is Sheriff Woody (voiced by Tom Hanks), but he
has just gotten a new toy, Buzz Lightyear, Space Hero (Tim Allen).
Woody is not happy about being displaced as Andy's favorite for reasons
never made clear-perhaps it's job security.   And it does not help that
Buzz is not quite bright enough to realize that he is not the real
thing.  The rivalry is watched by the community of toys including
tyrannosaurus Rex (ironically voiced by Wallace Shawn), Mr. Potato Head
(Don Rickles), Slinky Dog (Jim Varney), and Bo Peep (Annie Potts).
Just how Bo Peep got into this collection of Andy's toys is anybody's
guess, but she adds a love interest for Woody.  Eventually the rivalry
will get out of hand and will have the two racing to return home first
from the outside world and then from the house of the neighbor boy Sid,
a budding sociopath with an impressive imagination when it comes to
mutilating toys.  One rather nice touch here is that Disney animations
nearly always equate beauty with goodness and ugliness with evil, but
it is not necessarily true here.
     The animation technique used here is extremely good.  The
attention to details like reflective surfaces and the play of light and
shadow get better and better with succeeding Pixar productions.
Surface texture still seems to be a problem.  Pixar does a sort of
semi-gloss surface very nicely, which may be one reason they do so much
with plastic toys.  But the detail and texture they would need to do
realistically a man's arm with hair, for example, is not really there
any place.
     Pixar has made a charming movie carrying their current plot
concepts and animation techniques to what appears to be about the
limit.  TOY STORY is a lot of fun.  Now the important question for
Pixar is what do they do next.  This one gets a high +1 on the -4 to +4
scale.  (And special kudos to the Supervising Layout Artist.)

Title
Review for Patriot Games (1992)
          Capsule review:  RED OCTOBER fans may be a little
     disappointed at this surprisingly humdrum and downbeat
     political thriller.  This is more like a watchable police
     procedural and generates just about as much excitement.  This
     film does not generate the excitement of the previous Clancy
     film, but does generate at least a very low interest in what
     happens next.  Rating: high +1.
     A Tom Clancy novel lies somewhere between a James Bond thriller and a
textbook on American defense and intelligence systems.  Clancy gives a lot
of technical details but makes it enjoyable by putting it into the context
of a good spy story.  Technophiles may be a bit disappointed by the
technical content of the film PATRIOT GAMES.  We do see a bit of how the CIA
operates, but it is much less the thrust of the film than it is in THE HUNT
FOR RED OCTOBER.  Harrison Ford plays Jack Ryan as older, more bitter and
introspective, and certainly less exuberant than Alec Baldwin played him in
THE HUNT FOR RED OCTOBER.
     The story--which curiously begins much slower in Peter Iliff and Donald
Stewart's screenplay than it does in the original novel--starts with Jack
Ryan foiling an attack by Irish terrorists in London.  In the screenplay's
one concrete improvement on the novel, the victim of the attack was only a
distant member of the Royal Family and so spares us the indignity of having
the Queen of England fawning all over Jack Ryan.  In both stories, however,
the terrorists decide they now have a vendetta against Ryan personally and
are quite willing to punish the whole Ryan family.  Jack uses the facilities
of the CIA to protect his family and end the career of the particularly
faction of Irish terrorists.
     It is no secret at this point that Tom Clancy was less than totally
pleased with the screen treatment of his novel.  He legally had his name
removed from the film, and only in the last week or so before the release
agreed to have it put back.  The advertising I saw does not mention his name
at all and simply says "From the best-selling novel."  In fact, as film
adaptations go, the film is reasonably faithful to the novel, though some
fair-sized liberties were taken.  About midway into the film Ryan makes one
of his famous deductions and concludes something that in the novel Ryan was
told in a briefing very early.  Worth noting is one interesting touch in the
film--intentional or not.  In British spy films the Americans are allies, of
course, but very often characterized as boorish cowboys.  In this film, the
Americans are cleancut and bright, but interrogating the terrorists are two
of the most greasy-looking, weasely Britons they could cast in the role.
Touche'!
     PATRIOT GAMES is directed by Philip Noyce, who also directed an
exceptionally good thriller, DEAD CALM.  The music by James Horner is
notable: he makes extensive use of two pieces of music by other composers.
He uses the "Gayne Ballet Suite" by Khatchaturian, previously used in the
jogging sequences of 2001: A SPACE ODYSSEY to give the emotion of the tedium
of space flight.  More interesting is that Horner used the end credit song
from the film HARRY'S GAME for the end title music here.  (And if you want
to see a *really* good thriller about the tensions in Northern Ireland, see
if you can find the rest of HARRY'S GAME someplace.)
     PATRIOT GAMES caps off this Irish Spring, joining THE PLAYBOYS and FAR
AND AWAY.  It is not the thriller Clancy fans wanted; it may not even be a
good adaptation of the book.  But there are moments when it does show some
taste and style.  I give it a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Usual Suspects, The (1995)
     When most films end people get up, go to their cars, and drive
away.  Then there are some films that get a significant part of the
audience standing around and discussing--maybe even puzzling over--what
they have seen.  There are a lot of decent films in the first category,
but there are almost no bad films in the second.  A new film to discuss
and puzzle over is THE USUAL SUSPECTS.  This is a complicated crime
story, occasionally violent, but one that builds compellingly to one
climax, then suddenly turns into a complex set of logic puzzles that
must be solved to understand what actually happened in the story.  This
is not like RASHOMON which throws up its hands and says truth is
unknowable because everybody sees things differently.  Instead, it is
closer to Raymond Smullyan's logic problems where we know only that
certain things are true if other things are false.  One feels all the
information is there to figure out the truth, if only one can work the
puzzle.  But a complete understanding of the plot may not be possible
without multiple viewings.  But worry not, you don't have to solve the
puzzles completely to enjoy the film.
     The film begins with a cryptic but beautifully filmed crime scene.
A man is apparently shot; a fire is set.  But what exactly have we
seen?  The police (played by Chazz Palminteri and Dan Hedaya) pick up
the aptly-named Verbal (Kevin Spacey) and he begins his tale of the six
weeks that led to the crime.  In flashback, when a police operation
fails, the police bring to a line-up five suspects, and based on this
chance introduction the five decide to combine their various talents on
a job.  Along with Spacey, the five are played by Gabriel Byrne, Kevin
Pollak, Stephen Baldwin, and Benicio Del Toro.  From there the plot of
the film doubles and redoubles in complexity.  And casting his shadow
over the whole plot is a mysterious international criminal, Kaiser
Soza, who may be real or may be a total myth.
     The film was co-produced and directed by Bryan Singer, whose only
previous film is the relatively unknown PUBLIC ACCESS.  Here he directs
a clever screenplay by Christopher McQuarrie.  Singer and McQuarrie
manage nicely to characterize each of the criminals with just a few
moments in the line-up and in the subsequent police examination.  But
even with the characterization, they keep the story moving forward ata
headlong pace, forcing the audience to work to keep up.
     Curiously, for a film as small and somewhat experimental as this,
the producers have chosen to go for a cast with a surprising number of
familiar actors.  We are generally used to seeing at most one or two
recognizable actors in independent films and, indeed, those films are
often the route actors use these days to become more familiar.  The
producers have chosen to go with a cast of familiar and established
character actors, even in some roles that really do not require it.
Concieveably with the film's main attraction being its writing, the
budget elsewhere was low enough that the producers could afford to go
with an established cast.  It is not clear it pays off for them,
however.  Putting an actor like Paul Bartel in a tiny and undemanding
role may be more of a distraction than a casting necessity.  Still, a
veteran cast does deliver the goods for Singer.
     This is a film that looks good, and has good actors, but the
writing is really the film's strongest point.  This is a film that
demands some thought and perhaps even multiple viewings to understand
fully and it gets a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Geronimo: An American Legend (1993)
     I think that the most positive thing I can say about GERONIMO is that
it trusts the viewer.  It shows historical events and it trusts the audience
to make the right decision about who was right and who was wrong.  That
sounds like a small thing, but it was more than you got from films like
DANCES WITH WOLVES, THUNDERHEART, or, on another continent, GANDHI.  So
often when a film shows the old establishment as wrong, it shows everybody
who sided with or worked for that establishment as being totally
reprehensible.  I doubt that anybody can see GERONIMO and not come away with
the belief that a great injustice was done to the Chiricahua Apache.  But
many of the whites in this film are compassionate toward the Indians.  And
not all of the Indians agree with each other about their relations with the
whites.  Most of the people in this film are a bit bewildered about what is
happening and are ambivalent about United States Government policies toward
Indians.  As an example, Robert Duvall as an army scout professes his hatred
of the Indian in the early parts of the film, but it becomes clear later in
the film that underneath the surface he respects Indians and is also
indignant over injustices done to them.  While other aspects of this film
are not so well handled, the complexity of characters is a change from the
pre-digested Political Correctness we often see in films of this sort.
However, the film does twist facts to make it a more salable quantity.
     The story, as narrated by Lt. Britton Davis (Matt Damon) is not a full
biography of Geronimo, but only covers about five years and Geronimo's last
uprising, 1881-1886.  At the beginning of the film Geronimo (Wes Studi) is
already a living legend, but he now wants peace and is willing to turn
himself over to the cavalry and settle into life at the reservation.  But
when an Indian holy man is killed in the incident at Cibicue Creek that led
to a battle killing several whites, Geronimo (who is present at the
incident) decides to break his agreement and head for Mexico.  The film
covers two expeditions to apprehend Geronimo and his final surrender.
     A major component of this film is the beautiful near-desert vistas that
serve as a backdrop of many of the scenes.  Here also you should take what
you are seeing with a grain of salt.  The actual terrain over which Geronimo
ranged, particularly around Tombstone, Fort Thomas, and Fort Bowie does not
look at all as majestic with few of the buttes and other rock formations
that we see with most of this film.  You find those a little further north
in Monument Valley and in Utah, the latter being where the exteriors were
filmed.  Real "Geronimo territory" is flat or hilly with sand and scrub.
     The film is based on a story by John Milius, who also co-authored the
script, and that leaves some latitude for fictionalizing.  While the film is
supposedly narrated by Davis, it is clearly not based on or even consistent
with the real Britton Davis' book about these incidents, THE TRUTH ABOUT
GERONIMO.  Do not take much of this film as actual history.  Geronimo was no
place near the Cibicue Creek battle.  In real life the incident happened
mostly to White Mountain Apaches, though there were a few Chiricahuas
present at the time.  The two different tribes of the Apache nation did not
even like each other more often than not.  Chiricahuas did not get on well
with Jicarilla Apaches, Mescalero Apaches, or White Mountain Apaches.
Geronimo's breakout was only very indirectly related to the battle of
Cibicue Creek.  Following Cibicue there was a large buildup in white
military force in the area and this buildup of power is probably what
frightened Geronimo off the reservation about a month later.  Britton Davis
greatly respects Geronimo in the film, while the real Davis called Geronimo
"a thoroughly vicious, intractable, and treacherous man."  He also called
the Apaches "wild, intractable, and resentful of restraint."  In that book
the real Davis had a different point of view both on the campaign against
Geronimo and on the warrior himself.  Also Davis did not go into Mexico
under the command of Miles, as it is shown in the film, and did not
participate in the final surrender of Geronimo.  If truth be known, other
tribes and even other Apaches considered Geronimo a loose cannon and an
uncontrollable terrorist.  His campaign against the whites probably put him
on the side of some justice, but not for what anyone would really consider
the right reasons.  As for Britton Davis resigning the army in indignation
over its policies against the Indians, that too is total invention.  Davis
resigned because he got a better job offer and did not like army life.  So
much of this film really is a very inaccurate account of what took place in
history, even if it does cover many real events and characters.  This is a
very distorted view to make history seem to support the Millius' wishful
interpretation.
     GERONIMO suffers a great deal by comparison to the recent GETTYSBURG.
GERONIMO's history is not nearly as accurate and at the same time
GETTYSBURG's characters were a good deal more interesting.  The lead is
Jason Patric as Lt. Charles Gatewood.  Patric is a good deal too handsome
and is not nearly as formal-looking or gaunt as the real Gatewood.  And he
lacks the real Gatewood's thick moustache.  The film wants you to sympathize
with his point of view, and has chosen to make him heart-throb handsome
rather than to go the extra step to make him look like the real Gatewood's
photographs.  But Patric is pretty good at horsemanship.  Gene Hackman also
fails to capture the look of his character.  General Crook wore a bushy
forked beard that gave the impression of one full beard going off to the
right and one to the left.  Director Walter Hill probably decided that the
real beard would upstage the actor.  Under Hill's flat direction, only Studi
seems to project any screen presence at all.  The historic Geronimo had a
perpetual scowl on his face and Studi is one of the few Indian actors who
really looks the part.  Ry Cooder's score, using Indian themes, may conjure
up an emotional response in people who know more about Indian music than I
do, but for me it conveyed very little of the feeling that was called for.
     GERONIMO: AN AMERICAN LEGEND is generally accurate to history while
still twisting events to support a predetermined set of conclusions.  It is
more fair to both sides than it might have been, but it still is a
lackluster piece of storytelling.  I give it a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Vampiros en La Habana (1985)
          Capsule review:  The watchable Cuban feature-cartoon was
     made for the international market.  It is pure fluff with no
     more political comment than MAN IN THE WHITE SUIT, which it
     occasionally resembles.
     After a short history of vampirism and the discovery of a drug to
protect vampires from the sunlight that irritates their skin and reduces
them to a pile of ashes, the scene is Havana in 1933.  Professor Von Dracula
and his nephew Joseph Amadeus have become the focus of a war between a
Chicago-based gang of vampires and another gang from Dusseldorf.  One gang
wants to control the "Vampisol" drug; the other wants to open beaches
protected from the sun and will be put out of business if Vampisol protects
vampires from sunlight.
     VAMPIRES EN HABANA (VAMPIRES IN HAVANA) is a 80-minute cartoon from
Cuba that lampoons vampire movies, gangster movies, Cuban entertainment,
James Bond films, Cuban history, and anything else within reach.  In many
ways it resembles Japan's "Lupin III" cartoons with a little more humor and
a little less logic to the action.  In it we discover that vampirism is a
wide-spread sub-culture with its own radio stations, its own version of the
Mafia--the Capa Nostra--its own mad scientists, and its own set of problems.
There are many kinds of vampire--one always appears in a bubble, like Glinda
the Good Witch--but Joseph Amadeus is a new kind.  Thanks to a monthly quaff
of Vampisol, he has so few symptoms of vampirism that he has grown up never
knowing that he is a vampire.
     The pace of VAMPIRES EN HABANA is breakneck, but the animation is
rather poor.  The artwork is unexceptional and includes racial stereotypes
that we reactionary capitalist lackeys would never dare to put into a film.
It is enjoyable but not very deep.  Writer-director Juan Padron makes his
film almost devoid of political comment or any other kind of comment.  Rate
it a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Mission: Impossible II (2000)
     The new "Mission: IMpossible" film is out for early summer
audiences.  It will have stiff box office competition from Disney's
current DINOSAUR which offers material that will appeal to adults.
     Once again we have a "Mission: Impossible" movie without a
"Mission Impossible" plot.   What is a "Mission: Impossible" plot?
It is like a jigsaw puzzle.  Through most of the plot you see the
pieces being fit together, but you have no idea what they build.
Suddenly toward the end you go through an "Ah-ha!" experience when
you understand what it is all for.  Then you see what you built do
its thing.  Maybe doing its thing is to make some banana republic
would-be Hitler suddenly appear to have been stealing from the
country's treasury.  It is a spy film powered by gray cells instead
of testosterone.  MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE 2 is as clueless as its
predecessor what its title claims it to be.  It is like me saying I
am going to write great romantic sonnets just like Shakespeare, but
I am going to write them in four lines.
     Instead of a "Mission: Impossible" plot it has something that
might have worked as a James Bond script.  And evens so, it would
have been a Bond script a little heavy on chases and fights.  For
too much of the screen time Cruise is just showing off for the
camera.  Cruise is trying to be the Douglas Fairbanks, Sr., of our
generation.  He wants to be dashing and handsome and superb at any
number of sports.  This film is too intent on glamorizing Cruise.
     As the story opens we have a scientist in Sydney, Australia,
who had developed a great anti-virus.  And to prove the anti-virus
works he has also developed a great deadly virus for his anti-virus
to counter.  (Yes, that's what he did.)  Now he wants to take the
virus and the anti-virus to the CDC in Atlanta so he injects himself
with the deadly virus.  The deadly strain will be benign for exactly
20 hours, then it will attack him like Ebola.  Our brilliant
scientist wants to get to Atlanta and inject himself with the anti-
virus and not become the Patient Zero of a virus that could destroy
the world.  And what does he do to be sure to get to Atlanta in
time?  He boards a commercial air flight.  (Is this making sense to
you?)  But there are baddies who will stop at nothing to get the
virus and anti-virus.  On the commercial plane the pilot happens to
be one of the baddies' gang.  (However did they manage that?  They
didn't even know what plane he would be taking.)  The baddies, led
by Sean Ambrose (Dougray Scott), seize the biological agents and
escape the plane, leaving it to crash.
     The Impossible Mission Force has to call in the vacationing
Ethan Hunt (played by Tom Cruise) who is having fun by climbing
about half a mile up a sheer rock face without benefit of equipment.
The IMF brings in Ethan and tells him to pick two team members as
well as recruit a third, one a beautiful jewel thief named Nyah
Nordoff-Hall (Thandie Newton).  (With a name like Nordoff-Hall one
wonders if there was a bounty on her head.)  In the best traditions
of Hitchcock's NOTORIOUS, she is asked to go not just under cover
but also between the sheets with former lover Ambrose.
     The film stars Tom Cruise as the lead agent of the IMF.
Thandie Newton is a new face and a different one, but she does not
have enough to do on the screen.  Tom Cruise plays the athletic
miracle man.  In an unbilled role, Anthony Hopkins is around to give
Cruise his orders.  Tom Cruise plays the great lover secret agent.
Dougray Scott is a little lackluster for the villain, but perhaps a
lackluster villain is more realistic.  Tom Cruise is there as the
quick-thinking super-agent.  The Impossible Mission team also has
the talented Ving Rhames returning as Luther Stickell.  He gets to
ride a helicopter and shoot a gun.  Rounding out the crack team of
four agents was some dude with a thin moustache and beard.  I don't
remember if he did anything or had any speaking lines.  I seem to
remember he flew the helicopter.  MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE 2 also
features Tom Cruise.
     MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE 2 was badly in need of another script re-
write, particularly by someone who was a fan of the original series.
John Woo keeps the action coming, but not the intelligence.  And Woo
is not able to make the action scenes believable or enjoyable.  The
climactic fight is as funny as it is contrived.  MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE
2 is more just a Tom Cruise vanity piece than anything else.  I rate
it 4 on the 0 to 10 scale and a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     I am starting to have a real problem with this whole mask
thing.  The idea seems borrowed from the opening of FROM RUSSIA WITH
LOVE, where it was fresh.  But let us be clear that to masquerade as
someone else with one of these masks requires a lot of preparation
ahead of time.  It cannot be easy to make a mask that would fool
someone into thinking they were seeing someone they knew when it was
really someone else.  The voice disguise would also take a
tremendous amount of preparation.  Probably neither could be done
without the cooperation of the person who is going to be
impersonated.  Further, people recognize each other by more than
scent, word-choice, accent, memories, and dozens of other
parameters.  The original series used impersonation very, very
sparingly giving the person a lot of preparation time and even then
it was really a credibility stretcher.  You do not just attack a
building with a back-pocket full of these impersonation masks ready
to use.  In addition dramatically it is a poor idea.  It distracts
the audience making them constantly wonder if they really know who
they are looking at or not.  The script uses it entirely too
frequently, whenever the writer wants to throw the audience a cheap
and easy curve ball.

Title
Review for Apollo 13 (1995)
     There were two important events in James Lovell's life in 1965.
He flew the Gemini 7 with Frank Borman, rendezvousing with Gemini 6.
That event got worldwide attention.  There was, however, a more
important event that even Lovell did not know about.  That was the year
that the design team on the Apollo program decided to increase the
voltage on the fuel cell oxygen tank heaters from 28 to 65 volts.  Only
a handful of people knew about that decision and James Lovell was not
one of them.  It was not a bad decision in itself, but it required
replacing the thermostatic switches in the tanks with ones that could
handle the extra load.  But that replacement was one detail that got
forgotten amongst the millions and millions of details necessary in
building a lunar rocket.  Under the right conditions the wiring could
run hot and the Teflon insulation fail, then the wiring could short,
the switches could fuse open, the oxygen could ignite, and the tank
could explode.  It was an unlikely chain of events, however, and it did
not happen to the first Apollo missions.  Five missions went into space
with what was essentially a bomb in their service module and each
returned safely.  Ron Howard brings to the screen the story of the
sixth Apollo mission into space, Apollo 13.
     When I go to see a historical film I like to get more than two
hours worth of entertainment.  I try to read all I can about the events
of the film and try to picture them myself.  I enjoy knowing that in
BRAVEHEART what they called the Battle of Stirling was really the
Battle of Stirling Bridge and Wallace won the battle because the
English army was half on each side of the bridge when he attacked.
Then if I write about the film I like to tell about what it got wrong.
However, I will not be pointing out much in the way of historical flaws
in APOLLO 13 because I have little to say.  In 1970 it was Swigert
saying "Houston, we had a problem," and I think in the film it was
Lovell saying it in the present tense.  Big deal.  At one point an
astronaut develops a fever.  It is a detail that could have been missed
in the accounts I read.  There may be two or three other minor
distortions.  Only GETTYSBURG has been as accurate an historical
dramatization in recent years.  Watching the film after reading
accounts of the flight I had fewer reactions of "Hey, they did that
wrong," and than of "Oh, that's what the book meant."  (The book,
incidentally, is A HISTORY OF MANNED SPACEFLIGHT by David Baker, a book
that is fairly detailed and authoritative.  NASA also has an account of
the mission on the World-Wide Web and which is included below.)  The
film does a remarkable job of making the technical concepts
comprehensible.  But where it comes to a choice between understandable
or accurate, the film chooses accuracy.  It was the right choice.  The
film takes the risk of not underestimating the intelligence of its
audience, and as of this writing seems to be playing to sell-out
crowds.  It may not have more thrills than a Sylvester Stallone film,
but they are authentic.
     The spirit of the film as well as the subject matter makes it a
logical successor to THE RIGHT STUFF.  The tone could well have been a
pessimistic account about the dangers of space exploration.  Instead,
Howard chooses to give us a much-needed reminder that the problems of
space are soluble, and they would continue to be so even under
incredibly short time constraints.  Like DIE HARD WITH A VENGEANCE,
this is a film about people solving problem quickly under extreme
pressure.  But the reason is not nearly so contrived and is far more
believable.  This is the story of the incredible no-excuses-no-failure
engineering feat of taking a wrecked spacecraft that had fifteen
minutes of life left in it and turning it into a lifeboat capable of
bringing three men 200,000 miles to a safe landing on Earth.
     The film begins with the Apollo 1 fire in 1967, a preparation for
a sub-theme of the fear with which the families of all the Apollo
astronauts live all the time but particularly during missions.  Jim
Lovell (Tom Hanks) tries to reassure his family, but still makes clear
to his wife (Kathleen Quinlan) that he is going to walk on the moon.
The film shows something of the training and the tricks of fate that
determine the crew who will go on the ill-fated voyage.  Much of this
part may be interpolated and the matter of guesswork.  But once the
flight begins--with what is probably the most breathtaking rocket
launch in any film fact or fiction--from there the NASA accounts of the
flight are pretty much the scenario of the film.
     Future films depicting the weightlessness of free-fall will have
APOLLO 13 as a standard to live up to.  There are no rotated camera
effects or floating objects on wires.  The weightless shots were filmed
in genuine weightlessness within the atmosphere.  The scenes were shot
in short segments aboard Air Force KC-135s flying parabolic courses to
create in actuality a zero-G set.  Some roles call for actors to make
special sacrifices, but having to actually act in freefall must have
been particularly difficult as well as unique.  It also must have made
it impossible to film any one long shot.
     Having to go through this particularly difficult form of acting is
Tom Hanks who is no doubt learned that a real lunar mission can have
more surprises than a box of chocolates.  His James Lovell, Jr., is
played with a sort of quiet professional dignity that is a first for
him.  Kevin Bacon plays the hot shot pilot John Swigert, Jr.  Playing
the third Junior of three on board, Fred Haise, Jr., is Bill Paxton.
None of these are particularly flashy roles.  After letting Tom Cruise
over-act just a little in FAR AND AWAY, Howard has much more subdued
performances in this film.  Kathleen Quinlan is losing some of the
fragility of her earlier roles, but what she still has is useful here.
And of course there is a role for Howard's favorite character actor,
his brother Clint, here playing a nerdy technician.  There is even a
semi-comic role for Ron Howard's mother as Lovell's slightly confused
mother.  Howard was reluctant to cast Ed Harris as nervous, go-getting
flight director Gene Krantz, since Harris is known best as John Glenn
in THE RIGHT STUFF.  However, the character is written thinly and the
audience needs the previous characterization to flesh out the
character.
     James Horner provides a score lending a quiet dignity to the
scientific pursuit supplemented by just a little too much rock music
that really does not do all that much to capture the feel of the
period.  More is done by the clothing and set design, especially the
occasional slide rule, which at least for a technical type (nerd) like
me did much more to create an early 1970s feel.  Also slightly overdone
was the emphasis on urine and vomit.  Special effects are first-rate
and flawless.
     This film is a paean to the power of perseverance to solve even
the most impossible problems.  This one is well worth braving the
crowds to see.  I give it a low +3 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     What follows is NASA's own account of the flight of Apollo 13.
Consider it one big spoiler:
Mission Objective:
   Apollo 13 was supposed to land in the Fra Mauro area.  An explosion on
   board forced Apollo 13 to circle the moon without landing.  The Fra Mauro
   site was reassigned to Apollo 14.
     At five and a half minutes after liftoff, Swigert, Haise, and
Lovell felt a little vibration.  Then the center engine of the S-II
stage shut down two minutes early.  This caused the remaining four
engines to burn 34 seconds longer than planned, and the S-IVB third
stage had to burn nine seconds longer to put Apollo 13 in orbit.
     Days before the mission, backup LM pilot Charlie Duke
inadvertently exposed the crew to German measles.  Command module
pilot, Ken Mattingly, turned out to have no immunity to measles and was
replaced by backup command module pilot Jack Swigert.
     Ground tests before launch, indicated the possibility of a poorly
insulated supercritical helium tank in the LM's descent stage so the
flight plan was modified to enter the LM three hours early in order to
obtain an onboard readout of helium tank pressure.
     The No. 2 oxygen tank, serial number 10024X-TA0009 had been
previously installed in the service module of Apollo 10, but was
removed for modification (and was damaged in the process of removal).
The tank was fixed, tested at the factory, installed in the Apollo 13
service module and tested again during the Countdown Demonstration Test
(CDT) at the Kennedy Space Center beginning March 16, 1970.  The tanks
normally are emptied to about half full, and No. 1 behaved all right.
But No. 2 dropped to only 92 percent of capacity.  Gaseous oxygen at 80
psi was applied through the vent line to expel the liquid oxygen, but
to no avail.  An interim discrepancy report was written, and on March
27, two weeks before launch, detanking operations were resumed.  No. 1
again emptied normally, but No. 2 did not.  After a conference with
contractor and NASA personnel, the test director decided to "boil off"
the remaining oxygen in No. 2 by using the electrical heater within the
tank.  The technique worked, but it took eight hours of 65-volt DC
power from the ground-support equipment to dissipate the oxygen.  Due
to an oversight in replacing an understated component during a design
modification, this turned out to severely damage the internal heating
elements of the tank.
     Third lunar landing attempt.  Mission was aborted after rupture of
service module oxygen tank.  Classed as "successful failure" because of
experience in rescuing crew.  Spent upper stage successfully impacted
on the Moon.
     The first two days the crew ran into a couple of minor surprises,
but generally Apollo 13 was looking like the smoothest flight of the
program.  At 46 hours 43 minutes Joe Kerwin, the CapCom on duty, said,
"The spacecraft is in real good shape as far as we are concerned.
We're bored to tears down here." It was the last time anyone would
mention boredom for a long time.
     At 55 hours 46 minutes, as the crew finished a 49-minute TV
broadcast showing how comfortably they lived and worked in
weightlessness, Lovell stated: "This is the crew of Apollo 13 wishing
everybody there a nice evening, and we're just about ready to close out
our inspection of Aquarius (the LM) and get back for a pleasant evening
in Odyssey (the CM).  Good night."
     Nine minutes later, Oxygen tank No. 2 blew up, causing No. 1 tank
also to fail.  The Apollo 13 command modules normal supply of
electricity, light, and water was lost, and they were about 200,000
miles from Earth.
     The message came in the form of a sharp bang and vibration.  Jack
Swigert saw a warning light that accompanied the bang, and said,
"Houston, we've had a problem here." Lovell came on and told the ground
that it was a main B bus undervolt.  The time was 2108 hours on April
13.
     Next, the warning lights indicated the loss of two of Apollo 13's
three fuel cells, which were the spacecrafts prime source of
electricity.  With warning lights blinking on, One Oxygen tank appeared
to be completely empty, and there were indications that the oxygen in
the second tank was rapidly being depleted.
     Thirteen minutes after the explosion, Lovell happened to look out
of the left-hand window, and saw the final evidence pointing toward
potential catastrophe. "We are venting something out into the- into
space," he reported to Houston.  Jack Lousma, the CapCom replied,
"Roger, we copy you venting." Lovell said, "It's a gas of some sort."
It was a gas- oxygen- escaping at a high rate from the second, and
last, oxygen tank.
     (by James A. Lovell, from Apollo Expeditions to the Moon, edited
by Edgar M. Cortright, NASA SP; 350, Washington, DC, 1975 )
     The first thing the crew did, even before discovering the oxygen
leak, was to try to close the hatch between the CM and the LM.  They
reacted spontaneously, like submarine crews, closing the hatches to
limit the amount of flooding.  First Jack and then Lovell tried to lock
the reluctant hatch, but the stubborn lid wouldn't stay shut'
Exasperated, and realizing that there wasn't a cabin leak, they
strapped the hatch to the CM couch.
     The pressure in the No. 1 oxygen tank continued to drift downward;
passing 300 psi, now heading toward 200 psi.  Months later, after the
accident investigation was complete, it was determined that, when No.2
tank blew up, it either ruptured a line on the No. 1 tank, or caused
one of the valves to leak.  When the pressure reached 200 psi, the crew
and ground controllers knew that they would lose all oxygen, which
meant that the last fuel cell would also die.
     At 1 hour and 29 seconds after the bang, Jack Lousma, then CapCom,
said after instructions from Flight Director Glynn Lunney: "It is
slowly going to zero, and we are starting to think about the LM
lifeboat." Swigert replied, "That's what we have been thinking about
too."
     Ground controllers in Houston faced a formidable task.  Completely
new procedures had to be written and tested in the simulator before
being passed up to the crew.  The navigation problem had to be solved;
essentially how, when, and in what attitude to burn the LM descent
engine to provide a quick return home.
     With only 15 minutes of power left in the CM, CapCom told the crew
to make their way into the LM.  Fred and Jim Lovell quickly floated
through the tunnel, leaving Jack to perform the last chores in the
Command Module.  The first concern was to determine if there were
enough consumables to get home? The LM was built for only a 45-hour
lifetime, and it needed to be stretch to 90.  Oxygen wasn't a problem.
The full LM descent tank alone would suffice, and in addition, there
were two ascent-engine oxygen tanks, and two backpacks whose oxygen
supply would never be used on the lunar surface.  Two emergency bottles
on top of those packs had six or seven pounds each in them. (At LM
jettison, just before reentry, 28.5 pounds of oxygen remained, more
than half of what was available after the explosion).
     Power was also a concern.  There were 2181 ampere hours in the LM
batteries, Ground controllers carefully worked out a procedure where
the CM batteries were charged with LM power.  All non-critical systems
were turned off and energy consumption was reduced to a fifth of normal
which resulted in having 20 percent of our LM electrical power left
when Aquarius was jettisoned.  There was one electrical close call
during the mission.  One of the CM batteries vented with such force
that it momentarily dropped off the line.  Had the battery failed,
there would be insufficient power to return the ship to Earth.
     Water was the main consumable concern.  It was estimated that the
crew would run out of water about five hours before Earth reentry,
which was calculated at around 151 hours.  However, data from Apollo 11
(which had not sent its LM ascent stage crashing into the Moon as in
subsequent missions) showed that its mechanisms could survive seven or
eight hours in space without water cooling.  The crew conserved water.
They cut down to six ounces each per day, a fifth of normal intake, and
used fruit juices; they ate hot dogs and other wet-pack foods when they
ate at all.  The crew became dehydrated throughout the flight and set a
record that stood up throughout Apollo: Lovell lost fourteen pounds,
and the crew lost a total of 31.5 pounds, nearly 50 percent more than
any other crew.  Those stringent measures resulted in our finishing
with 28.2 pounds of water, about 9 percent of the total.
     Removal of Carbon Dioxide was also a concern.  There were enough
lithium hydroxide canisters, which remove carbon dioxide from the
spacecraft, but the square canisters from the Command Module were not
compatible with the round openings in the Lunar Module environmental
system.  There were four cartridge from the LM, and four from the
backpacks, counting backups.  However, the LM was designed to support
two men for two days and was being asked to care for three men nearly
four days.  After a day and a half in the LM a warning light showed
that the carbon dioxide had built up to a dangerous level.  Mission
Control devised a way to attach the CM canisters to the LM system by
using plastic bags, cardboard, and tape- all materials carried on
board.
     One of the big questions was, "How to get back safely to Earth?"
The LM navigation system wasn't designed to help us in this situation.
Before the explosion, at 30 hours and 40 minutes, Apollo 13 had made
the normal midcourse correction, which would take it out of a free-
return-to-Earth trajectory and put it on a lunar landing course.  Now
the task was to get back on a free-return course.  The ground computed
a 35-second burn and fired it 5 hours after the explosion.  As they
approached the Moon, another burn was computed; this time a long 5-
minute burn to speed up the return home.  It took place 2 hours after
rounding the far side of the Moon,
     The Command Module navigational platform alignment was transferred
to the LM but verifying alignment was difficult.  Ordinarily the
alignment procedure uses an onboard sextant device, called the
Alignment Optical Telescope, to find a suitable navigation star.  Then
with the help of the onboard computer verify the guidance platform's
alignment.  However, due to the explosion, a swarm of debris from the
ruptured service module made it impossible to sight real stars.  An
alternate procedure was developed to use the sun as an alignment star.
Lovell rotated the spacecraft to the attitude Houston had requested and
when he looked through the AOT, the Sun was just where it was expected.
The alignment with the Sun proved to be less than a half a degree off.
The ground and crew then knew they could do the 5-minute P.C. + 2 burn
with assurance, and that would cut the total time of our voyage to
about 142 hours.  At 73:46 hours the air-to-ground transcript describes
the event:
     "I'm told the cheer of the year went up in Mission Control.
Flight Director Gerald Griffin, a man not easily shaken, recalls: "Some
years later I went back to the log and looked up that mission.  My
writing was almost illegible I was so damned nervous.  And I remember
the exhilaration running through me: My God, that's kinds the last
hurdle -- if we can do that, I know we can make it.  It was funny,
because only the people involved knew how important it was to have that
platform properly aligned." Yet Gerry Griffin barely mentioned the
alignment in his change-of- shift briefing -- "That check turned out
real well" is all he said an hour after his penmanship failed him
Neither did we, as crew members, refer to it as a crisis in our press
conference nor in later articles."
     James A. Lovell ( Apollo Expeditions to the Moon, edited by Edgar
M. Cortright, NASA SP; 350, Washington, DC, 1975 )
     The trip was marked by discomfort beyond the lack of food and
water.  Sleep was almost impossible because of the cold.  When the
electrical systems were turned off, the spacecraft lost and important
source of heat.  The temperature dropped to 38 F and condensation
formed on all the walls.
     A most remarkable achievement of Mission Control was quickly
developing procedures for powering up the CM after its long cold sleep.
They wrote the documents for this innovation in three days, instead of
the usual three months.  The Command Module was cold and clammy at the
start of power up.  The walls, ceiling, floor, wire harnesses, and
panels were all covered with droplets of water.  It was suspected
conditions were the same behind the panels.  The chances of short
circuits caused apprehension, but thanks to the safeguards built into
the command module after the disastrous Apollo-1 fire in January 1967,
no arcing took place.  The droplets furnished one sensation as we
decelerated in the atmosphere: it rained inside the CM.
     Four hours before landing, the crew shed the service module;
Mission Control had insisted on retaining it until then because
everyone feared what the cold of space might do to the unsheltered CM
heat shield.  Photos of the Service Module showed one whole panel
missing, and wreckage hanging out, it was a sorry mess as it drifted
away.  Three hours later the crew left the Lunar Module Aquarius and
then splashed down gently in the Pacific Ocean near Samoa,
     After an intensive investigation, the Apollo 13 Accident Review
Board identified the cause of the explosion.  In 1965 the CM had
undergone many improvements, which included raising the permissible
voltage to the heaters in the oxygen tanks from 28 to 65 volts DC.
Unfortunately, the thermostatic switches on these heaters weren't
modified to suit the change.  During one final test on the launch pad,
the heaters were on for a long period of time. "This subjected the
wiring in the vicinity of the heaters to very high temperatures (1000
F), which have been subsequently shown to severely degrade Teflon
insulation ... the thermostatic switches started to open while
powered by 65 volts DC and were probably welded shut." Furthermore,
other warning signs during testing went unheeded and the tank, damaged
from 8 hours overheating, was a potential bomb the next time it was
filled with oxygen.  That bomb exploded on April 13, 1970 -- 200,000
miles from Earth.

Title
Review for Closet Land (1991)
          Capsule review:  A great idea for a film disappointingly
     squandered.  This is a two-person play about a woman accused
     of treason and a government interrogator trying to force her
     to sign a confession.  This could have been a powerful
     statement for Amnesty International, but its special power is
     lost on far-fetched plot contrivances and misjudgements in
     atmosphere.  It's still worth seeing, though.  Rating: 0 (-4
     to +4).
     Charlie Brown asked it after a particularly bad performance by his
baseball team: "How can we lose if we're so sincere?"  Sad to say, sincerity
is not enough.  Radha Bharadwaj wrote the play CLOSET LAND and directed the
film with what I am sure was nothing but great sincerity and the best of
intentions.  And if this film had been done correctly, it would have been a
film that is desperately needed with what is a very important message.  That
message is blunted with what turns out to be a contrived plot and a set of
unbelievable circumstances.
     In an unnamed country a woman (played by Madelaine Stowe) has been
kidnapped and is brought before an interrogator (played by Alan Rickman).
At first it appears to have all been a mistake.  She is non-political--a
simple writer of children's stories.  One of the stories, "Closet Land"--
still unpublished--has fallen into the hands of the government.  They
interpret it as a bitter anti-government allegory and now the government
wants the woman to sign a confession of sedition.  She is put through a
mind-numbing succession of mental and physical tortures to debase and
humiliate her in an attempt to get her to sign.
     So far, so good.  If that was all there was to this film it would be a
painful film to watch but it would make a powerful statement for Amnesty
International, for whose benefit this film seems to have been made.  The
incident portrayed here could be seen to be in many ways typical of crimes
committed by far too many governments today.  This view of government
political sadism is and should be a bitter pill to swallow.  But there is
more of a plot to CLOSET LAND than that and there is where the film goes
frustratingly wrong, making this incident anything but typical.
     When we see the real reasons behind the woman writing her story "Closet
land" and the real motives of the interrogator, both seem extremely
contrived and built around an incredible coincidence.  The interrogator
pulls off a number of odd deceptions; some require talents beyond even the
capabilities of Rickman to bring off.  One doubts that a man as talented as
the interrogator would become a government interrogator/torturer.  Surely we
are not meant to believe most people in this profession are this
intelligent.  Further undercutting the credibility is the set design of the
interrogation center.  One suspects in real life such places are at best
utilitarian.  This chamber, with its fancy furniture, its sound and light
equipment, its decorative columns, its functional yet decorative file
drawers, creates just the wrong feel.
     What is needed is a story that one can tell oneself is being  repeated
on a daily basis in many countries around the world.  Instead, we have a
story we doubt could have ever happened.  That makes this film a curiosity
rather than a powerful statement.  I give it a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Radioland Murders (1994)
     Back in the days when George Lucas had a perfect instinct for what
did and did not work on the screen, Steven Spielberg was hitting a bad
patch with films like 1941, a frenetic comedy with contrived scenes
that looked too much like clockwork in need of a tune-up.  1941 was
full of jokes that could have worked but their timing was off or they
just seemed too contrived.  Now it is Spielberg who seems to have the
feel for what works on the screen and Lucas has produced his own comedy
with all the faults of 1941.
     The year is not 1941 but 1939, and it is the first night of new
radio network, WBN.  That is the name of both the network and of the
Chicago station where the broadcasts originate.  Just minutes before
show time the new owner throws out half the scripts for the evening's
programs.  This is all it takes to turn chaos at the station into
pandemonium.  And most of the pressure falls on Roger, the chief writer
of the station.  Roger thought his life was already hectic.  Besides
writing for the new network he is in the midst of a campaign to win
back Penny, his estranged wife who also happens to be the personal
assistant to the owner of the station.  As bad as things are, they are
about to get a lot worse.  A phantom voice seems to be going out over
the broadcast waves and each time it speaks, somebody at the station is
murdered.  And who do the police suspect but head writer Roger?
     The plot of RADIOLAND MURDERS is straight out of a 1940s comedy--
perhaps with Bob Hope or Cary Grant--but the pacing and rhythms seem
tailored more to the music video generation with little short choppy
scenes to keep the action moving at a breakneck pace.  There is some
fun in spotting 40s radio programs being created for this supposed
fourth radio network.  The shows are mostly imitations of real radio
programs from the same time.  Though they are not called by the same
names we see recreations of "Spike Jones and his City Slickers," "Sam
Spade," "The Shadow," and "One Man's Family," as well as shows that
never played on the radio, but were in the same spirit.  One show
called "The Black Whip" is based on Zorro.  (The title may be inspired
by the movie serial ZORRO'S BLACK WHIP.)  Still this is not a very good
representation of what radio was like.  All shows seem here to be done
live with absurdly ornate costumes--an odd expense for radio.  Clearly
somebody confused radio with early television.  Why would anybody puta
tap dancer in a large cigarette pack on the radio?  Time and again this
film sacrifices logic for a piece of spectacle or a gag.  In one scene
Roger sits on a ledge typing a script, but later when it suits the plot
we are told that he is terrified of heights.  Also it is absurd that a
station owner would wait until the last moment and then throw out all
the scripts for the evening just minutes before the evening's
programming starts.  The fact is that it is the script by Willard
Huyck, Gloria Katz, Jeff Reno, and Ron Osborn that needed re-write
most.  Their imitations of radio drama really fail to catch the spirit
of the originals.  Admittedly for every good radio drama like "Broadway
Is My Beat," there were five silly melodramatic shows like "The
Whisperer" or "I Love a Mystery."  But even the bad shows on the radio
were a lot better than most of the lampoons in this film.
     Mel Smith, who directed RADIOLAND MURDERS, is a familiar figure
from British comedy television, but he probably never experienced the
Golden Age of Radio in America and so is a bad choice to direct.  His
humor, in the Benny Hill mold, is to throw in lots of gags but not to
create any characters on the screen.  Roger is played by Brian Benben,
who has moments but just is not the talent to carry the film.  Benben
plays a character similar to Roger but a very different type of humor
in his "Dream On" series on HBO.  He is the only actor in the film who
might have done something with is role, but even he doesn't do much but
dress in funny costumes.  Mary Stuart Masterson as second lead is on
the screen far less and does not have much opportunity to raise her
role above a stereotyped Girl Friday.
     This is a film that was made because it could look like a lot more
than its $10 million price tag.  Lucas demonstrates that clever special
effects can make an inexpensive film look like it cost a lot more than
it did--even for a film that is not science fiction.  But in his
headlong rush to make this a good-looking film, he neglected the final
re-write or two that this script would have needed.  And Lucas did not
get the right director.  The majority of the gags in the dialog just
fall flat.  Comic scenes go off like clockwork, but lack spontaneity
and are just not funny.  Admittedly that may not be true of the whole
film, there are many very funny scenes that do work.  This certainly is
a comedy with more laughs than, say, ONLY YOU.  But with such paper-
thin characters, the look of the film and the gags that do work are
just not enough.
     For a nostalgic look at pre-war radio, there are better choices
for films.  There is more authentic period feel in RADIO DAYS or for
that matter in THE SHADOW.  With a bit more work this could have beena
much better film but as it stands I give this one a high 0 on the -4 to
+4 scale.

Title
Review for Equus (1977)
     Muhammed Vanker wrote to me saying that he could not find any
reviews on the Internet for the film EQUUS (1977) and asked if I could
point him to one.  Well, the answer was no.  There are probably a lot
of major films from prior to the explosion of the Internet that have no
reviews readily available.  Though I had seen the film once in 1978 and
only once again in the early 1980s, the film left a deep impression on
me.  In part because for years I said that the film, actually a play by
Peter Shaffer makes a very good companion piece to another film by
Peter's brother Anthony Shaffer, THE WICKER MAN.  EQUUS is in part
about the birth of religions, THE WICKER MAN is about the maintenance
of religions.  Possibly the third film should be INHERIT THE WIND,
about the death of religions.  In any case I sent Vanker the quick
outline of what I would say if I were to review EQUUS.  With that in
place, I might as well go ahead and complete the review.  These
comments are based on memories of the film from at least thirteen years
ago.  Please excuse the brevity and perhaps even minor inaccuracies.
     Richard Burton plays a psychiatrist (himself very troubled) who
tries to get inside the mind of a sociopathic stable boy (Peter Firth)
who has blinded the horses who were left in his care.   The boy resists
for a long time any cooperation with the psychiatrist, but finally does
open up to reveal a troubled past.  What Burton discovers is that the
boy has is deeply disturbed but also has a mystical train of mind.  The
stable-boy has created for himself something like a religion (with
strong sexual overtones) worshipping horses.  The religion has its own
ceremonies and  the boy even turns the bits from the horses mouths into
a sort of religious icons which he calls the "Jingle-jangle." The
religion, however, cannot fulfill the boy and after an attempted sexual
encounter that fails his utter frustration was release in the horse
blinding.  This scene, depicted in reenactment, is an intense scene in
which angry boy lashes out against his god.  The full frontal male
nudity in the reenactment scene was rare in 1977 and quite shocking.
     In some ways the play EQUUS is perhaps ill-suited for cinema since
it is so dense in ideas that deserve considering.  It is one film that
would perhaps be better on video than in the theater.  The viewer will
be able to stop and even replay passages to think over their content
and impact.  The pace of ideas is so fast that you cannot think about
one idea before the next one comes along.  Still would have been really
powerful with the immediacy of a stage performance.  Richard Burton and
Peter Firth in two main roles were both nominated for Academy Awards as
was Peter Shaffer.  The film was directed by Sidney Lumet who had
previous directed several classics including TWELVE ANGRY MEN and
FAIL-SAFE.  This is, however, his most intense film and it rates a low
+3 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Deep Impact (1998)
     We have had a long period in which special effects have driven
science fiction films rather than characters or ideas.  Last year's
CONTACT was a very good science fiction film with three-dimensional
characters. DEEP IMPACT is the first of two major theatrical films
(along with at least one TV movie) inspired by the Shoemaker-Levy
comet's impact on Jupiter and speculation of what if it had been Earth
that had been hit.  At least in plot and ideas the film is highly
reminiscent of George Pal's classic WHEN WORLDS COLLIDE.  However the
emotional texture of the film also has some of ON THE BEACH.  For the
admittedly small sub-genre of films about celestial impacts on Earth
films--not forgetting METEOR--this is likely to remain the best.
     Teenager Leo Biederman (Elijah Wood) sights a celestial body that
just should not be where he sees it.  He reports his finding to
professional astronomer Marcus Wolf (Charles Martin Smith).  Wolf
confirms that indeed it is a new comet.  But Wolf also discovers it is
on a collision course with Earth.  A year passes and TV news reporter
Jenny Lerner trips on something very secret going on in Washington.
There seems to be a serious sex scandal, one sufficient to cause the
Secretary of the Treasury to resign.  In Washington any sufficiently
well kept secret is indistinguishable from a sex scandal.  Jenny wants
to get the goods on the Secretary of the Treasury and instead stumbles
onto what is accurately called the biggest story in world history.  The
United States and Russia are secretly cooperating on efforts to avert
the disaster that is coming our way in the form of Comet Wolf-
Biederman.  The story moves back and forth among multiple story lines.
Morgan Freeman plays a President of the United States whom the script
uses mostly just to make major announcements.  Spurgeon Tanner (Robert
Duvall) is a crusty ex-Apollo astronaut on a mission to destroy the
comet.  But he has a strained relationship with younger astronauts on
the same mission.  Leo Biederman must come to terms with the new fame
he has received having his name associated with a deadly menace to his
planet.  And Jenny Lerner is resolving her relationship with her
separated parents.
     The chief problem with DEEP IMPACT is that two hours is really
about a third of what would be needed to do the story realistically and
cover most of the parts that should be told.  That seems to imply TV
mini-series.  But it requires the wide-screen to do justice to the
visual aspects of the story.  Certainly in the early parts of the film
it seems to be rushing through what is just an outline of what the
story should be.  Much of the story goes by in a very superficial
manner.  Interesting and some sometimes spectacular scenes are left out
that would inevitably take place if a comet were headed for earth.
Cooperation is reached between two country's space agencies.  Huge
projects that dwarf the Manhattan Project occur off-stage.  While in
the plot there is hope for some people and not others, one would expect
great rioting by those less fortunate.  This is only hinted at.  While
human reactions are much more believable than they were in WHEN WORLDS
COLLIDE, they are still far from convincing. We see only frustratingly
sketchy details in a headlong rush to get to still meatier parts of the
story.
     Still the film has a real credibility that is broken only in the
semi-optimistic final reel.  The emphasis of the script is on people
and not special effects, though when the film calls for effects, they
are there in force with some very nice sequences.  DEEP IMPACT and
CONTACT are evidence that the science fiction film is not just for
thrill-hungry teenagers.  It can tell a story on an adult level and
convincingly take us places we have never been and in some cases may
never again want to go.  I give DEEP IMPACT an 8 on the 0 to 10 scale
and a low +3 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Good Morning, Babylon (1987)
          Capsule review:  At last--the untold story that film
     historians have been waiting for: the mammoth epic story of
     how the elephants were sculpted for the Babylon set of
     INTOLERANCE and the tragic story of the men who devoted their
     lives so that you and I might have better elephants.  A
     slightly overdone Italian film about the early days of
     Hollywood.  Rate it a slightly bemused -2.
     Right now you are probably asking yourself why it is that it was the
United States and not Italy that for so many years dominated the
international film market even after that great Italian masterpiece of 1913,
CABIRIA, directed by Giovanni Pastione.  Well, Italian directors Paolo and
Vittorio Taviani have brought the whole sordid story of how two poor
brothers from Italy saved Hollywood by sculpting the elephants for the
Babylon set of D. W. Griffith's INTOLERANCE.
     Ah, yes.  What a gripping tale it is, as two young architect-sculptors
find themselves out of work in Italy and come to the United States only to
find that they can be employed only as pig-herders.  But talents like theirs
cannot remain hidden long and soon they become plasterers for the great San
Francisco Exposition.  Meanwhile, D. W. Griffith sees CABIRIA and is
stunned.  It is greater than anything he ever did.  How can an American hope
to compete with the great Italian film industry?  And what impressed D. W.
the most?  The great stone elephant!  D. W. cancels his current film.  He
must make a film with stone elephants.  But where can he find someone with
talent enough to sculpt truly great elephants?  In the nick of time he sees
the Italian architecture at the San Francisco Exposition and asks to get the
same geniuses.
     But the boys' troubles are not over yet.  They still must overcome
genuine intolerance before they can achieve their destiny and sculpt the
elephants for the Babylon set of the film INTOLERANCE.  Their troubles
aren't even over when, on the premiere night of INTOLERANCE, D. W. Griffith
cannot accept the applause of the audience.  He defers the credit to where
it is really due, to the two Italian boys who sculpted the elephants for the
Babylon set.  Then destiny separates the brothers only to bring them
together once again on a World War I Italian battlefield where, dying
together, too weak to struggle to get help, they find strength enough to
film each other dying.  Their last effort is to leave a lasting momento for
the kids at home and all those legions of fans of the stone elephants in the
Babylon set of INTOLERANCE.
     Believe it or not, GOOD MORNING, BABYLON was not a comedy.  And the
same directors did the very fine NIGHT OF THE SHOOTING STARS.  Harlan
Ellison can rest easy.  Somebody finally made a sappier film about Hollywood
than his film THE OSCAR.  Rate this one a -2 on the -4 to +4 scale.  Oh, an
historical note: CABIRIA did make something of a splash at the time and had
one indelible effect on the Italian film industry.  This 1913 film
introduced the character Machiste, who has returned in countless Italian
strongman films.  Many times his name shows up as Atlas or Samson or Goliath
in the English translation, but in Italian it was Machiste.

Title
Review for Eight Men Out (1988)
          Capsule review:  Intriguing account of the 1919 "Black
     Sox" scandal, well-directed by John Sayles.  Like MATEWAN, it
     is a good piece of historical story-telling with an
     intentional political edge.  Rating: +2.
     I guess it is official now, at least in my own mind: John Sayles is now
one of the major film directors of the day.  He slowly built a reputation
with RETURN OF THE SECAUCUS SEVEN (which pre-dated THE BIG CHILL but was a
sort of BIG CHILL with real people), LIANNA, and THE BROTHER FROM ANOTHER
PLANET.  But he really scored with MATEWAN, the Eisenstein-esque account of
the coming of the union to a West Virginia coal mining town.  He took what
was reportedly a modest budget and made an epic historical film.  EIGHT MEN
OUT is a cut or two below MATEWAN, but a pretty decent film in its own
right.
     EIGHT MEN OUT is the story of the "Black Sox" scandal of 1919.  In that
year seven players on the Chicago White Sox found themselves between the
carrot of mobsters offering them bribes and the stick of owners who made
large profits but did not pay a living wage and who cheated on their
promises of bonuses.  (The eighth man of the title maintained that he had
never accepted any bribes.)  Watching the results of this triangle from a
distance are, on one hand, sportswriters and on the other, the kids who are
the real fans of the game.  Then some hoods with ties to the notorious
Arnold Rothstein want to fix the World Series but are rebuffed by the
players until one of the players is denied a bonus he was to have gotten if
he won thirty games.  It seems he won twenty-nine and would have won more if
the owner of the club had not pulled him out of some games.  After that,
one-by-one the players surrender to the lure of a little easy money.  The
willingness of the Sox to be bribed starts a sub-plot of betrayal in
Rothstein's organization, a sub-plot (incidentally) that Sayles never ties
up.
     In some ways EIGHT MEN OUT makes a good companion piece to THE NATURAL.
Both are poetically filmed stories of early baseball, criminal influence,
and the ever-present sportscasters' commentary to a public hungry for sports
news.  But, perhaps because it is a true story, EIGHT MEN OUT lack THE
NATURAL's clean and uncomplicated storyline.  Actually, the film is more
likely to invite comparison to MATEWAN with its photography, its historical
storyline, and several overlapping actors (including Sayles himself).  EIGHT
MEN OUT is the best sports film since THE NATURAL.  Rate it a +2 on the -4
to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Sliding Doors (1998)
     Some of the most interesting science fiction films have no special
effects at all.  SLIDING DOORS is a new film much in the mold of the
1971 film QUEST FOR LOVE.  Each tells a pair of love stories in
parallel timelines that have split off from each other.  In SLIDING
DOORS we cut from one story to the other seeing how things progress for
our character in each of the two possible futures.  Some things happen
quite differently, some are mysteriously similar.
     Helen (Gwyneth Paltrow) is already not having a good day.  She has
just lost a nice job at a London public relations firm.  She is headed
back to her apartment where, unbeknownst to her, boy friend Gerry (John
Lynch) is two-timing her (no pun intended).  He is shagging with his
old girl friend Lydia (Jeanne Tripplehorn).  As Helen is heading down
the stairs to the Underground, time mysteriously splits.  From this
point on, we cut back and forth between the two worlds following the
lives of Helen1 in one world and Helen2 in the other.  Helen1 is
delayed ever-so-slightly on the stairs and gets to her platform just in
time to have the train sliding doors slam in her face with her on the
wrong side.  Helen2, who was not delayed on the stairs, gets to the
train a moment sooner, makes the train, and finds a seat next to the
charming James (John Hannah).  Helen1 is forced to look for a cab and
on the way is mugged.  She must spend a few hours in hospital.  Helen2,
not delayed, returns to the flat to find Gerry2 in bed with Lydia2.
Deciding that she needs an entirely new life, Helen2 leaves Gerry2 and
goes to live with her best friend.  Helen1 is released from the
hospital and returns home to find some evidence that Gerry1 is cheating
on her, but is in no mood to chase it down.  Each Helen has to find a
new living now.  Helen1 puts her hair in braids and takes a job as a
waitress.  Helen2 starts wearing her hair blond and short and sets up
her own public relations firm. After two or three chance encounters
with James2, Helen2 decides to start dating him, in spite of not
trusting him after her former relationship.  Gerry2 takes up with
Lydia2 again but wants to win Helen2 back and Lydia2 is just as
determined to stand in the way.  Meanwhile Helen1 becomes more and more
suspicious that Gerry1 is cheating on her.
     This is not an easy concept to get across to the audience.  It
would just not be very subtle to put a placard in front of the audience
saying "time is splitting and we are following two futures for Helen."
At one time it might have been handled, as it was in QUEST FOR LOVE,
with a wise old scientist popping up to explain that time has taken two
paths and Helen is in each world living different lives.  But either
would have been crude and the accent here is not on the science but on
just exploring two possible futures for the same modern woman.  And
unfortunately just when the concept would have been most confusing for
the audience, just after the split has taken place, the two lives are
the most similar.  The viewer probably does not realize there is a
Gerry1 and a Gerry2 and wonders why Gerry1 does not remember the
falling-out that Gerry2 had with Helen2.  However as Helen1's
appearance and life diverges from that of Helen2 it becomes somewhat
clearer
     As everyone is aware, Paltrow is an actress who is pleasant to
look at but who rarely get challenging roles. This is by far her best
acting, as she plays two women growing and changing in different ways
from the same beginning.  Unfortunately, there is not much original
required in either of her roles.  Betrayed lovers have been done all
too frequently on the screen.  John Hannah is likable on the screen,
John Lynch seems a little too befuddled to be leading a double life.
Neither does much extraordinary.  This film offers an interesting idea
but little beyond the novelty of the two parallel paths.  Neither story
by itself is of sufficient interest that anyone would pay to see it in
a theater.  Even if both stories were told consecutively one after the
other they would be two very bland stories.  Only a little obvious
contrivance gives the film a tiny amount of dramatic tension toward the
end of each story.  It is the editing together and simultaneous telling
that give the film its ginger.  That allows the viewer to compare two
futures and is what makes the exercise worth seeing.

Title
Review for Babe: Pig in the City (1998)
     The second Babe film, BABE: PIG IN THE CITY, had plenty of room to
repeat what was good about the 1995 BABE. Co-writer and director George
Miller really did not need to change the film's approach.  But Miller
was not content to rest on his laurels.  The sequel is quite a
different film and gives the audience much that is new and quite
different to enjoy.  Is it as good as the first film?  To my mind it is
not quite as good.  The story is a little less a coherent story and the
big climax of the film is more slapstick and less subtle excitement.
Like BABE this is family entertainment, but I think it offers a little
less for the children and perhaps a little less for the adults also.
The tone is definitely darker and more disturbing.  But like BABE,
BABE: PIG IN THE CITY is probably the best family film of its year.
And it is one of the rare family films that may well be better
appreciated by adults than by children.
     The Hoggett Farm is certainly having its ups and it downs.  After
a series of adventures related in the first film Babe has won
international fame as the pig who is a sheep dog.  Things are going
well until Farmer Hoggett is disabled in a freak accident.  (Note: the
scenario of this accident was a joke told as early as the Fred Allen
radio program in the 1940s and has appeared other places since.  It may
even be older than that. But to the best of my knowledge, this is the
first time anybody filmed this strange sequence of events.) With Mr.
Hoggett unable to care for his farm it falls on hard times and the bank
is ready and anxious to make the times even harder.  Mrs. Hoggett takes
the famous pig to display him at a fair.  But events conspire to maroon
Mrs. Hoggett in the city with her pig and then to leave her pig all
alone.  Babe finds himself the new animal in a house full of animals
with dubious human supervision.  Among the animals Babe meets is a
Damon-Runyan-esque pit bull, a family of chimpanzees, and a taciturn
orangutan.
     The film is told in the same style as the first Babe film but
differently.  Again the story is divided in chapters whose titles are
read to us by the trio of singing mice.  The Classical and popular
music is back including the theme from Saint-Saens's Third Symphony.
Miller has managed to get the same cast back, though James Cromwell has
a much more limited role as Farmer Hoggett and Magda Szubanski has a
much larger role this time continuing as Mrs. Hoggett.  Again the
comedy is genuinely funny and sometimes very funny.  The acting and
voicing seems to have all the same people in the same roles.  The major
characters are all present, even if their roles are much foreshortened.
And as with the first film, the animals are frequently three-
dimensional characters with interesting personalities.  But the city
Babe visits is not so much a city as a Disneyland-modified city-
concentrate.  It seems like a Frankensteinian grafting together of many
of the great cities of the world.  Looking out a window, Babe sees
landmarks of cities all over the world.  The interior of the city is an
expressionist wonderworld looking like something out of Disneyland.
While the first film had some physical comedy, this new film has a long
slapstick sequence that seems out of character for the person involved.
     This is more expensive and a cut below its predecessor, but it
still is a good outing for the whole family.  I give this film a 6 on
the 0 to 10 scale and a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     Spoiler... Spoiler... Spoiler... Spoiler... Spoiler... Spoiler...
     Like ANIMAL FARM, BABE: PIG IN THE CITY may have many allegorical
meanings and perhaps even religious overtones.  Babe wins over his
enemies with kindness and feeds his flock, but then allows an enforcer
to stand over feeding and no animal is allowed to partake of the food
without thanking Babe, under apparent threat of violence.  What begins
looking like an allegorical Christ turns into more a Huey Long
allegory.

Title
Review for Donnie Brasco (1997)
     The setting is New York City, 1978.  Lefty Ruggiero (played by Al
Pacino) is one of this country's countless semi-failures, able to get
by just acceptably in a dead end job, but he is never really going be
successful.  Lefty's job is working for the crime syndicate and
especially killing people now and then when the need arises.  He knows
he is well into the second half of his life, has a moderately okay home
life though his son is a drug addict and that bothers him.  His path
crosses that of Donnie Brasco (Johnny Depp), a young kid who seems to
have the horse sense that would make him do well in the Syndicate.
Lefty takes Donnie under his wing and helps him to make a name for
himself in the local mob.  Perhaps he sees in Donnie the son he does
not really feel he has at home.  What Lefty does not know is that
Donnie Brasco is really FBI agent Joe Pistone on assignment to go
undercover to collect information about the Organized Crime.  The two
men become close friends and in spite Lefty's having been a murderer
many times over, Donnie learns to like the older man.  Brasco knows
that if he is ever discovered, both he and Lefty will be killed.  At
the same time being Brasco is a full-time job and that means that his
Joe Pistone side must spend most of his life away from his family.
This puts a real strain on his marriage.  There just is not enough of
Joe Pistone to be two people.  The story, which is based on truth,
gives us an inside view of the workings of organized crime and at the
time shows how Joe handles his life that often calls for him to be away
from his family for months at a time.  There are signs that Joe will be
the same sort of failure working for the FBI that Lefty is for the Mob.
On the other hand, Donnie begins to discover that he could have been
fairly successful if he had sincerely gone in for organized crime.
Donnie's feigned drive seems to sell better than Lefty's more sincere
loyalty.
     DONNIE BRASCO is something of a departure for director Mike
Newell.  Newell directed ENCHANTED APRIL, INTO THE WEST, and FOUR
WEDDINGS AND A FUNERAL.  Making a film in GOODFELLAS territory is one
of the last things that would have been expected of him.  He gets the
dialog and the feel of the film just about right.  Part of how he does
this is filming on the streets of New York City.  The mentor/student
relationship between Lefty and Brasco and between Joe and the other
agents of the FBI allows the script to explain things reasonably
comfortably and allows the viewer to pick up nuances in the
conversation that would not otherwise be obvious.  Among other things
we learn is about six different, often contradictory, meanings for the
phrase "forget about it."  Under Newell's direction we learn just about
everything that there is to know about the voluble Lefty.  Pacino
rarely stops talking and when he does talk he uses low-class profanity
and candid vocabulary.  On the other hand, Johnny Depp plays his
character as quiet and unemotional so that we are rarely sure what his
is thinking and feeling--at least not from his performance.  It is
Pacino who holds our attention.  But the longer the two men are
together the more of Lefty's behavior and mannerisms Joe seems to pick
up and use even in his personal life.
     This film does give in to some prosaic touches.  Any film about
Italian gangsters seems to need a scene of cooking.  At .least if you
are Italian, what crime does not pay in money it pays in dividends that
show up on your waistline.  That is part of the genre and it has come
to an expected feature of Italian gangster films.  More irritating,
however, are the number of product placements that Newell has put into
his film.  It is not even particularly subtly done.  In the middle of a
dark warehouse neighborhood there will be a big company logo very
obviously placed in the picture.  Deep focus is used in a kitchen scene
so that the viewer can pick up the name on a cereal box.  Later much
the same is done with a scene at an airport in which the camera focus
lets us read clearly the company name on a plane.  If Newell has so
little respect for his own movie that he sells advertising space in it,
it is a lot harder for me as a viewer to respect it.
     The script seems to have been written with the emphasis on Brasco
balancing two very different lives, but in fact Pacino pulls our
attention toward his character and make him more of interest than
Depp's.  Overall I rate DONNIE BRASCO a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Stranger Among Us, A (1992)
          Capsule review:  Yes, it's pretty much what the
     television ads make it look like.  Melanie Griffith stars in
     a plot not unlike that of WITNESS, but with Hasidic Jews.  Of
     course, it is not often we see the Hasidic community in film.
     And Sidney Lumet keeps the film consistently intriguing and
     often on a philosophical level.  Rating: high +1 (-4 to +4).
     At first look A STRANGER AMONG US looks a trifle too formulaic to be a
Sydney Lumet film.  Lumet's films are usually hard-hitting and very
original.  Just a few of his films are TWELVE ANGRY MEN; FAIL SAFE; the
superb, intense film THE PAWNBROKER; THE ANDERSON TAPES; MURDER ON THE
ORIENT EXPRESS; DOG DAY AFTERNOON; and NETWORK.  This does not sound like
the kind of director who would make a retread of WITNESS.  But that is
certainly how the television ads make this film look.  It looks like WITNESS
retold, but set among the Hasidic Jews of New York City.  Is that what A
STRANGER AMONG US is?  Well, yes and no.  Yes to the extent that it
certainly is a murder mystery that will take a police detective into a
totally alien culture from what she--in this case she--has known.  And she
does learn to respect that culture.  It even has many of the faults of
WITNESS.  It is about a lot of things, like violence and sex, that members
of the community would try to avoid.  And at the same time it idealizes that
community (and doing both at the same time *could* be viewed as hypocrisy).
On the other hand, Orthodox Jews are a major and important of the culture of
New York City, like Chinese and Blacks and many others, but how often do
they show up in major films?  How many films take the audience into this
community?  The only other film that comes to mind is Jeremy Kagan's THE
CHOSEN.
     Police Detective Emily Eden (played by Melanie Griffith) is having
second thoughts about her life.  By being too much of a "cowboy" and not
following proper procedures, she just got her partner and current lover
stabbed and nearly killed.  She feels guilt about that and at the same time
she is dissatisfied with her life in general.  She is given a light
assignment.  She is to investigate the disappearance of an Hasidic diamond
cutter who may have run off with some diamonds.  Visiting the family of the
missing man at first gives her the discomfort of sticking out with her short
sleeves, her short skirt, and her profanity.  However, the investigation
becomes a murder case that she must move into the Hasidic community to
investigate.
     At this point in the plot it becomes clear that the real story is about
how Eden sees and interfaces with the community.  The actual mystery plot
may account for about half an hour and is not the main thrust of the film.
Instead we see conflicts of values and Eden's growing understanding of and
respect for the Hasidim.  Her lifestyle as seen by the Hasidim has been the
victory of freedom over values.  She sees theirs as the victory of values
over freedom.  She also will have a close relationship with Ariel (played by
Eric Thal), a young scholar destined to be the leader of the community.
     In some ways this film could have been handled much better.  There is
some spectacular photography of New York City.  But once inside the Jewish
community every indoor scene is shot in annoying sepia tones.  At times the
sepia filter frustratingly obscures detail in the sets.  It gives an
artificial and uncomfortable feel to the film.  Perhaps the Hasidic life is
over-idealized.  Everyone seems to be friendly and gets along with each
other.  It is possible that in a lifestyle this rigid there is less
possibility for conflict, but whether that reflects reality or not I do not
know.  The mystery aspect of the story is just not given much time in the
script.  It is a little too simple and perhaps written a little sloppily.
     Still, A STRANGER AMONG US offers a view into a culture rarely shown in
films.  The background is the whole show.  I give it a high +1 on the -4 to
+4 scale.

Title
Review for And the Band Played On (1993) (TV)
     When Stanley Kramer made JUDGMENT AT NUREMBERG, he reportedly had only
a modest budget.  And yet the film had a cast that can best be described as
"star-studded."  Actors who usually got high billing were willing to take
tiny roles and were willing to be paid very modest salaries because the film
had a political message.  It told the story of the trial of the Nazis who
had committed crimes against humanity in the Holocaust and telling that
story was so important that actors put aside self-interest to be part of the
project.  In AND THE BAND PLAYED ON you see a lot of well-known actors in
very tiny roles.  And films made for HBO generally do not have huge budgets.
This film has itself become something of an event and actors want to be part
of the statement it makes regardless of what they can be paid and what
billing they can be given.
     AND THE BAND PLAYED ON would be an enthralling film even if it were
pure fiction, which unfortunately it is not.  It is the story of AIDS from
1976 before the first real breakout and continuing the story for about the
next decade.  It is the story of a disaster; it is the story of politics; it
is a detective story; it is a story about prejudice; it is about courage and
heroism and vanity; it's a horror story.  The cliche is that it would make a
great Hollywood film, but in reality Hollywood is making no more films like
JUDGMENT AT NUREMBERG and it takes someone like HBO with its captive
audience to make a film like this.  (Incidentally, HBO made last year's DEAD
AHEAD, which has some resemblance to this film.  DEAD AHEAD was not nearly
as solid a film as AND THE BAND PLAYED ON and I considered it one of the ten
best films I saw last year.  This would have to be one classic year for
movies for AND THE BAND PLAYED ON not to make this year's top ten list.)
     The film basically follows one doctor, Don Francis (played by Matthew
Modine) from the very puzzling outbreak--people dying from diseases that
usually strike only cats or sheep.  Francis as part of the Centers for
Disease Control (CDC), joins a small team with incredibly insufficient
funding slowly assembling the facts about this new disease.  And facts they
get, but they are facts that a lot of people do not want to hear.  And in
some cases facts are not available and suppositions must do.  So a political
element is added.  And this is a hard-hitting film that uses the names of
famous people, often not in a very positive light.
     Of bad touches, there are very few.  Glenne Headly does a reasonable
job as Dr. Mary Guinan on the CDC team.  She is a talented actress but I
strongly suspect the real Mary Guinan would not have her Hollywood beauty.
They did not feel the need to put in stunningly handsome men in major roles-
--unless it is Alan Alda as the self-aggrandizing Dr. Robert Gallo--but
there is still the perception here that the audience needs to have a pretty
face.  That is the only serious aspect in which the filmmakers have
underrated the audience.  With that exception I commend Roger Spottiswoode
for the direction and Arnold Schulman for an intelligent screenplay based on
the book by Randy Shilts.
     A reviewer always has a dilemma when a bad film is made in a good
cause.  Do you rate the film or the cause?  Thank goodness HBO has made such
a good film in this particular cause.  I give it a +3 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Men in Black (1997)
     Steven Spielberg's Amblin Entertainment has turned a dubious
premise into a delightful science fiction comedy.  Taking much the same
premise as TV's DARK SKIES, but handling it very differently, MEN IN
BLACK tells the story of special, super-secret government agents
charged with the responsibility for keeping the secret that at any
given time there are about 1500 space aliens running around on Earth,
natives of hundreds of different inhabited worlds.  Most are friendly,
but of course wherever there are lots of aliens there will always be a
few rotten apples who want to vaporize the planet Earth for the greater
glory of someone with a name like Zordalg.  New York cop James Edwards
(played by Will Smith) knows nothing of this, of course.  He just knows
that something is strange when he runs down a felon with funny eyes.
This feat earns him a candidacy for some unspecified government job
that turns out to be joining the Men in Black.  Once chosen he is re-
dubbed Agent J working with the experienced and cagey Agent K (Tommy
Lee Jones).
     Ed Solomon's script, based on the comic book by Lowell Cunningham,
is a barrage of funny lines and scenes of just how strange things can
be dealing with aliens.  But all that is about the background for the
real plot.  The actual story gets very little screentime comparatively.
The film is short as it is at 98 minutes and most of that time is taken
up with the background.  The actual story deals with two alien races
fighting over the fate of a galaxy.  One race is represented by an old
Jewish man controlled by good-guy aliens.  The other is an evil giant
bug who possesses the body of the redneck Edgar.  Vincent D'Onofrio
plays the possessed Edgar, but like most people would be the first time
behind the wheel of an 18-wheel truck, the creature just cannot get the
hang of the controls.  D'Onofrio is usually a serious actor, as he was
in THE WHOLE WIDE WORLD, but here he shows a real genius for physical
comedy.  He manages to walk his human body around, but not one body
part moves naturally.  Because so much of the film is taken up with
introduction to the premise this feels like the first film of series or
perhaps a pilot for a film series.  And if public enthusiasm remains
high, sequels of some form seem inevitable.  Director Barry Sonnenfeld
is best known for directing the two Addams Family films and GET SHORTY.
His Addams Family series was cut short by the death of Raoul Julia, but
he now has another chance in much the same vein with MEN IN BLACK.
     A manic film deserves a manic musical score, and manic scores are
a specialty of Danny Elfman.  It combines with good special effects and
Rick Baker makeup and effects.  In sum, MEN IN BLACK may well be one of
the best films of this summer's fly-weight class.  I give it a +2 on
the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Dong (1998)
     CAPSULE: A science fiction allegory.  At the Millennium a lethal
contagious virus has hit Taiwan.  Officials have cut off water and
other services to the center of contagion.  Life there devolves and
degenerates.  A man in an apartment has a hole in his floor and with it
harasses his downstairs neighbor.  A slow but harrowing film to be
missed if possible.  Rating:  2 (0 to 10), low -1 (-4 to +4)
   - The Taiwan Virus is ravaging Taiwan and the part of the city that
     is the center of the contagion has been evacuated of anyone who
     will go.  One apartment building still houses people.  A woman,
     formerly an office worker, (Yang Kuei-mei) is tormented by her
     upstairs neighbor (Lee Kang-sheng) who has a hole cut by a plumber
     in the floor and is using it as a drain.  Neighbor runs a small
     failing grocery store.
   - To make things more depressing, it is constantly raining hard.
   - Upstairs neighbor vomits through, pours water, etc.  A small and
     almost entirely one-sided war starts.  Allegory about callousness
     and selfishness.
   - Woman is living on a pile of rolls of toilet tissue.
   - Incongruous songs added to show downstairs neighbors dreams.
     These are the songs of popular Taiwanese singer Grace Chang.
   - Apartment is falling apart.  Wallpaper is separating from walls.
     Plumbing is failing.
   - Boredom shown by long cuts in which nothing happens.  A lot of
     film seems to be used up.
   - This story might have been done much better as a ten-minute
     animated film.
   - Stars are considered to be great dramatic actors by one reviewer.
   - This film seems longer at 95 minutes most two-hour films.

Title
Review for Adventures in Babysitting (1987)
     Back in the 50s and 60s, society seemed safe and simple.  With the
exception of a few crime and juvenile delinquent films it seemed that if you
simply behaved yourself you would lead a calm and placid existence.  As we
perceive society getting weirder, we see more films of people doing normal
things that wind them up in the middle of real chaos, particularly over a
single night.  In INTO THE NIGHT a man who is simply at the wrong airport
parking slot at the wrong moment finds not only his night but his whole life
turned inside out as a result.  Well, that's not too different from NORTH BY
NORTHWEST after the main character runs across the wrong people (in this
case, criminals).  The classic "night of pure chaos" film is AFTER HOURS.
There aren't even dangerous criminals in AFTER HOURS; it is mostly paranoia
and just the general weirdness of people that creates all the danger.
     Well, of late Hollywood has been doing films in all kinds of popular
sub-genres, but with teen-age main characters instead of the usual adults.
The newest "night of chaos" film has three teenagers and an adolescent going
through a night of chaos in Chicago.  Chris Parker (played by Elisabeth
Shue, who was also in THE KARATE KID) is baby-sitting for Sara (played by
Maia Brewton) when a friend who desperately needs a ride calls her.  Against
her better judgement she packs Sara, Sara's older brother Brad (played by
Keith Coogan, formerly of THE WALTONS), and his friend Daryl Coopersmith
(played by Anthony Rapp) into her mother's station wagon and heads for the
city.  Add one flat tire and one weirdo with a tow truck and the film is off
and running.  What follows is a lot of fun and adventures nowhere nearly as
puerile as the regrettable title might indicate.
     This film is the directorial debut of Chris Columbus, who wrote the
screenplays for three Steven-Spielberg-produced films: GREMLINS, THE
GOONIES


Title
Review for GoldenEye (1995)
     As James Bond films go, GOLDENEYE is some distance from the bottom
of the pack, but more importantly it is also a long way from the top.
As an attempt to jumpstart the stalled series with an almost entirely
new crew of talent on both sides of the lens, it is a failure.  Without
Richard Maibaum's view of who Bond is, without the tension of a John
Barry score, with an almost entirely new cast including a new actor in
the role of Bond, GOLDENEYE comes off like an imitation of a Bond film.
And there is no shortage of imitations.  CLEAR AND PRESENT DANGER is a
better spy thriller and has more of a feel of authenticity than any of
the Bond films certainly including GOLDENEYE.  It doesn't help that the
film is trying to have as much sex and violence as ever while paying
lip-service to feminism and an anti-violence philosophy.  The new
distaff head of staff puts Bond down as a sexist, mysogynist dinosaur
and the woman that he saves puts him and the villain down as a "boys
with toys" and criticizes their violence.  Bond just takes it as if to
say of course it is correct.  If even the script says there is nothing
to admire about Bond, why should the audience feel any different?
     The film's biggest thrill is the gunsight-iris opening that is
like a trademark seal.  That says that what follows is a GENUINE JAMES
BOND FILM.  And it may be just from habit, but the beginning of a new
Bond film is still an exciting moment.  Unfortunately the thrill is not
sustained.  Replaying scenes of Bond winning in a casino against a
villain and then identifying himself as "Bond ... James Bond," and
recreating scenes from previous films are obviously trying too hard to
move Brosnan into the role.  The famous Bond wit has never been so
strained, with Bond making comments after a near-death in one close
call in a helicopter about "the things we do for frequent flier
mileage."  And wearing thin is the usual convention that the villains
kill people right and left, but cannot bloody their hands by putting a
bullet between Bond's temples.  Instead they time and again leave Bond
in shaky death traps from which he escapes.
     And in spite of the new post-Cold-War setting, the basic plot is
not so different from those done in the 1970s.  In fact, it probably
would have worked better then.  In GOLDENEYE the former Soviets have a
weapon that nullifies computers.  The weapon is stolen by an unknown
super-criminal with plans to use it on a major city.  Bond (played for
the first time by Pierce Brosnan) has to stop the criminal, but first
he has to determine who it is that he has to stop.  (It is not a tough
guess for the audience.)
     The film starts in flashback from nine years earlier with a
Pyrrhic victory for 007.  Bond destroys a Soviet nerve gas factory, but
in doing it loses personal friend 006 (Sean Bean).  Now back in the
present the death of 006 hangs over Bond and the events of the film.
After the pre-credit action sequence, the first part of the film deals
with the theft of the Goldeneye device.  This is a long sequence that
involves little participation from Bond.  It does, however, introduce
Bond to a new assassin, Xenia Onatopp (Femke Janssen) who gets a sexual
charge from danger and murder and who mixes love and death by crushing
men between her legs during love-making.  Bond is dispatched to
St. Petersberg to investigate the destruction of the base that might
have controlled the Goldeneye device.
     So how is Pierce Brosnan as the fifth James Bond of the United
Artists series?  In a word, disappointing.  He is a Bond in the
tradition of Roger Moore, which is just what the series does not need.
I will conclude this review with some comments about casting the Bond
role.  Femke Janssen is not entirely believable as an assassin, but she
plays so offbeat and enigmatic a character that she makes herself the
center of attention in all her scenes.  She certainly is one of the
better Bond villains.  Gottfried John is, like Brosnan and Sean Bean,a
TV veteran having had the most interesting role on the abortive series
"Space Rangers."  Here he does not have enough to do, but he is a good
actor.  Joe Don Baker is a bad choice for a CIA agent having played a
memorable villain in THE LIVING DAYLIGHTS.
     There are some serious problems with the script, but none worse
than in the pre-credit sequence.  That sequence is usually a throw-away
but here it sets up the whole story.  Also, it involves two very
impressive stunts.  The problem is that one of the stunts requires that
the sequence take place at a very large dam; the other requires that it
take place high in mountains where you do not generally find huge dams.
And when you see the mountain base from above there is no dam in sight.
It seems unlikely that the villains' dish could be built particularly
where it is without attracting a great deal of attention.  And it does
not take much knowledge of history to know that this particular local
government is very edgy about what can be seen from overhead
surveillance.  Nor could the antenna be hidden where it is without
damaging it, nor could it be brought out of hiding and so quickly not
show the signs of where it was hidden.
     I would complain that the Internet address that is mentioned in
the film does not follow the correct naming convention, but it is just
nice to see computer nerds as important figures in a James Bond film.
But not even a computer nerd types on a standard keyboard one-handed
while he fidgets with the other hand.
     There is just too much that is too silly about GOLDENEYE and too
many mistakes in the making.  It is not as actively stupid as some Bond
films have been, but it is well below average in intelligence for the
already not too cerebral series.  I give it a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     A comment about the casting of Bond: As close as Sean Connery is
identified with the role, the actor who best embodies the character as
created by Fleming is Timothy Dalton.  Brosnan and Moore are too
smooth.  James Bond is at heart a thug for the Secret Service. He needs
a sharp, hard, flinty edge.  He can dress up in evening clothes and
appear charming but he never turns off the animal instincts just below
the surface.  Only Dalton brought out that aspect of his character.  If
Dalton is not going to take the role any more, perhaps they have the
right actor in this film in the wrong role.  Sean Bean did a very
impressive job in the two Richard Sharpe stories that have been shown
in this country.  He did a good job as 006 and should be at least
considered as 007, if it doesn't take too much time from the Sharpe
series, which frankly is better than the Bond series.  And they could
do a lot worse than to bring in Brian Cox, also from the Sharpe series,
to play M.

Title
Review for Midnight Run (1988)
     High Concept.  Picture this: The Odd Couple in a cops-and-robbers chase
movie.  Well, maybe not the original Odd Couple, but you have the slob and
the high-strung neurotic.  The slob is a bounty hunter who smokes, eats
greasy food, cusses...that sort of thing.  He's got to bring the accountant
of a Las Vegas gangster and heroin dealer from New York to Los Angeles.  Any
of these "odd couple" movies work on the principle that if you get to know
somebody, even of a very different type, whom you start out hating, you of
course get to like the other guy as you get to know him.  The odd couple
plot has already been done at least once on the road with last year's
PLANES, TRAINS, AND AUTOMOBILES.  MIDNIGHT RUN has its own odd couple (as
well as its own planes, trains, and automobiles).
     Bounty hunter Jack Walsh (played by Robert DeNiro having the time of
his life) has got to get Jonathan Mardukas (played by Charles Grodin) from
New York to Los Angeles.  On the up side, he will get $100,000 just for
bringing one guy in.  On the down side, 1) he cannot stand Mardukas, 2)
Mardukas is too neurotic to fly the distance so they have to go by ground
transport, 3) the FBI wants to stop them because they want to bring Mardukas
in, 4) another bounty hunter wants to stop them because *he* wants to bring
Mardukas in, and 5) the Mob would like to stop them, not just because they
do not want Mardukas to tell what he knows but also because he embezzled
$15,000,000 from them.  All this is just a quaint way of saying that Walsh's
chances of getting Mardukas to L.A. are less than ideal and that this
particular trip is across country will not be uneventful.
     The two leads of MIDNIGHT RUN are clever and funny men.  Charles Grodin
has a reputation for being, in real life, one of the funniest and wittiest
men in filmmaking, but he just cannot project it from the wide screen.  Or
perhaps he is just being himself on screen while other actors turn up the
clowning switch to "high" while the cameras roll.  He comes off not so much
funny as witty and likable in MIDNIGHT RUN.  DeNiro can be funny but somehow
the chemistry between the two men never really works.
     MIDNIGHT RUN is often funny, has a lot of action and some semi-
obligatory car chases, and is in general an okay piece of entertainment.
Rate it a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Lady in White (1988)
I understand that on July 2 the film LADY IN WHITE from 1988 will be
released on videodisk from Elite Entertainment.  Frank LaLoggia, auteur
of the film, contacted me and asked if I would be willing to re-post my
review of the film.  So I cannot claim that this testimonial is
entirely unsolicited.  However, I would probably want to republish the
review for my own purposes.  I am pleased to hear that the film is
becoming available again in some form since it is on my list of "hidden
treasures," films that I think not enough people know about and which I
think really should be made more available.  (Other films on the list
include A SUMMER STORY, RESURRECTION, TURTLE BEACH, SMILE, and perhaps
TO FIND A MAN.)
In the 1988 review below I predicted that this film would be remembered
as one of the best ghost stories on film by the year 2008.  I am a
little more cautious in my predictions these days, but who knows?  So
far its scarceness has worked against that prediction.  It seems to be
well-received by the critics but in my opinion it still seems
under-appreciated or at least under-recognized by the general viewing
public.  The film manages to at the same time be very evocative of
childhood and still work as an adult horror film.  My recommendation is
see the if you can at all manage it.  The laserdisk was supervised by
LaLoggia, a man who seems to take pains to do things just about
perfectly.  It is presented letter-boxed , includes six more minutes of
film... it looks like it will be a very nice package.  But I am not
recommending the laserdisk specifically (sorry, Frank) I am just
recommending that people may want to see the LADY IN WHITE in some form
and saying that I am pleased that the film is available again.
Capsule review:  Twenty years from now Lady in White will be considered
one of the best ghost stories ever put on film.   Frank LaLoggia has
made a beautiful film that raises more than a little gooseflesh.
Rating: +3.
Oddly enough, while the ghost story is probably the most commonly
written breed of horror story, it is very uncommon as a type of horror
film.  Perhaps there is a feeling that they do not translate well to
film.  Ghost stories are usually mood pieces and directors who know how
to capture moods generally have other kinds of films they want to
make.  Ghost stories that have really worked on film have done so by
hinting and by creating a--let's be frank--morbid mood in the
audience.  The good ones have been THE HAUNTING, THE INNOCENTS, THE
UNINVITED, and perhaps THE CHANGLING. (Hmmm.  I never noticed before
how similar the titles were.)  Two films that definitely do not make it
as ghost stories are GHOST STORY and POLTERGEIST.  While I liked
POLTERGEIST, it was really more science fiction on the astral plane
than a ghost story.  Each of these two films has been too overpowering
to make it as the subtle mood piece that a good ghost tale should be.
In fact, of the classic ghost stories I mentioned, only one was even in
color.  The other three depended on a dark mood that is very hard to
achieve in color.  Now a ghost story has come along on film that ranks
with the classics-perhaps even surpasses them.  LADY IN WHITE is a
ghost story in color, but it never overwhelms.  It is a very fine mood
piece and the use of color in the film enhances the mood rather than
fighting it.  And the story is worthy of the mood, and the photography
is worthy of the story.
LADY IN WHITE was written, directed, scored, and produced by Frank
LaLoggia.  That can be either a very good sign or a very bad sign in a
low-budget film.  LADY IN WHITE is very clearly one man's vision and
dream brought to the screen.  I grew up in New England and I can tell
you that no other place have I seen where autumn is so melodramatic.
The world turns bright hues of red and brown and yellow as it rages
against the dying of the warm.  LaLoggia captures the melancholic
autumn with a small town feel somewhere between that of TO KILL A
MOCKINGBIRD and SOMETHING WICKED THIS WAY COMES.  Like those films,
this is a story of children and growth, but it also raises gooseflesh
in ways that are all too rare in horror films.
It is, in fact, the story of Frankie Scarlatti, whom I suspect is made
up in no small part of little Frankie LaLoggia from about 25 years
ago.  Frankie loves Halloween and monsters of all sorts.  He tells such
a good Halloween story of the "prehysterical" monster that stomps
London that jealous classmates arrange for him to be locked in the
cloakroom closet.  In the old school that has served generations, years
mean very little and he is visited by the spirit of a little girl his
own age, or she was when she died eleven years earlier...a death that
the spirit must re-live over and over.
Even if the main story were not good-and it is-this would be a
marvelously textured film.  Characters like Frankie's grandfather, his
father, and his brother are drawn with a loving pen.  Frankie himself
is played by Lucas Haas who, young as he is, is the veteran of films
like TESTAMENT and WITNESS.  the film carries the viewer along, often
to unexpected vistas, without making one false move until the final
five minutes.  LaLoggia has problems ending the story without making it
a little goofy and a little cliched.  But until the final minutes of
the film LADY IN WHITE is a positive gem of film-making.  Even mistakes
in the special effects work for the film.  Rate it an admiring +3 on
the -4 to +4 scale.
-- 
      Mark R. Leeper, Lucent Technologies/Bell Laboratories
, (732)957-5619, MT 3E-433  :  Or try your WWW
http://www-bcs.mt.lucent.com/~leeper            :  search engine on 
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/6960/        :  "Mark" and "Leeper"

Title
Review for Payback (1999)
     Several months earlier Porter (played by Mel Gibson) planned a
clever robbery.  He was supposed to get a cut of $70,000 as his share.
Instead he got nothing but bullets in the back before being left for
dead.  As the film opens he is being treated by the just about the most
nightmarish doctor imaginable.  It is a painful scene to watch and will
not be the last painful scene by a long shot.  It was not easy getting
back on his feet, but now he is and he wants his money.  But the
proceeds of the robbery went to the Syndicate, an organization not
generally known for fast and friendly refunds.  The harder Porter
pushes for his money the harder he is pushed back by people who have
the power to push back.  But Porter is able to counter-punch for every
punch.  Along the way we get amusing portraits of hoods with sado-
masochistic tastes, crooked cops, prostitutes with hearts of gold,
prostitutes who are nothing but greed, and bizarre Mafiosi.  This is a
film with many bizarre characters, not all as funny as the trailers
would have you believe.
     PAYBACK had the potential to be a modern OUTLAW JOSEY WALES if the
lead had held the film together.  But Porter is just not a very well
written character.  Occasionally he is smart but more often he gets out
of trouble by being lucky.  Somebody shows up at just the right time,
or he is just in the right place because he needed cigarettes.  When
someone tries to kill him with a bomb he knows to check just the right
object in the room.  Or over the telephone he hears just the right
background conversation.  And in a fight he hits harder and shoots
straighter than anybody else.  In fact he is saved so often by
contrivances that the story becomes predictable and one rarely has to
watch the film.  We just know he will come out all right even if
painfully the worse for wear.  He is basically Superman and the bad
guys do not know it yet, but they are way over-matched.  The script was
a cooperation between Terry Hayes and Brian Helgeland.  Hayes wrote the
excellent thriller DEAD CALM.  Helgeland (who also directed) wrote the
scripts for L.A. CONFIDENTIAL and CONSPIRACY THEORY.  He also did work
on the script for THE POSTMAN.  PAYBACK itself is a remake of POINT
BLANK (1967).  Here, however, their character's capabilities are just
not very plausible and Gibson cannot carry the film the way Lee Marvin
did.
     Among the familiar faces in all-too-brief roles are William
Devane, James Coburn, and Kris Kristofferson.  Coburn just lights up
the screen.  All three are Syndicate members of various ranks.  David
Paymer is a small-time hood with the wrong friends in the police
department.  Maria Bello of ER plays Porter's friend and confidant.
Ericson Core's camera-work keeps the colors muted, mostly in blues and
grays.  This has much of the emotional impact of black and white
photography, without actually using black and white.
     We have seen before the story of the good-guy crook who plays
hardball with anyone who gets in his way.  For better thrills, the
viewer might want to rent the original POINT BLANK.  This remake gets a
4 on the 0 to 10 scale and a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Saving Private Ryan (1998)
     I am sorry that John Wayne is not around to see Steven Spielberg's
SAVING PRIVATE RYAN. Wayne made many films of the glory of war.
Perhaps during the war that was what was needed. But it presented a
totally artificial view of what war was really like.  In a John Wayne
film when someone is killed they fall over--usually bloodlessly.
Nobody has to deal with people who have been cut in half by machine gun
bullets, with wounded solders looking for their own severed arms. The
deaths in SAVING PRIVATE RYAN are anything but bloodless.  And at a
time when so many films show gratuitous gore, as a special effect
Steven Spielberg may be the only director who knows how to shoot blood
so that the viewer feels the pain.
     There are four boys in the Ryan family, or at least there were the
week before D-Day.  Mrs. Ryan will get three telegrams in one day about
the loss of three sons.  The last remaining son was airdropped behind
enemy lines and nobody knows if James Ryan is alive or dead.  The brass
wants to see him back safely with his family.  A squad of eight men is
sent to find Ryan and send him home.  But the squad is decidedly
ambivalent about the assignment.  Eight men are risking their lives in
highly dangerous territory to save the life of one private who is being
sent home in what may be only a public relations gesture.  Is he more
deserving of special treatment because of what happened to his
brothers?  When they find him is he even going to want to go home?
Might he be already dead and the whole mission pointless?  Are eight
people likely to be killed for some general's quixotic notion of mercy?
     No film in memory has ever taken such a gritty and un-romanticized
view of what the dog soldier experiences.  The battle scenes are as
vicious and unrelenting as any film has ever shown us.  The action
begins with a 25-minute subjective view of the squad landing on the
Normandy Beach-right in front of a nest of machine guns.  There are no
dramatics here.  It is just a bunch of men being delivered into to
mouth of a meat-grinder.  Most of the delivered soldiers last just
seconds before they die in any of a variety of ugly ways.  The
survivors of the squad are chosen for the Ryan mission and with some
trepidation they go off to find the private. Captain John Miller, a
blood-and- guts commander, played against type by Tom Hanks leads the
squad.  Unknown to the high command but suspected by the men, Miller is
starting to crumble under the stress of constantly dealing with the
dying and dismembered.  The squad is a heterogeneous mix of
personalities and ethnic types borrowed from any film like A WALK IN
THE SUN or THE BIG RED ONE.  It includes the loyal Sergeant Horvath
(Tom Sizemore), the uncooperative Private Reiben (Edward Burns), the
Jewish Private Mellish (Adam Goldberg), and a timid translator,
Corporal Upham (Jeremy Davies).  Among the issues contested by the unit
is the question of how to treat surrendering Germans and the
individual's responsibility to be sacrificed for the many.
     Spielberg has not returned to the black and white of SCHINDLER'S
LIST but he does some playing with the color and look.  At times he
will wash out the film, giving the feel of amateur photography of the
time.  During battle scenes he will use a special filter to tint the
scene.  Then he strobes the action so while the film is not slowed
down, it will give fewer images per minute.  In this way it looks like
the viewer is not able to take in all he is seeing.  He will use hand
held cameras to put the viewer into the action.  Miller's physical
state of shock is represented by near silence on the soundtrack in the
middle of a battle scene.  During some of the battle scenes we get
almost all of our information visually and the sound is reduced to the
din of battle.  Other times Spielberg lets the sound tell the story,
particularly in scenes where the squad is hearing the earthquake-like
rumble of approaching tanks.  Spielberg makes his point in the loud
numbing battle scenes or in quiet moments as when Mrs. Ryan just folds
up and sits on the floor of her porch when she knows she is about to be
given bad news.  He can make a point by letting his camera wander over
the geometrical lattice of a field of crosses in a military cemetery.
Curiously enough for so professional a production, there are some
inconsistencies in the Robert Rodat script.  Early in the film we are
told that the boys at first served together and were separated only
after the five Sullivan brothers died in the Navy when the boat on
which the five served was sunk by the enemy.  That true incident, by
the way, was probably the inspiration for this fictional story.  We see
a picture of the brothers all in uniform.  But later we are told that
when one of the brothers went to boot camp was the last time they were
together.  One more minor glitch if I saw what I think I saw, the men
invading Normandy seem to have guns covered in polyethylene to protect
them from the water. Nope.  That is a decade or so too soon for that.
What they did tend to use is latex, which would have been more tight-
fitting.  It also would be a product produced for another purpose.
(Information on polymers and WWII provided by Harold Leeper, Chemistry
Docent for the Tech Science Museum, San Jose, California.  He and I go
way back.)
     The honesty and realism of some of the scenes of this film may
forever change the war film.  This is not a pleasant film, but it is a
truthful one in a way that few war films have ever been truthful.  I
rate it a 9 on the 0 to 10 scale and a +3 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Parenthood (1989)
     If one had to compare PARENTHOOD to another film, one would have to say
that at least in structure it resembles HANNAH AND HER SISTERS.  Like that
film, it is really many stories about one extended family.  As such it can
tell several parallel stories at the same time.  Where it differs is that
each of the stories examines different aspects of one phenomenon,
parenthood.  Also the individual characters here are a little more
sympathetic and better characters from the point of view of storytelling.
One cares more what happens to these people.  Each of the individual stories
is decent but the whole is considerably more than the sum of its parts and
each story has bearing on the others.  In one plotline a parent seems not to
use enough discipline, while another warns against the discipline approach.
The result is a mosaic that views parenthood from many different angles and
approaches and at times even comes near to restoring something that has been
missing from film: some powerful drama.
     The patriarch of the family is Frank, played by Jason Robards, who is
justifiably plagued by guilt over the lack of attention he have his children
and is working it out by spoiling his wild son Larry (played by Tom Hulce).
Frank's oldest son is Gil (played by top-billed Steve Martin).  Gil appears
to be the most stable and successful of Frank's children but his career is
souring and his eight-year-old seems to have emotional problems.  Frank's
son Nathan (played by Rick Moranis) has an intensive program to turn his
three-year-old into an adult genius by the time she is four.  But the most
compelling story is of Frank's daughter Helen (played by Diane Wiest) whose
life is a shambles and a desperate struggle to raise her two wild children.
     While at times the writing is excellent, director Ron Howard seems to
feel the presence of Steve Martin requires an occasional timeout for
Martin's brand of physical comedy.  He also throws in some happier moments
that verge on being saccharine.  Their effect is to betray some of the more
serious drama.
     Perhaps PARENTHOOD comes up short when compared to an ORDINARY PEOPLE,
but with most Hollywood output geared to a teenage market, we have to be
grateful for the films that are engaging on an adult level.  I rate it a +3
on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Commitments, The (1991)
          Capsule review:  The setting upstages the plot in this
     story of a group of working-class (or dole-class) Dubliners
     who form a rock band.  Seeing all those Irish singing and
     immersing themselves in American popular music has a sort of
     whimsical irony akin to that of THE SINGING NUN.  But somehow
     a film set in this interesting city could focus on something
     more meaningful than its music.  Rating: +1 (-4 to +4).
     Alan Parker has been a new filmmaker for eighteen years now through at
least ten major films.  The way he remains a new filmmaker is by making a
clean break with the past and jumping off in a new direction every film he
makes.  The man made BUGSY MALONE, MIDNIGHT EXPRESS, FAME, SHOOT THE MOON,
PINK FLOYD: THE WALL, BIRDY, ANGEL HEART, MISSISSIPPI BURNING, COME SEE THE
PARADISE, and now THE COMMITMENTS.  At least superficially it is hard to
find any sort of pattern in these films.  This time around he is doing a
bittersweet adaptation of Roddy Doyle's novel about the life and times of
Dublin (Ireland)'s first soul band.  The idea of an Irish band doing soul
makes sense to the band's manager Jimmy Rabbitte (played by Robert Arkins)
since he sees himself not just once but triply black.  As he says, the Irish
are the blacks of Europe, the Dubliners are the blacks of Ireland, and the
northern Dubliners are the blacks of Dublin.  So he pulls together a band of
North Dubliners willing to say they are black and proud of it.
     As the film opens, Rabbitte is a hustler of cheap cassettes and T-
shirts.  His father places Elvis Presley just a bit lower than God and a bit
higher than the Pope.  With this minimal musical background, after pulling
together a rather poor band for a wedding he is struck by the raw singing
talent of a drunken guest who grabs the mike and starts belting out a song.
With this dubious inspiration he starts to put together a band to feature
the singing of Deco Cuffe (played by sixteen-year-old Andres Strong).  In
addition to Cuffe he finds an off-the-wall drummer, a frustrated jazz
musician, and a forty-five-year-old trumpeter who may or may not have played
with just about all the American greats.  He also finds three feisty female
backup singers.  From there it is a toss-up if this mismatched group will
tear itself apart or become a phenomenon.
     The real stars of this film are the music (big surprise) and the hard-
edged working-class (and lower) settings in northern Dublin.  One might say
that the view of living conditions in Ireland--with far too many filthy
children and with so many of the adults on the dole--by far upstages the
foreground story.  (This may be more true for me than for other viewers
because I do not really know soul music particularly well.  I may have
missed some of the jokes.  On the other hand, a top-of-the-lung belting out
of "Try a Little Tenderness" may not have been intended to be as humorous as
I found it.)
     Some of the humor was a bit derivative and no longer as funny as it
might have been.  The humorous audition montage is getting over-used after
SHE'S GOTTA HAVE IT, THE PRODUCERS, (the underrated) SOUP FOR ONE, and
Robert Kline's (hilarious) "New National Anthem Auditions" routine.  The
realism of the film is undermined to very little positive effect by a pair
of twins who always speak in unison.
     THE COMMITMENTS is a film that us amusing at times and well-textured,
but one in which I strongly recommend looking around the characters and
watching instead the scenery.  For me the film rate a +1 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Princess Bride, The (1987)
     One of the advantages of being a proficient and successful writer is
that you can write what you like and do not have to worry that this idea is
too silly and readers will laugh at it.  One of the advantages of being a
proficient and successful director is that you can make the kind of films
you like and do not have to worry that the idea is too silly for audiences.
William Goldman has written such successful books as NO WAY TO TREAT A LADY,
MAGIC, MARATHON MAN, and SOLDIER IN THE RAIN.  So when he decides to write a
book-length fairy tale, his publisher knows he can pull it off.  And when
Rob Reiner, who was not much of an actor but as a director of three films--
the worst of which was as good as THE SURE THING--wants to direct it, he
isn't going to have too much trouble getting up the mazuma to make a fairy-
tale movie.
     Princess--are you ready for this?--Buttercup (played by Robin Wright)
is to be the unfortunate bride of Prince Humperdinck (played by FRIGHT
NIGHT's Chris Sarandon).  But the only man she has ever loved was the callow
youth Westley (played by Cary Elwes of LADY JANE) who was killed off-screen
by a notorious pirate.  Buttercup would like revenge on the pirate and she
isn't too fond of her fiance either.  And speaking of revenge, Inigo Montoya
(played by Mandy Patinkin) would like some against the six-fingered man who
killed his father.  They could get revenge together but unfortunately
Inigo's current job involves him and two friends, including Fezzik the giant
(played by Andre the also Giant) kidnapping and murdering Buttercup.  Then
there's the little boy who would rather play videogames than listen to his
grandfather's story.  Yeah, well, he's in there too.
     It is hard to find fault with as well-meaning and enjoyable a film as
this offbeat fairy tale.  The real problem is that the characters are flat
so that one is never really drawn into the story.  Reiner can create
characters we like and believe, and had he done it here the film would have
been just about perfect.  As it is, the story feels a little thin and too
short for its material.  Something is wrong when the only one likable
character is played by a quarter-ton of professional wrestler.
     Beyond that all I can say is this is the most fun you will have in a
film for quite a while.  I could tell you why this fractured fairy tale is
fun, but most of what is fun catches you off-guard.  I couldn't convey the
fun and I'd probably ruin the gags.  Rate the movie a +2 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Courage Under Fire (1996)
     COURAGE UNDER FIRE has been compared to Akira Kurosawa's RASHOMON,
as I suppose any film with contradictory flashbacks is likely to be.
But RASHOMON had more respect for its audience.  The classic Japanese
film said that the truth cannot be determined by talking to people
after the fact and, in fact, that the truth may no longer exist after
the fact.  COURAGE UNDER FIRE is not so intelligent a film and feels
the need to tie everything up for the viewer.  In the end of COURAGE
UNDER FIRE you know who the good guys are and who the bad guys are.
And it is not hard to guess well before the end.  It treats itself asa
mystery film, sort of a courtroom drama without the courtroom, with a
not-too-surprising solution revealed at the end.
     Lt. Colonel Nathaniel Serling (Denzel Washington) was an armored
tank commander in the Persian Gulf War.  In the action of battle he
makes a split-second decision and accidentally kills several of his own
men.  He unwillingly takes part in an Army cover-up of the incident
which would make both him and the Army look bad and he is given a desk
job at the Pentagon.  Meanwhile the Army is considering awarding the
Medal of Honor posthumously to Captain Karen Walden (Meg Ryan).
Serling has only to write a superficial report on the events
surrounding Walden's heroism and death following the crash of the Red
Cross helicopter she was flying.   But Serling notes that there is
contradictory information in the reports of the people who witnessed
Walden's death and decides that it has to be cleared up before he is
willing to file his report.  He conducts his investigation under
pressure to conclude from his commander (Michael Moriarty) and a slimy
Whitehouse aide (Bronson Pinchot).  He must sift through accounts and
try to determine the truth.
     Edward Zwick directs Denzel Washington for the second time here,
having previously directed GLORY.  Zwick has a feel for creating vivid
battle scenes with a believable high-speed pacing and a certain chaos.
It is rare to find such a combination of thoughtful scripting with
action scenes.  Patrick Sheane Duncan's script walks a careful
tightrope being neither greatly pro-military nor anti-military.  In a
sense it is a film with a respect for heroes, but at the same time does
not minimize the horror of battle.  It is respectful of the Medal of
Honor, but at the same time has ironic scenes of soldiers praying
together before battle and concluding with "Let's kill 'em all."
Through much of the film he and director Zwick seem to maintain a
careful control of the style, then in the final third that control
starts to fail.  A gratuitous (non-battle) action scene is used for
some unneeded visual excitement toward the end of the film.  Then it
all ends with a slightly too perfect conclusion and a sequence of
scenes that are both cliched and overly sentimental.  It is a bad
faltering for a film that had done reasonably well up to that point.
Also, it is disappointing to see a director of Zwick's stature using
fairly blatant product placements.
     Denzel Washington has been playing well-balanced and in-control
characters for quite a while and it is nice to see him playing a man
with some serious emotional problems.  In fact, he is by far not the
only character who tries to hide a troubled core under an expression of
composure.  Matt Damon is particularly good as Ilario whose affable
manner does not quite hide a tense emotional core.  This is a good role
for Meg Ryan and calling on talents that she has not shown before, but
though her character hangs over the whole film, she is given star
billing for what is really not much more than a supporting role.  Lou
Diamond Phillips plays a somewhat two-dimensional character, Monfriez
and he does little to make the character memorable.
     COURAGE UNDER FIRE offers some very good action battle scenes and
a somewhat engaging mystery.  But it has only one really well-developed
character and its mystery is not solved by clever deduction so much as
by asking witnesses what happened long enough until the truth comes
out.  Still, when the film waves its flag for wartime heroes, it is
hard not to salute.  The film rates a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Hoffa (1992)
     Something is missing in Danny DeVito's HOFFA.  It is not the budget and
it is not that the budget seems wasted.  There is a lot of money on the
screen in HOFFA.  The film has an expensive star with a terrific make-up job
(when I first saw the trailer and saw the face on the screen, I though
"Hoffa" first and it took a beat to two to recognize it was Jack Nicholson I
was looking at).  The film also has spectacular action scenes of an acre of
strikers in a melee with an acre of strike breakers.  But what is missing
and what is missed is a human behind the public face of Hoffa.  What this
film says about Hoffa, the man, is that he cusses and drinks coffee.  Just
about everything else about him in this film you could find in a good
encyclopedia.  That is, everything that is true in the film.  In an
afterword to this review I will give a few facts that do not square with
this fictionalized version of the professional life of Jimmy Hoffa.  There
are probably other major deviations from the truth in this film.
     As the film opens, Hoffa (played by Nicholson) is at a roadside diner
with his longtime friend Bobby Ciaro (played by Danny DeVito outdoing the
major role Spike Lee gave himself in MALCOLM X).  Together they are waiting
for the arrival of a third party.  As they wait Ciaro remembers their long
career together.  They meet when Hoffa is a young man preaching the evangel
of the union.  Ciaro soon learns that his new acquaintance is happily
willing to break the law and to hurt whomever he has to for the sake of
organizing labor.  While DeVito's character never finds love and looks for
one-night stands, DeVito the director here finds his own true love--the
overhead shot.  Through much of the rest of the film DeVito carries on his
torrid love affair with overhead shots.  DeVito and overhead shots seem
inseparable until in the last third he has a quick affair with artistic
scene transitions.
     DeVito's infatuation with overhead shots and artistic scene transitions
notwithstanding, he does show some nice visual sense.  One gets the
impression that Hoffa (like the other enigmatic anti-hero of this film
season, Dracula) rarely ventures forth in the daytime and then only when it
is heavily overcast.  This gives us a dismal recreation of Detroit.  Hoffa
comes off as a creature of the night more than willing to deal with the
underworld if it suits the purposes of the union.  Since we see almost none
of Hoffa's personal life and little positive in his professional life, we
are understandably ambivalent as to the fate of the union leader.  Hoffa
seems likable only when he is verbally tying knots in Robert Kennedy (played
by Kevin Anderson).  Kennedy, as you might guess, comes off less than
favorably in this film.
     DeVito's HOFFA is sometimes well-photographed and sometimes not.  But
its biggest failure is in getting us to care what happens to Jimmy Hoffa.
My rating is a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     Afterword (with minor spoiler):  Jimmy Hoffa disappeared on Wednesday,
July 30, 1975.  He expected a meeting at the somewhat fancy restaurant, the
Manchus Red Fox.  It is thought he was meeting a local crime figure.  He
arrived at the restaurant at about 2 PM.  After a half hour, he called his
wife to tell her that the others had failed to appear.  At 2:45 PM or so he
was seen in the parking lot getting into a car with some other men.  This is
clearly not events as shown in the film.  Also, one might wonder why in the
film Bobby Ciaro chooses this day to remember his whole past with Hoffa.

Title
Review for Throw Momma from the Train (1987)
          Capsule review:  Danny DeVito's directing debut seems to
     indicate he is not yet ready to direct.  The characters are
     neither believable nor likable and the comedy is not funny.
     DeVito needs and deserves a better director than DeVito.
     Rating: -1.
     I think most successful comic actors should learn from Harry Langdon's
career.  Langdon made a number of successful comedies back in the silent
era.  He had a funny face that just worked well with screen comedy.  He was
also ambitious and wanted to direct his own films.  He spread a rumor that
his director, Frank Capra, really was an incompetent and that he himself did
most of the direction on his films.  So the studio let Frank Capra go.
(Fear not, it was a while, but Capra DID eventually get work directing films
again.)  Langdon directed his own comedies for two or three flops, then he
let other directors misuse him and his career just sort of petered out.  Not
everyone who is good in comedy acting knows how to direct him or herself.
Gene Wilder is another example.  A third is probably Danny DeVito.  DeVito
needs a director who wants to and knows how to show him off.   (I have been
surprised by how many fans of ONE FLEW OVER THE CUCKOO'S NEST and TERMS OF
ENDEARMENT do not even remember that DeVito was in those films.)  DeVito has
been funny only when he has had really talented directors.  His first
attempt to direct himself just proves he does not (yet?) have that talent.
     THROW MOMMA FROM THE TRAIN is a patchwork of comedy styles that never
gels into a real film.  The plot is a sendup of Hitchcock's STRANGERS ON A
TRAIN.  Larry (played by Billy Crystal) is a writing instructor who teaches
his class that a writer always writes.  He himself, however, has a writing
block connected with his hatred of his ex-wife, a hatred he makes no secret.
Owen (played by Danny DeVito) is a student in his class hatching murder
plots in fiction and for real equally incompetently.  Owen's mother is about
as revolting as a woman can appear on screen and Owen, quite justifiably,
wants to do her in.  Through misunderstanding Owen thinks Larry has
suggested an exchange of murders to throw off the police.
     The concept could have made for a successful comedy, but virtually
nothing in this comedy is funny.  The film starts with Larry struggling for
much too long with the first sentence for his book.  He wants a great first
line and he knows it will be "The night was ."  He has been stuck
for months looking for the right adjective.  The scriptwriter seems to think
that a writer finds a first line and then builds a story around it--not too
surprising, since he seems to have built a film around a funny title he
never successfully fits into the plot.  The situation is neither believable
nor funny.  And that is just how the rest of the film proceeds, leaving
implausibilities and loose ends in its unfunny wake.  The characters are
inconsistent and unbelievable.  (Would you help someone you thought was
trying to kill you to find the right word for a line in a story?)  In the
great glut of comedies we are having, so unfunny a comedy will be quickly
forgotten.  Rate it a -1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Nixon (1995)
     Some critics complained earlier this year when THE AMERICAN
PRESIDENT portrayed some Republicans as sitting in dark rooms hatching
dark conspiracies.  That film was mild compared to Oliver Stone's cold
expressionist painting of America's most controversial President.
NIXON is the bleak story of a man who had a harsh, unpleasant
childhood.  He parlayed that experience into life of power and pain
only to be brought down and destroyed by the powers he unleashed.
NIXON is a look inside the head of Richard Nixon that comes up with no
revelations beyond that it was a dark and scary place haunted by images
of his youth, a place as frightful for Nixon as it was for anybody
else.
     The film begins with a sales training film that may or may not
present Nixon's philosophy of dealing with people.  It is being watched
by the Plumbers on their way to Watergate.  The scene makes no earthly
sense in saying that these people would be watching this particular
film at just this instant of time.  But it is the sort of artistic
liberty that Oliver Stone takes in NIXON.  From there the film jumps to
points all over Nixon's life, flashing back in time for a few scenes
only to flash forward again and then to jump to some third point.  We
see Nixon's stern Quaker upbringing and his love/fear relationship with
a mother who had a power over him all his life.  Flash forward and we
see the deals he is making as a President after the Watergate story
broke.  Flash back and he is making other deals with J. Edgar Hoover or
with shady businessmen in Texas who seem to know before the
assassination that Kennedy will not be running for office in 1964.
Yes, this is an Oliver Stone film and secret deals and conspiracies are
salted into the plot.  In Stone's view, Nixon was a man who repeatedly
conspired with others and who saw conspiracies against him and
betrayals nearly everywhere.  He is a natural subject for an Oliver
Stone film.
     Under Stone's direction Sir Anthony Hopkins plays Nixon as a stern
vengeful man who must always assign blame for every misfortune,
sometimes bizarrely inappropriately.  Nixon is a man who remembers
every slight that he has ever received or imagined.  The 190 minutes
spent in Nixon's world is more than enough time.  Or more accurately,
it is far too much and yet not enough.  It is too much because of the
personality Stone gives Nixon is so sullen and unpleasant to be around.
And it not enough because the narrative is strangely out of kilter.  It
seems to assume the viewer already knows much of Nixon's history.  The
film spends an hour on Nixon's involvement with Watergate but not
enough to explain coherently the Watergate scandal to someone who does
not already know it.  Stone assumes the viewer knows the facts and
instead gives us a sequence that could be called "Famous Scenes from
the Watergate Affair."  I pity the foreign audiences who will try to
understand Watergate from what Oliver Stone tells them about it.  And
on top of that, Stone handily sidesteps the question of whether Nixon
knew in advance of the break-in.  In another odd sequence the film has
Mao and Nixon admitting to each other that they are tyrants.  Even if
the thought crossed Mao's mind, he would hardly tell Nixon.  Stone's
idea of what heads of state say to each other in private is almost
surreal.
     Some of the characterizations of the people around Nixon will be
equally controversial.  Haldeman and Ehrlichman are played by perennial
screen slimeballs James Woods and J. T. Walsh.  While Haldeman is as
slimey as any of Woods's characters, Ehrlichman comes off as
surprisingly troubled by Nixon's actions.  Pat Nixon (played by Joan
Allen) is elevated to almost heroic stature, torn between love and
loyalty on one hand and moderation and conscience on the other.
     The Hollywood Pictures production is a prestige film and has a
superior cast of actors led by Anthony Hopkins but including Powers
Booth, Ed Harris, Bob Hoskins, E. G. Marshall, David Paymer, Paul
Sorvino, and Mary Steenburgen.  Hopkins is, of course, a terrific
actor, but his Richard M. Nixon is one of his worst performances in
recent memory.  He neither looks nor sounds much like Nixon, but worse
yet he exaggerates Nixon's slight slouch giving him a round-shouldered
hunched look.  Making matters worse the make-up artist has given him a
much more serious case of five o'clock shadow than the original ever
had.
     While Stone was bending reality he threw in more than this film's
share of surreal and experimental scenes including sequences that were
highly under-cranked to show cars or clouds zipping by or shots printed
in negative.  Rarely do these convey much to the film but a touch of
pretentiousness.  Certainly in an epic film of this length a few of
these strange effects should have been cut.
     On the other hand it is hard to rate NIXON too low as a historical
film that tries to analyze a figure as complex--not to say pivotal--as
Richard M. Nixon.  This is not a film that reaches for easy and pat
answers, even if it does at times seem overly harsh on the man.  It
covers a broad swath of history and presents it in a way that does not
underestimate its audience.  Like Nixon the man, NIXON the film has
major problems and major virtues.  I give the film on balance a high +1
on the -4 to +4 scale, still a rather tepid rating for so lavish a
production.

Title
Review for Notting Hill (1999)
     The plot of NOTTING HILL is simple enough.  William Thacker
(played by Hugh Grant) is the handsome owner of a small and failing
travel bookstore.  He had a marriage that failed.  And now he lives
with a self-absorbed troglodyte of a housemate named Spike (Rhys
Ifans).  Spike is rude, stupid, and completely impossible to live with.
Into William's shop one day comes Anne Scott (Julia Roberts).  Scott is
sort of a combination of Meryl Streep, Gwyneth Paltrow, Emma Thompson,
and, yes, even Julia Roberts.  Her face is plastered on double-decker
busses all over London.  After the requisite shaky start, Anne and
William begin to date and go through some predictable comedic
situations.  What happens when a luckless bachelor comes to dinner at a
friend's house with his date of the evening, one of the world's most
glamorous movie stars?  (There is a somewhat similar and considerably
funnier sequence in MY FAVORITE YEAR.)  What happens when a man
thinking that he is going on a date finds that it really is a press
publicity junket for a film and for some reason he pretends he is there
to interview the star?  The latter sequence goes on much longer than
need be and eventually outstays its welcome.
     I have liked my share of romantic comedies, but NOTTING HILL just
never really catches on for me.  Perhaps the two leads seem just too
charming and empty. Hugh Grant's boyish stuttering as he finds almost
the right words is growing tiresome.  And Julia Roberts has such a wide
infectious smile from back molar to shining back molar.  I wonder if
she needed surgery to stretch that grin.  Their dialog ranges from
serious to cute to attempted cute.  The film could have had a
perceptive look contrasting how the super-famous and the unknown see
the world differently, but NOTTING HILL rarely rises to that occasion.
Much of the humorous dialog seems borrowed from "Seinfeld" with Spike
standing in for Kramer.  ("I once saw Ringo Starr.  Or it might have
been Topol."  "But they don't look even remotely alike."  "Well, he was
standing too far away.")  There are certainly places the film just does
not ring true.  The giant film that actress Anne Scott is currently
starring in appears to be on the level of GALAXINA, a film that would
be unlikely to have a big $15,000,000 star.  The script is by Richard
Curtis who has mostly written scripts for Rowan Atkinson playing either
Blackadder or Bean.  Curtis did write FOUR WEDDINGS AND A FUNERAL and
now has returned to Hugh Grant territory.  But FOUR WEDDINGS had much
more human drama mixed in with the comedy.
     Director Roger Michell is probably best known for PURSUASION.
Here he seems to be depending a bit much on the star power of his two
major actors.  Too frequently he allows the camera to lovingly just
take in Julia Roberts while she just stands with a wide smile.  He is
apparently hoping that her magic and allure will just effortlessly win
over the audience.  Even Roberts does not look that good.  Just a
little cuter is Hugh Grant as he boyishly stammers and says the
unexpected while he tries too hard to express himself.  But really as
is often the case, many of the background characters are of greater
interest than those in the foreground.  William's circle of friends are
more interesting characters with a more real set of problems than the
principals.  (How frequently are major characters in American films
bound to wheelchairs?)  The film has one sequence in which William
visits Anne on a production set and just to see the circus that is
required to make a film makes this the most interesting sequence in the
film.
     NOTTING HILL tries to return to the territory of FOUR WEDDINGS AND
A FUNERAL, but never manages to capture the same romantic spark.  I
would give it a 5 on the 0 to 10 scale and a high 0 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Longtime Companion (1990)
          Capsule review:  The tragic effect of AIDS on the gay
     community is movingly brought to the screen.  This American
     Playhouse production may be the most adult and substantial
     film released this summer, albeit one of the least expensive.
     Rating: high +1.
     Some of the best films being shown in theaters are actually made for
television.  They are productions for PBS's "American Playhouse" that get
their initial release in movie theaters before getting shown on public
television.  It is a positive-sum strategy since a theatrical release will
help pay for the film.  Since the film is already made for another venue the
investment to get it into the theaters is relatively meager.  And it is nice
to see a film a little more substantial than BACK TO THE FUTURE III or FIRE
BIRDS playing on the wide screen.
     Norman Rene directed Craig Lucas's screenplay.  The subject is a group
of gay friends living on Fire Island and in Manhattan and how AIDS changed
their lives.  They go from an apparently carefree existence in the early
Eighties through somber and often frightening changes as the disease claims
victims from among their numbers.  The behaviors we see are very much
universal to epidemics and plagues.  Initially the diseases are taken with
concern but also with an occasional flippant optimism.  We see weird
explanations of what the epidemic "really is."  Paranoia poisons the former
carefree friendships.  All the while the disease is taking its toll in the
decreasing circle of friends.
     LONGTIME COMPANION has too many major characters to keep them all
straight (no pun intended), particularly because they all look like
wholesome, male WASPs, but the center of the group is David, played by Bruce
Davison.  Davison's acting goes unnoticed until his character is placed
under a severe emotional strain.  Then Davison does some excellent acting
that must be about the best he has ever done.  Also notable is Mary-Louise
Parker as a close (heterosexual) friend.
     A couple of touches in the script are worth mentioning.  There is a
reference in the 1982 sequence to William Hurt playing a gay character.  I
believe they are alluding to Hurt's performance in the 1985 KISS OF THE
SPIDER WOMAN.  Also, there are about ten dated sequences and all but the
last four take place on Fridays.  That seems too many for coincidence, yet
none of the last four is a Friday.  (I am probably the only one who notices
these things.)
     LONGTIME COMPANION is not great.  I would give it a high +1 on the -4
to +4 scale.  But at a reported $1.5 million in production cost and with a
timely subject, this film is probably a very good choice for a theatrical
release.

Title
Review for Jalla! Jalla! (2000)
    CAPSULE: This super-light situation comedy from Sweden 
    tells the story of two close friends with romantic 
    problems.  The script involves formerly taboo subjects 
    like erotic toys and sexual enhancers but otherwise the 
    writing is not a lot different from what is shown free 
    on television.  The characters are paper-thin and the 
    interesting ideas purely non-existent.  This is a 
    decrement-life-by-90-minutes card.  Rating: 4 (0 to 10), 
    0 (-4 to +4)
JALLA! JALLA! is basically an exuberant TV situation comedy 
written instead for the wide screen.  It tells the story of two 
park custodians and the problems they are finding on the path to 
true love.  The film is set in Sweden where Roro and Mans (Fares 
Fares and Torkel Petersson) are custodians at a public park.  Roro 
is from a tightly knit Lebanese family who control him very 
closely, Mans is a Swede from a much more liberal background.  
They spend most of the day in the bushes at their park, cleaning 
up after dogs.  Roro and Mans each have girlfriends, but each has 
a problem.  Roro (nicknamed "Jalla") is having family problems.  
It seems that his family wants to arrange a marriage between him 
and a nice Lebanese woman, Yasmin (Laleh Pourkarim), but he is 
already in love with Lisa (Tuva Novotny).  Yasmin likes Roro, but 
does not want to get married either.  Mans on the other hand has 
been having a problem of sexual impotence.  The two friends worry 
about their problems and discuss the problems with each other.  
Mans thinks the answer to his problem is to purchase sexual 
enhancers.  The one catch is that he is too shy to go in and buy 
them.  Roro and Yasmin decide to give themselves some time by 
telling the families that they want to marry each other, but then 
plan to break up before the wedding.  Not too surprisingly neither 
finds that his idea works out the way he quite expected.
The plot turns in several places are contrived.  One knows fairly 
quickly that if things are going to work our happily for everybody 
certain plot contrivances have to happen.  Lebanese-born Josef 
Fares who wrote and directed is perhaps a better director than he 
is a writer.  When things start to get slow, he just adds throws 
in another story.  For example halfway into the film Mans 
innocently antagonizes some local toughs and a long chase is added 
to the film.  Characterization is a little better with Roro than 
it is with Mans who does not seem to have a whole lot more 
personality beyond fear for losing a biological function.  We do 
see some of Roro's family life and his concerns.  That may be 
because Roro's background is a lot like that of the director.
While the story was entertaining, I did not feel that I got 
anything worthwhile from the film.  It was just a way to pass 
about an hour and a half in my life.  One does not have to go to 
the movies to see entertainment like this.  I rate it a 4 on the 0 
to 10 scale and a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale. 

Title
Review for Misery (1990)
     Stephen King showed up as advertised at a World Fantasy Convention I
attended in Ottawa.  I have a review copy of CARRIE I found cheap in a used
bookstore and I thought this would be a good opportunity to get it
autographed.  I had no idea the investment of time it would require.  The
limit was three books per person and even with that limit King could have
easily spent twelve hours straight just autographing books for his fans.
But the number was not so amazing as the fervor of some of his fans.  Some
fans scouted at the front of the line to find people who were holding fewer
than three books and who could be coerced into getting someone else's book
autographed.  Now recognize, King is only a reasonably competent writer.
But he is a celebrity and every celebrity seems to have a cult of admirers
in which a fair percentage carry their adulation to the point of being
nuisances.  Martin Scorsese's KING OF COMEDY shows not too unrealistically
the fervor of some fans, including King's.
     That King knows the extremities of what fans will do and uses it as the
basis of a book is hardly surprising.  What is a little more surprising is
that King would, knowingly or not, combine the idea with a plot that had
previously been done on NIGHT GALLERY.  In the "Marmalade Wine" episode a
man, played by Robert Morse, takes refuge from a storm in the secluded house
of a lonely surgeon, played by Rudy Vallee.  The surgeon seems only too
pleased to have a guest he can care for.  The visitor finds himself drugged
and wakes to the surgeon cheerfully informing him, "I've taken the liberty
of amputating your feet.  Have some oatmeal."  (There are further plot
parallels, but revealing them would be a MISERY spoiler.)
     Well, there you have the basic plot of Rob Reiner's adaptation of the
Stephen King novel MISERY.  James Caan plays Paul Sheldon, author of eight
melodramatic books about a heroine named Misery.  He mangles himself in a
car accident in a Colorado snowstorm and awakes to find himself in the
overly loving care of his self-professed "Number One Fan," Annie Wilks.
Kathy Bates plays Nurse Wilks, who refuses to share her patient with any
hospital and instead cares for him attentively in her own home.  Wilks takes
the occasion to read the eighth book about Misery.  When the Number One Fan
finds out Sheldon has killed off Misery, the number two really hits the fan.
Sheldon will be held a prisoner until he writes a novel resurrecting Misery.
Wilks flashes from adulation to rage to depression.  Bates's combination of
winning child-like innocence and monstrous menace--perhaps not so far
apart--is really what makes the film tick.  Caan's flat performance goes
almost unnoticed next to Bates.  Richard Farnsworth and Frances Sternhagen
as a husband and wife sheriff and deputy have some chemistry but not enough
screen time really to show it.
     It seems as if every popular lead actor in Hollywood will eventually be
cast as "the good cop" in an action film and every director in Hollywood
will eventually direct a Stephen King horror film.  Maybe it only seems that
way.  But MISERY is certainly Rob Reiner's least remarkable film to date.
It is hard to imagine that MISERY is from the same director who made has a
very distinguished set of films including THE SURE THING and THE PRINCESS
BRIDE.  Reiner seems to have been gambling very heavily on Kathy Bates's
performance to set this film apart and make it a Reiner film.  Bates was
good but not that good.
     In the end MISERY is a very minor horror film not too different from
DEAD OF WINTER or several others.  My rating would be a high 0 on the -4 to
+4 scale.

Title
Review for Mermaids (1990)
     Rachel Flax (played by Cher) has not handle responsibility well.  On
the surface she seems a likable kook with some odd ways of getting through
life with minimal commitment.  When life gets too hectic for her, she packs
up and moves on, together with her two daughters.  What she refuses to face
is that she is hurting everyone around her and making both daughters
incredibly neurotic.  At first the viewer chuckles at the odd quirks of the
family, but with time the chuckling becomes more uneasy and we get a feel
for the painful contortions the Flax family is being put through by their
mother's willful avoidance of any commitment.  The movie is seen from 15-
year-old daughter Charlotte's point of view as she desperately tries to
understand her coming-of-age with no guidance whatsoever from her mother.
(Charlotte is played by the ubiquitous Winona Ryder, who is currently in
EDWARD SCISSORHANDS and WELCOME HOME, ROXY CARMICHAEL and is rumored to have
had a nervous breakdown that prevented her from also being cast as Michael
Corleone's daughter in THE GODFATHER III.  Predictably she gets everything
confused.  One minute she wants to become a nun (though she is Jewish), she
is fixated on Catholicism), and the next she is praying to be raped by the
26-year-old hunk who is the caretaker at a nearby convent.
     Mrs. Flax is having her current affair with a Lou Landsky who owns the
local shoe store "Foot Friendly."  There are a couple of problems here,
actually.  "Foot Friendly" at least sounds like a take-off on the phrase
"user-friendly," but MERMAIDS is set in 1963, before terminology like "X-
friendly" was familiar or perhaps even invented.  The second is that the
script apparently calls for Lou to be Jewish and from the Midwest and the
role is something of a stretch for actor Bob Hoskins.  His character Lou
realizes that behind all the weirdness there is a lot of pain in the Flax
family.  He wants to help but must tread a narrow line of helping the
children and not scaring Rachel into "moving on."
     Richard Benjamin directed, though a recent PBS discussion said that
Cher was able to maintain much of the artistic control.  The script's worst
faults are its lulling the audience into believing the material would be
light-weight, and a gratuitous piece of suspense toward the end that
cheapens the effect of the film and makes it seem more manipulative where
earlier it had been more sensitive.  Still MERMAIDS has more to it than
first meets the eye.  I rate it a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Jeanne et le garçon formidable (1998)
     CAPSULE: How do you tell a now fairly familiar love story set in
the time of AIDS?  The French do it by turning it into a light musical.
Virginie Ledoyen is charming as a young woman who finds her new lover
is HIV-positive.  Rating:  7 (0 to 10), low +2 (-4 to +4)
   - Directed by Olivier Ducastel and Jacques Martineau
   - The musical is not my favorite genre of film.  Musicals got too
     big with ornate production numbers in the US and fell apart of
     their own weight.  Woody Allen tried his own hand at the musical
     with EVERYONE SAYS I LOVE YOU.  It just did not work for me.  The
     French have a better approach.  They do not build the story around
     huge production numbers.  They just tell their story and at
     various moments a character will sing a simple song.  Perhaps
     there will be a few dance steps.
   - Virginie LeDoyen plays a switchboard operator who rarely is
     lacking a bed-partner.  But Jeanne is anxious to find a perfect
     lover.  She finds one, Olivier LaGrange (Mathieu Demy), on the
     underground, only to find he is HIV positive.  Without her
     realizing it they have a mutual friend, a gay school professor who
     knows Olivier from ACT-UP, the AIDS activist group.
   - Hard to imagine Jeanne is this promiscuous and this is the first
     time she has been touched by AIDS.
   - Musical numbers seem to start up very naturally.  Often they are
     on unexpected subjects like Tsing-tao Beer or foreign workers
     singing how they cannot get naturalization papers.
   - Most of the plot twists are predictable.
   - Last scene of film very different that what we would have in an
     American film.

Title
Review for Gattaca (1997)
     While some pairs of identical twins lead surprisingly similar
lives, frequently they do not and frequently they show different
interests and potential.  So there are limitations on the information
about the adult that can be augured by a DNA examination.  That makes
it seem to be unlikely that we would ever get to the world as it is
shown in GATTACA where everything anyone wants to know about you is
encoded into your DNA.  However, GATTACA assumes that the world has
decided that DNA is the most reliable way of judging a person in spite
of counter-examples like Vincent (played by Ethan Hawke) the main
character of this story.  Vincent has been delegated to the labor class
based on his DNA.  He looks wistfully at the rockets blasting off from
the Gattaca Corporation and dreams of going off into space.  He is
highly motivated, but nobody notices because his DNA says that he just
does not have the potential to be much more than a floor sweeper,
permanently a part of the under-class.  One wonders how so inaccuratea
test could be accepted without question by a society, particularly
after age of civil rights and civil liberties advances.
     Vincent knows he does not have a chance of being chosen by the
Gattaca Corporation for one of their probes into space, so he decides
to literally reinvent himself.  There is a criminal element who are
willing to match him up with a human with a much better DNA structure
who can supply him with hairs, urine samples, blood samples and any
other kind of sample so that all the samples that Gattaca takes from
him will really be from Jerome (Jude Law).  Jerome agrees to live with
Vincent, providing him with sufficient biological specimens to give to
the company and letting Vincent take on Jerome's name.  This is a
tricky process involving things like false finger tips filled with
Jerome's blood form the ID machine that takes a sample.  We see how
Vincent is occasionally able to substitute Jerome's specimens for his
own, but it is never really convincing that he could do that whenever
the need arises.  Vincent romances a fellow employee Irene Cassini (Uma
Thurman) who gets pulled into this web of deception.
     The story moves at a languorous pace showing how the world has
changed since the conversion to the DNA standard.  Andrew M. Niccol who
wrote and directed has given us a "not too distant future" that is not
entirely convincing, but is still worth seeing.  Loose ends abound, but
that may be part of the point.  For example, Vincent has taken over for
Jerome and is telling the world that he is the same person, but Jerome
has a "toffee-nosed" British accent and so presumably comes from an
environment that would produce such an accent.  Vincent does not havea
British accent at all.  Yet nobody seems to even care to compare
Vincent to his claimed background. It is hard to place how far this
world is in the future.  Women and men at Gattaca dress in almost
identical uniforms and women wear their hair in almost masculine
styles.  Cars make the whining sound of turbines, but still look a lot
like the cars of today.
     The photography by Slawomir Idziak is just a bit showy, bathing
some scenes in yellow or blue light. Particularly in the first half of
the film it is often his camerawork that creates the mood in scenes
devoid of any music.  It gives the world a repressive, sterile, dry
feel.  Michael Nyman's score when it does kick in is repetitive almost
to the point of being minimalist.
     GATTACA has a few places where it could have had the details
better developed, but it is a complex story, perhaps of the complexity
of a novel.  It is told without the too common problems of science
fiction of too much special effects replacing careful thought.  If
anything, GATTACA is a film that substitutes intelligence for
explosions.  This is about people caught up in a sort of cautionary
dystopic world.  It may not be a likely world, but it has well-
developed character in this world.  Overall I would rate GATTACA a +2
on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Dracula (1992)
[This is the first of *many* reviews of BRAM STOKER'S DRACULA.  In general, I
try to keep the number of reviews per movie low, but it proved impossible to
decide which reviews to eliminate--so they're all here.  -Moderator]
     In 1922 F. W. Murnau made the first film version of DRACULA: NOSFERATU.
While the film really was a thinly veiled plagiarism of Bram Stoker's novel,
originally calling the vampire Count Orlock, the source of the material was
obvious.  What was unusual about Murnau's version was the expressionist,
almost surreal, world that Dracula/Orlock lives in.  Using the crude special
effects of the day, Murnau drops the viewer into a sinister world of strange
visual images.  Subsequent versions, with the possible exception of Werner
Herzog's 1979 NOSFERATU, tended to show the story in a more natural world.
There were good reasons for that, mainly dealing with budget, but also with
audience acceptance.  Bela Lugosi, John Carradine, up through Christopher
Lee, all play Dracula as a human-like creature with a few special powers,
while there was little question that Max Schreck's Count Orlock had
transformed into something really quite different from a human.  Francis
Ford Coppola has directed a new DRACULA for a new generation and has
intentionally way out-done Murnau and Stoker.  Coppola has claimed this
would be the dramatic version closest to Stoker's novel and nearly
succeeded, at least for accuracy of plot.  (The three-hour BBC COUNT DRACULA
and the one-hour premiere of Orson Welles's "Mercury Theater" radio program
were both versions more faithful than Coppola's.)  Stylistically, Coppola
has turned up the horror elements in a way to make the novel prosaic by
contrast.
     Presumably most people reading this review will already have a good
idea what the story is about.  The historic Dracula (literally "Son of the
Dragon") was also known as Vlad Tepes ("Vlad the Impaler").  He got his
first nickname because his father was Vlad Drakul ("Vlad the Dragon").
Don't believe the film's introduction that said he got the name for being in
the Order of the Dragon; he was not.  It was Vlad Drakul, Dracula's father,
who was in the Order of the Dragon.  Two more things not to believe: the
Vlads were Hungarian, not Romanian as they say in the introduction (borders
were different then from what they are now) and the impalements were
depicted wrong.  People were not impaled the short way, through the trunk.
Instead they were set on the stake using holes nature had already provided,
which is a slower and much more agonizing death.  This alone would have made
Vlad Dracula feared.
     Here is where fiction separates from reality.  Stoker's novel claims
the feared Dracula became a vampire who still terrorized Transylvania four
centuries later.  For reasons that have been left by Stoker to speculation,
the vampire Dracula has decided to migrate to England and to spread his
infectious vampirism to a new country.  The symptoms of an outbreak of
vampirism eventually come to the attention of a Professor Van Helsing who
recognizes what is happening and, with a small group of friends, checkmates
and eventually destroys the vampire.
     In spite of his professed fidelity to the novel, Coppola's version,
with a screenplay by James V. Hart, makes some basic revisions to the story.
Borrowing an idea that goes back at least to the 1933 Boris Karloff film THE
MUMMY.  Dracula, it seems, became undead because of his love for a woman
back when he was truly alive.  Centuries later Dracula is still around and
finds a reincarnation of this lost love.  Now he wants her for his lover
again.  Dracula becomes a tragic hero trying to regain lost love.
     Other revisions to the story include a complete transformation of the
character of Van Helsing.  In the book it seems to me he was cautious and
reserved, holding his tongue as long as possible.  The film makes him a sort
of mad professor who does not care about the impact of his statement and
likely to misbehave in strange and unpredictable ways.  Actually, much of
the conversation we hear is probably a good deal franker and more sexual
than would be likely in Victorian drawing rooms.  The same goes for the
public cinematograph showing nude women.  I have no doubt the pictures dated
from then, but probably would have been reserved for a less public venue.
Two more places where a bit more research might have been done: Mina
mentions Madame Curie as if her name was a household word in 1897.  It was
not until several years later that Curie would become famous.  Also Van
Helsing said that the "story of syphilis is the story of civilization" as if
it had been around as long as civilization.  Actually the first known case
was in 1493.  It is suspected of having originated in the New World mostly
due to the chronology.  No other European is even suspected of having
originated with native Americans, incidentally.  And even in this case, it
is known only that it came with Spanish mariners from some other port.
     As for the acting, it is fairly spotty.  Keanu Reeves seems out of
place and uncomfortable as Jonathan Harker.  Anthony Hopkins is a bit too
weird as Van Helsing.  Normally, I would call that the fault of the script,
but various interviews have indicated that it was Hopkins's idea.  Winona
Ryder really was not too bad as Mina.  Her British accent seemed acceptable
to me, though likely a Briton might have a different idea.  Of course, she
did squint her eyes in a scene in which she was supposedly dead.  Then there
is Gary Oldman as Dracula.  Lon Chaney, Jr., was a very plain-looking man
who, contrary to expectation, was the best character actor of his
generation.  That same description applies to the man who played Joe Orton,
Sid Vicious, Lee Harvey Oswald, and Dracula.  This understated actor's range
is incredible.
     But what sets this version apart from all other versions is the look.
One image after another is startling.  Time and again the camera plays with
us.  You find yourself wanting to view scenes a second time.  Your eye will
catch something funny in a scene.  Dracula's shadow may be just an instant
in timing slower than Dracula himself.  Transylvania is painted in bright
primary colors.  Out of a red sky you will make out two huge Draculine eyes
watching a character.  It could be a touch of German Expressionism.  The
battle scenes in the historic sequence borrow from Akira Kurosawa.
Throughout the entire film there is a dram-like quality, perhaps a
surrealism.  Coppola seems to have chosen to avoid computer effects such as
morphing.  While these effects might be effective for a science fiction
film, there is something about them that does not work in a pure horror
film.  It did not occur to me at the time, but that might be one reason that
FRIGHT NIGHT was not as effective for me as it could have been.
     The one problem with this version is the lack of actor empathy.  BRAM
STOKER'S DRACULA is for me more an artistic success than a good horror film.
It tells the story often with images more vital than Stoker used in his
novel.  As with Murnau's seminal version, scenes are very good, but the net
effect perhaps is less than the sum of the parts.  My rating is a +2 on the
-4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Hot Shots! (1991)
          Capsule review:  Jim Abrahams, without the assistance of
     the Zucker brothers, manages to recapture the spirit of the
     classic Z.A.Z. comedies with about a gross of bad jokes, a
     gross of good jokes, a half dozen *very funny* gags, and maybe
     two or three dozen in-joke film allusions.  What NAKED GUN
     2-1/2 should have done to police action films, HOT SHOTS does
     to military flying films.  Not one cliche remains intact when
     Abrahams is done.  Rating: law +2 (-4 to +4).
     Earlier this summer, and with much fanfare, we saw NAKED GUN 2-1/2
directed by Jerry Zucker of the famous team of David Zucker, Jim Abrahams,
and Jerry Zucker, who made KENTUCKY FRIED MOVIE, AIRPLANE!, TOP SECRET!,
television's POLICE SQUAD!, and NAKED GUN.  And at that point I said that a
film was just not as funny if it did not have all three funny men doing the
writing.  As far as I am concerned, NAKED GUN 2-1/2 just did not click.  Now
Jim Abrahams has his own attempt at an Airplane!  style film with HOT SHOTS.
And guess what?  Abrahams operating without the other two really can capture
the manic style of AIRPLANE!.  HOT SHOTS must average at least three jokes a
minute and probably more.  Maybe one in six is genuinely funny and at least
half are enjoyably witty.  The movie is 85 minutes long.  You can do the
math yourself and figure that HOT SHOTS is a *very funny* movie.
     This time around Abrahams is trashing another breed of flying film, the
military flying film.  TOP GUN, FLIGHT OF THE INTRUDER, AN OFFICER AND A
GENTLEMAN, MEMPHIS BELLE, and probably many others provide a mother lode of
cliches for HOT SHOTS to mine.  But those are just the beginning.  There
must be thirty film references for films outside the military flight genre.
Charlie Sheen plays Topper Harley, a second generation hot-shot pilot who
wants to recover the name his father soiled.  Carey Elwes (formerly of THE
PRINCESS BRIDE) plays Kent Gregory, who has a vendetta to settle against
Harley.  Valeria Golino (formerly of PEE-WEE'S BIG-TOP) plays Ramada
Thompson, Navy psychiatrist and occasional night club singer, who provides
the love interest, and who in a remarkable scene with Sheen really sizzles.
Even telling the names of most of the other characters would be giving away
some of the gags of the film, not that HOT SHOTS could not spare them.
     The film culminates in an air attack on a certain unnamed Middle East
country.  Considering that the flight sequences are basically a throwaway,
they are surprisingly convincing.  While occasional model work is obvious,
at least some of the scenes really seem to show some impressive flying.
Even where model work is used it is surprisingly good, no doubt by reaping
effects technology as well as cliches from supposedly more serious flying
films.  If you like Z.A.Z. films but were disappointed by NAKED GUN 2-1/2,
this may be the film you were looking for.  I rate HOT SHOTS a low +2 on the
-4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Beauty and the Beast (1991)
          Capsule review:  Disney's animated feature films are, in
     my opinion, over-rated.  They lack plot and complexity.
     Their emotional impact is limited.  The usual excuse is that
     they are only supposed to be simple children's films.  BEAUTY
     AND THE BEAST demonstrates that a lot more can be done in
     this medium.  It beats BAMBI, CINDERELLA, SNOW WHITE,
     SLEEPING BEAUTY, and all of the other classics, including
     FANTASIA.  Parents should go with their kids.  If you don't
     have kids, go anyway.  This one may not be on cassette this
     century.  Rating: +2 (-4 to +4).
     I rather surprised myself with BEAUTY AND THE BEAST.  When I was young,
I liked the Disney feature cartoons as little entertainments, but after age
ten or so I found the stories a little uninteresting.  Eventually I could
respect the detail in the technique, but even then I was rarely impressed
with their imagination.  Yes, they had attention to detail and if I knew
what to look for, I liked that.  But, with the exception of the dragon
sequence from SLEEPING BEAUTY and the "Night on Bald Mountain" sequence from
FANTASIA, there was not much beyond lukewarm imagination.  And the stories
were really uninteresting.  And being a realist about my own looks, I have
long been a little irritated at the subtext that equates physical beauty and
ugliness to evil.  With all that to set up my attitude, it is hardly
surprising that I would come away from BEAUTY AND THE BEAST genuinely
believing it is the best animated feature film ever to come from Disney
Studios.  And that includes that beloved intellectual fraud FANTASIA.
     The plot of the film maintains Disney's usual standard for fidelity to
the original story.  This means, of course, that if you read Madame de
Villeneuve's story and then saw the film, you would be likely to see
similarities and probably would believe that the story did somehow inspire
the film.  (Those anxious to read the story faithfully told can find it in
Andrew Lang's BLUE FAIRY BOOK.)  Some bits were more likely inspired by Jean
Cocteau's film LA BELLE ET LA BETE.  Belle, if not a real intellectual, is
at least a reader.  In fact, she seems to love books more than boys, so is
thought to be weird.  (Bravo for her!)  But Belle has a semi-secret admirer.
Gaston is handsome, big, and strong.  He is also obnoxious, insufferably
conceited, sexist, and selfish.  Gaston is supremely macho and the film
subtly makes the statement that to be macho is to be beastlike.  All of
Gaston's virtues that he tells us about are really just descriptions of a
beast.  He is big, he kills animals, he is covered with hair.  There are a
bevy of young women from the town who swoon over the beastly qualities of
Gaston.  Belle, however, is unimpressed and wants nothing to do with Gaston.
Then events conspire (or contrive) to make her the prisoner in an enchanted
castle ruled over by a real beast--or at least an apparently real beast.  He
has all of Gaston's qualities in a more extreme form.  The Beast is super-
macho, but knows that it is a curse both literally and figuratively.  Belle
wants no part of the Beast until he starts to win her over.  How does he
start to win her over?  In a manner--time-honored in Disney films--for
beasts to win over people.  I won't say how, but anyone who has seen OLD
YELLER will find the situation familiar.  The story is well-told, though
almost entirely revisionist.
     Some mention should be made of the castle's enchantment, since many of
the film characters exist as a direct result of that enchantment.  Once
touch that Cocteau put in his film version that was not in the original
story was that the walls of the castle had ornamental torch-holders that
looked like human arms holding the torches.  These ornamental holders have a
life of their own.  The Disney film extends this to most of the furnishings
of the castle, giving them also voices and personalities.  At moments this
almost has a Philip K. Dick sort of horror, when someone drinking from a tea
cup finds the cup is talking to him.  The personalities are genial, however,
and the potential horror is quickly muted.
     Visually this film is at least up to and probably better than what we
think of as the classic Disney feature cartoons.  Snow White and Sleeping
Beauty were drawn as sweet and cheerful as a bluebird but perhaps not quite
as smart.  They were characters for years when innocence was prized over
intelligence.  Belle has apricot-sized eyes and high cheekbones, but also a
range of facial expression far greater than the classic animation heroines.
There is clearly more going on in her head than in those of her previous
counterparts.  Whether it was done before without acknowledgement, or is a
new approach, a different team animates each of the major characters.  James
Baxter headed the team which animated Belle and Paige O'Hara voiced the
characters.
     The Beast is a strange concoction combining elements of a mandrill, a
bison, a lion, and the American werewolf in London.  Glen Kean was is chief
animator for the Beast.  The voice casting director (I am sorry I do not
have his name) listened on tape to several dozen voices for special
characteristics.  He said in an interview that he himself was surprised to
hear the qualities he wanted in the voice of Robbie Benson.  I share his
surprise and his conviction that Benson's voice does work for the Beast.
     In general, the art and animation are impressively done.  These days
effort goes into every background painting.  One place I noted poor
technique and it took me some time to get the joke.  While Disney artists
usually take pains to make each character different, the three village maids
who fawn on Gaston are really one character drawn three times.  They were
then animated in a perfunctory two-dimensional style.  Perhaps the
filmmakers were subtly saying that women impressed by macho are just not
worth much effort.
     The songs are by Howard Ashman and Alan Menken, who also wrote the
songs for THE LITTLE SHOP OF HORRORS (one piece is reminiscent of a piece
from LITTLE SHOP) and THE LITTLE MERMAID.  Overall, the music is better than
that of THE LITTLE MERMAID.  The remainder of the film's music was by
Menken.  Ashman served as executive producer.  A note at the end dedicates
the film to Howard Ashman, who died of AIDS eight months before the release
of the film.
     There is some irony in the fact that Don Bluth left Disney animation
studios because they were not doing animation films in their own grand
tradition and now they may be doing them better.  In BEAUTY AND THE BEAST
Disney Studios has given me something it has not given me in a long time: an
animated feature film I want to see again.  I rate it a +2 on the -4 to +4
scale.  Amazing.

Title
Review for Priest (1994)
     Even the most idealistic laws can be only an approximation of
justice.  Criminals who hurt other people can hide behind the Fifth
Amendment of the Constitution.  They are given that right by the law so
that the law can be used to prevent larger injustices.  In A MAN FOR
ALL SEASONS the character Sir Thomas More puts it extremely succinctly
by saying, "I give the Devil benefit of law for my own safety's sake."
(That is a great scene, by the way.  I consider it the best single
scene in any film I know.)  What is true of the laws of this country is
also true of the laws of the Catholic Church.  It is a terrible
responsibility to have to allow in the name of a law a very bad evil to
continue in order to serve a greater good.  And that is the
responsibility that nearly destroys the young and idealistic Father
Greg in Antonia Byrd's PRIEST, a film from a powerful screenplay by
Jimmy McGovern.
     Father Greg (played by Linus Roache) is a young and high-minded
priest sent a rough Liverpool parish.  He is there to replace an older
priest who was fired when he fell from favor with his superiors.  "Time
to move on, old son," they told him insensitively.  His replacement is
Father Greg, who has little sympathy for priests or parishioners who do
not live by the rules of the Church.  This immediately puts him into
conflict with Father Matthew (Tom Wilkinson), the other presiding
priest of the parish.  Matthew is more worldly and more tolerant of
failure and sin.  The two priests immediately have philosophical
differences effectively over whether to follow the letter or the spirit
of church law.  But any chance Matthew might have in convincing Greg is
lost when Greg discovers Matthew is sleeping with the housekeeper,
Maria Kerrigan (Cathy Tyson).  This is just the sort of decadence that
Father Greg abhors, but he cannot completely condemn, knowing that
secretly he himself has desires that would make him a sinner in the
eyes of the Church.  Greg, who came to Liverpool reasonably confident
that he has all the answers, finds to his shock that there are
questions deeper than his answers go.  Like the main character in
Nathaniel West's MISS LONELYHEARTS, Greg is unprepared for the real-
world problems of the people around him.  Soon all this is overwhelmed
by his learning in the confessional of a terrible evil going on.  He
cannot take action without breaking his vow to protect the seal of
privacy of the confessional.  His choice of protecting the Church at
the expense of one of his parishioners, combined with his knowledge
that he is breaking other Church rules, places him in the jaws of a
crushing moral dilemma.
     The cast of PRIEST is mostly unfamiliar--the exceptions being
Cathy Tyson of MONA LISA and John Bennett, a veteran of 70's horror
films and episodes of "Doctor Who," here playing a priest so straight-
laced and old school he insists on speaking in Latin over dinner.
Still the acting is magnetic with especially good performances from
Roache and Wilkinson.
     It is perhaps ironic that members of the Catholic Church should
choose this film to protest.  McGovern's script could easily have made
the Church appear entirely wrong.  A lesser writer might have done
that.  Most American films make it obvious which side is correct in any
conflict.  But the dilemma in this film really is a dilemma and there
are good arguments on each side.  McGovern leaves it to the viewer to
decide whether Greg has done the right thing or not.  That is genuinely
refreshing.  I give PRIEST a low +3 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Matewan (1987)
          Capsule review:  A great propaganda film in the best
     traditions of Sergei Eisenstein.  An engrossing account of
     the birth pangs of the coal miners' union in Matewan, West
     Virginia, as seen purely from the union's point of view.
     Rating: +2.  Disclaimer: No political intention should be
     inferred from this article.  I am addressing issues of
     filmmaking style only.
     I think a lot of people were very surprised when REDS came out.  Warren
Beatty had been in some okay films but he had never shown any great talent.
Then he made REDS and people realized that somewhere inside him there was a
serious filmmaker with something to say.  John Sayles's track record has
been only moderately better than Beatty's.  His films had been mostly low-
budget pieces, usually with a social message.  Included are films like
RETURN OF THE SECAUCUS SEVEN, LIANNA, and BROTHER FROM ANOTHER PLANET.
MATEWAN is very much Sayles's REDS.  It is a detailed historical piece done
on a reasonable budget and it is a very moving film.
     MATEWAN is the story of how the union came to the mines of West
Virginia.  It is the story of open warfare between the miners and the
company who had kept the miners in virtual slavery.  Each side has its
general.  Leading the miners is Joe Kenehan, an idealistic young union man
with visions of a worldwide union.  Leading the fight for the company are
Hickey and Griggs, mercenaries brought in to put down the insurrection of
mine workers and to get the mines turning a profit again.  There is a lot of
history in MATEWAN, but it does not detract one iota from the story-telling.
     But while in some ways MATEWAN is similar to REDS, in some ways it is
very different.  REDS was sympathetic to the socialists, but showed them
reasonably realistically, warts and all.  Sayles instead was trying to make
a perfect propaganda film and, with some borrowing from masters like
Eisenstein, I think he has made it.  MATEWAN is the American equivalent of
BATTLESHIP POTEMKIN.  In two and a half hours of film Joe Kenehan shows
absolutely no faults at all.  He is intelligent, considerate, idealistic,
committed, self-sacrificing, and courageous.  Hickey and Griggs show not one
single virtue.  They are mean-spirited, rude, lecherous, impious, selfish,
and they kill people.  Sayles is taking no chances that you might not know
who are the good guys and who are not.
     The miners are a little more human.  The whites start out bigotted
against the blacks and Italians brought in to break the strike, but Kenehan
shows them that the only real fight is the union against the company and all
the workers eventually come to love each other.  In BATTLESHIP POTEMKIN one
of a group of jubilant revolutionaries yells, "Down with Jews!" only to be
shouted down by others who understand "the real fight."
     You see almost nothing of characters who favor the company side other
than Hickey and Griggs.  Sayles wants no possibility of them being humanized
in any way.  In the climactic "Battle on the Tracks" they are simply brought
off a train and seen at a distance without any humanizing close-ups.
Characters who are humanized include the callow young boy, innocent yet
resourceful, who was always anti-company but who gets to see at close range
just how despicable the company men are and, in an almost too perfect
substory, he becomes a hero of the strike.  We also see others uncommitted
at the beginning who are won over by the justice of the strike.
     MATEWAN, in its copious cinematic quoting from Eisenstein, right down
to the "mourning of the dead" scene, undercuts its own credibility.  It is
too perfect a propaganda film to be really trusted on its facts.  It is,
however, a really fine propaganda film and does everything Eisenstein would
have tried for.  It is moving and affecting.  It pulls all the right
strings.  As such it is a pleasure to watch.  Rate it a high +2 on the -4 to
+4 scale.

Title
Review for F.P.1 (1933)
     I came out of a double feature at the Film Forum in New York City
listening to the conversation of the couple behind me.  "Boy, I guess you
really don't know how bad films were back then," the man said.  I guess the
comment really took me by surprise.  This was an evening I had been looking
forward to for months and which had surpassed all expectations.  The evening
started with a chapter from the serial BATMAN, continued with DELUGE, and
concluded with F.P.1.  Each was a film I'd wanted to see for years.  The
fact that they did not stand up well compared to THE ABYSS is hardly
relevant.  Each of these films is a missing piece of the puzzle of how
science fiction films evolved.  When they find a new fossil at Olduvai they
don't get excited because it came from a really terrific ape.  Of the great
classic science fiction films that I have never seen, I expect them all to
be at best mediocre by today's standards.  Better than that is too much to
hope for.  I frankly never expect to see a great 1930s science fiction film
that I have not already seen.
     The BATMAN serial was not actually from the 1930s, but from 1943, and
directed by Lambert Hillyer, who had previously directed atmospheric
chillers such as THE INVISIBLE RAY and DRACULA'S DAUGHTER.  Lewis Wilson was
the screen's first Batman (succeeded by Robert Lowry and, of course, Adam
West and Michael Keaton).  I have seen Michael Keaton sticking his chin out
of his stiff--probably plastic--costume, and he really looks like the comic
character.  In 1943 Columbia did not have the same materials.  Wilson's
Batman suit really does look like the long underwear it was probably made
from.  There are wrinkles on the legs and the arms.  There is a pressed
crease up the side of the legs.  The cowl has the bat-ears but they are bent
at the ends.  The effect is like a jester's cap and brought howls of
laughter from the audience.  Robin had a full head of curly hair and a
Halloween mask.
     The only recognizable actor in the episode was J. Carrol Naish as the
evil Japanese mad scientist Dr. Daka with a machine that turns men into
zombies.  When Daka turns on his weird electrical equipment the entire
theatre vibrates, probably due to equipment left over from showing THE
TINGLER earlier the same week.  It wasn't as visually impressive as the 1989
BATMAN, but it was a lot more fun.  This was Chapter Five of BATMAN, for the
record.
     Film number two was DELUGE, directed in 1933 by Felix Feist, then 23
years old.  He directed the 1953 DONOVAN'S BRAIN and several episodes of
television's VOYAGE TO THE BOTTOM OF THE SEA.  Here he was directing a
screen version of the novel by S. Fowler Wright.  It should be noted that
DELUGE has long been thought to be a lost film and remains semi-lost.  It
has been just a couple of years since a copy turned up and it is dubbed in
Italian.  For this showing a man at the back of the theatre translated.
     The film opens by reminding us that God promised not to destroy the
world by flood again and then, after a buildup of nature going very sour,
proceeds to show most of the world being destroyed just the same way again.
We are told that the west coast has fallen into the ocean but never see it.
We do see New York City struck down by tidal waves and we see buildings
crumble.  If the effects were believable they would be spectacular.
However, even a contemporary reviewer complained that the effects were none
too convincing.  My audience apparently agreed and jeered.  Now I like
really credible effects.  They are a virtue.  But a reasonable attempt at
effects is sufficient for me.  They are, after all, just a device to carry
the plot.  When I go to a puppet show I do not complain that the puppets do
not fool me into thinking they are real people.  Weak effects are quite
forgivable as far as I am concerned if the rest of the film captures my
interest.
     And DELUGE is a very interesting film, if not for anything intrinsic at
least for where it fits historically.  What is particularly interesting is
how the film reminds one of films that came after, but not of films that
came before.  After the holocaust is over and there are just a handful of
people left the story has definite parallels to NO BLADE OF GRASS and the
excellent British television series THE SURVIVORS.
     Before the holocaust we have been introduced to iron-jawed Martin
(Sidney Blackmer), a family man who saves his family by moving them to a
stone quarry but is somehow separated from them.  And we meet Claire, an
athletic swimmer.  The storm washes Claire to the doorstep of two criminals.
Claire becomes one vertex in a triangle that leads to the murder of one of
the criminals.  Roger Corman would use almost the same plot for the 1960
LAST WOMAN ON EARTH.
     Claire escapes the killer Jephson only to be found by Martin, alone
since the storm.  The two of them try to survive together.  However, in the
mean time, a group of survivors has set up a small town.  They have thrown
out some undesirables and the criminals pick Jephson as their leader.  He
leads them on a raid against Martin and Claire.  At this point the film has
sort of degenerated into a bad Western plot.  Surprisingly, things do *not*
work out well for all concerned, and the film does at times touch on
questions of whether bigamy is justifiable in a post-holocaust world.  The
story if crudely done, but that didn't stop much of it from being redone,
often no better, by other filmmakers.  A good film?  No.  But not a bad film
either and definitely an important artifact.
     Waiting for the film to start, I started talking to someone sitting
next to me who had just finished seeing F.P.1.  He assured me it really
cornball with bad dialog.  I think I'd like to thank him for lowering my
expectations and making F.P.1 such a pleasant surprise when my turn came to
see it.  F.P.1 (1932) is an engineering film, sort of a forerunner to THE
TUNNEL and its remake THE TRANSATLANTIC TUNNEL, and later THINGS TO COME.
Like the Tunnel films, F.P.1 concerns itself with engineering feats to aid
transatlantic travel.  Instead of being about a tunnel, it is about the
building of a great floating airstrip and hotel to be built mid-Atlantic,
the Floating Platform 1.
     F.P.1 is really a German film refilmed in English to give it the
trappings of a British film.  It is the story of engineer Captain Drost, who
designed the platform but could not sell it to anyone, and his friend pilot
Major Ellissen, an enigmatic figure who arranges stunts to bring the
platform to the attention of a shipyard, then competes with Drost for the
attentions of heiress Clare Lennartz.  Ellissen is played by a very dashing
Conrad Veidt.
     F.P.1 is a spectacular melodrama of a great engineering feat and what
goes into building it.  There is a subplot of a consortium dedicated to
destroying the great platform for no readily apparent reason.

Title
Review for Village of the Damned (1995)
     [Spoiler warning: For those unfamiliar with the story, VILLAGE OF
THE DAMNED has many small mysteries for the viewer starting with the
very first scene.  It is impossible to say anything about the content
of the film without giving away some of the mysteries.  This review
will have only minor spoilers outside of one paragraph.  That paragraph
will have a separate spoiler warning.]
     One of the best British science fiction authors of the 50s and 60s
was John Wyndham Parkes Lucas Beynon Harris who wrote under several
names, but the best-known were John Beynon Harris and John Wyndham.
His most popular two novels, both written as John Wyndham, were THE DAY
OF THE TRIFFIDS and THE MIDWICH CUCKOOS.  The former has been filmed
twice under its own name; the latter has just been filmed for a second
time, both times under the title VILLAGE OF THE DAMNED, though the
second film version perhaps owes more to the first film than to the
novel.  Incidentally, the novel THE MIDWICH CUCKOOS itself appears to
owe a great deal to Richard Matheson's short story "Trespass"
(a.k.a. "Mother by Protest"), Theodore Sturgeon's "More than Human,"
and Jerome Bixby's "It's a Good Life."
     The director this time is John Carpenter.  When Carpenter remade
THE THING he threw a lot of special effects at the project and made a
film respectful neither of the spirit of the original film, nor of the
classic science fiction story on which it was based.  (Ironically, the
original story could be more satisfyingly adapted today with morphing
effects than with the model effects he used.)  His version of VILLAGE
OF THE DAMNED is much less sensationalist in style, probably lower in
budget, and at the same time a better representation of its story.  The
story is not one of screaming horror and dismembered bodies, but one
with more a subtle and a cerebral sort of chill.
     [Spoiler warning: do not read unless you already know the plot.]
The story takes place in the village of Midwich but no longer Midwich,
England.  Now it is Midwich, California, as unlikely as that name
sounds.  It is a nice, isolated coastal town.  In the middle of the day
a mysterious sleep falls upon everybody in town.  Simultaneously,
everybody in town simply collapses where he is.  Six hours later the
sleep ends as mysteriously as it began.  But things are not quite back
to normal.  Ten women come to realize they are pregnant.  With one
stillbirth, they give birth to what appears to be nine silver-haired
children, but it is actually one single organism with a single mind and
incredible mental powers.
     Carpenter has put in a few touches to please an action-film
audience.  There are a couple of particularly nasty deaths, there are
two fiery truck crashes, and toward the end there is a half-hearted
action scene with guns blazing.  But most of the violence is compulsion
by mental suggestion and mental suggestion is what Carpenter uses to
make it seem effective to the viewer.
     Carpenter clearly respects Wolf Rilla's 1960 version.  He credits
the screenplay and lifts whole scenes from the earlier film's script.
Visually he imitates the style of the earlier adaptation.  Realizing
how silly the superchildren would look in modern clothing styles, he
dresses them in the same sort of clothing as the earlier film and gives
them a similar silver-haired look and similar facial cast.  And
speaking of familiar casts, we have Christopher Reeve as the lead, an
amalgam of two characters in the original, but primarily the George
Sanders character.  Many may disagree but Sanders played the role too
smugly and confidently.  Reeve conveys a wider range of emotions.
Personifying the line "I'm from the Government, and I'm here to help
you" is Kirstie Alley.  There are interesting ironies in her character,
but she adds little to them.  As the town priest Mark Hamill
underpowers the role and carries too much baggage from previous roles.
The Children, like Reeve, may actually do a better job here than in the
original.
     For the most part, VILLAGE OF THE DAMNED looks like a science
fiction film that could have been made in the 60s or 70s that is not
half bad.  I give it a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Independence Day (1996)
     In retrospect there was something positively refreshing about
George Pal's 1953 film THE WAR OF THE WORLDS.  Over the years we have
seen many alien invasion films in which the aliens come as seed-pods to
replace us, or they have an advance guard take over our minds, or they
seed our planet with alien vampires.  Sometimes they really are
friendly; sometimes they only pretend to be friendly; sometimes they
are nasty and hide out in swamps; sometimes they steal our scientists.
There are only a very small handful of films in which the aliens try
straight-ahead overwhelming us with sheer military power.  In most of
them the aliens equivocate by negotiating at some point as they do in
THE MYSTERIANS or EARTH VERSUS THE FLYING SAUCERS.  Unique among these
films, until now, has been THE WAR OF THE WORLDS in which the
implacable aliens arrive with incredible power and start to pound
humanity flat--no negotiation, no communication, no quarter given.
That is perhaps a very believable scenario for an alien invasion, but
since THE WAR OF THE WORLDS nobody has really wanted to tackle it in a
movie.  One reason it has not been done more often is that it would be
really expensive in terms of special effects to do it right, showing
scenes of mass destruction rather than telling the view about them.
And it would require a script that would have the courage to depict
whole population centers destroyed, showing thousands of people being
killed.  George Pal made a reasonable stab at that with his film, but
nobody has really tried it since.  Roland Emmerich and Dean Devlin
apparently observed that film industry's visual technology has caught
up with that concept.  They also realized that the way was paved for
film like this by the success of the television program, "The X-Files."
Whatever convinced them that the time was right they now have a super-
hit of a film.
     A huge artificial object appears near the moon and start moving
toward Earth.  Without warning the skies over major cities go dark as
they are covered by mysterious cloud-banks.  From the cloud-banks
emerge city-sized flying disks, fifteen miles in diameter.  For six
hours they float in ominous silence.  Perhaps the best moments of the
script are the tension before the initial attack.  The script takes its
time, slowly revealing more and more about the alien ships.  The
script, which was co-authored by Dean Devlin who produced and Roland
Emmerich who directed, consciously mimics disaster film writing
introducing a large number of characters, most played by solid but
second string actors.  Bill Pullman plays a rather youthful President
of the United States is worried about his strong-willed but nice First
Lady Marilyn (Mary McDonnell).  He is aided by Constance (Margaret
Colin) whose ex-husband David (Jeff Goldblum) is a whiz with computers
but he is still working out his relationship with his cute but kvetchy
Jewish father Julius (Judd Hirsch).  Davis will soon find his fate
entwined with hotshot Air Force pilot Captain Hiller (Will Smith).
Most of the characters are developed only on the most superficial level
with the most touching relationship being that between David and his
father.
     Emmerich and Devlin freely admit that there is much in
INDEPENDENCE DAY that was inspired by other films.  They cite 1940s war
films and 1970s disaster films, but whole scenes seem to be lifted from
films like ALIEN and THE RIGHT STUFF.  In spite of the safe route of
borrowing from established films, the script does take some chances.
It is not many, but some characters the audience cares about get
killed.  While the script is heavy on coincidence and melodrama it
never fails to be fun.
     If this is not an intelligent film, it is not a really dumb one
either.  It is a big spectacular, almost two and a half hours, with its
share of script problems.  Much the same can be said of films like THE
TEN COMMANDMENTS or THE TOWERING INFERNO.  It is not intelligent, but
it is fun.  There is enough good to compensate for the negative points.
I rate it a high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     Spoiler...Spoiler...Spoiler...Spoiler...Spoiler...Spoiler...Spoiler
     There are a few of the ideas of the film that needed to be better
explained.  The aliens were here to steal out precious natural
resources, supposedly.  Our resources are valuable to us, but Earth is
no richer in resources than any other planet in the solar system.  It
is not at all clear to me why they wasted so much energy and resource
subduing a hostile native population.  It might have been better adding
a few words saying that they needed an atmosphere of oxygen to mine the
resources or that they as a policy first subdue any populations that
might be a threat before mining a solar system.  On the other hand,
perhaps it is better to leave them a little mysterious.
     Part of the problem is that the aliens are a bit too much like us.
They share our eyes, nose, mouth configuration, our five-fingered
hands.  This in spite of the fact that a daisy is a closer relative to
us than they are.  Not only are they too similar, their technology is
way, way too similar.  Humans can figure out how to fly craft
instrumented for their anatomy and designed by their psychology.  We
are able to write and run programs on their computers.  Isaac Newton
was much closer to us than they are in terms of mental processes and I
doubt that if he stumbled somehow on a modern PC it would be able to do
much with it without instructions.

Title
Review for Sleepy Hollow (1999)
     One of the greatest horror films ever made is Edgar Ulmer's 1934
THE BLACK CAT.  It is a delightful black comedy, an exercise in mordant
horror starring both Boris Karloff and Bela Lugosi in their first film
together.  It claims to be based on the classic story by Edgar Allan
Poe, but one can search for hours through the film and not find
anything that Poe would recognize.  One could hardly call it a
retelling of the Poe.  It is a little easier to find elements of
Washington Irving's "Legend of Sleepy Hollow" in Tim Burton's new
SLEEPY HOLLOW, but it is amazing to see how many people are calling
this a retelling of the Irving.  It most certainly is not.  Instead the
story has been disassembled and many of the pieces have been used in
telling the story of what might be a supernatural killer bringing
sleepless nights to the little New York State village of Sleepy Hollow
in 1799.
     Ichabod Crane (played by Johnny Depp) is an enlightened police
detective and reformer from New York City.  He is excited about the
coming of the new century.  (He calls it a new "millennium," indicating
that there must have been a bunch of people working on this film who
did not realize that new centuries and new millennia do not always come
at the same time.  So not everything scary about this film is
intentional.)  Though Crane himself is afraid of the sight of blood--
and seemingly even his own shadow--he believes that new scientific
methods will revolutionize police detective work.  He even has invented
for examining evidence a set of instruments that would do David
Cronenberg proud.  However, his methods are not welcomed by the local
constable and burgomaster (cameos by Alun Armstrong and Christopher
Lee).  Crane is sent by carriage upstate to investigate some recent
mysterious killings in Sleepy Hollow.  Three decapitation murders have
taken place in the little village and Crane is to report to prominent
citizen Baltus Van Tassel (Michael Gambon) and begin his investigation.
And if scientific methods can be employed, so much the better.
     Physically, Depp is all wrong to play the gangly Ichabod Crane.
However the queasy detective shows great internal dissonance when the
strength of his enlightened ideas push against his physical and
psychological weaknesses.  And he tries to hide his distress, not very
successfully, with his cold-fish demeanor.  The strain of this police
case eventually is really too much for him and he finds he is cracking
under the strain.  It is a delightful change to have a vulnerable hero
who has self-doubts and weaknesses.  Perfectly matching the spirit of
the film is a terrific Michael Gambon.  He must have spent hours in
front of a mirror achieving just the perfect facial expression for each
of his scenes, frequently conveying at the same time disdain, disgust,
and fear.  His daughter, Katrina Van Tassel, is Christina Ricci who in
spite of her buxom appearance still looks a lot like Little Wednesday
from THE ADDAMS FAMILY.  Perhaps that is a mold she will take a long
time breaking.  Miranda Richardson quietly plays Van Tassel's wife, but
is clearly the source of most of Van Tassel's strength.  When the
Hessian is given his head he is played by Christopher Walken who
appears to be having a grand time of it.  Rumor has it that Tim Burton
is so introverted that he wants to deal with as few new actors per film
as possible.  As a result many of his actors get used over and over.
Familiar faces include Depp, of course, but also Jeffrey Jones and Lisa
Marie, all from Ed Woods's entourage.  There are more familiar faces
including Michael Gough, Ian McDiarmid, and Casper Van Dien.
     Tim Burton is as much a visual stylist as a director.  His
particular visual style is recognizable and goes back to his amateur
film FRANKENWEENIE.  In this film he uses that style a little less, but
it is still recognizable.  The visual aspects of this film are, in
fact, its greatest attraction.  This is a nice film to look at.
Frequently large mattes are used to create scenes, but in a departure,
they are not intended to be realistic.  Instead they are either obvious
paintings of idealized nature or of smoke-filled scenes of villages
setting a tone for the film.  Sleepy Hollow is an area of mists and
darkness.  The few sunny scenes are memories of the past and again at
the end of the film when normality returns.  Burton intentionally lifts
images from classic horror films.  The film opens with an image of
dripping blood spattering borrowed from the Hammer film (THE HORROR OF)
DRACULA.  Later an image is borrowed from THE PIT AND THE PENDULUM.
     Washington Irving might not have thought much of SLEEPY HOLLOW.
But for a horror film, it is poetic and surprisingly pleasurable.  As
it rarely does when I am watching a film it occurred to me at about the
halfway point that I was really enjoying the film.  Even with all its
faults, this film is fun.  I give it 8 on the 0 to 10 scale and a high
+2 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     SPOILER WARNING... SPOILER WARNING... SPOILER WARNING...
     There are several points I would fine-tune with this film
including: 1) The birdcage on the disk is always filmed as if it is
right side up including at the end when it is filmed from both front
and back.  Seen from the front the cage and bird should be upside-down
if the user sees it right side up.  2) The ending of the film is
completely given away much too soon by the voice of the witch in the
woods.  Anyone who saw the very good TV-movie MERLIN will have heard
the same false voice used extensively.  3) Toward the end of the film
a clue is presented and interpreted.  Crane says that a dead body will
not bleed.  And starting a short time after the death of the body that
is true.  But if the filmmakers were aware of that fact, why did they
have the earlier pregnant victim's body bleed when it was dug up?  They
should have known it could not do that.

Title
Review for Roger & Me (1989)
          Capsule review:  A biting documentary about the
     destruction GM does by closing plants in Flint, Michigan.  It
     is razor-sharp and bitter.  Moore's film is a compilation of
     footage he took and pieces from stock footage, documentaries,
     television, etc.  Moore rarely has to use narration to tell
     the audience the point of a sequence; the point is clear from
     the footage he chooses.  The film has a very effective
     documentary style.  Rating: high +2.
     Michael Moore will likely turn out to be a flash in the pan.  He has a
lot to say about a subject he has been intimately involved with, but it
seems unlikely there is any other subject he will be able to make another
film about with such wit and insight.  But the film he did make may be a
real shot in the arm for documentary filmmaking.  How long has it been since
a documentary has made it to first-run popular (as opposed to art) theaters?
ROGER & ME has, and with very few overt jokes, it is one of the funniest
films of the year.  It seems amazing that by filming a true story as it
actually is happening Moore could have come up with a film at once as funny
and as sad as ROGER & ME, but that is the power of the documentary film
maker and editor.
     ROGER & ME is Moore's funny, bitter account of the decline of Flint,
Michigan, due to its plant closings, and of Moore's own attempts to
interview Roger Smith, the chairman of General Motors.  Smith clearly did
not want to be interviewed by Moore and it is easy to understand why.
Moore's interviews turn everyone he talks to into pate'.  So time after time,
Smith--or people who work for Smith--foil Moore's attempts at an interview
and they become the film's running gag.  Happening once or twice it would
look like daily business, but when Moore is foiled time after time Smith
just ends up looking worse and worse.  And just as surely as we occasionally
have national heroes, Moore has succeeded in making Roger Smith a national
villain.
     But the film is more than just an indictment of Smith or even of the
auto industry.  Moore has captured on film Middle America with every pimple
and pore showing.  He shows hare-brained schemes for reviving Flint, such as
the GM-built theme park Autoworld, built under the assumption that if GM is
in love with cars, the whole country is in love with cars.  It featured a
puppet auto-worker singing love songs to a robot assembler which Moore notes
will replace him.  GM brought in celebrities such as Pat Boone, Anita
Bryant, and Robert Schuller to spread messages of silly optimism.  "Turn
your hurt into a halo," Schuller advises with as straight a face as Schuller
ever has.  When people are in real trouble there is little that can be said
to make it better and Moore's camera zooms in on the foolishness of trying
to fix things up with mere words.  One woman becomes an Amway distributor
and seems to have gone off the deep end on somebody's theory that everybody
has a "season of color" like a zodiac sign, and you must get cosmetics and
clothing in colors determined by your season of color.  The theory sounds
like Elizabeth Arden meets New Age thinking.  Another woman goes into
raising rabbits for pets or meat and cheerfully kills and flays a rabbit for
the camera.
     GM also gets "The Newlywed Game"'s Bob Eubanks, who fails from Flint,
to come to town and tell people how great Flint is.  While Moore is doing a
number on Roger Smith, Eubanks is doing a number on himself that could be
just as bad.
     While I do not have any particular respect for somebody who is a black
belt at karate, I can respect a perfectly placed karate kick.  While I do
not always respect Moore's methods, his film is a perfectly placed kick to
the auto industry and all those who support it.  This is not fair
documentary filmmaking, but it is entertaining and it is effective.  It has
precisely the effect on the audience that it was intended to have.  I would
give it a high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Ransom (1996)
     The coming attraction showed Mel Gibson getting on television and
making a statement to the people who had kidnapped his son.  "This is a
remake of a Glenn Ford movie," I whispered to my wife.  I had seen
virtually the same scene a film on television in the mid-1960s.  I
remember at the time I did not think that film was as exciting as I had
hoped.  But could I figure out what that earlier film was called?  It
was not difficult.  My copy of Maltin listed RANSOM as a 1956 film
starring Glenn Ford and Donna Reed.  I just barely remembered the
original.  Luckily the 1956 version ran on a cable station and I got a
chance to see it a second time.  One thing I had no reason to notice in
the 1960s but impressed me when I saw it recently was that RANSOM
(1956) was written by Cyril Hume and Richard Maibaum; one source said
it was a remake of a television play.  I am actually a bit surprised
the original was as low-key as it was with those two authors.  Cyril
Hume is most familiar to me for writing the films FORBIDDEN PLANET and
THE INVISIBLE BOY.  Richard Maibaum is second only to Ian Fleming for
making James Bond a household name.  Maibaum either wrote or co-wrote
all but about three or four of the Bond films and the ones he did not
write I generally consider some of the worst of the series.  Most of
the James Bond screen persona and its continuity from film to film is
Maibaum's doing, interpreting from the novels.  Yet the 1956 film is a
low-key story built on personalities.
     In RANSOM (1956) the CEO of vacuum cleaner company is faced with
handling the situation when his son is kidnapped--off-camera--from the
boy's school.  The focus of this film is the suspense and a bit of
social comment.  He and the police try to decide what the best strategy
is to deal with the kidnappers and complicated by his wife's mental
breakdown under the stress.  He finds that there is a moral way to deal
with the kidnappers and to increase the chances that his son is
returned alive.  In the original film that solution to his problem is
really the climax of the action.  The remake uses that decision as only
the springboard for its real story.  It asks, if the abductee's father
really took the same unorthodox approach, would it work and what would
happen next?  The new film examines the consequences of his action in
much greater detail, but at the same time throws in a lot of often
mindless action and violence.  It would be difficult to find a better
measuring stick of how tastes in film have changed over forty years
than to compare the quiet black-and-white original with the explosive
and bloody remake.
     Neither lead character is average, but the Glenn Ford father is a
lot more believable.  He is a fairly ordinary businessman, well-off but
a lot like thousands of rather plain leaders of rather modest companies
without much of a public image.  Mel Gibson's version of the same role
is the dashing and sexy founder of a new airline who through his
(somewhat narcissist) television ads is a familiar (and ruggedly
handsome) face to millions of people.  In the first film the police
tell the father that he has hard decisions to make but that paying the
ransom does not really improve on his son's chances.  The emphasis here
is that the man is a professional decision-maker and he has to make
some hard and very complex decisions about what to do about the
kidnapping.  The police lay out the facts and make no recommendations,
though it is clear that to discourage future kidnappings they would
probably prefer the father not pay the ransom.  In the remake the
writers wanted to paint the Gibson character as an indomitable maverick
so, somewhat out of character, Delroy Lindo tells Gibson very
definitely that he should pay off the kidnappers and Gibson decides a
very different strategy from what the police are recommending.  The
original film wanted to put the audience in the father's role, to show
them what it must be like to have a loved one kidnapped and to get them
thinking what they would do.  Gibson's character definitely is not
there for realistic identification value.  He is a hero and a mechanism
to allow a twisty plot, some exciting chases and gunfights, and some
bright red stage blood to be pumped.  As the wife in the original,
Donna Reed has a bit of a mental breakdown under the fear of losing her
son.  This ups the ante on the Glenn Ford father and makes his
decisions all the harder. As a 1990s woman, Rene Russo has her own
ideas about how to get her son back.  She is angered and fierce and a
long way from breaking down like the weak Donna Reed mother did.  In
the original the kidnappers are not the focus of the film and remain
unseen in the film.
     Neither Mel Gibson nor Glenn Ford played their father rolls
significantly differently from their previous roles.  Except for his
profession, Gibson is playing much the same character as he played in
the LETHAL WEAPON films.  Rene Russo has a little acting to do, but her
role is definitely a secondary one and not particularly demanding.  Of
four parents in two films the only actor whose part was a stretch from
previous work was Donna Reed.  It is not easy to play a weak character,
slowly disintegrating, without going into King Lear-ish histrionics.
It also makes for a role that often does not get much respect.  It took
a remake to show how good her acting was in the original and how
different it was from here standard roles in pieces like IT'S A
WONDERFUL LIFE and "The Donna Reed Show."  If there are any real acting
honors in the remake they go to Gary Sinese as a policeman who is
involved in the kidnapping case.  I could not help thinking throughout
the film how much more intriguing the film would have been if he and
Gibson would have traded roles and Sinese could have worked more drama
into the father's role.  It would be a real gamble with the gross, but
it would be a film that people would want to see again.
     The new scriptwriters Richard Price and Alexander Ignon have taken
a very personal look at a very realistic situation and turned it intoa
slick 1990s action fantasy.  The first film had a lot to say about
relationships and about how a fairly average person handles the most
stressful situations he will ever know.  The film is also a very simple
and straightforward story.  The remake with its car-fire and gun-chases
also has a lot more unexpected twists and a much cleverer plot that
takes a clear-eyed hero though a thrilling adventure with his own son
as a prize.  The one really common thread in the approach is that each
has negative things to say about how the media turns private crises
into public media events.  Each film has virtues that the other lacks,
but on balance they make films about equally good, just in very
different ways and for very different audiences.  Intentionally the
remake is a film that can be appreciated by a twelve-year-old.  The
original, not being violent or bloody, with no car chases or gunfire,
and stressing only human drama can probably be recommended only to an
adult audience.  I rate each about a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Twelve Monkeys (1995)
     The virus attack that started in December of 1996 has killed all
but a small remnant of civilization who live in 2035 in underground
hi-tech steel bunkers.  In the bunker under Philadelphia it is like
living in a prison for everyone but prisoners.  Convicted criminals are
kept caged in steel boxes and moved in and out by cranes when they are
chosen to "volunteer" for hazardous tasks.  Prisoner James Cole (Bruce
Willis) is picked to volunteer to collect biological samples on the
surface.  This mission leads to a more important mission, being sent
back in time to 1996 to collect fresh virus samples.  Instead, through
miscalculation, he ends in 1990 where he is almost immediately thrown
into a mental institution.  His doctor is psychologist Dr. Kathryn
Railly (Madeleine Stowe), an expert in of all things, prophecy.  He is
put under the mentorship of a hyperkinetic schizoid Jeffrey Goines
(Brad Pitt) whose most harmless delusions are of being the son of a
famous man.
     12 MONKEYS is a film of great flaws and of at least moderate
virtues.  There are far too many places where the film wanders far
beyond the realm of believability.  In one scene Railly goes visiting
dangerous and unstable men in prison wearing a provocative short skirt.
Admittedly the character had not planned for this at the beginning of
the evening, but it is unlikely she would do it, even so.  Some of the
coincidences that move the plot along are incredibly contrived.  This
is a film that even for strong science fiction film fans will be one
that is better to have seen than to be seeing.  Director Terry Gillium
made BRAZIL a downbeat film to watch, but at least one with its
whimsical side.  For this film he has removed just about all the charm
and created a nightmarish past and present, and an especially bleak
future.  His images grate like steel claws scratching on a blackboard.
The entire film is an assault on the emotions and the senses.  For
example, this is just the film for all those people who have been
waiting years to see Bruce Willis drool, bleed, spit, and eat spiders.
That is just the kind of film it is.  Much of the story takes place in
mental institutions or alleys of homeless schizophrenics.  There is
little that is uplifting or exciting about the film, though there are
some intriguing science fictional ideas, particularly about causality
and time travel.  There are several nice ironic time travel paradoxes.
The screenplay is provided by David Peoples (who co-authored
BLADERUNNER) and Janet Peoples.  Rarely does a film bear a credit for
being inspired by another film, but 12 MONKEYS is inspired by Chris
Marker's 29-minute film "La Jetee," which originally ran on a double
bill with ALPHAVILLE.
     Willis and Pitt each give disturbing performances.  Willis is not
a great actor, but he is better than he often appears.  And this film
certainly gives him more opportunity than most of his action films to
create a character.  Mostly this film gives him an opportunity to show
bewilderment.  Brad Pitt has been getting some attention for his wildly
gesticulating mental patient.  He is adequately strange, but nothing
world-class.  Madeleine plays someone considerably more normal than the
two male leads and as a result has a much less flashy role.  She is
much harder to notice by contrast, proving than in an insane world a
sane person appears not insane but only unmemorable.
     12 MONKEYS is a pretentious and self-indulgent piece of oppressive
and cheerless filmmaking, but for mavens of time travel stories it
delivers the goods.  I rate it a low +2 on the -4 to 4 scale.
     Spoiler...Spoiler...Spoiler...Spoiler...Spoiler...
     "La Jetee" is a short film made up almost entirely of still
photos.  The following is a synopsis:
     It is a post-holocaust Paris in which survivors live underground.
The underpinnings of reality and causality have been blown away.  H is
haunted by the image of a woman's face that he cannot get out of his
mind.  It becomes an obsession.  Because it has weakened his hold on
the present, a scientist thinks that he can actually send H traveling
in time (similar to SOMEWHERE IN TIME).  H goes back in time to an
incident in his past where he thinks he may have seen the woman on a
jetty.  Something bad (I forget what) happens while he is on the jetty,
and he is killed.  The last thing he sees before his death is the image
of a woman's face, the same image that brought him to his death.

Title
Review for Night Falls on Manhattan (1997)
     Sidney Lumet, whose early work for film included the now classic
12 ANGRY MEN, has built up a major body of sharp films, frequently set
in New York and frequently about the criminal justice system.  In spite
of a little violence, and that mostly off-screen, this is a low-key
ironic look at how the system works and where it chooses to fail to
work.  While in the final analysis the film may not deliver a whole lot
more than some of the better television police procedural programs, it
is an intelligent and adult alternative to this season's fluff and
"blow 'em up real good" films.
     Sean Casey (played by Andy Garcia) is a new investigator in the
office of District Attorney "Morgy" Morgenstern's.  He is something of
a straight arrow who expects to go it on his own and stick to the
letter of the law.  His father Liam (Ian Holm) is an experience-
hardened cop who has encouraged his son to pursue a career in law.  The
plot thickens as Liam is on a stakeout of Jordan Washington (Shiek
Mahmud-Bey), a local drug pusher on his way to being a drug lord.  An
attempted arrest goes very wrong as three different precincts send in
backup, two policemen are kill by Washington and a third policeman is
accidentally killed in the confusion.  Liam himself is very nearly
killed.  District Attorney Morgenstern, who is having a bad time with
his public image and who is being betrayed by his own ambitious
assistant, decides to give the job of prosecuting Washington instead
assistant.  This in spite of any conflict of interest or emotional
entanglement Sean might have prosecuting the man who nearly killed his
father.  And there is a further complication as the defense--led by the
Alan Dershowitz-like Sam Vigoda (Richard Dreyfuss)--implies that the
police involved in the attempted arrest may have been on the take.  In
specific suspicion falls on Liam and his long-time partner Joey (James
Gandolfini).  Lumet wrote the screenplay himself, basing it on the
novel TAINTED EVIDENCE by Robert Daley.  Daley also wrote the novel
that was the basis for Lumet's PRINCE OF THE CITY.
     When one actor in a film gives a good performance, he is probably
a good actor.  When there are many good performances in the same film,
some from almost unknown actors, it probably is because of the talent
of the director.  One of the better performances in the film is James
Gandolfini as the partner of Liam.  He has just a scene or two, in
which he is an important character, but he seems very believable in
those scenes.  Holm and Garcia play reasonably well off of each other
though they do not give much feeling of being father and son.  The most
memorable performance is probably that of Ron Leibman as the District
Attorney, played with what could be called "an excess of personality,"
to borrow a phrase from JURASSIC PARK.  Richard Dreyfuss underplays
just a bit as a celebrated defense attorney who does not reveal the
dimensions of his character until the end of the film.  Rounding out
the cast is Lena Olin the attractive but somewhat dispensable character
Peggy Lindstrom, assistant to Vigoda who has an affair with Sean.
     This is not Lumet's best film and its final irony is more a subtle
point than a hard-hitting one, but it is an intelligent adult story.  I
rate it a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Henry V (1989)
     The advantage of the longbow over its shorter predecessors is, of
course, range.  It is entirely feasible to create a shower of falling arrows
that your enemy must enter before he can even come near you, provided you
have brought enough arrows along.  This is *probably* the reason that the
English at the Battle of Agincourt were able to kill what is quoted as ten
thousand French while losing only 29 of their own numbers.  Bill
Shakespeare's script for the current HENRY V tends really to downplay the
technological advantage the English had at the battle, implying the
imbalance in casualty figures can be attributed instead to the fact that Old
Hank really knew how to give one heck of a good pep-talk.  Well, song-
writers tend to glorify song-writers, and film-makers like to make films
about film-makers, so it isn't surprising that Shakespeare's stuff tends to
glorify wordsmiths.  Even though the actual casualty numbers were probably
closer to 200 and five thousand, Shakespeare still seems to over-rate
Henry's speech-making.
     That technical issue aside, how is HENRY V anyway?  I do not claim to
be a judge of Shakespearean acting and presumably the main virtue of this
film is Branagh's much-vaunted interpretation of Henry.  I can tell you that
in the early scenes he delivers his lines with very little expression at
all.  I am sure this is intentional, but after a supremely dramatic entrance
he strikes the viewer as being a sort of a cold fish.  As time goes by he
puts more emphasis in his words, and by the love scenes at the end he seems
not just human but positively likable.  One gets the impression that henry
was a wild teenager who rises to his office as king while we watch.  Still
Branagh seems only a good actor who has the audacity to cast himself in a
great role.  He may become a Rupert Pupkin of Shakespearean actors.
     This is a Shakespeare for the late Twentieth Century, with far more
dramatic visual images than in previous versions.  Notable particularly are
Henry's entrance and a scene of Henry on a rearing steed at "the breach,"
back-lighted by fire.  The battle scenes are beautifully filmed, somewhat in
the style of EXCALIBUR.  Ironically, the narrator tells the audience to work
hard to picture the scene while the audience have only to sit back and let
it flow over them.
     While they did not remove the line to tell the audience to work to
visualize the scene, some liberties were taken.  Flashback scenes were added
to show Henry's past with Falstaff.  Presumably Branagh undertook to write
these himself in a Shakespearean style.  There was a deletion to references
to the English killing French prisoners which probably would not play as
well on modern audiences as it did in Shakespeare's time.
     This is a memorable film and probably one that will be playing on PBS
in 2010 when most of the rest of this year's films are forgotten.  My rating
is a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Cérémonie, La (1995)
     Director Claude Chabrol's work has in fact been compared
frequently to that of Alfred Hitchcock, but he lacks the British
director's efficiency and compactness of story-telling.  Take away a
few subtle implications of quiet class warfare and this is a story that
could have been done every bit as effectively as a half-hour episode on
ALFRED HITCHCOCK PRESENTS in the late 1950s.  Given the screentime of
LA CEREMONIE, Hitchcock could have told a story by wide margins both
more thoughtful and more entertaining.
     The setting is a small but modern village on the northwest coast
of France.  Sophie (Sandrine Bonnaire) is a mysterious woman who hires
herself out as a maid to an upper-middle-class family.  Her employers
are the bland Catherine and Georges Lelievre (Jacqueline Bisset and
Jean Pierre Cassel).  Given their personalities, Sophie is
understandably very standoffish with her new employers.  She seems to
prefer retreating to the solitude of her room to having any beyond the
required contact with the Lelievres.  Instead she watches the
television. What nobody realizes is that Sophie has a rather surprising
secret, one that she protects with surprising dexterity.  The little
human contact she does make is instead with Jeanne (Isabelle Huppert)
the clerk at the village post office whose mild if slightly surly
demeanor hides a lot of rage for the more wealthy around her.  This is
a French film, but it fits well with the new American stereotype that
post office workers have an insidious side.  Sophie and Jeanne share a
common distaste for life in the village in general and of the Lelievres
in specific.  Chabrol hints at more than friendship and the beginnings
of a physical relationship between the two. Each finds the other a
sounding board for her rage and together they just might do the
unthinkable things that they never would do without each other.
     Basing the film on the novel A JUDGMENT IN STONE by Ruth Rendall,
Chabrol very slowly and deliberately paces the film though not really
adding a lot to the depth of his characters.  We see a good deal of
Georges and Catherine, but we never get to know very much about them
except that they are most comfortable with each other and with their
two children.  They have a hard time being very warm toward an intruder
in their house, even if the intruder has been hired by them.  While
they seem to be favored with wealth, their attitudes toward others
outside the family is stand-offish and self-absorbed at best.  Chabrol
takes a few cheap shots at the family and their class.  At one point
Jeanne is faced with having Sophie as a house guest for an extended
period of time.  She has lived comfortably on her post office salary
but with a second mouth to feed she comments that it will be hard for
them to eat.  Chabrol immediately cuts to the Lelievres eating a
somewhat fancy meal.
     In the final analysis, this is really not a lot deeper or more
impressive a film than various American films in which the hired hand
turns out to be more than a handful.  While the conflict is not as
one-sided as that in films like THE TEMP and THE HAND THAT ROCKS THE
CRADLE, LA CEREMONIE is really not far from that genre.  The
denouement, when it comes, has a few logic problems.  This film has
done well by the critics, but it is seems to have its problems.  I rate
it a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     SPOILER... SPOILER... SPOILER... SPOILER... SPOILER... SPOILER...
SPOILER... SPOILER...
     If the recorder was running all evening, recording the opera,
would the family have been talking over the opera, essentially ruining
the recording?  At what point did the recorder come off record mode
with the people present not realizing it?

Title
Review for Phantom of the Opera, The (1990/I) (TV)
     The day that Tony Richardson's made-for-television version of THE
PHANTOM OF THE OPERA was due to be shown, my local newspaper did a feature
on it quoting the writer Arthur Kopit as saying, "[After having read the
novel] what struck me was that this story ... wasn't very good.  Still it
captured the imagination of people.  Why?  What bothered me about [the
previous dramatic] versions, what I thought they essentially missed, was
that you never knew why the Phantom was in love with Christine."
     I had very high hopes for this version.  There were four announced film
adaptations in the wake of the success of the Broadway play.  One starred
Richard Englund, whose most famous role was the razor-gloved Freddy Krueger;
one was simply a film version of the musical; one was set in Nazi Germany.
Of the four versions, the only one that sounded like a genuine new
adaptation of the novel was the announced four-hour television version.
Then I read Kopit's quote.
     What Kopit is saying is that he has no respect for the material itself,
only for its ready-made market.  He also thinks that the dramatic versions
missed the point of why the story is popular.  I could easily believe his
comment if it really was the novel that people remember but, in fact, the
book has not been what people have liked.  For most of the years the story
has been liked, Gaston Leroux's novel has been hard to find.  Andrew Lloyd
Webber tells an anecdote about how difficult it was to find a copy of the
novel when he wanted to read it.  The dramatic adaptations that Kopit thinks
missed the point of why the story is remembered are really what made the
story popular.  And here they cannot have missed the point.  Actually I
would contend that they have all missed what I like in the novel, but not
what has made the story popular.
     The novel is about a man with a great intellect and a horribly deformed
face.  All his life he was treated as a freak and just occasionally
exploited for his genius.  Eventually he finds the opportunity to build for
himself an empire in the darkness beneath the Paris Opera House.  There he
can enjoy the music and can be seen only when he wants.  This is Gaston
Leroux's Erik but he has never been done satisfactorily in a film or play.
I had hoped that in the three and a half hours or so of story there would be
time to show Erik's history.  In fact, this version did show Erik's history
but it bore little relation to anything in the novel.
     Kopit missed the point entirely by making his Phantom a petulant young
man (played by Charles Dance of THE JEWEL IN THE CROWN), who is being
shielded by a former manager of the opera house (over-played by Burt
Lancaster).
     Kopit's screenplay intends this Erik to be likable and steers clear of
the question in the novel of whether Erik might be psychotic.  This Erik
does not kill, at least in the course of the film.  Oh, his face may startle
and early on this causes a death, but that does not appear to be Erik's
fault.  This Erik has lost the feel of the sinister and instead controls the
fate of the opera house with practical jokes.  Even the cutting down of the
chandelier is not a murder attempt but an act  of angry vandalism intended
to vent rage and for which the audience was intentionally given time to get
out of the way.  Of course, this Erik had less reason for rage than the one
in the book.  The script claims that Erik's mother at least found his face
"flawlessly beautiful."  In the book Erik's mother gave him his first mask
because she could not stand to look at his face.
     There are a few nice touches to the script.  One of them is the
handling of the issue of how to handle the unmasking.  Sort of independently
of the quality of the rest of the production there is the question of how to
shock audiences when they do see the Phantom's face.  The approach here was
unusual and not badly done, though it was perhaps dictated by the
screenplay's efforts to keep Erik as a romantic Phantom.  Less endearing is
Erik's unexpected forest beneath the ground.  It isn't like the metal forest
of the novel but a real forest with live trees and unexplained sunlight.  It
appears that Erik must have built himself a holodeck.
     Charles Dance is a little whiny for my tastes, as well as not being
sufficiently sinister.  Lancaster as the former manager is overripe and Teri
Polo as Christine Daee (in the book Daae) is unmemorable.  She and her lover
Adam Storke as Phillipe, Comte de Chagney, are pretty people but boring
actors.  (Again, they got the name wrong on the Comte.  The character's name
was Raoul.  Phillipe is the name of Raoul's brother, older by twenty years.)
     The whole mediocre revision of the story is directed by Tony
Richardson, who directed TOM JONES.  I am not a fan of that film but it
certainly was better directed than this slow-moving version.  If I had never
heard of the story before I would have rated this a little higher, but as it
is I would give Richardson's version a low 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     [Postscript: Of the dramatic versions of THE PHANTOM OF THE OPERA I
have seen, I would list them best to worst as: the Webber play (which is
surprisingly faithful to the book), the Lon Chaney film (1925), the Claude
Rains film (1943), the animated cable version (1987) (lackluster but very
faithful to the book), the made-for-television Maximillian Schell version
(1983), the Herbert Lom film (1962), the made-for-television Charles Dance
film (1990), and then there is a very long gap down to Richard Englund's
putrescent version (1989).  I do not count films only inspired by the story,
such as PHANTOM OF THE PARADISE, THE PHANTOM OF HOLLYWOOD, and PHANTOM OF
THE OPERETTA.]
     [Post-postscript:  For someone with a better command of French than my
own: the name of the novel as "The Phantom of the Opera" but in the novel he
refers to himself less dramatically as "The Opera Ghost."  Isn't that
distinction purely on the part of the translator?  Don't both translate to
the same words in French?]

Title
Review for Light It Up (1999)
     Thomas Harris did a lot that was original with the novel RED
DRAGON, later made into the film MANHUNTER.  He established or at least
revitalized the entire sub-genre of stories of police and psychotic
serial killers.  This sort of story had been made before but he upped
the ante by making the killers more interesting and dangerous.  Today
the novel would not be as good because so much has been plundered for
use elsewhere.  Had THE BONE COLLECTOR come out at that time, it would
have been a much more intriguing film.  But by now most of what it
offers is familiar.  Phillip Noyce is not new to psychotic killer
films.  His DEAD CALM is one of the best because it is as much a sea
adventure as a murder plot.  Now he demonstrates just how important it
is to do something creative with the genre by giving us a thriller does
just about everything else right and still makes for a very mundane
film.  THE BONE COLLECTOR gives the ready-made audience who want to see
another violent psychotic thriller film a film to see, but does no
interesting playing with the genre.  The attraction of dealing with a
killer who thinks differently than a sane person should be that he is
unpredictable.  But just about everything about THE BONE COLLECTOR is
mechanical and done by the numbers.   The killer always leaves a clue
to his next crime and the heroes always figure out what the clue means
and exactly where the crime will occur down to a street address.
     The team of investigators seems to have been pulled from a
checklist of ethnic types.  We have a beautiful white patrol officer
unsure she wants to do forensics.  Then there is a black forensic
genius confined to a bed and suffering from seizures that he hopes will
soon kill him rather than become a vegetable.  And finally there is a
Latino forensic science researcher.  Of course the team of
investigators have to contend with a police department dominated by the
stupid and incompetent white males.  This gutsy team races the clock
and bucks the power structure finding clues that nobody else in the
police department can see.  This could almost be a TV pilot it is so
formulaic.
     Lincoln Rhyme (played by Denzel Washington) is the forensic expert
who literally wrote the book that defines police detective work.  Now
he is bed-ridden and subject to seizures that any time may leave him a
human vegetable.  Before that happens he wants to arrange his own
death.  Emily Donaghy (Angelina Jolie) is a plucky young patrol
officer.  When she answers a report about a dead body found she has to
stop a train in order to prevent it from rolling over a clue.  This
brings her censure from her superiors, but earns her the respect of
Lincoln Rhyme.  Over her own objections she is drafted to help do the
detective work to track the killer.  The two quickly discover that they
are dealing with a psychotic killer who in the best traditions of
Batman villains always leaves a puzzle clue to what his next crime will
be.  The team is rounded out by Eddie Ortez (Luis Guzman), a genius at
materials analysis.  There is something wrong with the script when with
no additional clues the audience gets way ahead of the experts in
guessing the killer.  About a third of the way through I had a very
short list of suspects.  But then there were no clues whatsoever until
it is revealed who the killer is.  When at the end one does know the
killer and the motivation it too seems more out of Batman than reality.
     Cinematographer Dean Semler does a lot of obvious things to create
the feel of the film.  Scenes are kept dark and oppressive.  When the
plot shifts a setting into the sunlight the lens is heavily filtered to
give an unwholesome look to the street and sky.  Outdoor distance shots
try repeatedly and without subtlety to establish that this is Manhattan
while close-ups, those that do not take place in the basements and
bowels of the city, do not look a lot like New York and in fact are
filmed in Montreal.
     Denzel Washington plays his role with entirely too much vitality
for the man on the brink of death.  I am told in the book Rhyme is
middle-aged, which would have seemed more believable.  Here he happily
pokes fun at his own seizures, which seems entirely a wrong gesture for
a man in his supposedly depressed state.  Angelina Jolie, daughter of
Jon Voigt, does little to make the character of Emily Donaghy her own
and dozens of young actresses could have been snapped into the same
role like interchangeable parts.  Luis Guzman, recently of THE LIMEY,
is certainly watchable.  And Queen Latifah as Rhyme's caregiver matches
Washington's amiability.
     THE BONE COLLECTOR is an extremely forgettable TV-pilot level
serial killer film.  Only real fans of the sub-genre will enjoy it.  I
give it a 4 on the 0 to 10 scale and a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Stir of Echoes (1999)
     As I was sitting at the Toronto Film Festival last year waiting
for the screening of APT PUPIL I spoke to the woman next to me who
claimed to really love horror, especially Stephen King.  I asked if she
was also a fan of Richard Matheson.  "Who?"  Richard Matheson is one of
the most important names in American horror fiction, TV, and cinema.
She pulled a copy of Steven King's DANSE MACABRE, a study of American
horror, from a bag she carried and found that yes, there were
references to Richard Matheson.  I should hope so.  Matheson may not
have the name recognition of a King or a Koontz, but he has been behind
everything important in horror and some spilling over into fantasy and
science fiction since the 1950s.  Both King and Koontz freely admit
large debts to Matheson.  Matheson was really the major force to move
the setting of horror stories out of castles in Eastern Europe and into
American suburbia.
     Matheson first got involved with film when his novel THE SHRINKING
MAN was adapted into the film THE INCREDIBLE SHRINKING MAN.  Only Rod
Serling provided more stories that were dramatized on THE TWILIGHT
ZONE.  Matheson wrote most of Roger Corman's film adaptations of Poe in
the 60s.  He scripted THE DEVIL RIDES OUT (a.k.a. THE DEVIL'S BRIDE)
one of the best films from Hammer Films. Matheson adapted the novel THE
NIGHT STALKER for TV.  He wrote THE LEGEND OF HELL HOUSE and SOMEWHERE
IN TIME, based on his own novels.  He wrote DUEL based on his own
story.  DUEL was one of the first films to bring serious attention to
Stephen Spielberg.  The lady in Toronto entered the theater passing a
large standup ad for WHAT DREAMS MAY COME adapted from the novel by
Richard Matheson. That is about 45 years that Matheson has been a force
to reckon with in horror in the visual media.  STIR OF ECHOES is based
on the novel A STIR OF ECHOES by Richard Matheson.
     Tom Witzky (played by Kevin Bacon) is a sort of lower middle class
telephone lineman in an older suburb of Chicago.  His main
entertainments involve beer and sports.  Both he and his wife Maggie
(Kathryn Erbe) are vaguely dissatisfied with their downbeat existence.
Their son Jake (Zachary David Cope) seems to live in his own world
talking to an imaginary friend, Samantha.  Maggie has a male-hating
friend Lisa (Illeana Douglas) who is in training to be a hypno-
therapist.  One night at a party Tom makes fun of Lisa's profession and
Lisa suggests he allow her to hypnotize him.  She leaves him with a
post-hypnotic suggestion to be more "leave his mind open."  The
suggestion works too well. Tom's mind is open to more than just a few
new ideas; it is open to some forces in the universe better left alone.
He starts having disturbing and graphic nightmares, continuations of
visions he had under hypnosis, and worse, now he sees Samantha himself.
And she looks to him like a walking corpse.  Tom starts to associate
this ghostly apparition with a neighbor girl named Samantha who
disappeared from the neighborhood some months before.  Slowly he
becomes obsessed with proving his visions of Samantha are real and that
she must have been murdered in his house.
     David Koepp has been a writer on several big-ticket films of the
recent years including CARLITO'S WAY, JURASSIC PARK, THE SHADOW,
MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE, THE TRIGGER EFFECT (which he also directed), THE
LOST WORLD: JURASSIC PARK, and MEN IN BLACK.  Here he both writes and
directs; though the film is based on a novel by Richard Matheson.  He
does have a nice hand with mood as he keeps the lighting subdued and
sets the film in an older neighborhood to create more atmosphere.  The
latter is a curious move on his part having written the screenplay.
The novel, written in 1958, is set in a then modern suburb.  The story
could well have been set in the neighborhood where POLTERGEIST was set
instead of this old Chicago neighborhood.  But the script explicitly
calls attention to the fact that the house is new or at least that the
Witzkys are the first people who have ever lived in the house.  The
line makes no sense in a house this old.  I also note with pleasure a
nod to Richard Matheson in that a babysitter is reading his THE
SHRINKING MAN.  (And given that it is an old edition and was probably
purchased in Chicago.  The odds say she got it at the bookstore The
Stars Our Destination.)  The setting does not always work and a little
doctoring of the script might have made the film make more sense.
     This is a tense and atmospheric film.  Kevin Bacon does a
convincing job of playing the working class main character.  But in the
final analysis there is not much new in the film.  To be memorable it
would have to build up to something a little less prosaic.  I rate it a
6 on the 0 to 10 scale and a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Hussard sur le toit, Le (1995)
     CAPSULE: A tale of adventure and love in the time of
     cholera.  An Italian revolutionary and a beautiful and
     wealthy French woman, each with a mission, repeatedly
     encounter and help each other in 1832 France.  Jean-Paul
     Rappeneau gives us a high-spirited, yet solid historical
     adventure that excites but never goes over the top into
     swashbuckling.  Beautifully filmed and nicely acted.
     Rating: +2 (-4 to +4)
     It is 1832 and the threat of Napoleon is over.  Still Italy knows
no peace.  Twelve years earlier, inspired by a revolt in Spain, the
Neapolitans arose and forced King Ferdinand I to give the country a
constitution.  A congress of European governments, meeting at Troppau
and Laibach, decided it must discourage all such revolutions, which
might, after all, spread to other countries.  The Congress gave Austria
a mandate to march into Italy and to restore things to the way they had
been before the constitution.  Their rule was marred by uprisings, not
surprisingly, including a 1821 Piedmont revolution put down in less
than a month by forces of royalists and Austrians.  The 1831 uprisings
in Modena and Parma met a similar fate.  But uprisings against the
royalist government and especially the invading Austrians continue.
Many ranking officers in the various rebellions find things a bit hot
for them in Italy and find sanctuary in France.  They were also finding
support from like-minded Frenchmen, disillusioned with their own king
Louis Philippe.  He had been chosen as King in part for his liberal
viewpoints.  The reality disappointed the people, however, after the
new king had ruthlessly put down a workers rebellion in Lyon the
previous year.
     Angelo Pardi (played by Olivier Martinez), an officer in the
Revolutionary Army, is in France with gold collected there that will
help finance revolution ... if he can get it back to his country
intact.  Austrian agents are also in France, hunting down the enemies
of the Italian royalist government.  The French are generally
sympathetic, but just now they have an even more frightening and
implacable enemy.  One that can strike at anyone, highborn or commoner
equally.  An epidemic of cholera haunts the land.  And making the
situation even more dangerous, the people hold any number of strange
ideas of what causes and what prevents the disease.  Any stranger might
be accused of being a well-poisoner and hung by angry mobs anxious to
do anything that has any chance of protecting them from the disease.
Pardi faces a double threat from the Austrians specifically looking for
him and from the French who in their ignorance are looking to kill any
strangers who may possibly be visiting this disease on them.  On the
run Pardi finds himself in the house of a beautiful aristocrat Pauline
de Theu (Juliette Binoche).  She hides him and helps him, little
knowing that their paths would cross again multiple times.  A good deal
of what makes this film engrossing is its view of the medicine of the
period.  While that is not the primary focus of the story, it figures
heavily in the plot, not unlike RESTORATION earlier this year.
     Jean-Paul Rappeneau, who five years ago gave us his terrific
adaptation of CYRANO DE BERGERAC gives us another delightful historical
excursion, beautifully acted and photographed.  Like CYRANO, HORSEMAN
has a clever wit that shows itself at odd and unexpected moments.
There are a few enjoyable digs at the aristocracy of France.  One
particularly enjoyable scene involves the reactions at a dinner party
to Pauline's recent past.  It should be noted that this film takes
place in a France that the previous year had produced the novel NOTRE
DAME DE PARIS (bearing little similarity to an animated film to be
based on it near the end of the next century) and the film even makes
some mention of Victor Hugo.  The cast will be mostly unfamiliar to
American audiences, though Juliette Binoche will be familiar for roles
in THE UNBEARABLE LIGHTNESS OF BEING and BLUE.  Binoche has the sort of
exquisite demure beauty that seems to be a staple of French films.
However her role rarely calls for her to show much versatility.
Martinez is moderately the more interesting of the two actors lead
actors, but perhaps because his role is better written.  There is also
a small role for Gerard Depardieu who also does not get a chance to
show much range.  Martinez has the greatest opportunity to act except
for a sequence for Binoche toward the end of the film.
     With the exception of a modest resurrection of the Western it has
become very rare to see American films set prior to World War II.  Most
serious historical films these days are coming from Europe.  The same
Hollywood that made great films like QUEEN CHRISTINA and THE SCARLET
EMPRESS back in the 1930s now seems to shy away from historical
settings, perhaps for fear of lack of interest.  In any case, for those
with no fear of subtitles, this may well be the most rewarding film of
the summer.  I give it a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Hairspray (1988)
     The world is coming to an end: cracks are forming in the Earth's
surface, mountain-sized chunks of ice are falling from the sky, John Waters
has made a family film, oceans are boiling over.  Well, one out of four is
actually true.  And I know which one you probably think is true, but you're
wrong!  No, as unlikely as it seems, John Waters has made a family film.
This is the same John Waters who made PINK FLAMINGOS in which super-obese
transvestite Divine eats what the doggie leaves behind (and I don't mean
leaves behind in the dish).  And gang, it wasn't trick photography and a
Tootsie Roll.  It was done so lucky(?) audiences could tell it was the real
thing.  Since then and until Divine's recent death, Divine has appeared in
most, if not all, of Waters's films, perhaps indicating that Waters has some
sort of conscience, though more likely indicating that Waters's gross-out
film require the services of someone who will do just about anything for
money.  Waters's films are mostly about bad taste.
     Of late Waters has been trying a new formula to make more profitable
films.  Most of his films have become "cult classics" but have had small
audiences because of their subject matter and, in particular, their X
rating.  But Waters has long known that all bad taste need not be
scatological.  He made the R-rated POLYESTER and now the PG-rated HAIRSPRAY.
As part of the new formula, Waters intentionally picks out acting talent(?)
that most of his viewing audience considers to be a joke.  POLYESTER
featured--along with Divine--Tab Hunter.  HAIRSPRAY features Sonny Bono, Pia
Zadora, Jerry Stiller, and Debbie Harry.
     In 1962 Baltimore, nearly everybody watches THE CORNY COLLINS SHOW, a
sort of locally produced version of American Bandstand.  The politics of
choosing what teenagers will be dancing on the show reflects the politics of
the time.  There is a power structure determining who will show up as a
dancing teenager on the program and making sure that blacks show up only on
the once-a-month blacks-only show.  The story is about two teens vying for
the Number One spot and about the people trying to keep the show segregated
against those trying to integrate the show.  And it is all done with a
bizarre but not all that exaggerated view of the fashions and hair styles of
1962.  Waters finally has a film that could have mass appeal.  Rate it a +1
on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for What Happened Was... (1994)
     This is a film that already has rally stripes.  Tom Noonan wrote,
directed and starred in this film which he made for only $300,000 and
took only eleven days to shoot it.  They finished editing the film just
hours short of the deadline for entering it in the Sundance Film
Festival.  But the effort to get the film done in time was repaid.  At
Sundance it won the Waldo Salt screenwriting award and Grand Jury
prize.  Samuel Goldwyn snapped it up for an immediate profit.  Noonan's
face may be familiar to filmgoers for other films in which he has
acted.  He has played psychopathic killers in films like MANHUNTER (the
earlier of the two "Hannibal Lector films") and THE LAST ACTION HERO.
It is good to see him in a more normal role.
     WHAT HAPPENED WAS... is basically a one-act play for two people
produced as a film.  But for a few scenes at the beginning, the film is
all one scene taking place as it happens in front of the camera.  This,
however, is not to imply the film was made in a single take but it does
give the film a certain immediacy.  A woman has invited a co-worker to
her Manhattan apartment for dinner.  Both work in a legal office,
Jackie as a secretary, Michael as a paralegal.  She has been impressed
by his sense of humor and is intrigued by his apparent working on some
secret project of his own.  She has invited him to a candlelight dinner
at her apartment.  The evening begins very awkwardly.  Each has a
talent for choosing just the wrong thing to say to the other.  The date
appears not to be working out at all.  But on and off the wine seems to
be loosening each other up.  They begin trading confidences and
dropping defenses.  Eventually each will know more about the other than
either of them really want.
     Tom Noonan's Michael is controlled and systematic.  Karen Sillas's
Jackie lives with emotional tides that Michael has been able to
suppress in himself.  He is mechanical and she is disturbed.  Noonan's
script gives hints as to how each has gotten that way, but in the end
much is left to conjecture.  Both performances have impressive
authenticity.  My one complaint would be that film is not really the
proper medium for this script.  More appropriate would be the live
stage.  Noonan's direction intentionally makes little use of the
advantages that cinema has over the live stage while it certainly could
benefit from the additional intensity and immediacy that live
performances would have given it.  Making the film more cinematic would
probably have further sacrificed the immediacy.  Noonan at least does
not repeat Hitchcock's error in ROPE of trying to create immediacy by
simulating a single take.  In ROPE Hitchcock apparently realized the
technique became a distraction and he did not repeat his error in DIAL
M FOR MURDER.  Occasionally Noonan misjudges the pacing of his
material, but his direction was usually on-target.
     In spite of the critical acclaim this film is getting, it is not
nearly as original as the rumor mill would have it.  It was reminiscent
of other dramatic works and very similar to a play produced on PBS in
the 60s called, if memory serves, "Birdbath."  While falling short of
my expectations for the film, I would still give it a respectable high
+1 on the -4 to +4 scale.  You won't see much else like it in the
theaters soon.

Title
Review for Cook the Thief His Wife & Her Lover, The (1989)
     Peter Greenaway's most famous film to this point was THE DRAUGHTSMAN'S
CONTRACT.  On the surface that was a mystery set at a country estate.  Its
subtext was that beneath the affected surface of the upper class there is
mischief and dirt.  The style was, however, very affected and uninvolving
and bloodless.  To be frank, I could not wait for the film to end.  In THE
COOK, THE THIEF, HIS WIFE & HER LOVER, Greenaway seems once again to have it
in for the upper classes (or at least for the nouveau riche) who dine at a
very fine French restaurant (as well as for the people who put up letters on
theater marquees).  But this time around the cold and uninvolving style is
gone.  Really gone.  The film starts like a Monty Python sketch that goes on
a bit too long, then it fades to John Waters, then Herschel Gordon Lewis,
and when it is all over we find we have been watching an intricately mounted
E.~C.~Comic and a story that could have been taken from the pages of VAULT
OF HORROR or TALES FROM THE CRYPT.  I laughed my way through the film, was
delighted by every ghoulish turn, but I have to say that I cannot recommend
this film to most of the people I know.  I do not remember when I have seen
a film that more people walked out on.
     What we have here is one week behind the scenes at The Restaurant From
Hell.  Actually, the restaurant is "La Hollandais"--soon to be known as
"Spica and Boarst's."  Richard Boarst is a superb Cordon-Bleu-class French
chef whose restaurant was taken over by gangster Albert Spica.  Spica does
not live by halfway measures.  He is extremely violent, exceptionally loud
and rude, and supremely vulgar.  Night after night he holds forth at his
restaurant, piling vulgarity on vulgarity and often savaging his customers.
We are led to assume that the cuisine must be very, very good for anyone to
be willing to sit in the same restaurant as Spica.  The gangster repeatedly
brutalizes his wife Georgina, whom he virtually holds prisoner.  Georgina,
however, is able to sneak away from Spica occasionally to rendezvous with a
rather studious, quiet customer, Michael, with whom she makes passionate
love.
     Greenaway, who wrote as well as directed, has written what could well
have been a stage play.  There are only a very limited number of sets, and
the sets are designed for use of color and for effect rather than for
accuracy.  First we see the parking lot infested with a veritable army of
stray dogs.  The kitchen is a hilarious revelation of what goes on behind
the scenes at a fancy restaurant.  What goes on in the kitchen is
unbelievable.  The transition from this kitchen that you would not feed a
dog from to the ultra-posh dining room stuns the viewer.  And so it goes,
from one room to the next.
     Michael Gambon plays Spica and must speak two-thirds of the lines in
the film.  He never shuts up and he never says anything you want to hear.
Gambon was good in the BBC drama THE SINGING DETECTIVE but his Albert Spica
will easily eclipse that role.  Helen Mirren is usually good and this is
probably a role that will get more attention than her (perhaps better) films
such as THE LONG GOOD FRIDAY.
     THE COOK, THE THIEF, HIS WIFE & HER LOVER is not really an art film but
a ghoulish horror comic book with art film trappings.  If you see it, I
cannot promise you will like it, but I can promise you that you have not
seen any other film like it.  I give it a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Guilty by Suspicion (1991)
     An artist painting a picture has the option of reproducing exactly what
the eye sees or of distorting reality to reach a deeper truth.  The artist
who just reproduces reality may be little more than a human camera; the
artists whom we consider to be great have known how to distort reality to
show a greater truth.  It is possible to make a film about a subject that is
realistic and at the same time does a disservice by being so realistic.
Irwin Winkler's GUILTY BY SUSPICION, based on his own script, is a very
realistic and at the same time subdued portrait of a blacklisted film
director.  But what is called for is a howl of rage against the government
subversion of the Bill of Rights.  Martin Ritt's THE FRONT, which starred
Woody Allen, does have that release at its climax.  GUILTY BY SUSPICION
whimpers its way up to a modified version of an exchange that actually took
place during the Army-McCarthy Hearings, but it is not nearly as effective
as Allen telling the government to go fuck itself.
     GUILTY BY SUSPICION mixes real Hollywood figures such as Darryl Zanuck
with purely fictional ones and ones who are thinly disguised versions of
real actors like cowboy star Jerry Cooper.  The story begins as one of
Zanuck's best directors, David Merrill (played by Robert DeNiro) returns to
Hollywood in 1951 after having been in Paris for a while.  However,
Hollywood is not the town he remembers.  The House Un-American Activities
Committee and the FBI are conducting a witch-hunt to find Communist
sympathizers in the film industry.  Careers are being destroyed and
marriages broken up by the paranoia and the government pressure.  David sees
the family of a friend destroyed and soon he too is called upon to explain
his attendance at a few meetings of what is now accused of being a Communist
front organization.  He is willing to cooperate until he is required to
start by giving names of involved associates.  For refusing to draw others
into the net, he finds himself blacklisted.  The project he is working on is
canceled and the studio nearly bankrupts him by insisting he return a
$50,000 advance.  What follows is a long and not entirely interesting siege
of unemployment seasoned with FBI harassment.  The film builds to his
eventual hearing with HUAC.
     Winkler spent a fair amount of the budget recreating the early 1950s,
much more than Martin Ritt did, or needed to do, for THE FRONT.  I thought
while watching the film that some of the women's hair styles were
anachronistic, but I could easily be wrong.  The period feel was somehow
just missing, as was the dramatic edge of the film.  DeNiro's character is
weak and indecisive and spending so much time showing him not finding work
just does not grab the audience the way it could.  I give the film a flat +1
on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for As Good As It Gets (1997)
     James L. Brooks has built a career being the executive producer on
some of the most popular TV situation comedies including "The Mary
Tyler Moore Show," "Rhoda," "Taxi," "The Tracy Ullman Show," and "The
Simpsons."  His touch is comedy with a strong dose of human character,
especially characters with foibles. His film-work has been more spotty
but includes TERMS OF ENDEARMENT and BROADCAST NEWS. His new film AS
GOOD AS IT GETS is more like his TV series than it is like his better
films.  In it he tells the story of a solitary misanthrope, a hermit
living in is big city, who finally discovers his humanity and finds joy
in relating to the very people he despised previously, not at all
unlike Ebenezer Scrooge.  The film's release around Christmas time only
exaggerates the parallels to Dickens's A CHRISTMAS CAROL.
     Melvin Udall (played with the usual gusto by Jack Nicholson) is a
boy-man who lives by himself in a New York City apartment building.
And by himself is just how he likes it since there is nothing he can
see that is very positive in his neighbors or anyone else for him to
care about.  He is finishing his 62nd book in a series of romance
novels whose popularity he ascribes to the fact that he actually
loathes women.  His hobby is candor raised to the level of a martial
art.  There is a firm mutual hatred between him and his apartment
neighbors, particularly Simon Bishop (Greg Kinnear of SABRINA), a gay
artist.  Simon's dog messes the hallway, and Melvin wants to see the
little dog destroyed.  Melvin's favorite person in the world (meaning
he has only a mild dislike for her) is Carol Connelly (Helen Hunt of
TWISTER) the waitress who serves him at a local restaurant.
Circumstances--with a strong assist from Simon's professional manager
(Cuba Gooding, Jr.)--force Melvin to take Simon's dog into his
apartment and care for him.  In spite of all his worst instincts,
Melvin finds himself actually liking the dog and this opens a chink in
his shell that allows him to start relating to both Simon and Carol.
What follows one of the last act of A CHRISTMAS CAROL played in slow
motion.  Melvin also takes an interest in medical care for Carol's
sickly (dare I say "Tiny- Tim-like") child.
     The film itself is sporadically funny and occasionally touching,
but offers little that is not available on TV. One difference between
this film and a TV comedy is the shock value of Nicholson's comments
and insults. Melvin goes well beyond the limits of Archie Bunker or
even of the Simpsons making obscene suggestions about Simon's sex life.
One can do that in a movie and not face TV censorship, I guess, but
they do little to improve the viewing experience.
     Beyond the go-for-the-throat comments, Brooks has done here little
that he could not have done on the set of a situation comedy.
Certainly this is a story told on a smaller scale than his TERMS OF
ENDEARMENT or BROADCAST NEWS.  The script, which Brooks co-authored
with Mark Andrus is funny only on a hit and miss basis.  Perhaps part
of the problem is that once it is established what a creep our main
character is, the audience has less emotional investment in seeing him
rewarded with a happy ending.  One is torn between whether the best
ending has him finding happiness or being hit by a truck.
     This is certainly one of Brooks's more minor contributions to
American entertainment.  The film is watchable, but tepid.  I rate it a
6 on the 0 to 10 scale and a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Jing ke ci qin wang (1999)
     From the beginnings of film one of the highest goals of cinema has
been to transport the viewer in space and time to see something he
would never be able to see otherwise.  I suppose that might be why most
of my favorite films are either fantasy films or historical--the two
genres are linked.  To some extent both appeal to the same kind of
people.  And of particular interest are the great spectacular scenes of
history involving thousands of people: the exodus from Egypt, the
Oklahoma land rush, the Zulus besieging Rorkes Drift, the Battle of
Austerlitz, that sort of thing.  The noblest goal of cinema is to act
as a time machine to make us eyewitnesses to those events of world
history really worth seeing.
     But film is a business and one has to be able to shoot epic scenes
where extras will work for an affordable amount.  One place where labor
is cheap is in heavily-populated China.  Yet until now Chinese
historical films have been very personal films shot in medium close-up.
The sweeping events of Chinese history have been too expensive to film,
so generally have never been used as the subject of films.
     It has been foreign filmmakers who have recognized that
inexpensive labor in China give the potential for filming the huge
scenes in Chinese history.  In 1987 Steven Spielberg filmed the rout of
Shanghai for EMPIRE OF THE SUN and Bernardo Bertolucci filmed the
grandeur of the Forbidden City for THE LAST EMPEROR.  At long last the
Chinese themselves, in conjunction with French and Japanese investors,
have seen the potential they have to paint history on the grand scale.
And if epic history could be made about the last Emperor, what better
choice could there be than telling the story of the first Emperor?
That would be Ying Zheng, one of history's true larger than life
characters.  At age 13 he inherited control of the Kingdom of Qin.
This was 245 B.C.E., about the same time Hannibal was born.  He took
seven warring kingdoms and forged them into a single empire.  Though
his reign was a short one he was responsible for the two greatest
artifacts of Chinese history, the Great Wall of China and the huge
terra cotta army of soldiers he had buried with him to protect him in
the next life.  He also burned all but the most innocuous of books to
have greater control of his subjects' minds and so that Chinese history
would start with him.
     In THE EMPEROR AND THE ASSASSIN, Ying Zheng (played by Li
Xuejian) comes to power as a boy of thirteen in 245 B.C.E. with
a dream of unifying the seven warring kingdoms under one benevolent
emperor.  [Actually historical opinion is that he inherited rather
than originated the dream and that all the conquering but a few
mop-up operations had been done by his predecessors.]  His childhood
sweetheart, now his concubine, Lady Zhao (Gong Li) joins him to aid
him.  Ying Zheng wants to conquer the Kingdom of Yan without
appearing to be the aggressor.  Lady Zhao has a plan to get them to
make the first move.  She will appear to be a prisoner escaped from
Ying Zhang fleeing to Yan.  There she will convince them to send an
assassin to attempt to kill Ying Zhang.  But the King will be ready,
kill the assassin, and use the incident as an excuse to destroy Yan.
     The story centers on the story Ying Zheng (whom we should know
will succeed in the end if we are up on our history) and on his
assassin Zhang Fengyi as Jing Ke.  Each is sympathetic is his own way.
Ying Zheng wants to end 550 years of warfare and create an empire he
expects to run for the good of his people "with grain growing
everywhere."  Jing Ke was a great assassin, now guilt-ridden over the
deaths he has caused.  He wants nothing to do with killing again, but
is being manipulated for another job.  The style is a real change of
pace for director Chen Kaige who experiments with bits of style
borrowed from samurai films, Hong Kong action film, Japanese historical
epics, and Italian Westerns, bringing them all into perhaps the most
entertaining film to come from the People's Republic of China.  Not all
the battle scenes are as exciting as they might have been staged, but
considering the source they always beat the expectation.
     Clearly there is much more of a "give the public what it wants"
attitude than we have seen previously coming from the PRC.  If this
film is successful and that attitude catches on, it can only be healthy
for the Chinese film industry.  This is a film gives the audience a
history lesson and has them enjoy getting it.  The one problem being
that with most of the rest of the world knowing so little Asian
history, they probably will not know where fact leaves off and fiction
begins in this story.
     Films from China are usually edifying experiences.  For once we
have one that is also fun.  I rate THE EMPEROR AND THE ASSASSIN 8 on
the 0 to 10 scale and a low +3 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Civil Action, A (1998)
     Stephen Zaillian has written some of the most intelligent
screenplays to be made into films in the last several years.  He wrote
SCHINDLER'S LIST and SEARCHING FOR BOBBY FISCHER.  The latter he also
directed.  His second directing project A CIVIL ACTION.  He is again
directing his own script, a very nuts-and-bolts look at a civil action
against two major corporations as seen through the eyes of the lawyer
who brought the action and risked his law firm and his career on the
case.  The film is based on the book A CIVIL ACTION by Jonathan Harr.
     The film's first moments are among its most chilling as the voice
of Jan Schlichtmann (played by John Travolta) gives us "the calculus of
personal injury," a litany of cold rules for figuring the settlement a
personal action suit.  A victim who is alive and suffering pays off
better than one who is dead.  A male victim will pay better than a
woman will and a child will pay least of all.  As he explains the rules
we see how he plays for a jury's sympathy in order to squeeze more
money from a defendant.
     Schlichtmann's law firm is considering a case from Woburn,
Massachusetts, where eight children have died of leukemia.  It sounds
like just the sort of idealistic case everyone would assume lawyers
should take, but several law firms have already turned down the case.
Schlichtmann is also inclined to refuse the case until he discovers
that there are two major corporations involved.  (Apparently no names
have been changed, by the way.  Certainly all the major characters have
the same names as the principal in the original court case. The viewer
will probably recognize the names of the corporations.)  Schlichtmann
attacks the case in the only way that he knows how, launching a multi-
million dollar investigation in the hopes that a sufficiently large
settlement will pay off the investigation costs.  This is not the story
the viewer expects.  A lot of it is about the financial gamble of
environmental litigation.  The huge commissions charged by the legal
trade are seen not so much as greed but as the pay off of a very big
investment.  In its own way this is one of the most positive films ever
made about the legal profession.
     As with SCHINDLER'S LIST we never actually see when Schlichtmann's
motivation changes from being purely financial to idealism, but
eventually his outrage is obvious.  However, his crusade will bring him
in direct conflict with eccentric legal genius Jerome Facher (not
unexpectedly well-acted by Robert Duvall). In the film Facher plays law
the way Bobby Fischer plays chess, repeatedly trying to get under his
opponent's skin.
     John Travolta is sufficient for this role, but never manages to do
anything beyond the obvious.  He just wears a suit well and looks
reasonably sophisticated.  But Robert Duvall really is a brilliant
actor, and here he has to take an eccentric and make him seem
formidable.  That he does quite nicely.  William H. Macy's role as
accountant for Schlichtmann's law firm seems a little overplayed, but
there is nice support by Tony Shalhoub and especially James Gandolfini
who plays with real sincerity.  It would be nice to see Dan Hedaya in a
sympathetic role for once, but this is not it.  He seems condemned to
always play characters seething with inner rage.  But Duvall steals the
show.
     Conrad Hall's camerawork is a little showy.  He intentionally
under-lights any courtroom scene.  Half of an actor's face will be lit
as if carved out of the darkness.  The score by Danny Elfman shows more
control than he usually has, but the end-credit song by Talking Heads
seems jarringly out of place.  In all this may well be the most
sympathetic and at the same time frightening film about the legal
profession since THE PAPER CHASE.  I give it a 7 on the 0 to 10 scale
and a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     For one good description of the actual case see
http://www2.shore.net/~dkennedy/woburn_trial.html.  This site is
authored by Dan Kennedy, who was a reporter at the Woburn trial.
Included at the site is the questionnaire that plays a part in the
movie.  For more information you can also see http://www.geology.ohio-
state.edu/courtroom/.  And for greater detail see the book on which the
film was based.

Title
Review for Ulee's Gold (1997)
     Ulysses "Ulee" Jackson (played by Peter Fonda) is a beekeeper from
a small, sweaty town in the Florida panhandle.  He lives with his two
granddaughters (Vanessa Zima and Jessica Biel) in what in a nicer
neighborhood would be called a "dysfunctional" family.  The older
granddaughter is a little wild and does not have a lot of respect for
her grandfather.  Ulee's son-in-law Jimmy (Tom Wood) is in the
penitentiary for robbing an armored car.  And his daughter-in-law Helen
has run off to have a good time, leaving her two daughters to Ulee.
Hurt by the most of the people he loved, Ulee has withdrawn into
himself emotionally.  He relies on nobody and nobody can let him down.
He has trained his family to never ask the help of outsiders.  Above
all he maintains his integrity and his dignity, even at the expense of
a backache or two or not meeting his honey production goals.
     Then Jimmy gets word from his two partners in the robbery, still
free, that they have Helen in Orlando, high on drugs, and they want
someone to take her off their hands.  When Ulee comes to pick her up,
they make clear how they have used her and at the same time tell Ulee
that they want the $100,000 of bank money from the robbery that they
just found out that Jimmy had and hid from them and the police.  Ulee
brings home Helen, but finds that she is too much to handle in drug
withdrawal and he is forced to ask help of the nurse who rents from
Ulee a house across the street from his house.  Ulee wants as little
help as he can manage, but it is the time of year he needs to give a
lot of attention to his business of producing honey.
     Peter Fonda has never been the most expressive of actors, but here
it works to his advantage playing a man who has retreated into his
shell and divorced himself from his emotions.  This is being called the
best role of Fonda's career, but it may be just a matter of calling for
the type of non-emotive acting that Fonda is best at.  The entire cast
does well with Steven Flynn and Dewey Weber genuinely detestable as
Jimmy's two slimy partners.
     The film DEAD CALM would have been a standard stalker if it had
not included some fascinating scenes of how Sam Neill, as a nautical
man, saves a foundering yacht.  Just seeing the processes used by an
expert makes for some good filmmaking.  Though ULEE'S GOLD does not
take full advantage some of the most interesting scenes of the film
show how Ulee maintains the hives and the discussions of rotating the
hives and the various grades of honey.  In addition these scenes
characterize Ulee as a careful and contentious man who does things a
step at a time.  His care to repair the hives and to return the bees
that have strayed makes a metaphor for Ulee's care for his home.  Later
his behavior around the bees is his guide for how to handle the two
hoodlums who threaten his family.  Unfortunately only in certain scenes
is it clear what Fonda is doing with the hives.  This is not a
documentary on beekeeping, but it would not have taken a lot of effort
to make the task a little more comprehensible.  Though even as it is it
does engage the viewer.

Title
Review for Final Analysis (1992)
          Capsule review:  Psychiatrist finds himself involved
     with the sister of a patient and her gangster husband.  Too
     much of the script follows well-traveled paths for the turns
     to be much of a surprise.  Gere is acceptable as a
     psychiatrist, though the best acting comes from two smaller
     roles--a gangster and a detective.  Rating: low +1 (-4 to
     +4).
     There is a crime committed about a third of the way into this film.  I
turned to Evelyn and said, "Now tell me the plot of the rest of the film."
To the credit of FINAL ANALYSIS, it was only the plot of the next third of
the film, but it was extremely predictable.  By the final third of the film
interesting things are happening right up to but not including the again
predictable climax.  Not that FINAL ANALYSIS is not a classy thriller, but
far too much of the plot is like that of too many other films with very
similar plot twists.  Fans of classic thrillers, be warned.
     Isaac Barr (played by Richard Gere) is a successful San Francisco
psychiatrist often called upon to be an expert witness in legal proceedings.
He makes what, having seen THE PRINCE OF TIDES, we might call "the
Lowenstein mistake."  That is, he has the professional ethics not to get
emotionally or sexually involved with his patients, but he is not so careful
with their family members.  He is intrigued by the strange dreams of his
patient Diana Baylor (played by Uma Thurman), but is downright enchanted by
Baylor's sister, heather Evans (played by Kim Bassinger).  Heather is
married to Jimmy Evans, a sadistic and rabid Greek gangster (played by Eric
Roberts).  Barr would like to rescue Heather from Jimmy the Greek.  Then
things start moving.
     Contrary to some reviews, Gere is perfectly acceptable as a successful
psychiatrist.  He does not act like Judd Hirsch in ORDINARY PEOPLE, but his
manner is not so absurd for a psychiatrist either.  Bassinger, on the other
hand, us only a mediocrity as an actress--a dressed actress anyway.  Perhaps
the best acting is by Eric Roberts, whom one can easily believe is meaner
than a junkyard dog.  Keith David does a great job as an angry police
detective.
     Some comments should be made about the opening credits.  They are in
the Saul Bass tradition of setting the tone for the whole film, not just
throwing names on the screen.  Screen credit goes to Wayne Fitzgerald for
the credit sequence.  Director Phil Joanou does a competent job with the
flawed script.  I rate it a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Saint, The (1997)
     I am told that back in the 1970s a young filmmaker came to the
owners of the rights to the character Flash Gordon and said he wanted
to make a Flash Gordon movie.  They turned the filmmaker down so he
created a brand new hero of his own, calling him Luke Skywalker.
Fortunes are made and lost on such decisions.  But the question is why
would even some of the most talented filmmakers choose to use pre-
existing characters when they can create new ones of their own who are
just as interesting.  One might be that they think they can explore
some new approach to an existing character; the other is to exploit
audience recognition value.  A test to see which is true would be
whether the character would be recognizable with the names changed.
Frequently there are good films made that re-examine Sherlock Holmes.
Almost always these films would be recognizable as being about Sherlock
Holmes even if he were given another name.  One film that definitely
does not pass the test is the new THE SAINT.  Without being told that
this character sometimes uses the name Simon Templar (but usually not)
and without the use of the Saint stick- figure logo toward the end of
the film, there is nothing in Val Kilmer's nameless character that at
all evoke Leslie Charteris's roguish troubleshooter.  And that is
almost surprising since the original Simon Templar is sort of an all-
purpose adventure character.  He might in one adventure be battling
diamond smugglers, in another dangerous spies, and in still another his
opponent would be a mad scientist who has bred an ant the size of a
train car.  Frequently he was suspected to be on the fuzzy edge of the
law, but he never actually was.  He usually used his own name, rarely
used disguises, and probably never used Bondian gadgets though he did
use his own suave personality.  In short, there is just about nothing
in the new Val Kilmer version of The Saint evocative of the character
as written or portrayed before.  Not that this is not an interesting
character.  In fact, this film would have been much better had it not
played on the audience's expectations to see Simon Templar.
     The story opens in what can only be termed "the Catholic School
from Hell."  Because one boy does not take to the Saint's name he has
been assigned, all the girls are locked in their dorms and the boys
will get no food.  This seems like a particularly virulent piece of
gratuitous anti-Catholicism.  Perhaps because the character will later
take the names of saints the filmmakers wanted to make clear this was
not a religious film.  That becomes really clear when the set loose
dogs on some of the children in their charge and one is killed.  This
incident has scarred for life a man of mystery with no name, but who
likes to occasionally use the name Simon Templar.  Flash forward a few
years and the man is a hi-tech cross between Batman and a James Bond
without a British Secret Service to serve.  It is never explained where
his money comes from, but he obviously has a lot to spend on the latest
gadgets.  He gets caught up in a really confused plot by the Russian
Mafia to steal a formula for practical cold fusion from an attractive
American scientist, played by Elizabeth Shue.  The whole convoluted
story builds to an outlandish climax in Red Square.
     Shue is appealing with her slightly geeky touches.  Though somehow
there just does not seem to be much chemistry between her character and
Kilmer's and their romance only seems to bog down the plot.  Kilmer is
just a little over the top in a fun way with his many and varied
disguises.  They are each just a bit exaggerated much like Rod
Steiger's tour-de-force performance in NO WAY TO TREAT A LADY.  The
problem is the story which is so totally artificial and which so often
depends on far-fetched coincidence to get Kilmer's character out of
trouble.  I think I would like to see more of this character, but in a
plot that is much better thought out.  And frankly it still irks me
that they hung this brand new character on The Saint.
     The score of this film by Graeme Revell is not inspiring (which is
probably why the trailers borrowed music from THE SHADOW and CRIMSON
TIDE).  The film is full of scenes that are not well considered.
During one chase the character apparently changes clothes (off camera)
in the middle of a crowded public square with nobody noticing.
It would have been nice to have a new film about Leslie Charteris's
character.  It may even be good to have more stories about this Simon
Templar, but they are not the same and this story has too many rough
edges.  I give this THE SAINT a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Restoration (1995)
     On January 30, 1649, Charles I of England, who had earlier lost
his fight to restrict the power of Parliament, paid the price and was
beheaded.  England was in the hands of the Parliamentarians.  Oliver
Cromwell, the Puritan who commanded the New Model Army remained as
unbeatable as Charles I had found him.  Cromwell took control of the
government making himself essentially a dictator.  He went on and
within months subdued the rebellious Ireland.  Charles I's son, who had
been crowned Charles II of Scotland, raised an army to invade England,
but he was beaten back by Cromwell's army.  In another victory Cromwell
presided over a successful war with the Netherlands.  But now the
dictator needed money to finance his victories.  To get it he reversed
a ruling of Edward I (see my review of BRAVEHEART) and allowed Jews
back into England to get their financial support.
     When Cromwell died on September 3, 1658, there was nobody worthy
to replace him and his son Richard was the nobody worthy who was
chosen.  To have a continuation of the harsh Puritanical rule of a
Cromwell and the lack of leadership that Richard offered brought
discontent throughout England.  It did not take much of Richard
Cromwell's rule to make Charles II of Scotland look like a natural
leader.  Charles II was given the throne of England on assurances that
he would take no revenge for his father's death and would allow
religious freedom for England.  With the return of the monarchy to
England begins the period called the Restoration.
     Thus we have an England that was still ravaged from the Civil War.
And it still has bitter conflict between severe Puritans and more
free-living and perhaps even decadent followers of the two Charles
Stuarts.  In spite of continuing conflicts the Restoration was the time
of great cultural landmarks in English history.  Milton wrote "Paradise
Lost."  Social philosophers Thomas Hobbes and John Locke were
publishing.  King Charles had a particular interest in science and
chartered the Royal Society of London to do scientific research.  Isaac
Newton was 19 when Charles returned and was doing his early work.  When
the Great Plague struck London with its full force in April of 1665
Newton fled to his mother's farm and there worked out the laws of
gravitation.  Meanwhile over 50,000 people in London died of the
pestilence.  Luckily he was still out of London 17 months later when a
bakery fire broke out near London Bridge and engulfed a street of
vulnerable wood houses.  Fanned by east winds the inferno continued to
spread and burn for four days until much of the city had been consumed.
Even with a large piece of the city leveled, an estimated 13,000
houses, enough to make 100,000 people homeless, Charles could not
convince property owners to rebuild along lines planned by master
architect Christopher Wren and Charles had to settle for Wren's
redesign of St. Paul's Cathedral.  I is in this Restoration England
that the story of RESTORATION is set.
     Robert Merivale (Robert Downey Jr.) and John Pearce (David
Thewlis) are close friends who are very similar but very different.
Both are promising medical students, but for John successes come only
through hard work and a dedication that is well in keeping with his
stern Quaker background.  Robert has more of a genius for medicine, or
would if he would ever stop partying.  One day Robert is called to
court in a personal mission of healing by Charles II (Sam Neill).
While there his womanizing is noticed by Charles.  Charles is looking
for a nominal and platonic husband for his mistress Celia (Polly
Walker).  Once she is married he can continue his affair with her while
she is still under a cloak of respectability.  Along with this non-wife
wife Robert is given a house and lands and a pension.  But then the
plot takes the obvious turn with Robert falling in love with his for-
show wife Celia.  Luckily this complication leads to others which turn
what was a rather bland situation comedy in an interesting setting into
another story entirely that affords a much better view of Restoration
England.
     Yes, the story does improve as it goes along but the one factor
that remains constant is that the story is never so interesting as to
avoid being upstaged by the detailed and beautifully filmed setting.
Michael Hoffman, whose best known film to date was SOAPDISH, manages to
bring in a sumptuous look at mid-17th Century England at a surprisingly
small budget of $18.5 million.  The budget is in large part helped by
having cinematographer Oliver Stapleton use relatively close shots of
nearly every fancy scene.  This only occasionally gives a feeling of
constriction and probably saves immensely on costs.  Rupert Walters's
screenplay based on the novel by Rose Tremain moves the story at a pace
that never drags and allows the action to bring the audience to a
surprising number interesting places, yet never occupies the viewer too
much to look for the detail at the sides of the frame.  The film is a
study in contrasts.  We go back and forth from the pleasureless work of
the Quakers to the workless pleasures of life in Charles's court.  We
see people who are all style and no substance and styleless people of
great substance.
     In spite of the low budget, one has to look a fair distance down
the cast list to find unfamiliar names.  David Thewlis is very good as
the dedicated and serious friend and colleague though he carries some
baggage from his skin-crawling role in NAKED.  Polly Walker of
ENCHANTED APRIL and PATRIOT GAMES makes a fetching mistress.  Also
present are Meg Ryan, Ian McKellen (currently starring in RICHARD III),
and of course Hugh Grant.
     For those who like films that show them a bit of a different world
and a different time, this film should be a pleasant surprise.  I give
it a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     For fans of historical films wanting to expand their film
experience and learn about the period, there is a terrific Worldwide
Web site for this film at
http://www.obs-us.com/obs/english/films/mx/rest/top.htm with great
links to original source material about the Restoration.  This is what
the Web was made for.  I just hope it remains around long enough for
the readers of this review to who want to have an opportunity access
it.

Title
Review for Rising Sun (1993)
          Capsule review:  Culture clash and high-tech
     manipulation of reality are the themes that combine with a
     mediocre murder mystery in this adaptation of Michael
     Crichton's novel RISING SUN.  Much of the anti-Japanese and
     anti-Western-decline diatribe from the book are toned down
     for the film.  Rating: high 0 (-4 to +4).
     A party slogan from Orwell's 1984 said "who controls the past controls
the future and who controls the present controls the past."  RISING SUN is a
high-gloss technological murder mystery that, as everybody already knows, is
about xenophobia, xenophilia, and Japanese-American relations, but what is
getting less attention is that it is also about how electronic and computing
technology is changing what we think of as reality.  As portrayed in the
film, the Japanese are masters at the electronic manipulation of reality--an
art that gives them an immoral advantage over their American counterparts.
This, by the way, is an interesting reversal of the 17th Century Japanese
policy to suppress the Western technological advance of the gun which gave
its wielder what was considered by the Japanese an immoral advantage over a
swordsman.  Times have changed and tables have turned.
     In Los Angeles Web Smith, a liaison officer with the police department
(played by Wesley Snipes), is investigating a murder in a Japanese
corporation's skyscraper.  Assisting him as a guide is John Connor (played
by Sean Connery), a mysterious expert on Japanese culture.  An American
woman who was deeply into drugs and kinky sex is found dead, presumably
murdered, on a conference room table.  The police should have a big jump on
solving the case with four observation cameras trained on the room, but that
is electronic data in the hands of people who are masters of the
manipulation of data.  Also complicating the investigation is the amoral,
financially-motivated, chauvinistic presence of the Japanese business
executives.  This aspect is toned down from the novel, but it is still very
present in the film.  But also toned down is the aspect of the novel being
arguably as critical--or more so--of the cultural decline of the West as it
is of the Japanese.  Michael Crichton's book was intended as a wake-up call
to the American people.  Not surprisingly, that message has been completely
obliterated in the transition to film, along with a large proportion of what
was negative about the Japanese.
     What we have left here is an okay murder mystery revolving in large
part around technological elements.  It is then given Hollywood gloss with
high production values and a notable cast.  Sean Connery is, of course, Sean
Connery.  His performance is exactly what you would expect it to be.  In
this film he also has the title "executive producer."  Wesley Snipes is a
good actor who balances the cast racially but unless I am mistaken, it is
very unlikely that the LAPD would have a black in the diplomatic position of
liaison officer to the Japanese, who have a very low regard for blacks.
Also present is Harvey Keitel, certainly one of America's most highly
regarded character actors.  Japanese playboy Eddie Sakamura is played by
Cary-Hiroyaki Tagawa, somewhat familiar for having played an alien lifeform
in the crew of the short-lived television series SPACE RANGERS.  But for all
the gloss and high-tech hardware, the mystery just fails to be intriguing.
This is not a puzzle mystery where the clues are all in front of the
audience.  It is more a "follow the police and all will be revealed" sort of
mystery.  I would have to give it a high 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Russia House, The (1990)
          Capsule review:  Colorless spy story keeps promising to
     pay off with something happening, but plot twists are a long
     time coming.  Photography in Russia tries to make it look
     exotic and interesting, but the rather drab cities are not
     the best photographic subjects.  Rating: 0 (-4 to +4).
     At the beginning of THE RUSSIA HOUSE three notebooks purportedly
containing Soviet military secrets have been passed to a British publisher
and the British want to know if the notebooks are genuine.  An hour and
forty minutes into THE RUSSIA HOUSE we have seen a lot of Russian scenery,
we know some of the characters involved a little better, a fourth notebook
has been passed, and now the Americans as well as the British want to know
if the notebooks are genuine.  That may well be how the spy business really
is, but it really is not a very good piece of story-telling.  It would be
one thing if the evidence built up in an interesting way the way it did in a
previous LeCarre adaptation, TINKER, TAILOR, SOLDIER, SPY.  But here we are
dealing with far less than compelling characters.  The two main characters
are Sean Connery as British publisher Barley Blair and Michelle Pfeiffer as
Soviet publisher Katya.  Katya passes the notebooks written by a former
lover Klaus Maria Brandauer as the enigmatic Dante.  Barley and Blair seem
to fall in love for reasons never very clear.  This has to be a what's-the-
attraction love pairing to rival the one in HAVANA.
     Fred Schepisi has taken a script that would move moderately well at
thirty minutes and stretched it to a hundred and twenty-three.  One way that
he has stretched it is to show you the scenery of Russia, mostly Moscow and
Leningrad.  This plays off the new post-glasnost interest in the Soviet
Union; however, it seems unlikely this film will greatly contribute to
Soviet tourism.  While many of the buildings are of majestic design, the
film only underscored the drabness of Russia.  That drabness is further
emphasized by filming Russia with perpetually overcast skies.  The film also
unsells tourism by underscoring how much the economy has degraded under
glasnost.  As Katya complains, "Glasnost gives everyone the right to
complain and accuse, but it doesn't make shoes."  Curiously, Katya manages
to be able to get plenty of eye make-up, as Michelle Pfeiffer's characters
always do.
     What is curious about the uninteresting background is that the
screenplay is by Tom Stoppard, who made Shanghai mystical and fascinating in
his screenplay for EMPIRE OF THE SUN.  Here, however, he tries to show us
not a physical landscape but the figurative landscape of the world of
espionage and counter-espionage.  LeCarre can make that landscape
interesting, but it does not come through in Stoppard's screenplay.  I like
Stoppard and LeCarre, but I hope they realize they are no good for each
other.  I rate their result a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Land Before Time, The (1988)
     It is surprising that Disney studios never did "cute" animation of
dinosaurs.  They have done cute versions of most familiar animals in their
various films:  dogs, cats, pigs, mice, birds, fish, insects--and those were
just "bit parts" in cartoons; that does not count as continuing characters.
But the only time Disney ever did dinosaurs was in FANTASIA and there they
were just big, meaty blood-and-thunder engines of destruction who crashed
into each other to the tune of Stravinsky's "Rite of Spring."  As much as
children love dinosaurs already, Disney never animated a dinosaur that was
even remotely likable.  Not that it was a void that really needed filling,
but Disney animation department veteran Don Bluth, who specializes in
imitating Disney's animation heyday, has made an almost-feature-length
animated film, THE LAND BEFORE TIME, about the adventures of some likable
baby dinosaurs.  And Bluth uses "flat animation" in what may be the only
serious attempt of such animation since FANTASIA and a good while before.
The field of animating dinosaurs has been very nearly the exclusive province
of dimensional animators such as Willis O'Brien, Ray Harryhausen, Jim
Danforth, and David Allen.  In spite of the principle that flat animation
offers the artist greater freedom of expression--admittedly at the cost of
some realism--it has very rarely been used for dinosaurs.
     But I rather suspect that the real inspiration for THE LAND BEFORE TIME
came from the dinosaur art of William Stout, particularly as seen in his
1982 book THE DINOSAURS (Bantam Books, $12.95).  Unlike most dinosaur
artists who try for a realistic,almost photographic style, Stout's art is
more stylized and almost comic-book-like.  He tries more for caricature
rather than for realism and so is able to put more expression into his
dinosaurs.  I do not remember if Stout's name appeared in the credits of THE
LAND BEFORE TIME, but several of the illustrations from THE DINOSAURS are
dramatized in the film, including an appealing camarasaurus baby hatching
from an egg.  Another illustration shows ultrasauri standing among trees.
The top of the painting cuts off the heads but a visual analogy between the
necks and the treetrunks is implied.  This scene also appeared in the film.
     It is difficult to decide when THE LAND BEFORE TIME would have taken
place.  One needs to identify exactly what dinosaurs we are seeing.  I have
heard the main character, Littlefoot, described as a "brontosaurus."  If
that was what was intended then Bluth and company were hopelessly sloppy.
Most of the dinosaurs in the film did not live until the late (or Upper)
Cretaceous Period--sort of the grand finale of dinosaur life that brought
into existence familiar dinosaurs such as triceratops and tyrannosaurus.
That is entirely the wrong era for "brontosauri"--more accurately called
apatosauri.  But then, the dinosaurs of the film had more rounded faces than
apatosauri would have had.  They had the rounded faces that brontosauri used
to be portrayed as having.  Also, apatosaurus died out in the late Jurassic
era; even camarasaurus, which outlasted them and lived only into the EARLY
(or Lower) Cretaceous was not contemporary with late Cretaceous animals.
Littlefoot could have been some lesser-known species of sauropod, some of
which did live late enough to be contemporary with triceratops.  The
stegosaurus also is an Upper Jurassic dinosaur, but some of its similar-
looking relatives could have been alive in the mid to late Cretaceous.
Before you decide that the questions of era are trivial matters, realize
that the Upper Cretaceous has been over for 70 million years and you can see
how much animal life has changed since then.  Go back another 70 million
years and you are just about at the end of the Jurassic period with the
Cretaceous soon to begin.  "Bigmouth," incidentally, is a parasaurolophus
who is respectably Upper Cretaceous.  And what appeared to be a dimetrodon
that should have died out 150 million years before this story was more
likely an Upper Cretaceous spinosaurus.  Stretching a point, all these
dinosaurs could have been contemporaries, but it still seems unlikely.
     Even more questionable is the geological background of the film.  Yes,
the Earth was geologically active at that time, but nowhere near as active
as shown.  In a short space we see the characters encountering powerful
earthquakes and unrelated volcanos, and they struggle with a tar pit.  Even
in a geologically active era, this is entirely too much activity to be
credible.
     The story of THE LAND BEFORE TIME is about a baby sauropod of some
sort--they call themselves "long-necks"--who is born in a time when food is
scarce.  His mother wants to take him, along with his grandparents, to the
"great valley," where for some reason food is still plentiful in spite of
the fact that every dinosaur and his brother is headed there or is already
there.  Along the way he meets a cute, pugnacious little girl triceratops,
but the parents of both know that mixed species relationships rarely work
out.  Each gets the sort of reaction you would get if you told your parents
you were really good friends with a sheep.
     Through circumstances I will not describe, Littlefoot finds he must
make the journey without his elders.  Instead, a set of lost young dinosaurs
band together to make the trip as group.  The story could be reasonable but
the characterization is not.  The characters are not well-developed.
Littlefoot goes through all kinds of tribulations without giving up, then
suddenly at some point, gives up entirely: possible, but unlikely behavior.
And if you doubt that real characterization can be done in an animated film,
see WATERSHIP DOWN or THE PLAGUE DOGS.
     THE LAND BEFORE TIME is a short film, even by animated film standards.
It is just 66 minutes long--so short, in fact, that it is always shown with
a cartoon, "Family Dog."  The cartoon, by the way, is the first half of
"Family Dog," the February 16, 1987, episode of Steven Spielberg's AMAZING
STORIES television show.  If it seems like it ends a trifle abruptly, that
is why.  If it means anything, they have chosen the best piece of the
original broadcast.  Apparently they could get the cartoon cheaply since
Spielberg was one of the executive producers of THE LAND BEFORE TIME.
     THE LAND BEFORE TIME does boast a nice score by James Horner and an
okay song sung by Diana Ross.  But it still does not show the effort of
other animated feature films.  And padding the length with part of an
episode of AMAZING STORIES is no substitute for the kind of story-telling
that Disney Studios or even Bluth himself have done in the past.  Rate THE
LAND BEFORE TIME a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Fish Called Wanda, A (1988)
          Capsule review:  Very funny, well-written crime
     story/comedy combines the story-telling of the old Ealing
     comedies with the pace and outrageousness of FAWLTY TOWERS.
     This film makes one long for the days of better films by
     better writers.  We don't see many like this any more.
     Rating: high +2.
     I got complaints recently on my review of MIDNIGHT RUN.  I only mildly
liked a comedy-adventure in which you got to know somewhat two conflicting
character types, set on the background of a sort of race across country that
included cars chasing cars, helicopters cars, and double crosses.  Now,
eight days later, I see an English comedy-adventure, A FISH CALLED WANDA.
It too has chases, conflicting personalities, and double crosses, but the
poor British cannot afford to blow up helicopters and crash cars, so they
economize by getting good writers who can really write dialogue and create
characters, and at the same time be funny and tell a good story that keeps
an audience guessing how things are all going to turn out.  In short, A FISH
CALLED WANDA is not only a film that does things right, it is a film that
does some things astoundingly right.
     The film begins with a mismatched set of crooks pulling off a jewel
heist.  There are two English brothers (played by Michael Palin and Tom
Georgeson) and an American brother and sister, Otto and Wanda (played by
Kevin Kline and Jamie Lee Curtis).  The jewels are just barely stowed away
when the first double cross happens.  The second double cross is only a
short time after.  One double cross might have caused problems; with two,
all hell breaks loose in an amazing set of misunderstandings, dirty tricks,
counter-plots, and revenges.  Soon into the fray comes barrister Archie
Leach (does that name sound familiar?), played by John Cleese.  Wanda wants
to use Leach against the English brothers, but Otto's basic anti-British
prejudice starts fouling things up.
     A FISH CALLED WANDA was written by John Cleese and directed by Charles
Crichton (who directed great British comedies like THE LAVENDER HILL MOB).
It was based on a story by Cleese Crichton.  With that background, it is not
surprising that it has a feel of FAWLTY TOWERS combined with MONTY PYTHON
crossed with old Ealing Studios comedy.  A FISH CALLED WANDA has good
three-dimensional characters, has a good story, and is very funny at the
same time.  Rate it a high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Lady in White (1988)
     Oddly enough, while the ghost story is probably the most commonly
written breed of horror story, it is very uncommon as a type of horror film.
Perhaps there is a feeling that they do not translate well to film.  Ghost
stories are usually mood pieces and directors who know how to capture moods
generally have other kinds of films they want to make.  Ghost stories that
have really worked on film have done so by hinting and by creating a--let's
be frank--morbid mood in the audience.  The good ones have been THE
HAUNTING, THE INNOCENTS, THE UNINVITED, and perhaps THE CHANGELING. (Hmmm.
I never noticed before how similar the titles were.)  Two films that
definitely do not make it as ghost stories are GHOST STORY and POLTERGEIST.
While I liked POLTERGEIST, it was really more science fiction on the astral
plane than a ghost story.  Each of these two films has been too overpowering
to make it as the subtle mood piece that a good ghost tale should be.  In
fact, of the classic ghost stories I mentioned, only one was even in color.
The other three depended on a dark mood that is very hard to achieve in
color.  Now a ghost story has come along on film that ranks with the
classics--perhaps even surpasses them.  LADY IN WHITE is a ghost story in
color, but it never overwhelms.  It is a very fine mood piece and the use of
color in the film enhances the mood rather than fighting it.  And the story
is worthy of the mood, and the photography is worthy of the story.
     LADY IN WHITE was written, directed, scored, and produced by Frank
LaLoggia.  That can be either a very good sign or a very bad sign in a low-
budget film.  LADY IN WHITE is very clearly one man's vision and dream
brought to the screen.  I grew up in New England and I can tell you that no
other place have I seen where autumn is so melodramatic.  The world turns
bright hues of red and brown and yellow as it rages against the dying of the
warm.  LaLoggia captures the melancholic autumn with a small town feel
somewhere between that of TO KILL A MOCKINGBIRD and SOMETHING WICKED THIS
WAY COMES.  Like those films, this is a story of children and growth, but it
also raises gooseflesh in ways that are all too rare in horror films.
     It is, in fact, the story of Frankie Scarlatti, whom I suspect is made
up in no small part of little Frankie LaLoggia from about 25 years ago.
Frankie loves Halloween and monsters of all sorts.  he tells such a good
Halloween story of the "prehysterical" monster that stomps London that
jealous classmates arrange for him to be locked in the cloakroom closet.  In
the old school that has served generations, years mean very little and he is
visited by the spirit of a little girl his own age, or she was when she died
eleven years earlier...a death that the spirit must re-live over and over.
     Even if the main story were not good--and it is--this would be a
marvelously textured film.  Characters like Frankie's grandfather, his
father, and his brother are drawn with a loving pen.  Frankie himself is
played by Lucas Haas who, young as he is, is the veteran of films like
TESTAMENT and WITNESS.  the film carries the viewer along, often to
unexpected vistas, without making one false move until the final five
minutes.  LaLoggia has problems ending the story without making it a little
goofy and a little cliched.  But until the final minutes of the film LADY IN
WHITE is a positive gem of filmmaking.  Even mistakes in the special effects
work for the film.  Rate it an admiring +3 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Little Man Tate (1991)
          Capsule review:  Good acting, good direction, but a
     really bad screenplay and story trying to make us all thank
     our lucky stars that we are not geniuses.  This film insults
     the viewer's intelligence in specific and intelligence in
     general.  This is the most paranoid view of the highly
     intelligence since SIMON.  Rating: -1 (-4 to +4).
     Poor Pinocchio!  He was a wonderful magical puppet, but he knew it was
much better to be a real live boy.  Then there was Mr. Spock.  He seemed to
pride himself on his logical Vulcan side.  But every chance the writers get
they showed how much better it was to be human.  Kirk's eulogy also said
that of all souls Kirk had met, Spock's was the most human.  Being a normal
human must be the best thing in the whole universe.  And look.  We're all
human.  There are so many humans around, this just has to be Best of All
Possible Worlds.  And you and I are the best things to be.  Just normal
everyday people.  Oh boy!
     Fred Tate (played by Adam Hann-Byrd) is like one of the child geniuses
in CHILDREN OF THE DAMNED.  Daddy is nowhere to be found and Fred clearly
does not get his genius from his mother's side.  But at what looks like age
two he is already reading labels on dinnerware, much to the amazement of his
mother, Dede (played by Jodie Foster, who also directs).  By age seven he is
already brilliant in eight or nine different ways, including painting,
poetry, mathematics, and music.  When he is given a math problem he and the
audience see the numbers float by in a pretty blue stream.
     Fred is discovered by Jane Grierson (played by Dianne Wiest).  Grierson
heads a sort of institute that is funded in some way we never find out.  Its
opulence surely cannot all come from tuition.  Her institute seems to
collect dossiers on emerging child geniuses, screen them, and choose a
select few to be given all the resources they need to develop to their full
potential.  It seems to work sort of like the similar organization in THE
FURY.  One of the children from this sort of environment seriously tells an
interviewer, "I'm working on an experiment involving lasers, sulphuric acid,
and butterflies."  Oh, buy, that sure doesn't sound like much fun for the
butterflies, does it, boys and girls?  But then, we all knew that geniuses
develop things like H-bombs because they have lost the human touch.  Lucky
you and I still have it, huh?
     Well, as it turns out, Jane Grierson has her problems too.  She is a
genius, which means of course she eats funny things.  She likes macrobiotic
foods that make the normal side of Fred vomit.  She listens to genius music
by Mozart (but by the end credits we are back to people-oriented music like
Cole Porter).  And she does not know how to deal with people at all.  Fred
becomes the object of a tug-of-war between Dr. Grierson, who wants to
develop his genius, and his mother, who wants him to be more average.
     Oddly enough, just about everything I did not like was the script.
Except for her choice of material, Jodie Foster did a good job with the
film.  Dianne Wiest turned in a very good performance, as usual.  Like
Kathleen Quinlan, another actress I admire, Wiest seems to have an aura of
both vulnerability and courage.  It is as if she has been badly hurt but has
picked herself up and is carrying on.
     Adam Hann-Byrd really plays a young genius very well.  In spite of the
script not knowing how geniuses behave, Hann-Byrd really does seem bright.
Both Hann-Byrd and Wiest are more engaging than Foster.  Foster seems
satisfied to be the hero of the film and does not do much to steal scenes
from the other two.  Foster maintains our interest in the characters in
spite of the weak script.

Title
Review for Predator (1987)
          Capsule review:  Arnold Schwarzenegger meets an alien
     with a cloaking device while on a commando mission in Central
     America.  Action films are pretty common, but the concept of
     the cloaking device coupled with decent special effects are a
     boon.
     When I was growing up and into comics, one kind of comic I was NOT
interested in was war comics.  I never read one, though I was occasionally
curious about the ones that mixed war stories with a science fictional
element.  Typically, some group of commandos would find an island they were
taking was infested with dinosaurs.  If I were to read a war comic, that
would be the one I'd want to read.  Well, the science fiction war story has
made it to the screen with PREDATOR.
     To Major Dutch Schaefer (played by Arnold Schwarzenegger), it's just
another job.  Schaefer makes his living by leading a crack commando unit in
the jungle.  It isn't the safest way to make a living, but it usually has a
predictable level of danger and few really unexpected hazards.  Schaefer
usually knows pretty much what to expect and what to be prepared for.  This
time, however, Schaefer has flubbed it badly.  Schaefer and his men are not
prepared for the hazards they are facing and they are paying the price in
lives.  It isn't really their fault, of course.  It's just that sometimes
you face *something you haven't seen before*.  This time they are being picked
off by an alien creature and because the alien can fade into the jungle like
a chameleon, they are not even seeing the something this time.
     Twentieth Century Fox, who cleaned up with two science fiction horror
films last summer (ALIENS and THE FLY), have as their summer science fiction
film this year a sort of RAMBO meets ALIENS.  You probably already know who
Schwarzenegger is.  The title role is played by the 7'2" tall Kevin Peter
Hall, the Peter Mayhew of the 80s.  Hall is quoted as saying of his alien's
fighting style: "An alien warrior wouldn't come from outer space doing old
Bruce Lee routines.  I wanted something a little different from the standard
karate.  Medieval combat seemed appropriate."  Right!  Well, I'm not really
sure you can tell the difference.
     What does set this film apart from pure throwaway action films is an
interesting approach in the chameleon or, more accurately, "cloaking"
effect.  In the first scenes when you see it, you really are not sure what
you have seen or how the effect was created.  When you can get a better look
at the effect, it is relatively clear how it was achieved, but it is still a
good idea.  The plot implications of a nearly invisible creature stalking
the commandos are well-handled.  Without the cloaking concept this would be
a fairly low-grade action film.  As it stands, PREDATOR is an enjoyable
action film, reasonably well-thought-out.  I saw only one real inconsistency
(I don't think it will give away much to say that sometimes the alien can
see human eyes and sometimes it can't).  Because the invisibility theme is
well-handled, I give PREDATOR a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Maurice (1987)
          Capsule review:  Disappointing E. M. Forster entry by
     much of the same team that made A ROOM WITH A VIEW.  A plea
     for acceptance of homosexuality flounders in melodrama,
     florid production values, and even a mild dash of sexism.
     There is enough quality present to make the film worth
     seeing, but not as much as you'd think.  Rating: +1.  (The
     following review contains spoilers and opinions that are
     going to draw flak.)
     Over the last few years there has been a discovery of the works of E.
M. Forster by filmmakers.  Until A PASSAGE TO INDIA, I don't think anyone
had ever filmed a Forster novel.  Since then, we have seen A ROOM WITH A
VIEW and now MAURICE.  The new entry is the story of a homosexual, Maurice
(pronounced "Morris") Hall, who discovered his own homosexuality at
Cambridge and a bunch of other people's as he went along.  MAURICE tells the
story of his discomfort in a country that is "disinclined to accept human
nature."
     Maurice becomes aware of his homosexuality at Cambridge, where we are
shown that he runs into no women who are attractive or interesting.  There
are darn few women in the whole film who are not portrayed as superficial
and vacuous.  But there are lots of pretty men running around.  In class,
they read classics with references to homosexuality (the professors tell the
boys just to skip over the explicit parts and interpret the rest as platonic
love).  One thing sort of leads to another and Maurice meets Clive Durham,
who is close and pretty and soon they are pretty close.  The film follows
their affair for a few years until Clive decides to buckle under to public
pressure and marry someone of the opposite sex instead.  It isn't long
before he is telling Maurice how he was surprised to find that women are
nice too.  (It is the only scene in the film that has much nice to say about
women.)  Maurice tries to have an American hypnotist (played by Ben Kingsley
doing his best to sound like a Texan) cure him, but it doesn't work and soon
Maurice decides that if he cannot have Clive, he will have Clive's assistant
gamekeeper.
     There are always two parts to an E. M. Forster story.  There is the
story itself and there is the social comment.  A PASSAGE TO INDIA, in
addition to having a good story, argued cogently for home rule for India.  I
became firmly convinced that Britain did the right thing almost forty years
ago.  A ROOM WITH A VIEW argued that Edwardian social custom really screwed
up people's lives and I left the theater shouting "Down with Edwardian
social custom!"  It too told a good story.  MAURICE is perhaps the most
relevant to our society and even in that it is more than seventy years out
of date, but the story itself is not very good this time around.  It is
overly long in the telling--about 140 minutes--and is much more melodramatic
than director Ivory's previous ROOM WITH A VIEW.  I think Ivory wanted to
repeat that film's success, so he put in many of the same faces, forced Ben
Kingsley into the wrong role, chose a not-very-good novel, and then gave it
a long and florid treatment.  With the talents involved, the film could not
go wrong, but one would expect a much better rating than a low +1 on the -4
to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Misérables, Les (1998)
     The best and certainly the longest novel I ever read--about 1600
pages in my unabridged edition--was Victor Hugo's LES MISERABLES.  Hugo
turned slow operatic pacing into a piece of monumental art throwing in
which fifty-page essays were just side comments.  This novel also has
the distinction of being the only piece of written fiction that ever
moved me to tears.  So I was very much looking forward to seeing the
new film version.  The new version is not a screen adaptation of the
popular international musical, but a straight dramatic rendering.  Much
of what I enjoyed of the novel was missing, but then it should come as
no great surprise that not all 1600 pages of story would make it to the
screen.
     Liam Neeson plays Jean Valjean, a vicious ex-convict who is turned
in one night into a human saint by the goodness of the Bishop of D.
But in the course of the story he will be tempted to return to evil
many times as his past repeatedly fights to catch up with him.  In this
case his past takes the form of the implacable Inspector Javert,
searching for the missing Valjean.  SHINE's Geoffrey Rush plays the
inflexible lover of law and order Javert who hounds Valjean for years.
As the film opens Jean Valjean has already been released from his
nineteen years in prison, but with his yellow passport nobody will give
him shelter until an old woman suggests he try the door of the Bishop
of D.  After the familiar story of the Bishop's silver, probably the
best-known sequence in the novel, we jump forward ten years to see
Valjean having become the enlightened factory owner and mayor of the
village of Vigo.  Uma Thurman plays Fantine, a woman fired from his
factory who turns to prostitution.  Fantine has got to be the least
glamorous role of Thurman's career.  Behind the (intentionally) ghastly
makeup Thurman is able to put some real passion into her role and gives
as good a performance as I can remember from her.  Her love for her
daughter is a new inspiration for Valjean.  Claire Danes completes the
set of principles as the adult daughter Cosette in a role that requires
little but that she be cute and a bit spoiled.
     The film takes a number of small liberties with Hugo's plotting to
make things going on within characters' heads happen on-screen and more
visibly.  In this version Valjean does not just slip out of the
Bishop's house with the silver; he physically attacks the Bishop.
Valjean's escape to find Cosette is much simplified from the novel and
turned into a carriage chase to add some excitement to the story.  The
Thenardiers are reduced from major characters in the novel to a single
scene.  The modification that is really the most bothersome is the
final meeting of Javert and Valjean.  Apparently Rafael Yglesias, who
wrote the script, wanted a piece of strong dramatic action.  He ends
the film in a major key, where a minor key seems more natural to
portray Javert's final doubts.
     Liam Neeson is physically a large man making him instantly more
appropriate than Fredric March was in the classic 1935 version.  Neeson
tends to underplay the role where some more passion would have been
what was expected.  Geoffrey Rush is equally passionless, but in this
case it works to his advantage.  Javert, after all, makes himself
little more than a machine for enforcing rules and laws.  The most
disappointing casting is in having Peter Vaughan play the Bishop of D.
Vaughan appears to be something of a ditherer, a nice man but not one
with a great deal of intellectual power.  Yet the Bishop is really the
most important character in the story, and Valjean is only an extension
of the goodness of the Bishop into a second person. Valjean is the
embodiment of the good that the Bishop did living on rather than being
interred with the Bishop's bones.
     LES MISERABLES too often is just a bit bloodless.  It is a bit
more an intellectual exercise than the story of tragedy and triumph
Hugo wrote.  Still it recalls the passion of the novel.  I would still
give it a 7 on the 0 to 10 scale and a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Homeward Bound: The Incredible Journey (1993)
     I was twelve years old when I read Sheila Burnford's INCREDIBLE
JOURNEY.  It must have been a year or so later that I saw the Walt Disney
adaptation.  I do not actually remember if that film was narrated or not.  I
suspect it must have been narrated to keep the story understandable.  (I
think THE BEAR was about the first case I saw of a feature film that shows
animal characters completely non-verbally.)  In any case, now the film has
been remade almost thirty years later and the approach to conveying animal
action has taken a step backwards from realism.  In Duwayne Dunham's remake
the animals talk and even wise-crack to each other.  That certainly makes
the animals easier to understand, and it opens the way for a lot of humor--a
la LOOK WHO'S TALKING--but it regrettably pushes the story into fantasy.
     Shadow (played by Ben with Don Ameche's voice), Chance (Rattler/Michael
J. Fox), and(Tiki/Sally Field) love their human family, but are left
temporarily with a family friend.  Through a mix-up, they decide they have
been abandoned and determine to strike out on their own to make their way
home.  Between them and home are some unspecified hundreds of miles (250
miles in the original) of beautiful but treacherous wilderness.
     The screenplay is by Linda Wooverton (who worked on BEAUTY AND THE
BEAST) and Caroline Thompson (who wrote EDWARD SCISSORHANDS).  Often the
wise-cracking animals get off a good one, but it is somewhat hit or miss.
Lines like the referring to a porcupine as having a "bad hair day" just
don't work.  In spite of that misplaced humor, HOMEWARD BOUND does hit a
responsive chord and will have many members of the audience openly crying at
the loyalty of these pets for their humans.  Not a perfect film, but
generally one that should please adults and children.  I give the film a +1
on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Planet of the Apes (2001)
    CAPSULE: The much anticipated re-adaptation of the Pierre
    Boulle novel comes to the screen as  a dark and a little
    dreary film with lots of chases and fighting, but very little
    intelligence.  Visually  there is much to like about this
    version, but the approach is to take an adventure after the
    style of  GULLIVER'S TRAVELS and treat it as an action film.
    That makes it a film without much center.   Rating: 4
    (0 to 10), 0 (-4 to +4)
Pierre Boulle, author of THE BRIDGE ON THE RIVER KWAI, wrote
PLANET OF THE APES  (a.k.a. MONKEY PLANET), the novel, as a
social satire.  It reads a lot like a fifth book of  GULLIVER'S
TRAVELS.  Humans discover a planet in which the roles of apes and
humans have  been reversed, not unlike the roles of horses and
humans on Jonathan Swift's island of the  Houyhnhnms.  The novel
moves somewhat slowly to create some suspense in revealing all
the  things most film fans know to be true about the nature of
the planet.  It seems to me there is also a  statement about
human cruelty to animals, but perhaps I was just looking for
that.
When Rod Serling adapted the novel into a film released in 1968,
he added a number of Serling  touches, familiar from episodes of
THE TWILIGHT ZONE and changed the ending to make it  more
Serling-ish.  The final irony of the original version has become
film history.  Without it there  could never have been a "Planet
of the Apes" film series.  I can surmise only that Serling ran
into  serious script problems in how to handle the tricky
question of language.  In the book the apes had  their own
language and the human eventually learned that language.  That
could have been done in  the film, but that would have required
the entire film to be subtitled for the non-ape-speaking.
Serling avoided this by having the apes speak English and, of
course, there is some justification  for that by the end of the
film.  Justifying why the apes spoke English may have even been
the  inspiration for his surprise ending.  But Serling never
tackles the all-important question of why a  supposedly
intelligent human never shows any curiosity or even surprise that
the apes speak his  own language, a language they had no
opportunity to ever hear.  Few viewers questioned this  serious
plot hole, however, and the film has become well respected in
cinema history.  Partial  credit at least should go to Jerry
Goldsmith whose extremely inventive score is one of Goldsmith's
best if not his best.
When the film's success called for sequels, the filmmakers turned
up the violence and they added  well-intentioned, though not very
subtle, political messages about what was happening in the
United States of the 1960s and 1970s.  While the first film had a
little shooting of guns and what  was there seemed a little half-
hearted, by the second film, BENEATH THE PLANET OF THE  APES,
there was a good deal more violence and from that point on the
series had a lot of violence  and chases.  The series concluded
with BATTLE FOR THE PLANET OF THE APES in 1973.   Now director
Tim Burton tries his hand at adapting the original book again.
For those who thought that the 1968 version was not very faithful
to the book, Burton's new  version is even less faithful.  First,
he does not really reverse the roles of the humans and the apes.
He has them both be intelligent, articulate races battling for a
dominance of the planet currently in  the hands, uh, make that
paws, of the apes.  That could be a good story too, but it is not
PLANET  OF THE APES.  As with the MISSION IMPOSSIBLE films and so
many other cinematic  homages to the third quarter of the last
century, the title makes promises that the filmmakers have  no
intention of honoring.
In 2029 Leo Davidson (Mark Wahlberg, not this world's most
expressive actor) works on a space  station increasing the
intelligence and usefulness of apes.  Then a convenient time
storm sweeps  him up WIZARD-OF-OZ-fashion and drops him on an
alien planet.  (Yes, he survives this storm,  but then no storm
is perfect.)  He quickly finds, not greatly to any surprise he
shows, that on this  planet apes rule and humans drool, but
everybody talks.  And the language they talk is Earth- English.
Apparently it does not even occur to Leo that there is a mystery
that needs to be  explained about that.  The fact it does not
occur to Leo and apparently didn't occur to Tim Burton  either is
the heart of the real horror of this film.  Both just assumed
that if apes were going to talk  the language they would speak
would be English.  In any case having one talking race dominating
another makes this not a look at human-animal relationships and
more one of the master-slave  relationships.  Outside of Sudan
and a few other countries this is a less relevant topic.
Leo is captured to be used as a slave but also is discovered by
Ari, played by Helena Bonham  Carter.  Ari is an attractive ape
with close ties to high political power.  She is bent on making
the  world a better place.  Perhaps in a previous draft of the
script she was called Hil-Ari.  In any case  with makeup that
stifles her usual pout, Carter is just about as attractive as she
has ever been in a  film.  She may want to consider this to
become her standard look from this point forward.
It is not long before Leo escapes with some human and only a
couple of sympathetic apes.  This is  a further abandonment of
the source material.  The chase severely limits the interplay of
ape and  human and the examination of each's place in this
reversed society, each important in the book.   We cannot see how
the society works because most of the screentime society has
broken down.   We see the humans either separated from the apes
or fighting them.  Burton chooses visceral  thrills over cerebral
ones at almost every turn.  This is a miscalculation, as
characters so lacking in  empathy value are difficult ones to
place much emotional investment in.  They are basically chess
pieces and the viewer has little reason to root for them to win.
The 1968 script had little subtlety,  with lines like "I never
met an ape I didn't like," but at least we cared for what
happened to Taylor,  the main character.  Most of what this film
has to offer is in the visuals.
The visual work is spotty but generally nicely done except that
so much of the film takes place in  the night or in fog.  This
tends to limit close looks at the makeup.  In general it seems
much  improved from 1968.  The makeup team is led by Rick Baker
instead of John Chambers, who did  it for the 1968 version. In
1968 Chambers makeup was a jaw-dropper. It was realistic enough
to  almost be believable but flexible enough to show emotion.
Chambers is good, but if anyone had a  chance to best him it
would have to be Baker.  Today audiences have higher
expectations; Baker's  visualization is really an improvement.
These visuals work nicely.  What does not work is the  wire-
assisted leaps some of the apes make.  They look like they were
inspired by the physics- defying leaps of CROUCHING TIGER, HIDDEN
DRAGON.  Apes spring incredible distances.   Some of the best
scenes are apes running into battle looking like they have ape
posture, but when  they start flying through the air the effect
is lost.  One final visual problem is that the film  frequently
shows its budget in what should be spectacular battle scenes the
camera shows us only  a small group of people close-up.
Since the days of Lon Chaney and Boris Karloff few actors have
crossed over to stardom in a role  that required heavy make-up.
The one actor who has a shot is Paul Giamatti.  It is not that
his  lines are so good, most are silly jokes.  But he delivers
them very well.  He was always a  watchable actor, but has not
yet made stardom.  As the ape-trader Limbo he over-emotes to
overcome his ape make-up, but does it very well.  In doing so he
makes himself the most  interesting thing on the screen.  He is
probably the best thing in the film and conjures up memories  of
Peter Ustinov's performance in SPARTACUS.
As an in-joke there are several lines in the script borrowed from
the 1968 film and an old ape  played by Charleton Heston becomes
an allusion to the first film by itself.  Danny Elfman's score
has a nice primitive feel, but Jerry Goldsmith's 1968 tour de
force score is a real classic. That  score and the whole film
will be remembered when the 2001 film is forgotten.  I rate the
remake 4  on the 0 to 10 scale and a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Mighty, The (1998)
     Nobody expects very much of Max Cane (Eldon Henson) the son of a
man in prison for murder.  Max himself is learning impaired and is
spending his third year in the seventh grade.  Nature has not been kind
to Max who is big, mean-looking, and rather ugly.  Kids in school call
him Killer Cane, (perhaps an allusion to the Buck Rogers character;
there are other science fiction allusions).  A local hoodlum gang, The
Dog House Boys, are not sure if they want to pick on him or if they
want him to join their ranks.  Max's life is somewhat less than
satisfying, living with his dour grandparents (Harry Dean Stanton and
Gena Rowlands) and getting the knocks he does at school.  Then a new
boy moves in next door.  This is Kevin Dillon (Kieron Culkin) with a
sadly twisted body and a genuine intellect.  Kevin lives with his
mother Gwen (Sharon Stone) and does "kid-intellectual things" like
reading and playing with scientific toys.  A birth defect has left
Kevin with a bent spine and an inability to walk without his crutches.
Neither boy is much good at making friends, but Kevin immediately sees
that Max is almost a perfect complement to himself. Where he is
strongest, Max is weakest; where he is weakest, Max is strongest.  But
Max has no interest in being friends with his bookish neighbor and
Kevin has to bribe him with money to act as his legs.
     Max is a poor reader and is given Kevin for a reading tutor.
Kevin has Max read Sir James Knowles's LEGENDS OF KING ARTHUR AND HIS
KNIGHTS and uses it to inspire Max to read like no professional teacher
has been able to.  Max carries Kevin on his shoulders and together they
become one person whom, after the style of King Arthur, they dub Freak
the Mighty.  Then time and again their frame their friendship in
Arthurian terms, as if they are a knight in quest of adventure.
Together each is able to face up to his personal problems and either
overcome them or accept them.  While the film travels a predictable
course, it is a credible one.
     This is director Peter Chelsom's third film and he seems to do
something entirely different each time.  His HEAR MY SONG was likable
nostalgic comedy set in London and Ireland.  His second film FUNNY
BONES was a very dark and strange look into the world of the stand-up
comic mostly taking place in bleak Liverpool.  Now he tells the story
about friendship set in South Cincinnati.  Eldon Henson is a good
choice for Max and is certainly not the appealing sort of young actor
one generally sees in film.  On the other hand Kieron Culkin is
obviously a Culkin but one who is not so saccharine as his brother
Macaulay.  Sharon Stone is making the transition from glamorous actress
to character player skillfully.  One sees little of her previous
sensationalist roles in her Gwen.  Here she does a forty-ish mother
with real strength.  Max's grandparents are supposed to be as humorless
as the people in "American Gothic," but they are played by Harry Dean
Stanton and Gena Rowlands.  The one problem in that casting is that
Harry Dean Stanton has a hard time looking humorless.  Even when he is
trying to be serious there is always a twinkle in his eye.
     THE MIGHTY is a Canadian production with a screenplay by Charles
Leavitt, based on the novel FREAK THE MIGHTY by Rodman Philbrick.  It
is broken into chapters, like a book, and narrated by Max.  The score
is melodic with a strong Irish influence that seems a little out of
place with non-Irish characters and the Ohio setting.  John De Borman's
camera seems to see Cincinnati as a city of hard steel bridges and
concrete, just over the hill from the boys' homes.
     This is really not simply a children's film but a family film and
one that adults can enjoy.  It had very good word of mouth at the
Toronto International Film Festival (though it was not one of the films
I saw there) and deservedly so.  I rate it a 7 on the 0 to 10 scale and
a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Richard III (1995)
     I generally do not like to see historical dramatic works done in
modern dress.  I was excited when the Bayreuth production of Wagner's
RING OF THE NIBELUNGS was to be broadcast in this country, but when all
of the fantasy was sucked out by staging it in late 19th Century dress,
I decided that I was not really so anxious to see it after all.  It
seemed an attempt to replace the magic with social comment.  But in
this film, based on a popular London stage production, the modern
context is as much the show as the story.  We have a Britain in an age
to which we can relate brought under the control of a Fascist King.
Suddenly it is clear why modern dress (relatively speaking) can open up
and even transform the meaning of a story.  RICHARD III is told with
visual imagination and panache unusual for a 1930s film or a
Shakespeare play.  There are huge sets out of THE TRIUMPH OF THE WILL,
while other scenes have almost the flair of a Terry Gilliam.  The view
of 1930s England has a nicely accurate and detailed view even if this
is politically a very different 1930s England than the one we know from
history.
     Ian McKellen gives us a more immediate and riveting Richard than
the one we are used to from Laurence Olivier.  A bit more soft-spoken
than we usually think of for Richard, he nonetheless makes a chilling
and wonderfully vicious Fascist dictator.  Americans Annette Benning
and Robert Downey, Jr., at first may seem odd choices for Elizabeth and
her brother the Earl Rivers, but a 1930s King of England might well
have married an American and for once it might be perfectly reasonable
to cast Americans in Richard III.  The major roles are nearly all
played by familiar and respected British actors.  If Downey plays his
fey playboy a little too broadly there is the marvelous casting of
Adrian Dunbar, formerly cast as sweet and callow in HEAR MY SONG, here
as the amoral assassin Tyrell.
     Stylistically the film has some terrific moments, oozing period
feel.  Richard's political rally seems to come from somewhere between
Nazi Germany and Ruritania with its boar's head party symbol.  Great
art deco buildings, stylish royal residences and sterile hospital
hallways form the setting.  The battle scenes are unexpectedly violent
but also unrealistically brief.  Richard's army seems much too easily
beaten at the end of the film.  The final minute of the film is perhaps
the worst stylistic misstep of the film leaving the viewer with a
slightly bad taste in his mouth.  The only other real problem with the
style is that the invented setting is so compelling and has such a
powerful effect on the thrust of the film that the staging threatens to
overshadow even Shakespeare's writing.  Considering the wit of the
writing, that says a great deal.
     While I enjoyed the warm Tuscan feel of Kenneth Branagh's MUCH ADO
ABOUT NOTHING, it just never was as riveting this amazing production of
RICHARD III.  It may end a minority opinion but this exciting
adaptation was for me the better of the two films and I rate this film
a +3 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Johnny Handsome (1989)
     John Sedley is going to get a second chance at life.  Mickey Rourke
plays John Sedley, who was born with massive cranial deformities known as
"lionheadedness."  In spite of Sedley having a good mind, his life has been
a sequence of rejections, scrapes with the law, and foul-ups.  Most recently
he was involved in a heist in which two of his partners, Sunny Boyd and Rafe
Garrett (played by Ellen Barkin and Lance Henriksen), murdered John's best
friend, made off with the takings, and left John to take the rap.  Then as
an added stroke of viciousness they try to have him killed in prison.  But
the prison doctors want to give John a new name and a new.  much improved
face.  He can take his new life or he can go back to his old life.  His
surgeon thinks he will go for the new life; Drones, the cynical police
detective (played by Morgan Freeman) is convinced that John's unfinished
business will just be too strong an attraction.
     Want to know which he does?  Well, director Walter Hill is known for
violent action pictures such as 48 HOURS and RED HEAT.  Hill seems to
specialize in stories about particularly sadistic criminals and likes to
create killers for whom simple killing seems too light a punishment.  And
Boyd and Garrett are no exceptions.  Hill brings Rourke back to New Orleans,
the site of Rourke's popular ANGEL HEART, although the New Orleans
atmosphere is almost ignored in JOHNNY HANDSOME, indicating that Hill is
nowhere the stylist that Alan Parker, director of ANGEL HEART, is.  To
Hill's credit, however, he does get some atmosphere by subduing the color of
the film.  (In spite of what Ebert and Siskel say, a good stylist really can
create a bleaker feel in a scene with color than with monochrome.  It is
just easier to create a mood in monochrome.)
     JOHNNY HANDSOME does not have a particularly original plot.  Basically
the same story was told 53 years earlier in THE MAN WHO LIVED TWICE.  For
that matter, both are really at heart THE COUNT OF MONTE CRISTO.  But JOHNNY
HANDSOME is a better made film than most of Hill's other chase films.  The
mere fact that one particularly obnoxious woman in my audience irately
complained because it did not have the ending she expected indicates that
Hill is doing something right.  I give it a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Mighty Aphrodite (1995)
     MIGHTY APHRODITE is a strange title.  I guess the implication is
that love or at least sex is a powerful force in people's lives.  Or
perhaps that love conquers all.  But the title just does not seem to be
all that clever and in the final analysis it just does not work very
well.  That makes it perfect for one of Woody Allen's rare films that
is a nearly complete total misfire.  Admittedly, it is hard to be
totally objective about whether a film is funny or not, but from my
point of view the jokes fail one after another.  Perhaps part of the
problem is Allen's choosing the motif of the Greek drama complete with
chorus to comment on the action.  Somehow lampooning Greek choruses is
an exercise in futility.  It worked with Russian literature in LOVE AND
DEATH because he hit many different aspects of Russian literature and
make clear what he was kidding in each case.  Here it is one or two
jokes repeated over and over.  One joke is to have the chorus use
modern language and especially Yiddishisms.  The other is to have the
chorus sing modern music and it is a very similar gag.  Generally Greek
choruses just are not funny and it takes a great deal of skill to make
these jokes funny the first time they are used.  When Allen milks the
jokes by using them repeatedly, they fail him in a major way.
     The story told is of couple Lenny (Woody Allen) and Amanda (Helena
Bonham Carter) who are considering adopting a child.  Lenny is a
newspaper sportswriter and plays the role only a little less believably
than he played Jimmy Bond in CASINO ROYALE.  Posing him standing on a
basketball court cannot make the New York intellectual look or sound
like a sportswriter.  Suddenly the couple who have applied for a child
are given an opportunity to adopt if they decide to quick, quick,
quick.  (Is this really how the adoption process works?)  They go with
it and get what turns out to be a great child.  But Lenny is obsessed
with finding the child's real mother.  The agency has a rule against
giving out this information and, in fact, to do so would be breaking
the law.  But in an incredibly contrived scene Lenny gets the illegal
information.  Lenny tracks the woman down to find her to be hooker and
porno actress, Linda (Mira Sorvino).  Linda has a winning personality,
a losing intellect, and an irritating voice.  Getting interested in the
woman's life, Lenny tries to arrange a marriage for her with a boxer,
Kevin (Michael Rapaport), and to bury the feelings he is starting to
have for her.
     The jokes in this film are not just unfunny, some verge on mean-
spirited.  Among the subject for jest are about how stupid Linda and
Kevin are.  Kevin has to ask to find out which is his right fist and
which is the left.  It is not very likely and even less funny.  One of
the hallmarks of a Woody Allen script is the clever dialogue.  Here the
dialogue comes off as neither believable nor witty.  And it is given
too important a place.  Scenes that would have major dramatic impact
take place off-screen.  Prostitute Linda is freed of her entire
unwanted commitment to her pimp, but we never see her reaction when she
is told.  A later major scene between Kevin and Linda we are told about
but do not see.  Instead these scenes appear to have been eliminated to
allow room for "witty" dialogue scenes that do not advance the plot and
eventually drag.
     The strain of writing, directing, and starring in a film, as he
does here, is starting to show on Allen.  Each task is executed with
unexpected mediocrity here.  Allen does absolutely nothing to
distinguish his current character from the one he played in previous
films like MANHATTAN MURDER MYSTERY.  Helena Bonham Carter's role is
fairly colorless and is a departure for her only in that she is not
playing an indignant, pouty aristocrat.  Mira Sorvino wins the film on
points alone.  Her likable prostitute, with the Liza Doolittle
propensity for saying the unintentionally shocking, steals the show.
Ordinarily, stealing a Woody Allen film is a major distinction.  With
MIGHTY APHRODITE it seems hardly worth the effort.  Hopefully Allen
will be back on form next film.  This one gets an amazing -1 on the -4
to +4 scale.

Title
Review for God Said 'Ha!' (1998)
     CAPSULE: This is a one-woman show.  Julia Sweeney (who played the
androgynous Pat on Saturday Night Live) relives the humor and horror of
having her brother and parents move in with her just before her brother
was diagnosed with lymph cancer.  Not all of the humor works and some
of the telling style seems a little artificial.  But most seems sincere
and is frequently moving.  Rating: 6 (0 to 10), 1 (-4 to +4)
   - Sweeney got a divorce and a house by herself when her brother was
     diagnosed to be in the last phase of lymph cancer.  He moves in
     with her and so do her parents.  This would have been a trying
     time in anybody's life.  Her humor concerns jokes made about her
     parents, her brother, her attempts to date, and generally how her
     life was going.  Some moments are very funny, some touching, some
     not quite on the mark.
   - Performance in the style of Spaulding Gray's SWIMMING TO CAMBODIA
     and MONSTER IN A BOX.
   - The show seems sort of artificial in some ways.  After a
     particularly trying moment the lights change and she turns her
     back to the audience and gets a glass of water.  It is as if the
     emotion has all been orchestrated.  Of course this is really a
     performance of a stage play that she had enacted hundreds of times
     before this version was filmed.  It has to have a different
     emotional impact once it has been performed on the stage for
     years.  Still parts do still pack a wallop.
   - One wonders how much the stories have been embellished.
   - Balancing her love life and her parents living in while taking
     care of her brother.
   - Certainly some of the hardest moments she will face in her life.
   - Sweeney does have a nice self-assured style.

Title
Review for Playing by Heart (1998)
     "Talking about love is like dancing about architecture."  That one
line is probably the cleverest thing about PLAYING BY HEART and will
probably be remembered as a trivia question long after the rest of the
film is forgotten.  (Actually the quote is a variation on the aphorism
that talking about music is like dancing about architecture which has
been variously attributed to Frank Zappa, Laurie Anderson, Thelonious
Monk, and Steve Martin.)  Yet, knowing the futility of talking about
love, yet knowing that futility the film still attempts to tell a
series of stories about love, all cut together.
     In PLAYING BY HEART we have the story of Joan (Angelina Jolie)
whose intended new lover Keenan (Ryan Phillippe) is totally
uninterested in relating to another person.  Gillian Anderson of THE
Stewart) who would like to start a relationship with her.  Gracie
(Madeleine Stowe) and Roger (Anthony Edwards) have a great time
together and are married, but not to each other.  Mildred (Ellen
Burstyn) and Mark (Jay Mohr) are mother and son talking one last time
before Mark dies of AIDS.  Hugh (Dennis Quaid) is looking to form a
relationship with anybody, female or male, as long as he can build the
relationship on a lie.  Finally and perhaps best, there are Hannah
(Gina Rowlands) and fatally ill Paul (Sean Connery) who after a long
marriage want to reaffirm their vows, and just now Hannah has
discovered that early in their marriage, Paul loved another woman. Six
stories about six relationships, working and failing.
     As he tells these stories Willard Carroll is doing something
behind the curtain that the viewer comes to suspect early on, but is
not actually confirmed until late in the film.  By the time it becomes
clear what the script has done, it is probably too late to pick up all
the details, at least on the first viewing.  Like THE USUAL SUSPECTS,
one probably has to see the film twice to pick up on some of the
subtleties.
     Sean Connery's character Paul is dying yet even he does not have
the vulnerability of Ellen Burstyn's Mildred who has to cope with the
death of her son.  It may be that having to deal with the death of a
loved one is harder than dying oneself or it may be just that Burstyn
is an actor who can reach from the screen and tear at a viewer's
heartstrings.  Paul Newman was approached for the part of Paul.  In
fact, he seems to fit the role better than Connery.  It was probably
written with Newman in mind.  It may say something about acting styles,
but ten hours after having seen this film one still cares about the
Burstyn, Connery, and Rowlands characters.  Speaking for myself I can
picture the younger characters, but I do not really care a whole lot
for what happens to them and their relationships.  Burstyn can whimper
more powerfully than Angelina Jolie can shout.  Perhaps the problem is
that there are too many characters to cover the material more than
superficially.  Carroll is satisfied to just give us a feel for the
personality of the characters.  The veteran actors know how to make the
most of their time.
     In 1998 Willard Carroll wrote and directed PLAYING BY HEART as
well as TOM'S MIDNIGHT GARDEN.  Before this year Carroll has not has
not directed since his debut in 1990 with a somewhat under-appreciated
horror film, THE RUNESTONE.  If PLAYING BY HEART is no worse then THE
RUNESTONE, it is really little more accomplished.  I would give it a 6
on the 0 to 10 scale and a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.  Of some
tangential interest is the fact that the MPAA in a bizarre ruling
rejected the shooting title of this film DANCING ABOUT ARCHITECTURE as
being too similar to the current DANCING AT LUGHNASA.  It is hard to
imagine the two being confused.

Title
Review for Time to Kill, A (1996)
     John Grisham's first novel is also (reportedly) his most serious.
It makes his most interesting film adaptation to date.  That is in
large part because it is a serious story, looking at racial tension
rather than being a throwaway thriller.  It makes the most satisfying
of his films, if slightly over-polished and simplistic.  Rather than
telling one complex story, it jumps around showing a broad collection
of characters, few of whom get much development but many of whom get
nice rounded stories that reach conclusions.  None of the individual
subplots is very original or interesting, but the total is more than
the some of its parts.  Like a narrative mural we get a large picture
made of many smaller stories of what happens during a trial and the
resulting clash of townspeople at both ends of the political spectrum.
     The setting is Canton, Mississippi, with its mix of small town and
rural people.  As the film opens we see two white men in their early
twenties looking for trouble and finding it by raping and very nearly
murdering a ten-year-old black girl.  Unexpectedly, the girl lives and
within hours the two men are behind bars.  But the girl's father, Carl
Lee Hailey (played by Samuel L. Jackson) is filled with rage and fear
of the very real possibility that the men could end up not being
punished for their crime.  In a rage he hides himself in the town
courthouse and the next morning as the men are being walked through he
takes justice into his own hands and guns down the two men,
accidentally also crippling a deputy escorting the men.  For his
defense he chooses a local white lawyer and acquaintance Jake Brigance
(Matthew McConaughey), to whom Hailey had hinted the day before that he
might be planning to murder the rapists.  Brigance decides to use
defense of temporary insanity, though it is relatively obvious that the
killing was an angry act of revenge but not insanity.  Through Brigance
we meet his daughter and his wife (Ashley Judd) who is reluctant to
have her husband take the emotionally-charged case.  We also meet
Brigance's old law professor (Donald Sutherland), now disbarred and
enjoying a drunken retirement.  Kevin Spacey plays an ambitious and
tricky prosecutor wanting to ride the case to bigger things, and
Patrick McGoohan plays the aptly-named Judge Noose.  Most unlikely
seeming, is the arrival of a brilliant, attractive law student, Ellen
Roark (Sandra Bullock) anxious to bull her way onto the defense team
with an impressive arsenal of legal knowledge.  But the trial also
beings a revival of the dormant Ku Klux Klan threatening everybody on
the defense team.
     Director Joel Schumacher's strong suit has us usually been setting
and mood.  This was certainly the case with his brooding Gothic medical
school in FLATLINERS and his oversized but under-thought BATMAN
FOREVER.  His Mississippi town is less exaggerated, but little details
seem to be intentionally carried a bit too far. Housewife Ashley Judd
looks to be laminated in sweat, as if she was sprayed with Pam, but
only from the neck down and no other character is sweating nearly so
profusely.  As the Klan walks into town a plate glass window reflects
them as three times their height--Schumacher's visual sense often plays
with size--and far more intimidating than they actually are.  Peter
Menzies, Jr., gives the film's photography a somewhat more subdued feel
than previous Schumacher films, but the director's style is still
there.
     A TIME TO KILL has been compared to Robert Mulligan's TO KILL A
MOCKINGBIRD and naturally it falls considerably short of that film.
But the two films are related only in subject matter.  I would be more
likely to compare A TIME TO KILL to Spike Lee's DO THE RIGHT THING in
its breadth rather than depth view of the people affected by the trial.
This film is really not moving and perhaps not even greatly intelligent
in the way that TO KILL A MOCKINGBIRD was, but it gives a feel for
Southern politics and law better than other Grisham films and it tells
its story engrossingly.  I give it a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Lan feng zheng (1993)
     Encouraged        by a government        policy anxious to root out its own problems,
Tietou's father        is willing to discuss with friends what        things needed
change.         When this Hundred Flowers policy is replaced by a government stance
more paranoid, local officials turn viciously on Tietou's family.
Repeatedly we see people's loyalty to the government betrayed.        The country
is so anxious to root out supposed traitors that they give the weapon of
political ostracism to anybody who finds it convenient to use it.  In one
chilling sequence schoolboys are tired of school so they accuse        their
teacher        of being a counter-revolutionary and have her humiliated and dragged
away.  It takes        little to be accused of        being disloyal and once        accused
there is little        chance of being        vindicated.
     The film is 139 minutes long and follows Chen Shujuan, Tietou's mother,
through        three marriages        and many life experiences, mostly ending in misery
either because of the system's inadequacies, and its political paranoia.

Title
Review for Firm, The (1993)
     When I was in the Galapagos I was on a boat of about a hundred people
and I was reading the newly published HUNT FOR RED OCTOBER.  I noticed that
about four other people were reading the same novel at the same time.  Out
of a population of a hundred people that is a surprisingly high percentage
of people reading the same novel.  That sort of popularity rarely happens
unless there is a film imminent.  (I saw a lot of people reading JURASSIC
PARK just before the film came out, but that film had a lot of hype.)  The
only other book I remember seeing that so many people seemed to be reading
at once was John Grisham's novel FIRM.  Now nuclear-powered submarines and
Cold War warfare is a subject with natural appeal, but the story of a yuppie
lawyer and a law firm does not have the same trappings to entice people so I
guessed it must be a pretty good thriller.  Now THE FIRM, like THE HUNT FOR
RED OCTOBER, has made it to the screen.
     There is an old rule of business that a deal that sounds too good to be
true probably is.  That is what young lawyer Mitch McDeere (played by Tom
Cruise) and his wife Abby (played by Jeanne Tripplehorn) discover when Mitch
is choosing a firm for employment.  One company in Memphis offers Mitch a
package that sounds too sweet to turn down.  His salary will be 20% higher
than the next best offer, and he gets a beautiful home and a free Mercedes.
The company just force-feeds Mitch one Perquisite after another.  Bendini,
Lambert, and Locke is just one big family, Mitch is told, but Abby balks
when she sees how strongly the firm wants to run both Mitch's life and her
own.  And there have been some mysterious deaths of young lawyers at the new
company.  Then there are two mysterious strangers who are not with the firm
but seem to know a little too much about the company and about Mitch.  And,
like the law firm, they too seem to have targeted Matich for something
unknown to him.  Mitch is a clever lawyer but he will need all his skill
just to stay alive when he is caught between his own unscrupulous law firm
and the government.
     What made people want to read the book is the question, "What is
*really* going on?"  The same question will probably intrigue movie
audiences, but the answer is disappointingly prosaic.  In the book the
answer makes some sense, but there were major revisions in the film and it
does not make quite as much sense.  (More on this in a heavy spoiler at the
end of the review.  Don't worry; I will flag it.)
     This is a long film--more than two and a half hours long--and it feels
like a long film, mostly because it is tightly packed with a lot happening
throughout.  But it is still a carefully crafted thriller.  Much of the cost
of the production had to be in the casting.  This film has a powerhouse
cast.  Cruise is, of course, box-office gold and just recently played a
lawyer in A FEW GOOD MEN.  His skills are improving with time until he is a
respectable actor now, though his range is limited.  Tripplehorn also gets
some chance to take part in the action and is adequate.  But the two leads
are not the most interesting casting.  For members if the sinister law firm,
David Rubin cast people who have generally played gentle, nice-guy roles,
people of some integrity, the sort of actors who are chosen to do voice-
overs for commercials.  We have Gene Hackman, Hal Holbrook, and Wilford
Brimley--people you naturally feel are friendly.  It makes them seem all the
more sinister when their real natures are covered with this air of pleasant
control.  Then you have the grungies, the people who have less gentility and
who cannot get away with it when they break the law.  Here we have Gary
Busey and a character actor I have been pointing out for years, David
Strathairn.  And cast against type is Holly Hunter, playing a gum-chewing
tartish secretary.  Playing government agents are Ed Harris (who plays
straight arrows occasionally with sinister sides, as he did in UNDER FIRE),
and Stephen Hill (who headed the IMF in the first season of MISSION
IMPOSSIBLE).
     THE FIRM is a thriller that does not cover tremendously new territory,
nor does it have a lot of substance, but it is well made and exciting.  And
its thrills come from human interactions, not from explosions or martial
arts or car chases.  I give it a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     First, I cannot claim actually to have read the book.  This comment is
based on a three-hour abridgement on audio tape.  But in the book, the
reason the firm could make such generous offers was that it actually was the
Mafia.  They desperately needed the best lawyers they could get and were
willing to spend whatever it took to get them.  When Mitch decided to betray
the firm, he was going head-to-head with the Mafia.  It seems to me that the
novel glosses over the question of how you can be a Mafia lawyer without
realizing that your clients are all in the syndicate, but perhaps that is
possible.
     In the film, Bendini, Lambert, and Locke is not the Mafia, though it
does work for them.  This introduces a logical problem.  There is nothing
intrinsically against the law about being the legal counsel for the Mafia.
In fact, the Constitution guarantees even the Mafia the right to legal
counsel.  So then what really is the nature of Bendini, Lambert, and Locke's
villainy in the film>  They try to control their staff's lives to the point
of killing them when they want to leave.  And they overbill by about 25% in
the example we see.  Both actions probably help the bottom line.  And they
probably do some illegal work for their clients.  But none of this seems
profitable enough to explain their very bizarre way of doing business.  By
making Bendini, Lambert, and Locke the villain rather than the Mafia, there
is more that is left unexplained.

Title
Review for Thelma & Louise (1991)
     Thelma and Louise have had it.  Thelma (played by Geena Davis) is
something somewhere between a housewife and a household appliance.  Her
husband bullies her, cheats on her, and treats her like dirt.  Louise has it
a little better as an unmarried waitress with a foul-tempered boyfriend.
The two of them want just to get away for a weekend and do a little fishing.
Then, after an evening in a bar, Thelma is almost raped and Louise has shot
the rapist.  Suddenly the two are on the run from the law, a situation they
find both exhilarating and terrifying.  Thelma has never been allowed to
think for herself.  Now that she is free and thinking, it is not surprising
that her decisions are not very well thought-out and generally get the two
deeper into trouble.  In a sense this is a coming-of-age film about Thelma.
     At least superficially, this is a story that has been done many times
before.  The sympathetic characters start with a little fun, enrage the law,
and eventually are being chased by regiments of law enforcement officers.
Yes, the film does have car chases and hair-breadth escapes and the usual
scenes of police cars cork-screwing through the air and crashing.  Take away
the subtext and you have a very cliched film.  The subtext, however, makes
this a very strong little propaganda film.  There are a lot of men in this
film and only one man is decent and another is decent when he is not having
a temper tantrum.  Jimmy, Louise's boyfriend, does prove to have redeeming
features.  And Hal, the policeman tracking Thelma and Louise, manages to
understand every wall of the box the two of them are in.  Hall is more
interested in saving the two from harm than he is in catching them.  If this
film has a hero, it is Hal.  But every hunk Thelma tries to pick up only
makes things worse.  Truck drivers on the road are sexist pigs.  And
Thelma's husband Daryl is a real piece of work.
     Ridley Scott's direction is good in the human interaction scenes if
rather cliched in the action scenes.  The photography of the great Southwest
is certainly visually stunning.  Still, the film's message about feminism
and, in general, freedom comes on a little strong.  While the rapist
certainly has none of the audience's sympathy, killing him seems
unnecessary.  We want to see his attitudes and behavior punished, but like
Louise, we have strong second thoughts as to whether his crimes deserve the
death penalty.
     In any case, this may be one of the most intelligent cross-country
chase films.  I give it a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Golem, Le (1936)
     To start with, what is a golem?  It is a statue that has been brought
to life by mystical means.  The Bible claims that God created man by
bringing the dust of the earth together and breathing life into it.  Legend
has it that God can be invoked to do it again by special Ceremonies, though
the formula is imperfect and the resulting Artificial human will lackthe
power of speech.  FRANKENSTEIN was inspired by golem legends.  The most
famous golem story is of the Golem of Prague, brought to life to protect the
Jewish community.  Films about golems are unusual though there had been two
made in Germany previously starring Paul Wegener.  One of them is a lost
film, but the other is considered a classic.  Since that film was made a
tide of anti-Semitism had risen in Germany.  In 1935 the Nuremburg Laws
institutionalizing German state anti-Semitism.  About the same time afilm,
a French and Czech co-production, was being made with veiled anti-German and
not so veiled pro-Jewish sentiments, THE GOLEM.  The film has interest as a
political document as well as a fantasy film.  For many years this has been
a rare film, but this year it is starting to become available on videotape.
     The time is the 17th Century in Prague.  Rabbi Loew, who createdthe
Golem is dead, but Rudolf II is still emperor.  The troubled Jewish
community is now led by the young Rabbi Jacob, student and friend of the
late Rabbi Loew.  Rudolf's tolerance of the Jewish community has lasted
about as long as the life of Loew.  Now he is reinstituting persecution
albeit warily.  His dreams are still troubled with visitations of theGolem
and he will not rest easy until he possesses it and is sure the Jews cannot
reanimate it.  He is willing to torture and kill to get his hands on the
magical statue.  All his attempts to confiscate it fail until one night it
just appears in his palace, still stone-like and inanimate.  With theGolem
under his thumb, the Rudolf safely returns to persecution.
     Except for the metaphor of its politics, and perhaps not even that at
the time, this is not a film of extreme subtlety.  The filmmakers were
primarily interested in getting their idea across.  The feeding of Jews to
lions is probably anachronistic, but it is an image that the audiences could
probably find meaningful.  The writers obviously felt very strongly about
the film's message and was neither shy nor particularly subtle about
expressing that message.  When somebody tries to warn the Jews "Your
brothers are in the hands of murderers" it is clear that the message is
meant for more than the characters in the film.  When the Emperor calls
himself a friend of Jews while torturing one the analogy may break down
slightly--at least the Nazis admitted their motives toward the Jews--but
still it is clear that it is another dig at the Third Reich.  The burning of
the Jewish ghetto also seems to be a very contemporary image in the film.
The motto of the film, often repeated, is "revolt is the right of a slave."
The French filmmakers do not say the French will come to the Jews' aid if
they revolt, but it definitely affirms their right.
     Julien Duvivier directed the film as a somewhat fancy costume drama,
perhaps to attract a wider audience in the bleak days of the late thirties
in Europe.  In a golem film, of course one of the main considerationsis the
design of the Golem itself.  Ferdinand Hart is perhaps one of the least
imaginative visualizations.  It looks more or less like a statue of alarge
bald man.  The reasons for toning down the horrific aspect of the Golem are
again likely to be political.  If the film is supposed to instill a sense of
solidarity with the Jews, it would not make sense to have them be the
creators of monsters.  The script then seems intentionally to build suspense
about the appearance of the Golem.  He is not shown on-screen until well
into the plot and only at the end of a suspenseful sequence of a nighttime
walk through the big empty palace.  Disorientation and insecurity on the
part of the emperor are often created with a tilted camera.
     Harry Baur as the emperor is goggle-eyed and insecure.  He was at the
time a familiar actor, I believe.  Charles Dorat as Rabbi Jacob is young and
handsome but his performance is not particularly inspired.  Finally there is
Ferdinand Hart in the title role as the mystical statue.  What can you say
about a role that for most of the film requires you to stand absolutely
still, then in the inevitable climax for this sort of film suddenly in the
final reel turns into Machiste.  The role requires more broad shoulders than
depth.
     I would say that the film is less a work of art and more a piecewith
some entertainment and an artifact of a dramatic period of history.
Nevertheless, as someone with a particular interest in golem legends I am
very pleased to see this particular film, usually only available at campus
showings, now on videotape.

Title
Review for Immortal Beloved (1994)
     Well, to start with, there probably were three major amors in
Beethoven's life.  And one really was Giulietta Guicciardi; so far the
filmmakers got that one right.  The other two women were Giulietta's
cousin Josephine von Brunsvik, to whom he proposed, and Therese
Malfatti, the daughter of one of Beethoven's doctors.  The film did
show Josephine as a minor diversion and ignored Malfatti altogether.
This is a rough biography of Ludwig Van Beethoven that takes some
liberties to add some suspense.
     There genuinely is a historical mystery, of course.  After
Beethoven's death three letters were found addressed to someone he
called "Immortal Beloved."  It is possible they were just a writing
exercise, though the fact they range from poetic prose to complaints
about his health and his discomfort makes that unlikely.  If they were
to a real person, nobody ever found out to whom the letters were
addressed.  The film suggests that Beethoven (here played by Gary
Oldman), kept this love a secret, then illogically left a bequest to
his "Immortal Beloved" without ever naming the intended recipient.
Anton Schindler, a friend (played by Jeroen Krabbe) sets out, to solve
the mystery. (The real Anton Schindler apparently was a junior
acquaintance of the composer.  Beethoven was born in 1770 and Schindler
was the author of BIOGRAPHIE VON LUDWIG VAN BEETHOVEN--English title:
BEETHOVEN AS I KNEW HIM--in 1860, some thirty-three years after
Beethoven died.  But Schindler might well have looked for the
mysterious love, so to set up this mystery/biography is really not too
much of a conceit.  Though it is a bit absurd to assume that the
composer would on one hand be so secretive about this love and on the
other hand virtually to force this investigation by leaving her his
fortune.  And, of course, as with AMADEUS, any conclusions the film
draws are purely speculation and should be considered as such.
     The film opens with Oldman living up to his name and near death.
(He looked much the same early in BRAM STOKER'S DRACULA, but there he
was near death just on the other side.)  Schindler finds the will and
sets out with a list of leads to try to discover who this Immortal
Beloved is.  The structure is like that of CITIZEN KANE and as with
CITIZEN KANE the story of the life is revealed as a mosaic of
flashbacks and here even flashbacks-within-flashbacks, mostly covering
the period from the onset of his deafness to his death.  First
Schindler visits the now-aging Countess Giulietta Guicciardi (Valeria
Golino), whom Beethoven forcefully makes his pupil.  She falls in love
with him and wants to marry him, but she and her father discover a
secret about Beethoven that he cannot bear them to know.  The trail
then leads to Anna Marie Erdody (Isabella Rossellini), a Hungarian
noble who continues the story, and so forth.  Much of the film
concentrates on either on his women, his deafness, or his cruel battle
for custody and control of his nephew.
     Gary Oldman is one of the best and most versatile actors in film
today.  He gives us a very watchable impression of a great genius in
constant struggle with himself and with his own personal demons.
Krabbe's role is less demanding, calling for him to be little more than
a good listener in period clothing.  Galino and Rossellini are winning
but are upstaged by the intensity of Oldman's performance.  In fact the
only other strong performance is by Johanna Ter Steege as the sister-
in-law who fights Beethoven for custody of her own son.  Direction is
by Bernard Rose, director of the off-beat fantasy PAPERHOUSE and of the
horror film CANDYMAN.
     "It is the power of music to carry one into the mental state of
the composer," according to Beethoven.  And Rose seemingly uses this as
the inspiration to score the film with whatever music Beethoven is
composing at each point in time.  Whether he was entirely accurate is
unclear, but he does seem to  proceed though the symphonies in
chronological order.  This means, of course, that the filmmakers get a
glorious, evocative orchestral score simply by making selections.  And
certainly one cannot deny the power of scenes like Napoleon's shelling
Vienna to the strains of the first movement of the Fifth Symphony in
pure digital sound.
     The fragmentation of the narration, using the patchwork narrative
form, and bogging down of the story into a custody battle tend to rob
IMMORTAL BELOVED of some of its power, but the music on a really good
sound system and the crafty proposed solution to the central mystery
make this one of the better musical biographies.  Rating high +1 on the
-4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Tin Cup (1996)
     Voltaire said "Le mieux est l'ennemi du bien."  Literally it means
"the best is the enemy of the good." That is just what has kept Roy
"Tin Cup" McAvoy (Kevin Costner) from being a top ranking golfer.  He
has to try for the best shot, the dangerous one rather than looking not
quite so good.  He usually misses it, but at least he tried for the
shot that everybody would remember.  So instead of a well-known golf
pro, he runs a second-rate driving range in Salome, Texas.  It is not a
great living but in a tiny West Texas town like Salome, where the
armadillos outnumber the golfers by hundreds to one, it is amazing he
can even survive.  Even stranger is that the small town supports a
psychiatrist, Dr. Molly Griswold (Rene Russo) and that each has never
heard of the other until Griswold shows up a the driving range wanting
lessons.  McAvoy is attracted to Griswold but she is already attached
to someone.  The plot thickens when an old friend, now a rival and a
top golf pro, David Simms (Don Johnson) turns up and wants McAvoy to
caddie for him in a golf tourney.  Needing the money McAvoy takes the
job, but get himself fired in a grandstand play when Simms goes for a
conservative shot at the tourney.  McAvoy decides to go for another big
one and make a play for Griswold, only to find out her boyfriend is
Simms.  From there you could plot out the rest of the film and with
only a small surprise here and there you would probably be right.
(Think of it as ROCKY with a different sport and cast with prettier-
looking actors.)
     What makes TIN CUP watchable are the characters and the dialog.
These are bright people and their small talk as the plot plays itself
out is more of interest than the plot itself.  McAvoy and Griswold are
likable people as are the circle of people who orbit around them.
First and foremost of the friends is Romeo Posar, as the most
interesting an amiable character  that Cheech Marin has ever played.
The role was likely written for someone of a milder character to have a
little fun hamming it up.  Instead Marin plays the role as restrained
as anybody he has ever played, so that is not the comic bits that
surprise us but the moments of warmth and sincerity.  Another close
friend is a stripper and ex-girlfriend to whom McAvoy owes money.
Making her a stripper seems like it was a calculated move.  At 42 Ms.
Russo probably prefers to show considerably less flesh than say, Susan
Sarandon did in a previous film by director Ron Shelton, BULL DURHAM.
The story asks if this old, but still talented, failure McAvoy can make
something of himself on the golfing advice of his caddie and the pop
psychology of his girlfriend without alienating either too much.
     Ron Shelton's films seem to be falling into a pattern of sports, a
bit of sex, a large dollop of comedy, some well-drawn characters, and
good dialog.  His films are thin on plot and give the audience little
to chew on after the film is over, but they are audience pleasers and
at least the audience when I saw the film were applauding at times.
Considering that golf is a gave that even its most ardent fans usually
give only polite hand-clapping, getting a film audience so involved in
a golf film is no small feat.   With the exceptions of Costner's slight
grunge edge, the characters are pretty and pretty bland.  Johnson
actually is the most believable as the blandest of all.  I think that
the film also sported some golf champions who would have been familiar
to some of the audience, though I would not have recognized them if
they were two feet away.  Some familiar brand names also show up on
things like golf caps and even a blimp and they  too are playing
themselves.
     TIN CUP will not leave you with much to think about other than a
person's reach should exceed his grasp.  This is a pleasant enough
throwaway film you will not remember in the fall.  Rate it a +1 on the
-4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Talented Mr. Ripley, The (1999)
     For me one of Alfred Hitchcock's best films is DIAL M FOR MURDER.
It is a stage play barely adapted for film, but it is a very good stage
play.  We have in it a murderer who is a formidable force.  His talent
is not that he strong or fast.  He does not come popping out at
anybody.  He does not outrun anyone.  His skill is that he thinks very
well on his feet.  You can actually just see him thinking out
possibilities and almost unerringly find the right one.  Once he makes
a decision he stays with it.  He never seems troubled by uncertainty.
THE TALENTED MR. RIPLEY is about a very similar sort of criminal
genius.  Quite a bit younger, but no less mentally agile is Tom Ripley
(played by Matt Damon).
     It is 1958.  Tom Ripley is, to use his words, "a real nobody," a
bathroom attendant and sometime piano player.  But he is good a mimicry
and at forging signatures.  He decides that it is better to be a fake
somebody than a real nobody.  When he comes in contact with the
Greenleaf family, wealthy from shipping, he passes himself off as a
friend from Princeton of Dickie Greenleaf (Jude Law), currently in
Italy.  He is treated like one of the family for a while, and Dickie's
father Herbert Greenleaf (James Rebhorn) has a proposition for Tom.  He
will pay Tom $1000 to go to Italy and convince Dickie to give up his
playboy ways and return home.  Tom goes, meeting Meredith Logue (Cate
Blanchett) along the way.  In Italy Tom arranges a meeting and
befriends Dickie and his fiance Marge Sherwood (Gwyneth Paltrow).  All
the while he is putting together plans to kill Dickie and, where
necessary for his plan, take his place.  Director Anthony Minghella's
screenplay begins with this setup and brings the characters together
and then lets them simmer together in the warm Italian sun for nearly
an hour, choosing the leisurely pace of a good Agatha Christie film.
The tempo is slow and thrills are cerebral, but we do get to meet and
understand the characters and it pays off in the second half of the
film.  We see that in more than one sense that Ripley is expert in
playing people.  His one failure is to fool the unctuous Freddie Miles
(Philip Seymour Hoffman), an old friend of Dickie.  Freddie takes an
immediate dislike to Tom, complicating the plan.  Eventually there is a
murder and Ripley has to be both himself and Dickie Greenleaf for a
while.  He is walking a tightrope and must remember with each person
what version of reality he is trying to project.  And as the film
progresses his step must become ever more careful.
     The roles must have seemed like a little bit of dj vu for the two
male leads.  Damon played the genius of lower class origins in GOOD
WILL HUNTING.  Jude Law played the aristocrat whose very identity is
borrowed by someone else in GATTACA.  In any case Law seems very much
at home in his roll as the young jazz-loving jet setter.  Damon seems
sufficiently controlled.  Paltrow is regal.  Special mention should be
made of one of the bit parts.
     One of the ever more familiar faces showing up in films is Philip
Baker Hall who in here has a small but important roll as an American
lawyer.  Hall, in his late 60s, is able to project an absolute
authenticity of authority and at the same time a magnetism of a person
in a position of power.  Anyone who has seen the film HARD EIGHT was
mesmerized by his performance from the very first scene.  He has been
in films since the early 1970s, but probably because of his performance
in HARD EIGHT he is showing up in a lot of major films.
     The plot of THE TALENTED MR. RIPLEY does not take a whole lot of
thought before contrivances become apparent.  But under the influence
of the warm Italian sun, the audience is lulled into going along with
it and even being thrilled as Ripley gets himself into and out of minor
scrapes in his amoral attempts to steal a life.  I give the film a 6 on
the 0 to 10 scale and a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Europa (1991)
          Capsule review:  A weird and hypnotic film, but
     ultimately a disappointment.  The viewer is apparently
     hypnotized and regressed to be a German-American in Germany
     shortly after WWII.  He becomes a train conductor pulled into
     the conflict of the Americans against the anti-American
     resistance.  Rating: high 0 (-4 to +4).
     You are being hypnotized and regressed to an earlier existence.  The
hypnotist puts you to sleep and makes you live the life of an American of
German descent who went to Germany a few months after World War II ended to
become a sleeping car conductor.  You are under the supervision of a stern
uncle whom you have just met, and he pushes you through a Kafkaesque world
that places impossible demands on you, all to meet the incredibly high
standards of being a sleeping car conductor on the Zentropa train line.  But
this is only the beginning.  You are about to be drawn into an intrigue that
pits the Americans occupying Germany against werewolves--the secret German
resistance against the occupation.
     ZENTROPA is a complex and confusing film, very heavy on style.
Sometimes it is dense with ideas, sometimes totally incomprehensible.  It is
filmed mostly in black and white with selective use of color.  Some scenes
are all black and white, some are all color, some have only the foreground
in color.  Sometimes just one object will be in color like in a Nuprin ad.
The black-and-white photography is usually crisp and sharp, with some
amazing images.  One of the best is a train speeding through a tunnel seen
from a few feet ahead with the smoke forming a streaming "hair-do" over the
top of the train.
     ZENTROPA (original title: EUROPA) is Danish director Lars Van Triers's
strange look at Germany after war.  Parts of the world seem as if they could
never have been.  The Zentropa Railroad is a world out of BRAZIL crossed
with Kafka in which the individual is beaten into submission by the system.
In the film's one obvious joke, our main character has just had to pay for
his uniform--which nevertheless belongs to the company--and several other
expenses he must pay in order to start work on the railroad.  "I now
understand German unemployment," he says.  "Nobody can afford to work."
     Ultimately ZENTROPA is a muddled thriller that only partly makes sense.
The viewer is never certain if the historical detail has any validity or is
being made up from the whole cloth.  There are certainly moments of tension,
but more of confusion.  It won the Jury Prize at the Cannes Film festival of
1991, but lost out to BARTON FINK for the Golden Palm, at which Van Trier
reportedly was extremely indignant.  Stylistically it is an achievement, but
the viewer will have to decide if it is really is an entertainment
experience.  For me it had all the elements to work but a few logical
questions left unanswered.  For that I rate it a high 0 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for She-Devil (1989)
     Last Tuesday and Wednesday night I watched the television adaptation of
Fay Weldon's novel THE LIFE AND LOVES OF A SHE-DEVIL.  Friday I saw Susan
Seidelman's version of the same story for Orion Pictures.  The television
version took its title directly from the novel; the film version abbreviated
the title to just SHE-DEVIL, perhaps causing some confusion with the 1950s
science fiction movie of the same title.  Having seen the two versions so
close together and with the television version being about two and a half
times as long, I will disqualify myself from actually reviewing SHE-DEVIL
and just discuss the contrasts in the two versions.  The film is a very
pale, very weak, and almost entirely forgettable rendition of the same
story.  Even now, an hour after having seen the film, the television version
is more immediately memorable.  Let me say why.
     First, the television play had drama, comedy, and horror story mixed
together into whatever proportions seemed right as it went along.  The film
aimed at a market for comedy and always tried to keep the tone light and
frothy.  So right from the start the film was less ambitious than the movie.
     The film had a dream cast for the story.  It had a popular serious
actress, Meryl Streep, to play Mary; a popular television comedienne,
Roseanne Barr, to play Ruth; and a number of other good actors.  The
television version had virtual unknowns in the major roles.  So why was the
casting so wrong for the film?  Because everybody was cast exactly right in
the television play for the play's approach.  Streep could have played Mary
Fisher in the television play and done a reasonable job of it.  The film,
however, had more physical comedy.  Streep is hardly known for comic roles
and she is just not very good with it.  Julie T. Wallace who played Ruth in
the television play did not always have to be appealing to the audience.
She starts out with the personality of a red brick.  She is large, ugly,
heavy, sullen, and not outgoing at all.  Roseanne Barr got popular because
she has a bright personality.  Her weight does not stand in the way of her
being basically attractive and charismatic.  Even at the beginning of the
film it is hard to think of her as a loser.
     Thematically Ruth is very much like Stephen King's Carrie White.  She
is a woman who has almost nothing.  She does not have looks, she does not
have talent, she does not have money.  The only thing she has is her rage.
And her rage is enough.  From her rage she forges the power to destroy her
tormentors.  At least that is how it is in the television play.  In the film
she does not start nearly so low and she falls well short of destroying Bob
and Mary.  The ending for all three is reasonably happy in the film.  That
is how comedies work.  The television play did not have to worry about box-
office and could allow itself to be bleak.
     If I had to rate the two versions on the -4 to +4 scale, I would give
the television play a +2 and the movie a low 0.  But I do not trust those
ratings because each rating is probably too much affected by the other.  Let
me leave these ratings unofficial and say that the play (which runs
periodically on the Arts and Entertainment Network) IS worth your time to
see, probably much more than the film.

Title
Review for Boxing Helena (1993)
     Dr. Nicholas Cavanaugh (played by Julian Sand) has overcome his unhappy
childhood--mostly.  The neglected son of a great surgeon is himself a great
surgeon.  He has a beautiful house, an attractive mistress, and a king-sized
obsession.  The object of his obsession is Helena (Sherilyn Fenn), a
stunningly beautiful woman with whom he has had sex once (as apparently has
just about every able-bodied man available) and who now wants nothing to do
with him.  Forget his status, his position as chief surgeon of his hospital,
he cannot stop himself from thinking about and even stalking Helena ... even
to the point where he is climbing the tree outside her bedroom window in
order to watch her love-making.  Nick tries to invite Helena to his home
only to be treated with contempt when she comes to a party he is throwing.
He lures her back to the house the next day only to have her escape, running
from the house and into the path of a hit-and-run driver.  Nick could take
her to the hospital, but decides to treat her in his home, amputating both
her legs and  making her his prisoner.  Eventually, when she tries to
strangle her captor, Nick will amputate her arms also.
     What we have then is a rather ghoulish variation on John Fowles' THE
COLLECTOR and at the same time an erotic fantasy.  Nick lives out his dream
of having his beloved Helena dependent on him and at the same time at his
mercy.  She obviously has objections to him personally, but he hopes if he
is sufficiently disarming she will be left without a leg to stand on.  The
ending of the tale will be disappointing to some, but one that has a time-
honored tradition, particularly in early film.
     BOXING HELENA is directed by Jennifer Chambers Lynch, daughter to David
Lynch.  Her father probably would have done the same story every bit as
weirdly but it also would have been full of images that would be meaningful
only to him.  His daughter's style is at least comprehensible.  Perhaps as
one allusion to her having a famous father, incidentally, Lynch includes on
the soundtrack the aria "O mio babbino caro" ("Oh my dear little papa") from
Puccini's GIANNI SCHICCHI.  Speaking of Puccini, to convey the upper-class
feel of Nick's house Lynch uses as background music to scenes in the house
no less than four arias from Puccini and also fills the house with Greek
statuary--indicating she does know high class when she encounters it.  Of
course the primary piece of statuary, a reproduction of the Venus di Milo,
does fit thematically into the film.
     There are some problems with this story, but it does show promise for
Lynch.  My rating is a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Backdraft (1991)
     The first movies were all non-fiction.  The early filmmakers simply
shot the world they saw around them.  One of the more common subjects was
firemen fighting fires.  In 1902 Edwin S. Porter (who the next year made THE
GREAT TRAIN ROBBERY) made what is considered to be the first non-documentary
film.  He took previously shot footage of firemen and edited the pieces
together to tell the first fiction story in cinema.  He called it LIFE OF AN
AMERICAN FIREMAN.  As time went by, however, the subject of firefighting
showed up less and less.  It is difficult to think of a sound film that is
mostly about firefighting.  Films such as TOWERING INFERNO occasionally have
firefighting as a substantial subplot, but rare is the film with
firefighters as its main characters.  That is perhaps unfortunate since
there is great dramatic potential in the idea of the firefighter.
     There certainly seem to be enough films about soldiers fighting an
enemy who, in the case of most American wars, will be vanquished within five
years or less.  Firemen fight battles in a war they can never in their
lifetimes hope ultimately to win.  Films such as GHOSTBUSTERS turn to the
supernatural to provide a towering dramatic force that a few brave people,
with whatever equipment they can carry, have to stand up to.  It is not hard
to see parallels to firefighting, in which a person can be called on to
fight an enemy ten stories high.  As one of the characters in BACKDRAFT
describes fire, "It's a living thing.  It breathes, it eats, and it hates.
The only way to beat it is to think like it....  The only way to truly kill
it is to love it. a little."  The dramatic potential for a powerful and
frightening film about firefighting is there, but unfortunately it is only
partially fulfilled by BACKDRAFT.
     As the film opens in 1971, we meet a young firefighter idolized by his
two sons.  He takes his younger son, Brian to watch him fight a fire, not
knowing that Brian will also be seeing him martyred by his hazardous
occupation.  Flash forward twenty years and the older son is now a hotshot
lieutenant in the fire department.  Lt. Stephen McCaffrey, now nicknamed
"Bull," is played (as his father was) by Kurt Russell.  The younger son
Brian McCaffrey (played by William Baldwin) has been unsuccessful at several
abortive careers and now is himself trying his hand at firefighting.  Brian
is assigned to the same fire company as Stephen is.  This opens the way for
the first of several themes, the rivalry of the two brothers.  Complicating
matters is an alderman intent on budget-cutting by shutting down fire
companies.  And one more complication: there is an arsonist loose setting
small but very explosive sorts of fires.  Fire Inspector Donald Ringate
(played by Robert DeNiro) is doing the detective work to try to track down
the deadly firebug.
     In the war against fire it is possible to win battles, but the war
never ends.  There will always be another fire.  This is probably why the
plot relies so heavily on its arson subplot.  A film does not feel right
unless it has a conflict which is resolved.  Since it is impossible to
conquer fire the script, unfortunately, creates an enemy that can be
conquered--a single arsonist.  That unfortunately turns this film into a
rather pedestrian mystery story.  Too much of BACKDRAFT is about people
against other people; not enough is about people against fire.  Too much of
the script is very unoriginal, including one sequence toward the end that is
very nearly a direct steal from another current thriller (or at least from
books by the author of the thriller).  While visually this film is a genuine
spectacular, some of the touches of the script are very weak.  In one scene
Stephen is talking to someone on the street while his friends surprise him
by hooking up a fire hose and spraying him.  It does not seem that there can
be an unobtrusive way to hook up a hose four inches in diameter.  That sort
of thing attracts attention!  In the last fifteen minutes the writing and
even the acting seriously deteriorate.  There are some incredibly cliched
scenes.  William Baldwin seems to stop at one point during an alarm and he
poses on the firepole for Ron Howard's cameras.  There is an action sequence
to match any in a James Bond film, but it seems designed mostly to give
BACKDRAFT a punch finish.  It is extremely melodramatic.
     The fire photography is very much the star of BACKDRAFT as much as any
of the humans.  Assisted by Industrial Light and Magic effects crews, the
camera shows many different textures of flame.  Sometimes the flame is
beautiful enough that some audience members may go out and try to duplicate
the arsonist's crime.  There are many fire sequences, but there are two
extended sequences that are particularly exciting.  Hans Zimmer's score
makes a very impressive contribution to the film also.  I would give
BACKDRAFT a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Glory (1989)
          Capsule review:  Excellent Civil War film of the first
     black regiment and the prejudice they faced.  At times it
     seems a little over-idealized, but no more so than most films
     about World War II.  Realistically photographed by Freddie
     Francis and well acted, particularly by Morgan Freeman.
     Rating: +2.
     At a time when Hollywood is simply not making many films set in
previous centuries, perhaps even the novelty of Edward Zwick's Civil War
film GLORY might carry it.  However, Zwick's film goes beyond that to being
one of the best Civil War films ever made.  GLORY tells the story of the
U. S. Army's 54th Massachusetts Regiment, the first black regiment in the
Army's history.  The 54th had two enemies it had to fight.  The Confederate
Army was second.  First they had to fight the Union Army for the privilege
of being treated as soldiers.  From the start, the all-black regiment--with
two white officers--was an experiment programmed for failure.  Command was
given to Robert Gould Shaw, a 23-year-old inexperienced at command.
Further, they were criminally under-provisioned, having to battle the army
for such basics as uniforms, shoes, socks, and guns; one scene shows a black
soldier standing guard duty with a spear.  They have to fight for
provisions, they have to fight to be sent to the front, and finally they
have to fight to fight.  Their training was by--among others--an Irish
racist who apparently thought that blacks were Hindus.  In spite of this,
and in spite of the army cheating them out of their fair salary, they
distinguished themselves sufficiently to become cannon fodder.  GLORY is
their story.
     Or more accurately, it is the story of the white officers who led them
and the story of five soldiers who shared the same tent upon enlisting.  All
the other blacks in the film are effectively spear-carriers (in some cases
literally).  Even given that Colonel Shaw was supposed to be young, Matthew
Broderick seems a little too boyish for the role.  He carries too much
baggage from previous roles in which he always played the role of the
"wise-guy kid."  He is a little hard to take seriously as the committed
idealist, though he does much better in Shaw's moments of self-doubt.  Much
better is Morgan Freeman as Rawlins.  Freeman could easily have carried the
film as the main character and as it is he is likely to get an Oscar
nomination as Best Supporting Actor (as well as a nomination for Best Actor
for DRIVING MISS DAISY).
     One of the unsung stars of the film is Freddie Francis, director of
photography.  Francis was director of photography on such films as THE
INNOCENTS, THE FRENCH LIEUTENANT'S WOMAN, THE ELEPHANT MAN, and DUNE.
Francis is superb at creating a period feel.  From his visualization of the
battle of Antietam, the viewer realizes that he is going for authentic feel
rather than dramatic effect.  His view of a Civil War surgery is somewhat
harrowing, to say the least.  His photography rounds out the film and makes
for a very satisfying view of history.  My rating is a +2 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Out of Sight (1998)
     This is the season for "good guy" bank robbers.  Earlier this year
we had THE NEWTON BOYS about the most successful bank robbers in
American history, but who remained nice guys through it all.  Perhaps
inspired by them is Jack Foley (George Clooney) who has robbed more
than 200 banks without anyone ever being hurt.  That record is almost
believable as the film opens with Foley using his charm and a clever
plot to rob one more bank.  This time his luck is against him and he is
caught and thrown into prison.  Nor do the breaks come his way when he
tries to escape from prison.  Just as he has tunneled out, gun-loving
federal marshal Karen Sisco (Jennifer Lopez) is there by chance.  Foley
and company have to take shotgun from her and kidnap her, throwing her
in the same trunk in which Foley will hide.  Even under the
circumstances there is chemistry between them, and even after she
escapes, each continues to think about the other.  This could be bad
for either of them since professionally they are opponents.
     George Clooney is sort of a bland actor who floats along on his
good looks.  I have yet to see him show anything akin to emotional
intensity in a role.  And because his characters are not stressed, we
never see what they are made of.  That gives him a nice sturdy screen
persona, but it is not going to win him any acting awards.  Clooney
glides through Jack Foley effortlessly and leaving behind little
memorable but his smile.  Jennifer Lopez's Karen Sisco is only a little
more interesting.  She is more of a prime mover in the story, but as is
much to frequently the case in 90s popular films, the main characters
more have to look good than to create memorable characters.  More
interesting roles went to Ving Rhames, Don Cheadle, Albert Brooks, and
especially Dennis Farina.  Watch for two major actors who have cameo
roles.
     Scott Frank's screenplay is deliberately non-linear and a little
confusing, jumping without warning into or out of flashbacks.  Perhaps
this is even a good thing since the story itself is fairly
straightforward.  The solution to the puzzle may be simple, but there
is enough spin on the ball when the story is told to make the viewer
feel good when the pieces fit together.  When the film starts we have
several seemingly disconnected strands of plot with different
characters, but the strands are quickly brought together.  Some of the
photographic touches are a little obvious.  Scenes that take place
under the warm Florida sun are shot with bright colors, but scenes that
take place in Detroit are shot mostly with a blue filter to give them a
sort of run-down look.  The dialog is humorous, but a little more
down-to-earth than Quentin Tarantino might offer.  But then Elmore
Leonard has his own strange touch when it come to dialog.  There is
little actual sex in the film that the audience sees--two characters
undress in front of each other, but we see little we could not see on
the beach.  The conclusion of the film, on the other hand, is fairly
gory and we do see the blood.
     OUT OF SIGHT is not one of the great crime films, but it is
entertainment with a little challenge to the audience.  It does not
push the outside of the envelope, but it gets its job done.  I give it
a 6 on the 0 to 10 scale and a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Full Monty, The (1997)
     Sheffield, England, in the early 1970s had an economy a strong as
the steel it produced, as a public relations documentary under the
credits tells us.  But this is twenty-five years later and the mills
have closed.  The people who planned to work in the mills the rest of
their lives are on the dole and scratching to find subsistence jobs.
Gaz (played by Robert Carlyle--the weird Begbie of TRAINSPOTTING) has
lost his wife and son to another man, mostly because he cannot provide
for them.  He has only tenuous visiting rights with his son, Nathan
(William Snape) but pushes the law and has his son as a nearly constant
companion. Gaz does have an idea how to make a little money.  When the
Chippendales male strippers play in town they pack a local rented hall.
If they can make money so easily, perhaps Gaz and his friend Dave (Mark
Addy) can put on the same sort of a show.
     The problem is that the people he can get on the stage to strip
are incredibly ordinary-looking people, not the Chippendales sort of
hunks.  And they dance worse than they look.  With more reluctant pluck
than looks and talent put together a group of six men including their
old foreman Gerald (Tom Wilkinson) and Horse, an aging black drifter
with a bad hip but who can teach them the moves.  (How they assemble
this troop while still keeping their plans secret is not really clear.)
But the question is why would women who have seen Chippendales be
willing to pay to see such losers strip?  Gaz thinks that if they go
the "full monty," baring all, that that will give them the edge.  The
idea seems doomed from the start.  If they cannot make a living at what
they were good at, how can they expect to be cocky enough to entertain
an audience stripping, particularly looking so ordinary, this one
skinny, that one out of shape, another one over the hill.
     THE FULL MONTY manages to be about a lot of things and work on
several levels.  In part it is about the sad state of much of the
British economy and the effects, obvious and subtle, of unemployment,
broken dreams, and failure on the community.  Sheffield is city where
the balance of power between the men and the women has been destroyed
by so many of the men's inability to earn a living.  Gerald, the former
boss of Gaz and Dave has spent six months maintaining a ruse for his
wife that he still has his job.  When he can no longer provide luxuries
his wife wants the marriage breaks apart.  We are led to assume
something similar has happened to Gaz's marriage well before the action
of the story.  The film is also about how closely tied is Dave's self-
image to his ability to earn a living.  In fact the most touching
personal relationship in the film is Dave's with his wife.
     This is a cast that will seem to most American audiences to be
unknowns.  Robert Carlyle of course is from TRAINSPOTTING.  Curiously
he is the lead, but his performance is not one of the better ones of
the film. For me the performances I will remember will be Mark Addy's
Dave and Tom Wilkinson's Gerald.  It is these people pushed to the
point of desperation and for whom the audience generates the most
sympathy. Tom Wilkinson of SENSE AND SENSIBILITY and THE GHOST AND THE
DARKNESS would seem to be the most secure of the three and yet he has
the fewest options and clearly feels it.  Sadly we do not see very much
of Horse, played by Paul Barber.  In some ways his is the most
enigmatic character and the film could have used more story about him.
     The only serious problem with THE FULL MONTY is that it is our
third or fourth film about the sad state of the economy in the English
hinterlands.  This film reminds one a bit too much of BRASSED OFF!  And
having a brass band making the best of a bad situation in an early
scene may be an unfortunate coincidence. But a comedy-drama with good
characters is always worth seeing.  Listen sharply to pierce the thick
accents.  I give this a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Dracula: Dead and Loving It (1995)
     It is faint praise, but DRACULA: DEAD AND LOVING IT is the best
Mel Brooks comedy in quite a long while.  And for once he made a film
that without the humor might have been above average.  But some of the
nice visuals are just wasted here and the film remains only a very
mediocre effort with humor that is just too weak and mechanical to
carry the film.  The enema jokes and other unfunny run-on gags spoil
the few funny bits in this satire of three different film adaptations
of DRACULA.
     At one time Mel Brooks was a really good filmmaker with genuine
characters and a great sense of humor.  Consider the skill with which
he balanced personality with humor in THE PRODUCERS or the too-rarely-
seen TWELVE CHAIRS.  We have not seen much of that Mel Brooks in quite
a while.  Brooks's humor these days leans to cheap and easy gags,
scatological or just lame far too often.  And the weak humor sabotages
not only his own production values, but his better gags as well.
DRACULA: DEAD AND LOVING IT is no YOUNG FRANKENSTEIN, but it has a nice
visual sense and many of its jokes really are funny.  But Brooks needs
to get a better idea of which gags work and which fall flat.  In the
end this new film has too many jokes to work as a horror film and too
high a percentage of lame jokes for it to work as a comedy.
     DRACULA: DEAD AND LOVING IT is basically a reworking of the 1931
screen version, itself a reworking of the John L. Balderston and
Hamilton Deane play.  That play, is a perennial favorite on the stage
and formed the basis of the 1931 Bela Lugosi and the 1979 Frank
Langella versions of DRACULA.  The Brooks film then recreates and
satirizes scenes from the Lugosi, the 1958 Christopher Lee DRACULA
(U.S. title: THE HORROR OF DRACULA), and the 1992 Gary Oldman BRAM
STOKER'S DRACULA.  There is even a quick nod to the 1921 NOSFERATU.
There is a nice recreation of the stairway and web sequence from the
1931 version and a beautiful recreation of the staking of Lucy from the
1958 version, even matching the odd color values.  It is in these two
scenes that the film has its best moments.  There are times when the
photography has an exaggerated dreamlike quality that really does work.
And the opening which takes us through famous graphic portrayals of
vampires is done with a great deal of style.  Unfortunately, these good
moments get lost in the film.
     By far not the smallest fault in the film is the transparent
casting of Leslie Nielson as Dracula.  Nielson's forte is playing
characters who are overly obvious like big children, while a quality of
mystery and otherworldlyness is necessary to play the famous vampire,
even in a comedy.  He is cast against type, and he plays against type.
If that was a gamble, it fails miserably, but more likely he is in the
film because of his associations with other films.  Harvey Korman as
Dr. Seward has more than a little Nigel Bruce in his performance.
     Brooks's writing has turned formulaic and that is slow death in
comedy.  He fills time in the film with pointless run-on gags that do
not seem to get any funnier with the repetition.  One of the run-on
gags only reaches its real point at the end of the credit sequence when
it plays mostly to empty seats--another example of where Brooks
misjudges his audience.  Too many of his jokes just end up a reference
to urine or feces as if that by itself is funny.  Also overused are
pratfalls.
     It is a sad state when all the best aspects of a Mel Brooks comedy
have little to do with the humor.  Brooks should take a look at what
made some of his early films so good and refresh his memory on the
difference between humor and gags.  The style of the film, perhaps
contributed by a good cinematographer, brings this one up to a high 0
on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Nuns on the Run (1990)
     STAR WARS and RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARK shifted the market for adventure
films.  Their slam-bang pacing spoiled audiences who previously were happy
with the pacing of adventures such as SHE and THE MAN WHO WOULD BE KING.
Monty Python's various films and television show similarly shifted the
comedy audience.  By pre-Python standards NUNS ON THE RUN would be a
frenetic comedy with some interesting characters and a few good laughs.  It
has been getting some bad press as being not funny enough and lacking in the
punch that a film such as A FISH CALLED WANDA had.  Well, it really does not
have the steady laughs of A FISH CALLED WANDA, but it is every bit as funny
as the classic Alec Guinness Ealing comedies.  And if it is less substantial
than classic Guinness comedy, it is certainly more substantial than most of
the modern comedies being made.  That means that it is roughly eight times
as good as empty comedies such as THROW MOMMA FROM THE TRAIN or BLIND DATE.
     In NUNS ON THE RUN, Brian Hope and Charlie McManus are two aging hoods
who want to get out of crime.  Their boss cannot afford to have them
possibly double-cross the organization, so when the boss finds out they want
to leave they know their days are numbered.  Their only chance is now to
double-cross the organization and steal enough money to escape to Brazil.
When their gang is going to rob a local triad gang, Hope and McManus see
their chance to make off with the boodle.  [Note of explanation: Someone can
correct me if I am wrong, but I believe the Triads are the same secret
organization sometimes known as the Tongs.  The film makes fun of their love
of cutlery.  The real Tongs are as professional and deadly as any of their
European counterparts.]  Things do not go well for the two and they end up
with both their own gang and the Triads chasing them.  Their only escape is
to disguise themselves as nuns and hide in a convent.  But Hope is
bewildered by the Catholic religion he is now expected to know.  McManus is
Catholic and tries to rescue him, but his explanations are little help.  In
the discussion of religion, the comedy is at its richest.  Hope's very life
may depend on his understanding McManus's muddled explanation of the Holy
Trinity and the basic doctrines of Catholicism.
     For the most part this comedy could have been done in the 1950s.  It
pokes a little fun at Catholicism, but never to the point that it is really
disrespectful.  The film's only scene that would have been out of place in
the 1950s is a delightfully vulgar shower room scene.  In general the film
works like a well-oiled machine, with many diverse plot elements coming
together in unexpected combinations.
     Eric Idle of Monty Python fame stars as Brian Hope.  Idle's age is
starting to show on him and he looks surprisingly middle-aged here, but that
helps to give Hope character.  For once his antics are outshone by a non-
Pythonite, Robbie Coltrane, who played Falstaff in HENRY V and Bob Hoskins's
mystery-loving friend in MONA LISA.  The film was written and directed by
Jonathan Lynn, who in this country is best known for writing and directing
the television shows "Yes, Minister" and "Yes, Prime Minister."  While
lacking those series' sophistication, NUNS ON THE RUN is still an
intelligent, whimsical comedy.  I give it a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for American President, The (1995)
     Just in case you did not notice this film was "Capra-esque,"
scriptwriter Aaron Sorkin works the term into the dialogue.  But even
if he had not, there would have been inevitable comparisons to Frank
Capra's techniques of pulling the viewer in with one story and then
introducing a much more relevant plotline.  And this film is in a class
with MR. SMITH GOES TO WASHINGTON and MEET JOHN DOE.  THE AMERICAN
PRESIDENT is a bright, witty romantic comedy with really good dialogue,
but at the same time it is a statement about politics, and about
politicians, some who are idealists and some who are opportunists.
This is a film that purrs and a film that has claws--not big ones, but
claws nonetheless.
     President Andrew Shepherd (played by Michael Douglas) is an
idealist and a Democrat with a high approval rating from the American
public.  Shepherd is a widower with a teenage daughter.  He gets along
tolerably well with Republicans and with the environmental lobby,
treading a path somewhere in between.  When he overhears a new
environmental lobbyist, Sydney Ellen Wade (Annette Bening), making
insulting comments about him he is intrigued by her and invites the
flustered woman to be his date for a state dinner.  Eventually they are
seeing more of each other in spite of warnings from his staff that
dating a woman will hurt his approval rating.  It soon becomes clear
that they are right, as an opponent, Senator Bob Rumson (Richard
Dreyfuss) who is adept at political hardball, begins mounting a smear
campaign suggesting that Wade is a flag-burner and that she is using
sex to sway the President's opinions.  The President's interest in Wade
is exaggerated into an all-out attack on family values.  The
President's sagging approval rating forces some hard decisions.
     Sorkin's dialogue with Rob Reiner's direction is witty, sharp, and
a lot of fun.  While the entire course of the President's relationship
with Wade is easily predictable, there are some very funny situations
built around what would happen if a modern President did decide to
date.  Reiner's film has the undeniable charm in portraying the
President trying to do what seem like simple tasks like ordering
flowers and dating.  There is a charm in seeing a lobbyist awed and
flustered by the attentions of the President.  And for a while the film
rides on all that charm.  But the film does a lot more than that.  The
film is something of an education in how modern politics works.  We see
something of the complex deals and strategies which anyone in high
political office must contend.
     The cast is a bit overpowered with familiar faces in almost every
reasonable role.  Martin Sheen, Michael J. Fox, and David Paymer are
advisors to the President.  I was pleased to see Anna Deavere Smith in
an important role as the President's press secretary.  Smith proved
herself to be a first rank character actor with an incredible acting
range in her one-woman show "Fires in the Mirror," filmed for PBS.
Other familiar faces include Samantha Mathis, John Mahoney, and Nina
Siemaszko.  Marc Shaiman's score is dignified and sounds Presidential.
The photography looks convincingly like it was filmed in the White
House, no doubt due in large part to contributions by Industrial Light
and Magic.
     Like many of the films of Frank Capra, THE AMERICAN PRESIDENT can
be seen as a light entertainment and at the same time a somewhat deeper
look at the problems in American politics.  To balance both as adroitly
as it does, I rate it a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Elizabeth (1998)
     CAPSULE: The first hour is beautifully realized.  In the second
hour the writing gets a little muddled and the style becomes less
original.  Still, this story of the coming to power of Queen Elizabeth
is enthralling.  She is a bit too much a 1990s woman, but the
photography is very good.  Rating: 8 (0 to 10), high +2 (-4 to +4)
   - Directed by Shekhar Kapur.  Unusual to see an Indian directing a
     film about a British monarch.
   - Very powerful telling of the rise to power of Elizabeth I.  The
     first hour was spellbinding.  The director filmed with real power.
     By the second hour the writing had gotten a little muddled.
   - David Hirschfelder (SHINE) provides a very melodic score.
   - Many overhead shots to show the size of the buildings and
     smallness of people.  Photography kept dark.  Many scenes done in
     rich blacks and reds.
   - Somehow reminiscent of a Hieronymous Bosch painting with some of
     its weird and powerful images.
   - False move in showing Elizabeth practice an argument using a
     technique like would be used to show outtakes.  It seems like too
     modern an editing technique.
   - Elizabeth begins as a pawn and learns to fend for herself.
     Deciding best way to be rid of Elizabeth, Queen Mary instructs a
     bishop, "Your Grace will find some proof of her treachery."
   - Very harrowing and haunting scene of an execution by burning.  Do
     not bring young children.
   - Wolsingham (Geoffrey Rush) is Elizabeth's Secret Service and is
     ruthless in protecting her.
   - I like films of this period and few are done as well as ELIZABETH.
   - She may be written a little too much like a modern woman.

Title
Review for Mrs. Doubtfire (1993)
     Robin Williams plays Daniel Hillard, who is a bit like a big child.  He
tempermentally walks off of a job providing voices for cartoon characters
over a principle.  (This reminds one of TOOTSIE, and it certainly will not
be the last such reminder.)  To cheer himself up he throws a lavish birthday
party for his son which backfires involving both police and his wife Miranda
(Sally Field).  This is the last straw and Miranda files divorce proceedings
that severely limit Daniel's right to see his own children.  To appease his
need for work as well as his emotional need to see his children Daniel has
his brother, a gay makeup artist, make him up to look like a woman.
Disguised and taking the name Mrs. Doubtfire, he secretly takes the job of
nanny to his own children.  There he is able to win the acceptance, albeit
unknowing, of his family.  From there you can pretty well figure out what
comic situations arise.  For example, he must learn to cook for his family.
Most of the gags here do not even require the major premise of the film,
they are just generic learning to cook gags.  Then when his ex-wife starts
dating a rich handsome bachelor (Pierce Brosnan), and of course he uses his
position as confidant to steer Miranda back to him.  There are few
unfamiliar situations in this by-the-numbers comedy.  We even have that old
standby from dating movies, having to balance two simultaneous dates (well,
dinner appointments) without anybody realizing he is not spending full time
with them.
     I will not say I was a big fan of TOOTSIE, but at least it attempted a
little more substance than this light-weight comedy.  I will say that if I
saw both Dustin Hoffman and Robin Williams on the street dressed as women, I
would probably be more convinced by Williams portrayal, but there the
advantages of MRS. DOUBTFIRE over TOOTSIE end.  There are serious flaws in
logic in this film.  Not the least of these flaws is that even using a
bodysuit and mask, the Doubtfire costume would take on the order of fifteen
minutes to put on and perhaps as long to take off.  There are times in the
film where Williams slips in and out of his disguise in seconds.  Williams
is good at varying his voice, but probably not so good as the story calls
for him to be.  In specific, he fools his wife of fourteen years throughout
the story with many different voices.  I doubt that even Mel Blanc could
have done that.  The film glosses over the difference between being able to
put several different characterizations in a voice and the ability to
actually disguise a voice so is not recognizable.  Another flaw is the
dependence on slapstick comedy.  Yes it brings a quick laugh, but it just is
not as satisfying as real wit in writing.  Too many of the scenes are just
obvious and mechanical.  This is a fluffy see-once situation comedy that is
about what you would expect from Chris Columbus who directed the two "Home
Alone" films and the somewhat better ADVENTURES IN BABYSITTING.  This one
gets a rating of +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Adventures of Huck Finn, The (1993)
          Capsule review:  This is a reasonably faithful
     adaptation of what may be the great American novel. Although
     whittled down from the intricate novel, this version will
     entertain kids and adults.  Rating: +1 (-4 to +4).
     As unlikely as it seems, the great novel of Spain is a burlesque about
a madman who anachronistically thinks he is a knight.  DON QUIXOTE is a
novel you can read at nearly any age.  It is simple enough to enjoy at age
ten and as you grow it becomes more and more sophisticated.  England's great
story for all ages is ALICE IN WONDERLAND.  In the United States we also
have our story for all ages.  It is not even a stand-alone, but is the
second book in a series that also includes boy detective stories.  Yet THE
ADVENTURES OF HUCKLEBERRY FINN--often considered to be the finest American
novel ever written--is a book you can read and enjoy at ten or at sixty.
Disney Studios has adapted the picaresque novel into a fairly entertaining
adventure film.
     For those lucky people who still have their first reading of
HUCKLEBERRY FINN ahead of them, here is what the story is about: The setting
is the pre-Civil War South.  Huck (played by Elijah Wood), the wild adoptee
of two old women, is kidnapped by his real father, a violent alcoholic.
Huck escapes to the Mississippi River and runs into runaway slave Jim
(played by Courtney B. Vance).  They strike up a partnership made uneasy by
Huck's conscience telling him it is wrong to help a slave escape.  The novel
tells of the strange people they meet during their escape and of Huck's
growing respect for Jim.
     This version, while occasionally adopting modern values, is actually
fairly accurate to the novel, though the character Tom Sawyer has been
written out.  Wood as Huck is an odd casting choice since he seems too young
and cute.  Ron Perlman, who played a gentle beast in the television series
BEAUTY AND THE BEAST, plays a not-so-gentle monster as Pap Finn.  Younger
children may be frightened by Pap's drunken rage.
     The recreation of the Old South seems fairly authentic.  Bill Conti has
written a striking orchestral score.  This production, like the book, can be
appreciated at nearly any age.  I rate the film a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for To End All Wars (2001)
    CAPSULE: This is a harrowing look at a rarely dramatized 
    chapter of WWII, life in a Japanese prison camp. TO END ALL 
    WARS is a moving film about the struggle of prisoners to 
    retain their humanity and their dignity.  The somewhat 
    religious interpretation may not be to everyone's taste.  
    Rating: 9 (0 to 10), +3 (-4 to +4)
More than any other people the Japanese seem capable of acting 
with one goal and not letting any other consideration get in their 
way.  This may be a holdover from the code of Bushido when loyalty 
to ones master was the only law.  During World War II, of course, 
the one goal was winning the war.  This led them to do some very 
inhuman things in pursuit of that goal.  When the Japanese had 
captured prisoners, they were very much treated in whatever way 
would be optimum for achieving the one goal.  Minimum resources 
were to be spent in maintaining prisoners in keeping with maximal 
positive output.  While the Germans, not known for their kindness 
in those days, had a 6% mortality rate among captured prisoners of 
war, the mortality rate of Japanese prisoners of war was 27%.  The 
best thing for the war effort was working prisoners nearly to 
death on the Thailand to Burma railroad.  That railroad was needed 
if Japan was to attack India as it planned to do.  The best thing 
for the effort was not to waste much food on the prisoners so 
short and amazingly wretched food was the order of the day.  And 
just being in the jungle without proper medical aid took its toll.
In the public mind Japan has never been held as accountable for 
war atrocities as was Germany.  Filmmakers have been reticent to 
tell the story, perhaps for fear of offending the Japanese.  There 
are comparatively few films about the Japanese POW camps.  
Certainly there was David Lean's THE BRIDGE ON THE RIVER KWAI.  
There were some low-budget British exploitation films and that was 
about it.  Then there were TV series "A Town Like Alice" and 
"Tenko."  Lest the experience be forgotten we have a new film TO 
END ALL WARS directed by David Cunningham and written by Brian 
Godawa.  It is based on the account of Ernest Gordan who survived 
the horror of that World War II prison camp and went on to become 
for 26 years the Dean of the Chapel at Princeton University.  The 
film while realistic shows the conditions in the camp as being 
considerably more brutal and sadistic than BRIDGE ON THE RIVER 
KWAI portrayed them.
The story opens with six or so soldiers being marched into the 
prison camp only to be immediately placed in front of a firing 
squad.  It turns out to be a grim joke, one of many that the 
sadistic Japanese play to amuse themselves.  Beating and torture 
are commonplace events.  Men already imprisoned tell the new 
arrivals to enjoy the last of their health; it will not last long 
with parasites and disease almost inevitable.  However, unlike as 
in KWAI, the prisoners want to avoid going to the hospital, called 
by the prisoners the Death House.
So goes a war within a war with the prisoners trying to maintain 
their humanity and with the Japanese trying to make them 
interchangeable and highly expendable cogs in a rail-laying 
machine.  This is more than just a battle of who will win the war 
but a battle of ideologies.  The Japanese believe that the 
individual is nothing, that conformity to group's norms is all 
that gives a life meaning.  Conformity is purpose.  Before the 
film is over there will be some surprising revelations about the 
character of the prisoners and the character of those running the 
camp.  If this story showed nothing but sadism from the Japanese 
it would be one kind of story.  If the British (with one American, 
by the way) and the Japanese learned to respect each other it 
would be another kind of story.  It is neither.  It is a stirring 
and believable account of camp life.
The color has been distorted in the film to give a washed out 
yellow.  This serves a double purpose for Cunningham.  It gives an 
effect of Technicolor film that has been left in heat.  It also 
creates a distancing effect.  The only touch that seems a little 
out of place is the use of Gaelic music.
This is a powerful and philosophical view of the prison camp 
experience.  I rate it a 9 on the 0 to 10 scale and a +3 on the -4 
to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Powder (1995)
     Sometimes a film just clicks for reasons hard to determine.
POWDER should not work well as a film, but it does.  This is a story
about a self-effacing superman with a pained expression on his face who
finds himself in a world that largely does not appreciate him.  It
initially looks like a self-indulgent film searching for a cult
following from a narrow band of sentimentalists.  That may even be what
it was, but it did just enough that worked for me that I fell into that
narrow band.  In another ten years I may look at this film and wonder
what I saw in it, but for right now it had more than one scene that
paid off for me.  I would like to think I will always find the subplot
with the deputy to be powerful.
     Jeremy Reid, inexplicably called "Powder" (played by Sean Patrick
Flanery), has not had much of a life.  His mother died of a lightning
bolt before his birth.  The albino fetus salvaged from the dead woman
was rejected by the father.  The child was raised by his grandparents
and lived in a dark cellar for almost all of his life.  Powder, it
seems, was not entirely human, though what else he is is never clear.
He may be a mutation or maybe an implanted alien.  But he has an I.Q.
that goes beyond measurement, a photographic memory, telepathic and
empathic abilities, and voluntary and involuntary powers to affect
electromagnetic waves.  Due to his upbringing he is introverted and
maladjusted.  Wherever he goes he is hated and feared by most of his
Texas community.  Sent to a school for disturbed children, he finds
friends in the head of the school (Mary Steenburgen) and an energetic
science teacher (Jeff Goldblum).
     Actor Sean Patrick Flanery is hidden under an overly obvious
makeup job which looks like it was intended to justify the title of the
film.  Flanery is not a bad actor--some viewers may remember him as
TV's teenage Young Indiana Jones.  But in POWDER the white make-up
lacks contrast and seems to hide all of his facial expression but the
most pained looks, which he then uses all too often.  Also sprinkled in
are some good character actors like Lance Hendriksen as the town
sheriff.  Hendriksen is one of those familiar actors who never seem to
get the appreciation they deserve.  Mary Steenburgen is not well-used,
but Jeff Goldblum as the enthusiastic science teacher is a treat.  Two
more actors it is nice to see working are Ray Wise and camp film
actress Susan Tyrrell.
     The script has some problems.  Powder's powers seem to be revealed
only as he needs them and we are never sure what powers he has.  That
is not necessarily bad, though one might question if the writer and
director Victor Salva had a clear idea of what he wanted Powder to be.
For example, the teenager seems to be involuntarily magnetic in some
scenes and not others.  Some places the effects are not convincing.
Lightning plays a part in the story but never looks realistic.  An
animal head is also unreal-looking.  There are continuity errors witha
clock in one scene between Goldblum and Flanery.  None of these are
really bothersome.  What did need more care were the last three or four
minutes of the film, which just don't work.
     There is a great deal being said about writer/director Victor
Salva's background.  On this subject I will say just that I can respect
and enjoy Wagner's operatic cycle "The Ring of the Nibelungs" without
condoning everything that Wagner ever did in his personal life.  Salva
has had a bad chapter of his life which is now over.  His film POWDER
rises above some mediocre acting and make-up to have several touching
moments in a 1950s-style superman story.  For the people in the right
mood it gets a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Analyze This (1999)
     Paul Vitti (Robert DeNiro) is the head of one of New York City's
two biggest crime families.  But he is losing his drive.  He is beating
people up less and he is feeling their pain more.  For no apparent
reason he will start crying. (The head of a crime family beats people
up himself????  Why does this not seem very likely?)  He decides he
needs good psychiatric help, but he must keep it secret since seeing a
psychiatrist would be seen as a sign of weakness.  Through an odd chain
of events he chooses analyst Ben Sobel (Billy Crystal).  But the last
thing Sobel wants is one of New York's most notorious criminals as a
patient.  Nor does Sobel know how to treat Vitti.  A psychiatrist works
by getting and holding the upper hand over his patient.  No matter what
a patient does the psychiatrist must always be in control of the
situation.  With Vitti he is dealing with a man who is also expert at
control, even if he needs a gun to maintain it.  The two of them begin
a battle for control of their sessions.  It is a struggle that should
have been more interesting than it was.
     But his doctor is not the only opponent that Vitti is battling.
He is in a cold war with Primo Sindone (Chazz Palminteri), the head of
New York's other major crime family.  And Sobel may become a pawn in
the conflict.  At the most inconvenient times suddenly Sobel will be
summoned to have a silly psychiatric session with Vitti.  It is a gag
repeated as many times as is necessary to fill out the length of the
film.  Writing which is very funny in the first part of the film is
wasted in a film which has much sparser and less funny gags in its
second and third.  This film could have done more with the doctor-
patient relationship, but settles for pop psychology and an instant
miracle cure.  It could have done more with the crime plot, but it
settles for something hackneyed and overly cliched.
     What is curious about the film is that the acting is way below
anybody's standards.  Robert DeNiro coasts along as the gangster, a
part he could play in his sleep.  What gives Vitti potential as a
character is that he has emotional problems, but DeNiro is not used to
playing emotional problems of this sort. When he cries in front of the
camera it is like amateur night tryouts for the Actors' Studio.  His
touch at comedy is only marginally better.  Billy Crystal is again the
nice-guy, sincere, New York Jew he always plays, only this time he
plays it as a psychiatrist.  This would have been a far more engaging
film if on Day One DeNiro and Crystal would have just looked at each
other, said "not this role again," and then traded roles.  Lisa Kudrow
is capable or more but plays a bewildered third wheel in the grand
tradition of Terry Garr.  She should never have settled for such a
tangential role.  More interesting are the character roles of Joe
Viterelli as the bodyguard Jelly and Chazz Palminteri is his usual
riveting character.
     Many of the jokes really are funny, but again most are in the
first half of the film.  There are also some interesting allusions to
crime films, both in the dialog and visually.  But the script by Ken
Lonergan and Peter Tolan is not content to simply have many of the
allusions, it must tell the viewer about them so that they are not
missed.  It sacrifices subtlety.  Overall this averages out to being a
decent comedy, but it was capable of being much more.  I rate it a 6 on
the 0 to 10 scale and a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Piano, The (1993)
     Do not trust me on this one.  I am not someone who gets a whole lot out
of stories of people who do strange illogical things in the heat of passion.
I tend to find these tales comic at just the moment that they are trying to
be the most serious.  I have this nasty tendency to chuckle at
D. H. Lawrence stories.  But for me, THE PIANO was an incredibly overwrought
and pretentious melodrama.  When I should have been shuddering I found
myself chortling.  The critics who are liking this film so much clearly are
better able to appreciate this sort of story.
     Holly Hunter plays Ada, a woman who has chosen at an early age to
remain mute for reasons that even she does not understand.  Already we can
see that Ada gets caught up in situations where she does not understand her
own behavior and motives.  Rather than a voice she has come to express
herself through music on her piano and through sign language.  As the story
opens, some time in the 19th Century, she has a daughter of about eight (Ana
Paquin) and her father has arranged a marriage between her and a New Zealand
settler Stewart (Sam Neill).  On her arrival in New Zealand her husband
decides that her piano is wrong for life in New Zealand.  For practical
reasons, though also insensitively, he abandons it on the beach.  But
without a care for the wishes of his new wife he does not go back for the
piano even when he has a chance.  Ada goes to a crude neighbor, George
Baines (Harvey Keitel) to ask him to rescue the instrument.  That he does
but convinces Stewart to trade to him the piano for a piece of land.
Stewart agrees without even consulting Ada.  He knows how much the piano
means to her, but after all he is a man and so is insensitive to the wishes
of the wife whose affection he is trying to win.
     Baines is extremely lonely and he finds seeing and hearing Ada play
extremely erotic.  He first works a deal for Ada to teach him to play the
piano as part of the land agreement.  But as a side arrangement he tells Ada
she can buy back the piano, a black key at a time if she will give him
little sexual favors while she plays.  This arrangement sets into motion a
melodrama of sex and violence worthy of a drive-in triple feature of
exploitation films.  Perhaps writer/director Jane Campion has made this film
with a modicum more polish, but the material is no less trashy than if the
story were set on an Arkansas sawmill.
     Keitel, Hunter, and Neill are all good actors but of them only Keitel
manages to rise above the material and invest his character with real
humanity.  At his worst Baines is never far from being a sympathetic
character.  It is a bit too easy to feel sorry for poor Ada as the powerless
victim.  But still her character is top-heavy with too many weird facets for
even Hunter to make believable.  (Are there genuinely people who not only
sleepwalk but sleep-piano-play?)  Ada brings about the climax of the story
of her and Stewart in an enigmatic act of piano mutilation that was
disastrously unsuccessful, but which would have been no less a fiasco had it
gone as she planned.  Somebody would have noticed the effect on the piano
soon.  In addition the act seemed to involve a note to someone whom she
already knew was illiterate.
     At least the film is well-photographed, showing both positive and
negative aspects of life among the Maori of New Zealand in the last century.
That adds what watchable elements the film has.  But I cannot help feeling
that in years to come, once we are past the initial rush of political
sympathy, this film is going to be considered an embarrassment in just the
same way BILLY JACK has been.  I give this film a -1 on the -4 to +4 scale.
For me, this is the most over-rated film of the year.  Sorry, I fully expect
that there will be many who disagree, but Harvey Keitel and the Emperor are
dressed just alike.

Title
Review for New York Stories (1989)
     The multi-episode film, while it goes back at least as far as D. W.
Griffith's INTOLERANCE, had its real blossoming in the 1940s and 1950s with
films such as DEAD OF NIGHT, O. HENRY'S FULL HOUSE, FLESH AND FANTASY,
QUARTET, and TRIO.  In the 1960s it was mostly reserved for the horror film,
with entries such as BLACK SABBATH, SPIRITS OF THE DEAD, the non-horror
BOCCACCIO '70, and a whole series of horror anthology films from Amicus
Films of Britain.  Arguably, even last year's ARIA might be included, but in
general multi-episode films have almost disappeared.  Now Disney's
Touchstone has given three popular directors a chance to work with a
shorter-than-feature-length piece.
     "Life Lessons" by Martin Scorsese has Nick Nolte as a popular artist
who is behind schedule painting for a show of his works coming up in three
weeks.  His girlfriend, just returning from a fling with another man, comes
back to live in Nolte's studio and re-begin a stormy relationship with
Nolte.  The artist channels his rage into a painting fury.  The story has a
not-too-surprising semi-twist ending.  There is a lot of shouting, a lot of
loud 1960s music, and one nice piece of music from Puccini's TURNADOT.
There is sound and fury, signifying something, but perhaps not enough.  I
would rate this segment a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     Francis Ford Coppola's "Life Without Zoe" is essentially a children's
film, a genre Coppola does surprisingly well in.  His Zoetrope company made
the very good THE BLACK STALLION.  Coppola falls just a little flat here.
"Life Without Zoe" is about a poor little fantastically rich kid who lives
under the guardianship of a kindly and funny butler in a posh New York
hotel.  By sheer force of good, Zoe is able to solve a big problem for her
father and to bring about the reconciliation of her parents.  You don't have
to be poor to be happy.  Aren't you pleased?  I give this one a -1.
     The final segment, "Oedipus Wrecks," is a Woody Allen fantasy about a
little Jewish nebbish whose life is made miserable by his embarrassing and
manipulative mother.  Deep down he wishes for her just to disappear.  Some
supernatural force grants his wish only to make things a lot worse for him.
While never hilarious, this film has more jokes per minute than any film
Allen has made since LOVE AND DEATH.  I rate it a +1.

Title
Review for Private Parts (1997)
     Howard Stern will do just about anything to be funny on the radio
from having guests strip naked (could anything be more pointless in
this medium!), having another stick a thirteen inch kielbasa down her
throat, inducing a listener to have an orgasm from the vibration of her
woofer, and making dead fetus jokes the day after his wife's
miscarriage.  His humor is not so much off-color as two counties away
from being even near- color.  PRIVATE PARTS is his autobiography in
book form and the film based on the book.  Except for his personal
style of gags the plot is of how his straight-laced management at his
various jobs tried to tone him down and how he always reacted by
becoming even more of the Bad Boy of Radio.  This basic conflict is the
same sort of thing we saw in NATIONAL LAMPOON'S ANIMAL HOUSE,
MEATBALLS, STRIPES, and GHOSTBUSTERS.  Since each of those films was
either produced or directed by Ivan Reitman, it should come as no
surprise that he produced PRIVATE PARTS also.
     As the film Howard Stern (played by Howard Stern) opens is
performing a stage act as Fartman in a pair of pants tailored to leave
his butt cheeks exposed.  As Stern walks back stage he worries that his
humor is not appreciated by others as he gets disapproving stares from
other performers.  To a woman sitting next to him on a plane, he begins
to recount his life, told in a flashback.  We start with Stern as a
cute child with a father who seems constantly angry.  Starting as a
geeky teenager and then as a geeky adult (who looks a lot like Weird Al
Yankovic), he goes from one radio job to the next fighting
unsympathetic management and territorial fellow disk jockeys.  At first
he is usually the victim of these conflicts, and he drifts through jobs
in one city after another.  Stern finds himself in larger and larger
conflicts culminating in his being hired at New York City's WNBC whom
we are told hired him only on the basis of his high ratings at his
previous job at a Washington DC radio station.  When they found out the
nature of his radio program they decide it is necessary to tame him.
But in a series of battles Stern always wins eventually because he is
so popular with the listeners.
     Howard Stern could conceivably be a good actor with the right sort
of material, but here he is cast hopelessly against type.  He never
seems get much of a handle on his character and without an
understanding of what makes someone like Howard Stern tick, he seems to
be just going through the motions.  Along the way Stern picks up the
rest of his comedy team including his female straight man, Robin
Quivers playing herself.  Quivers is charming as is Mary McCormack as
Stern's long suffering and ever-perfect wife Alison.  Holding his own
for the comic drive of the film is Paul Giamatti as the NBC executive
who has vowed to tame Stern and who, at least to hear Stern tell it, is
hopelessly outclassed by the classless Stern.
     Ironically with all the sexist and sexual humor, the film was
directed by a woman, Betty Thomas (who some will remember played Lucy
Bates in "Hill Street Blues").  This is a cotton candy film, light,
pleasant, but without much substance and what little there is made to
go a long way.  If there is not a whole lot to think about here, at
least the film moves well and is entertaining.  Probably people not
offended by the style of humor will enjoy the show.  This is the kind
of film that generates from critics a lot of positive votes but not a
lot of enthusiasm.  I rate is a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Honeymoon in Vegas (1992)
          Capsule review:  The writer of THE IN-LAWS and THE
     FRESHMAN tells the story of a love triangle of a neurotic New
     York private detective trying to marry his girlfriend while a
     big-time gambler tries to win her away.  Much of the story
     takes place in a Las Vegas infested with Elvis lookalikes.
     Lots of little pieces that only sometimes hang together well.
     Rating: +1 (-4 to +4).
     Andrew Bergman has been around making comedies for a long time, but in
HONEYMOON IN VEGAS he seems more like a new and talented amateur than a
seasoned professional.  Bergman wrote and directed SO FINE and THE FRESHMAN,
both of which jabbed at bad taste in American popular culture.  With
HONEYMOON IN VEGAS he has stopped his little jabs and pulled out a meat
slicer to go after the cult of Elvis worshippers.  Not that his basic plot
has anything at all to do with Elvis: he uses Elvis just to create a comic
background for his real story.
     Jack Singer (played by likably goofy Nicholas Cage) has been a
diffident lover to Betsy (played by Sarah Jessica Parker) due to a deathbed
promise to his mother (played by Anne Bancroft in cameo) that he would never
marry.  Finally Betsy overcomes the promise and the two head for Las Vegas
for a quick marriage.  That is where Betsy is seen by tough gambler Tommy
Korman (played by James Caan).  Betsy has a very strong resemblance to the
wife Korman lost to skin cancer, and Korman decides to snare Betsy for
himself.  He lures Jack into a high-stakes poker game, takes him to the tune
of $65,000, and then makes a deal with Jack: Jack's debt will be forgiven if
Betsy will be Korman's platonic companion for the weekend.  Korman wants to
use charm and his rather comfortable lifestyle to win Betsy.  Meanwhile,
Jack is becoming increasingly frantic to break up the pair as Korman spirits
Betsy off to Maui.
     What does all this have to do with Elvis?  Nothing really.  But the
background of the story is a Las Vegas having a convention of Elvis
impersonators.  Bergman constantly comments on the story with carefully
chosen Elvis songs and shows us an army of gaudy Elvis lookalikes, Elvises
of many races and sizes.  The film is just two Elvises short of pushing the
gag too far.
     The usually reserved James Caan and the never reserved Nicholas Cage
each seem to have a field day chewing up the scenery.  It is very rare to
see Caan putting this much expression in a role and clearly enjoying
himself.  Smaller roles go to the always enjoyable Pat Morita and Peter
Boyle as an unnatural naturalized Hawaiian.
     The photography is surprisingly spotty.  At least two scenes appeared
totally washed out in the print we saw.  Some scenes of natural beauty in
Maui and natural beauty (?) in Vegas owe more to William Fraker's
camerawork.  The cartoon credits were amusing and usually made sense.
Overall this is an amiable but unexceptional comedy.  I rate it a +1 on the
-4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Heavy (1995)
     It is a familiar viewpoint that color in a film actually distracts
the viewer and mutes the emotional impact of the film's camerawork.
What is less commonly observed is that dialogue may actually do much
the same thing.  We have seen the overly florid gesturing of silent
film acting, much of which looks silly today.  But some silent films
were extremely intense emotional pieces in their day.  Perhaps as much
of the emotional potential of film was lost with sound film as was lost
with color.  HEAVY is a color film, and a sound film, but it functions
very much as a silent film would.  Almost all of the story is conveyed
either in visual images or in single lines of dialogue, perhaps
appropriate to title cards in silent films.  Of course the film is not
lacking in dialogue, but the dialogue is almost never used to move the
plot along.  It adds a little color and background interest to the
film, but it is rarely used to advance the plot.  This is a film that
owes much more to the traditions of silent film than to those of the
sound era.  By forcing the viewer to carefully watch the characters,
very different information can be imparted to the viewer and the
technique focuses attention on the emotions of the characters.
     Most of the action takes place in and around Pete and Dolly's
Restaurant, a bar and restaurant in a small New England town.  Pete has
been dead for years and his widow Dolly (Shelley Winters) still blames
waitress Delores (Deborah Harry in a surprisingly textured role) for a
liaison with Pete.  When Dolly hires an attractive teenager Callie (Liv
Tyler) to help out there is immediate resentment from Delores.  Caught
between the two is Victor (Pruitt Taylor Vince), Dolly's son somewhere
in his 30s.  Victor is so stigmatized by his own obesity and so
dominated by his mother that it is all he can do to occasionally speak.
He is very much attracted to Callie but cannot bring himself to have a
conversation with her.  Instead he decides to try to reinvent himself,
taking up dieting and investigating a local cooking school.  But he
must fight the forces of his own inertia and that of his mother who
wants to keep him in his present job.  He fantasizes about being a hero
and saving Callie.  Soon Victor's life, which has been static for so
many years, starts to change violently.  His reaction and his behavior
when those changes come is totally unexpected.  Little of this are we
told about, it is almost all shown to us and Victor's quiet nature is
perfect for the visual style of storytelling.  The same story could
have been lightened by comedy but writer and director James Mangold
takes a very realistic approach and rarely strays from it.
     This is a very precisely directed film and it has many very nice
subtle touches.  As an example of the directing technique, to
underscore Victor's image of himself, there is a scene in which he
looks at a stack of photographs.  Gingerly he places each on a table
after looking at it.  When he gets to a picture of himself he puts it
down with a small slam.  Small and subtle touches do what another story
would simply tell with dialogue.
     In general the production values speak of a film made well on a
low budget.  The colors were not particularly rich, indicating a less-
expensive print.  But the performances are all very powerful.  Pruitt
Taylor Vince's acting gets more and more intense as the film goes on.
Mangold moves his story with a slow and deliberate speed, but
completely pulls the viewer into the lives of his characters and
particularly Victor's life.
     The usual way of saying it is that one "sees" a film, but for most
films much more of the story is conveyed in the dialogue than the
visuals.  HEAVY is truly a film one sees rather than hears.  Mangold's
experiment in visual storytelling may not have a lot of application to
other films, but it works extremely well in this film.   I would rate
HEAVY a high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Kĺdisbellan (1993)
     Roland is a boy growing up in Stockholm in the 1920s (or so) with
just about everything going against him.  His father is a Socialist,
his mother is a Russian Jew fighting an illegal battle for family
planning.  Roland's father is an autocrat with little empathy for the
boy.  Roland's teachers are anti-Semitic and anti-Socialist and have
little use for the boy except as a bad example and as a target for
occasional sadistic corporal punishment.  Roland's schoolmates cheat,
exploit, and play cruel tricks on young Roland.  And in spite of all
this, Roland has an irrepressible spirit.  He sometimes does fight
back, but chooses his fights where he thinks they will do the most
good.  He also has an ingenious and a creative mind.  The story always
has the feel of an autobiography of somebody who achieved something
great later in life.  In fact, it is the adaptation of a semi-
autobiographical novel by Roland Schutt, so we know he at least became
a novelist.  The book was adapted for the screen and directed by Ake
Sandgren.
     THE SLINGSHOT takes its title from one of many applications young
Roland finds for the condoms that his mother illegally distributes.
Without understanding the actual purpose for the devices, he is able to
see in them and improvise several unexpected uses, each only getting
him into deeper trouble.  One keeps expecting somebody to notice the
genius of the ten-year-old, much as the boy comes to be appreciated in
MY LIFE AS A DOG, but this is not a film with simple answers and
obvious scenes.  Roland's rewards will be far more abstract and not so
dependent on others.
     Jesper Salen stars as Roland and manages a better performance with
more depth than many better-recognized actors in this country give.
Many actors his age just read lines and go through some motions for the
camera.  Jesper's acting is intelligent and convincing.  You always
have a feeling that there really are intelligent mental processes
behind his actions.  Stallen Skarsgard plays Fritiof, the father who
thinks himself a great liberal thinker but who runs his family like a
despot.
     While the film leaves the character of Zipa (Basia Frydman) at the
stereotypical loving mother level, we do get to know a lot more of
Roland's father.  He is harsh and demanding of his sons.  He is
determined not to let a spinal condition, which is slowly taking away
his ability to walk, undermine his control on his family.  He is a
walking (or nearly so) contradiction trying to hold on to some of the
values of the past while trying to change the social order of his
country.  He despises the government while envying the trappings of
being the king--trappings that he gets a chance to sample for himself.
     Roland is not a victim of the Holocaust and he lives in a country
not generally associated with discrimination and bigotry.  But the
prejudice he faces is clearly a major part of forming his character and
his ability to remain strong and to rebound still makes for a moving
story which I give a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Miracle on 34th Street (1994)
     There are basically two reasons to remake a film.  One reason is
that movie theaters need something to thread into their projectors.
Here the urge is often to try to get the product made as quickly as
possible and to use as the blueprint a film that has already proven to
be an audience pleaser.  One can only hope that the filmmaker will
treat the original material with respect, particularly if the original
is a well-liked film.  The other reason for remaking a film is that
sometimes a filmmaker can discover a new slant on an old story and can
bring something fresh to the story.  And these reasons are in large
part in conflict since the first requires speed, the second slows down
the process.
     The new MIRACLE ON 34TH STREET feels like it was made for both
reasons.  The holiday season is coming and those projectors are hungry
to be fed.  What does the new version add?  Primarily what it adds is
color.  The original has become a great children's film that only
adults will watch.  Why?  Because it is real, real old, from the days
before people knew that movies need color, dude.  The choice seems to
be to colorize, to remake, or to just stop telling the story to
children.  Then I saw this film with absolutely the wrong audience, a
collection of film fans who obviously would have grown up with the
original and knew not to equate monochrome with bad filmmaking.  To
much of that audience this film was a purely redundant remake.
     I suppose I feel much the same way.  But I do admit it generally
did treat the material with a degree of respect.  So often films for
children have gunplay or people kicking other people or attempted
rapes, etc., ad nauseum.  But in this film, besides an attempted
corporate takeover by some shadowy bad guys, which admittedly I could
have done without, this is a likable and a faithful retelling.
     Kriss Kringle (played by Sir Richard Attenborough) is back on 34th
Street.  This time he is not in Macy's Department Store but in a
foundering store called Cole's.  (Macy's reportedly wanted no part ofa
remake that would claim they were in financial trouble.  Other stores
were anxious but none on 34th Street.)  Kriss is the best department
store Santa Claus that any store could have, with just one drawback.
Kriss actually thinks that he is Santa Claus.  And what is more he is
able to convince others of his insanity.  One of the people he would
like to convince is the store's hard-nosed special projects director,
Dorey Walker (Elizabeth Perkins), and her wide-eyed daughter Susan
(Mara Wilson).  But who does nor know the plot of MIRACLE ON 34TH
STREET, one of the perennial holiday classics.
     Kriss is played by Sir Richard Attenborough, formerly of JURASSIC
PARK.  He is still trying to give children something real, but this
time around it is something that won't bite them.  Where Edmund Gwen
was smiling and pleasant, Sir Richard genuinely radiates joy.  His
short beard is a bit of a problem, particularly since young Susan
claims he looks like all the pictures of Santa Claus, but otherwise he
is more satisfying in the role by objective standards.  Mara Wilson
plays young Susan, the wide-eyed premature realist.  Wilson is not the
beautiful child that Natalie Wood was, but does seem to show an
intelligence far beyond her seven years of age.  Elizabeth Perkins and
Dylan McDermott play Dorey Walker and her suitor Bryan Bedford.  Each
know they have to out-act their predecessor in the previous film and
probably do.
     I do not remember the original giving much explanation why the
mother has her attitudes on the danger of living in fantasy.  This
version gives a fairly thin explanation, but at least it is there.  In
some ways it strengthens the new version, but the explanation is alsoa
bit downbeat for a children's film.  The happy climax of the film
trades the original's piles of mail for crowds of people and a much
better legal argument.  Strictly speaking, the happy ending of the
court case is far less contrived in this version, not that it will be
as satisfying to youngsters.
     It is hard to know exactly how to rate a remake.  Do you pretend
you never saw the original?  If so, then this is a fairly good film.
But, if like most people, you have seen the original, there is not a
whole lot new to offer.  Overall, I suppose I will rate it from the
latter point of view and give this a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Manon des sources (1986)
[There are two back issues that reviewed JEAN DE FLORETTE, the film that
preceded MANON: 00089 and 00149.  In addition, Mark did a review that was not
posted here but is also available.  Send mail to movies-request@mtgzy.att.com
to request them.  -ecl]
     A few months ago I reviewed JEAN DE FLORETTE, the film that makes up
the first half of the film adaptation of the novel of the same name by
Marcel Pagnol.  I refused to rate JEAN DE FLORETTE by itself because, unlike
some reviewers, I did not feel it stood by itself as a story.  The story
proceeds to a natural breaking point, but a point unsatisfying as an end of
a story.  MANON OF THE SPRING continues the story years later.  It works
only slightly better as a self-contained story and probably should not be
rated by itself either.  We have essentially a single film and the parts
should be separated by at most an intermission of an hour or so.  I cannot
help feeling that even more of the story would fit together for me had I not
allowed so long a time to elapse between seeing the two films.
     As MANON OF THE SPRING begins, Manon has grown into a beauty, but has
grown up a little wild in the hills where her father tried to build his
farm.  There is some question as to how much she knows of the events that
happened when she was a young girl.  Knowledge that the audience assumed she
already knew comes to her as a revelation that brings her to tears.  It is
only then that she starts plotting a revenge that I had earlier assumed she
had years to think about.  the story is engrossing and credible through most
of the film.  Then suddenly the plot twists again under the all-too-obvious
hand of the storyteller.  Rather than a solid drama, the film swerves into
melodrama trying too hard for too contrived an ending.
     But while the ending damages the credibility and dramatic power of the
story, it cannot damage the beautiful portrait of French village life.  This
is a film in which the background is as compelling as the foreground.  In
the final analysis, how people live is of more interest than what the people
do.  And the characters become more interesting as well.  Ugolin, who is
little more than a sidekick in the earlier, comes into his own as a
character.  His love for Manon, the woman he had wronged years earlier, is
pitiful and yet compelling.  The viewer almost hopes that he can be forgiven
the past and win Manon.
     JEAN DE FLORETTE and MANON OF THE SPRING together make up a very good
story that continues for nearly four hours without dragging.  Rate the pair
+2 on the -4 to +4 scale.  If you can manage it, see the two together.

Title
Review for Lost in Space (1998)
     Back in the 1965 Irwin Allen created a TV series, LOST IN SPACE,
based on the comic book SPACE FAMILY ROBINSON, itself a science fiction
adaptation of Johann David Wyss's SWISS FAMILY ROBINSON.  The series
lasted until 1968.  In the series seven people are present on an
experimental ship on a space mission when something went terribly wrong
and the whole group became, well ... lost in space. The characters were
the five-person Robinson Family, the pilot, and a stowaway enemy agent,
one Dr. Smith, whose initial goal was to destroy the mission.  The
family was unrealistic, even for the 1960s in that everybody seemed to
get along with everybody.  But Dr. Smith was adept at playing everybody
off against everybody else.  Smith was the embodiment of every negative
and dangerous human impulse but subtlety, yet the Robinson family never
seemed to catch on.  The special effects were bargain basement quality
for the most part.  When the LOST IN SPACE premiered, no less an expert
than Isaac Asimov wrote a letter reprinted in "TV Guide" about how
absurd the concept was.  It was a physical impossibility to travel so
fast and far in a few seconds that you could not even find familiar
stars in the sky.  I believe he claimed it was comparable to saying a
child on a tricycle took a wrong turn and found himself in another
country.
     There are at least two advantages to making a film of the story in
the late 1990s.  The story can be presented with superb special
effects.  I would rank the visual effects of this film just a few
microns below the quality one would expect from a STAR WARS film.  The
other advantage is that in these days of all kinds of theoretical holes
in physics--black, white, and worm--you would never get a reputable
scientist willing to commit to the impossibility of finding a few-
second shortcut to some other arm of the galaxy.
     In the new film version the Earth has finally conquered war and is
ready to move on to conquering the universe.  People live together in
peace--all but some nasty holdouts called the Sedition.  John Robinson
(played by William Hurt) has devoted his life to science at the cost of
neglecting his loved ones.  As a result he has one deuce of a
dysfunctional family.  Wife Maureen and children Judy, Penny, and
Will--nobody gets along.  The world is just not as peaceful as it
initially would seem.  The Robinsons might almost be better called the
Bickersons.  But John has a plan for bringing his family together and
at the same time further his work.  The whole family is going to take a
little trip together to the Alpha star system to set up a jump gate for
instantaneous travel to that system.  After ten years of being cooped
up together in space, of course the Robinsons will get along.  Everyone
in the family recognizes this as one of Dad's less stellar ideas, but
he thinks it will bring the family.  Little does John know that the
forces of the Sedition have an agent, Dr. Smith (Gary Oldman) who is
trying to stop their little mission and kill the family.  Except for
the maladjusted family this is really the plot of the TV series, but
remarkably when watching the film, one does not think of it as being a
retread.  It feels freshly re-imagined as if we are seeing it for the
first time.
     I cannot say I am very fond of William Hurt's acting in general.
Like Harrison Ford he usually has this distant quality, as if he is
just a little bit high all the time.  Mimi Rogers plays a slightly
authoritarian Maureen Robinson.  As Will Robinson Jack Johnson is
considerably more natural than was TV's Billy Mumy.  Heather Graham
makes an okay Judy Robinson, but Lacey Chabert's Penny is annoying and
just about the last person I would want to be cooped up with for ten
years.  Matt LeBlanc as the pilot on the make with Judy is nearly as
bad.  Gary Oldman, however, is a big improvement over the TV series.
His TV equivalent Jonathan Harris was a comedy actor who was miscast
and never convincing as the sinister agent. Oldman adopts many of the
same gestures, but makes them sinister and mysterious.  And he does get
some good lines like a playful allusion to the original STAR TREK as he
complains "I'm a doctor, not a space explorer."
     It has been a while since the look of a science fiction film has
done much to excite me, but if this film has a hero, it is production
designer Norman Garwood.  Visually, LOST IN SPACE is very evocative of
1960s science fiction, but not of TV science fiction of the time.  What
I saw on the screen was what was on the covers of magazines and books
at the time of the TV series.  It was like the film was the result of
someone watching the TV series in 1965 and then visualizing it the way
cutting edge artists of the time would have.  I kept finding myself
enjoying just looking at the screen and thinking what a good cover for
ANALOG science fiction magazine this or that scene would make.  Under
Garwood's design, space is a sinister place, much more so than it was
in the TV series.  The one false move is a cartoon-like monkey that
seems like a fugitive from some other film.  Garwood does a little
playing around with the design of the robot, which changes over the
course of the film, finally getting the crystal crown that was its most
memorable feature of the design from the series.  The credits list
cameos from the original TV series.  I must not have noticed Angela
Cartwright, but it is much harder to miss June Lockhart and, of course,
the voice of the robot is the same.  The language is a little salacious
for what is predominantly a children's film, but perhaps that is a sign
of changing times.
     With the exception of Oldman's performance, this is a film I would
rather look at than listen to.  But it does manage to take old material
and breathe new life into it.  I rate it a 6 on the 0 to 10 scale and a
high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Grosse Pointe Blank (1997)
     The last film I saw with such hip yet unrealistic dialog had
Kenneth Branagh looking for revenge on his own uncle for the murder of
his father.  This is another smoothly written but violent tale of a man
in his twenties dressed in black who is seeking something different in
his life, but there the resemblance ends.  John Cusack is Martin Blank,
who has been out of high school for ten years, the last five of which
he has been a professional assassin.  Like Sam Spade he works out of a
dingy office where he is tended by a mothering secretary.  It might
have been fun to see a steamy relationship between him and his
secretary, but I think that the American public might not have been
ready for that given that his secretary was played by sister Joan
Cusack.  Martin's profession throughout is treated almost as just
another job.  His chief competitor is Mr. Grocer (Dan Aykroyd) a
cheerful killer who is trying to organize all the assassins and hit men
into a sort of a union so they could do less work for more money, but
would have to attend meetings.
     At the near insistence of his secretary he decides to attend his
ten-year class reunion in the posh Detroit suburb of Grosse Pointe.
Reticent at first, he decides he will combine questionable business
with dubious pleasure by performing a contract hit in the same area.
So off he goes to the reunion, but one of his first stops is to see his
old girl friend Debi Newberry (Minnie Driver) who now is best known in
Grosse Pointe as the host of a local radio program, making strange
elliptical comments on the music.  When the two of them get together,
it is going to be a bizarre weekend.
     Of course, bizarre is the word for Martin and just about everybody
he knows.  To anybody who asks what he does for a living, Martin very
openly admits he kills people.  The response is always a quip and at
first it seems that nobody is taking him very seriously.  However, when
he kills somebody late in the film, a high school buddy very matter-
of-factly helps him dispose of the body apparently without giving it a
second thought, as if he was helping Martin change a tire.  Often there
seems to be logic missing in the plot, but then plot frequently seems
to be only a vessel for the clever dialogue.  Not that what people say
makes sense all the time either.  The dialogue, like that in PULP
FICTION, is stylized, but somehow it never has the same spark and
sometimes just seems to be forced filler.  "What do you want in your
omelet?"  "Nothing." "Well, that technically is not an omelet."  The
line is neither accurate, realistic, nor funny.  But what can we expect
from a production company called "Caravan Pictures," and whose logo is
a solitary man walking down a road?  Unlike in PULP FICTION we feel we
are listening in on people who are all style and no substance.
     Some of the films better moments occur when the two Cusacks (John
and Joan--actually there are at least two more in the credits) play off
of each other.  It perhaps gives us a feel for what it must have been
like in the Cusack household.  The screenplay credits John for some of
the writing, though it might well be for ad libbed quips.  Minnie
Driver has a little less of the likable quality she generally exudes
due to being just a bit too smooth, much like her father, played by
Mitchell Ryan.  (Ryan, incidentally, has the distinction of playing in
three unrelated major films showing at the same time--THE DEVIL'S OWN
and LIAR LIAR.) Alan Arkin has a small part as Martin's analyst, but
comes off the most humane as the only person who seems really disturbed
by the fact that Martin kills people.
     Like most its characters GROSSE POINT BLANK is uneven, hard to
believe, occasionally funny, but has too much style and not enough
substance.  These are people who are thinking more about their next
clever comment than they are about killing.  The film is entertaining,
but its flippant attitude toward murder leaves a bad taste.  The film
gets a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Hunt for Red October, The (1990)
     Tom Clancy created a new market for the techno-thriller genre of
story-telling with his 1984 novel THE HUNT FOR RED OCTOBER.  This genre is
intended to tell a crackling good story about the military and at the same
time include a lot of "executive summary" explanations about what equipment
is used, how strategy is determined, and anything else about defense that
comes up in the course of the story.  There was enough technical detail--
though its accuracy has since been questioned--that the book became the
first fiction publication of the Naval Institute Press, whose usual fare was
dry reference material on subject matter such as tides.  The book quickly
became that rarity today, a book that was not just a best-seller by its own
admission, but also in the public's perception.  When THE HUNT OF RED
OCTOBER made it to paperback, you saw *a lot* of people reading the
paperback.  (Personal note: shortly after the paperback came out, I read it
on a boat with less than a hundred passengers and I saw at least three other
copies being read.)  Now that best-seller has been filmed.
     Part of the irony of the film coming out now is that while the source
was greatly popular, it was all about the Cold War defense chess game that
the NATO countries play with the Soviet Union.  It is quite possible that
the genre that the book fostered is itself going to be the victim of new,
friendlier relations with the Soviet Union as, at least in the public
perception, the Cold War seems to be coming to an end.  I have yet to hear
anyone say that the nuclear submarine fleet is being dismantled or that
anyone has backed off of the edge-of-nuclear-war defense routine, so there
may still be material for new techno-thrillers that work as something other
than restricted period pieces.
     The reason that THE HUNT FOR RED OCTOBER could still be filmed is that
the plot did not include anything the public would have known about at the
time so the film could still take the stance that this whole story is true
and the proof is that both the Americans and the Soviets deny that it ever
happened.  However, some of the edge is taken off the story because the book
gets its real tension from the ever-present possibility that the events told
will lead to a nuclear strike on the United States.  Read as a contemporary
novel in 1984 or shortly after, that was a real possibility for what could
take place in the story.  That Sword-of-Damocles tension is missing from the
film because--and I say this as only a minor spoiler--there do not appear to
have been any nuclear strikes on major American cities at any time in the
early 1980s.
     "On November 13, 1984, approximately four months before Mikhail
Gorbachev took power in the Soviet Union" (the story begins), the Soviets
had a new super-submarine, the Red October, which featured a nearly silent
underwater jet-propulsion system.  This nifty little gimcrack has but one
conceivable use.  It is unstoppable as a first-strike device that undetected
could nuzzle up close to the American coastline and then start firing
nuclear missiles.  And for the maiden voyage of the super-sub they had
chosen to command their top submarine commander Marko Ramius (played by Sean
Connery).  Their joy at this great Cold War victory was short-lived,
however.  Ramius steals the Red October and heads it for parts unknown.  Now
both sides desperately want to get their hands on the Red October and
neither side knows for sure what Ramius intends to do with the submarine.
     It is, of course, impossible to take all of the action of a novel such
as THE HUNT FOR RED OCTOBER and put it into a film of standard length.  It
is even more true with this novel than it would be for most novels, since
the original was very heavy with military aircraft of many different sorts,
very few of which made it to the film adaptation.  They seem to have
whittled down the novel with a very large knife.  One of the most lamentable
deletions was Ramius's actual motivation for doing what he is doing.  In the
book that made the character what he was and added a very tragic dimension
to his character and at the same time said something worth saying about life
in the Soviet Union.  Perhaps in an efforts to make all its negative
statements about the Soviets applicable *only* to the pre-Gorbachev years,
the film blunts its social statement that still might be applicable.  The bad
guy of this film is a Soviet point of view that is seen as being strictly
pre-Gorbachev.  Another lamented deletion, if only because I would have
liked to see Industrial Light and Magic's visual rendering, is that there is
no nuclear meltdown on a Soviet submarine. This scene was a descriptive
centerpiece for the novel and it should have been a visual centerpiece of
the film.
     That brings us to the visual effects that were in the film.  They were
sufficient to tell the story and occasionally very nice indeed but
surprisingly shoddy in other places.  One in particular that did not work is
showing a torpedo coming at the viewer.  The technique they used, harkening
back to effects of the 1960s, is to superimpose a picture of the torpedo on
the background and then just increase the size of the inset picture.  You
see this technique in films such as ROBINSON CRUSOE ON MARS, which had a
budget a small fraction of that of THE HUNT FOR RED OCTOBER.  In truth, it
is done better here but it still robs the scene of some of the three-
dimensional effect.  The film also had a problem with some obvious matte
lines.  I suspect, however, the films needs to take some liberties with
visual effects if for no other reason than that seeing actual submarine
fights at the proper depth it might be difficult for the viewer to see very
much or to tell what is going on.  The underwater visuals probably told the
story more clearly than was realistic for them to tell it.
     Also adding to the effect is a score by a master film composer whose
work is all too rarely heard, Basil Polidouris.  He has scored at least two
films before on the them of American-Soviet relations, RED DAWN and AMERIKA,
though his masterpiece was his rich and varied score for CONAN THE
BARBARIAN, by far the best thing about that film.  In THE HUNT FOR RED
OCTOBER, his score seems to have been influenced by the music of the Russian
Army Chorus and Band.  And while it may not have been a very original or
creative choice, it certainly was a proper one and the choral pieces do make
for magnificent sections of music.
     Finally, some mention should be made of the casting.  Sean Connery, of
course, was not the first choice for Ramius.  That choice was German actor
Klaus Maria Brandauer whom Sean Connery defeated in NEVER SAY NEVER AGAIN
and whom he beat one more time in the casting of THE HUNT FOR RED OCTOBER.
I suspect Brandauer could have done Ramius a little better since he does not
have a Scottish accent.  And perhaps to the ears of the public a German
accent sounds more Russian than a Scottish one does.  However, if the public
thinks that Edinburgh-raised Connery does not sound sufficiently Russian,
the producers could counter that he really is not supposed to be.  Ramius is
not Russian--he is Lithuanian!  Actually, accents brings up one of the
film's major implausibilities.  It is hard to believe that any Biblical
passage, no matter how powerful, could make an entire Soviet submarine crew
speak English and not even realize they were doing it.  (That's an inside
joke for people who have seen the film.)
     Second lead went to Alec Baldwin as CIA analyst Jack Ryan, a continuing
character in Clancy's novels.  Baldwin, who played the somewhat simpy
ghost-husband in BEETLEJUICE, is actually a very good Ryan, a family man
with a fear of flying who also has just a bit of Sherlock Holmes in him.  He
has a very winning combination of high competence and vulnerability.  Like
Ramius, he is also a renegade with very strong opinions.  One of the nice
touches of the script (and counter to the cliche) is that while Ramius has
actually read Ryan's books on military history, he does not think very much
of them.
     THE HUNT FOR RED OCTOBER has a heavy sprinkling of familiar faces in
other roles.  Scott Glenn is crisp as submarine captain Marcuso.  Sam Neill
is a little too sugary as Ramius's second-in-command.  Then there is James
Earl Jones, Joss Ackland, Richard Jordan (in a role as a wily politician
that is somewhat of a departure for him), Peter Firth, Tim Curry (as the Red
October's goggle-eyed surgeon), and Jeffrey Jones.
     While this seems more a Readers' Digest condensation of the Clancy
novel, much scaled down for the big screen, it certainly is a good adventure
yarn, particularly welcome because it was not saved for a summertime
release.  I rate it a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Apt Pupil (1998)
     CAPSULE: A boy fascinated by the Holocaust finds a fugitive war
criminal living in his neighborhood.  What follows is a battle for
power of each over the other.  The theme of the Holocaust seems
misused.  Good performance from Ian McKellan (so what else is new?).
Rating:  6 (0 to 10), 1 (-4 to +4)
   - Directed by Bryan Singer though APT PUPIL is not nearly as good as
     his THE USUAL SUSPECTS.
   - Todd Bowden (Brad Renfro) is fascinated by the Holocaust and has
     memorized pictures of all the principles so he recognizes Kurt
     Dussander "the Butcher of Treblinka" (Ian McKellan) when he sees
     him on a cross-town bus.  With photographs and fingerprints he
     gets evidence that this Arthur Denker really is the Kurt Dussander
     whom he thinks he has found, then follows a game of power between
     the two.  Initially Todd just wants to hear an eyewitness account.
     But the game between the two becomes more serious.
   - We never find out why Todd is so interested or what his point of
     view is.  In the final analysis APT PUPIL has little to do with
     the Holocaust.  It is just there as an excuse why Todd knows
     something that had can blackmail Denker with.  In fact, it ruins
     some of the credibility.  Denker tries to blackmail Todd by
     threatening going public.  A war criminal would never do that.
   - Some shocking scenes where Todd uses Denker as a puppet.
   - Todd wants to understand the Holocaust better than he can from
     books but  the script does not have anything for Dussander to
     reveal about the Holocaust that is not already common knowledge.
   - When Todd's grades suffer, the guidance counselor makes an offer
     to Todd that no high school would ever offer.  It is convenient
     for the plot, but makes no sense.
   - Denker is fighting to defend a meaningless existence of drinking
     whiskey and watching cartoons.
   - It was not six million people killed in the Holocaust, it was six
     million *Jews*.  There were ten to twelve million *people* killed.
     And a pie graph on the board seems to show only about a third
     where it was really a much higher proportion.
   - A simple documentary about the Holocaust like "Night and Fog" is
     far more chilling than anything that Singer managed to get on the
     screen.  What is a single murder next to ten million murders?

Title
Review for Tale of Sweety Barrett, The (1998)
     CAPSULE: In a remote Irish fishing village the village simpleton
comes into conflict with a corrupt and tyrannical policeman.  Nicely
filmed and well acted but the story is overly familiar and invites
comparison to SLING BLADE.  Rating:  7 (0 to 10), +2 (-4 to +4)
   - Directed by Stephen Bradley
   - Mentally retarded circus performer is let go by the circus and
     must fend for himself.  He comes to live in a fishing village and
     makes friends with a young boy.  He is on a collision course with
     a corrupt policeman who rather than fighting the local crime
     actually directs it.
   - There is a lot of nice local feel to the film.
   - The story is a bit stereotypical and predictable.  Director is a
     first timer, however.
   - Good menacing performance by Liam Cunningham.
   - Rather appealing young Irish child.  Most of the characters are
     appealing, though showing a little more of life in the village
     might be a good idea.
   - It's a little hard to judge Barrett's intelligence level at times.
     He seems almost simple by choice.
   - Cruel jokes are played on Barrett by people of village.  He just
     tolerates them.
   - Seems like a big buildup to not very much of a climax.

Title
Review for Phantoms (1998)
     If you are going to take a long novel and adapt it for the screen,
you are essentially cutting it to the length of a novelette.  Something
has to go.  It must have been a painful task for Dean Koontz to cut
down the scope of his novel.  He had to make a lot of choices as to
what would play to a horror film audience.  I remember consciously
thinking when I read the novel PHANTOMS that I would have been willing
to go through everything in the novel up to this point, all the horror,
if I could just be in on this one conversation between a human and...
well... something that was definitely a long way beyond human.  That
moment--chapters long in the book--either did not make it to the film
or passes by so quickly that it is hardly noticeable.  The moments when
something violent or repulsive is happening seem to go on forever, but
my little moment with its sense of wonder seems to have been pushed
aside.  Shame on you, Mr. Koontz, for not recognizing what was really
unique powerful about your own novel.  Instead we have one more horror
film with grisly gore and in-your-face special effects.  On the other
hand, at least it is played seriously.  This is all material that could
have been played for laughs and perhaps the film's greatest strength is
that it was not  If anyone is going to treat Koontz's ideas seriously,
it is going to be Koontz.
     Dr. Jennifer Pailey (played by Joanna Going) lives in the high
Colorado town of Snowfield.  She brings her sister Lisa (Rose McGowan)
to the town for a visit and to get her away from the corrupting
influence of life in Los Angeles.  She does not imagine that what she
is bringing Lisa to is far worse than what she is leaving. Their first
discovery on arriving is that Jenny's landlady is lying dead on the
floor of her home, her skin having turned strange colors.  It is quite
a shock, and it is only the first.  When they go to report it to the
police, the officer on duty is dead with identical symptoms.  Most of
the town is empty and those that are still there are dead.  This
explains why the streets seem so quiet.  As in ANDROMEDA STRAIN they
find that whenever it happened, whatever "it" was, some people died
immediately and some went slowly insane. Finally after wandering the
museum of horror that had been Snowfield, they find three living
people, the sheriff (played by Ben Affleck) and his two deputies, also
returning from out of town.  As they investigate they find the
telephones will connect them only with a mumbling presence, but
whatever killed the town is still present and still a danger.  More
exploration turns up no new survivors, but a cryptic message "Timothy
Flyte the Ancient Enemy."  It is on this clue that the whole
understanding of the nature of the menace will hinge.  Eventually the
military is informed of what has happened and they enter the town to
find out what has happened.  The Army brings in a scientist (Peter
O'Toole) with an oddball theory as to what happened to Snowfield, tying
it into previously unexplained historical incidents.
     The cast is of lesser-known actors, all but Ben Affleck and, of
course, Peter O'Toole.  Frankly, great actors are not really needed
here, though the script calls for some, the doctor and the sheriff,
perhaps to be a little older than the very young actors featured in
this film.  Under the direction Joe Chappelle the principles give their
lines but add little to the film beyond acting menaced.  There is only
one actor who has to go beyond that.  Peter O'Toole has to act the role
of a latter-day Dr. Van Helsing, a joke in the scientific community but
with the spark of an idea that might explain a lot of history.  He has
to walk a gentle tightrope between being wise and being a little
unstrung.  That is the same tightrope that O'Toole had to walk in
LAWRENCE OF ARABIA, and in spite of my initial skepticism on seeing him
in the role, perhaps he was just what it needed.
     PHANTOMS runs its good ideas past the viewer much too fast, but at
least they are there.  It feels like a very much scaled down version of
the novel.  I give it a 6 on the 0 to 10 scale and high +1 on the -4 to
+4 scale.
     Spoiler...Spoiler...Spoiler...Spoiler.. .
     What is nicely done in the film but far better in the book is how
the theories of the nature of the enemy change in the course of the
book.  It starts seeming like some sort of disease, a la THE ANDROMEDA
STRAIN.  Then it appears more malevolent and seems like some sort of
shape-changer.  Then the characters realize they are in contact with,
and talking to, the force of evil going back to the beginning of time.
They are essentially in conversation with the Devil and it is affably
talking to them.  Think of what an opportunity that would be.  The film
sort of flashes over it, but what if you really could discuss history
with the force behind all evil.  Suppose you could discuss history with
a being that has been here since the beginnings of time, marshaling the
most powerful side in the battle between good and evil.  What would you
ask first?  I mean this would be better than getting Saddam Hussein on
MEET THE PRESS.  Finally the concept transforms again to come up with a
science fictional explanation for the Devil through the ages and even
that concept is intriguing.  It is much muted in this adaptation, but
even in the film some intriguing possibilities come through.

Title
Review for Espinazo del Diablo, El (2001)
    CAPSULE: During the Spanish Civil War young Carlos is sent to 
    a dreary orphanage complete with an unexploded bomb in the 
    courtyard, a murder mystery, and a restless spirit.  His life 
    may depend on his learning the secret of the phantom.  This is 
    a stylish ghost story and murder mystery, though the emphasis 
    is on the murder mystery.  The writer and director is the 
    incomparable Guillermo del Toro.  Rating: 8 (0 to 10), high +2 
    (-4 to +4) 
The Golden Age of the Mexican horror film was during the 1950s and 
1960s.  During this period the Mexican film industry turned out 
horror films with more enthusiasm than budget or quality.  
Featured in the films were vampires, werewolves, Aztec mummies, 
and professional wrestlers.  The latter were usually heroes.  They 
may not have gotten theatrical release in this country but the 
films would occasionally be pressed into service for late night 
horror film programs.  Beyond that they were not much seen in the 
US.  The supply died in the late 1960s and for a long time there 
were no horror films from Mexico.  In 1993 a quality Mexican 
horror film, CRONOS, directed by Guillermo del Toro, was released.  
It was good enough that it played here mostly in art houses.  In 
1997 del Toro released another film, MIMIC.  Both are atmospheric 
and visually remarkable films.  THE DEVIL'S BACKBONE is the third 
from del Toro, a stylish ghost story set in a boarding school near 
end of the Spanish Civil War. 
The film opens with a bomb bay opening and a bomb being dropped.  
The bomb falls in a schoolyard, but does not explode.  To this 
same school is brought Carlos (played by Fernando Tielve), a new 
student.  Almost immediately on arrival Carlos sees a ghostly 
presence in a doorway and the sight will shape his life at the 
school.  Carlos has a hard time adapting to the new school and 
winning the friendship of the other students.  Bigger children 
bully him and the teachers unfairly discipline him.  But more 
unusual and more disturbing is that he continues to see the 
ghostly presence.  At night he will see a shadow of the specter by 
his bed.  He soon finds out the ghost is called by the other 
children "the one who sighs."  The ghost might be Santi is a 
fellow student who disappeared and was thought to be murdered.  
The students are all terrified of Santi, but Carlos a bit less 
than the others are.  For this reason Santi seems more willing to 
appear to him.  Carlos learns about the school staff through 
little clandestine nighttime spying trips.  He learns particularly 
about Professor Casares (Federico Luppi of CRONOS), his wife 
Carmen (Marisa Paredes), and the handyman, the handsome Jacinto 
(Eduardo Noriega). 
THE DEVIL'S BACKBONE is only partially a ghost story.  It part it 
is a standard boarding school story with horrors coming as much 
from the school bully as from the ghost.  Eventually Carlos will 
have to find how it was that Santi became a ghost.  The script of 
this film was del Toro's school thesis.  Taking place in wartime 
and with a killer in the story, one might think the film could 
easily enough horror without a ghost.  Even if all the elements 
are not necessary for the story, they are fit together in a very 
nice way.  Del Toro has a beautiful eye for color and landscape.  
So in spite of the fact that some of the horror effects not 
particularly unique and the ghost is not frightening  for long, 
the sheer beauty of the film's production make this a pleasure to  
watch.  Del Toro keeps the digital work to a minimum and when he 
uses it, he uses it well.  This is not the original film that 
CRONOS was, but it does work. 
Sadly Mexican horror died in the late 1960s before it could really 
get going.  Guillermo del Toro has brought about a minor rebirth 
and is the only director keeping it alive.  But he is just about 
the best Mexico has ever had and is one of the best horror 
directors making films today.  I rate the Mexican/Spanish 
production THE DEVIL'S BACKBONE an 8 on the 0 to 10 scale and a 
high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale. 

Title
Review for Trance (1998/I)
     CAPSULE: This is the kind of film you used to see in the 60s from
small studios like Tigon.  An American couple finds themselves in a
huge old Irish house with a mad woman stalking the hallways, and, oh
yes, a 2000-year-old Druid witch is also running around and shape-
changing.  Once it gets going it is entertaining but it would be hard
to claim it is actually a good film.  Rating: 5 (0 to 10),  low +1 (-4
to +4)
   - Written and directed by Michael Almereyda who directed the vampire
     film NADJA.
   - Far less experimental than NADJA but more coherent.
   - Alcoholic American couple Nora (Alison Eliot) and Jeff (Jared
     Harris) take young son and visit wife's family mansion in Ireland.
   - Huge brooding mansion beside the ocean.  Nora's grandmother is
     near 90 and senile.  Her uncle is nearly blind, but he continues
     his experimentation with a 2000-year-old petrified body found in
     the bogs and now in the basement.
   - Nora and Jeff are trying to give up alcohol, or so they tell
     themselves.  Very flip as if always drunk.
   - Irish accent is hard to understand at times.
   - Harris's acting style is very much like Christopher Walken's.
   - Myth of Earth and Sky: At the beginning of the world there was
     just Earth and Sky and they greatly loved each other.  Then they
     were separated.  When it rains the Sky is trying to touch the
     Earth.

Title
Review for Dragonheart (1996)
     Some of my best friends do not understand why I am an admirer of
the film DRAGONSLAYER.  I am not as a rule a reader of fantasy and when
I am culling my collection of books, the books that have dragons on the
covers seem to be among the first candidates to go.  Dragons have been
almost as over-used in fantasy novels as vampire have been in horror
novels.  Yet though I am not a fan of dragon stories, still I found
myself totally floored by DRAGONSLAYER for some of the plot turns, many
of the touches in the script, and especially for Vermithrax Pejorative,
the most magnificent dragon ever portrayed on the screen.  It is
difficult to just put wings on a something that just looks like a
dinosaur or a serpent and expect that it will seem like something that
could fly.  Yet it just takes one look at Vermithrax Pejorative to know
that she was meant to soar in the air and not walk on the ground.  But
as much as I liked DRAGONSLAYER, I knew few people had my admiration
for that film.  At least I thought they did not until I saw the
trailers for DRAGONHEART.  They did not show a lot of the dragon, but
what I could see reminded me of DRAGONSLAYER and made it look like it
could almost be a sequel. Sadly, DRAGONHEART is not the follow-up film
I would have wanted, but it does have some moderately sophisticated
fantasy ideas and its dragon is a nice construction, if not as
aerodynamic as old Vermithrax Pejorative.  In fact, one really doubts
that DRAGONHEART's dragon really would be able to fly.
     In this film dragons are an old race that is dying out in large
part for having been killed off by humans.  That seems particularly
short-sighted on the part of the humans since the dragons, we are told,
are mystical creatures who for some unexplained reason love humans and
want them to prosper and be happy.  They seem to be perfectly happy to
forgive humans for wiping out their race.  DRAGONHEART is the story of
the friendship between the last dragon left in the world (voiced by
Sean Connery) and the knight and dragonslayer Bowen (played by Dennis
Quaid), the man who killed the second-to-last dragon.  Draco, as the
dragon is nicknamed--we are almost but not quite told his real name,
bears no animosity toward Bowen for being responsible for the death of
the last few of his species.  Draco just wants Bowen to help him stand
up for humans.  If this seems a little saccharine, well, this is no
DRAGONSLAYER.  But I am getting ahead of myself.  As the story opens
Bowen is the teacher of Einon (Lee Oakes as a boy, David Thewlis as a
man).  Einon is the son of a powerful tyrant king, and he is killed in
a peasant uprising.  Einon's mother, Aislinn (Julie Christie, in
entirely too much makeup for 984 A.D.), takes the dead boy to a local
dragon who performs a mystical operation somehow wedding the bodies of
the dragon and the boy.  The operation is a success, but the boy is
almost immediately seduced by the dark side of his own power.  Bowen is
angered at what the dragon has done to Einon and goes off in search of
dragons to slay.  Twelve years later (or just exactly one millennium
ago) Einon has become a worse tyrant than his father and the
dragonslayer Bowen comes upon the dragon he will come to call Draco.
After a rocky start the two become fast friends.
     The initial conceit of having a dragon not just sound like Sean
Connery, but also have the mannerisms and even look a bit like him is
one of the biggest mistakes in the making of this film.  Certainly it
will add to the box-office appeal of the film, but it robs the dragon
of much of his mystical appeal and his credibility on the screen.
Granted, Connery is a better choice on which to base a dragon than,
say, Rodney Dangerfield.  But fantasy works best when one can suspend
disbelief and put oneself into its world.  The casting of Connery as
dragon is too much of a reminder that we cannot take all this
literally.  Some of the humor really tests our suspension of disbelief.
There is a comic dig at President Clinton, there are at least two
crotch jokes, there is a joke stolen from the "Wizard of Id" comic
strip.  But those are the bad touches.  Much of the script by Charles
Edward Pogue is intriguing as the dragon becomes a major character in
the story.  His code forces him to be an ally to some humans, notably
the down-trodden, some of whom are responsible for the killing off of
his species.  And yet his closest ties are with his worst enemy.  He is
not a monster, but more an erudite person.  Perhaps he is more close in
behavior and attitudes to Chinese dragons than to the fearsome
creatures of European lore.  Incidentally a look at the closing credits
indicates that much of the production was done in Eastern Europe,
particularly Slovakia, and that is a part of the world where dragon
lore is both popular and a local tradition.  A traveler in Eastern
Europe quickly loses count of the number of artistic renditions seen of
St. George and the Dragon, and one rather suspects that the reason is
not because people have a fascination with St. George.  The plot calls
upon a number of high-fantasy traditions and even has a short speech by
King Arthur voiced, if I am not mistaken, by an uncredited John
Gielgud.
     Dennis Quaid is starting to show his age, but does passably well
as Bowen even if his accent is a bit uneven.  Connery hams it up a
little as the dragon, but that is perhaps what is necessary to render
him so delightfully in to the form of the great beast.  Pete
Postlethwaite give a rare, overdone performance as a comic relief man
of the cloth who fancies himself a poet.  On the other hand David
Thewlis (of NAKED, BLACK BEAUTY, and RESTORATION) could have put a
little more oomph into his villain.  Coincidentally, Postlethwaite and
Thewlis both had parts in the recent JAMES AND THE GIANT PEACH.
Director Rob Cohen previously directed DRAGON: THE BRUCE LEE STORY, and
directed the upcoming DAYLIGHT which had a trailer at the showing of
DRAGONHEART.
     Rather than a fantasy that would work well for all ages, this
turns out to be a juvenile, but one good enough that adults can enjoy
it--which is not quite the same thing.  I rate it a +2 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Fly Away Home (1996)
     Young Amy Alden (Anna Paquin of THE PIANO) is the daughter of
separated parents, her mother living in New Zealand, her father (Jeff
Daniels) in Canada.  When her mother is killed in an automobile
accident, she must go to Canada and live with her father.  Now it is
clear to the audience that Thomas Alden is about as nifty a father as
anyone could have.  Non-conformist Dad creates fantasy sculptures and
builds and flies his own gliders.  But Amy refuses to forgive him for
separating from her mother.  The two absolutely cannot connect until
Amy needs her father's help.  She finds some goose eggs, ready to hatch
and broods them herself, inadvertently imprinting herself on the
goslings as their mother.  She then finds she has the responsibility to
raise them and teach them what geese need to know.  Her greatest
challenge is the dilemma of whether to have their wings clipped or to
teach them to migrate.  Finding the former unthinkable, she is left
with the seemingly impossible task of the latter.  It is her father's
idea to teach them how to migrate by actually leading them on a
migration with the use of a single-person aircraft he would build.
Even with so impossible a task, there are human impediments in their
way including a local official who insists that legally the young geese
have to have their wings clipped.  In some ways the plot of FLY AWAY
HOME has many of the same messages as APOLLO 13.  It teaches that faced
with a prodigious task you break it down into small pieces and solve
the problem a piece at a time.  And there is a fascination for the
audience in simply watching as the formidable list of obstacles is
whittled down one by one.
     Jeff Daniels adds another off-beat role to his collection,  this
one more charming than some of his other recent ones.  Anna Paquin
turns in a performance more like one would expect of a thirteen-year-
old than of an Oscar-winner.  Dana  Delaney is winning but does not
have enough to do as the father's girl friend (and by implication in
this family film, his lover).  Director Carroll Ballard previously
helmed the excellent NEVER CRY WOLF and the lyrical BLACK STALLION.
Like the latter film, this one starts very well but falls apart in the
final act when a race is thrown in to create synthetic tension.  In THE
BLACK STALLION, Ballard may have been constrained by the book on which
the film was based. However, FLY AWAY HOME had already taken large
liberties from the original story, part of the autobiography of Bill
Lishman, and one suspects that the final race against time was not in
Lishman's story.
     The photography is in the hands of Caleb Deschanel, who formerly
filmed THE BLACK STALLION for Ballard and more recently was Oscar-
nominated for THE RIGHT STUFF and THE NATURAL.  His photography of the
geese at all stages of their lives is flawless, though at times it
looks like the geese grow much too quickly, sometimes in a single day
of the plot.  Still, Deschanel's ability to capture the birds in flight
together with the small ultra-light airplanes is extraordinary.  Mark
Isham's score is generally undistinguished and usually just lays in the
background.  That is good because when the one song is sung it is
basically telling the audience just the same things they could see with
their own eyes if they have been paying attention.  Frankie Lane could
get away with that in the 50s, but it is a little out of place in the
90s. There is also something wrong with having Anna Paquin making a
plea for the protection of the natural world wearing two pendulous
earrings and a nose-ring.  There may be nothing wrong with the jewelry,
but it really is jarring to see it in this context.
     The film needed a final sequence better than a race against time
to preserve wetlands.  Also superfluous was the conflict with a local
game official and how it was resolved.  Telling this story simpler
would have been better and less might have been more.  Still, this is
one the adults will enjoy perhaps more than the children.  I give it a
high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Ba wang bie ji (1993)
     How much misery can anyone give to their art is the question asked by
FAREWELL MY CONCUBINE.  It is the story of a poor boy, the son of a
prostitute, who becomes a popular opera star, and of what is required of
him.  Douzi is groomed for only one role, the loyal concubine of a
defeated king who kills herself rather than desert her lover and
master.  Learning any role requires an incredible regimen of punishing
physical training and potentially lethal beatings from the sadistic
perfectionist schoolmaster.  Douzi's training entails an even worse
aspect--to better play a woman he has to offstage and on renounce his
gender entirely and think of himself as a woman for the rest of his
life.  He is paired to go through life with Shitou, the actor groomed
for the role of the king.  Once they achieve greatness Douzi's problems
are still only beginning.  Shitou decides to take a wife of his own, an
act of chivalry toward a prostitute.  But the pairing now turns into a
triangle.  Douzi is forced to take lovers, but only male ones.
     Just when this lifestyle looks like it cannot get worse, the Japanese
invade China.  This brings a new set of hardships, and yet another set of
hardships come along when the Nationalists regain China, the Communists
bring yet another bad turn that only gets worse with the Cultural
Revolution.  The film reminds one of a Dickens story except that things do
not get better with time.  The overall theme seems to be that when you are a
man slotted for the Beijing Opera to play a woman in a single role for your
whole life, that life is really a bitch and then you die.
     It is hard to imagine a much more nihilist film.  Every good deed that
one of our two characters performs results in all the more misery for them
or others.  If you are Chinese it is quite possible that there is a
perceivable nobility in all the pain, but--and I say this as someone who has
seen or heard several Beijing operas--it is very hard for a Westerner tp
appreciate the aesthetics of this art form.  Even without that there will be
some aspects of story that a Westerner will find hard to understand.
     At 170 minutes FAREWELL MY CONCUBINE is a difficult film to watch
particularly with its relentlessly downbeat theme.  There have been several
films this year with Chinese themes and this one is harder to recommend than
most.  With my limited understanding of Chinese culture I would rate this
film a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Waiting for Guffman (1996)
     The town of Blaine, Missouri, was a mistake from the very
beginning when pioneer Blaine Fabin overestimated the distance he had
brought his party and assumed they had reached California.  The
residents of this town appear to have over-estimated their
accomplishments ever since.  The town, famous for its footstools has
dubbed itself the Stool Capital of America.  As the town approaches its
sesquicentennial it is planning for a celebration large by Blaine
standards, capped by a play telling of major events of the history of
Blaine in a musical pageant called "Red, White, and Blaine."  The
production is to be put in the hands of the multi-untalented auteur
Corky St. Claire (played by Christopher Guest who also co-authored,
directed, and wrote some of the music for the film).  The stars of the
show are the town's myopic dentist (Eugene Levy), the town's two travel
agents (Fred Willard and Catherine O'Hara), the cute waitress from the
Dairy Queen (Parker Posey), and the town hunk (Matt Keeslar).  Corky is
temperamental and has the same over-estimation of his own abilities
that seems nearly universal in Blaine.  The only person in town who
seems to have any taste at all is the tightly wound music teacher who
leads the band in too small a part for Bob Balaban.  The film has
repeated gags on the ego and vulgarity of the town residents, but for
the most part the characters are more caricatures than believable
people.  WAITING FOR GUFFMAN might be more impressive if it was not so
similar in approach to the wonderfully-observed SMILE, directed by
Dennis Ritchie.  In that film, which tells the behind-the-scenes story
of a California town's hosting of a teenage beauty pageant, the
characters seem considerably more real and are at the same time a lot
more funny with often-caustic humor.
     Christopher Guest has written the meatiest role for himself as the
fey director and only at times has the talent to carry the film.  Guest
previously co-wrote THIS IS SPINAL TAP, but his most creative film was
THE BIG PICTURE, a particularly insightful lampoon of the Hollywood
film-making process.  Perhaps this film's most memorable image is
Guest's odd little improvisational stomach dance, done wearing his
pants backwards.  When the Abrahams and the Zucker Brothers proposed
making the film AIRPLANE!, the studio wanted to cast the film with
well-known comic actors in the major roles.  The filmmakers very
intelligently held out to get a set of actors not associated with
comedy and the film was all the more funny as a result.  Guest would
have been well-advised to follow a similar policy since one has already
seen over- the-top comedy performances by Levy, Willard, and O'Hara.
Their characters needed an air of authenticity and credibility that
these actors simply lack.
     WAITING FOR GUFFMAN is certainly worth a viewing for the parts
that do work, but afterwards, for a real treat, rent SMILE and see what
can really be done with a lampoon of a small town and its icons.  In
this film there certainly are at least three good laughs and no slow
portions, so WAITING FOR GUFFMAN does work as a comedy but it never
works well.  I rate it a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Sling Blade (1996)
     Very little seen but central to the film TO KILL A MOCKINGBIRD is
the figure of Boo Radley, played by Robert Duvall in his theatrical
cinema debut.  For years Radley has been his town's legendary monster
stemming from an act of seemingly senseless violence against his own
family.  Radley is, in reality, a simple and likable man who redeems
himself by another act of violence, a revolt against the hatred of
others.  Radley is not responsible for his own violence, but focuses
the callousness and evil around him, redirecting it back at its origin.
A nearly identical character--right down to having his shirt sleeves
too long--is Karl Childers, the center of an enigmatic black comedy
that is at times horrifying and at others amiable.  SLING BLADE was
written by, directed by, and stars Billy Bob Thornton.  It is an
expansion of the short film "Some Folks Call It a Sling Blade,"
directed by George Hickenlooper but also written by and directed by
Thornton.  In both films he plays Karl Childers a patient in an
Arkansas state mental institution.  Life there would not be bad if he
did not have to be immersed in the sadistic sexual recountings of
another patient, a predator played superbly by J. T. Walsh.
     Karl is given a chance to tell his own story to a visiting
reporter and though presented in a horrifying manner we begin to see
Karl as a victim, yet somehow one without an ounce of self-pity.  If we
blame Karl's parents for his condition, it is our decision and not
Karl's.  Karl remains completely dispassionate about his past and his
ability to do so makes his even more disturbing.  Maintaining through
the film a stone-like face with jutting lower lip he never shows any
emotion.  We are never sure what is happening behind that face and
indeed when one of the characters probes later in the film we find it
is either nothing or more likely it is well-hidden.  Reportedly up to
Karl telling his own story was all there was to Hickenlooper's original
short film, but Thornton was apparently intrigued by the character he
had written and played.  SLING BLADE continues the story with Karl
being released into what is for him a bewildering world.
     Karl is out for just a few hours when he befriends a boy about
twelve, Frank (Lucas Black) with roughly Karl's own mental capacity.
Karl and the unquestioning Frank become fast friends and he is accepted
almost as a family member in Frank's distressed family.  That Frank's
mother Linda (Natalie Canderday) accepts Karl seems almost more
believable than her acceptance of her own abusive boy friend Doyle
(Dwight Yoakam).  Doyle is a bad ol' boy who verbally savages Karl,
Frank, and Vaughan (John Ritter), Linda's gay boss.
     The plot from this point follows a predictable path, but the story
is not as important as the style and the textured look at life in a
small Arkansas town.  One can tell when a script is respected by the
people who agree to be in small roles in the film.  In SLING BLADE one
spots several familiar faces in tiny roles including Jim Jarmusch as an
ice cream stand boy and Robert Duvall in a tiny part as Karl's father,
perhaps as an allusion to his own Boo Radley role.  The photography is
usually a bit straightforward and not as interesting as it could be,
but as a first-time director Thornton has a sure hand.  And he writes a
script that is by turns sad, horrifying, and funny.  If the ending is a
little too neat, it also is clever and ironic.
     The subject matter may not be to everybody's taste but the film is
a winner on just about all counts.  Rate this one a +3 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Postman, The (1997)
     The plot has been done so many times in so many tiresome ways that
we really did not need one more. Society has been destroyed and
peaceful good guys of the world are menaced by marauding nasties.  Then
one hero (or perhaps a handful) stands up and saves the good guys.  It
is really SHANE turned into a science fiction film.  NO BLADE OF GRASS,
THE ROAD WARRIOR, WARRIORS OF THE WASTELAND, and any number of bad
sci-fi films on cable have used the plot because it does not require
fancy special effects to make a science fiction film.  Of course it can
still use up a big budget on the plot if the filmmaker wants.  Kevin
Costner's WATERWORLD is just one example.  Now Costner is back and,
surprise, it may be the best film on this theme ever made.  But it came
along too late and had a misleading trailer.  Had THE POSTMAN been made
in 1960--and except for having been based on a later novel it well
could have been--it might have been stiff competition for THE
MAGNIFICENT SEVEN.  But that was almost four decades ago.  Audiences
might have been more receptive to the film's idealism.  Today audiences
might be more cynical about the film's message of the power or idealism
and optimism.
     It should be noted that in spite of the impression given by the
trailer THE POSTMAN is not BACKDRAFT with mailmen.  The film is *not* a
tribute to the loyalty and service of letter carriers.  That would be a
cause whose banality would be second only to that of the importance of
good dental hygiene. The trailer gave audiences that impression, and as
such it may turn out to be the most disastrous movie trailer in cinema
history.  I saw this film at a Saturday matinee and there were four
people in the audience, three of which were my group.  This film is not
STAR WARS, but it is not that bad of a film either.  It is considerably
better than ROBIN HOOD, PRINCE OF THIEVES.
     We never do find out exactly what the war was that destroyed
civilization.  There was ground fighting in the United States and there
was either a nuclear winter or something similar.  In any case, the
world of 2013 is little pockets of people trying to scratch out a
subsistence living.  Making that more difficult are "the Holnists," a
private army, raiding small settlements.  The leader of the Holnists is
the fascist General Bethlehem (played with nice savagery by Will
Patton).  Bethlehem spouts the self-reliance rhetoric of the right wing
taken to a sadistic extreme.  Kevin Costner plays a drifter, a sometime
Shakespeare player, who is conscripted into the Holnists, meeting their
admission criteria ("if you are between fifteen and fifty and of
suitable ethnic foundation...")  When the drifter finds the opportunity
he escapes.  On the run, he finds a post office jeep with a skeleton of
a postman inside.  He thinks up a scam to get some food. Putting on the
postman's uniform, he takes some letters to a small nearby community of
Pinetree, Oregon, to deliver.  He claims to be an official postman
appointed by the newly reformed government and they have a
responsibility to feed and house him while he performs his duty.  The
effect is totally unexpected. These are people desperately in need of
good news and a return to the world that they knew.  (There is an
amusing scene earlier demonstrating that even Bethlehem's army is tired
of all the violence in their lives and refuses to watch UNIVERSAL
SOLDIER on a movie screen when there is THE SOUND OF MUSIC to watch.)
The Postman is treated by the settlement as a romantic hero.  His false
story rekindles optimism.  Writing a letter for the postman to deliver
becomes a symbolic act signifying faith in the new government.
     With a government to help protect them, people are willing to
resist the Holnists.  This hope and optimism is something that
Bethlehem cannot allow ("morale is a dangerous thing"), but also cannot
stop. Two people are especially affected by the visit of the Postman.
One is Abby (Olivia Williams) who is looking for someone to impregnate
her.  Her husband is impotent and both have decided to find someone
virile to act as biological father, especially one who will not be
around much.  The Postman fills the bill. The other person affected is
a black teen who goes by the name Ford Lincoln Mercury (Larenz Tate).
He is so inspired by the Postman, he decides on the spot that he will
become a Postman also.
Playing another clean-cut hero, albeit an involuntary one, will not do
much for Costner's career even if this film does find an audience.
There is little in his role that Costner has not done many times
before. There probably is little in the role of the idealistic savior
that he could not do in his sleep.  Will Patton, on the other hand, is
spell-binding playing the self-indulgent and inflexible fascist leader
with total conviction.  He plays the part like some great but strange
Civil War general.  Olivia Williams is sharp and smart as Abby.  Most
of the cast are little known but good actors while a few of the
characters are a little too cloyingly polished and pretty for their
roles--specifically a child actor handing off a letter to a racing
Costner.  But generally Stephen F. Windon provides some terrific images
of Oregon and Utah.  James Newton Howard provides a stirring if not
greatly original score.
     This film covers thematic territory that has become too familiar
from too many lesser films.  And then it made the further mistake of
releasing to theaters a trailer that distorted the thrust of this film.
Get past those two problems and this is actually not too bad a story,
even at its three-hour length.  I rate it a 6 on the 0 to 10 scale and
a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for West of Zanzibar (1928)
     I am from the generation of horror film fans that grew up with Forrest
J. Ackerman's magazine FAMOUS MONSTERS OF FILMLAND.  It was a magazine of
dubious literary merits created by a man of questionable writing talent or
cinematic taste, but he did grow up with fantasy films of the silent era and
he did give his readers a perspective that the horror film had a long and
proud history stretching back into the silent era.  These days if you read
the electronic bulletin boards you often find someone trying to identify a
"really old" horror film that turns out to be eight years old.  Readers of
FAMOUS MONSTERS knew that eight years did not make a film "really old."
     Forry's magazine's illustrations made me familiar with cinematic images
than the silent days of film and made me anxious to see the whole film.  For
a handful of films it turned out not to be a really great effort.  Silent
films like THE PHANTOM OF THE OPERA or METROPOLIS were not very difficult to
locate, even in the days before video.  They were available.  Now advances
in video technology have made the seeing of old classic films--and even the
owning of copies of those films--far easier than at any time in the past.
But even so, some classics have remained out of reach due to low demand.  I
am certain I will never see many of the classic silent films of which I have
heard.  Some, like LONDON AFTER MIDNIGHT, are thought to be completely lost.
But there are many others I have never heard were available or were lost.
It is a rare pleasure when one of these films surfaces.  In the last month
or so, three classic silent films have become available to me.  Three films
that until now have been legendary to me are now showing up in my
collection.
     Those films are THE HANDS OF ORLAC, WEST OF ZANZIBAR, and THE MAN WHO
LAUGHS.  WEST OF ZANZIBAR features Lon Chaney (Sr.).  The other two feature
Conrad Veidt.  But Veidt was very much Germany's "Man of a Thousand Faces,"
just as Chaney was in the United States.  The MAN WHO LAUGHS may star Veidt,
but it has strong echoes of Chaney.  It almost certainly was made to
recapture the popularity of the THE HUNCHBACK OF NOTRE DAME and THE PHANTOM
OF THE OPERA.  It too is a period piece with a stigmatized and disfigured
central character.  THE MAN WHO LAUGHS is almost halfway a Chaney film,
being based on a novel by the same author as THE HUNCHBACK OF NOTRE DAME and
using PHANTOM's co-star, Mary Philbin.  All three of these films involve men
who have been abused or injured.  Each in its own way is a study of stigma.
     It is one of the unfortunate characteristics of film that visual images
slow down the story-telling.  It takes the camera a lot longer to show you
images that can be described in less time.  Of course, to describe a scene
fully one picture is worth a thousand words, but rarely is it necessarily to
describe a scene fully in telling a story.  Silent film is even slower at
telling a story, since a much higher proportion of the story is told by
visual images.  For this reason, silent films will often be more simple
stories than sound films of equivalent length, though they can be just as
much or even more atmospheric.  The whole story of THE HANDS OF ORLAC (1924)
could well be told in six or seven sentences--including plot twists I will
not reveal.
     THE HANDS OF ORLAC reunites THE CABINET OF DR. CALIGARI director and
its star.  Robert Weine directs the vastly under-appreciated horror actor
Conrad Veidt in this adaptation of Maurice Renard's novel.  The story should
be familiar to any who have seen the three other film versions including MAD
LOVE (1935), HANDS OF ORLAC (a.k.a. HANDS OF A STRANGLER) (1960), and HANDS
OF A STRANGER (1962).  Paul Orlac is a great concert pianist who loses his
own hands in a train wreck.  In their place, a surgeon grafts the hands of a
guillotined knife murderer, Vasseur.  To Orlac's horror the hands seem to
desire to return to their career of crime.  It is an idea that would be used
many times in film, but this was the first and perhaps the most stylish use
of the idea.
     Under Weine's direction, Veidt's acting is very effective as a man
almost being dragged around by his own hands.  Veidt's face shows increasing
madness as the film progresses.  Perhaps the most effective image of the
film shows a crazed Veidt, a mad look on his face, as his half-clenched
hand, filmed in the foreground, seems to be leading or even dragging him.
Beyond this the film has a gratuitously Gothic feel, the camera making much
of taking place in a cavernous old house with its huge bullet-shaped
doorways.  It is a style that would later be imitated by Universal Studios
in their 30s horror cycle.
     More could be done with this story, as Karl Freund's MAD LOVE would
prove.  Still, the film has enough of its share of effective images to make
it worth seeking out.
     Most people who are fans of horror films--and who know a little
something of the history of the horror film--respect the name of Lon Chaney.
Chaney is the best-remembered horror actor of the silent era, at least for
his silent work.  (Karloff, of course, had his share of horror parts in the
silent era, but he is remembered much more for his sound roles.)  Chaney is
the American horror actor most associated with the silent era.  But oddly,
his current reputation is based for all but a few horror fans on only two
roles and a few stills from other films.  It is relatively easy to find
opportunity to see THE HUNCHBACK OF NOTRE DAME (1923) and THE PHANTOM OF THE
OPERA (1925).  But how many of us have seen SHADOWS (1922), A BLIND BARGAIN
(1922), THE TRAP (1922), or THE SHOCK (1923)?  Films like LONDON AFTER
MIDNIGHT (1927) appear to be totally lost.  Most of his other roles require
some effort to find.  Resurrected for Turner cable television is one of his
more interesting efforts, Tod Browning's WEST OF ZANZIBAR.
     Browning is best remembered as the director of the 1930 film DRACULA,
and is a bit less well-remembered for FREAKS (1932), but he has a number of
interesting films to his credit.  He did several previous films with Chaney
including THE UNHOLY THREE (1925), THE BLACKBIRD (1926), THE ROAD TO
MANDALAY (1926), and the lost and legendary LONDON AFTER MIDNIGHT (1927).
He is also remembered for two sound era films:  MARK OF THE VAMPIRE, his
1935 remake of LONDON AFTER MIDNIGHT with Bela Lugosi and Lionel Barrymore,
and his 1936 DEVIL DOLL, again with Barrymore.
     The story opens in a London music hall.  Phroso the Magician (played by
Chaney) is a popular attraction, particularly when he performs the illusion
of turning a skeleton into his beautiful wife.  How, his wife is more
interested in Crane, an ivory trader played by a young and handsome Lionel
Barrymore.  Phroso gets into a fight with Crane only to have his back
broken.  The magician has lost both his wife and the use of his legs in one
evening.  Some years later, Phroso's wife returns from Africa, dying and
with Crane's baby.  Phroso decides to take revenge on Crane and his
daughter.  Flash forward eighteen years and Phroso is no more, but in his
place is the vengeful mystery man called Dead-Legs.  In a cannibal village
in the title location, Dead-Legs is hatching a plot to destroy Crane.  Using
his stage magic to control the superstitious natives, he has Crane's
daughter brought to his jungle outpost.  There he begins to exact his
revenge.
     Admittedly, WEST OF ZANZIBAR has a plot that is a bit simplistic and
the twists in that plot telegraph themselves well in advance of actually
occurring.  This makes it difficult to say this is actually a good film by
modern standards.  But the macabre jungle melodrama is told with more than a
little style and the resulting film is surprisingly enjoyable as an
artifact.
     We see here two of Chaney's claimed thousand faces.  Phroso the
Magician's stage make-up is obviously played for a laugh, with Chaney even
borrowing a gesture or two from Charlie Chaplin.  Out of the stage make-up
he looks very normal.  But Dead-Legs is something very different, something
reptilian.  His head is shaved so he looks nearly hairless.  Out of his
wheelchair, he slithers his way lizard-like across the floor not unlike a
serpent.
     Much of the scripting is dated.  Natives have names like King
Lunkaboola and Bumbu.  There is no Kunta Kinte in Tod Browning's Africa!
These are savages who glisten as if they had been laminated.  They eat their
enemies and have independently invented their own version of Indian suttee.
But they are easily fooled by the simplest of stage magic.  But underneath
everything is a story of deep emotions and Chaney's rubberlike face shows
impressive subtlety of expression.  In short, this film was worth
resurrecting.  It does show us more of the range of Chaney's acting skills
than has been available previously.  THE MAN WHO LAUGHS
     When the 1989 film BATMAN was being cast there was a strong opinion in
many people's minds that Jack Nicholson was perfect for the role of the
Joker.  Nicholson seems to smirk very naturally, like the Joker.  In my
opinion, Nicholson made a very bad Joker having the wrong stature and
actually the wrong facial structure.  I told friends at the time that, just
as a historical fact, there was once an actor who really could have looked
like the Joker.  In fact, the comic book figure of the Joker was visually
based on the looks of Conrad Veidt in the 1928 film THE MAN WHO LAUGHS.
Also, the visage was the inspiration for a later horror film, MR.
SARDONICUS (1961).  Gwynplaine of THE MAN WHO LAUGHS, however, was not a
villain like his later imitators but like Quasimodo a tragic, noble figure
living in a deformed body.  THE MAN WHO LAUGHS is, in fact, an adaptation of
a lesser novel in which Victor Hugo explored some of the same themes he
employed in THE HUNCHBACK OF NOTRE DAME.
     Gwynplaine was the son of a Scottish nobleman who refused to vow
loyalty to James II of England.  The noble was given a double punishment of
being executed in the Iron Maiden and of having his son have a surgical
operation that twisted his (the son's) mouth into a perpetual grin.
Whatever Gwynplaine would ever feel internally, to the world his face would
always be a broad grin.  Gwynplaine is eventually adopted into a traveling
show where he becomes a famous clown.  There he falls in love with a
beautiful blind woman, Dea.  Dea is played by Mary Philbin, who seems to
attract stigmatized lovers, though here she is spared the unmasking scene
she withstood in THE PHANTOM OF THE OPERA.  But the royal court of England
is not through with the tortured soul with the smiling face.
     The plotline of the THE MAN WHO LAUGHS is a bit muddled and confusing.
The story features a dog whose intelligence puts Rin-Tin-Tin to shame.
There are good reasons why this film was not the success for Universal that
two similar predecessors, THE HUNCHBACK OF NOTRE DAME (1923) and THE PHANTOM
OF THE OPERA (1925), were.  But none of the film's faults can be attributed
to the terrific performance of Conrad Veidt.  Given only his eyes for
expression over that horrible grinning mouth, he manages to convey a
tremendous range of emotion.  Most people have seen Veidt at most only as
Cesar the Somnambulist in THE CABINET OF DR. CALIGARI and as Colonel
Strasser in CASABLANCA--neither film allowing him much range of emotion.
And neither film prepares the viewer for the excellent range of Veidt's
acting in THE MAN WHO LAUGHS.
     The centerpiece of the film is a scene in which Josiana, a rather sexy
and over-sexed duchess, tries to seduce Gwynplaine with the latter wanting
the love of a sighted woman, but still trying to hide his mouth from her.
Veidt carries the scene masterfully with his eyes only.  (Josiana,
incidentally, is played by Olga Baclanova, who played the villainous
Cleopatra in Tod Browning's FREAKS.) This scene and any scene in which we
see Gwynplaine's whole face, requires two interpretations from the viewer.
How would others interpret the scene if they did not know the smile was
meaningless, and secondly, by looking at Gwynplaine's eyes, can we tell what
he is feeling?  And Veidt controls both interpretations at the same time--an
amazing feat of acting.
     THE MAN WHO LAUGHS is also an artifact of the advent of sound into
films.  It has a complete soundtrack, mostly music, but also with sound
effects, occasional voices, and a song repeated twice in the film.
     The film heavily abridges the Hugo story and reaches a little too far
to place a happy ending where Hugo never intended.  But while this is a
flawed film, it boasts some of the most impressive acting of the silent era.
It certainly has sharpened my interest in Veidt.  This may be a hard film to
find--it took me several years--but it is a film well worth the wait.
     These three films show the ability of two similar actors: Chaney the
American and Veidt the German.  Veidt, incidentally emigrated with the
coming of Naziism to Germany.  Apparently he returned to Germany for a short
visit in 1930 and was held prisoner by the Nazis until Gaumont British
Studios were able to get him out safely.  (There is a short account of this
in Ephraim Katz's FILM ENCYCLOPEDIA.)  Each made major contributions to the
pre-sound horror film.

Title
Review for Violon rouge, Le (1998)
     There are several different ways to write an anthology film, a
film made up of several episodes.  Some films manage to have the whole
be greater than the sum of the parts.  One that does rise well above
the parts is this history of the Red Violin, a violin of astounding
acoustical properties.  Francois Girard, who directed, co-authored the
screenplay with Don McKellar, who appears as a scientific violin
expert.  The two Canadian filmmakers previously worked together on
THIRTY-TWO SHORT FILMS ABOUT GLENN GOULD.  While it is not true that
each episode stands on its own as a good story, the combined film is
actually quite well-written.  The story is set at the Montreal auction
of the violin and then flashes back over the history of the violin and
its travels from Italy to Montreal.
     ITALY: We have the greatest violinmaker of his day Nicolo Bussotti
(played by Carlo Cecchi) of Cremona, Italy, creating a masterpiece of a
violin to coincide with the birth of his first child.  ITALY and
AUSTRIA: A young boy Kaspar Weiss (Christoph Koncz) with a Mozart-like
brilliance for music is taken from his home in Northern Italy and taken
to Vienna where he will find that his greatest impediments are not in
competition but in himself.  AUSTRIA and ENGLAND: A band of gypsies
plays the great violin for years without ever knowing its true value.
ENGLAND:  The Red Violin inspires a scoundrel (Jason Flemyng as
Frederick Pope) to make great music, but Pope does not realize how
dependent on it he becomes. CHINA: The political orthodoxy of the
Cultural Revolution teaches a cadre the price of fanaticism and forces
her to choose between love of the violin and her loyalty to the fanatic
new brand of politics sweeping China.  MONTREAL: An auction house
prepares for a public sale of musical instruments acquired from the
Chinese government.
     Contrary to expectation the film is at its most interesting when
it gets to the 20th Century.  We have seen other films like THE BLUE
KITE tell us how China allowed political fanaticism to impoverish and
destroy the country, but this film makes the same point much more
succinctly and at the same time plaintively. In the Montreal segment we
get a tantalizing look at 20th century analysis of a 17th century
musical instrument, from acoustics to chemical and even biological
analysis.  In addition the final segment answers several previously
unanswered questions and fits some apparently disconnected pieces
together.  We get a much better understanding of the Red Violin, what
makes it unique, and why is it red?
     Don McKellar seems to be becoming as ubiquitous in Canadian film
as Denholm Elliot used to be in British film.  At the 1998 Toronto
International Film Festival (where I could not get into THE RED VIOLIN)
he seemed to be associated with one film after another.  Here he
writes, directs, and acts.  Top billing goes to Samuel L. Jackson,
whose role does not become important until the final segment of the
film.  There are few familiar actors to stretch the budget, but there
is some nice location scenery.  But what is really enjoyable, as one
might suspect in a film about a great violin, is that the film has some
really excellent violin music.
     In short, people who are pleased with the current vogue to have
arthouse films on the theme of behind the scenes looks at how classical
music gets created, films like SHINE and HILARY AND JACKIE, films with
potent samples of good music, should find THE RED VIOLIN an
entertaining entry.  I give it an 8 on the 0 to 10 scale and a high +2
on the -4 to +4 scale.  (Historical note: all characters, musical
instruments, and events are fictional.)

Title
Review for Dogme 1 - Festen (1998)
     The audience tittered when before the film a certificate was shown
saying the film followed Dogma 95. Indeed, even the filmmakers who
subscribe to Dogma 95 do not know if it is serious.  Dogma 95 is a
Danish movement in filmmaking that is a reaction to over-polished,
unrealistic Hollywood films.  Films made with Dogma 95 conventions are
shot generally with a hand-held camera with natural sound.  Shooting is
done on location rather than at a studio.  The effect of the unsteadied
hand-held camera give THE CELEBRATION the feel of a sound home movie,
but the lack of music gives it also some of the immediacy of a stage
play. My wife claimed that BREAKING THE WAVES made her seasick and this
film did much the same.  It clearly has a very positive effect by
fighting burgeoning film budgets.  The crudeness of the production adds
a certain credibility to the story.  Like monochrome it contributes to
the mood.  And oddly an unfinished photographic style gives a film more
credibility in the same way that saturated Technicolor makes it less
credible.
     THE CELEBRATION is made with Dogma 95 conventions and like Dogma
95 it is a mixed bag of positive and negative touches.  The film is 105
minutes, but seems longer because it takes almost an hour to get to the
serious content.  By the time one gets to the serious content, one has
almost forgotten the blur of people in the first hour.  Lost is
characterization that would be interesting once one could place the
characters in the main story line.  In the spirit of Dogma 95 parsimony
the film has a minimum of music--the first music in THE CELEBRATION is
a music box heard over the end-titles.
     It is Helge's 60th birthday and the entire extended family is
gathering to attend a gala party at a hotel Helge (Henning Moritzen)
manages.  Arriving are older son Christian (Ulrich Thomsen), younger
son Michael (Thomas Bo Larsen), and middle daughter Helene (Paprika
Steen).  The fourth child, Christian's twin sister had committed
suicide some time earlier.  We see some family tensions, but at first
they do not amount to much.  Finally the banquet begins and the
children start toasting their father.  Christian's toast starts fulsome
and typical of what one would expect, but in the middle he throws in an
accusation that Helge had sexually molested him and Linda.  People do
not know what to make of this little piece of unpleasantness.  If
Christian will only apologize the party can continue, but each time
Christian makes a speech he broadens on the accusation.  What is there
to do so that the party can go on?
     Once the story gets going the drama is powerful and has overtones
of American scandal politics making it much more topical than director
and co-writer Thomas Vinterberg could have expected.  Though the story
loses some of its potential impact by resolving whether the accusations
are true, there is a very good play in the second half of this film.
If Vinterberg had started with the banquet and elaborated on people's
reactions this could have been a very powerful piece of social
commentary.  As it is it wastes too much of the viewer's time getting
where it needed to go and then never sufficiently develops characters
like Helge's wife.
     This is an okay film that missed its opportunities to be a really
powerful experience.  While Dogma 95 will turn off some users, the
film's taking too long to get to its real story is its biggest flaw. I
rate it a 6 on the 0 to 10 scale and a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for RoboCop (1987)
          Capsule review:  Featherweight and violent super-hero
     comic book on film about a cyborg policeman protecting the
     streets of Detroit.  Paul Verhoeven is one of the last
     directors I would expect to make this fun but unoriginal
     action film.
     The place is Detroit.  the time is some undefinable date in the future.
Law enforcement is no longer done by government and is instead contracted
out to the giant corporation, Omni Consumer Products.  Two models of
mechanized policemen have been developed by OCP.  One if the ED-209, a kind
of walking tank combined with the artificial intelligence to take over
standard cop-on-the-beat responsibilities.  The other model is "Robocop," a
cyborg incorporating human and mechanical parts but requiring a human brain
to run the device.  Just as the ED-209s are about to be mobilized, the model
proves to have difficulties and instead, a recently murdered policeman,
Murphy (played by Peter "Buckeroo Banzai" Weller), is robocized and
resurrected as Robocop.  Three guesses what crime Robocop wants to solve.
     In fact, rarely does anyone need more than one guess about anything in
ROBOCOP.  The plot is supremely cliched.  The resurrected-hero idea has been
used many times before, from the "Six-Million-Dollar Man" to Remo Williams
to the Lone Ranger.  The "honest police under corrupt leadership" plot is
done two or three times a year, it seems.  Scenes of hoods shooting at
Robocop to no effect are virtual dramatizations of scenes in "Superman"
comics half a century old.  The only place the script becomes at all
creative is in extrapolations of society some (inconsistent) number of years
into the future.  By the look of cars and clothing styles, this film could
be taking place tomorrow.  As far as the technology and changes to society
(like contracted police protection), the film still could be thirty or forty
years into the future.
     And some things might not make much sense whenever they take place.
The ED-209 is nearly useless as a surrogate policeman.  It is too big and
bulky to do anything but travel on flat terrain and blast away.  Robocop has
only a little more finesse.  If I lived in the Detroit of this film the one
thing that would scare me more than crime would be the possibility that
Robocop might come to my rescue.  There is no better way to parlay a $100
robbery into a $100,000 damage-repair bill than to call on the "Flatfoot of
Steel."  And with what Robocop must cost OCP in police brutality suits, they
could probably hire an army of old-fashioned humans.
     But the biggest surprise about ROBOCOP is that it is directed by Paul
Verhoeven.  This film is an entirely new style for the director of SOLDIER
OF ORANGE, SPETTERS, FLESH AND BLOOD and THE FOURTH MAN.  Although the
latter two films were in spots quite as violent as ROBOCOP, all four of
Verhoeven's previous films were aimed at a more mature audience.  ROBOCOP is
his first film aimed at the audiences who make floors sticky.  Where films
like THE FOURTH MAN had occasional touches of Kurt Russell, ROBOCOP has more
of a tendency to fade into KENTUCKY FRIED MOVIE.
     One final comment: Basil Poledouris, who has a nasty habit of giving
films better musical scores than they deserve (e.g., BLUE LAGOON, CONAN THE
BARBARIAN, RED DAWN, and AMERIKA), has once again shown up his director by
making his score the best thing in the film.  Rate this one a +1 on the -4
to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Daytrippers, The (1996)
     THE DAYTRIPPERS has the feel of a story written in a PC.  It
starts as scenario that can be described in two or three sentences.
But that is too short to make a film so sequences are added one at a
time like Christmas decorations on a tree to pad the scenario until
there is enough there to fill out a script.  Some of the added
sequences interconnect, most do not.  Mostly you take the scenic route
through the original three sentences, learning about the people
traveling with you and some of the people you pass along the way.  In
the end the value of the whole comprises very little more than the sum
of the value of the parts.  It is apparently writer/director Greg
Mottola's belief that if you see the characters in enough disconnected
situations you will see sufficient facets of their personality to come
to understand them.  Perhaps there is some truth to that, but one wants
more of a story than is provided here.
     Eliza (played by Hope Davis) and Louis (Stanley Tucci) are a
comfortable suburban couple living not far from Eliza's parents Rita
(Anne Meara) and Jim (Pat McNamara).  Eliza teaches fourth grade and
Louis is an executive at a Manhattan-based book publisher.  Then on the
day after Thanksgiving, Eliza finds an Andrew Marvell love poem that
has fallen out of Louis's pocket.  Asking Rita for advice, her mother
suggests going into Manhattan and confronting Louis directly.  And the
more people for support the better.  So Eliza, her parents, her sister
Jo (Parker Posey) and her sister's boyfriend Carl (Liev Schreiber) all
go trooping off in the family station wagon to Manhattan to find Louis
and hopefully the truth.  It is a trying day in the city for each of
them as well as some of the people in Manhattan that they involve.
Along the way they have various small adventures, but the adventures
are not very interesting in themselves, do not tell us a lot about the
family members, and do not advance the plot.  Much of this film is
picking up on the texture of the characters, which is a bit threadbare,
and waiting for something to happen.  We get validation of our first
impressions that Rita is a meddling busybody.  There is confirmation
that Jim is a long-suffering father who really is a font of wisdom if
people would only notice and listen to him.  We see that Jo is not as
ready to commit to Carl as she thinks she is.  And Carl, the writer, is
really just a big fish in a small intellectual pond.  We get something
of how he thinks as he recounts in detail the plot of his novel, a
rather simplistic symbolic work about a man with the head of a dog.
(Curiously the release of this film seems to coincide with the
publication of a real novel that would seem to have some similarities
to his fictional novel:  Kirsten Bakis's LIVES OF THE MONSTER DOGS.)
     Anne Meara actually does a fairly good job as the overbearing
Rita.  In many ways she is more believable than Debbie Reynolds was in
MOTHER.  The film does not make adequate use of Pat McNamara who really
makes the film come alive when he is given anything to do.  Parker
Posey who at one time seemed to overpower her roles intentionally gives
a somewhat more subdued performance in this as she did in WAITING FOR
GUFFMAN.  Director Mottola seems to be keeping an eye on expenses as is
producer Steven Soderbergh, whose films tend to be simple actors in
front of a camera. The score is apparently done on a single guitar.
Perhaps it was just the quality of the print I saw, but the colors were
a little washed out.
     By structuring his story so that the most interesting events fall
in the very latest part of the film Mottola makes his film at once too
long and one that the viewer is hoping will not end when it does. This
is a film for the patient.  I rate it a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Deep End, The (2001)
For any thriller to work fully there are two real requirements. 
The viewer has to have some emotional investment in the 
characters, particularly the main character, and the characters 
have to make choices that will affect the outcome of the story. 
If we do not care what happens to the main character we might as 
well be watching pieces on a chessboard.  If the people in the 
story do not make judgments and choices then they might as well be 
on a thrill ride at an amusement park following its inevitable 
track.  They just ride through the various dangers they face.  In 
THE DEEP END we are given reason to empathize with Margaret Hall 
(played by Tilda Swinton), but after the first half-hour or so she 
is mostly doing just what she has to do.  While other characters 
are complex and at times do the unexpected, once we know Margaret 
well enough to care for her, we also know the choices that she 
will make.  And by never doing anything unexpected she loses much 
of her interest value.  The film is almost a morality tale. 
Having made a bad choice at the beginning, this long chain of 
events is what she has earned for herself. 
Margaret Hall lives with her family in an idyllic existence in a 
nice house on Lake Tahoe.  Her son Beau (Jonathan Tucker) is a 
promising music student making applications to various colleges. 
Margaret's one wish is to protect Beau from the clutches of a male 
lover whom she is sure just wants to use her son.  After a 
clandestine assignation between the two Margaret finds the lover 
dead.  Without telling anyone she decides to hide the body so her 
son will not be implicated in the investigation.  This leaves her 
prey to blackmail and a horrific chain of events. 
Swinton is known mostly for roles of women who have foregone 
anything like a "normal" lifestyle.  Somehow her unusual, almost 
albino, looks lead to unusual roles.  In ORLANDO she plays her 
best known role, an immortal who at one point for no obvious 
reason spontaneously changes gender from male to female. 
Frequently she plays women of power.  It is a little odd seeing 
her play a housewife who at least starts out somewhat typical.  Of 
course not long into the movie she is juggling her life as a 
housewife with her secret life dealing with blackmailers.  The man 
who has contacted her for hush money also shows sides to his 
personality we would not expect. 
This is the second screen adaptation of the 1947 novel THE BLANK 
WALL by Elizabeth Sanxay Holding.  The first was the 1949 film THE 
RECKLESS MOMENT with James Mason and Joan Bennett directed by Max 
Ophuls.  Ophuls chose to use actors who would be familiar to 
audiences, hence making it a glossier production.  The team of 
Scott McGehee and David Siegal who have been writing and directing 
thrillers since 1993's SUTURE.  Here again they wrote and 
directed.  They chose to use generally less familiar actors than 
the previous version.  Only Swinton and character actor Peter 
Donat were even vaguely familiar to me. 
THE DEEP END is a well-acted story of a woman who makes one 
mistake and then faces some fairly harrowing consequences.  I rate 
it a 6 on the 0 to 10 scale and a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale. 

Title
Review for Hombre mirando al sudeste (1986)
          Capsule review:  A serious science fiction film from
     Argentina has a psychiatrist faced with a Christ-like patient
     who claims to be an alien.  This is a film with a lot to say
     about psychiatry, hunger, charity, and religion.  With that
     much to say it is, perhaps, over-ambitious.  It does not do
     everything right but what is right is worth seeing.
     Argentina is not one of the countries one generally expects to be
making science fiction films.  It has had a film industry for quite a long
time--as anyone who has heard EVITA knows--but their films seem rarely seem
to get international play and do not seem to have much fantasy, in any case.
Yet Argentina has a heritage of literary fantasy led until his recent death
by Jorge Luis Borges.  Borges's influence can be felt in a new fantasy
science fiction film from Argentina, MAN FACING SOUTHEAST.  The film
combines elements of THE MAN WHO FELL TO EARTH and ONE FLEW OVER THE
CUCKOO'S NEST.
     The main character of MAN FACING SOUTHEAST is a psychiatrist in an
insane asylum.  Dr. Denis is disturbed by his inability to really help his
patients and by the asylum's callous and factory-like treatment of patients.
One patient's fantasy, incidentally, is an uncredited enactment of the
painting "The Lovers" by Magritte.  But a new patient appears at the asylum
one day, committing himself.  It is Rantes's apparent delusion that he is an
extra-terrestrial sent to Earth on a mission.  He commits himself
voluntarily because he knows society would only commit him more forcibly if
he did not.
     Rantes sees the suffering and pain around him and the selfishness of
the comfortable.  In a number of scenes he turns the tables.  But Dr. Denis
is the real center of the story.  Facing pressure to drug Rantes out of what
may or may not be an illusion (actually the audience knows which but the
doctor does not), Denis sees himself as Pontius Pilate, being forced to
crucify another Jesus.  As more patients at the asylum become disciples of
Rantes, the pressures increase on the bewildered psychiatrist to fulfill his
role as the later-day Pilate.
     MAN FACING SOUTHEAST is an intelligent science fiction film that needs
no special effects.  It is at once a cry of social despair, a philosophical
essay, and a science fiction story.  If anything it tries to be too much and
spreads itself too thin; often it gives way to cliche.  Yet in many ways it
is comparable to THE MAN IN THE WHITE SUIT and if the Argentine industry
follows the same path the British did, we can hope to see a lot more good
films from it in the future.  Rate MAN FACING SOUTHEAST a +2 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Phantom of the Opera, The (1989)
          Capsule review:  Somebody took what would have been a
     poor re-telling of PHANTOM and proved it could be made much,
     much worse.  Believe it or not, they threw in time travel and
     an immortal Freddy Krueger-esque killer.  I thought I was a
     completist enough to want to see all versions of the semi-
     classic story, but this was a total and contemptible mess
     representing the producer's profound and cynical disrespect
     for his audience.  Rating: -3.
     To date there have been four movie versions of THE PHANTOM OF THE
OPERA.  The title role has been played by Lon Chaney, Claude Rains, Herbet
Lom, and Maximillian Schell.  Now there have been four and a tenth.  It is
clear that somebody was serious about making a version of the semi-classic
story and somebody else was not.  Nominally Dwight Little is the director of
the new film, though his name is pasted over somebody else's on the posters.
So what we get is an exquisitely clumsy cross between a lackluster but
traditional telling of the story and an episode of "Freddy's Nightmares."
     Christine Daae is an opera singer in modern-day Manhattan who finds an
old piece of music by a forgotten composer who was also a serial killer.
She decides to use it for an audition for an opera.  During her audition she
is coshed on the head by a sandbag and suddenly, with no apparent
bewilderment, she is an opera singer from the chorus in 1884 London.  The
story that is then told is just barely recognizable as a version of THE
PHANTOM OF THE OPERA.  A great but unknown composer has made a pact with the
Devil that if his music should become immortal he would sell his soul.  The
Devil adds his own little amendment by gouging pieces out of the composer's
face.  The Phantom can make himself almost normal, but only by sewing pieces
of live flesh into his face--so much for the romance of the mask.  The
Phantom now lives under the opera house and teaches his Christine,
mercilessly torture-killing anyone who gets in his way.  He skins two people
alive and beheads two others.  Meanwhile Christine is bewildered as to why
she is able to remember the words to sing to the Phantom's music--not
remembering that she learned them in New York.  Classic scenes such as the
chandelier scene and the unmasking are dispensed with entirely--well, sort
of.  Later when the story returns to the present it turns more into a
traditional supernatural molester story.
     I cannot imagine how this film turned into such an unholy mess.  Only
part of the mess can be explained by saying they had a gory version of the
traditional story and well into the shooting they decided they wanted to
turn it into a totally different film.  That would explain the change of
directors.  It would also explain the credits "Screenplay by Duke Sandefur,
Based on a screenplay by Gerry O'Hara."  Somebody must have decided they
could not sell Robert Englund as anything but a supernatural, unstoppable
killer like his Freddy Krueger.  The result is a sort of a PEGGY SUE SINGS
FOR THE PHANTOM ON ELM STREET that is a crude hoax that will disappoint
Phantom fans, Freddy fans, and everybody in between. I would like to give
this film a full -4 but for a little nice opera and a few scenes that were
almost an okay adaptation of the story I will give it a -3 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Ours, L' (1988)
     Some films are just simple enough and pure enough that they look
effortless.  They seem as if they put themselves together with nearly
everything clicking.  One such film is THE BEAR--even the title is simple
and pure.  The film covers about a month or so in the life of a young bear.
The film's greatest fault is that it is too short--about 90 minutes--and
covering so short a span in the bear's life is simply not satisfying enough.
The filmmakers could easily make this the beginning of a series about the
same bear and not have it wear thin after ten chapters.  The bear--or more
accurately the two bears--in this film are characters that audiences will
really want to know more about.
     THE BEAR has a minimum of dialogue and no narration.  This helps avoid
having the film be as cutesy or sugary as some Disney wildlife
documentaries, but it means the story is told more slowly than if a narrator
were telling you plot.  When the bear is sad, you pick it up from body
language and inference rather than being told, and the emotion is felt by
the viewer far deeper this way.  At the same time, much of the emotion gets
understated.  When the bear loses her mother it is probably more traumatic
than the film can convey.
     The story, set in the Canadian wilderness, is of a young bear whose
mother is accidentally killed.  After staying with the body hoping it will
move again, the bear finds that she--I think it was a she--must find food
for herself.  She finds and seeks the protection of a large bear who, as it
happens, is being hunted by a group of men.  The film could easily have made
the men soulless beasts, particularly since the film is both implicitly and
explicitly an argument against hunting.  To the film's credit, both man and
animal are to some degree sympathetic.
     The photography of the Canadian wilderness and of the bears in it is
constantly enthralling.  Faults of the film?  A couple of the animals look
more like props on fishing lines, specifically a butterfly and a frog.  The
film tries to put you inside the mind of the bear, seeing dreams and at one
point a hallucination.  Just what a bear would see in these different states
of consciousness we will probably never know and the film's interpretation
is speculative at best.  The bear's voice was dubbed after shooting and
seems often to be unrealistically expressive, though I do not have
sufficient knowledge of bears to decide if that is really true.
     Jean-Jacques Annaud, who previously did QUEST FOR FIRE, is to be
commended for making one of the most original as well as one of the five
best films of the year.  My rating is a low +3 on the -4 to +4 scale.  If
Annaud promises to make a sequel a year to THE BEAR, just telling us as well
what the bear is up to that year, I promise to buy a film ticket to each
one.  If he spends the rest of his life telling the story of this one bear,
it will be well-spent.

Title
Review for Empire of the Sun (1987)
     EMPIRE OF THE SUN is J. G. Ballard's semi-autobiographical novel
recounting his experiences as a boy in China during the Japanese occupation
in World War II.  Tom Stoppard has adapted it for the screen and Steven
Spielberg proves to have the talent of a Kubrick in directing the film.
Spielberg does things nearly impossible in film.  He has combined a
spectacular with a highly personal film, even mixing them in the same scene.
The scene in which Jim gets separated from his parents in a veritable ocean
of fleeing humanity is both emotionally moving and immense.  This is a film
filled with one strange and vivid incident after another, one memorable
scene after another, yet one never feels there is too much frosting and not
enough cake.  This film proves that somewhere underneath the highly
commercial director is a man of great artistic talents that all too rarely
get used.  It is incomprehensible that the director of INDIANA JONES AND THE
TEMPLE OF DOOM also directed a film of the sensitivity of EMPIRE OF THE SUN.
     Jim (played by Christian Bale) is a boy with a very believable
obsession:  flight and airplanes.  It is easy for me to believe this
obsession with flying would strike a responsive chord in Spielberg; I know
it does in me.  His father became wealthy in the textile industry in
Shanghai in a European community incongruously identical to one that one
might find in Britain.  Jim has led a sheltered life.  His big concern is
building airplane models and studying aircraft.  His ambition is to join the
Japanese military, not for political reasons, but because they have planes.
Jim's simple existence is about to come to an end.  The Japanese Imperial
forces are about to seize Shanghai and Jim will have to fight to stay alive.
     This story could have been told prosaically, but there is little
prosaic about EMPIRE OF THE SUN.  With Ballard's, Stoppard's, and
Spielberg's imaginations creating images there is nothing stereotypic about
this film.  It is amazing that such a story could be told of conflict and
suffering, and yet there is not a single villain and every character who
speaks is fresh and new.  There is a sense-of-wonder observation of the
Japanese--bringers of planes to China--and of the Americans who build the
huge "Cadillacs of the sky."
     Just as HOPE AND GLORY--a comparable but less fully realized
autobiographical film--gave us insights into the roots of John Boorman's
love of fantasy, EMPIRE OF THE SUN more than explains why Ballard writes
science-fictional mega-disaster novels in which we see how titanic, world-
crushing events affect common people's lives.  Perhaps the only thing that
cuts against the credibility is that it is difficult to believe so many
beautiful and enigmatic incidents could have happened to one boy.
     EMPIRE OF THE SUN also demonstrates that Spielberg is an intelligent
businessman.  Apparently he had only three weeks to film in China.  But he
took much better advantage of that time than Bertolucci took of a much
longer time in filming THE LAST EMPEROR.  In China the price of an extra is
something like a dollar a day.  Bertolucci uses this advantage in perhaps
one or two scenes--notably Pu Yi's coronation as seen from above.  But
Spielberg puts us in the middle of an ocean of panicking humanity as
Shanghai is evacuated.  Bertolucci tells us about history; Spielberg makes
it happen to us.  Bertolucci distances us from his characters; Spielberg
puts us inside his.
     This is the best film I have seen this year.  Perhaps the best in
several years.

Title
Review for Nell (1994)
     In the back woods of the Great Smokey Mountains of North Carolina
an old hermit woman dies.  When a  policeman (played by Nick Searcy)
and a doctor, Jerome Lovell (Liam Neeson) come to investigate and tidy
up the loose ends, they find a loose end nobody knew about.  The woman
had a daughter Nell (Jodie Foster) who had lived virtually without
human contact and who spoke a completely unintelligible language.  Nell
has been raised to fear people and her reaction to these invaders is
pure panic.  Lovell brings in a second doctor, Paula Olsen (Natasha
Richardson), little realizing that he is sowing the seeds of a three-
way battle for the fate of Nell.  One faction will want her to remain
in the wild, one will want to study her in an institution, and both
will want to keep her out of the hands of the media who want to exploit
her.  Deep in the woods Lovell and Olsen competitively initiate studies
to understand Nell and the forces that made her what she is, to
decipher her language, and to ease her terror of strangers.
     Michael Apted is singularly appropriate to direct NELL.  Two of
the major themes of his film are how Nell's childhood has molded her
into the enigmatic woman that she is and how the outside world and
mainstream society are a corrupting influence.  Apted is the creator of
the 7 UP, 7 PLUS 7, 21 UP, 28 UP, and 35 UP documentaries, which are
released each seven years, examining at seven-year intervals the lives
of 14 people and how they develop.  He also directed GORILLAS IN THE
MIST, THUNDERHEART, and the documentary INCIDENT AT OGLALA, each of
which has a theme of the corruptive or exploitive influence of society
on the innocent.  Both themes are present in William Nicholson and Mark
Handley's adaptation of Handley's stage play "Idioglossia."  Nicholson,
incidentally also wrote the screenplay for SHADOWLANDS.  This story
also looks at two approaches to science: one that tries to study in
nature and one that prefers the laboratory approach, in vivo versus in
vitro.  In a violation of political correctness, unusual for Apted, the
nurturing scientist, who sets up a pup tent and tries forming a
relationship with Nell, is the man.  The woman scientist's approach is
to bring up a houseboat full of electronic equipment and to observe
Nell with surveillance cameras.
     The telling of the story is deliberate, like a scientific case
study.  For viewers who are not interested in the puzzle of
understanding Nell's behavior and her language, the film will be as
slow-paced as watching someone fill out a crossword puzzle or paint a
picture.  The writing requires at least a modicum of curiosity about
the reasoning of anthropologists and how they do their work.  Apted
takes a good long time before he starts talking down to his audience
and moving the story in what are, unfortunately, some very predictable
directions.
     As time goes by Nell and her language become more understandable.
It is not entirely clear why this verbal fruit cocktail starts sounding
more comprehensible.  It is possible that the listener's ear becomes
more attuned to the language or that the more Nell is around people the
more she might start to imitate their speech patterns.  I suspect,
however, that the film is really a little less than honest by simply
having Foster's language written closer to spoken English in the later
parts of the film.
     Foster's acting in dramatic scenes is nearly perfect, though her
ecstatic, dance-like jaunts though nature seem a bit idealized.  Neeson
is compelling and sensitive.  Probably he is typecast as being
sensitive after playing Oskar Schindler.  Richardson comes in a fair
third for acting honors, but it is really Foster's movie.  Also
watchable is the photography of the Great Smokey Mountains, by Dante
Spinotti.  And  though it lacks the breathtaking spectacle of his work
for THE LAST OF THE MOHICANS, his eye for the beauty of nature becomes
an intergal part of the film.
     This is not so much an original film as a familiar story done very
well.  Certainly it ranks among one of Apted's better dramatic films.
I give it a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for White Men Can't Jump (1992)
          Capsule review:  Occasionally very funny dialogue is not
     enough to rescue a story about the lives of two basketball
     hustlers who basically live for the game.  The story off the
     court is basically pointless and has holes large enough to
     stuff a basketball through.  Rating: -1 (-4 to +4).  (After
     the review is a spoiler section listing plot absurdities.)
     Billy Hoyle (played by Woody Harrelson)  is a natural basketball
player.  The game is his whole life.  And he has a natural advantage.  Billy
is white and, as the title suggests, everybody thinks only blacks can be
good at basketball.  One day Billy hustles Sidney Dean (played by Welsey
Snipes), who is also a part-time hustler.  Sidney suggests that the two of
them join up as a hustling team.  Each needs money.  Dean has a wife and son
and a semi-legal part-time job that does not pay enough.  Hoyle is on the
run from two thugs because--are you ready for a twist?--he failed to throw a
game after he'd told some gamblers he would.  Billy has a girlfriend also,
who spends her day memorizing trivia facts in the hopes that someday she
will be on JEOPARDY.  The hustle has Sidney offering to play two-on-two
playground basketball and his opponents can choose any partner for Sidney
they want.  Sure enough, they always pick the white guy with the stupid look
on his face.
     So what we have here is a black and white male bonding film.  We see in
great detail how the two get along, how they occasionally don't get along,
and how basketball conquers all.  We see how each relates to "his woman."
When things get dull the wise and wordly Sidney gives Billy some fatherly
advice like "listen to your woman."  And there is genuine pathos as we learn
Billy's terrible secret that being white, he just does not have the talent
to slam-dunk the basketball.  (Spoiler: guess what happens in the climactic
scene of the film?  And in slow motion, yet.)
     WHITE MEN CAN'T JUMP was written and directed by Ron Shelton.  Shelton
previously did the nice BULL DURHAM and the very good BLAZE.  While some of
the basketball photography is okay, in terms of dramatic tension it
degenerates into the cliche of slow motion photography.  Only the rapid-fire
insult-trashings on the court give the film interest value.  This one is
skippable.  I would give it a -1 on the -4 to +4 scale.
  1.  So what if a security guard for JEOPARDY owes a favor?  How does that
      get a contestant on the show?
  2.  Why did just the right question categories show up on JEOPARDY?
      Another security guard favor?  Not likely.
  3.  On JEOPARDY you have to wait until a question is read before you can
      hit the button.
  4.  No organized crime enforcer is stupid enough to fake having killed
      someone to fulfill a contract.  It is a really good way to get
      yourself killed if anyone sees the victim still alive.
  5.  The bet is that you are to play against Sidney and one other person of
      your choice.  This guy over to your left owes you money.  On your
      right is your best friend since second grade.  Then there's the kid
      with the missing arm.  And that one over there can't dribble a
      basketball without tripping.  There is a seven-year-old watching
      behind the fence.  And over there is a tall, athletic white dude,
      somewhat nerdy, whom you've never seen before.  Which one *wouldn't*
      you pick?  Ever?  But if the hustle doesn't work the whole film makes
      no sense.

Title
Review for Everyone Says I Love You (1996)
     It may be partially my fault.  The night before I saw my first new
musical film in years I prepared myself by watching my favorite
musical, Norman Jewison's FIDDLER ON THE ROOF.  This would allow me to
compare techniques, I told myself.  Oh dear.  Not only is EVERYONE SAYS
I LOVE YOU not FIDDLER ON THE ROOF, it is not much of anything.  It is,
in fact, a bigger disappointment than MIGHTY APHRODITE.  That film, his
last but for this, made fun of the conventions of the Greek Chorus in a
play and this one makes fun of the traditions of the musical.  Take two
TV situation comedy plots, sprinkle in some fairly incompetently done
musical numbers and what do you get?  What I got was the obvious
conclusion that Woody Allen has lost the recipe and no longer makes
decent films.  Can it really be true that the director who made films
like LOVE AND DEATH and CRIMES AND MISDEMEANORS or even BULLETS OVER
BROADWAY made a film that misfires in eight directions the way this one
does?  Woody Allen in the past has created characters, humorous but
very real at the same time, that the viewer cared about.  That seems
unimportant to him now.  The people in EVERYONE SAYS I LOVE YOU are
paper-thin.  They seem to be no more than just pieces to move around a
game board of uninteresting romantic situations.  Allen is seemingly so
desperate for a laugh he is even stealing gags from THE ROCKY HORROR
PICTURE SHOW--in this case a male dancer in a wheelchair kicking his
leg like a Radio City Rockette.  The old Woody Allen was a font of
comedic ideas and would never have needed to borrow a gag from another
writer.
     Steffi (played by Goldie Hawn), her previous husband Joe (Woody
Allen), and her current husband Bob (Alan Alda) get along very well
with each other.  Steffi and Bob are sort of wealthy hippy-dippy
liberals and activists for contemporary liberal causes.  They all look
forward to the impending marriage of Steffi's and Bob's ditzy daughter
Skylar to the bland and slightly dense Holden (Edward Norton).  Little
do they realize that one of Steffi's causes will cause problems in
their relationship.  A second plot has Joe, unlucky in love, courting
Von (Julia Roberts) making unfair use of information his daughter
gleans from eavesdropping on Von's visits to her analyst.  Allen can
probably now play the luckless schmoe role in his sleep and does it
what would be perfectly but for the fact that much of the audience is
losing interest.  There are a few faint laughs from having the super-
liberal Bob have a neo-conservative son Scott (Lucas Haas), but Scott's
political arguments with his father are only on the most shallow and
cliched level.  Allen is telling stories he can write in his sleep and
writing himself roles for which he can phone in performances.
     Whether it is an attempt at satire of the musical form, or whether
it is just incompetence, one grows rather weary of hearing people sing
who really should not be singing in public.  At first it seems like it
is just Edward Norton who lacked the talent, but as the film wears on
there are more major characters singing when it would have been better
to remain silent.  Allen gets some humor from having very realistic
looking people in the background suddenly joining the production
number.  But after a while having people singing badly, including major
characters, goes a little stale.  Some have found one of the musical
routines, taking place in a hospital, to have some on-target humor.  It
did not do much for me, but a second musical number at a mortuary was
for me the (not-too-high) high-point of EVERYONE SAYS I LOVE YOU.
Allen has some fun with the ridiculous things some dancers do in
musical numbers in the old Busby Berkeley musicals, but the fun rarely
rises above the whimsical.
     EVERYONE SAYS I LOVE YOU was a noble experiment on Woody Allen's
part to try to experiment in the medium of the musical and perhaps milk
some humor laughing at the conventions of the musical.  In theory it
might have worked, but even a musical needs a better story than the
one(s) Allen wrote.  I rate EVERYONE SAYS I LOVE YOU a -1 on the -4 to
+4 scale.

Title
Review for Seven Waves Away (1957)
          Capsule review:  This is the story of an overcrowded
     lifeboat.  It is a good treatment of the hard decision
     between being humanitarian and risking killing everyone on
     the lifeboat or being crueller but more realistic.  This film
     tells more about the nature of disaster and how people react
     to it than all the disaster films Irwin Allen ever made.
     In my review of the film ALIENS, I said that one of the reasons it was
not as good as ALIEN was that it introduced a weak and sympathetic
character.  There is an unwritten romantic code in horror and disaster films
that says that most women and children, particularly the appealing ones, are
safe.  In THE POSEIDON ADVENTURE there are a lot of people who start the
journey to safety and one by one the strong characters die off.  Carol
Lynley and two children survive, if I remember right.  I think everyone
loves to see the weak survive but nobody really believes it.  I guess it is
just a cinematic convention.
     I just saw on cable (from Atlanta) the 1957 film ABANDON SHIP!  (Oddly
enough I had never heard of it until very recently and I think someone
described it to me just about a week or so ago.)  This is the story of a
very overcrowded lifeboat and the captain who really has to make some hard
decisions about who is going to live and who is going to die.  These
decisions are based on logic, not on what will play well to an audience.
The film covers topics often reserved for post-holocaust films--and often
side-stepped even there.  In specific, there are questions of triage.  No
medical supplies can be wasted on those who are too sick or disabled to
continue.
     There are two or three nice ironic twists at the end of the film and
the revelation that this is a true story, which perhaps accounts for why it
seems so believable.  The film is the real stuff.
     I should mention the film stars Tyrone Power and a host of faces
familiar from British films and TV.  And, let us face it, I love just about
any film that has two warring factions, both of which seem right.  ABANDON
SHIP! (British title: SEVEN WAVES AWAY) is just about the most thought-
provoking disaster film I can imagine.  Rate it a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Amateur (1994)
     Hal Hartley is something of a rogue filmmaker, producing, writing,
and scoring the films he directs.  Of late he is making them for PBS's
American Playhouse.  I have seen only his THE UNBELIEVABLE TRUTH,
though I found that an original and well-made film, perhaps better than
AMATEUR.
     In the current film Hartley brings together a mixed bag of
characters who are unfortunately less than totally believable.  One
problem with his style is that he will completely change our
understanding of a character for the sake of a funny or bizarre line.
The main character is Isabelle (played by Isabelle Huppert).  For
fifteen years Isabelle was a nun.  Then she gave it up to write
pornography and give vent to her nymphomaniacal tendencies.
Unfortunately, her pornography does not sell because she cannot resist
the temptation to turn it into literature.  She is still holding off on
her nymphomaniacal binge because she is very choosy about her choice of
partners.  So with absolutely no experience with sex, she wants to bea
pornographer.  Into Isabelle's life comes a possible sex partner, an
injured man (played by Martin Donovan) with no memory of who he is or
how he came to be injured.  Also into Isabelle's life comes Sofia
(Elina Lowensohn of SCHINDLER'S LIST), a woman who is a porno film star
who has run afoul of a powerful criminal international arms dealer.
The dealer has sent two strangely erudite thugs to murder her.  Sofia
knows who the amnesiac really is, but does not want to tell him.
Complicating matters is a former associate of the amnesiac and Sofia,
Edward (played by Damian Young).
     Hartley's dialogue is as bizarre as Quentin Tarantino's in PULP
FICTION, but with characters not quite as bright.  Hartley leaves long
pauses between spoken lines and this tends to slow the film down.
While some have classified the film as a thriller, the slow pacing
tends to sap any thrills that AMATEUR might have delivered.  In truth,
because of their bizarre behavior and motives it is difficult to
identify with or even believe any of the characters.  One character who
has gotten an electrical shock seems to mimic the childish, brutish
mannerisms of the Frankenstein monster, particularly when he comically
lays siege to a pizza shop.
     Hartley wrote, directed, and even scored this film, much as he did
with his previous film SIMPLE MEN.  That film also featured
performances by Martin Donovan, Elina Lowensohn, and Damian Young.
This is Isabelle Huppert's first performance with Hartley, though she
is a familiar actress in France, particularly from Jean-Luc Goddard's
films.  Seeing similarities in Goddard's and Hartley's styles, she
wrote to Hartley suggesting that she act in his films.  Hartley admits
contritely her letter went unread for several months due to his own
disorganization.  When he realized what the letter was, he paid its
owner more respect.
     This is a film that turns out to be more entertaining than it
might at first appear, but its style does not allow it believable
characters, nor is the humor strong enough to qualify it as a comedy,
nor does the film function as a thriller, nor is the style really
interesting.  The combination of what it contributes in these aspects
is sufficient to make the film watchable, but it is little more than
that.  I give it a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Cider House Rules, The (1999)
     Life is bleak at the orphanage at St. Cloud, Maine during the
Depression era.  The weather is cold.  The doctor who autocratically
runs the orphanage, Wilbur Larch (Michael Caine), is an ether addict
who performs illegal abortions.  And of course orphans learn about
rejection the youngest of anybody.  This could be the worst of all
possible worlds but for all Larchs shortcomings, his love and
compassion transform the orphanage.
     Into this orphanage is brought Homer Wells (played as an adult by
Tobey Maguire), twice adopted and twice returned.  Homer is raised by
Larch's love and by the love of the staff.  As a teenager Homer is
trained to have a medical knowledge almost rivaling Larch's.  Homer
personally wants nothing to do with abortions, and Larch respects that.
Homer delivers children and can handle a wide range of medical
emergencies like a professional.
     Homer has never been far from St. Cloud, never seen the ocean,
never even seen a lobster.  He longs to see a little of the real world.
When a serviceman brings his girlfriend Candy Kendall (Charlize
Theron)) for an abortion, Homer befriends the two, and when it comes
time to leave Homer asks to go with them.  Homer has no skills he knows
how to sell and gratefully takes a job as an apple picker.  The team of
farm workers, all black but for Homer, is led by Mr. Rose (Delroy
Lindo).  Homer must try to fit into the team.
     Peppered through the story as a continuing theme are rules and
people who break rules.  Under age boys drive cars and operate as
doctors.  Adult doctors perform abortions.  We also see love against
the rules.  Irving shows us cases where rule-breaking is excusable and
cases where it cannot be forgiven.  The whole story seems to be a
backdrop for examples of when rules should and should not be broken.
It is almost like a school exercise in which one tries to put as many
prepositions in a single sentence as possible, with the actual meaning
of the sentence having only secondary importance.  Irving may be saying
nothing more complex than that rules should be made only with
understanding and caution and should be broken only for unselfish
reasons.  But in giving all the examples John Irving, who wrote the
screenplay based on his own novel, has simplified the story to the
point where it is quite predictable.  We are pretty sure how it is all
going to end, and we know Homer is going to use his medical knowledge
just as surely as we know James Bond will use all of the gizmos he has
been given.
     Lasse Hallstrom, director of MY LIFE AS A DOG, tells stories
slowly and deliberately with a lot of personality texture.  He takes
his time developing his characters.  Toby Maguire's normally pensive
style has been useful in his career.  He seems to specialize in roles
in which he is a little bit of an outsider and has to work out what
things are all about.  In THE ICE STORM he has to navigate the adults'
world of sexual mores.  In PLEASANTVILLE he has to figure his way in
1950s TV-land.  Where another actor might jump into a situation he
thinks about it and intellectualizes it.  Irving and Hallstrom have
given Michael Caine a role different from those he has played in the
past.  That is not easy to do with an actor like Caine, but this is
Caine as we have not seen him before, an odd combination of sleazy and
loving.  Delroy Lindo adds a touch of magnificence and dignity to a
farm worker who is more complex than he at first seems.
     Irving's story is a little simplistic but engaging and the film
captures a sort of nostalgic feel.  I rate THE CIDER HOUSE RULES a 7 on
the 0 to 10 scale and a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale

Title
Review for When Harry Met Sally... (1989)
     Rob Reiner is one of the few current major directors that most
Americans can recognize by sight.  He has put on a little weight since his
ALL IN THE FAMILY days, but he is still recognizable.  But more than just
having visual recognition, he is also recognized as being a major directing
talent.  After THIS IS SPINAL TAP, THE SURE THING, STAND BY ME, and THE
PRINCESS BRIDE, one tends to expect a lot from him as a director.  One looks
forward to a Rob Reiner film.  However, this one was really disappointed by
WHEN HARRY MET SALLY..., a film that seems to assume it has a wonderful warm
and winning story, but somehow just does not have a story to match its
expectations.
     The story is punctuated by interview insets, much like Warren Beatty's
REDS, but here we have older couples who love each other and obviously have
had successful marriages, reminiscing about how they first met.  And as far
as that goes the film is warm.  These insets take up only about six or seven
minutes od the film and unfortunately it is in these insets that we find
most of the characters we end up liking.  The main line of the story is
about how Harry got coupled with Sally, but since these people are more
superficially cute than lovable (and not always even cute), there is
something really missing in the connections between the insets and the plot.
Harry and Sally first meet after graduation when Harry was something of a
male chauvinist and Sally was just a little cold.  They fail to hit it off.
Flash forward five years.  Harry is now something of a male chauvinist and
Sally is now a little cold.  They run into each other in an airport and fail
to hit it off.  Flash forward another five years to 1987.  Harry is now
something of a male chauvinist with a better sense of humor, and Sally is
now a little cold and has self-doubts.
     From there we follow the two trying to be platonic friends, wondering
if they should have sex, discussing if sex partners are sincere, discussing
Harry's promiscuity, ad nauseum.  Do we care?  Sure, there is some
voyeuristic appeal to hearing people talk about their sex lives.  Do we care
any further about these people as people?  I did not.  I had the feeling
that when these people walked off camera they winked out of existence.
Harry is a political consultant.  I'm not sure what a political consultant
does, but Harry's friends don't seem to be political consultants, and Harry
never so much as reads a newspaper.  This is not creating a character.  Nora
Ephron, the script writer, just filled in a blank labeled "Occupation"; she
did not create a character.
     Billy Crystal as Harry and Meg Ryan as Sally are attractive, engaging
people, and I was willing to find out about their characters' sex lives
while they were going well.  It did not make for great cinema, but it is
watchable.  When their relationship starts to sour, both characters are
pretty tiresome.  WHEN HARRY MET SALLY... is all right as a piece of
entertainment for a little while, but it is by far reiner's worst film.  I
give it a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     (One final note:  Nora Ephron (a female) has a male character express
the philosophy that a male cannot just be friends with an attractive woman
without wanting sex with her.  I can just hear a lot of women saying, "Ah-
ha!  I knew it all along!"  In fact, the woman who lived next door to me in
my first apartment said pretty much the same thing, eyeing me suspiciously.
I will tell you what I should have told her.  It is a paranoid myth and is
false.  You can go through life believing the worst of people and nobody
will be able to prove you wrong.  But for the record, women, it simply is
not true of all men.  If you use myth to rationalize negative behavior
toward men, it is you who are in the wrong.)

Title
Review for Darkman (1990)
     Sam Raimi is a director who came from out of nowhere to become a major
name in the horror film genre.  His film EVIL DEAD (1983), produced on a
shoestring, was nonetheless a very impressive debut.  He had a lot of novel
variations on what was basically a zombie film.  Raimi's second film, EVIL
DEAD II (1987), proved to be a terrifically inventive horror film with an
amazing array of weird twists and visual playing.  You have little idea
watching EVIL DEAD II what is likely to happen next but you can be fairly
sure it will further twist the horror film cliches into a knot.  With
DARKMAN Raimi is taking on the comic book superhero film and trying to twist
it the way he twisted the zombie film in his previous efforts.
     With DARKMAN, however, Raimi is telling a more complex story than
before and it shows up weaknesses in his story-telling abilities.  In fact,
by making the short trip from horror/fantasy to what is basically science
fiction, Raimi has managed to turn his greatest virtue into his greatest
flaw.  What was good about the EVIL DEAD films, particularly the sequel, was
the feeling that just about anything could happen.  That is the same feeling
we get with DARKMAN, but it is a fault.  As a fantasy, the EVIL DEAD films
take place in a world of the supernatural.  DARKMAN occurs in the world of
the rational and it has a much more complex plot.  With a rational film you
have the right to observe that something does not make sense.
     Liam Neeson plays Dr. Westlake, a scientist working on synthetic flesh
a la 1932's DR. X.  His girlfriend Julie Hastings (played by Frances
McDormand) runs afoul of some particularly sadistic heavies and they
horribly disfigure Westlake in an attempt to kill him.  To treat Westlake,
his doctors cut his pain sensors, a standard procedure operation that leaves
Westlake with great strength and also makes him just a little mentally
unbalanced.  As his doctor (Jenny Agutter in a cameo) explains, this is
pretty generally what the operation does. The first question to ask is why
there are not a bunch of very strong people running around.  Even if, as the
doctor suggests, the vast majority of people who have the operation do not
survive, wouldn't the few who do have the Darkman's strength?
     Westlake, disfigured, then escapes and hides in sewers with perhaps
more than just a slight tip of the hat to the 1943 PHANTOM OF THE OPERA.
Eventually he finds a place and stocks it with very advanced scientific
equipment.  (How does he find such a nice place that is just abandoned?
Where does he get the equipment?  Who knows?)  He uses his synthetic flesh
to make computer-generated masks that are perfect replicas of people using
only the information in a single photograph.  (Bosh--he could not possibly
get all the information he needs from so few photographs.)  When he puts on
the mask he can look so much like the other person as to fool even close
associates.  (How does he get the right voice?  Assume the right stature?)
Apparently after having built this laboratory with his own hands he suddenly
discovers that all along his hands have been as badly destroyed as his face.
(How could he do as much as he did without realizing the state of his
hands?)  The logic of DARKMAN is not just bad, it is shockingly bad.
     The technical credits are somewhat better.  The score by Danny Elfman
is somewhat in his BATMAN style but stands fairly well on its own.  With his
first real budget, Raimi has managed a number of nice visual effects though
at times he almost borders on being pretentious.  One such touch has
Hastings watching the death of her lover.  First the background fades to a
graveyard, then her clothing fades to a black mourning dress.  A number of
visual touches seem to borrow from ALTERED STATES.  But there are also
surprising visual gaffes such as shots shown in mirror image with tell-tale
backwards lettering.  At one point we see a truck with a clown smile face on
it destroyed and seconds later we see it miraculously undestroyed.  The tone
of the film abruptly shifts to tongue-in-cheek toward the end, damaging the
feeling.
     DARKMAN has been getting some very favorable comment from critics.  And
I tried to turn my mind off and just enjoy the film.  But I have to say
DARKMAN did not do very much for me.  I give it a -1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Mummy, The (1999)
     I am not old enough to have seen the original release of the Boris
Karloff THE MUMMY (1932).  I caught it on television as I was growing
up, and it is a cherished memory.  This concept was that mysterious
ancient magic was still powerful and you have to respect ancient
strange gods and their mysterious curses.  There was a real sense of
wonder in the great old film and in the idea it was based upon, the
idea that there was a degree of truth in the ages-old religion that
inspired the great stone enigmas of Egypt.  Karl Freund's film, often
deemed slow by today's teens, was not actually slow but hypnotic.  Its
unspoken premise was that the universe was full of possibilities,
including nasty ones that Isis and Osiris and Anubis were as powerful
as any gods, and they only for now chose to slumber.
     Today we live in the age of "Buffy the Vampire Slayer," and our
teens have the answer to all that.  They know that in those old movies
the reason that people had all that trouble with mystical forces is
that they did not know martial arts.  If you run into particularly
nasty magic from the age of the pyramids, all that is really necessary
is that you kick a little harder.  All that old awe stuff was stupid.
So for this audience a mummy movie needs a lot of action and Indiana
Jones style thrills and funny jokes and special effects.  That really
is what we have gotten.
     The new version of THE MUMMY begins with an extended opening
sequence showing the origin of the living Mummy told as we tell it in
the 1990s.  As much as the film in general does, this sequence mixes
blessing and curse.  There is a beautiful computer animation, if
somewhat obviously animation, of an ancient Egyptian city.  While
somewhat idealized it looks fairly close to being done with a high
degree of historical accuracy.  This is followed by scenes of Imhotep
(Arnold Vosloo), here a high priest of Osiris fooling around with
Pharaoh's wife Ankhesenamun. The latter is dressed in a sort of fishnet
outfit. Let us say that historical accuracy is not uniformly
distributed.  Of course, the lovers are discovered and Pharaoh is
roughly as forgiving as one would expect of a living god.  Imhotep is
sentenced to be mummified alive, to be made immortal, and to suffer an
eternity of living death in his tomb in Hamunaptra, a treasure city and
sacred burial site.
     Flash forward to 1921 and we find American adventurer Rick
O'Connell (Brendan Fraser) is fighting with French Foreign Legion when
he runs across the ruins of what might be the legendary Hamunaptra.
>From there the general flow of the plot is obvious and not unlike a
hyped-up version of THE MUMMY'S HAND.  O'Connell gets involved with
Evelyn Carnarvon (Rachel Weisz) the daughter of a famous explorer.  Two
groups of people end up trying to find the riches of Hamunaptra and a
third group is trying to protect the city and its secrets.  The secrets
include an immortal mummy who when raised needs to collect living
organs to adopt into his body and recreate himself whole.
     Adrian Biddle's cinematography captures a big adventure feel and
spectacle that is unusual for traditionally low-budget mummy films.
Here, at least in the early parts of the film there is a good
adventuresome look for the film.  While Jerry Goldsmith's score is not
one of his better works and does not make itself memorable, at least it
underscores the action well.  There are certain dramatic problems with
the film.  Some tension is created as the mummy becomes more and more
complete by virtue of the organs he steals.  But when he is complete,
he just looks like Arnold Vosloo again.  It is something of a letdown;
Vosloo is no Boris Karloff.
     This new THE MUMMY is a comedy that does well what current films
do well, but it completely fails to do well what 1932 films did well.
In short, in spite of the title, this just is not THE MUMMY.  On
leaving the theater I felt like chanting, "Show me THE MUMMY!  Show me
THE MUMMY!"  This experience rates a 6 on the 0 to 10 scale and a +1 on
the -4 to +4 scale.
     1. The real Imhotep lived around 2980 B.C.E.  Imhotep, very
probably one of history's great geniuses, was a physician and an
architect.  He invented step pyramids for the Pharaoh Zoser, leading
the way for true pyramids.  However, he probably would not also have
been a priest of Osiris as the film portrayed him. The real
Ankhesenamun lived around 1375 B.C.E and was the wife of Tutankhamun.
Naturally Imhotep and Ankhesenamun never met, much less had a great
love.  The time difference is roughly the same as if it was suggested
that Attila the Hun had an illicit affair with Meryl Streep.
     2. The descendents of the original Egyptians are portrayed in the
film as Moslem; they would much more likely be Coptic Christians.
     3. Though unstated, Evelyn's father is clearly intended to be Lord
Carnarvon, who in 1923 would be pivotal in Howard Carter's discovery of
Tutankhamun's tomb. Lady Elizabeth Carnarvon's death in 1929 was one of
those linked to the supposed curse on Tutankhamun's tomb.
     4. Books with pages were invented in China and did not make it to
places like Egypt until something like the 4th Century C.E.

Title
Review for Bedroom Window, The (1987)
          Capsule review:  In the best film thriller I have seen
     in a while, Steve Guttenberg pretends to have witnessed a
     crime his paramour actually saw.  Before long, he is swept
     into an ever-worsening vortex of trouble and danger.
     I recently gave a fairly negative review to an attempted nightmarish
thriller, THE HITCHER.  The plot of that is one of a teenager driving
cross-country who picks up a psychotic hitchhiker and spends the rest of the
movie fighting this creep who always does just the right thing, who has
super-human strength, and who apparently has the ability to cloud the minds
of officers of the law.  Several people commented that they found it a very
tense film and one asked me what more I wanted from a thriller.  I just saw
a film that has some superficial similarities to THE HITCHER but does just
about everything right that I thought THE HITCHER did wrong.  The film is
THE BEDROOM WINDOW and it does right nearly everything that I thought THE
HITCHER did wrong.
     Steve Guttenberg plays a young executive at a Baltimore construction
company who has a short affair with his boss's wife.  From his bedroom
window she witnesses an assault on a woman on the street below.  Leter that
evening another woman is murdered nearby.  Sylvia, the boss's wife, cannot
report what she saw to the police without her husband finding out about the
affair so she describes the assailant to Guttenberg and he tells the police
that it was he who saw the crime.  This begins a chain of events that start
out simply inconvenient for Guttenberg but get worse and worse, eventually
achieving truly nightmarish proportions.
     THE BEDROOM WINDOW, unlike THE HITCHER, has genuine characters with
motivation and personalities.  The killer, when finally discovered, is far
more exciting as a character than is Rutger Hauer in THE HITCHER because he
is real and makes mistakes.  Guttenberg's desperation is also effective and
believable because, while he rarely does the smartest thing he could do, the
character always has good reasons for what he does.  As a side note, the
action of the film takes Guttenberg to the fells Point Saloon, which might
well be a tip of the hat to Guttenberg's first major role in DINER.  That
film took place at the Fells Point Diner.
     THE BEDROOM WINDOW has characters the audience cares about getting into
believable messes.  I rate it a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Strictly Ballroom (1992)
     Society has its rules.  Because of these rules everybody knows where
they stand and what is expected of them.  Who c Scott Hastings started to go
wrong.  He came from a good family.  His parents ran a ballroom dancing
studio.  Scott himself had the makings of one of Australia's great ballroom
dancers.  Then one day Scott broke society's rules.  In the middle of a
minor ballroom competition Scott just snapped.  Suddenly he was dancing his
own steps--steps not accepted by the Australian Ballroom Dance Federation.
Here in Technicolor and stereophonic sound is the story of Australia's
Spartacus of ballroom dancing.
     Here also is a delightful satire of really bad over-ripe dramatic
story-telling.  It is all here: the boy with the dream, the girl from the
wrong side of the tracks, the pushy mother, the conspiracy to fix the big
dance competition, the dark secret from the past, and, of course, the
climatic dance competition.  And not one un-telegraphed plot twist.  In
fact, everything is here to make the plot feel like an old friend.  The
target is contrived film plotting and STRICTLY BALLROOM hits the mark with
deadly accuracy.
     The film stars Paul Mercurio as Scott Hastings, who instinctively knows
that a man has got to dance the way a man has got to dance.  Actually, this
particular man DOES dance very well, not that that is really the point of
the film.  Scott's love is Fran (played by Tara Morice).  She has glasses
and a bad complexion, and is ugly and surprisingly clumsy, but inside she
knows she has what it takes to be beautiful and a great formal dancer.  Bill
Hunter plays Barry Fife, who wrote the videocassette on ballroom dancing.
But does he hide a sinister secret?
     This is a film that has echoes of what is wrong in even the most
popular films from 42ND STREET to ROCKY and HOOSIERS.  I give this one a low
+2 on the -4 to +4 scale.  It's a hoot!

Title
Review for Last Emperor, The (1987)
          Capsule review:  Impressive biographical historical epic
     gives an emotionally uninvolving account of the life of Pu
     Yi, the last emperor of China.  Bertolucci tells us about
     historical events he should show us and shows us sex scenes
     he should probably only tell us about.  But the sweep of
     history is certainly present and a great deal of change in
     China is obvious.  Rating: +2.
     We in the United States feel we have grown used to change.  Change
seems to come quickly and to virtually all aspects of life.  But in fact
change does not come very fast to the United States and we do not take to
change well.  The country that has seen the most change this century is, in
all probability, China.  For millennia it had retained a feudal structure
under the emperors.  China held firmly to its past as the rest of the world
moved forward.  When it finally did let go of that past, it snapped
violently forward into the 20th Century.  In the span of a single lifetime
it has gone from dynasties to the electronic age.  Even a shorter lifetime
could have seen five very different forms of government.  And such a
lifetime was the one lived by Pu Yi, the last emperor of China.
     THE LAST EMPEROR chronicles Pu Yi's life from the days the emperor
ruled to the Republic, to the days when the Japanese invaded and ruled
Manchuria, to the Communist revolutionary government, and finally to the
Cultural Revolution.  And each government uses Pu Yi without ever giving him
any power.  He is always a puppet and each succeeding government merely
seizes the strings from the previous one.  Each regime is portrayed in a bad
light and each resurrects aspects of the days when the emperor ruled.
     THE LAST EMPEROR is a big film, an epic, with a great deal of
historical scope.  As such it is quite a good film, but it is in some ways
very flawed.  Bernardo Bertolucci somehow fails to breathe any life at all
into his characters.  They are strangely uninvolving; one is always
displaced from them.  The characters are more ciphers than humans.  Just
when we might be ready to empathize with Pu Yi, he does something immature
and nasty and suddenly we find ourselves not caring for him again.  THE LAST
EMPEROR also panders a little, taking more opportunities than necessary to
shock us with scenes of breast-feeding, feces-sniffing, multi-partner sex,
opium use, and lesbianism.  Bertolucci underestimates his audience (or at
least me) if he thinks that this sort of thing is what would interest them,
even if he finds historical documentation for it, which I doubt.

Title
Review for Personal Services (1987)
     It is tough to say exactly where this film went wrong.  This is a sad
parable of a boy with rat-like features.  For years he has lived in a junkyard,
thought by everyone to be just one more legend.  Then he is kidnapped and falls
into the hands of Sondra Locke, who wants to exploit him to make a fortune.  In
retrospect, a lot of the film was probably intended to be funny but just
wasn't.  The film's view of humanity as being entirely selfish and callous just
is too familiar.  Like HAROLD AND MAUDE, this film was probably not intended to
be a first-run hit but to become a cult film.  Unfortunately, it never has the
right touch.  RATBOY is a production of Clint Eastwood's company Malpaso.
These days usually Eastwood directs Malpaso films; this time he has allowed his
frequent co-star to direct.  Rating: 0.  (All films will be rated on the -4 to
+4 scale.)
     This film came as something of a surprise, not because it was unusual but
because after a few good reviews it turned out to be remarkably and
unexpectedly usual.  In spite of pretensions to be something more, PERSONAL
SERVICES is little different from a lot of English sex comedies that get picked
up to run on cable after midnight.  Julie Waters (who was so good in EDUCATING
RITA) plays a character the film claims was inspired by but not based on
Cynthia Payne, a notorious London madam.  Due to unfortunate financial
pressures, Cynthia is forced to become first a prostitute and then a madam.
For a hard-hitting, realistic view of the world of prostitution, PERSONAL
SERVICES is right up there with THE BEST LITTLE WHOREHOUSE IN TEXAS.  There is
no attempt at impartiality, and eventually the film degenerates to pure sex
farce.  Rating: 0.
     Spend a couple of hours safety-pinned to a punk rocker.  See Sid Vicious
slam his head against a brick wall to get a reaction from his girl friend.
Watch him for two hours doing the same thing figuratively to get a recation
from anyone who will give it.  This is an uncompromising film that never asks
you to care for punk rocker Sid or his girlfriend Nancy, just as they never
seem to first we see Sid among the London punk culture.  They do likeable
things like spray paint graffiti on borrowed apartments or kick in windshields
of Rolls Royces.  In the second part of the film we see them among bewildered
non-punkers.  They go to the United States as part of a tour and, among other
activities, visit Nancy's grandparents who quickly tire of the little
parasites.  The title characters lead pointless, useless lives that are cut
mercifully short by early deaths.  Rating: +1.

Title
Review for Remains of the Day, The (1993)
     Stevens (Anthony Hopkins) is Lord Darlington's loyal butler.  And that
is all that Stevens allows himself to be.  Very old values tell Stevens that
every fiber of his being should be devoted to his vocation.  So he has
strangled off every emotion and inclination but those of loyalty and
integrity as a butler.  Lord Darlington (played by James Fox) is, after all,
a very important man.  As a diplomat he entertains other diplomats from all
over Europe.  As Germany re-arms under Hitler, Darlington has strong
sympathies for the German people and he holds international conferences in
Darlington Manor to convince other countries that Germany under Hitler does
not constitute a threat.  Stevens does not so much submerge his feelings
about his master's politics as actually deny himself the right to even hold
any feeling or opinion but loyalty.
     Into this house comes a new housekeeper, Miss Kenton, played by Emma
Thompson.  At first there is friction between Stevens and Miss Kenton,
particularly over Stevens' father, who has come to work in the same house.
Eventually they learn to work together and to some degree understand each
other.  Miss Kenton is even startled one day to discover Stevens actually
respects her.  She responds by developing affection for Stevens and is
frustrated to realize that Stevens does not allow himself the emotion to
reciprocate her feelings.
     Stevens' loyalty is made all the more tragic by the shallowness of the
diplomats and friends of Darlington who feel they are the saviors of Europe
while steering it toward inevitable war.
     Yet the story is a bit of a tear-jerker and seems to do less with more
than this year's similarly themed UN COEUR EN HIVER.  The screenplay is by
Ruth Prawer Jhabvala based on the novel by Kazuo Ishiguro.  And there is
something else here that is unexpected from a British-born writer.  European
films often show Americans as being brash dilettantes.  While Christopher
Reeve, as an American congressman attending a conference, is an idealist, he
also is perhaps the only one of Darlington's guests to understand the issues
involved at the conference.
     THE REMAINS OF THE DAY is impeccably directed by James Ivory and
Hopkins' acting is a joy to behold as he walks around the Manor giving
bulldog looks and overseeing his master's house.  Hopkins is always able to
find something physical to do with a scene that seems to go beyond the
script.  In one scene Thompson is trying to pry an object from his hands.
Hopkins resists, then relents.  Most actors would simply let go of the
object cradled in their arms.  Hopkins flattens his hand giving an
unexpected gesture of surrender.  Thompson is engaging also, but with much
less of a flair for the unexpected.
     This is a solid film that may remind some of the TV series UPSTAIRS,
DOWNSTAIRS.  The characters are well portrayed but it is just a bit obvious
in theme.  I would give it a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Accidental Tourist, The (1988)
          Capsule review:  Slow adaptation of the Anne Tyler
     best-selling novel is good viewing for those already familiar
     with the story but may seem lethargic and perhaps a little
     pointless to the casual viewer.  Kasdan re-unites Turner and
     Hurt.  Rating: +2.
     Macon Leary is a man who never gets out of his easy chair.  Physically
perhaps he does, but mentally and emotionally he cannot face the world of
the unexpected.  His philosophy of life is always to follow the path of
least resistance.  Macon has all the character of a wet washrag.  His
occupation is helping others to share the same numbed existence.  He writes
travel books for people forced to travel but who are anxious to avoid any
new experiences.  Macon, who advises his readers never to carry anything
they would be devastated to lose, brings that same philosophy to everything
he does in life.  But new experiences are coming to Macon.  A year ago his
son died in a senseless murder.  Now his wife Sarah is leaving him.  And
soon he will meet Muriel, a very kookie dog trainer who has designs on both
Macon's dog Edward and Macon himself.  For over two slow hours we watch
Macon buffetted by the tides of those around him until finally he is ready
to leave his easy chair and make a real decision.
     THE ACCIDENTAL TOURIST is Lawrence Kasdan's film based on Anne Tyler's
beautifully textured novel of the often odd people in Macon Leary's life.
In THE ACCIDENTAL TOURIST, Kasdan re-unites William Hurt and Kathleen
Turner, the stars of his BODY HEAT, as Macon and Sarah.  Having seen them
together before gives a sort of pre-history to their relationship much like
Tracy and Hepburn would have.  Hurt and Turner may not be readers' images of
the Learys but they certainly are one interpretation of the roles.  Oddly
enough, Geena Davis is too natural an actress for her role.  Some of the
things Muriel does in the book that seem really weird Davis does so
naturally that they lose much of their strangeness.  Yet Muriel, as only the
third lead, is the character of most interest to the viewer.  Macon and
Sarah are too bland really to catch the audience's imagination the way
Muriel does.  Tyler could put some character into Macon but Hurt seems to be
just sleepwalking through his role.  I would rate THE ACCIDENTAL TOURIST a
+2 on the -4 to +4 scale, but I recommend it only to people who are already
familiar with the story.  If I had not been, I might well have given the
film a lower rating.

Title
Review for Doomsday Gun (1994) (TV)
          Capsule review:  Once again HBO's docu-dramas prove
     that there are good films being made for cable.  The
     story of Gerald Bull and his attempts to build a super-
     gun for Saddam Hussein's pre-war Iraq was under-reported
     in the press, in spite of the natural fascination of the
     material.  This film is a sort of TUCKER-meets-Tom-
     Clancy based on fact.  Rating: +2 (-4 to +4)
     I think I have a special fondness for HBO docudramas.  They
generally have a good feel for how to make recent history engrossing
and dramatic.  Whether they choose to base it on pre-existing material,
as they did in last years adaptation of Randy Shilts's AND THE BAND
PLAYED ON, or whether they write their own story based on research as
they did with DEAD AHEAD, their quality is generally more than a rival
for what is playing in the theaters.
     With DEAD AHEAD they had their work cut out for them.  This was
the story of the Exxon Valdez disaster and the politics of what
followed.  It is not easy to make that material really engrossing, and
they managed.  DOOMSDAY GUN suffers from no such handicap.  The story
of Gerald Bull and his super-gun already has the makings to be Tucker-
meets-Tom-Clancy.  Add to that the fact that the story was really was
under-reported in the press and you have a fairly engrossing piece of
entertainment.
     Frank Langella plays Gerald Bull, a child-man with a fascination
with large artillery pieces and the engineering intellect to build the
guns that he dreams about.  His inspiration since boyhood has been
Jules Verne's FROM THE EARTH TO THE MOON with its cannon large enough
to send a shell and its passengers to the moon.  The Canadian has built
guns for the United States and many of its allies, including Israel,
whom he helped to defend the Golan Heights.  After a falling out with
the Americans he decides that he will sell his services and that of his
small organization to the highest bidder ("except the Russians").  The
highest bidder turns out to be Saddam Hussein who is militarizing and
fortifying Iraq.  Alan Arkin plays an Israeli intelligence officer with
the uncomfortable job of convincing a friend and former ally not to
built his gun and place it in the hands of Hussein.  Meanwhile Bull has
to get the industrialized nations to build the parts he needs under the
noses of their own intelligence agencies.  Then there is the larger
story of how much governments' intelligence agencies knew and even had
complicity in the arming of Iraq.
     If you go into DOOMSDAY GUN expecting CLEAR AND PRESENT DANGER,
you are sure to be disappointed.  But if you are expecting a modest
little made-for-cable film, you will probably be very pleasantly
surprised.  DOOMSDAY GUN ranks very well with what is in release in
theaters.  If you consider all the boxing matches and stand-up comics
ad nauseum that made-for-cable fare is becoming on the "premium"
services, DOOMSDAY GUN at least shows that some quality material is
still being made.  I would give DOOMSDAY GUN a +2 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels (1998)
     LOCK, STOCK, AND TWO SMOKING BARRELS is the kind of farce we have
seen before. It is a comedy of chaos.  This sort of comedy puts enough
groups of people together in a script, none knowing what the others are
doing and (perhaps) the audience can follow what is going on, but you
can reasonably expect that none of the characters has a clue.
Particularly good comedies in this vein are Martin Scorsese's AFTER
HOURS and John Landis's OSCAR.
     The plot of LOCK, STOCK, AND TWO SMOKING BARRELS works like a
well-oiled machine set on high-speed, with everybody doing things to
everybody else and nobody being sure who is doing what to whom. It
seemed like a good idea at the time. Four young London low-lifes figure
they have a good shot at getting rich if they can get into a high
stakes poker game.  They get together 100,000 pounds.  What they did
not count on was that the game was rigged and that they would end up
owing 500,000 pounds.  And they have one week to get it.  Luckily a
possibility presents itself.  Their next-door neighbors are planning to
rob an urban marijuana farmer.  Our group plans to steal the proceeds
of that crime.  But that is not all that is happening.  All told there
are about six different groups of people, all criminal in some ways,
running around bumping into each other, double-crossing each other, and
shooting each other up.
     Everybody is doing something illegal in this part of London; it
goes with the turf.  Set in a part of London where the law is something
of an irrelevancy, this frantic farce is the first outing for 30-year-
old writer and director Guy Ritchie.  Everyone here is a criminal, but
at least he is an eloquent one.  As has been the style for crime films
since PULP FICTION, the dialog leans to the clever and inventive side
and away, far away, from realism.  Everybody knows that few real thugs,
and certainly not the ones this far down the ladder, are as eloquent
and as engaging to hear as the ones in this film.  If they were this
bright, they would be in a less hazardous profession.  But then the
filmmaker's first responsibility is to entertain.  Some Americans will
have problems penetrating the thick accents that unfortunately obscure
some of the funniest lines.
     Most of the actors have good credentials in British films, though
they may be less familiar in this country.  One exception is a small
part for Sting. Supplementing the cast are some particularly ugly
actors, apparently by the credits supplied by a special agency
dedicated to providing ugly actors.
     The film has considerably more violence than an Alec Guinness
English crime comedy would have and some of it may cut against the
humor, but Guy Ritchie is a promising director.  Rate this a 6 on the0
to 10 scale and a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Blob, The (1988)
     When the original BLOB came out in 1958, it was a film that was in some
respects ahead of its time.  Not that it was a virtue, but it was one of the
first science fiction films that put teenagers not only at the forefront as
the main characters but also made them the clearest thinkers of the film--a
device to cater to a recognized teenaged audience even then.  Also the film
was made by an independent production company but released by a major--in
this case Paramount--a practice more common today than in the 1950s.  One
thing that was not 1980-ish about THE BLOB was the special effects.  At that
time most often special effects were expected only to help tell the story,
not to be visually believable necessarily, much in the way that little is
really visually believable in a marionette show.  So, like many of the
science fiction films made when science fiction films were hitting their
stride but special effects had not yet hit theirs, THE BLOB is getting a
nominal remake in the special-effects-conscious 1980s.
     I say a "nominal" remake, because there are some major twists to the
story not in the original film.  Perhaps Jack Harris--who produced the
original and co-produced the remake--felt that the original story was a
little slow and simplistic for modern audiences.  However, the major
"innovation" is one that has been done many enough times that a straighter
remake would have made for a more original film overall.  Many of the
incidents of the original film occur in the remake but in different ways.
Shawnee Smith plays Meg Penny, who has seen what the amorphous alien can do,
but nobody believes her.  The police look at the mostly-consumed body of one
of the victims  and assume absurdly enough that it is local rebel Brian Flag
(played by Kevin Dillon) who killed (and ate?) the unfortunate after a
disagreement between the two.  I assume some sort of congratulations should
go to screenwriters Chuck Russell (who also directed) and Frank Darabont for
figuring ways to take the plot of a 30-year-old film and fill it with 1)
motor vehicle chases, 2) sex, 3) another retread of the condom-buying scene
from SUMMER OF '42, 4) heavy armaments, 5) an anti-government social
statement, 6) whiz-bang special effects, and 7) rock music.
     And whiz-bang special effects they are.  The original shapeless glop
from outer space did little but roll.  The new incarnation also shakes and
rattles.  It does all kinds of disgusting gooey things that seem to have
been inspired by the effects of John Carpenter's THING.  Also, the
filmmakers of the new BLOB know how to create some atmospheric photographic
effects.  So which is the better film?  Well, if they are seen back-to-back
(which effectively I did), I would say that the original pales next to the
remake.  That only proves that the remake would have been a memorable film
in the 1950s--if it had not been banned for what then would have seemed like
too much sex and totally absurd levels of violence.  But the original will
remain the classic because it stood out from the pack.  The remake is just
one more of the same kind of film.  Rate it a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Finding Forrester (2000)
     Two films back Gus Van Sant had a large success with GOOD WILL
HUNTING.  The public seemed to go in a big way for this story of a
blue collar mathematics genius. (Mine was one of the few dissenting
opinions and mostly for the unlikelihood of the premise.)  Van
Sant's follow-up made a definite thud with an almost scene-for-scene
remake of the classic PSYCHO.  PSYCHO is one of those films that one
ought not to remake.  Van Sant needs another success to show that
GOOD WILL HUNTING was not just a fluke.  He really has to have
another GOOD WILL HUNTING.  Sadly that is rather transparently what
he was trying a little too hard to make.  He took the premise of his
former success and doctored it to be an even surer success.  First
he plays the race card.  This time his hero is not just a blue
collar worker, he is a really deserving sixteen-year-old black
writer who is trying to succeed in an academic world dominated by
white males, some of them nasty.  Coming to a new and posh school a
rich white girl takes an interest in our young writer, and you know
immediately they are going to hit it off.  Why?  Van Sant is taking
no chances.  If they fight the script will have to make one of them
right.  It can not make a white right in a conflict with a black or
a man right in a conflict with a woman.  Neither would be safe
filmmaking, so the clearly can be no conflict between the two of
them.  Then to make the film even safer there is a big part for Sean
Connery as a great writer who takes our deserving lad under his
wing.  Connery makes few films that do not succeed and here he even
was one of the producers.  Retread concept, political correctness,
and Sean Connery: this is Van Sant playing it super-safe.  Oh, yes,
and did I mention there is also a "big game"?
     Outwardly, Jamal Wallace (played by Robert Brown) seems like
just about any other ghetto kid.  Well, he is great at basketball.
But privately Jamal likes to read the great works of Western
literature.  And then he has his notebooks where he writes his
thoughts that he does not want to share with the world.  In this
Bronx neighborhood there is a strange old man who never leaves his
apartment.  He just stares out the window at the passing parade and
does who knows what else.  He just looms as a presence over the
neighborhood.
     On a dare Jamal breaks into the strange apartment and is about
to steal something small to prove he was there but is frightened off
leaving behind his backpack with his writings.  The old man
eventually gives the backpack back, but the notebooks have been
marked up with the critical comments that could only come from a
great writer.  It is the kind of tutelage that Jamal desperately
wants.  The recluse turns out to be the great William Forrester
(Sean Connery), the J. D. Salinger-like writer who wrote one great
novel and then never published again.
     Meanwhile Jamal has attracted the attention of a prestigious
school who wants the students for his basketball skills and only
secondarily for the potential that his test scores show he has.  But
there is pressure in the new school to push Jamal into the
basketball track while his writing teacher Professor Crawford (F.
Murray Abraham) finding his writing getting better and better
bigotedly suspects Jamal of cheating.
     There is not doubt that the best part of the film is the
writing lessons which are written with insight.  Suggestions like
writing first from the heart and then rewriting from the mind sound
useful, though they may be a little obvious.  And they are a special
treat delivered by the charismatic Connery who, though not known for
his writing ability, has the hypnotic style that would make even
toilet repair sound enthralling.
     This is the second film I have seen this year photographed by
Harris Savides, the other being THE YARDS.  I definitely see a
pattern forming.  Both are films in film noir style with overuse of
dimly lit scenes.  Many of the scenes really seem to be carved from
the darkness.  In Forrester's apartment the lighting is so muted
that shadows on Connery join with the background darkness.
Crawford's classroom is also filmed in dim and downbeat style.
Scenes are frequently washed out.  It feels to me like this is
manipulation, though in a better film it might more sympathetically
be called style.  In any case there seems to be an excess of it
here.
     By trying too hard to be successful, this film rarely rises
above mediocrity.  I rate it a 4 on the 0 to 10 scale and a 0 on the
-4 to +4 scale.  I did like the writing lesson, but with that
exception everything I ever needed to know about FINDING FORRESTER I
got from watching the trailer.

Title
Review for Bonfire of the Vanities, The (1990)
          Capsule review:  DePalma echoes some things worth
     saying, amplifies some things that are not, twists the tone
     of the Wolfe book, and makes the audience seasick in the
     process.  With over-rated boxoffice stars such as Hanks,
     Griffith, and Willis, he stacked the deck against himself.
     Rating: low 0 (-4 to +4).
     THE BONFIRE OF THE VANITIES is an occasionally audacious comedy with a
large number of grievous faults.  Many of those faults would either
disappear or would be outweighed by the film's virtues if this had been an
original screenplay and there had not already been a novel with a similar
plot and identical title written by Tom Wolfe.  As an adaptation of a novel,
Brian DePalma's film and Michael Cristofer's screenplay are a total botch.
As a film that stands by itself, it has some very nice touches and is only a
partial botch.  Any film that sets out to point out social ills and has
something to offend nearly everybody cannot be all bad, but a comedy that
ends with some dignified character summing up the film and making a sermon
for more "decency" at the end has a hard time being all good either.  In the
1950s and 1960s a Spencer Tracy or perhaps a Henry Fonda could sermonize and
it would work.  Here it is like getting to the bottom of an ice cream sundae
and finding a chunk of prime rib.
     The story of THE BONFIRE OF THE VANITIES has much the same world-view
as Billy Wilder's excellent ACE IN THE HOLE (known on television as THE BIG
CARNIVAL).  Each is a story of a human mishap and a large number of people
professing only the best of intent swarming to it like sharks to serve their
own self-seeking ends.  In this case, the mishap occurs when Wall Street
wizard Sherman McCoy (played by Tom Hanks) is driving his mistress home from
the airport, misses an exit, and must drive through an unfriendly part of
the Bronx.  They are trapped in a probable mugging attempt.  They try to
escape with mistress Maria Ruskin unknowingly backing McCoy's car into one
of the muggers.  An alcoholic reporter, Peter Fallow (played by Bruce
Willis), desperately needing a big story blows this one into big headlines.
Also, a black minister, the Reverend Bacon (played by John Hancock), whose
resemblance to the Reverend  Al Sharpton is "purely coincidental," decides
to use the incident for political grist.  Soon a whole circus of vultures is
preying on the incident from all angles, blowing it into a major racial
incident.
     And from all angles is exactly how DePalma chose to film BONFIRE.
DePalma has often used interesting camera angles to add atmosphere to a
scene.  Here he does it by far too often and for often inexplicable reasons.
The audience watches a phone conference from the ceiling of a room looking
straight down.  There is no explanation to the viewer of what he or she is
doing on the ceiling.
     The film actually has a cast which includes some very fine actors such
as Morgan Freeman, F. Murray Abraham, Donald Moffat, Robert Stephens, and
Andre Gregory.  Medium-weight notables include Saul Rubinek, a clever comic
actor misused here.  Then there are some dead-weight actors apparently on
hand for boxoffice value.  These include Tom Hanks, Bruce Willis, and
Melanie Griffith.  Perhaps a good director could squeeze a good performance
if they were perfectly cast.  Here they are not, and DePalma is not that
good a director.  Hanks is wooden and evokes little emotion from the role.
Griffith is once again quite good at taking off her clothes, but her ability
to do a Southern sexpot named Maria is beyond her ability.  She does not
look like a Maria and her Southern accent is forced.  The accent also
probably changed in the course of filming and in her first scene in the film
her voice sounded crudely overdubbed.  Then there is Bruce Willis.  His flat
acting did not get in the way of the "Die Hard" films.  About the only film
he would be well-cast in would be THE BRUCE WILLIS STORY, and even there it
is questionable if he could really get into the character.
     With more smoke than fire, THE BONFIRE OF THE VANITIES never ignites.
I give it a low 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Grumpy Old Men (1993)
     The town of Wabasha, Minnesota, has seen for years the battle of two
now crotchety next-door neighbors, friends from youth and at the same time
enemies since not long after.  John (Jack Lemmon) and Max (Walter Matthau)
seem to live to play nasty jokes on each other.  In their 70s, there now is
little in either's lives but watching television, ice fishing, and
tormenting the other.  Then a likable, sexy kook moves in across the street.
Now the two old men have a new activity, stairing out the window at Ariel
(Ann-Margaret).  And they have a new conquest to be rivals for.  Ariel is
someone who lives life rather than retreating from it the way John and Max
do.  Ariel is like a mystical force in Max and John's lives.  Her presence
in Wabasha is never very well explained, nor is what she lives on, nor even
her interest in Max and John.  But her presence will transform them.
     Jack Lemmon and Walter Matthau are almost a classic comedy team after
THE ODD COUPLE, THE FORTUNE COOKIE, and THE FRONT PAGE.  But director Donald
Petrie seems at a loss as to how to tap into that comic potential.  The
fault is not his and is certainly not his actors' but that of a poorly
written screenplay by Mark Steven Johnson.  At its best, the screenplay
makes palatable some trite points about living life and taking risks.  But
the film indulges itself too much in showing old men cussing and using
sexually explicit language as if that was in itself supposed to be
hilarious.  Actually we get to see that Lemmon and Matthau really do have a
chemistry together still as we see them joking with each other in the
outtakes run under the final credits.  But when the cameras were rolling for
real and they had to follow Johnson's script, somehow all the chemistry
evaporates.  Petrie did much better with MYSTIC PIZZA a much more keenly
observed regional comedy.
     GRUMPY OLD MEN is over-powered with a very good cast who just are not
needed in the parts they have gotten.  At 52 Ann-Margaret is starting to
lose her figure but little of her appeal.  And in addition somewhere along
the way she has learned to act to the point I would almost classify her as
under-appreciated.  Burgess Meredith is incredibly wasted as a foul-mouthed
nonagenarian.  Daryl Hannah and Ossie Davis are around in smaller parts than
they deserve and ones they should have let go to less familiar actors.
     GRUMPY OLD MEN is a very fluffy film people who think it is funny to
see old men fighting like children and repeatedly calling each other "putz"
and "moron."  If you list ten crises that old men might face, two of them
will probably be in this film.  This one has a moment or two, but the rest
fails to click.  I give it a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Emperor's New Groove, The (2000)
     What would the holiday season be without a new animated film
from Disney?  This outing rather than taking some classic story and
inaccurately making it into a film, they have taken their own story
setting it in Peru vaguely sometime before Columbus came to the New
World.  The Emperor Kuzco (voiced by Saturday Night Live veteran
David Spade) has been particularly cruel to a well-meaning lug of a
peasant Pacha (John Goodman). Kuzco may not have a shred of meanness
in his body but the also does not have a scrap of empathy or
kindness.  What does have is an ambitious and evil adviser, Yzma
(the great Eartha Kitt).  Yzma tries to poison Kuzco in order to
take his place but instead accidentally turns him into a llama and
then loses him.  Kuzco find himself alone and friendless except for
the peasant he has mistreated.  He finds it a rocky friendship but
one he comes to depend on.
     As Disney animated films go this is not the best, but
definitely not the worst.  The script does not go into the
characters as much as it might, choosing instead to keep the script
denser in humor.  Wait long enough and the relationship between
Kuzco and Pacha will become surprisingly touching.  The choice of
setting is one that has rarely been used for film and one that the
younger members of the audience might not immediately recognize or
understand.  It may provide a good opportunity for parents to give
their children a history lesson, if indeed the parents understand it
themselves.  Of course the history must not be taken too seriously
either.  The script mixes its cultures a little too much having in
one scene a Mexican piata party.  One of Sting's forgettable songs
incorrectly refers to this part of the world as "Meso-America."
John Goodman is a little large and plump to play an Inca.  Incas
were probably short and certainly not heavy.  The script manages to
avoid having anything larger than a ladybug die in the course of the
story.  The most frightening scenes are not of violence, but of
dangers of falling from great heights.  Then again, this is Peru and
you expect great altitudes.  The religious right may object to a
usually likable gay character, even if he is the conflicted henchman
of the villain.  Those who would ban books like Harry Potter and THE
WIZARD OF OZ may be unhappy that magic has an effect in this film;
though they may take consolation in that it seems never to be the
effect intended.
     This film does push what were at least of few years ago limits.
For most of the film Pacha's wife is noticeably pregnant.  And in
spite of the fact she seems content to be what we would call "a
housewife," she proves herself more than match for some powerful
baddies.  Most of Disney's best villains have been women so they
have never held back from allowing women to be villains, though
usually they are uglier and older women and this film is not really
an exception.  The corpulent hero is, however, something of a change
for Disney.
     For once the animation techniques do not run away with the
show.  There are no scenes that are anywhere near a breath-taking as
the opening of THE LION KING.  Most of the animation seems fairly
flat and old-fashioned.  This is Mark Dindal's second outing as
director.  His previous effort was CATS DON'T DANCE for Turner
Broadcasting.  He did previously direct for Disney the animation
sequences for the under-rated THE ROCKETEER.  The music is by John
Debney and David Hartley.  Sting wrote the songs and is apparently
unhappy that some of his songs were dropped.  He might have a point.
The songs dropped could easily have been better than the boring
place-holder songs that were not dropped.  At least I think they
were boring place-holder songs, admittedly not much about the songs
comes to my mind at the moment.  When Disney Studios said that they
mourned the loss of Alan Menken, it was with only the best of
reasons.

Title
Review for Starship Troopers (1997)
     STARSHIP TROOPERS by Robert Heinlein is one of the perennial
classics of science fiction.  The novel may be so popular more for the
timing of its publication, 1959, than for quality, being probably the
first important piece of military science fiction.  The book itself is
a look at life in the combat military during World War II, but had it
been written as such it would have been forgotten two months after it
was published.  And it was, in fact, probably inferior to many of its
contemporary novels about the war.  But Heinlein was a science fiction
author and so set the story in an interstellar war.  Having been
written as science fiction, it brought military fiction to a new
audience and probably was pivotal in creating military science fiction
as a new sub-genre.  (Historical note: 1959 was also the year of
military science fiction novel DORSAI by Gordon Dickson.  The only
major military science fiction novel prior to that year was 1952's
GUNNER CADE by Cyril Kornbluth and Judith Merrill writing as Cyril
Judd.)
     Heinlein's story is a set of forays into Heinlein's own political
philosophy combined with a sort of enthusiastic--but somehow unsavory-
-look at military discipline.  He wrote it after serving in the
military in the war, albeit behind a desk.  The philosophy for me was
more engaging than the discipline.  After all, if one feels threatened
by people's different ideas, one should not be reading science fiction.
But Heinlein's admiring descriptions of good, harsh military
discipline--up to and including the use of the lash--are often hard to
take.  So that humanitarian concerns would not get in the way of
Heinlein's military philosophy he dehumanized the enemy well beyond
even the level of gooks to spiders with hive insect habits.  (The film
goes a step further, and in the wrong direction, calling them both
"insects" and "arachnids."  Of course they cannot be both.)  Making the
enemy bugs neatly reduces them in the reader's concern and disposes of
any humane consideration for them.  Ironically, this is just the aspect
that Paul Verhoeven seizes upon in his film.  He wants to examine what
would a war of infantry against an implacable army of giant insects be
like?  And with the advent of good computer graphics, giant insects
could be shown attacking in the thousands.
     The story of the film is at least roughly that of the novel.  It
is a world where veterans have taken over the government and military
service is a prerequisite of having voting rights.  The film follows
Johnny Rico (played by Casper Van Dien) through the military experience
from his high school experience coming under the influence of pro-
military teacher Jean Rasczak (Michael Ironside).  It follows him and a
few of his friends though enlistment and an extended sequence of
training.  About an hour into the film it takes him to battle and to
becoming a hero fighting the giant insect like inhabitants of
Klendathu.  Overlaid on the military plot is the much less interesting
story of the love lives of the main characters.  It is hard to build up
a whole lot of interest on whether Johnny will get together with
girlfriend Carmen Ibenez (Denise Richards) or Dizzy Flores (Dina Meyer)
when giant insects are ripping people apart.  That whole subplot seems
a little bit like unneeded padding in a film that is 129 minutes long.
     As far as acting, this is a film in which all the interesting
characters are in minor roles.  The only real tension on screen in the
relationship between Casper Van Dien and Denise Richards is to see when
they finally do kiss, how will they keep those jutting chins from
getting in the way.  On the other hand in a more minor roles are Clancy
Brown as the violent, sadistic drill instructor with the heart of gold.
Always watchable is Michael Ironside as the gruff, hardened teacher-
turned-commander with the heard of gold, Rasczak.  Anybody who is
military seems gruff and insensitive, but that is because they really
love the troops.  Edward Neumeier wrote the screenplay which shows
similarities to his screenplay for Paul Verhoeven's previous ROBOCOP,
particularly in its send-up of the popular media.  Special effects--
some showing incredible swarms of giant insects--are produced by
Industrial Light and Magic among other contributors.  Things have come
a long way since Warner Brothers made THEM! with one full-sized ant
mock-up and the front half of a second ant.  These giant insects are
too realistic at times.  The film has a right-wing-slant so it comes a
no surprise that the score is by Basil Poledouris who also scored CONAN
THE BARBARIAN, RED DAWN, IRON EAGLE, ROBOCOP, AMERIKA, FLIGHT OF THE
INTRUDER, and THE HUNT FOR RED OCTOBER.  It is not one of his better
scores and is regrettably well below that quality he showed with CONAN
THE BARBARIAN.
     My feeling is that it is not the most ambitious project in the
world to make a film of STARSHIP TROOPERS.  The best film you could
possibly make would be none too good.  But I also feel this very nearly
is the best film you could possibly make from the book.  It is not
accurate to the book, but most of the changes are probably for the
best.  There are places that this version diverges from the novel, but
they seem to be modifications that the author would have endorsed.
Heinlein gave us an all-male army that just does not square with our
90s vision of the future.  If serving in the military is a prerequisite
for voting rights, it is unlikely that women would be excluded and they
would have to serve under the same conditions as the men.  The script
does that very handily.  Also scenes like the one with co-ed shower
facilities are very much within the style of later Heinlein books.
That idea could have almost come from a Heinlein book.
     With the proper set of substitutions this could be a fairly
typical John Wayne film about World War II.  As a science fiction piece
with good special effects, this makes for an entertaining two hours
plus, and it is fun to hear some of Heinlein's political ideas.  I
would rate this film a +6 on the 0 to 10 scale and a +1 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Den polnoluniya (1998)
     CAPSULE: This is a story-less film told in a series of vignettes.
Each vignette is linked to the next as a background character becomes
the main character of the next.  Diverting though very little more than
the sum of its parts in spite of some repeated themes. Rating: 6 (0 to
10), 1 (-4 to +4)
   - Probably most notable for the many points of view as the film
     progresses.
   - Directed by Karen Shakhnazarov.
   - I first saw this style of story-telling, or lack thereof, as a
     joke on MONTY PYTHON though the subsequent film SLACKER also used
     the technique.  The camera follows one character, jumps to a
     passerby, then follows him.  When it is all over you have a mosaic
     of life, but do not know any of the characters particularly well.
   - We see life in modern Russia and a little bit of history, though
     we do not actually learn very much.
   - There are some repeated themes.  A high proportion of the men seem
     to ogle women.  There are repeated references to Mongolia and to
     Genghis Khan.  Three different characters were affected by a scene
     in a restaurant in 1948.
   - At least twice there is sudden and unexpected violence.
   - Much of this film seems to take place almost in real time, but
     there are continuity errors.  We go from evening to the middle of
     the day.  A sunny day is suddenly dismal.
   - There are some well-known Russian actors, but none is on the
     screen very long.
   - There is a central mystery about a scene in a restaurant, but we
     never have even the simplest part of it answered.
   - The most enjoyable vignette puts us in the mind of a dog.
   - There is a minor piece about Pushkin stopping in Mongolia on his
     way to fight the Turks.
   - There are a few dream sequences, though none of any great fantasy
     value.
   - Winner of several international cinema prizes but not likely to be
     seen on the art-house circuit in the US.

Title
Review for Don Juan DeMarco (1995)
     It is an old theme to juxtapose the cruel, real world with the
seductive fantasy of a madman.  Certainly that is the power of
Cervantes's DON QUIXOTE.  And there is some attempt in DON JUAN DEMARCO
to capture some of the power of DON QUIXOTE or perhaps even the
strengths of Anthony Harvey's THEY MIGHT BE GIANTS.  But for such a
story to work, the fantasy under-story has to be compelling.  The Don
Juan story of DON JUAN DEMARCO is less a compelling fantasy that
captures the viewer and more a satiric burlesque.  Lord Byron's near-
epic poem version of the adventures of the amorous nobleman was itself
intended to be a light social satire, perhaps no more compelling than
CANDIDE.  Jeremy Leven's screenplay takes three incidents from what was
apparently the Byron version of the story.  (He does that loosely,
incidentally; Leven changes some of the character names and the island
incident should have preceded the harem captivity.  Also in the Byron,
Juan's father died when Juan was a very young boy.  Still, of the many
versions of the Don Juan story, Leven seems to be basing his on the
Byron.)  But the story works only if Leven can make the reader
wistfully wish the fantasy were true.  There would be nothing
compelling about a patient straddling the real world and, say, that of
PEEWEE'S BIG ADVENTURE.  Rather than having DeMarco's fantasies give
resonance to his madness and make us want to believe them, they leave
us with nothing we really feel like believing in either the sane or the
mad world.  It is one of several miscalculations novelist Jeremy Leven
made in directing DON JUAN DEMARCO based on his own screenplay.
     The story begins with Don Juan DeMarco (Johnny Depp) dressed in
the clothing of a Spanish nobleman, but we quickly discover he is in a
modern American city.  He seduces one last woman and then goes to
commit suicide for the love of the one woman he could not win.
Psychiatrist Jack Mickler (Marlon Brando) talks him out of the suicide
by playing along with the imaginings.  When Don Juan is admitted to an
asylum for ten day's observation, Mickler arranges to do the observing.
There the doctor finds himself drawn into Don Juan's charming fantasies
and finds that the young man's pleasant delusions transform his own
life and his relation with his wife (Faye Dunaway).
     Johnny Depp does a fairly good job as the seductive Spaniard,
adding one more likable misfit to what is becoming a long list of such
roles.  Heresy Alert!  Marlon Brando does as well as he is physically
able to do with the role but it has been a long time since he has
turned in a really good performance--in fact, forty-one years!  Since
THE WILD ONE, he has relied on his physical presence and his natural
speech patterns, not unlike John Wayne.  Today he is rotund, he lisps,
and he is surprisingly in need of elocution lessons.  Dunaway puts just
a bit more edge in her role, but has no chemistry with Brando.  It is
unclear what it would mean to have chemistry with Brando in his current
state.  Bob Dishy is unusually restrained as the chief doctor of the
hospital.
     A gentle fantasy along the same lines could have been a very
welcome film, but DON JUAN DEMARCO fails in the execution.  I give it a
low 0  on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Hope and Glory (1987)
          Capsule review:  John Boorman's reminiscences of
     childhood during the London Blitz form the basis of this
     unconventional but believable comedy.  This film is filled
     with memorable characters and a child's sense of wonder at
     the War.  Rating: +2.
     There are lots of films made about World War II.  Some are idealized--
and just about any English-language film made *during* the War was--and some
are more realistic.  There are at least some films made about the British
home front but very, very rare is the film that does not idealize.  You get
this vision of a dedicated British people suffering bombs and bullets with
an idealized British stiff upper lip.  Many seem inspired by MRS. MINIVER.
John Boorman, whose films usually are abstract and in the fantasy genre, has
turned out a realistic reminiscence of the WWII British home front which
probably has more than a little autobiography.  HOPE AND GLORY is a
child's-eye view of the home front, though we see what is happening with the
understanding of an adult.
     Very simply, HOPE AND GLORY is the comedy/drama of the Rohan family of
five when Daddy enlists in the army and goes off to war.  The first scene of
the film sums up the best of the film.  We see a weekend movie matinee
audience at a theatre.  On the screen, a somber newsreel talks about a
worsening international situation that we know will soon lead to
hostilities.  In the audience, however, war seems to have broken out already
as screaming kids run around, throw things at each other, and generally have
the high old time that kids always have if given half a chance.  Well, the
war does come but it still leaves the children that necessary half a chance.
This is was with a sense of wonder.  After each bombing the children
joyfully run around to pick up souvenirs like shrapnel and shells.  Even the
adults stare with childlike wonder as an errant barrage balloon, almost as
big as a house, floats solemnly through the neighborhood, capriciously
damaging a chimney here or a roof there.  And in this world of the inanimate
balloon seeming like a mischievous floating monster, we see some of what
could have inspired Boorman's love of fantasy.
     Unfortunately, partway through the film seems to lose some of its
vision.  The story of the children gives way to to soap-operish story of
Young Bill's teenage sister.  The subplot of the sister drags the film down
a bit but the mother's character is every bit as well-drawn as young Bill's.
And in one sequence a prayer voiced under the mother's breath focuses the
film and elevates her part from a portrayal of a hysterical mother to a
tragic hero.  The film is at its best when it is about the mother or son in
London.  When the film shifts away from London, as it eventually does, it
loses its uniqueness.  But until that point it is nearly perfect.   Rate
HOPE AND GLORY a high +2.

Title
Review for Phenomenon (1996)
     George Malley (played by John Travolta) is someone who just gets
by in life.  He is a good auto mechanic and a decent gardener, but not
a whole lot more and he has few friends.  He would like to win the
favor of a single mother of two children, Lace Pennamin (Kyra
Sedgewick), but she is just as determined not to become involved with
him.  On the night of his 37th birthday he is looking at the sky and
sees a bright flash of light that knocks him over.  Suddenly the
relationships of things become much more clear to him.  He is able to
play a winning game of chess for the first time.  He finds that the
Spanish he was trying to learn is suddenly very easy for him, he can
read two or three books a day--whatever he tries is easy for him.  Soon
he discovers he has the power to feel the waves that foretell the
coming of earthquakes and can even will objects to move.  The one thing
that he cannot do is win over Lace, the woman he loves.  The more he
tries to win her over the more stubborn and bewildered she becomes.
George has two constant friends.  Nate Pope (Forest Whitaker) is a
similarly lonely friend whose lot, George tries to improve.  The other
is a local physician (Robert Duvall) who is like a foster father for
George.  With some of the strange new abilities and his innocent genius
he has he is able to win over friends.  He makes himself a hero, at
least temporarily, but soon he finds that his new powers also breed a
certain suspicion. To make matters worse he decodes a cryptic signal he
hears on short-wave and responds with his own messages in the same
code.  This only brings him to the attention of the government who take
him into custody to study his strange skills.  In spite of his best
efforts he finds himself becoming more and more of a freak in his own
town.
     John Travolta carries out his role sufficient charm, though not as
much as the script really calls for him to have. But for some minor
descents into frustration and neurosis, he remains a simple, pleasant
and likable genius. He is getting a little old for boyish, winning
roles.  Kyra Sedgewick is also likable but brings even less of an edge
to her role than does Travolta.  Travolta's unflagging devotion to this
woman should presumably be endearing, but apart from a minor physical
attractiveness there is little in her role that makes her seem so worth
the effort.  Robert Duvall is along playing a physician who is almost
like a father to the Travolta character.  He seems to be there often as
only a sounding board and a script device.  Duvall is too good of an
actor not to give a good performance but there is little new for him to
do.
     What carries PHENOMENON is the subject of human intelligence and
writer Gerald DiPego's idea of what a big increase in IQ brings to a
small man in a small town.  George's ingenuity and his ideas of small
projects and experiments are enjoyable, but toward the end of the film
the point of what is going on becomes muddled.  George seems to pop in
and out of adjustment in ways that are not nearly as interesting as the
well-developed Charly Gordon in Daniel Keyes's FLOWERS FOR ALGERNON.
That novel set the standard to measure stories of intelligence increase
by and this story comes a poor second.  (Of course, the film version
CHARLY also misses the potential of the story badly and tries too hard
to be a 1960s mod film.  A faithful adaptation of the novel might be a
much bigger service to the viewer than this film had even the potential
to be.)
     This is a story not without its interesting moments, but it needed
less of a fuzzy edge and less of an admiration for good sweet old
George Malley.  I would give this film a flat +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Green Mile, The (1999)
     Five years ago Frank Darabont released THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION a
film he wrote and directed based on a Stephen King story set in a
prison.  I picked that as the best film of its year.  Now Darabont
returns to that territory with what promised to be a powerful Stephen
King story, but one which is not compelling enough to justify the
film's three-hour length.  Certainly the payoff, when it comes, is
moving.  But it is undercut by the introduction of mystical elements
and by heavy-handed stylistic touches.  The addition of supernatural
elements to a gritty story of human experience seems ill-conceived.
     At a home for the elderly one resident Paul Edgecomb (Dabbs Greer)
has a number of strange behaviors.  Every day he gets out and takes a
walk in the woods.  Seeing the film TOP HAT on television reduces him
to tears.  Finally he tells his story in private to a friend.  In 1935
he was the lead guard on death row at a Cold Mountain Penitentiary in
Louisiana (here he is played by Tom Hanks).  The team of guards was
made up of decent men most of whom just wanted the best for the
convicts under their care.  The one exception is the sadistic Percy
Wetmore (Doug Hutchison), the governor's wife's nephew.  [No mention is
made of Senator Huey Long who was a virtual dictator in Louisiana.  It
was under his auspices political appointments like Percy's were made.
The governor that year was Long's handpicked replacement when three
years earlier in the middle of his term Long vacated the office for a
seat in the US Senate.  Long was at the height of his power at the
point this film was set.  Change was fast in coming, however.  This
film is set in July.  A little over a month after the events of this
film, on the night of September 8th, 1935, Dr. Carl Austin Weiss
assassinated Long in the State Capitol Building in Baton Rouge.]
     The story really begins when John Coffey (Michael Clarke Duncan)a
huge black man is brought to the cell block having been convicted of
raping and murdering two young girls.  Paul cannot believe that this
giant child-man who is afraid of the dark could be a murderer.  The
film slowly develops the stories of some of the inmates and guards.
For a long time the script neglects Coffey whose angel-like presence is
felt over the entire cell-block but who does little to interact with
people.
     Darabont's script apparently wanted to carry over from the novel
the feeling that the viewer really knows the inmates as individuals and
cares about them.  But the characterization comes slowly and too
frequently characters are dispatched quickly.  The one inmate not well
characterized is Coffey, the one who would be most interesting to know.
Our reactions to Coffey come mostly from stereotypes borrowed from
other films.  That is the problem with too many of the main characters.
We do not really understand Percy at the end of the film.  Nor do we
really understand Wild Bill.(Sam Rockwell of JERRY AND TOM), a wild
animal of a man.  Even Paul is not a character of much depth or wisdom.
He is simply a good and decent man.
     Almost the entire film is shot with a heavy yellowish filter that
blocks out any bright light and artificially casts a pallor on the film
and calls attention to itself.  In THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION Darabont's
team created a prison that looked like a prison of the period.  This is
a longer film and most of the film takes place in the one cell block
and the room of the electric chair.  While the confinements are not
claustrophobic, they do start to become tiresome after a while.
     Tom Hanks is reasonable as the decent and likable prison guard, a
welcome change from usual negative stereotypes.  A man with grown
children, he looks a little young for the role and the accent never
sounds exactly right.  His second in command is David Morse as Brutus
"Brutal" Howell.  Morse is a large quiet actor familiar from THE
CROSSING GUARD.  He his tall and calm image gives him the air of a
blond Gary Cooper.  James Cromwell has been a familiar face for many
years, but since BABE he has been getting more major roles.  Here he
plays a prison warden with the requisite dignity.  Another familiar
face in a very small role is Gary Sinese.
     The lineage of THE GREEN MILE is excellent, but the film itself is
only decent and probably could have been more effective at a two hour
length.  I rate is a favorable but disappointed 6 on the 0 to 10 scale
and a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Dolls (1986)
          Capsule review:  Often charming little horror piece done
     to near-perfection further establishes Empire Pictures'
     reputation for being *the* creative horror film maker of
     today--perhaps a latter-day Hammer Films.  Rating: high +1.
     Back in the mid-1950s while the science fiction film was first
blossoming, the horror film was foundering.  The Universal cycle that
started in 1930 had gone into unconscious, then self-conscious self-parody
and died a decade before.  Horror films meant shoddy productions in which
neurotic teenagers turned into vampires or werewolves or Frankenstein
monsters.  Then in 1957 budget studio Hammer Films tried some radically new
approaches to horror films and turned out well-made products and the horror
film was reborn.
     Today the horror film is foundering in self-parody, in teen-age films,
and in innumerable repeats of being chased by a bogeyman whom you cannot
kill.  Knock him down and he just gets up (HALLOWEEN 1 and 2, FRIDAY THE
13TH PART N, THE TERMINATOR, THE HITCHER, etc., etc.--even the final
sequence of FATAL ATTRACTION).
     The one-time rip-off producer who *is* exercising different nightmares
and making some of the most creative horror films today is Charles Band's
Empire Pictures.  That is the company who made the HOUSE films, THE RE-
ANIMATOR, and FROM BEYOND.  Among their most creative is TROLL which started
as a film about a troll running around murdering people.  When the decision
was made that the film had to be rated PG, the gore was eliminated, the
horror toned down, and both were replaced by a heavy dose of high fantasy.
TROLL is uneven but often charming and surprisingly entertaining.  More
recently they have released DOLLS. a sort of horror fairy tale in the
tradition of A. E. Merritt that is also creative, charming, and
entertaining, but with a much better sense of mood and atmosphere than TROLL
had.
     During a storm six people are stranded in an old house with a
mysterious old toymaker (one-time British swashbuckling star Guy Rolfe) and
his wife.  The house is full of toys and especially dolls.  The two visitors
who are young in heart enough find all the dolls enchanting.  The other four
find being surrounded by toys *deadly dull*.  Of course, as the evening wears
on they find it less and less dull and more and more deadly.  Like an
episode of the old TWILIGHT ZONE episode it is not very surprising where the
story is going, but the telling of the story is nicely and originally done
with enough special effects to capture the imagination but not so much as to
distract from the people.
     DOLLS is a gentle film with a gentle message and just a tad too much
gore--as if it is walking a line between EC Comics and TWILIGHT ZONE, but in
a market where filmmakers are retreading each other's ideas, DOLLS recently
released to cassette, is something different.  The story is fairly (not
entirely) new and done with high production values.  The same could have
been said of Hammer Films' first big success, CURSE OF FRANKENSTEIN.  Rate
it a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Shattered Image (1998)
     CAPSULE: Anne Parillaud and William Baldwin star in a film that
has two story lines about the same two people.  In one the Parillaud is
a contract killer who meets Baldwin through her work.  In the other
story line the two are on honeymoon in Jamaica and there are mysterious
threats.  The viewer is watching not only to see how the story lines
work out, but what is the relation the story lines bear to each other.
Rating: 6 (0 to 10), 1 (-4 to +4)
   - Directed by Rual Ruiz, screenplay by Duane Poole.
   - We move back and forth between two story lines.  In one story line
     Jessie is an efficient emotionless assassin, In the other she is a
     frail newlywed, the victim of rape and later attempted suicide.
   - Point of film is to untangle what the two story lines have to do
     with each other.  How can these both be the same woman.
   - Graham Greene is oddly cast as Jamaican policeman.
   - Dreamy photography of Jamaica.
   - The ending leaves many questions unanswered.

Title
Review for Sinnui yauman (1987)
     One of the things I like to do occasionally in my film reviews is to
make reference to some very good film that I doubt most of my readers have
heard of and that I would like to call some attention to.  There are a lot
of decent films, and a handful of very good ones, that at this point may
exist only in the film libraries of obscure television stations, and when
these few prints disappear the films will be gone.  I would like to generate
some interest in four of these films, if not to help save them, at least to
alert people that if you do get a chance to see these films, it is a rare
chance and you should give them a try.
     Of course, there are a lot of obscure films that are showing up on
videotape today, many of them very poorly-made films, and it is ironic that
some terrific films are being over-looked, but in each case I think I can
understand why some producer would think the film would not sell well on
tape.  There are three science fiction films and one horror film.  However,
none of the film has special effects.  Particularly for science fiction,
people have come to expect visual effects.  I guess they feel that if they
do not really enjoy the story then at least there will be something
interesting to watch.  These films are just actors in front of a camera,
perhaps with a very rudimentary make-up effect thrown in (but very little).
Three of the films are in black and white and unfortunately that is also
considered to be a strike against a film.  I still recommend these films
highly to watch for.
     This film combines Cold War thriller elements with science fiction and
a compelling human story.  A scientist working on sensory deprivation
commits suicide and is discovered to have been passing secrets to the
Soviets.  Was he to blame or could his mind have been twisted while under
the influence of the sensory deprivation tank?  The government decides to
experiment to find out.  Another scientist working in the same field (played
by Dirk Bogarde) is very devoted to his wife and family.  Can they change
that in his personality while he is in the tank?  This film is well-acted,
enthralling, and atmospheric.
     A secret project is working on space exploration right in the heart of
London.  The approach to exploration is a novel one.  Rather than sending
the whole human into space, they are working on a sort of technological
out-of-body experience.  Project your mind to another planet and there have
it take on physical form ... invasion by mental projection.  The rub is that
scientists on the project are being killed in some mysterious way involving
super-high energy.  And the wives of some of the scientists seem to have no
background that project security can trace.  The script is tense and the
acting is quite good, with a cast that includes John Neville (A STUDY IN
TERROR, THE ADVENTURES OF BARON MUNCHAUSEN) and Jean Marsh (UPSTAIRS,
DOWNSTAIRS).  (This film is so obscure that Leonard Maltin's usually very
complete MOVIE AND VIDEO GUIDE overlooks it.)
     This film is only 59 minutes long and originally was intended as a
television pilot, but was released to theaters to play with films such as
William Castle's I SAW WHAT YOU DID--which it far out-classed.  Leslie
Nielson plays a detective in late 19th Century San Francisco whose foppish
appearance hides a man very knowledgeable and adept in matters of the occult
and the supernatural.  A series of unsolved murders and a friend's blackout
spells may be connected and have some occult significance.  Mark Richman and
Werner Klemperer also star.  The latter, best known as the gullible
commandant from HOGAN'S HEROES, does a terrific job in a sinister role.
     This film is loosely adapted from the short story "Random Quest" by
John Wyndham.  Colin Trafford (played by Tom Bell) is a  leading scientist
at Britain Imperial Physical Institute when one of his experiments goes
wrong.  Suddenly he finds himself in a parallel London in a parallel Britain
that has not been to war since the Great War in the early part of the
century.  Trafford here is not a physicist, but a popular playwright.  He is
also now married to a beautiful woman (played by Joan Collins) whose life he
has made miserable with his selfish ways and his philandering.  Can Colin
convince the world he is the playwright while convincing his new wife that
he is different?  Then there are plot complications that lead to a fast-
paced climax across parallel worlds.  Denholm Elliot also stars in the story
which is part science fiction adventure and part love story.
     Of these four films only the last is in color.  At present, the only
one available on video, UNEARTHLY STRANGER, is offered only by a tiny
specialty house, Sinister Cinema.  Of the four, only QUEST FOR LOVE has
played on New York area television in the last fifteen years.  I would much
like to get my hands on copies of THE MIND BENDERS or DARK INTRUDER.
     Director F. W. Murnau is better known for NOSFERATU, but there is a lot
of good visual fantasy in this film version of the famous play by Goethe.
There is a terrific image of the Devil spreading his cape over a village,
and many other visual surprises throughout.
     The story could be better, but Conrad Veidt is terrific in the role of
a man whose face is carved into a huge involuntary grin.  Veidt conveys a
full range of emotions through his eyes alone.  The grinning Veidt was the
visual inspiration for Batman's foe The Joker.
     At times this is very slow but also at times a very effective horror
film.  This was a low-budget film done in Yiddish.  The "Dance of Death"
scene had become an eerie classic.  The story deals with a man's soul
returning from the dead to possess the woman he loved.
     Other Val Lewton films get more attention but this film is blacker and
bleaker than anything every done in film noir.  This is a solid mood piece
that stands above Lewton's other films.  A woman searching for her sister
runs afoul of murder and Satanists.
     This film has gotten some attention because of an allusion in a song in
the ROCKY HORROR PICTURE SHOW but it is rarely seen.  That is a pity because
it is quite a nice little supernatural thriller.  It suffers a little from
showing the audience too much too soon, but it still is suspenseful and
well-written.
     When Richard Matheson and Charles Beaumont co-write a screenplay based
on a novel by Fritz Lieber, you just naturally expect a good thriller.  This
story about an empirical college professor discovering that his wife and
several other professors' wives around him are actually witches is very
well-produced.
     This is a wildly uneven film, but it has many very good moments.  There
have been several attempts to do the stories of ventriloquist dummies who
have lives of their own.  This is the most intriguing treatment of the
theme.  For once the secret of the dummy is not a let-down.
     The first and last ideas of this film are pretty silly, but in between
this is a fairly exciting super-disaster film.  Some of the visuals are
spectacular.  There is also some complexity to the characters.
       QUATERMASS AND THE PIT (a.k.a. FIVE MILLION YEARS TO EARTH) (1968)
     This film is finally getting a cult following and some recognition.  It
is much better known in Britain.  The model of what a science thriller
should be, it unfolds like a science fiction detective story uncovering a
discovery that has greater and greater implications about the nature of
mankind.  This is one of the great idea films of science fiction cinema.
     Richard Matheson's adaptation of the black magic novel by Dennis
Wheatley takes a science fiction-like approach to Satanism.  It is fast-
paced and at times fairly intelligent.  Also worth seeing is Hammer Films'
other adaptation of Wheatley black magic, TO THE DEVIL A DAUGHTER.
     A vital and well-made historical fringe-horror film about one of the
great villians of English history, Matthew Hopkins.  Even Vincent Price does
a reasonable acting job.  The original musical score is actually quite
beautiful, though there is a version with an entirely different and much
less enjoyable score.
     In some ways an imitation of the style of WITCHFINDER GENERAL.  A 17th
Century English ploughman turns up the remains of a demon and the artifact
exerts satanic influence on the children of the region.  This is a very
atmospheric film with an authentic historical feel.
     This low-budget horror film redefined the concept of the vampire.  As a
reaction to the staid, hypnotic, and slow vampires of British horror films,
this film makes most vampires fast moving predatory deadly animals who hunt
in packs.  At the time this was pretty scary stuff and the film still has a
lot of its impact.
     Two mutually alien intelligences in the beginnings of a serious war.
It is really more about how each side collects information about the other
and uses its physical differences against the other.  Ants somehow develop a
gestalt mind and prepare to make themselves the masters of the world.
Visually very impressive with direction by visual artist Saul Bass (best
known for creating striking title sequences for other directors' films).
There is also some terrific insect photography.
     This fairly accurate adaptation of Algis Budrys' novel had film stock
problems (!) and could not be released to theaters.  That is a genuine pity.
Cold War story of its near future has a scientist important to military
defense in a bad accident.  The East Germans get ahold of him and return him
to the West more prosthetic than living matter.  Now the problem is, how do
you prove that he is who he says he is?
     Australian Peter Weir build his reputation on this strange, mystical
film about a lawyer who finds he might be the fulfillment of an Aboriginal
prophecy.  Images of nature out of balance and an intriguing story make this
story a real spellbinder.  This is a hard film to pigeon-hole and the
intelligence of the writing never flags.
     Lots of films try to do Medieval high fantasy, but this is probably the
best.  With the death of a great magician, his young apprentice must see if
he has mastered enough of his master's art to destroy a terrific dragon who
is ravaging the countryside.  There are lots of nice touches in the script
and the dragon is the best ever created on film.
     George Romero says he got this out of his system and never has to make
another film like KNIGHTRIDERS.  What a pity!  This was one of the best
films of its year.  Superficially this is the story of a traveling
Renaissance Fair that features jousts on motorcycles.  But it has some
terrific characters and a theme of the struggle between integrity and
commercialism and between idealism and practicality.  And late in the film
the viewer realizes that the film has also been doing something else all
along.
     Very few fans are willing to look beyond the naked woman and the
zombies to see what is one of the most bizarre and audacious concepts for
any science fiction film.  Vampires, we learn, are really beings that leak
lifeforce into the atmosphere like a tire with a slow leak leaks air.  They
must replenish the force regularly or they die.  Much as we put bacteria
into milk to multiply and make yogurt or cheese, some huge,
incomprehensible, amoral, alien race seeds earth with vampires.  The numbers
of these numbers will increase exponentially, leaking more and more
lifeforce into the environment so the aliens can vacuum it up.
     Hong Kong is making their own horror film movement for their own
audience.  There films are fast-paced, usually liberally laced with comedy
and martial arts, but also having some interesting horror concepts.  No one
such film is all that terrific (at least among the films I have seen so far)
but some are astonishing and full of unexpected touches.  Look for the
CHINESE GHOST STORY films, WICKED CITY, and MR. VAMPIRE (which must have a
different name in China since it is really about Chinese "Hopping Ghosts").

Title
Review for X Files, The (1998)
     THE X-FILES is, of course, a screen version of the popular
television show.  The first thing that people will want to know is if
they are not fans of the TV series, will the film make sense to them.
Well, I can say only what my experience was.  I would say that I am not
particularly a fan of the X-FILES show.  I probably have seen in the
range of six to ten episodes and have not seen anything that would make
me want to be a more regular viewer.  So not keeping up with the series
was I confused by the film?  I would say only in the right places.  An
feel at a loss to understand what was going on for any lack of
following the television series.  I think that if the viewer only knows
that the series is about two FBI agents who battle government efforts
to cover up paranormal phenomena, he is ready to see this film and, as
far as I know, will not miss a lot of what is going on.  How about the
other side of the coin?  Will regular viewers who miss the movie miss a
lot of the arc of the story line?  Again my guess is that the answer is
no.  In spite of claims in the coming attractions that all will be
revealed; it would be too radical a departure from the X-FILES formula
to tell much of anything helpful. That highly successful formula keeps
the viewer tantalized but never reveals enough to really clear up the
basic mysteries.  The film appears to me to be no more and no less than
a very deluxe version of an episode of THE X-FILES television series,
one with good special effects and a few very respectable character
actors.
     The problem with THE X-FILES is that as political thrillers go it
really does not cut the mustard.  In a really good political thriller,
say SEVEN DAYS IN MAY, the characters do intelligent things and it
makes the film all the more compelling.  It is clear from the script
(written by series creator Chris Carter) that Mulder is supposed to be
a very clever agent of the FBI, and certainly his continued (albeit
limited) success at keeping his investigations going would lead one to
believe that he should be fairly bright.  In the film he never gets to
exercise much intelligence.  The plot is repeatedly moved forward by
people who are privy to secret information dropping Mulder
surreptitious clues as to what is really going on, or by Mulder making
extremely lucky guesses.  Remove his lucky hunches and his Deep-
Throat-ex-machina informants and Mulder really does not do a lot
besides going through the obvious motions.  In fact the only time we
really get to see his professionalism is when he blurts to a barmaid
that the FBI is covering up an alien invasion. Carter would like us to
believe that Mulder is intelligent, but apparently Carter has no idea
how to write Mulder that way.
     Toward the end of the film Mulder's incredible luck becomes almost
laughable.  He has what amounts to a needle-in-a-haystack-within-a-
haystack quest.  Suddenly Mulder falls through a hole, drops a long
way, and lands amazingly uninjured within a few feet of exactly what he
is searching for.  This guy Mulder must have friends in much higher
places than the cloistered rooms of conspirators in which the film
glories.  Mulder must be friends with "the Guy Upstairs"... Chris
Carter, that is.
     But I am getting ahead of myself.  The film opens with the
familiar eerie whistle and almost immediately the plot twists start
coming thick and fast, though this may be "thick" may be in the sense
of "stupid."  We start with a short prolog taking place in a glacier-
bound Texas of 35,000 BC (more or less).  Somewhere deep inside the ice
something scary is happening.  We cannot really see it well, but it is
something with a lot of sudden jumps and loud noises.  When the same
violent thing happens again in present day Texas (minus the glacier, of
course), the government finds itself with some dead bodies.  And it
would want nobody to ask too many questions about them.  In one of
those great government conspiracies it tries to conceal the deaths. And
you should hear the absurd way they try to cover it up!  I discuss some
of the problems with the government plan in the spoiler section below.
Part of the cover-up uses agents Mulder and Scully and sends them
looking for answers to all the most embarrassing questions.  It will
lead them to the edges of a new conspiracy bigger than the ones before,
a conspiracy to change our whole future.
     In addition to series regulars David Duchovny as Special Agent Fox
Mulder and Gillian Anderson as Special Agent Dana Scully we have some
impressive character lending their talents: Martin Landau, John
Neville, and Armin Mueller-Stahl.  Glenne Headly is present for a
single scene as the barmaid...Long on style and visuals, but short on
story THE X-FILES rates a 5 on the 0 to 10 scale and a low +1 on the -4
to +4 scale. ).
     Incidentally, even in the worst of the Ice Age the glacier did not
extend south to Texas.  Remember that the glacier tore up the ground in
the North, leaving that region good only for industrialization.  It did
not roll over the South, which is why they later could remain
agricultural.  That was a big part of the cause of that ruckus we
Americans had in the 1860s.
     The initial cover-up with the building explosion could not have
worked.  First, I am sure the fire department knew to where the firemen
had been dispatched and it was not where they supposedly died.  The
black-eyed boy's mother also would have known her son was not by chance
in the exploded building.  And it is very unclear why the bomb expert
was willing to commit suicide for the good of the cover-up.  Also given
that they had worked out all those problems, the last people they would
have wanted involved with the cover-up would be their two star
paranormal investigators Scully and Mulder.  It is within minutes of
the start of the film that it starts losing its credibility.

Title
Review for From Dusk Till Dawn (1996)
     Let's say you are a video store clerk with some ideas of what you
would like to see in films.  So you make the crime film you have in
mind, inspired by Hong Kong crime films, and it is a moderate success
and popular with critics.  You take most of your remaining plot ideas
and combine them all in one script and surprise, the film is an
international sensation.  You bask in fame, but soon the question
arises: just what do you do for an encore.  The world is waiting for
your next film expectantly.  Can you imagine the pressure?  What are
you going to give us next, Mr. Tarantino?  Well, there is an old
Hitchcock plot you can turn into a short film for FOUR ROOMS.  This
time the critics are unimpressed.  But your name is gold so you make
another film.  This time you dust off a horror script you wrote as a
video clerk.  So what happens?  Well, in my opinion you have made a
fairly standard video store sort of horror film, a hyper-version of a
story that has been done before.  FROM DUSK TO DAWN is somewhat dressed
up with familiar actors and a big special effects budget, but these can
not raise the film much above its modest origins.  As director, Robert
Rodriguez handles his characters and his first large budget well.
Rodriguez is best known for his ultra-low-budget EL MARIACHI and
still-low-budget DESPERADO.  By his standards this is an epic spectacle
film.  But Tarantino, whose real forte is in creating the script, the
writing is already a big step down.  He needed to be associated with a
strong film and this was not it.
     The Gecko Brothers are loose and headed for the border.  Richard
Gecko (played by Quentin Tarantino) has helped Seth Gecko (George
Clooney) escape from prison and the two are cutting a swath, killing
and kidnapping their way to the Mexican border.  Along the way they
kidnap a family of three: widower and pastor Jacob Fuller (Harvey
Keitel), his daughter Kate (Juliette Lewis) and son Scott (Ernest Liu).
They sneak across the border and make for a rendezvous at a trucker and
biker bar.  The most sophisticated and stylish thing about this bar is
its name, The Titty Twister.  It is a place of drugs and sleazy
strippers with wild bar fights during the day.  Then after dark the
folks really let their hair down and not, long after, their fangs.
Yes, the whole bar is a front for a den of vampires.  Our two killers
and three hostages find themselves besieged by, if not an army, at
least a platoon of vampires presented in the special effects tradition
of FRIGHT NIGHT.  If this plot seems new and creative you haven't seen
the "Midnight Mess" chapter of 1973's VAULT OF HORROR.
     FROM DUSK TO DAWN will be a real disappointment for most Tarantino
fans.  While his trademarked hyper-violence is present in all its gory
glory, the dialog is not nearly so finely honed as it was in PULP
FICTION.  My guess is that Tarantino has not rewritten his script to
give audiences the sort of writing characterizations--he has given to
previous films.  One place where this film does stand out is in one of
Harvey Keitel's rare subdued performances.
     FROM DUSK TO DAWN may well get the attention of the critics
because of the names involved and the ad campaign, but more creative
vampire films get made and go unnoticed to video stores and to cable.
In specific, whatever creativity FROM DUSK TO DAWN has, it pales next
to the latter two chapters of Ted Nicolaou's nearly unnoticed
SUBSPECIES trilogy or Anthony Hickox's SUNDOWN: THE VAMPIRE IN RETREAT.
You will find them on the same shelf of your video store where FROM
DUSK TO DAWN will probably end up.  I give the new film a 0 on the -4
to +4 scale.  My suspicion is that Tarantino used up his creative plots
on PULP FICTION and now his writing subsists of small borrowings from
old Hitchcock plots and an Amicus anthology film, and a bit from
NATURAL BORN KILLERS.
     Spoiler..Spoiler..Spoiler..Spoiler..Spoiler..Spoiler..Spoiler..
     While Rodriguez gives us some fast-paced action, much of it does
not make a lot of sense.  We once again have the BLOOD SIMPLE visual
image of a dark and dusty room with bullets cutting holes in the walls
so we see beams of light pierce the room.  But Rodriguez does not do it
right.  Following a beam backwards should take you directly to a source
the light.  If the beams are from sunlight they should all be parallel.
But Rodriguez has them pierce the room at all angles as if there are
many suns in the sky.  It is important to the plot of a vampire film
that the beams of light be from sunlight as you can imagine.  The same
error was made in NEAR DARK.
     A vampire must be staked through the heart to kill it.
Technically the stake should pin the vampire's heart to the coffin,
according to expert Montague Summers.  But Rodriguez allows several
scenes to pass where vampires are staked in the stomach.

Title
Review for Whore (1991)
     When the subject of a film is sex, don't trust my opinion.  Generally
what the critics like, I don't.  I thought SEX, LIES & VIDEOTAPE was dry and
dull.  The characters bored me.  Yet the film was almost universally
applauded by the critics.  Generally I am not very impressed by films about
sex.  Also I am not keen on Ken Russell.  Russell is more interested in
putting strange images on the screen than he is in telling a story.  With
the exception of THE DEVILS and LAIR OF THE WHITE WORM, ken Russell and I
don't seem to agree on what makes a good film.  WHORE is a Ken Russell film
about sex and prostitution that has gotten a thumbs-down from most of the
critics.  That is three strikes against the film.  Who knows what possessed
me to see the film?  Yet once the film started I was totally engrossed by
what I was seeing.  Admittedly it is cartoonish and some of the scenes do
not work.  Occasionally Theresa Russell out-and-out misreads lines.  Yet
there is an undeniable narrative vitality here.  Theresa Russell is a frank
and vulgar prostitute telling us about her profession as she sees it.  If
some of her stories seem contrived, it is because that is the way she
remembers them.
     The film covers a single day in the life of Liz, a prostitute.
Initially the film seems nearly plotless.  It appears to be just a portrait
of the world of the streetwalker.  The portrait is pieced together form
unconnected incidents punctuated by Liz explaining to the audience what she
is thinking and feeling.  By the end of the film we are no longer sure that
we have not crossed over into a story that Liz is telling herself.  Much of
the narrative is in Liz's mind and memory anyway.  She speaks directly to
the camera and it becomes her confidante throughout the day.  She tells the
camera her past: a horribly failed marriage, how she got into the business
of prostitution, how she got a pimp--perhaps more accurately how he got her.
And we see a cross-section of customers from gentle to vicious.  Ken Russell
does have an eye for the ugly!
     WHORE seems to a sort of penance on the part of director Ken Russell.
His 1984 CRIMES OF PASSION was probably the most positive view of
prostitution since IRMA LA DOUCE.  Kathleen Turner as China Blue found
prostitution a creative and fulfilling art that blesses her that gives and
him that gets.  In the seven years since that film it looks as if someone
has been talking to Russell.  In WHORE prostitution is a living death of
being manipulated, lied to, and beaten.  Russell drags in every vulgar
symbol of sexuality he can muster, yet avoids being erotic.  This is a film
well-suited to the NC-17 rating.
     WHORE is an adaptation of a play by David Hines, an English taxi driver
who patched together a play based on stories he'd heard from prostitutes who
had been his customers.  Even as third-hand stories, much of what we have
seen is told with skill and ower.  I give WHORE a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Ivan Groznyj II (1958)
     It has come time to review another undiscovered classic of early film.
This one shows up on public television every once in a long while but has
been completely forgotten by anyone who doesn't watch PBS.  The film is
really two Soviet films by Serge Eisenstein, IVAN THE TERRIBLE (Part I) and
IVAN THE TERRIBLE (Part II).  It is difficult to decide if this is really
one film or two.  On one hand, when Part I ends it has more loose ends than
a golf ball with the skin peeled off.  About all that is tied up is the
current sentence.  Talk about leaving room for a sequel!  Eisenstein doesn't
just leave ROOM, he leaves the whole house!  An historical note on
Eisenstein: he appears to be the only Jew revered by the Soviets since Karl
Marx.  Apparently he hid his religion by not asking to leave.
     As with most films about conflict, the IVANs tell the story of the
unending struggle between pretty people and ugly people, with ugly people
being the bad guys.  (This struggle may be more recent than we tend to
think.  In Dickens's time it was more a struggle of people with funny names
such as Twist and Nickleby against people with ugly names such as Mr.
Scrooge or Miss Zits.)  It is only with the more realistic Schwarzenegger
and Stallone films of the 1980s that the good guys are ugly too (and in
Stallone's case they are making up for lost time).  IVAN THE TERRIBLE is the
story of how after an ugly becomes Czar he tries to run Russia for the
peasants, all of whom are pretty.  From a distance Ivan looks ugly: his hair
is greasy and slicked down and he looks like he probably has fleas.  But it
turns out Ivan may not be ugly after all; it may be a plot by his aunt who
has a face like a corn-grinding stone.  It was probably she who put the
Penzoil in his Vitalis.
     The film opens with Ivan's coronation, which is more long and expensive
than it is interesting, but then that is true of a lot of Russian films.
They were made that way to prove to the world that Communism works so well
that they can afford to waste film.  But you know that Ivan is in big
trouble because the place is just teeming with *ugly* people.  There are a
few pretty people who are saying loyal sorts of things, but there are far
more uglies and they are not at all happy that Ivan is being crowned.  Be
warned, however, that some of the pretty people may well turn out to be
villains.  You will know this is happening when the camera starts showing
them in unflattering close-ups.
     Following the coronation there is a reception and banquet that turns
out to be the funniest meal on screen since Blake Edwards's THE PARTY,
except I guess it came before.  During the course of a one-hour meal:
  2.  Ivan's best friend announces he cannot support Ivan and exiles
      himself,
  3.  there is a peasants' revolt where they burn the outskirts of the city,
  5.  Ivan fights with one peasant in hand-to-hand combat,
  7.  the peasants return to their homes, the Mongol ambassador arrives and
      demands tribute,
     The second film has some definite stylistic differences from the first
film.  During the course of making the two films, Eisenstein became more
anti-West as time went along.  By the time he made the second film the
anti-foreigner sentiment is obvious.  He puts much more bright light at the
bottom of the screen so the subtitles will be almost impossible to read.  At
the same time, this makes the plot more complex and harder to follow.
     I wouldn't say this about Part I, but IVAN THE TERRIBLE (Part II) ranks
up there with the original PHANTOM OF THE OPERA, the original HELL'S ANGELS,
THE RETURN OF DRACULA, and SHE'S GOTTA HAVE IT as a film that suddenly goes
from black-and-white to color in the middle for no obvious reason.  It is
quite a shock. Presumably the Soviet economy took an upturn during the
shooting.  Unfortunately, the blues on the colored stock have been lost to
time but the reds are somewhere between vibrant and oppressive, much like
Ivan himself.  Part II has enough songs to rank almost as a musical and some
odd dance numbers, including one around a peasant dressed like the Statue of
Liberty.
     The two film together are fairly long but the plot is not difficult to
follow because it moves so slowly.  Other than the banquet scene, in any
given fifteen-minute stretch you can be reasonably sure that not much as
happened.  In fact, even in two films about Ivan, we learn almost nothing
about the man or anything he did.  The snail-paced plot instead gives plenty
of time for meaningful looks and poses.  It is as if every frame was
intended to be a great--if not very realistic--painting.
     In all, I would say that IVAN THE TERRIBLE is two classic films you may
want to see some time.  (Mediocre classics don't get ratings on the -4 to +4
scale.)

Title
Review for Finding Graceland (1998)
     CAPSULE: In a current-day cross-country trip a man picks up a
hitchhiker who claims to be Elvis Presley.  Harvey Keitel, Johnathon
Schaech, and Bridget Fonda star.  David Winkler directs the film with a
lot of heart.  Rating: 7 (0 to 10), 2 (-4 to +4)
   - A man haunted by the death of his wife a year earlier picks up a
     hitchhiker who is more trouble than he is worth.  He is a
     freeloader without money and though he does not look the part he
     claims to be Elvis Presley.  This is a warm film along the lines
     of MIRACLE ON 34TH STREET.  It toys with (without endorsing) the
     para-religious cult of worshipers of Elvis.
   - Not much resemblance to Presley, but perhaps that works.
   - That Keitel is good will come as little surprise.  Bridget Fonda
     pulls off a real tour de force as a Marilyn Monroe impressionist,
     even doing her own singing impression of Monroe.  Johnathon
     Schaech, a Peter Gallagher look-alike, holds his own as the main
     character.
   - Priscilla Presley is executive producer, though her contribution
     was mostly after production started.  She checked the script for
     accuracy and arranged for shooting at Graceland.
   - Nice regional photography.
   - It seems unlikely that main character would let anyone else drive
     his classic car.
   - Keitel does not do his own singing.
   - Definitely an enjoyable film even for people who are not Elvis
     fans (which includes me).
   - It is not clear if there is supposed to be a surprise twist
     involving the car accident.  You don't have to be Sherlock Holmes
     to figure it out.  Yet the script makes it seem like something
     kept secret.

Title
Review for Little Women (1994)
     The most enduring so-called "girls' book" ever written is Lousia
May Alcott's 1868 LITTLE WOMEN, based in large part on her childhood
experiences growing up in Concord, Massachusetts.  The novel has
previously been filmed five times, beginning with a 1918 silent version
and including a British mini-series.  It was even turned into a short-
lived television series in 1979.  The sixth filming may well rank as
the most beautiful and compelling version, though certainly some will
still prefer George Cukor's classic 1933 version with Katherine Hepburn
as Jo March and Spring Byington as her mother.  The newest version is
directed by Australian Gillian Armstrong of MY BRILLIANT CAREER and
MRS. SOFFEL.
     The Marches are a very tightly-knit family of four sisters and
their ever-perfect mother.  The family lives in 1860's Concord,
Massachusetts.  I have heard about families like this but never
actually believed they existed.  They share everything with each other
and are bound to each other with a love that transcends even the rare
imperfections.  They do things like give up their Christmas morning
dinner, including delicacies like sausage that are almost unavailable
during the Civil War, to feed a hungry immigrant family.  The girls
read poetry, put on little plays written by Jo (played by Winona
Ryder), and steal glances out their window at the boy next door, Laurie
(Christian Bale), and his stodgy tutor (Eric Stoltz).  The girls roll
bandages and take care of the sick and hungry while waiting anxiously
for letters from their father who is off fighting for the Union cause.
The sisters do have their occasional differences, but they always give
them up with a sigh of relief when something happens to bind them even
closer together.  Eventually Laurie becomes like one of the family and
there is no doubt that he will eventually court one of the March girls.
When he goes off to school the film jumps ahead four years and everyone
but young Amy (Kirsten Dunst) looks just the same.  Amy (now Samantha
Mathis) looks like she has aged about eight years.  Each daughter
develops into the woman her childhood characteristics made her.  Jo
writes melodramatic potboilers and goes to New York (following her
mothers suggestion, "Embrace your liberty") to make her fortune.  And
she becomes romantically entangled (big surprise!) with a German
philosopher who shares the boarding house where she is staying.  There
is sad family tragedy, there is warm family love, and there are
romantic entanglements.  Remarkably, Armstrong makes this story of
traditional values (with just a light whisper of feminism) work for a
90s audience, assisted by Geoffrey Simpson's nostalgic camera work.
British Columbia stands in for Concord and makes everything look homey
and beautiful.
     The casting of some of the major roles is a bit too Hollywood and
not enough Alcott.  Trini Alvarado looks more like a young Andie
MacDowell than like Alcott's plumpish Meg.  Alcott had Jo be tall and
awkward, and even the film script calls for her to be plain and to have
her long hair be her one nice feature.  Does it sound like I am
describing Winona Ryder?  The casting of beauty in roles that call for
plain tends to oversimplify the motivations of the various suitors.
Claire Daines as Beth is the only daughter who approaches being homely-
--in both senses of the word--in this version and the only one for whom
we never see a suitor.  Susan Sarandon conveys the warmth and wisdom of
Alcott's overly-idealized mother.  She is always there with just the
right insight, with a nursing talent that puts doctors to shame, and
with a noble and charitable thought for others.  Kirsten Dunst seems
far too precocious as the child Amy to grow into the placid Samantha
Mathis adult version.  Dunst does a good job, but she will be
remembered more for her role as the adult vampire trapped in the body
of a child from INTERVIEW WITH THE VAMPIRE.
     Among other things, the film chronicles how Jo's childhood writing
develops into what she writes as an adult.  Here her imagination is
seen as positive and constructive.  But the timing of the release
should invite interesting comparisons to Peter Jackson's HEAVENLY
CREATURES.  And LITTLE WOMEN sorely needs something for the viewer to
think about when it is over rather than just being left with a warm
feeling.  I give LITTLE WOMEN a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Witches of Eastwick, The (1987)
          Capsule review:  Broadband supernatural comedy has
     insight, slapstick, violence, horror, special effects,
     sophisticated comedy, profanity, a monster, vomit scenes,
     Jack Nicholson, Michelle Pfeiffer, Susan Sarandon, and Cher.
     For fans of six or seven of the above only.
     John Updike is a prize-winning writer of serious literature about
people finding their identities and that sort of thing.  His masterwork was
his trilogy of novels RABBIT RUN, RABBIT REDUX, and RABBIT IS RICH.  There
was something of a stir when he wrote THE WITCHES OF EASTWICK about three
women in a provincial Connecticut village who have a brush with a warlock.
People thought he was too good a writer to fall back on the fantasy market.
My guess is that it was a calculated financial move.  I have no figures but
I'd be surprised if it was not his most profitable book.
     Now THE WITCHES OF EASTWICK has been adapted into a film by George
Miller--you know, the man who directed the "Mad Max" films.  Add a musical
score by John Williams, a cast like Jack Nicholson, Cher, Michelle Pfeiffer,
and Susan Sarandon, and makeup by Rob Bottin (THE HOWLING) and you've got
one heck of a motley crew contributing to a movie.  With a crew like this
you might expect a film that is something of a hodge-podge.  That's pretty
good expecting on your part.  This film is an incredible hodge-podge, in
fact.  The film can't decide if it is light fantasy, horror, soul-searching
literature, comedy, Peyton Place, or what.  I would use a cliche like "This
film throws in everything but the kitchen sink," but it wouldn't be quite
true.  Instead I'll say this film throws in NEARLY everything including the
kitchen sink.  Warlock Jack Nicholson--I forget his character's name--
breezes into a provincial Connecticut town after he is wished to do so by
three unattached women (played by Pfeiffer, Sarandon, and Cher).  He takes
up residence in an old house where witches were once burned  (Pretty hard to
find.  Actually only one person in North America was ever sentenced to be
burned for witchcraft.  He escaped.  Salem has a very small witch-hunt
compared to what used to go on it Europe and all the Salem witches who were
executed were hanged.)  The three women have simultaneous affairs with
Nicholson and all seem to be taking it amicably.  Then things start to sour.
     Nicholson glides through his part, sometimes impishly childlike, often
ranting and bellowing like Ralph Kramden.  The three women are believable in
their parts and perhaps more realistic than most women in witchcraft films,
but don't look for them at Oscar time.  The film has some powerful scenes of
evil--some seem inspired by SOMETHING WICKED THIS WAY COMES--but as good an
actor as Nicholson is, he never rises to the malevolence of Jonathan Pryce
in SOMETHING WICKED THIS WAY COMES.
     THE WITCHES OF EASTWICK has its moments but they do not add up to one
whole movie of any kind.  It has something for everyone but it will have
enough of anything only for real fans.  Rate it a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     P.S.  To save having everyone e-mailing me Nicholson's character's
name, yes, I do remember it, but it's an inside joke.

Title
Review for Yin shi nan nu (1994)
     Ang Lee is the Taiwanese filmmaker best known to American
audiences for last year's charming but occasionally cliched THE WEDDING
BANQUET.  This year the fans of that film can enjoy his new film EAT
DRINK MAN WOMAN.
     Eating and drinking.  Men and women.  The title refers to two of
the basic human urges.  One is to consume food and drink; the other is
to mate.  These fundamental urges are central to Ang Lee's story of a
great chef and his three adult daughters.  Each of the four has a life
of her or his own and each of the lives intersect at the dinner table
over almost pornographically seductive Chinese banquet dishes.  Not
since BABETTE'S FEAST has food looked this sensually inviting in a
film.  (And, yes, I have considered LIKE WATER FOR CHOCOLATE, TAMPOPO,
THE AGE OF INNOCENCE, and WHO'S KILLING THE GREAT CHEFS OF EUROPE.  Did
I miss any?)
     Eldest of the daughters is Jen (played by Kuei-Mei Yang), a
sexually repressed chemistry professor who is just coming out of being
shell-shocked from a college romance.  The second daughter is Chien
(Chien-Lien Wu) a successful executive for the Taiwanese national
airline.  Deep down she regrets that she never became a proficient cook
and housewife since her father would not let her do the cooking.  Third
of the daughters is Ning (Yu-Wen Wang) who rebelliously works in a
Wendy's Hamburger Restaurant to spite her father's culinary tastes.
     Then there is Chef Chu himself (Si-hung Lung).  Knowing that he
will soon lose his daughters and dreading an empty nest, he is losing
his taste for life and has already literally lost his taste for food.
In his attempts to connect he has adopted the family next door: a
friend of Jen's and her mother and daughter.  But nothing in this film
is very far from food.  Chu's relationship with the little girl next
door is through his cooking.  When the family gets together and
communicates it is over one of Chu's carefully prepared meals.  It is
over meals that announcements are made to the family.  Much of the
screen time is spent showing exactly how Chu prepares his feasts. These
interruptions would be irritating distractions from the storyline but
they have their own interest value.
     EAT DRINK MAN WOMAN is a long film at 123 minutes and at times the
film moves slowly developing the relationships that form the four
different stories.  Lee is ambitious trying to tell so much plot, but
even at more than two hours some of the stories end up a bit sketchy
and rushed.  In particular, Ning's story is slighted with a rushed
telling.
     But like THE WEDDING BANQUET, this film will probably be popular
in the United States for different reasons than it will be popular in
Lee's native Taiwan.  Remove the Chinese culture from each and you
have a story that is watchable but already a little familiar in this
country.  Neither plot is probably as common in Taiwan.  But United
States audiences may find that the view of the dynamics of a Taiwanese
family is compensation.  This story is not so well written or
structured as last year's JOY LUCK CLUB.  But it still is an enjoyable
comedy-drama, perhaps a bit on the light side.  I rate the film a high
+1 on the -4 to +4 scale.  Plan to go out for Chinese food after you
see the film.

Title
Review for Mountains of the Moon (1990)
     The Nile River came like a miracle out of the desert, the last place
you would expect a great river, to bring life to the great Egyptian
civilization.  That civilization was a major world power--often *the* major
world power--for 3500 years, and it was totally dependent on the enigmatic
Nile, the only major river that flows south to north.  Even today the Nile
means life or death to countries in its path.  Not surprisingly, when
Europeans came to Africa they were fascinated by this strange river and in
particular, where the waters originated.  But it was time when tracing the
river to its origins meant an expedition on foot under nearly impossible
conditions.  And the only reward would be to go down in the history books as
being the one who answered the great question: "Where did the waters of the
Nile come from?"  When the question finally was answered, it was only at
very great cost and it was an answer that would remain shrouded in
controversy for almost two decades.  MOUNTAINS OF THE MOON is an intelligent
yet visually spectacular adventure film about the expedition to find the
source of the Nile.  It is about Sir Richard Francis Burton and John Hanning
Speke, two very different men who made that expedition, and the controversy
that came out of that expedition.
     The film covers much of the same territory that the excellent BBC
mini-series "The Search for the Nile" covered in 1971 (and wouldn't this be
a good time for someone to rebroadcast that series?).  It is the story of
how Burton and Speke came to go on such a perilous expedition, of the
experiences on the trek, and of the bitter controversy that arose from their
different conclusions about the sources of the Nile.
     Sir Richard Burton was perhaps the most colorful explorer and
anthropologist of all times and the film hardly does justice to the man's
history.  Burton had fluency in dozens of languages and was sufficiently
good at the art of disguise that he could make himself appear to be a native
through much of the world.  Disguised as an Afghani, he was the first
European to enter Mecca and Medina.  He had an unquenchable thirst to learn
about other cultures first-hand, especially their sexual practices--in which
he both observed and participated--and their erotic literature.  He was an
eloquent writer and translator, but because of his fixation on the sexual,
many of his writings and translations were considered unsuitable in British
society.  His was the definitive translation of the "Arabian Nights" and it
accurately has far more sex and violence than the expurgated versions
generally available. Burton was a giant man with giant vices.
     On the other hand, John Speke was a petty man with petty vices.  His
greatest passion was for hunting and he looked upon Africa in large part as
one big game park populated with animals he could shoot and populated with
savages best avoided.  Where Burton had a thirst for knowledge about other
cultures, Speke had an attitude of inflexible superiority that more than
once put his life in danger.
     William Harrison's 1983 novel BURTON AND SPEKE (recently re-issued as
MOUNTAINS OF THE MOON) shows much more the personality conflict between
these two men and only vaguely hints that they may have had a grudging
respect and even an affection for each other.  Curiously, this film written
by Harrison together with director Bob Rafelson--based on the novel and on
the logs the two men kept of the expedition--reverses that viewpoint.  It
says the two were actually close friends and the post-expedition conflict
about the interpretation of their findings was due more to English society
wishing to take the opinions of an Englishman, Speke, over those of Burton.
Burton was, after all, an Irishman, a free thinker, and a writer of what
English society considered pornography.  Harrison seems to have changed his
mind between writing the book and the screenplay--or had it changed by
Rafelson--about what were Burton's and Speke's attitudes toward each other.
The irony of the conflict, of course, is that while reading the book and
probably while seeing the film you want to believe Burton, it was Speke's
interpretation that this "Lake Victoria" was the actual source that was
vindicated.  Speke's measurements were eventually found to be essentially
accurate and his conclusions were correct.
     The film's two main characters are powerfully played by Patrick Bergin
as Burton and Iain Glen as Speke, both relatively new to American audiences.
The film also has a good cast of supporting characters.  In a film with two
such interesting main characters, it would be quite easy for Fiona Lewis to
go unnoticed as Burton's stay-at-home lover and later wife Isabel.  Not so,
however.  Shaw's Isabel is a major character fiercely loyal to an idealized
image of her husband, an image of which even the great Richard Burton fell
short.  Shaw's expression when seeing Burton seems to convey an emotion
combining joy and astonishment, the same expression she used as Christy
Brown's teacher in MY LEFT FOOT.  The original Isabel Burton was by all
accounts a remarkable woman totally willing to turn a blind eye to her
husband's philandering just to be married to Burton.  Eventually her
unquestioning loyalty shamed her husband into monogamy.  On the night he
died, she burned a priceless collection of his unpublished notes and forty-
one unpublished manuscripts in a misguided effort to preserve her dead
husband's reputation.
     Somewhat understated in the film as well as all European accounts of
the expeditions is the presence of Sidi Bombay, at this point an
inexperienced African hired by Burton and Speke as a guide and treated very
poorly by Speke, but who went on to become one of Africa's great explorers.
     The film's account of the great expedition, much abridged from the
novel and logs, remains harrowing and gives a feel for the courage it must
have required to venture into Africa on foot in 1857.  The most horrifying
sequence, for me all the more so since I had previously read the account in
both Harrison's novel and in Burton's account of the expedition, was the
incident that resulted in Speke losing his hearing in one ear.  Nearly as
disturbing is the account of why Burton had to be carried and of the
primitive first aid.  (I will withhold the details of these incidents for
the benefit of readers who do not yet know the story.)  All along the way,
there are contacts with the local tribes, each with its own culture, and
many of whom were not happy to see strangers.  The stories of the three
expeditions, naturally, had to be greatly abbreviated for the film--in fact,
we are only told that the third expedition took place--but what we do see is
sufficient for good storytelling.
     Harrison and Rafelson's screenplay, while based on the novel and the
expedition logs seem to have invented details not in either.  At one point
in a speech, Burton says that no white man can claim to have discovered a
body of water well-known to the local tribes.  Even for Burton with his
enlightened views, this would seem an anachronistic viewpoint.  In actual
point of fact it is not the discovery of the body of water that was
important so much as its association with the river that is the lifeblood of
Egypt, and Speke really was the first person to make the association that
the two really were the same body of water.  He also gathered reasonable
evidence for that point of view.  As much as we would like to credit both
the local tribesmen and Burton over the priggish Anglo-chauvinist Speke, it
really is Speke to whom the credit belongs.  As a side note, Burton's views
toward Africa were less enlightened than his attitudes toward Arab peoples.
As Robert Collins observes in his 1967 introduction to Burton's THE NILE
BASIN:
          Burton's insatiable appetite for travel soon brought him
     to Africa.  He observed Africa and the Africans at best with
     the assumptions of a Victorian Englishman, at worst with the
     attitudes of an Arab slave trader.  Not surprisingly, he
     judged African culture, which he made no attempt to
     understand, as hopelessly inferior to the Asian and European
     civilizations he knew so well.  African customs, manners, and
     morals repulsed him, perhaps because they did not fit his
     preconceived notions of civilization.  Moreover, he never
     sought to separate race and culture.  Thus African cultural
     inferiority became obvious proof of African racial
     inferiority.
          This "Afrophobia" led Burton, as well as other
     Englishmen, to place Africans at the bottom of the
     evolutionary scale of national and racial development.  True,
     Burton was sufficiently condescending to consider Africans
     human beings, but humans of the lowest kind.  He argued that
     only through emigration, or, perhaps, by the adoption of
     Islam, could they hope for salvation.  Burton's bigoted ideas
     of African inferiority colored all of his writings about
     Africa, and the more he saw and learned, or rather
     mislearned, the more vicious became his contempt for the
     continent.  One should not read Richard Burton without
     keeping in mind this deep-seated prejudice.
     It is perhaps a pity that MOUNTAINS OF THE MOON should be released
withing days of another adventure film, THE HUNT FOR RED OCTOBER.  Since I
had read both novels, it was MOUNTAINS OF THE MOON that I was more looking
forward to.  My reasons were at least two-fold.  First, however
realistically Tom Clancy writes and however well-researched his facts were,
THE HUNT FOR RED OCTOBER is fiction and the Burton-Speke expedition is
authentic history.  It really happened.  Harrison had some latitude with the
interpretation of events but most of what we are seeing is true.  The
second, and perhaps more important, reason was that Clancy's heroes sit in
large and relatively comfortable machines and play out their game.  True, if
they lose they die, but if they win the only price they have paid is that
they are exhausted.  Arguably most of the impressive feats are done by the
machinery.  But to set off on foot across mid-19th Century Africa with no
more defense than a few rifles requires a different character of courage.
Burton and Speke set out knowing that even if they found the source of the
Nile, by the time they returned Africa would have eaten a big piece of each
of them.  Speke could not predict that he would have to mutilate horribly
his own ear and leave himself deaf; Burton could not predict the diseases he
would be stricken with, but that or something just as bad was nearly
inevitable.  And Burton and Speke went anyway because a question had to be
answered.  To that degree they were greater heroes than Tom Clancy's
fictional imaginings.  And yet they were real people.  And to find not one
but two different books by Burton describing his expeditions in his own
words I needed to go no further than my public library.
     Because I had greater expectations for MOUNTAINS OF THE MOON than for
THE HUNT FOR RED OCTOBER, I knew it was much more likely that I would be
disappointed by Rafelson's film.  Surprisingly, MOUNTAINS OF THE MOON came
much closer to meeting my high expectations that THE HUNT FOR RED OCTOBER
came to meeting lower ones.  Rafelson, whose earlier films were very
different low-budget films (FIVE EASY PIECES and STAY HUNGRY), has made an
intelligent adventure film to be savored for years to come.  I rate it a +3
on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Limbo (1999)
     Limbo is "a place or state of restraint or confinement; an
intermediate or transitional place or state; a state of uncertainty."
The essence of limbo is being between this and that.  Limbo is waiting.
One knows what has passed, but not what is coming.  John Sayles has
constructed LIMBO like a fractal pattern of limbos within limbos.
Alaska is in limbo politically.  And within Alaska the town of Port
Henry is in limbo economically.  And within Port Henry most people are
within a state of limbo in their personal lives.  As the film opens a
major chapter has just ended in the life of Donna De Angelo (played by
Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio).  When the film closes a major chapter in
her life is about to start and there is complete uncertainty as to what
that chapter will hold for her.  The film covers that period of limbo.
It also covers a limbo in the life of Joe Gastineau (David Strathairn),
once a fisherman that he can no longer be and waiting for the next
chapter in his life.
     LIMBO begins with a 1950s travelogue showing what wonderful times
it is in Alaska.  The film has faded, but not as badly as the local
economy.  Hard times have hit in Port Henry, Alaska.  With demand
vanishing for canned salmon the local economy is slowly dying.
Factories are closing one after another.  A few wealthy people plan the
next big thing for Alaska with more enthusiasm than wisdom.  ("Think of
Alaska as one big theme park.")  Within Port Henry people are trapped
between the old and the new.  Their old jobs, mostly in the local
salmon canning plant, are coming to an end.  There may be a future for
Port Henry or there may be just oblivion.
     Donna has for years stayed without commitment with one man and
then another.  In her singing career she does the same.  Currently she
has a not very good job singing in the local saloon.  She has a
troubled daughter, Noelle (Vanessa Martinez), who has seen her father
only twice.  Unknown to her mother, Noelle has a friend and confidante,
Joe Gastineau, and in spite of his much greater age Noelle is starting
to think of him in romantic terms.  Joe used to be a fisherman, but for
his own reasons wants to stay away from the water--not an easy feat in
Alaska.  Donna is sour on all men and barely notices when she meets Joe
that he may in fact be something special.  Still, the two of them build
a relationship.
     For most of the film Sayles lets the story drift along without any
obvious direction.  We just spend time with the three main characters
getting to know them very well.  Noelle is very intelligent but
completely alienated from her mother and is rebelling purely by being
morbid.  The film delves into her relationship with her mother as Donna
and Joe become increasingly serious about each other.  Eventually all
three relationships will be tested by hard realities of survival in the
Alaskan wilderness.
     This is a film that has been wisely cast.  David Strathairn and
Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio are two very fine actors who rarely get the
public attention they deserve.  Certainly they are far more talented
than many actors with much more bankable marquee value are.
Mastrantonio even does her own singing in this film.  Strathairn has
the quiet, likeable stage presence of a Henry Fonda.  Kris
Kristofferson is along with a small role as the bush pilot Smilin'
Jack.
     Sayles's story is an enigma and a curiosity.  It very clearly is
an independent film, because it does some things and goes some places
that are more intelligent than profitable.  Not everyone will be
pleased by some of the decisions that Sayles makes, but on reflection,
it is just those decisions that are the point. I give LIMBO a 7 on the
0 to 10 scale and a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for 18 Again! (1988)
     A couple of weeks ago I reviewed VICE VERSA and I said that the plot of
personalities trading bodies had been done before often and usually not very
memorably.  In fact, FREAKY FRIDAY--an early Jodie Foster film made for
Disney--came to mind though I had seen only trailers for it.  But I am sure
I have seen the theme elsewhere; it is just the films were so forgettable.
Now two weeks later I have seen another treatment of the same story and this
one is really forgettable.  The film is 18 AGAIN and, take my word for it,
it is one time too many.
     David Watson (played by newcomer Charlie Schlatter) has more than his
share of problems.  He is pledging at a fraternity and is being picked on by
his frat brothers.  The girl he secretly loves goes with his chief
tormentor.  David is expected to join the dull business of phonemaking owned
by his grandfather Jack Watson (played by George Burns).  Jack has only one
problem: he wants to be 18 again like David.  Through a birthday wish gone
wrong, Jack finds himself in his grandson's body.  Schlatter spends most of
the rest of the film doing a George Burns impression.  Jack then brings his
own philosophy of self-confidence to straightening out his grandson's life
from inside the grandson's body.
     While VICE VERSA brought a fresh eye and a clever sense of humor to the
trade-of-personality plot, 18 AGAIN drags through every predictable cliche
at half the pace that Mr. Burns walks.  The script totally sidesteps the
plot of the boy in the old man's body and shows you only the old man in the
boy's body and, even so, it does considerably less with that plot than VICE
VERSA does with less screen time.  The story does virtually nothing new with
the idea.  There is, however, one good piece of advice in the film.  As
David's chief tormentor is getting ready for a race with our hero he tells
him, "Don't waste your time."  Let me pass that advice on to you.  Rate 18
AGAIN a -1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Ninth Gate, The (1999)
     Take a Sherlock Holmes story and set it in the Middle Ages at a
monastery and you have IN THE NAME OF THE ROSE.  Tell the story that
way, and the unfamiliar trimmings will have some interest and you can
give new life to what might otherwise be a tired plot.  Far too much of
THE NINTH GATE is hard-boiled detective story in the Sam Spade
tradition, but sprinkled with trimmings from the rare book trade.
Supposedly the novel on which THE NINTH GATE is based has almost no
supernatural element and Polanski emphasized the little that was there.
But take the supernatural out of this film and you have warmed over
Dashiell Hammett.  Late in this long film the greatly amplified
supernatural element becomes more important, but its contribution is of
too little interest too late.
     Johnny Depp plays antiquarian book dealer Dean Corso, a wheeler-
dealer with few scruples.  In marked contrast to the passion his
customers have for books, Corso treats books like stocks, buying and
selling them like pork belly futures.  Corso is hired by Boris Balkan
(Frank Langella doing a Fritz Weaver impression) a well-known collector
of books on witchcraft and demonology.  Balkan has recently purchased
or stolen a Necronomicon-like book, "The Nine Gates of the Kingdom of
the Shadows."  Whether the book was bought or stolen will not be
determined since the previous owner, Andrew Telfer, committed suicide
once the book was out of his hands.  There are thought to be only three
copies of this book: Balkan's, one in Portugal, and one in France.  But
Balkan knows that even that number is not correct.  There is only one
copy and the other two are frauds.  Balkan hires Corso to compare his
copy with the other two copies and determine which is the original.
     Before leaving for Europe Corso pays a visit to Liana Telfer (Lena
Olin), widow of Andrew.  She claims that the book belonged to her and
by rights it still does.  Corso heads for Europe.  He quickly discovers
that there are people trying to kill him and get Balkan's copy of the
book.  He also has acquired a sort of mysterious guardian who protects
him in time of danger.  She is an attractive blond (Emmanuelle Seigner)
with a mean kick-boxing style.  Corso has no idea who she is or why she
protects him.
     Roman Polanski has taken a rather complex and mystical novel,
increased the emphasis on the supernatural, and changed a number of
things around.  By dropping the entire Alexander Dumas subplot, for
which the book was named, he has freed up characters to be redefined
for his new plot.  Some of Polanski's seem just to be testing the
medium.  He has a completely gratuitous special effect in that two
twins on the screen together are played by a single actor.  The
conclusion of the film is markedly different from the book.  The
mysticism that suffuses the film seems completely artificial, a long
way from Polanski's best work.  Part of the problem is that he seems to
have lost his way in understanding where true horror lies.  Certainly
there are Polanski films that are horrifying.  But in ROSEMARY'S BABY
the ceremonial Satanism only worked because it was the late 1960s and
people were open to really weird ideas.  It was the situation of
Rosemary being entrapped where the film's punch can still be felt.  In
this film he builds to a horror that seems cliched and uninteresting,
like a spook in a sheet.  He breezes right past the films only scene of
true horror.  That was at the beginning of the film and involved a
stroke victim.
     Polanski filmed THE NINTH GATE entirely in Europe.  He had to
recreate New York City much as Kubrick had to in EYES WIDE SHUT, though
presumably he did it more economically.  For this and other reasons
this film seems at least superficially a companion film to Kubrick's
last film.  However, Kubrick brought his film to a conclusion while
Polanski ends his film just short of telling us what it all means.
Even when you find out what is happening you do not know what is
happening.  After 132 minutes it seems there should be more we know.
It is the difference between serving a feast or just tantalizing the
audience with one.  I rate THE NINTH GATE 5 on the 0 to 10 scale and a
low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Knoflíkári (1997)
     CAPSULE: A series of comedy sketches inter-related dealing with
absurd uses of science, strange sexual perversions, marital infidelity,
etc.  The result is occasionally funny, but much more often the pieces
just seem to fall flat.  It could be, however, that some of the humor
has been lost in the translation.  Rating: 3 (0 to 10), -1 (-4 to +4)
   - Made for Czech television.
   - Written and directed by Petr Zelenka.
   - Several inter-related skits: Japanese learn to swear in the final
     hours before the Hiroshima bomb is dropped while the bomber crew
     swears a blue streak, a cab driver has two consecutive set of
     passengers who want to use the cab for sex, two pairs of
     prospective in-laws meet each other and discover each other's
     perversions, a couple plays odd games near a railroad track, a
     laid-off railroad employee and his wife discuss a plan to send
     sperm into space, the pilot of the Enola Gay is resurrected by
     seance, etc.
   - Props from one skit show up in the next, then turn out to be
     connections between skits.
   - Historically inaccurate about the bombing of Hiroshima.
   - There are sufficient links between the segments to put them in
     some chronological order, much like PULP FICTION.
   - Very negative on United States and the decision to use the bomb
     without examining the historic alternatives.
   - The film has a sort of cult following in Czech Republic, much like
     Monty Python over here.  It is unlikely to be seen in the US.
   - Some of the concepts are very strange including a party of two
     bourgeois couples who each have their own weird perversion.
   - The structure is more interesting than the content.

Title
Review for Die Hard 2 (1990)
     This year there is no James Bond film, in fact, but there is a
reasonable substitute.  There is no film about British superspy James Bond
being sent out to save England, but there is a film about L.A. supercop John
McClane sending himself out to pick up his wife from Dulles Airport in
Washington D.C.  McClane is played by Bruce Willis who is my idea of no
actor, but in films such as this can be a reasonable substitute.  Of course,
dealing with an airport during Christmas rush is never easy.  McClane has to
deal with airport police who ticket him for parking in a no-parking zone and
with a bunch of Army-bred mercenaries who are trying to free Manuel Noriega
(thinly disguised under the character name Esperanza).  DIE HARD 2 is the
story of how McClane gets the airport police to tear up the parking ticket
and how he picks up his wife on a night when Dulles is not at its dullest.
I will not say exactly how McClane gets the ticket torn up but it involves
killing a bunch of "bad guys" and saving a lot of "good guys" (to use his
sophisticated jargon).  It also involves him being just about the only guy
with intelligence and pluck in an airport full of and run by jerks.
     DIE HARD 2 *is* a big beefy action film much in the style of a James Bond
film.  It follows the time-honored traditions of Bond films, like all the
luck working for the hero.  McClane makes no false moves while trained
commandos make mistakes such as running out of ammunition without realizing
it.  Eight bad guys can be having a showdown with McClane but they will very
obligingly attack one at a time so McClane can pick them off like Horatio at
the Bridge.  Later, when there is one piece of equipment that McClane really
needs it just sort of falls into his hands, no muss, no fuss.  That is not
to say there is not a whole lot of mussing and fussing in the film.  But
McClane is the sort of hero who can go through a trash compactor, wince and
maybe bleed a little to remind the audience that it is painful to be
compacted, and five minutes later he is back to normal.  His bones must be
made of the stuff they built Patton tanks from (or perhaps should build them
from).
     There are a number of reasons the plot could not really proceed as it
does.  McClane gets an identification on a character based on fingerprints
that he faxes from a car rental stand.  Even assuming he could coerce the
car rental agency to do his faxing, it is very unlikely the print at the
other end would have anything but black blotches.  But I guess part of the
fun of seeing a film like this is picking holes in the screenplay, which in
this case was written by Doug Richardson and Steven de Souza.  The latter
wrote 48 HOURS and here is adapting 58 MINUTES, the novel by Walter Wager on
which DIE HARD 2 is based.
     Visual effects are impressive and provided by Industrial Light and
Magic.  One very nice shot involves McClane sort of flying away from an
explosion but toward the camera.  The musical score is by Michael Kamen.
Rare is the film review that has a spoiler warning for a comment about the
musical score, but this one does.  Jump to the next paragraph if you wish to
avoid it.  Through the film Kamen often uses a theme for the villains that
sounds just like the first eight notes of Sibelius's "Finlandia."  Well, I
had always thought they did sound ominous, but was it coincidence or was
Kamen really quoting?  Sibelius's tribute to Finland has, after all, little
to do with the story at hand.  Then in the final suspense scene the
orchestra finally breaks out into a big chunk of "Finlandia."  The end
credits then are a full orchestral performance of "Finlandia."  It sounds
mighty good in Dolby Surroundsound.  That's worth fifty cents of the
admission price all by itself.
     This is an enjoyable action film: nothing requiring great thought, but
certainly enjoyable.  I would give it a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Homicide (1991)
     Bobby Gold (beautifully played by Joe Mantegna) is a respected cop on
the homicide squad who has reacted to police department anti-Semitism by
struggling to assimilate and to ignore his Jewish roots.  Early on we see
him be the butt of a totally unreasonable tirade from a bigoted black
superior who gets his jollies calling Gold a "kike."  Gold is already
involved in a case trying to find a black cop-killer before the FBI can find
and kill him.  He is getting enthusiastic about this project and its
prospects for him to redeem himself in the department's eyes.  Then, by
accident, he becomes involved in another case and is told he must take
charge of this case also.  An elderly Jewish woman who ran a candy store in
a black neighborhood has been murdered.  The last thing he wants is an
assignment that will tie himself in with the Jews, and it does not help that
the woman's family seems to think that there is a deeper conspiracy
involved.  But then evidence starts appearing that may point to an anti-
Semitic conspiracy.  That and an unmasking of Gold's own self-hatred as a
Jew start pushing him to value this case more and to neglect the other.
     HOMICIDE is just a sort of typical David Mamet.  That is, there is a
fair amount to say about it, but most of it falls under the classification
of spoiler.  Any review that does not ruin some of the surprises of this
marvelous puzzle of a film will be so general as to be nearly pointless.
David Mamet, like the Coen Brothers, specializes in crime films with a sort
of unexpected spin.  I first became aware of Mamet through a radio play
called "The Water Engine" which had a marvelous 1939 period feel and dealt
with one of the great American myths, the engine that runs on water for fuel
and that the insidious auto companies have hushed up.  Mamet wrote DePalma's
UNTOUCHABLES, but also has directed his own screenplays HOUSE OF GAMES and
THINGS CHANGE.  Both were good; HOMICIDE is better.  HOMICIDE lacks BARTON
FINK's visual style and craftsmanship, but its story is better and a case
could be made that the two are thematically linked.  They are the two of the
best films I have seen this year and they would be very interesting seen as
a pair.
     Mamet's excellent screenplay is a grabber from the very first scene.
The film is already tense and suspenseful before the first word of dialogue
is spoken.  Most enigmatic is Joe Mantegna's Bobby.  Does he suddenly feel a
solidarity with the Jewish community or is he reacting from guilt and to
prove something.  How real was his anti-Semitism earlier; how real was his
reversal?  Was he doing what he believed or was he first professing not to
like Jews in order to win approval from his buddies, then reversing to prove
something to the Jews he met through the case.  There is a lot to this film.
I give it a low +3 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     Mamet's story is an amazing orchestration of smoke and mirrors.  Like
THE DAY OF THE JACKAL, we follow the reasoning each step of the way to its
logical conclusions.  But in THE DAY OF THE JACKAL at least we feel we know
our logic was wrong earlier.  At the end of this film we do not even have
the security of knowing anything.  We have no idea to what degree Bobby was
right, to what degree he has misled himself, and to what degree he has been
intentionally manipulated.
     In a bad James Bond film, such as MOONRAKER, the clues are all laid out
for Bond.  He gets into a fight in a factory, knocks into a crate, finds an
address on it, and goes to that address only to get into another fight and
find another clue.  Bond never goes off in the wrong direction.  In HOMICIDE
the clues seem a little too easy to find.  It is almost as if they were left
lying around intentionally.  Bobby never stops to reason, for example, that
organizations like 212 do not put their addresses on stationary.  On the
other hand, it is a tenuous chain of events that brought Bobby to that clue.
If Bobby were intentionally being brought to 212, there were a lot of people
in on the plot.  How could they have been sure Bobby would could to that
yeshiva and overhear the mention of 212.  If the finding of 212 was just
chance, how did the organization know so fast what it wanted from Bobby?
     It seems almost impossible that there was not a Jewish conspiracy.  But
if there was a Jewish conspiracy to get back the names, the question is why?
The law is not going to go after people who ran guns to the Israelis forty-
five years ago.  There might be a revenge plot going on against the
gunrunners that would explain the murder.  And we did catch a glimpse of
someone on the roof.  But that implies there are two opposed conspiracies.
That seems a little far-fetched, particularly since the police think they
know who committed the primary murder.
     Then maybe there was no conspiracy at all.  Except that 212 did seem to
know they wanted Bobby's list.  The plot is constructed like a bedsheet that
you can tuck in only three corners on.  If you try to tuck in the fourth
corner, one of the other corners pops out.  There is no consistent
explanation of what we saw.  And in the middle of this confusion is Bobby,
who would be betrayed by his own people, much like Randolph was.

Title
Review for V.I. Warshawski (1991)
     Imagine, if you will, a hard-boiled detective.  You know the kind:
wise-cracking, knows all the angles, good in a fight, heavy drinking, and
hard as nails.  Our private eye may be a slob, but in a tight spot nobody
thinks faster.  Nothing exciting, right?  So far I could be describing
hundreds of different characters from Sam Spade to Mike Hammer to Mannix to
Peter Gunn.  But ... but suppose this private eye is different.  Suppose on
top of everything else our shamus is a sexy woman.  Boy, what an original
idea for a character, huh?  Aren't you utterly intrigued?  If you answered
this question "yes," fine.  You're welcome to V. I. WARSHAWSKI, a pedestrian
made-for-television-grade mystery that was instead made for a theatrical
release.  It would not at all surprise me to see this turned into an equally
pedestrian television series that will last one season and die.
     The film opens with a helicopter view of a bit city (Chicago) under the
credits and that is just about how original the plot gets.  V. I. Warshawski
(played by Kathleen Turner) is on the outs with her reporter boyfriend when
she meets and is attracted to a famous hockey star.  Next thing she knows,
the hockey player has left his daughter on V. I.'s doorstep while he goes
out for an evening on family business.  By the end of the evening he is
dead, and Warshawski has a pesky young teenager on her hands as well as a
murder to solve.
     The V. I. Warshawski novels of Sara Paretsky form the basis of this
story by Edward Taylor and adapted to the screen by Taylor, David Aaron
Cohen, and Nick Thiel.  The screenplay is occasionally witty, milking the
novelty of a sexy woman with very masculine traits for all the humor it can
get from it.  Even more comes from Warshawski's low opinion of the opposite
sex.  And when they are tired of that they play with the novelty of her
name.  Nobody, they suggest, can pronounce a three-syllable name.  Then they
play the T. S. Garp initial game ("What does the V. I. stand for?"  "Very
Inquisitive").  The story and the action are strictly television level.  Had
there been a series of films about this character, this might have made an
acceptable fifth film in the series.  But if this is the first film there is
not likely to be a second one.  I rate V. I. WARSHAWSKI a 0 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Muriel's Wedding (1994)
     Reminiscent of British comedy/dramas of the 60s, particularly
GEORGY GIRL, the Australian MURIEL'S WEDDING tells the story of a
misfit finding self-esteem.  And while the film takes a lot of
unexpected turns along the way, its ultimate destination is obvious
from the beginning.
     Muriel (Toni Collette) is an over-weight and ungainly young woman
with absolutely no fashion sense.  Her home is the Australian town of
Porpoise Spit--I kid you not.  The clique of snooty school chums whom
Muriel considers her friends ostracize her for just being too frumpy to
be in their exalted presence.  Muriel gets little emotional support at
home from one of the ugliest families we have seen in film in a long
while, headed by an overly critical and unsupportive father (Bill
Hunter).  Our sympathies at first are with Muriel, but soon we find her
repeatedly stealing, first to have a dress to wear to a wedding and
then in order to be able to take a vacation with the women she
considers her friends--without their consent, incidentally.  On the
vacation Muriel discovers the vivacious and instantly likable Rhonda
(Rachel Griffiths), actually an old school friend, who strikes up an
unexpected close friendship with Muriel.  Much like the relationship in
HEAVENLY CREATURES, the very differences in their personality types
binds the two young women together.  But though the two form a solid
platonic relationship, events would soon take place that would place
heavy demands on that friendship.
     MURIEL'S WEDDING was written and directed by P. J. Hogan, her--
admittedly I am assuming it is a her--first such effort.  And it shows
in the freshness and the feel for unexpected situations in Hogan's
writing.  If this film were made in America, Muriel would likely be
written as an entirely sympathetic character.  Ironically, sympathetic
characters in American films live either apparently entirely moral
lives or are rebels and live entirely outside the law.  Of course in
life there are a lot of people who are in the gray area being mostly
honest and decent, but who would steal a little here or there and maybe
cheat on their taxes just a bit if they thought they could get away
with it.  That is the sort of person Muriel is.  People in her world
blame each other for their own shortcomings.
     Muriel's love of slightly tacky ABBA songs, matching her
questionable taste in clothing, is reflected Peter Best's score which
relies heavily on ABBA songs and a score that relies heavily on
dramatic variations on ABBA melodies.  As the Australians do so well,
this is not so much a good film but a clever reworking of a cliched
plot.  It takes several unexpected turns, but ends up where everyone
knew it was going all along.  I give it a high +1 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Rain Man (1988)
          Capsule review:  Barry Levinson's occasionally humorous
     drama of a razzle-dazzle car salesman and an autistic savant.
     This is perhaps Hoffman's most demanding role since his
     performance as Ratso Rizzo in MIDNIGHT COWBOY.  RAIN MAN is
     one of the few films really worth seeing this holiday season.
     Rating: +2.
     These days we see a lot of films about outsiders and how they see and
fit into our society.  SPLASH! showed us the theme with a mermaid; STARMAN,
E.T., BROTHER FROM ANOTHER PLANET, and any number of others have used
aliens; MOSCOW ON THE HUDSON and even RED HEAT did it with Soviets.  Of
course you do not have to go to another planet or the Soviet Union to find
outsiders.  We have institutions full of people whose view of the world is
radically different from yours or mine. But where is the pleasure of seeing
a film about people with so-called mental disorders?  That is the stuff of
television movies perhaps, but they rarely make it into theatrical films as
anything but killers.  But if anyone is going to make an original theatrical
film about mental disability, few filmmakers can do it as well as Levinson.
     Barry Levinson is one of these days' all-too-few filmmakers who is
willing to take a chance on the type of film they make and then make it work
for them.  Besides making THE NATURAL--perhaps the best sports film ever--he
made an enjoyable film about salesmen of aluminum siding, and, of course,
his two best-known films, DINER and GOOD MORNING, VIETNAM.  With the
possible exception of GOOD MORNING, VIETNAM, his films are fresh and
different from anything else being made.
     In Levinson's latest film, RAIN MAN, Tom Cruise plays Charlie Babbitt.
Babbitt is the kind of car dealer that the man who sold you your last car
would really like to be, the kind of salesman you hope never to run into,
and the kind of salesman which on your salary you probably never WILL run
into.  Charlie is a wheeler-dealer who may have his hand in many pots but
when we see him he is dealing in ultra-expensive cars, razzle-dazzling them
past the EPA, and making enormous profits.  He uses people like toys and
loves only money.  At the death of his father his only emotion is greed.  He
is all ready to happily inherit millions, but instead gets a shock.  At the
reading of the will he finds out that his father has chosen to leave the
bulk of the estate to someone else.  (Why?  Well, I may be the only reviewer
in the world who doesn't give away that plot twist.)  The actual beneficiary
is Raymond, an autistic savant.  What is an "autistic savant?"  It is a
person who generally lives in a world of his own, but in just a few skills
he is good enough to boggle the mind.
     Now Raymond (played by Dustin Hoffman) has a rather remarkable mind.
Like most autistic minds, his usually is off in a twilight zone of unrelated
thoughts.  He talks a sort of verbal fruit cocktail.  Yet at the same time
he is capable of incredible mental gymnastics.  Given two three-digit
numbers he can visualize their product and simply read it off.  Overturn a
box of toothpicks and he can almost instantly count them just by looking.
Given a date, he knows its day of the week.  (Actually, I can do this one
myself, but it takes me twenty seconds or so; Raymond knows instantly.)
Charlie formulates a scheme to steal the inheritance, but as it progresses
Charlie finds he must spend more time with Raymond than he ever expected..
Initially Charlie has no sense of wonder about Raymond's mind, Charlie is
just one more person to use.  But eventually Raymond's lightning flashes of
numerical brilliance and his innocence begin to win over even Charlie.
     As with MIDNIGHT COWBOY, Dustin Hoffman does not play the main
character--at least the character was not written that way.  But let us
face it, the day that Hoffman cannot out-act Cruise, he might as well hang
it up.  This is Hoffman's movie as much as or more so than MIDNIGHT COWBOY
was.  Tom Cruise does an adequate acting job and no more is really
necessary.  Even if Cruise were a much better actor than he is, when Hoffman
is on the screen all eyes would still be on Hoffman.  If Hoffman fails at
all in this film, it is in not  really giving us enough insight into
Raymond's mind.  We see enough of Raymond's world-view to whet our appetite
to see more, but we never get sufficient insight into who his mind works.
Perhaps nobody but an autistic savant knows how an autistic savant thinks.
But in a very disappointing holiday season's crop of films RAIN MAN stands
out like Raymond himself does.  Rate it a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Beetlejuice (1988)
     Excuse me if this review is not very well constructed.  I have to write
it very, very quickly.  I just saw BEETLEJUICE, an extremely forgettable
fantasy film.  So much so that even as I walked out of the theater, large
pieces of the film were being forgotten forever.  Why is BEETLEJUICE so
forgettable?  I guess because the producers had so much budget and so little
story.  It is not that it was a bad story.  It was co-authored by Michael
McDowell, one of the leading modern horror writers, but it was about four
pages worth of story and the rest was just lathered-on special effects.
Remembering the film entails remembering the list of special effects, mostly
totally gratuitous, that were laid on at at various points in the minimal
story.
     The story of BEETLEJUICE involves...(oh, rats.  What was it about?  oh,
yes!) a young couple who live in a rustic little town and love their old
house.  They are in a car accident and are killed.  Now is this where they
see the ghost with the shrunken head and the smoker who was charred to a
cinder?  No, I think that's later in the plot.  Oh, well, it doesn't really
matter.  Anyway, they go back to their house and can get in but can't get
out again.  Yeah, I'm pretty sure this is where they had the alien landscape
special effect and the giant sandworm.  That's what they face if they leave
the house.  Wait, that doesn't make sense--they were just outside the house.
Well, I guess making sense doesn't matter.  And then, yes, that's it, some
not very nice people buy the house and start to remodel it.  The ghosts
don't like that, so try to scare the new owners.  Now is this where they rip
their faces off altogether or is this where they just stretch their faces
into funny shapes?  Doesn't matter, I guess.  So where does Beetlejuice fit
into this?  Well, first off there is nobody named "Beetlejuice."  There is
someone named Betelgeuse, like the star, and that's pronounced "Beetle
juice," but then why isn't the film called BETELGEUSE?  Darned if I know!
Anyway, Betelgeuse fits in later in the plot.  But don't worry about the
plot.  The filmmakers didn't.
     The star of the film is Geena Davis who is attractive enough to
occasionally upstage the special effects.  She may be familiar from
television work or from her role in the remake of THE FLY.  Alec Baldwin is
forgettable as her husband.  Jeffrey Jones as the new owner is used to being
upstaged by special effects as in HOWARD THE DUCK.  And Michael Keaton was
on hand as (uh, give me a second), oh yes, in the title role.  No, wait,
there was nobody in the title role.  Well, anyway, give this tournee of
mediocre special effects a -1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Return to Paradise (1998)
     This is an adult film in the literal meaning.  It is a film that
does not sugar coat its view of reality.  Things do not happen in this
film because of wishful thinking the way they might in a Frank Capra
film.  RETURN TO PARADISE is a film without a safety net.  It asks the
right questions and does not provide the viewer with pre-digested
answers.  In A FEW GOOD MEN there are some interesting issues raised,
but there are giant neon signs telling the viewer which side to
sympathize with on the issues.  Independently of the Jack Nicholson
character's ideas, the script makes him an insulting male chauvinist.
The film entirely sidesteps the issue of whether Nicholson might be
correct about defense, he clearly is a villain.  RETURN TO PARADISE
also raises issues.  But it is not a morality tale.  It does not tell
the viewer what the answers are. There are no neon signs.
     Tony (David Conrad), Sheriff (Vince Vaughn), and Lewis (Joaquin
Phoenix) are having a good time together in Malaysia.  They are
drinking beer, seeing the countryside, getting into trouble, and
smoking cheap hashish.  They throw out the hashish they have not used
when Sheriff and Tony have to go home.
     Flash forward two years.  Sheriff is a limousine driver, and Tony
is an architect.  Lewis has spent the last two years in a Penang
prison.  Now the Malaysian government is going to hang Lewis as a drug
dealer unless he can prove he was only a user.  To do that he has to
produce the people who shared the drugs with him.  Informally the
Malaysian government says that they will give a total of six years
prison time to the one or two people who show up and will commute
Lewis's term.  Lawyer Beth (Anne Heche) is in New York and has the job
of convincing Sheriff and Tony to go and take their prison sentences so
Lewis will not be executed.  But how does one weigh the greater evil
when the prison is so bad that six years may be tantamount to a death
sentence or perhaps be enough to permanently unhinge the prisoner.
     Vince Vaughn and Joaquin Phoenix are perhaps better known as the
leads of CLAY PIGEONS.  Here they have a very different moral
relationship but their fates are similarly connected.  Anne Heche of
SIX DAYS, SEVEN NIGHTS is the lawyer stuck with the task of getting two
men to give up years of their lives to save the life of someone they
hardly know.  The script is based on the film FORCE MAJEURE by Pierre
Jolivet. The original English language script was written by Bruce
Robinson  who wrote what I considered the best film I saw in the 1980s,
THE KILLING FIELDS.  And here he is connected with the best film I have
seen thus far in the 1990s.  Wesley Strict rewrote the script.
     RETURN TO PARADISE is a rare film experience.  It is an
intelligent and adult look at people making hard choices in the real
world.  I give it a 9 on the 0 to 10 scale and a high +3 on the -4 to
+4 scale.
     Heavy spoiler.... Heavy spoiler....Heavy spoiler...
     If this film were only about the heavy price Sheriff and Tony were
being asked to pay to save Lewis's life, this would be a very good
film.  But it goes much beyond that.  Unfortunately one only realizes
the other issues of this film toward the end and I cannot discuss them
in the main body of may review.
     If one were to ask if freedom of the press is a good thing or a
bad thing, I think most of us would vote in favor.  We give the press a
broad range of freedoms in this country in the hopes that it will help
to topple dictators, or better yet never letting them get started.  We
do not want to let the government limit our freedom of expression, our
First Amendment rights.  If I were asked what is the downside of giving
this much power to the press the first example that comes to mind is
that we are giving the press the right to publish how to make dangerous
devices.  There have been issues in the past of magazines wanting to
publish instructions for building your own atomic bombs.  It is also
very timely that this film comes out just as a media barrage is
toppling a President.  There are certainly good arguments that the
press has overstepped its bounds.
     Our First Amendment really hamstrings us in controlling dangerous
information.  There are laws that may let us use restraining orders,
but deep down the First Amendment has given all the big guns to people
who want to make information available, for better or for worse.  In
the case in RETURN TO PARADISE it was a lost cause from the beginning.
The international press was going tell the world about Lewis's case.
That would anger the Malaysian government and they would punish Lewis.
Any nobility on the part of Sheriff and Tony would be misplaced.  (And
that really is something we rarely see in film.  The ethical thing to
do is rarely shown as being useless and pointless.)  As soon as the
press got hold of the story, it was out of the main characters' hands.
Lewis was going to die, not because of his crime, but because the
founding fathers felt the press had to be unrestrained.
     Another issue is raised in the film, that that we are much more
tolerant of drug use in this country than the rest of the world.  The
Malaysian judge has a very good point.  In his country children are
free from the risk of drugs.  Malaysia has a much lower risk of crime.
Our lax attitude on drug enforcement also has a heavy price.  We walk a
middle ground between either legalizing drugs or treating drug use as
harshly as the Malaysians do.  We are afraid to do the former and do
not have the stomach to do the latter.  And that middle ground of
shadow tolerance is also what kills Lewis in this film.

Title
Review for Sense and Sensibility (1995)
     Well, it is almost certain now.  E. M. Forster, monarch of art
house class film productions has been deposed.  With so many of his
major novels already adapted, it was only a matter of time before a new
monarch had to be chosen.  The new queen is Jane Austin.  Emma
Thompson, one of the two most popular art house actresses (the other
being Helena Bonham-Carter) not only stars in this adaptation of
Austen's SENSE AND SENSIBILITY but in this case she even tries her hand
at writing it.  Well, perhaps suggesting that a crown has been passed
is overstating the matter, but in less than a year we have seen
CLUELESS (inspired by EMMA) and PERSUASION, and we will shortly have a
serious adaptation of EMMA and a BBC version of PRIDE AND PREJUDICE.
The current SENSE AND SENSIBILITY certainly has the marks of being a
prestige film.  It is directed by Ang Lee of THE WEDDING BANQUET and
EAT DRINK MAN WOMAN and it has a lush and luscious score by Patrick
Doyle who has done so many of Kenneth Branagh's films, often featuring
Branagh's wife Emma Thompson.
     In Jane Austen's time "sensibility" was almost the opposite of
today's meaning of "sense."  The word meant following emotions rather
than logic.  Austen's novel is of two sisters who have very parallel
sorts of stories, but one of whom approaches life with sense and the
other with sensibility.  In the story Mrs. Dashwood (Gemma Jones) and
her three daughters find themselves reduced from having a comfortable
existence to being homeless when Mrs. Dashwood's ex-husband dies.  The
widow discovers her home has been left to her step-son, John Dashwood
and his wife, the aptly-named Fanny.  John was left with the
responsibility to take care of the women, but Fanny talks him out of
the expensive duty.  The family of four women eventually are invited by
a cousin to move into a Devonshire cottage much smaller than their
previous living arrangements and the daughters' prospects for finding
good husbands are much diminished.  Marianne, the middle daughter
(played by Kate Winslet of HEAVENLY CREATURES), a women of great
sensibility (in the Austen meaning) but little sense, is attracted to
the handsome John Willoughby (Greg Wise), who seems to love her.  The
eldest daughter Elinor (Emma Thompson), a woman of strong sense but
little emotional sensibility, is attracted to Fanny Dashwood's brother,
the pleasant but oh-so-diffident Edward Ferres (Hugh Grant).  But their
plans will go awry when each man is called away unexpectedly to London.
     I cannot claim to be much of a fan of Jane Austen and her stories
of what seem often to me to be overwrought accounts of love and
manners.  But Ang Lee tells this story so well and with such warmth and
wit that he overcomes the weaknesses in the plot.  He manages to make
Austen's characters far more interesting than what they do.  And it is
the minor characters who have the most interest.  Yes, there is some
depth to Elinor Dashwood as the logical spinster in the role Thompson
wrote for herself; Thompson is always very good with body language.
Also Winslet is good but not really memorable as the flighty, romantic
sister.  But the minor characters are the most engaging.  Gemma Jones
has a great air of sad dignity as Mrs. Dashwood.  Elizabeth Spriggs, a
freight train of a woman, is a popular busy-body.  Much too rarely seen
outside of British TV comedy is the rubber-faced Hugh Laurie who could
read the phone book and make it funny.  Here he has a small role, but a
funny one.  Alan Rickman is usually good actor and here as the patient,
disappointed suitor he matches the sad dignity of Gemma Jones.  Hugh
Grant plays almost the same likable foul-up that he played in FOUR
WEDDINGS AND A FUNERAL.  The look of the film and especially the
costumes give a real period feel, though at least the print I saw
seemed to be faded and the film stock inconsistent from scene to scene.
     After I did not greatly enjoy PERSUASION earlier this year I was
not expecting to like SENSE AND SENSIBILITY.  In fact it was the first
film of Jane Austen that I can remember having enjoyed.  Rate it a +2
on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Pay It Forward (2000)
     A reporter's car is destroyed while he is getting a story on a
hostage crisis.  As he sadly looks at the wreckage a passing
stranger throws him some car keys, making him the gift of a new
Jaguar.  But the benefactor has one condition.  The reporter must do
large favors for each of three deserving people of his own choice.
And each of them must do three favors.  Intrigued, the reporter sets
out to find the origins of this benevolent pyramid scheme.
     Flash back four months.  In a Las Vegas junior high school, a
new teacher, Mr. Simonet (played by Kevin Spacey) gives his seventh
grade social studies class two tough assignments.  The first is just
to keep up with all the new vocabulary words he uses in his
conversation.  Not easy, but the second assignment is a lot harder.
"Think of an idea that could change the world."  Not an assignment
frequently given to a junior high student.  (At least not until high
school teachers see PAY IT FORWARD.)  Trevor McKinney (Haley Joel
Osment) comes up with a plan more powerful than he realizes.  He
will do favors for three people, each of whom will pass the favor on
threefold in an ever growing pyramid.  Rather than paying back the
favor they pay it forward.  This part of Las Vegas certainly is a
community that could use some altruism.  Trevor's mother Arlene
(Helen Hunt) is a recovering alcoholic who is a waitress in a casino
by day and one in a strip joint by night.  Arlene is infuriated when
Trevor gives a homeless man the run of her house, and she goes to
complain to Mr. Simonet.
     There are several ways this story could have gone wrong.  The
people could have been instantly transformed by the power of good.
Or everybody in the chain might have their lives dramatically
changed by the scheme.  Or the people might not be properly
developed or only developed as one might expect for a film aimed at
teens.  In fact these are people who have had some hellish
experiences and whose lives are not working out.  The script could
have pulled its punches in many different ways.  The way that story
does go wrong was in a much less offensive manner, thought wrong it
does go at the very end.  The filmmakers turn the heretofore
realistic plotline into a slightly syrupy allegory toward the end.
To that point they go out of their way to take a story that was not
pat, and then they give it a pat ending.  But then director Mimi
Leder has had previous problems with the final reel of otherwise
good movies.  That was her problem with the film DEEP IMPACT.  This
screenplay was written by Leslie Dixon who wrote OVERBOARD and MRS.
DOUBTFIRE. The writing is frequently moving and at times takes
chances.  I could probably have done without the love story.  But
for the ending and perhaps some gratuitous violence at the beginning
the writing is good.
     The plotting has been compared with what one might have gotten
in a Frank Capra film and it is an apt analogy, though this
screenplay has some harrowing realism, perhaps along the lines of
LEAVING LAS VEGAS.  Speaking of Las Vegas, when this film about a
pyramid scheme shows the skyline of that city, it features the Luxor
pyramid.  Was it an intentional comment?  Other writers have tried
to do films in the Capra style.  Notable particularly is THE
HUDSUCKER PROXY by the Coen Brothers.  This is a more successful
attempt.
     Helen Hunt seems to be showing up everywhere on the screen
these days.  She is in both PAY IT FORWARD and DR. T AND THE WOMEN,
both currently playing in theaters.  If that were not enough
theaters are showing a trailer for WHAT WOMEN WANT starring Helen
Hunt.  Haley Joel Osment, formerly of THE SIXTH SENSE, seems to have
been born with a face that just seems earnest and intense.  But
whatever part luck played, he is already a skillful actor who holds
his own against adults, not with Shirley Temple cuteness, but with
genuine acting intelligence.  Kevin Spacey also exhibits acting
intelligence, but then he is all grown up so it not quite the same
feat.  All three play scarred people, though Spacey's character's
scars are the most obvious.
     This is a good film worth seeing as I think the other half
dozen or so people who saw it in the theater with me would agree.
It is a pity it is not getting larger audiences.  Perhaps people are
underestimating the maturity of the storytelling.  I rate it a 7 on
the 0 to 10 scale and a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     A comment for people who have seen the film:  The chronology
does not quite work in this film.  The birthday party is maybe one
day before the end of the film, but the invitation to the birthday
party happened before the whole parallel sequence.  Simply too much
had to have happened in that interval of time.

Title
Review for Belizaire the Cajun (1986)
          Capsule review:  Mark Twain-esque tale of murder and
     bigotry set in 1859 in Louisiana.  Armand Assante plays a
     clever Cajun healer trying to protect his cousin and the
     whole Cajun community from local rednecks.  This is an
     engrossing and enjoyable film that tells its story without
     any wrong moves.  Recommended.
     Every once in a while, one of the cable stations runs what they call a
"find."  That is, they run a little-known film that got almost no theatrical
play but is a good film anyway.  Actually, "little-known" may not be quite
accurate, since almost always the cable "finds" have been previously
reviewed--usually favorably--on one or the other of TV's review programs.
Well, I guess in the same sense I can claim BELIZAIRE THE CAJUN as a find of
sorts.  It seems to me that I had heard it recommended but it sounded kind
of artsy and dull.  The last thing I was expecting was a fun film.  It takes
about five minutes to get into the southern and Cajun accents and the
occasional lapsing into French.  (What can I say?  I'm slow!)  After that I
was enjoying the film too much to let any of that get in my way.
     In southwestern Louisiana in 1859 the men of the upper class are
joining together in a vigilante "committee"--the forerunner of the Ku Klux
Klan--to frighten the local Cajun population into leaving the territory.
Not yet threatened and for now perhaps the best-liked of the Cajuns is
Belizaire, a healer, a fast thinker, and a real character.  But Belizaire's
cousin has been given a writ of exile by the vigilantes and Belizaire is
quickly being pulled into the fray.
     In a story worthy of Mark Twain--in fact, reminiscent in some ways of
PUDDIN' HEAD WILSON--we have a story about an ethnic group rarely seen in
films, yet a story that will be meaningful to every minority and should be
enjoyable by just about anyone.
     Admittedly I do not know much about Cajun culture, but a viewer can
generally tell when a film seems authentic and this one seems to have been
very well researched.  Perhaps that is partially due to having Robert Duvall
as creative consultant.  Duvall (who, incidentally, appears in a cameo) has
an extremely good ear for accents and is reputed to be a real stickler for
accuracy.  With a feel of accuracy and a good piece of story-telling,
BELIZAIRE THE CAJUN is a "find" worth looking for at your local video store.
Rate it +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Noi vivi (1942)
     In 1942 Italy was at war with the Allies in more ways than one.
Without permission or legal rights they thumbed their noses held by the
enemy.  They started writing their own FLASH GORDON comic strips, hiring for
the task two young unknown Italian cartoonists, one of whom was Federico
Fellini, who later was to have some association with the film industry.
Also without permission, and certainly in direct opposition to her
philosophy, the state appropriated film rights to Ayn Rand's semi-
autobiographical first novel, WE THE LIVING.  Goffredo Alessandrini adapted
the anti-Communist novel into a film.  NOI VIVI (WE THE LIVING) played for
about five months before a reportedly furious Mussolini decided the film was
an argument against any totalitarian government and had the film banned.  In
1968, after much effort, lawyers for Ayn Rand found a copy of the film in a
vault outside Rome.  Ms.~Rand, not happy with the original film, re-edited
it and redubbed parts.  WE THE LIVING is now having its first United States
release.
     It would be nice to report, as is usually the case when an old "lost
film" is discovered, that it is a wonderful classic that we are all
culturally poorer for for having been deprived of all these years.  It may
have been true of Gance's NAPOLEON; it is patently not true of WE THE
LIVING.  The re-released film is only a moderately enjoyable melodrama made
with some of the faulty conventions but also some of the cinematic artistry
of the period.  That means it's no CITIZEN KANE, but it stacks up really
well next to ALIEN NATION.
     In post-Revolutionary Russia, Kira's family of ex-aristocrats returns
to the city they will always call Petrograd and take up residence in a few
rooms of what used to be their house.  Young Kira (played by Alida Valli)
has no respect for anyone who works for the new Soviet government.  She
rebuffs the advances of her cousin Victor, a loyal Party member, and instead
has a monthly rendezvous with Leo (played by Rossano Brazzi), the son of a
famous counter-revolutionary.  The police are looking for Leo and Kira is
nearly pulled into trouble with him.  Yet unbidden, people in high places
seem to intervene in her behalf.  One of Kira's unbidden saviors is Andrei
(played by Fosco Giachetti), an inspector for the GPU security police, who
seems anxious to reunite the two lovers.  This is the beginning of a story
that spans several years in the lives of Kira, Leo, and Andrei, a story
involving politics and crime, love and death.
     WE THE LIVING was made at a time when great care was taken to compose
scenes visually.  A vast number of Soviet propaganda posters were somehow
obtained (or perhaps invented) for the filming.  Yet not everything makes
sense as it was filmed.  One wonders how in an economy of shortages, Kira is
always able to wear lipstick and eye makeup flawlessly applied.  In one
scene the characters come into a warm building from the snow, yet the snow
on their shoulders refuses to melt.
     Ayn Rand's stories always seem to be overblown melodramas, having
larger-than-life characters who refuse to capitulate to the demands of
society.  And the stories usually culminate in the hero making an
impassioned speech of Rand's personal philosophy that society tries to tear
down the individual as a sort of dubious benefit to an undeserving
multitude.  This version of WE THE LIVING is no exception, however the
speech seems to make little sense in the context of the film.  And the
speech scene is quite noticeably one of those scenes that were re-dubbed.
One wonders if in the original the speech was so noticeable a non sequitur.
     WE THE LIVING is diverting fare, but falls well short of being a
classic.  Still, it is valuable as an artifact of World War II history as
well as film history and a reminder of what films used to be.  Rate it a +1
on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Legends of the Fall (1994)
     Much too rarely seen these days are the big, sprawling historical
epics with beautiful scenery well photographed, and with big brash
scores.  That's what LEGENDS OF THE FALL is.  This is a story of
Montana going through the transition from its more wild frontier past
to so-called civilization.  It is the story of the three sons of a
ranch family: Tristan (Brad Pitt), a wild remnant of the frontier
culture; Alfred (Aidan Quinn), who chooses ties with the coming civic
world; and the young idealist Samuel (Henry Thomas).  The head of the
family is Col. William Ludlow (Anthony Hopkins), an alienated and
disillusioned retired cavalry officer who grew to hate all government
after he was ordered to help preside over the destruction of the Plains
Indians.  From his early youth Tristan forms a bond with OneStab
(Gordon Tootoosis), Col. Ludlow's Indian scout who now lives on the
ranch.  OneStab introduces Tristan to Indian mystical ways.  The boys
grow with a seemingly unbreakable bond.  But when Samuel first brings
home a fiancee, Susannah Finncannon (Julia Ormond), then convinces his
other two brothers that the three should enlist to fight in the Great
War breaking out in Europe, he sets in motion a train of events that
were to change completely all the relationships in the family.
     The storytelling is occasionally just a bit rushed and sketchy in
LEGENDS OF THE FALL.  The plot has a lot of territory to cover and
while the film is 134 minutes long, it could easily have made good use
of another half hour or more.  Though the story that formed the basis
was of only novella length when published in ESQUIRE, the film has an
epic sweep.  John Toll's camera work can admire the foothills of
Montana or show the chaos of a battlefield in France with equal grace.
On the other hand, however, there are some noticeable visual mistakes,
including a child of thirteen who when seen three or four years later
still looks like a child of thirteen.  The narrative could have fallen
into melodrama with its fraternal romantic conflicts, but Zwick
generally keeps the story on a higher level.  The one concession to
melodrama that bothers is in Tristan's practicing of Indian ritual,
often in unlikely places like a battlefield in France.
     Following close on the heels of INTERVIEW WITH THE VAMPIRE, we
have a very different sort of role for Brad Pitt.  Considering that in
1992 he was still getting thankless roles like the minor one in COOL
WORLD, his is becoming a major name in films.  While his is the
character of greatest interest, the most demanding role is probably
Aidan Quinn's.  Anthony Hopkins gets second billing, but has a
distinctly secondary role.  An actor of less stature would probably not
gotten second billing for this role as written.
     LEGENDS OF THE FALL is a thoughtful and occasionally powerful epic
film.  It is unusual to see film makers taking a risk on this type of
film any more, but this one deserves to pay off.  I rate it a low +3 on
the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Death and the Maiden (1994)
     Fifteen years ago, in an unnamed South American country, Paulina
Escobar (played by Sigourney Weaver) survived arrest, interrogation,
and inhuman torture at the hands of her country's former fascist
dictatorship.  But her body and her mind remain horribly scarred and
her life is a waking nightmare.  Now she lives for the justice that she
hopes to get by the efforts of her husband, a leftist lawyer just named
to the President's commission on human rights.
     Fifteen years after her ordeal she still lives in fear and hatred
for the doctor whom she never saw but who tortured and raped her
repeatedly.  Her husband Geraldo Escobar (Stuart Wilson) is brought
home one night by a man who gave him road assistance.  Pauline hears
his voice and is convinced he is the man who has haunted her
nightmares.  When given the chance she traps Dr. Miranda (Ben Kingsley)
in the house, ties him to a chair, and holds a sort of impromptu trial
to determine if she should kill him or not.  Geraldo as the moderating
force must take the role of defense attorney but cannot fight too
fiercely for Miranda for fear of himself becoming the victim of
Paulina's rage.
     DEATH AND THE MAIDEN, a play by Ariel Dorfman adapted to the
screen by Rafael Yglesias and Dorfman, is one of those simple and
enigmatic stories that you can take at face value or in which you can
see a multitude of meanings and issues raised.  Among the issues one
might see in this film are: Can people avoid letting the magnitude ofa
crime affect their impartiality in the decision of guilt or innocence?
Where is the line between avenging past wrongs under tyranny and
becoming another tyranny?  What is the nature of evidence and how much
circumstantial evidence constitutes a convincing demonstration of
guilt?  Do we have a natural bias to believe one sex over the other and
if so, which way?
     Roman Polanski has been criticized for setting this film in a
South American country, yet not giving appropriate accents to the
characters.  This is an unfair criticism of this film.  In fact, if he
were going for total realism he should have had the film spoken in
Spanish and used subtitles.  However, even accents would remind the
viewer that the film is set in another country.  Polanski may well have
wanted to avoid the distancing effect that accents would give him.
Where he does leave himself open to criticism is ironically in the
makeup.  His film has been accused of using gratuitous nudity.  In fact
the scenes are intended to show us the scars of Paulina's torture.  But
this is before the plot lets us know she has been tortured and, at
least in the print I saw, the scars were not obvious and could have
been missed by a viewer not expecting to see them.  The screenplay's
descriptions of torture are at once too muted to be realistic, but
sufficiently graphic to bother some audiences.
     Sigourney Weaver and Ben Kingsley both give tight, riveting
performances.  Weaver gives the erratic feel of a wounded and
irrational animal.  One is never sure what she will do.  Kingsley gives
a tightly-wound performance of controlled desperation.  Stuart Wilson's
performance is less memorable but entirely convincing.
     As with PULP FICTION, one hesitates to recommend this film to
anyone sensitive to violence in movies.  But DEATH AND THE MAIDEN is
powerful, intelligent, and suspenseful for those willing to try it.  I
rate it a high +2  on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Fabulous Baker Boys, The (1989)
     I don't know--what you can say about a quart of vanilla ice cream?  THE
FABULOUS BAKER BOYS is the story of two brothers, Jack Baker (played by Jeff
Bridges) and his brother Frank (played by his brother Beau).  For 31 years
they have played piano together and by now they have become an institution
on the cocktail bar circuit.  This is a film about the highs and lows of the
cocktail piano game., where the highs don't get very high and the lows are
only a little bit bluesy, and the men are laid back as all get out.  As we
meet our intrepid heroes they are just sort of getting along but they could
be doing better.  Brother Frank decides that the group could use a female
vocalist so they audition and end up with sultry Suzie Diamond (played and
actually sung by Michelle Pfeiffer).  With Suzie's singing they start doing
okay.  They get some better bookings.  On the horizon is a little low-key
romance and a little low-key conflict.
     Steven Kloves, who wrote and directed, does have have considerable feel
for his characters and his occasional comedy, light like almost everything
else in this film, does work well some of the time.  A case in point is a
scene with Jack and Suzie, sharing a suite of rooms in a posh hotel,
checking out each other's toiletries.  Also neatly handled is a telethon the
brothers sign to play at Frank's insistence, only to find it is a high
school production to earn money for a gymnasium.
     This is a style of filmmaking we have not seen for a while, perhaps
since the Forties.  The film builds a sort of laid-back piano bar mood and
is never anxious to get anywhere.  Pfeiffer gets full marks as a steamy
torch singer, but when she is not singing she just squeaks by as acceptable.
One may speculate that the sibling rivalry of the title characters may
reflect some sibling rivalry of the actors, but it is hard to be sure.  If
the film is watchable, it is mostly for the attraction of the actors.  The
story itself is as slow and languorous as one of Ms. Pfeiffer's songs.  Rate
the film a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Blaze (1989)
          Capsule review:  Not as well-hyped as other films this
     holiday season, BLAZE is still a front-runner for plaudits
     with a solid performance by Lolita Davidovitch managing to
     steal the show from Paul Newman.  Rating: high +2.
     For a while the most interesting films of the year were released during
the summer.  These days the period with the best films is the winter holiday
season so they are fresh in people's minds for Oscar nominations.  released
with very little fanfare, BLAZE is certainly a contender.  BLAZE manages to
be a serious film and at the same time delightful, not an easy feat.
History records that Governor Earl Long of Louisiana, brother to empire-
builder Huey Long, was himself a crafty politician and an eccentric
character.  Earl risked his career to continue a long-standing affair with a
notorious stripper, Blaze Starr.  BLAZE is the story of Blaze Starr's
career, Earl and Blaze's relationship, and Louisiana politics.
     The story starts with Blaze (played by Lolita Davidovitch) leaving the
Appalachian hill country and going to New Orleans to find work.  She is
tricked into becoming a stripper, but once she gets used to it she becomes a
major New Orleans attraction.  Once she meets the Governor (played by Paul
Newman) they start spending time together.  At some point unclear this stops
being social climbing on Blaze's part and becomes a deeply felt, mutually
supportive love.  The wilder and crazier Earl gets, the more loyalty Blaze
is able to muster.  At first Earl is enough of a politician to support the
rights of blacks and sell it as racism to a constituency that will buy only
racism.  When he can no longer fool the racists he continues to support
equality, knowing it may be political suicide.  His political enemies
retaliate by using his undeniable eccentricities against him in the press.
Blaze does not always understand Earl, but she unfailingly knows what Earl
needs.
     With an actor of Paul Newman's stature acts as eccentrically as Earl
Long, a virtual unknown of a co-star runs the risk of going totally
unnoticed.  That was now what happened at all.  If anything, Davidovitch
walked away with the film.  A Yugoslav by birth and a naturalized Canadian,
she is convincing as a touch but gentle woman from Appalacia with an ability
to hold audience attention that goes beyond her physical attraction.
Davidovitch had small parts in ADVENTURES IN BABYSITTING and THE BIG TOWN,
but is unlikely to get any more small parts.
     Ron Shelton previously directed BULL DURHAM with good characterization
but not such a good story.  His BLAZE has a better story and gets a rating
of a high +2 on the -4 and +4 scale.

Title
Review for Thin Red Line, The (1998)
     "There's only a thin red line between the sane and the mad."  That
is supposedly an old Midwestern saying. From it James Jones took the
title of his semi-autobiographical novel based on his experiences in
the Infantry Company C on Guadalcanal.  That book was adapted into a
movie by Andrew Marton in 1964. Now Terrence Malick, who has not made a
film for two decades but who made the moody BADLANDS and DAYS OF
HEAVEN, has filmed it a second time.
     The story follows Company C and their experiences on Guadalcanal.
There is very little real plot for a film of this length, about three
hours.  Basically the film simply has a company of soldiers comes to
the island, has a hard fight against the Japanese, and finally leaves.
We get to know the characters through their interaction and hearing
their thoughts on the soundtrack.  Their thoughts may well be accurate
to the novel, but they are a little too poetic to be believed.
     Commanding the action in Lt. Col. Gordon Tall (played by Nick
Nolte).  Tall is a bitter man past the age when most men retire from
command but wanting to have command in a battle to prove himself.  "The
closer you are to Caesar the greater the fear," Tall thinks to himself.
It is not entirely clear what he means by that, but it is the sort of
think most of the soldiers seem to think to themselves.  One soldier
Bell (Ben Chaplin) thinks endlessly about his wife and we have inter-
cut dreamlike scenes of her and of the two of them together.  He has
turned her into sort of the idealized woman.  He remembers her over and
over, her and his memories of telling her that if anything will happen
to him, "I will wait for you on the other side of the dark waters."  It
is hard to believe GIs talked or thought like this.
     The film goes from one character to the next as we hear their
thoughts and see how they react to the experience.  There are plot
developments, like a conflict between Tall and commanding Captain
Staros (Elias Koteas), but the point of the film is mood, not to tell a
story.  One of the problems with THE THIN RED LINE is that it is hard
to keep so many characters straight on a single viewing.  The names are
new and so are most of the important faces.  And it does not help that
the viewer that he is seeing them in army helmets that cover up the top
part of the head.  There are some major stars in this film, but
frequently they will appear in what amount to cameo roles.  John
Travolta and George Clooney appear in one scene each. Sean Penn is
recognizable and has a larger role as a nasty sergeant who tells an
idealistic soldier, "We are living in a world where man is trying to
blow himself up as fast as he can arrange it.  Just shut your eyes and
take it."  Frequently we are shut out of what is really happening.  In
one case we see one of the soldiers on the transport yelling for a door
to be opened, but are given no explanation what that is all about.
     The film is an uneasy balance of style and realism.  While the
scenes of battle are very realistic, much of the credibility is
sacrificed by having the characters think in the free verse we hear in
the voice-overs. Somehow it is not believable that when a soldier is in
great danger, tracking through the high grass, constantly on the
lookout for an enemy who could appear at any time, that he thinks in
poetry.  Far more than the novel, the film takes advantage of its
location in the Melanesia tropical forest.  Some of the nature
photography is top notch.  The film opens with an extended image of a
crocodile submerging into water, giving the nature a sinister side.  It
is inviting but deadly.  One interviewed veteran I have heard soldier
says that he does not remember there being as much high grass but the
sound editor uses it to create a lush feel to the film.  Hans Zimmer,
who has scored several films with African themes over the past several
years, has provided a score that sounds as African as anything he has
written.  Whether this sound is authentic to the Solomon Islands is
questionable.
     The film is a powerful experience, one that undoubtedly captures
much of the feel of battle in a new hyper-realistic style.  But much
of the film does not work or at least requires multiple viewings to
take in.  I rate the film 7 on the 0 to 10 scale and a low +2 on the -4
to +4 scale.
     The stories in THE THIN RED LINE are from the point of view of
soldier who did not see "the big picture."  This film had little of the
actual history surrounding this battle.  Here is what was missing from
the film.  In 1942 Japanese military spearheaded south and captured the
Solomon Islands, bringing the war almost to Australia's doorstep.
Queensland, Australia, was just 1000 miles to the southwest.  It was
vitally important to the Japanese that they disrupt Allied Forces in
the area or they would be pushed easily back out.  To avoid this they
needed a base from which to launch air attacks against Allied supply
lines.  They built their air base on Guadalcanal Island.  New Evidence
suggests that as early as five years previously, and before the war
started, they had planned for what they saw was the coming war and were
stocking Guadalcanal to hold the island.
     On August 7, 1942, the day the United States had been in the war
only eight months, the United States sent in 6000 Marines to capture
the island, never expecting it would be a major battle.  Repeatedly
each side brought in reinforcements as the battle grew, first one side
and then the other.  The fighting spread from the island to a navy
battle in the surrounding sea.  The Japanese were well-entrenched and
very difficult to dislodge.  The natural protections of the Japanese
and the malarial jungles took a heavy toll on the Allies. The Allied
forces here were 90% American.  The fighting extended from August 1942
to January 1943. Naval superiority eventually decided the battle for
the Americans.
     The effect upon the Pacific War was profound.  There were 1600
Americans killed and another 4200 wounded.  There were 7100 casualties
in total.  But the Japanese losses were more terrible.  There were
14,000 Japanese killed or wounded.  Another 9000 died of disease or
starvation.  About a thousand were captured.  Guadalcanal together
with Midway were really the turning of the tide of the Pacific War.
At Guadalcanal the Americans proved the Japanese could make mistakes
and could be beaten.  Victory is usually the result of a combination
of skill and luck.  And at Guadalcanal the American forces could feel
they had defeated the Japanese through genuine military skill unlike
at Midway where the Japanese were beaten not as much by the Allies and
much more by an incredible run of really bad luck.  But these two
great Japanese losses really sealed the fate of the Japanese in the
Pacific War.

Title
Review for Ceddo (1978)
          Capsule review:  Micro-epic from Senegal.  The film is
     weak on style, acting, and pacing, but has a really good
     story.  Never released in Senegal, nominally over a
     disagreement about the spelling of the title, but more likely
     for anti-Islamic sentiments.
     Imagine, if you will, a story written for Akira Kurosawa.  You know,
one with armies clashing and sieges of great castles.  Now imagine the story
was done instead by a third-grade grammar-school class of about thirty
people--the same heavy themes but where Kurosawa would show an army the play
has to use two people.  Instead of a castle there would be a tent.  You
would get a sort of "micro-epic."  Okay, now you have some idea what a
"micro-epic" might be.  Ousmane Sembene's 1977 Senegalese film CEDDO is a
very big film on a very small scale.  The film, based on a true story, takes
place in one village but it is still the stuff of epics.
     In one small village in Senegal, three cultures are fighting for
dominance: one worshiping the traditional village fetishes, one the new
Islamic faith, and the third represented by two white Europeans.
Admittedly, the latter are not so interested in converting souls as they are
in trading guns for slaves.  As the power shifts back and forth, more than
one group decides it has to spend a few people on guns.  The real catalyst
of the events of the film occurs when three anti-Islamic villagers kidnap
the daughter of the Islamic king.  This starts a small-scale civil war that
has a local band of Moslems (allies of the Islamic king against the anti-
Islamic villagers) attempting to oust the king and seize control for
themselves.
     Senegal's film industry is still a fledgling and this film in all but
its plotting falls well below what we have come to expect as Western
standards.  The pacing and acting are poor; the camera-work is only fair.
The plot, on the other hand, is excellent.  CEDDO is a film of political
dialogue and philosophy and, at times, even action.  Much of the excitement
of the action scenes is sapped away by mishandling.  Sembene is
predominantly a novelist and when he made this film he did not have the
filmmaking talent his story deserved.  It cannot be that hard to pick up the
talents Sembene is missing.  Hundreds of directors in this country know how
to get a reasonable acting job and how to make a film of minimal polish.
They just do not have a good enough story.  Sembene has a good story, one
that is every bit as good as the story of Z.  If Sembene could pick up a
little polish in his style, he could be making first-class films.  As it is,
I would still give CEDDO a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Apostle, The (1997)
     For years I have thought that Robert Duvall is the best American
actor.  And his acting in THE APOSTLE is as good as ever.  But Duvall
has let his vanity run away from him in this film.  He has what could
be a moving story if he had taken the time to flesh it out.  Instead he
cut the story down to the bare minimum to allow for more time for his
preaching sequences.  The film comes in at a running time of 148
minutes, yet skimps on story-line for what should be a simple story to
tell.  One example of his skimping: Billy Bob Thornton goes through
some emotional changes and should be a major character, but his entire
presence in the film is reduced to two scenes,  And Thornton's changes
are too rushed, because the screenplay, written by Duvall give him only
the two scenes.
     Take all of the shouting and singling out of THE APOSTLE and what
is left is a rather simple and short story.  Sonny Dewey (Duvall) is a
charismatic Pentecostal preacher in both the common and the religious
sense of "charismatic."  He has been preaching in New Boston, Texas for
so long that religion has become an essential part of his being.  Every
moment of the day if he is not preaching he is hymn-singing.  If he is
not hymn-singing he is trying to convert somebody.  He seems to be
incapable of speaking three consecutive sentences without one of them
mentioning Jesus.  But his dedication to preaching is not enough.
Sonny's life starts to fall apart when his wife (Farrah Fawcett) and a
young minister cheat on Sonny together and then manage to oust Sonny
from his own church.  When chance brings together Sonny, the young
minister, and a baseball bat, Sonny unleashes his rage leaving the
minister in a coma.  Realizing that he is now in serious trouble, Sonny
flees to Bayou Boutte, Louisiana where he cannot resist the temptation
to start a new church.  Sonny takes a new name, calling himself "the
Apostle E. F."  But he still preaches in the style for which he was
known in Texas.
     It is redundant at this point to say that Duvall is good as Sonny.
That is really not the point.  He does a terrific job that won an Oscar
nomination and will very likely win the prize.  There is just more of
this performance than the film really needed.  Farrah Fawcett nicely
underplays her role as Duvall's wife.  It is hard to believe looking at
her worn hawk-like features that she was once a national pinup.  But it
is harder to believe that this is the same actress who seemed so
untalented in LOGAN'S RUN.  She deserved to be seen more in this film.
Fawcett has come a long way.  Miranda Richardson provides love interest
in the new life.  It would not be accurate to say, however, that Duvall
steals the film but that as writer and director he never gives it to
anyone else.  He gives the film very believable dialog and captures the
feel of the more rural sections of the deep South.
     Duvall is a good director and a better actor.  One can only
disagree with some of the choices he made in bringing together this
film.  This could have been an expose in the tradition of ELMER GANTRY.
After national scandals of clergy people being shown to be hypocrites,
it took some courage to make the hero of this film a preacher and a
hypocrite.  But Duvall does manage after a while to make his audience
feel for Sonny and want him to succeed.  The critics have mostly liked
this film better than I did.  I rate this film a 6 on the 0 to 10 scale
and 1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Forrest Gump (1994)
     There is more to FORREST GUMP--both the character and the film--
than what is happening on the surface, but I am not clear just what it
is.  This is Robert Zemeckis's symbolic exercise that belongs beside
films like BIRDY, CATCH-22, HAROLD AND MAUDE, THE WORLD ACCORDING TO
GARP, and especially BEING THERE.  I think if I could figure out what
BEING THERE was *really* all about, I would have a big clue on FORREST
GUMP is about beneath the surface, and vice versa.  My problem is that I
can see many possible meanings, and none is particularly profound.  You
could see FORREST GUMP as being an allegory implying God or angels look
out for the simple and the pure of heart.  (Personal note: to me that is
the self-congratulatory philosophy of the fortunate, and it has a
sinister touch of victim-blaming for many good people who suffer through
what I think is no fault of their own.)  At least on some level this is
the story of a man with an IQ of 75, the victim of a lot of cruelty from
his peers, who overcomes his problems with a natural talent for running
at super-human speeds, for playing ping-pong at super-human speeds, for
assembling guns at the same speeds, and for just being a nice person.
He overcomes his disability to the degree that he becomes a winner of
the Congressional Medal of Honor, one of the most successful businessmen
in the country, and the center of a sort of runners' cult, all by just
being a really, really nice man with just a few minor super-powers and
having friends who guess well about what stocks are going to take off.
He also is unknowingly the catalyst for many events of American history
from the 50s to the 80s.
     The film is told with the same peculiar structure as MAVERICK.
That is the first three-quarters of the film is told in flashback and
from there it proceeds without flashback, but it is not clear why the
starting point is what it is.  Most of the story is told by Gump (Tom
Hanks) on a bus stop bench to anyone who will listen.  His captive
audiences, at first indifferent, become more and more engrossed and
inspired by his story.
     Gump is born with a bad spine in addition to his below-average IQ.
The local school children in Greenbow, Alabama, ostracize and torment
young Forrest and this somehow causes his back problems to go away in
one mysterious moment and for him to become a super-runner able to out-
pace bicycles and pickup trucks.  His high-speed running and his nice
guy attitude make him first a football hero, then a war hero, and
continues throughout his spectacular life.  He prospers tremendously,
then goes on to look for meaning in his life.  In fact he gets
everything material anybody could want but the one thing Gump really
does want.  He never seems to be able to hold on to his childhood
sweetheart, Jenny.  With a talent for making wrong decisions, Jenny
walks a self-destructive path through the same world as Forrest, but
without the benefit of his simple good ways or his super-powers.  Along
the way we see a lot of American history and here a lot of popular music
whose lyrics often echo the plot twists in the film.  (And along the way
there is also some sloppy writing.  One personal bugaboo: an event we
are told takes place on a Saturday morning is later given the date March
22, 1982.  That was a Monday.)
     Tom Hanks is decent in his role as far as I can tell, but can one
really say he was believable in so unbelievable a role?  In a way he is
the wise foole.  But one cannot say people like him behave the way he
does, since there just is nobody like he is in this film.  About the
best one can say is that he maintained his accent fairly uniformly.
Robin Wright as Jenny gets a little chance to act, but only sufficiently
to prove herself competent.  This role was more demanding than her title
role in THE PRINCESS BRIDE, but still did not provide her the emotional
range to prove whether she can actually act, or just read lines.  My big
complaint concerning the acting is with Gary Sinese.  He has spent too
much time on the stage when it was clear that films are desperately in
need of his talents.  I hope we will be seeing more of him in future
films because he is one talented actor.  This is a soft, soft film in
need of more of the intensity only he provides it.  Sally Field at one
time could not turn in a bad performance either, but as Forrest's mother
she is recreating the same characterization she has played all too often
in the past.  In her sleep she can do sweet, homey, folksy, women with a
small stubborn streak.  This is just one more.
     Somehow this is not what you would think of as a special effects
film, yet in fact some of the visual effects are quite impressive.  What
most people would pick up on are the scenes of Hanks shaking the hands
of Presidents.  They are not actually executed as well as might be
expected in spite of the praise they have gotten.  The scenes that
impressed me concern an actor who loses limbs in the course of the film.
There are standard ways to create this effect that involve body doubles
or binding back the limb so the camera cannot see it.  At least one
scene in the film cannot be explained using either technique.  All I can
think of is that digital technology might have been employed but it
genuinely looks like this actor had legs amputated for the role.  Scenes
in which Forrest moves at high speed also are very impressively done.
Generally undercranking a camera leaves tell-tale signs in other parts
of the scene, perhaps branches wave much too fast in the wind.  Here
again the techniques are not obvious but they are convincing.  Of course
Robert Zemeckis's films are often very heavy on special effects, so he
is no stranger to special effects wizards.
     FORREST GUMP is certainly supposed to be an enigmatic film,
hopefully no less than I found it to be.  If it was supposed to be
inspiring in some way, it missed my wavelength.  It was competently made
but overlong and occasionally infuriating.  I would give it a 0 on the
-4 to +4 scale.  But, being fair, I will point out that your mileage
will possibly vary.  The film received an ovation at the end in the
theater where I saw it, so it is pleasing some audiences.

Title
Review for Package, The (1989)
          Capsule review:  Fast-paced if not entirely satisfying
     political thriller has Gene Hackman on the run from the Army
     and the police, trying to avert the sabotage of a nuclear
     disarmament treaty.  Very reminiscent of other thrillers,
     especially SEVEN DAYS IN MAY, but with a few new wrinkles of
     its own.  Rating: low +2.
     THE PACKAGE is a neat little political thriller with a complex but
still fairly coherent plot.  The story is reminiscent of some of the better
political thrillers from the early 1960s though most of all, and perhaps too
closely, it parallels the plot of SEVEN DAYS IN MAY.  THE PACKAGE is,
however, not as cerebral a thriller as is SEVEN DAYS IN MAY, having less
discussion of the political reasons for what is going on and substituting
instead action and car chases.  That choice makes the film more entertaining
on one level but less involving on a deeper level.  While in SEVEN DAYS IN
MAY we are led to conclude that the real enemy is an age, in THE PACKAGE
there is little doubt that the real enemy is a group of "bad guys" whose
motives are all too quickly glossed over.  That is just not as satisfying.
     The story begins at a disarmament summit meeting in East Berlin at
which United States and Soviet diplomats agree to disarm and cooperate with
each other.  However, a dissenting group of high-ranking United States and
Soviet military people decide they do not want to cooperate with each other,
so they team up to sink the treaty so they can go back to distrusting each
other.  (Now that I think about it, that does seem a bit ironic.)  Into this
situation is dropped Johnny Gallagher (played by Gene Hackman), Gallagher is
a career military man who becomes a cat's-paw for the conspirators.  Also on
hand is Tommy Lee Jones as a brawling soldier whom Gallagher must "escort"
back to the United States and who clearly is not quite what he seems to be.
It is not long before Gallagher is on the run from the army, the police, and
the conspirators.  He enlists the aid of his ex-wife Eileen Gallagher
(played by Johanna Cassidy), also a career army officer.  It is extremely
refreshing, incidentally, to see an intelligent action character played by a
woman over 40.
     As political thrillers go, THE PACKAGE has a complex plot involving a
wide spectrum of characters from the intelligence community to Communists to
neo-Nazis.  While the ultimate goal of the conspirators is not hard to
guess, many of the details of their plot are unexpected enough to keep the
viewer off-balance and guessing.  I give it a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Vincent & Theo (1990)
     With the world celebrating the 100th anniversary of Vincent Van Gogh's
death, the time was ripe for a biographic film about the artist.  Kirk
Douglas had played Van Gogh in the 1956 film LUST FOR LIFE, but that was a
sort of polished Hollywood version.  This time we have an international
production directed by Robert Altman.  It seems from Altman's film about the
great artist who was so misunderstood in his own time that, in fact, there
was good reason to misunderstand Vincent Van Gogh.
     Tim Roth, who plays Van Gogh with an English accent, makes his subject
not just someone you would *not* want to meet, he makes him someone who
could drive you out of a room just be entering it.  Vincent chooses to live
in squalor not through poverty--at least initially--but through apathy.  His
teeth are rotted and discolored through lack of care and his clothing is
tattered.  His fascination with color is by no means limited to his
painting.  He seems to have a passion for smearing himself with paint and
for eating his paints--we see him licking paint at several points in the
film.
     VINCENT AND THEO concentrates, not surprisingly, on the love/hate
relationship between Vincent and his brother Theo.  A little ungraciously
the film shows Theo's wife as having little but disgust and disregard for
Vincent while historically it was her perseverance that eventually brought
the art of Vincent Van Gogh to the attention of critics.  While that is not
wholly inconsistent with what we see in the film, it does seem unlikely
considering her constantly unfriendly attitude toward her brother-in-law--
not surprisingly toward a man who seems to like to take a big mouthful of
wine and then drool it out of his mouth.
     Kirk Douglas played Van Gogh as a man of deep passions.  Roth plays him
as just plain weird and cold with occasional explosions of emotions.  It is
hard to judge which is the more accurate representation, though the earlier
interpretation is by far the more watchable and dramatically interesting.
     There is an odd disjointed quality to the script.  Syphilis victim Theo
in one scene tries, fails, and tells his wife, "I can't pee any more."  In
the next scene he is back at work as if it were just an activity of no
importance that has been dropped from his schedule.  Though my wife did not
remember it, I really thought I heard one character tell another to look him
up in the phone book.  We both heard a reference to South American velvet
painting, which seems a likely anachronism.

Title
Review for Mulholland Falls (1996)
     Well, somebody must have believed in this script.  I am not sure
why.  I suppose the reason may be that it is a murder mystery that has
a setting of post-war Los Angeles and environs.  And the plot has to do
with political conspiracies and sex.  Perhaps someone thought this
could be the new CHINATOWN.  MULHOLLAND FALLS has terrific photography
by Haskell Wexler, one of the great cinematographers.  There are a
surprising number of name actors even in tiny roles.  This is a film
that was given every advantage the Zanuck organization could give it.
But it was all to bring to the screen an amateur script that often
verges over into the Idiot Plot, the plot that moves forward only
because somebody, usually the villain, acts like a complete idiot.
("Mr. Bond, this is the reactor keeps my whole island running.")
     Max Hoover (played by Nick Nolte), Coolidge (Chazz Palminteri),
Eddie (Michael Madsen), and Relyea (Chris Penn) are the kind squad of
cops that give the Los Angeles Police Department the reputation it
enjoys after the Rodney King and O. J. Simpson cases.  They come on
like the Untouchables (in the movie) and have no respect for hoods,
gangsters, or due process of law.  After an initial sequence that shows
just how far beyond the law that they are willing to operate, they are
called in on a mysterious case.  A woman has been found dead in the
desert, and Max obviously knows the woman, but is keeping that to
himself.  The woman was found actually imbedded IN the desert as if she
had fallen off a cliff, but there are no cliffs around from which she
could have fallen.  From the dialogue it is clear that our squad of
deep-thinking policemen cannot figure out how that is possible.  To
their credit, nobody in my audience shouted the answer at the screen,
but we are just a few minutes into MULHOLLAND FALLS and it is clear
this was not going to be a mind-stretching film.  And it certainly is
not.  Multiple times there are scenes which do not make sense, such as
characters being frisked by experts who somehow miss little things like
eight-inch blackjacks.  The logic of this film is on the level of a bad
James Bond movie with the bad guys making major and stupid errors in
judgment.  That is actually a shame because both the police enforcement
squad and the secret they uncover individually have a basis in truth.
What is far- fetched is the scripting and not the basic plot.
     Why Nick Nolte's agent let him play opposite Chazz Palminteri is
anybody's guess, but it certainly was a mistake.  Playing a scene
opposite James Earl Jones, Howard da Silva, Chazz Palminteri, or Rin-
Tin-Tin, you are in a battle for the audience's attention and you are
probably going to lose.  Nolte is okay, but Palminteri manages to make
his own every scene in which he plays.  Palminteri is really along
mostly for comic relief from a tension that rarely manages to
materialize.  Second billing goes to Melanie Griffith in a decidedly
secondary part as Max's wife.  Her character is not even a major
character in the story, though she does get some opportunity to act.
John Malkovich does have a pivotal role as a general as well as a
scientist working for the Atomic Energy Commission who was involved
with the murdered woman.  The casting department seems to have gone out
of its way to get name actors in even some of the tiniest roles.
People like Bruce Dern, Brad Pitt, and Louise Fletcher show up for
parts as small as three sentences and then are seen no more.  Direction
is by New Zealander Lee Tamahori who directed ONCE WERE WARRIORS.
     With a few good revisions on the script by Pete Dexter this could
have been a major film and worthy of the attention that was lavished on
it.  As it is this is a film that has great style, but weak substance.
I rate it a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Quarrel, The (1991)
          Capsule review:  Two men, old friends and adversaries
     with different theological perspectives have each assumed the
     other died in the Holocaust.  Years later they meet by
     accident and continue a riveting philosophical argument of
     faith vs. rationalism. Extremely intelligent and rewarding.
     Rating: +2 (-4 to +4).
     Chaim Kovler (played by R. H. Thomson) survived the Holocaust, but lost
his wife and children to the Nazis.  He also lost his best friend and worst
philosophical opponent Hersh Rasseyner.  And while he still believes in the
existence of God, he no longer cares since he blames God for allowing the
Holocaust.  Even back at religious school as a boy he had his own ideas
about religion and God.  Now a year or so after the end of the war he is
living in the United States and has become a popular novelist and advice
columnist. Visiting Montreal, on the morning of a Rosh Hashonah that he
chooses not to acknowledge, he finds Hersh (played by Saul Rubinek) alive
and a very Orthodox rabbi.  The two men, one staunchly religious, the other
just as staunchly a rationalist finally have a chance to talk out their
different world-views after being separated for so long and with so much
tragedy that has happened to each of them.  If this sounds a lot like all
too many Sunday morning television religious dramas, it is not.  This is not
the story of somebody regaining his faith after a few pat religious
arguments.  It is a fair and even-handed exploration of two valid but
diametrically opposed philosophical points of view.  Chaim Grade's story,
adapted into a play by David Brandes and directed by Eli Cohen, is itself at
times coldly rational, at others sad and moving.
     The two old friends meet in park and argue not just about religion, but
about rain and the paths in the park and anything else that can momentarily
distract them from their real and fundamental philosophical differences--
which they will be resuming shortly.
     This is not the first time these three--Rubinek, Thomson, and religious
differences--have come together.  Rubinek was a man trying to get his friend
out of a religious cult and Thomson was a deprogrammer in the excellent 1982
film TICKET TO HEAVEN.  They are both very good actors, albeit very
different types, and they are very good on the screen together.  But while a
few films were made on religious cults (TICKET TO HEAVEN is merely the best
of the lot) THE QUARREL is in a category by itself.  Few films have
respected their audience sufficiently to give them this density of ideas and
concepts.  You basically would have to have a two character play that is
solid dialog.  In fact, cinema is probably not the best medium for this
story.  At the risk of saying "this is a great film, but don't go" I have to
say that the best way to appreciate this film will be on a videotape that
will allow you both to see the actors expressions and will allow you to go
back and replay portions to better take in what is being said.  And since
THE QUARREL is a theatrical release of American Playhouse (like the film I
saw minutes before it, THE MUSIC OF CHANCE) it will almost certainly show up
on PBS sooner or later.  However, with that one minimal cavil, this film is
recommended.  I give it a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Sexy Beast (2000)
Roger Ebert asks in his review of SEXY BEAST, "Who would have 
guessed that the most savage mad-dog frothing gangster in recent 
movies would be played by...  Ben Kingsley?"  My response would be 
that anyone who has seen Alan Arkin in WAIT UNTIL DARK, Henry 
Fonda in ONCE UPON A TIME IN THE WEST, or Anthony Hopkins in THE 
SILENCE OF THE LAMBS should have guessed it.  They should know 
that the way for a film to create a really creepy sociopath is 
cast someone who generally plays mild, sympathetic, or even 
ineffectual character roles.  The same characteristics that make 
an actor seem gentle in most of his roles can work in his favor 
when a role calls for him to be fierce and vicious.  That is the 
principle that works for Kingsley in SEXY BEAST.
Gary "Gal" Dove (played by Ray Winstone) has retired from a London 
career of crime and is living on a luxurious villa in Spain.  Life 
has become a routine of sunning himself and relaxing.  But his 
paradise is about to be shattered by a one-two-punch.  The first 
punch is a boulder that comes rolling down the hill next to the 
villa.  The second punch comes from Gal's past.  Back in London 
gang boss Teddy Bass (Ian McShane, TV's Lovejoy) is planning to 
break into a safety deposit room in a bank and he wants Gal.  He 
sends his most rabid henchman Don Logan (Ben Kingsley) to fetch 
Gal.  Don will accept any decision Gal makes from "yes" to 
"certainly."  However, if Gal says "no" Don will do whatever it 
takes to turn it into a yes including threatening Guy's ex-porn-
star wife DeeDee (Amanda Redman).  In the meantime Don knows just 
how to get under everybody's skin.  Kingsley makes Don a compact 
package of fury and nastiness.
There are some serious problems in Louis Mellis's and David 
Scinto's script that should have been caught before filming.  When 
we see the actual crime we have no idea why Gal was so important 
to its success.  Beyond an ability to use skin-diving gear, no 
special talents are required of him.  Any local hood could have 
done what Gal is needed for.  Additionally the crime involves 
digging from a swimming pool to the bank vault, flooding the 
vault.  No only could they have let the water out of the pool and 
avoided the complication altogether, but there is by far too much 
water to be accounted for by what was in the pool.
In spite of the provocative title, the story is cliched and overly 
familiar.  I know I have seen all the plot elements of SEXY BEAST 
in old Westerns like THE LAW AND JAKE WADE.  The story is usually 
of the reformed outlaw, a Robert Taylor type, who has hung up his 
guns and is trying for a life of peaceful respectability.  The old 
gang, however, wants to do one more job with their old buddy and 
sends a rabid Richard Widmark type to go and git im.  It is not a 
great plot.  In SEXY BEAST even the plot twists have gray beards.  
Perhaps the film has a little more respectability because it was 
made not as a Western but as a stylish British gangster film.  It 
is an old plot dressed up to look new.
If the plot is old, at least the style is creative.  This is 
director Jonathan Glazer's first film, but he has reputedly done 
some notable TV ads for Guinness Stout.  His style does have some 
unexpected touches including some very odd dream sequences.  
Cinematographer Ivan Bird uses a lot of half lit scenes.  We see 
one side of a person's faces.  But the other side fades into the 
darkness, a sort of metaphor for the half-world these characters 
in-habit.  Half of everything that is happening is also kept 
hidden.
Us Yanks will have a hard time with some of the dialog.  At least 
in my theater it was difficult to make out the words with the 
quiet speaking, the heavy accents, and the cockney language.
SEXY BEAST is a very and familiar minor plot lent respectability 
in the US by being done in what is here a still somewhat novel 
genre, the London crime film.  The plot may be new to British 
crime films, but it would be overly familiar as a Western.  
Further respectability comes from Ben Kingsley's high-powered 
performance.  I give it a 4 on the 0 to 10 scale and a 0 on the -4 
to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Night and the City (1992)
     About the best thing you can say about Harry Fabian (as played by
Robert DeNiro) is that he has a lot of energy and ambition.  Harry is a
high-powered promoter of sleazy schemes.  In spite of Harry's surface
likability and ever-endearing demeanor, even Harry's closest friends cannot
or should not trust Harry anywhere near money.  Harry is a lawyer who has
become so well known for his ambulance -chasing that he has to supplement
his income by any other scheme he can put together.  His latest scheme is to
promote a night of local boxers fighting each other, but the scheme is
elaborate and the financing shady.  And Fabian will use whomever he has to
in order to make himself a big fight promoter for one night and at the same
time gall "Boom Boom" Grossman (played by Alan King), a well known local
fight promoter.
     Jessica Lange stars as Helen, who owns a bar with her husband
Phil(played by Cliff Gorman), but who is also fooling around with Fabian.
The supporting cast includes Jack Warden and Eli Wallach.  But the main show
is the frenetic Harry Fabian, who is almost never off-camera and seems to
live at 10% greater speed than the rest of us.  He has to so that in the
middle of one scheme he can get involved with another one, like selling
probably-stolen VCRs.  "Sell these for $400, keep $200," his friend Gupta
tells him, and Harry is off on a second scheme.
     The dialogue in Richard Price's screenplay is fast and often funny in a
bitter, ironic way.  Harry's various inter-connected schemes build a sort of
"Mission Impossible" house-of-cards plan where the impossible mission is to
make this cheap hustler into a success.  Irwin Winkler's direction and Tak
Fujimoto's photography pick up the grunginess and oppressiveness of the New
York City streets with the immediacy of hand-held Steadicam.  Popular songs
from the 1950s and 1960s run a commentary on the action of the film, as when
Fabian runs a scam to the tune of "The Great Pretender."
     In spite of a lack of likable characters, NIGHT AND THE CITY shows us
the life of the underbelly and a few interesting machinations.  I gave it a
high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Warlock (1989)
          Capsule review:  Three years after the coming
     attractions ran, WARLOCK is finally getting a release, albeit
     spotty.  A prestigious producer, a good director, and a
     distinguished cast turn out a good drive-in horror movie made
     with care and imagination.  The one flaw is a rather obvious
     borrowing from the plot of TERMINATOR.  Rating: low +2 (-4 to
     +4).
     One of the odd mysteries of cinema of late has been "whatever happened
to WARLOCK?"  Three years ago there were coming attractions that promised a
horror film with a  nice look.  From what we saw it could have been decent
or it could have been another special effects and gore film.  But for three
years it did not seem to get released either to theaters or to cassette.
Finally, in 1991, the film is getting a spotty, here-and-there release and
while nothing great, it is certainly closer to my best hopes than to my
worst fears.  Only on reading material about the film afterwards do I
discover that the film had a pedigree that should have raised my
expectations--perhaps to the point that I would have been disappointed when
I actually saw the film.  It is produced by Arnold Kopelson, who also
produced PLATOON.  It is directed by Steve Miner, whose HOUSE did have some
good moments.  It stars Julian Sands of A ROOM WITH A VIEW and Richard Grant
of WITHNAIL AND I.  The film has a very nice look.  It is clear this was not
intended to be a film dominated by special effects.  There is a little gore,
about the amount you might find in a Hammer Films horror piece of the early
1960s.  Most of the other effects are nicely orchestrated, and occasionally
done with the subtlety to leave the viewer not quote sure what has just been
seen.
     The worst touch is that the basic plot is very similar to TERMINATOR.
The film opens near Boston, Massachusetts, in the year 1691.  A rather
unappealing witchfinder, Giles Redferne (played by Richard Grant) has
sentenced to death a rather charismatic sorcerer (played by Julian Sands).
Our warlock escapes with a spell that catapults both him and the witchfinder
into modern-day Los Angeles.  There the warlock begins a mission to re-unite
three separated sections of the Devil's Grimoire.  When brought together
they will tell the warlock God's most secret name.  (This aspect sounds more
as if it came from the Kaballah than from 17th Century European tradition.)
Reciting that name backwards will uncreate the world which then presumably
Satan can recreate by his rules.  The warlock kills one of the two
housemates who care for him after a somewhat rocky arrival.  The other
housemate he curses.  Each morning she will find herself aged twenty years
over the day before.  This rapidly aging woman (played by Lori Singer) and
the witchfinder set out to find and stop the warlock.
     This is an oddly sexless film and that works in its favor.  The plot is
never stopped nor is its mood sabotaged for gratuitous scenes of
titillation.  Nor is the film padded out with long chase scenes.  The film
is 102 minutes long because there was just about 102 minutes of story to
tell.  Most of those 102 minutes show some imagination.  Don't get me wrong:
WARLOCK is a drive-in sort of movie, not great cinema.  It is not a ground-
breaker even as a horror film.  It is a drive-in movie that delivers the
goods just about every moment it is on the screen.  I give it a low +2 on
the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Lorenzo's Oil (1992)
          Capsule review:  How did two parents with no medical
     background find a cure for the previously terminal disease
     that afflicted their son?  You actually will understand, step
     by step in this true story part intellectual puzzle, part
     political statement about the medical community, part story
     of a family medical tragedy.  We need more films like this.
     Rating: +3 (-4 to +4).
     A friend heard I was going to see LORENZO'S OIL and said we should be
sure to take handkerchiefs.  He had seen one LORENZO'S OIL.  My wife saw the
film as a political tract against the medical establishment.  She saw a
different LORENZO'S OIL.  The film I saw was neither of those two movies.  I
saw a film that was the logical successor to THE STORY OF LOUIS PASTEUR and
particularly DR. EHRLICH'S MAGIC BULLET.  It is the story of people who
start with a scientific puzzle that is also a tragic problem.  And step by
step, with the tragedy eating at them, they solve the problem.  And though
it is about a complex medical problem, the solution process is always
comprehensible, so much so that at one point I found myself whispering to my
wife the solution to a piece of the puzzle that the characters had not yet
figured out.  Here I am learning about a disease I'd never heard of when I
saw down and I wanted to shout a medical hypothesis at the screen.  (I was
right, too, except what I called a "constructor" they called an "enzyme.")
Anyway, that is the film I saw and I had a great time!
     This is a true story as enthralling as any from Paul de Kruif's MICROBE
HUNTERS or Berton Roueche's accounts of medical detective work.  Augusto
Odone (played by Nick Nolte) and his wife Michaela (played by Susan
Sarandon) are perplexed when their five-year-old son Lorenzo (played by Zack
O'Malley Greenburg) starts throwing fits of anger and losing his
coordination.  Eventually the boy is diagnosed as having an invariably fatal
disease, adrenoleukodystrophy (ALD).  Because the disease is so rare, the
medical community had funding for only limited research.  Less effort seemed
to be expended in research than in helping parents cope with the medical
crisis.  So Augusto and Michaela, neither with a medical background, set out
to do their own research and, remarkably, found their own cure.  (Not really
a unique story, however.  When the nuclear physicist Leo Szilard developed a
terminal case of bladder cancer, he turned his attention from physics to
medicine and discovered his own cure.  This was a case of "physicist, heal
thyself."  Of course, Odone was not even a scientist.  He was a banker.)
     Susan Sarandon does a very good job of conveying the anxiety of a
mother trying desperately to save her child and coping with a senseless
guilt because genetically ALD is passed by the mother.  Nick Nolte has
problems with the Italian accent, but otherwise is quite good.  Peter
Ustinov is, as always, a pleasure to watch, in a role not quite fair to the
medical community.  George Miller, best know for the "Mad Max" films,
directed and co-wrote the screenplay.  As a physician himself, he can
explain the medical aspects in nice, clear, simple terms.  His direction is,
however, a bit heavy on religious imagery and in gratuitous overhead shots.
     This is a film written for an intelligent audience, and intelligent
audiences should find it very rewarding.  My rating is +3 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Shadow, The (1994)
     Who knows what evil lurks in the hearts of men?  Now let's not
always see the same hands.
     Back in the 30's and 40s, before there was television, one of the
great super-heroes of the radio-ways, pulps, and comics was Lamont
Cranston.  He was a variant on H. G. Wells' INVISIBLE MAN.  Cranston
could not actually make himself invisible, but using techniques he
learned in the orient he could "cloud men's minds so they cannot see
him."  With adventures that began in 1931, he was one of the earliest
popular American superheroes, and was perhaps the most popular superhero
on the radio.  The Shadow had already been a household name  more than
seven years when Superman first appeared and more than eight years when
Batman was first introduced.  To the radio's sinister strains of Saint-
Saens's "Omphale's Spinning Wheel" the invisible Shadow would stalk the
night looking for evil-doers to scare the bejeezus out of.  Over the
years there were many cast changes and many voices to The Shadow and his
sidekick, "the lovely and talented Margo Lane," including at one time
respectively, Orson Welles and Agnes Moorehead.
     Even though The Shadow lasted on radio twenty years, until 1956,
there was never (until now) a memorable version of The Shadow on TV or
in the movies.  Somehow the combination of atmosphere and special
effects necessary would have never been possible.  Also unlike other
superheroes, The Shadow had to be played by someone ugly.  The pulps,
which started publishing the character in 1931, always portrayed him as
a tall man with a long crooked nose, a fedora, and the lower part of his
face covered.  He was more frightening when you could see what he looked
like.  Victor Jory was nearly ugly enough and starred in a 1940 serial,
but could not match the phantom with the disembodied voice of vengeance
on the radio.  Today special effects are much more articulate on the
screen, even if actors often are not.  The menace of The Shadow is now
very possible to show on the screen.  In fact, while on the radio The
Shadow could only cloud men's minds and in later years read what he
clouded, the screen's new Shadow has an arsenal of psychic weapons, and
so do his enemies.  This provides opportunity for more visual
excitement.  But what current actor is ugly enough to play Lamont
Cranston, The Shadow?  Would you believe Alec Baldwin?  I would not
have, but this film manages to have a handsome Shadow without
compromising on the menace or the image.
     As far as I know, the radio plays never gave you much of a history
of how The Shadow got his peculiar talents.  I have been a fan of the
radio plays and they never went into any detail on the origins of The
Shadow except that in the Orient this hero learned the ability to "cloud
men's minds."  The film goes into much more detail.
     Our story begins in Tibet with Lamont Cranston anything but heroic.
As his first alter-ego Ying Ko, he is a mysterious drug lord of American
origin.  It is hard to believe that this villain will one day be the
great crimer-fighter I know from the radio series.  Seduced by the light
side of the force he goes to New York to make amends for the evils he
did in the East.  He gets one opportunity after a priceless sarcophagus
is sent, un-requested, to the New York Museum of Natural History.  The
coffin leads to murder and The Shadow finds himself fighting Shiwan
Khan, the last descendent of Genghis.  Khan is portrayed by John Lone
who played THE LAST EMPEROR and Khan is now determined to become the
next one.
     THE SHADOW probably does not use Baldwin to the fullest it could
since the demands of playing a superhero fall well short of those of
being one.  It at least gives him a chance to play someone a little
sinister and helps to shake off his clean-cut family man image.  Perhaps
out of place are his humorous one-liners after action scenes.  They were
funny when James Bond delivered them in the 60s, but they have become
much too common in action films and it is all wrong for the somber
Shadow to be making "Bondisms."  Penelope Ann Miller is attractive in
dresses featuring low cuts in front and lower cuts in back.  She has a
little more to do than the original Margo Lane--the original was little
more than a sounding board so the audience knew what The Shadow was
thinking--but still this is not a role that stretches someone's acting
abilities.  One way to tell this film had serious financial backing is
the name actors in parts that could have gone to unknowns.  Jonathan
Winters, in his most reserved role in memory, plays the police
commissioner actually fairly well.  Peter Boyle has little to do and
seems along only for the ride.  Andre Gregory is completely wasted as a
minor functionary in The Shadow's network.  Tim Curry makes a weird
villain, but doesn't that go without saying?
     But the real star of the film is New York City of the 1930s.  Not
New York as it was then or ever, but a beautiful, idealized, Art Deco
1930s New York City.  Director Russell Mulcahy, who gave us the great-
looking HIGHLANDER, gives us a stunningly idealized Manhattan of the
mind's eye.  In addition he give us small gratuitous surprises for the
camera including one subjective shot that is almost a roller-coaster
ride in itself.  And a Jerry Goldsmith score is always a plus.
     This may not be exactly the classic radio version of The Shadow,
but it may be more fun.  For the most part it does not contradict the
canon, but it places it in a larger context and fills in many of the
blanks.  There are some changes but there is a lot of filling in of gaps
in some very unexpected ways.  Lamont Cranston is given an evil past
that certainly casts The Shadow in a whole new light.  In fact it adds
complexity to his character over the one-dimensional do-gooder.  While
Batman is essentially out for vengeance against criminals in general,
Lamont Cranston had committed terrible evils and was driven by the need
to make amends.  I am not sure that this is what Walter Gibson had in
mind for his character, but it certainly works.
     The Shadow on radio was a little different from The Shadow in the
pulp magazines and The Shadow in the film is different from either.  I
do not remember any radio references to The Shadow having a network of
agents--I think there was more about them in the pulps.  Even on the
radio he did have his faithful cab driver Shrevie.  The Asian mysticism
that plays a big part in the film version was not usually apparent in
the radio series, though some of the pulps drew heavily on the Asian
origin of the The Shadow's powers.  Perhaps the most interesting
revision to the Canon is to give Margo psychic abilities also.  While
never explained it really adds interest to her relationship with Lamont.
     This may well be a piece of summer fluff, but I found it far more
engaging than the usual superhero film.  For once the power of the mind,
both psychic and reasoning, are as important to a hero as are his
physical powers.  And the image of the tall, crooked-nosed in Fedora and
cape whipping out guns will thrill rather than disappoint fans of The
Shadow.  This is the most I think I have ever enjoyed a "superhero"
film.  I give it a high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.  (Oh, by the way, my
contact with The Shadow has been almost entirely in radio revivals of
the old series.  I am too young to have heard original broadcasts.)

Title
Review for 23 (1998)
     CAPSULE: Two computer hackers from Hanover, Germany, members of
the Computer Chaos Club get involved breaking into the computers of
major companies and of governments.  What starts as a game turns into
an international espionage incident.  The (basically) true story is
told here.  This is the story of the computer criminals that Clifford
Stoll caught as detailed in THE CUCKOO'S EGG.  Rating:  8 (0 to 10),
high +2 (-4 to +4)
   - Directed by Has-Christian Schmidt who co-wrote the screenplay.
   - The other side of Clifford Stoll's CUCKOO'S EGG.  In fact, the
     Nova dramatization would make a very good companion piece.  This
     is the story of the Hanover data bandits.
   - Begins with Karl Koch and his friend David's interest in the
     Illuminatus book by Robert Shea (unmentioned) and Robert Anton
     Wilson (who plays himself in a few short scenes).
   - Karl and David are 19 when taken with the hacker's ethic that
     information belongs to everyone.  They begin breaking into
     corporate and government computers.  A go-between suggests that
     the KGB will pay well for the right information.  From there life
     starts giving them big ups and bigger downs.
   - 23 is basically a morality tale of how the Hanover bandits ruined
     their lives.  With their fascination in conspiracies they actually
     bred conspiracies against themselves.
   - It is hard to keep up with the pace of the story telling.  The
     names are a little hard to follow.
   - It is hard to understand why the hacker's ethic would cause Karl
     and David to ally themselves with the KGB.
   - They use money from their hacking to buy cocaine and only make
     their lives worse.
   - They make obvious errors.  When the landlord no longer seems to
     care whether you are paying rent or not, get the heck out.
   - In tone similar to TRAINSPOTTING.  People trapped by shortsighted
     behavior.
   - The information that the Hanover bandits gave the Soviets was not
     the serious damage.  They stole much of the innocence of the
     Internet.  Imagine a village in which people feel secure and
     nobody locks their doors.  Two kids discover this and start petty
     thefts.  They may not steal much but soon everybody will realize
     they have to put locks on their doors.  Security becomes an
     industry.  That is what the Hanover bandits did to the world of
     computers.

Title
Review for Army of Darkness (1993)
     Sam Raimi's EVIL DEAD was a low-budget horror film that was above
average for its kind.  It combined fluid camerawork (often with undercranked
cameras) and a fresh look at the then over-used concept of the walking dead.
It made a name for Raimi as a director willing to do the unusual.  While
ostensibility the same sort of film, EVIL DEAD II picked up the pacing and
increased the creativity by a large factor.  It was a wild, funhouse sort of
horror film where just about anything weird could happen.  The accent was on
being strange and funny with gooseflesh becoming a low priority.  The film
ended by dropping its main character through some sort of evil vortex into
medieval Europe.
     Determined to play the ball where it lies, the third of the "Evil Dead"
films begins with Ash arriving in medieval Europe and eventually gets him
involved in an epic battle between the living and the dead.  ARMY OF
DARKNESS is another giant leap in creativity, but this time Raimi has gone
too far.  This film shows just how far Sam Raimi has allowed his reach to
exceed his grasp.  ARMY OF DARKNESS is a truly magnificent failure.  The
concept of an apocalyptic battle of the powers of Darkness against the
powers of Light has been toyed with by writers from Milton to
J. R. R. Tolkien and James Blish.  When Clive Barker adapted his CABAL into
NIGHTBREED, he also said what he wanted to do someday--and what that film
gave only an inkling ofwas such a mammoth battle of the Dead against the
Living.  The Raimis (Sam co-scripted ARMY OF DARKNESS with his brother Ivan)
try to tell the story of such a battle, but squander too much of the effect
on cheap one-line jokes, insufficient humor, and images that often don't
work.  The scripting is weak and the camerawork often captures exactly the
wrong mood.  The Raimis could not get their tongues out of their cheeks long
enough to realize they were squandering what could have  been a great horror
fantasy classic.
     Bruce Campbell recreates his role as Ash, who now finds himself caught
up in a "Connecticut Yankee" sort of plot as he prepares for the battle.
However, the Raimis do not have the writing skill of a Mark Twain, so Ash's
programmed response to problems is to use his shotgun or his chainsaw.  When
Ash fouls up a mission to retrieve the NECRONOMICON--the classic book of
evil--he inadvertently looses on the world a battalion of skeletons.  The
Raimis fail to build much excitement about the ensuing battle, playing it
more for giggles than thrills.  And the final sequence of the film, which
seems horribly out of keeping with the rest of the story, is apparently an
afterthought.  The conclusion of the film as shown at the Sitges Film
Festival and reported in the October 19, 1992, VARIETY, was much bleaker but
also probably much more effective than what was shown in local theaters.
     I rate ARMY OF DARKNESS a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale, mostly on the
basis of some good ideas albeit mishandled.  Maybe somebody else will pick
up the idea again.

Title
Review for Hot Shots! Part Deux (1993)
     Being objective in writing a film review is nearly impossible even
under ideal circumstances.  Perhaps major film critics are able to be
objective about the films they write about, but I doubt even that is true.
My approach to the problem is periodically to remind people that I am
writing about one person's experience with a film on one viewing--their
mileage with a film may vary.  Now, while this inescapable subjectivity is
enough of a problem with a film such as HOWARD'S END, it is far worse with a
no-holds-barred comedy such as HOT SHOTS! PART DEUX.  Anybody builds up a
resistance to a style of comedy eventually.  My experience with Monty Python
is that the earliest episodes I saw were, and still are, hilarious; episodes
seen later lack that zing.  Other people seem to have shared this
experience: in spite of seeing episodes in a different order, they also find
that what they saw before they became jaded are funny for them, but not so
much what they saw later.
     HOT SHOTS! PART DEUX is the latest in the sub-genre of film and
television satires punctuated with rapid-fire gags.  I would claim the sub-
genre was invented in 1976 with James Frawley's BIG BUS.  But the sub-genre
came to be led by Jim Abrahams, David Zucker, and Jerry Zucker, who did an
extended skit, "Fistful of Yen," in KENTUCKY FRIED MOVIE (1977).  They made
the 1980 film AIRPLANE!, and the 1981 television series "Police Squad."  One
or more of the triple has been involved with many similar comedies since.
Abrahams without the Zuckers directed BIG BUSINESS and WELCOME HOME, ROXY
CARMICHAEL, then returned to the AIRPLANE! style with the original HOT
SHOTS! and now HOT SHOTS! PART DEUX.
     HOT SHOTS! PART DEUX begins by parodying, almost to the point of
remaking, the first part of RAMBO III.  However, the problem is not in
Afghanistan but in Iraq, where Saddam Hussein is holding American hostages
and several teams of would-be rescuers, including Col. Denton Walters
(played by Richard Crenna), an old commander of Topper Harley (played by
Charlie Sheen).  (Trivia question: what was the inspiration for Col. Denton
Walters's name?)  Topper Harley leads the rescue attempt.
     Of course, a good deal of the fun is noting the film and/or television
allusions and/or rip-offs.  There are nice bits borrowing from CASABLANCA,
LADY AND THE TRAMP, and a particularly clever gag on APOCALYPSE NOW.  But
how funny is the film?  I would say it is funnier than the "Naked Gun"
films, but not as funny as AIRPLANE! or HOT SHOTS!  But again, what is and
is not funny is very subjective.  I give HOT SHOTS! PART DEUX a low +1 on
the -4 to +4 scale.  (Avoid the closing credits if you have not seen THE
CRYING GAME.)
     [Trivia answer: Richard Crenna played Walter Denton on radio and
television in "Our Miss Brooks."  His character was a dim-witted teenager
who talked as if he had peanut butter on his tonsils.]

Title
Review for Pacific Heights (1990)
     Law favors the tenant.  Nobody likes to see people thrown out on the
street where they have no place to go.  It is generally assumed that the
landlord if better off than the tenant, so in many states the law favors the
tenant.  This does not seem to be a very likely fact on which to base a film
thriller.  Most of us have heard horror stories about landlord/tenant
relations with one side or the other doing monstrous things, but that sort
of horror story is rarely made into a movie.  It is much easier to make and
sell a horror film about, say, a vampire, than it is to make one about
rental relations though I somehow suspect there are more bad tenants in the
world than there are vampires.  In the past real estate horror has generally
been mixed with comedy in films, as in the classic MR. BLANDINGS BUILDS HIS
DREAM HOUSE and its recent pale shadow, THE MONEY PIT.  So PACIFIC HEIGHTS
gets points for some originality and even some clever plotting.
Unfortunately, both seem to run out about two-thirds of the way into the
film.  Then the film starts showing us things we've seen before and finally
falls into cliche.  And contrived cliche at that.
     Patty Palmer and Drake Goodman (played by Melanie Griffith and Matthew
Modine) are two young people starting out life together buying a house and
renting out the first floor as apartments.  Think of them as minnows.  And
as their new tenant they have attractive, persuasive Carter Hayes (played by
Michael Keaton).  Think of him as a shark.  Carter does not just know his
legal rights as a tenant; he understands how to use those rights in
intelligent and creative ways to grind up and swallow his unsuspecting
landlords.  And all the while he is doing this grinding, the law is on his
side and pulling for him.
     Had this been a film about a monster whose powers were all granted him
by the law, PACIFIC HEIGHTS could have been a terrific thriller that would
have been making a powerful statement.  Unfortunately, at some point someone
decided that Carter Hayes would be more than a crooked tenant: he would also
be a psychopath.  It may be the first horror film about real estate law
ever, but it is probably the second or third film with a psychotic villain
this month.  When the psychotic side of Hayes becomes more important than
his legal savvy, PACIFIC HEIGHTS just falls apart.  The screenplay is Daniel
Pyne's first and is inspired by his own experience as a landlord.
Presumably he had an axe to grind.  Curiously, his screenplay starts
faltering only when he stops grinding it.  I give PACIFIC HEIGHTS a low +1
on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Emma (1996)
     EMMA is an exquisite recreation of early 19th century country
life.  Seeing one scene after another is like looking in on historical
rooms recreated in a museum.  It is not that every scene is ornate, but
each has a feel of authenticity.  One almost feels that a guide taking
the viewer around the room and telling the viewer what each of the
items is might have been nearly as interesting as having the actors
play out the scene.  And at the end of the film one almost feels that
might have been a better use of time.  I am afraid that it will take
some effort to convince me that this is really a better story than even
INDEPENDENCE DAY has, as boorish as that might sound.
     As is frequently the case in a Jane Austen story, EMMA is
concerned with the vitally important issue of which of Ms. Austen's
generally shallow characters will marry which others.  Especially of
interest is how will Austen's main heroine get together, after some
tribulation of course, with the man who it is so obvious from the
beginning is the perfect choice for a husband.  At least in SENSE AND
SENSIBILITY the main character was in some ways admirable.  The self-
satisfied Emma Woodhouse (played by the elegant Gwyneth Paltrow) is
merely attractive and rich.  I rather hoped through the film that there
might be some semblance of a morality tale here and Emma's meddling
would lead to her not getting her Mr. Right.  Of course, that is not
Austen's style and in the end Austen arranges that there is no
permanent damage done by Emma.
     Mr. Right in this case is Mr. Knightly (played by Jeremy Northam),
Emma's sister's brother-in-law.  And Knightly really is knightly.  He
is the voice of conscience and the advocate of restraint ("Better to be
without sense than misapply it as you do.") as Emma goes madly running
about trying to run the lives of all her friends.  Her best friend is
Harriet Smith (Toni Collette), afflicted with just average looks.  And
worse, she is afflicted with a friend like Emma.  The persuasive Emma
has decided that a local farmer who is interested in Harriet is not
good enough to marry Harriet.  Emma decides to quash that match and to
instead set up a marriage with Reverend Elton, the local rector.  Soon
two eligible unmarrieds come on the scene.  One is the callow Frank
Churchill (Ewan McGregor of TRAINSPOTTING), stepson of Emma's governess
and confidant.  The other is Jane Fairfax (Polly Walker, who had far
more engaging roles in ENCHANTED APRIL and RESTORATION), niece of the
region's second ranking busybody.  Soon all the wrong people are
attracted to all the wrong people from Emma's point of view.
     The novel was adapted to the screen and then directed by Douglas
McGrath and some of the film has some undeniably witty moments.  The
acting is all sufficiently convincing.  Gwyneth Paltrow looks
extraordinarily long-necked and elegant.  Jeremy Northam would look
very good except for the fashions of the day that seemed to go in for
extraordinarily large hats and other exaggerated clothing features.  It
is something of a surprise to see Greta Scacchi in a smaller role as
the ex-governess.  Also a familiar face is Juliet Stevenson of TRULY
MADLY DEEPLY in a small role.  More than once I found the sets
upstaging the action with apple-filled harvest scenes, Christmas party
scenes, crocheting rings, and views of odd decorations on yard
furniture.  In fact, there is little in this film that is not top-notch
but the story itself.  (I have to admit, I did like the film better
than the recent CLUELESS, loosely based on the same novel.  But at
least there it was easier to like the main character in CLUELESS
because the results of her actions would have been less permanent.)
The only thing really wrong with EMMA is Emma herself.  With a main
character that there was some reason to care about, this could have
been a much better film.  I give it a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Eyes Wide Shut (1999)
     The way to become rich in the American entertainment industry is
to give the public what it wants.  Evidently what the public wants is
to see Nicole Kidman nude.  Last season Broadway offered NICOLE KIDMAN
NUDE: THE PLAY, officially titled THE BLUE ROOM.  The draw of this play
was apparently from all the publicity that one got with the price of a
ticket a quick look at Nicole Kidman starkers.  And free with the look
you got a reputedly mediocre play about sexual mores.
     But most of the country could not get to Broadway to see this
theatrical indelicacy.  Now no less a filmmaker than the late Stanley
Kubrick brings to the screen NICOLE KIDMAN NUDE: THE MOTION PICTURE,
officially titles EYES WIDE SHUT. The film is not based on THE BLUE
ROOM--it just happens to be another story about sexual mores.  Kubrick
himself is no stranger to the act of bringing heavenly bodies to the
motion picture screen.  But I do not remember another film that has so
titillated the audience into wanting to see the body of a major
character since GODZILLA.  And in fact, Kidman does show off her body
so frequently and so gratuitously in the early part of this film we can
only conclude that she has decided she likes doing it.  The irony is
that her character's nudity and even her sexuality is only tangential
to the main line of the plot.  Most of the scenes of nudity, the first
one being a good 60 seconds into the film, are added totally
gratuitously.
     As the film opens successful young physician William Harford (Tom
Cruise) and his wife Alice (his wife Kidman), a stylish and wealthy New
York couple, are preparing to go out for the evening.  They are going
to a Christmas party at the palatial home of the well-connected Victor
Ziegler (Sydney Pollack).  When they get to the party both Harfords
find themselves being seduced by other guests. William is set upon by
two young models, Alice by a somewhat older Hungarian Lothario (Sky
Dumont) who quotes Oscar Wilde as if the wit was his own.  The Harfords
each resist, but the tension later causes a rift in their marriage that
has them each questioning their relationship.  But that disagreement is
only the background for the central action, a bizarre chain of
incidents sparked by a chance meeting at the party.
     That evening the Harfords have a sort of sophomoric argument on
sexuality that does little more than show that both William and Alice
are each in their own ways naive about sex.  Kubrick allows the
argument, and much that follows it, to go on way too long.  With 2001:
A SPACE ODYSSEY Kubrick started pacing his film more slowly.  Going
counter to the trend of films moving faster, Kubrick has made the
pacing of his films more deliberate and occasionally more textured.  In
this pacing some points get really belabored.  A few of his sequences
seem to go on much too long and his storytelling is characterized by
foot-dragging.
     EYES WIDE SHUT is not in all ways a well-directed film in spite of
the Kubrick name.  Cruise's acting style seems limited to facial
expression.  There is little emotional impact in his performance.
Kidman goes through a wider emotional range more believably, but still
there is nothing impressive done here.  Ironically Spartacus and
Varinia in SPARTACUS make a more compelling couple than William and
Alice played by an actual husband and wife in EYES WIDE SHUT.  Stanley
Kubrick's final film surprises the viewer with an engaging thriller
plot involving a sinister forces having their roots in history.  There
are some surprising problems with the film but it is not without its
moments of delight.  I rate it a 7 on the 0 to 10 scale and a low +2 on
the -4 to +4 scale.
     Spoiler... Spoiler... Spoiler... Spoiler...
     The society that we see portrayed in this film is almost certainly
based on one that did exist, though the original probably died out in
the middle 18th century.  The original is popularly called the Hellfire
Club (though members called themselves "The Monks of Medmenham") and it
was for a time an important force in European, and particularly
British, politics.  Like the society that Kubrick shows us here it was
a secret society; even most members may not have known who the other
members were.  The secret society combined satanic mysticism--either
real or feigned, probably some of both--and orgies.
     The founder and leader of the secret society was Sir Francis
Dashwood, an influential Member of Parliament and eventually Chancellor
of the Exchequer.  It is not known with any sureness who else was a
"monk."  One person who it is strongly rumored was a member or perhaps
only an honorary member but a repeated guest was Benjamin Franklin.
The Earl of Sandwich was certainly also a member. (As an aside, if his
name sounds a little funny the latter was not surprisingly also an avid
gambler.  His unwillingness to leave the gaming table to eat caused him
to invent a food concoction more portable than a plate of food.  He
would grasp a piece of meat in the hand between two slices of bread.
And that's the origin of the "sandwich" and of its name.)
     Other members of the Hellfire Club included painter William
Hogarth and politician John Wilkes.  The club met and had their orgies
and their strange ceremonies at Medmenham Abbey.  Meeting at the chapel
of the abbey and at the West Wycombe caves near the Dashwood estate,
the club held strange ceremonies and orgies very much like the ones we
saw in the film.  For more information, read
http://www.blather.net/archives3/issue3no1.html.

Title
Review for Crying Game, The (1992)
     [Spoiler comments follow main review.]
     At an amusement park in Northern Ireland, English soldier Jody (played
by Forest Whitaker) has a good-looking local girl on his arm.  They go off
to be alone and suddenly Jody finds there are three men holding guns on him.
The IRA has kidnapped Jody.  They will kill him if the IRA prisoner held by
the English is not released.  Jody is brought to a hiding place.  There he
begins the slow task of picking out one of his captors and trying to make
him an ally.  He chooses Fergus (played by Stephen Rea).  Jody shows Fergus
a picture of his girlfriend Dil (played by Jaye Davidson).  Little do Jody,
Fergus, and Dil know how the one action has bound them together.
     THE CRYING GAME is a film for you to go to see ... quickly.  Don't read
any more reviews.  This is a tough film to review without revealing any of
the plot twists.  Word is going to get around soon about this film.  See it
first.  And don't tell anyone else either.
     THE CRYING GAME was written and directed by Neil Jordan, who previously
directed and co-wrote MONA LISA.  The similarities will be obvious.  Each
film has an intelligent script that lulls characters and audience alike into
one set of assumptions, then turns those assumptions inside out.  The two
films have much the same visual style.  Jaye Davidson and Cathy Tyson are
both sexy and attractive in much the same way.  In both cases the main
character is a white male in love with the beautiful centerpiece of the film
across racial lines.  And in fact it seems unimportant that it is across
racial lines, though each comes from a fairly racist culture.  This film and
MONA LISA each has a delightful sense of irony which in THE CRYING GAME
extends to the music over the end credit sequence.
     The two black stars both have to be surprisingly versatile in this film
and each manages.  Forest Whitaker (GOOD MORNING, VIETNAM!; CRIMINAL
JUSTICE; and A RAGE IN HARLEM) is an odd choice to play an English soldier.
His accent rings very true to my admittedly non-British ears.  Jaye
Davidson's performance will be the best remembered of the film probably.
The part calls for Dil to go through some major changes and Davidson is
always to the mark.
     The film did not quite make sense in that neither of the people would
have been sent to prison.  In either case it was self-defense against a
person who had been involved in a previous IRA killing.

Title
Review for Casino (1995)
     Following the structure of a classical tragedy, CASINO chronicles
in fascinating detail the rise and fall of Sam "Ace" Rothstein, the
mob-assigned manager of a prestigious Las Vegas casino.  Martin
Scorsese co-wrote the screenplay with Nicholas Pileggi, basing it on
Pileggi's novel.  The two previously co-wrote GOODFELLAS, based on
another Pileggi novel.  (Pileggi also co-wrote the screenplay for the
upcoming CITY HALL.)
     CASINO has an epic length, just short of three hours, and while
the central plot advances slowly the film is filled with the engrossing
details of what is involved with the running of a major casino as well
as telling a complex yet never confusing story.
     Ace (played by Robert De Niro) is a consummate gambler who does
his homework for bets in painstaking detail.  His skill has earned
enough for the Kansas City Mob that they reward him, a non-Italian Jew,
by letting him manage the Tangiers Casino.  This is a position in which
he can get very powerful while becoming very rich.  In the job he
really comes into his own as a perfectionist who oversees all the
details, some unsavory, of running the high-profit show.  Ace
reluctantly allows his friend since childhood Nick Santoro (Joe Pesci)
to come to Las Vegas and to get involved with the Tangiers.  Ace also
falls for a beautiful hustler, Ginger McKenna (Sharon Stone).  Neither
turns out to be a good decision.  Nick is a loose cannon thug with a
volatile temper.  He will do whatever it takes to get money and power.
Even as Ace's power and prestige increase, the seeds of his downfall
are being sown by idealistic but questionable decisions.  Ace's
marriage and over-generosity to Ginger, his trust of the uncontrollable
Nick, and his unwillingness to rehire the incompetent brother-in-law of
a local official all lead to major trouble.  As he and Nick narrate,
each self-righteously defends his own actions.
     Robert De Niro is fine as Ace, though the character is well within
the range of characters he has played before.  Pesci's violent thug is
very much the same character he played in GOODFELLAS, though perhaps
with a shorter fuse here and with more of a penchant for cruelty.  The
actor who really shows us something new is Sharon Stone, whose descent
into alcohol, cocaine, and rage is her most effective screen role to
date.   As an apparent joke, the deeper addicted Stone gets, the more
she is made up to look like Michelle Pfeiffer.  James Woods is around
playing his usual slimeball character.  Don Rickles is surprisingly
effective in one of his rare serious roles.
     Scorsese's style with this film is fresh and new, though not all
of his touches really work perfectly.  The film starts near the story's
end with Ace in a car bombing and blown through a strange credit
sequence with impressions of the lights of Las Vegas.  The sequence is
strange and the floating through of De Niro in what looks like a car
ejection seat is very odd, indeed, almost reminding one of Fellini.
The sequence was created by Elaine and Saul Bass.  Saul Bass was one of
the classic credit sequence designers of the 1960s.  Scorsese does use
violence more often than in previous films.  And what is there is very
strong stuff and is not for the sensitive.  Borrowing a touch from
FORREST GUMP, the film is seasoned with popular music of the 1970s,
often as a commentary on the story.
     The whole package is a riveting account and a well-told story.
Though the script does not always play absolutely fair with the
audience, the small cheats help lead to unexpected plot twists.  No
film I have seen this year has a better shot at a Best Picture Academy
Award.  I give CASINO a low +3 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Devil in a Blue Dress (1995)
     It's a hot summer night in L.A.  Somewhere across town Philip
Marlowe is getting too close to the truth.  And he is also getting a
mouthful of knuckles for his trouble.  But that doesn't matter here
because this story is about Easy Rawlins.  And Easy isn't even a
private dick.  Not yet anyway.  Right now Rawlins is just another
factory worker from Texas who likes to go around in a sleeveless
undershirt.  In fact, he is not even that.  He's had a little hard luck
so Douglas Air is building their airplanes without his help, and he is
trying to get by without their paycheck.  With a bank account that's
crawling under a duck, perhaps Easy is getting a little careless about
whom he lets pay him and what he has to do for the money.  In 1948
L.A. that just isn't Einstein-caliber thinking.  So maybe his job
tonight does smell like yesterday's fish, but at least it is easy
enough and pays enough.  Too much, in fact.  Easy is looking for the
mayor's missing girlfriend.  Losing her is making the mayor feel so bad
he's not even going to run for reelection.  That's what the newspaper
says.  But somebody thinks she has a taste for black men and is hanging
out in Easy's part of town.  Easy is getting a C-note just for the
looking for her.  But the next few days are going to get tough as a
one-dollar steak for Easy.  He is going to be involved in murder and
gunplay and crooked politicians.  And he isn't even a private dick.
Yet.
     Holding the megaphone was Carl Franklin of ONE FALSE MOVE.  That
film showed Franklin had a taste for the rough stuff.  But this job
didn't call for quite so much.  Maybe some gunplay.  What it called for
was late '40s atmosphere.  For that he got Tak Fujimoto, a good man
with a camera.  And Fujimoto lathered the '40s feel on like he had to
use it up.  He had shot Denzel Washington before on the PHILADELPHIA
job.  Washington slipped into the role of Easy like it was a suit cut
just for him.  But muscling in on his scenes is Tom Sizemore, whose
creepy panache grabs the eye like a zoot suit at a monastery.  Lagging
behind is Jennifer Beals as a femme fatale, playing it stiff as a rusty
gate hinge.
     DEVIL IN A BLUE DRESS was the first of Walter Mosley's Easy
Rawlins novels, and Franklin wrote the script as if the series was a
meal ticket he was expecting to punch again.  While Franklin's telling
of the story gives it some twists, they seemed not so much after seeing
THE USUAL SUSPECTS with a plot that's tangled like a five-year-old's
first fishing line.  But Franklin is playing the first Easy Rawlins
story with just some easy-to-take twists and some openings like he is
hoping to be invited back.  Easy is not just a black Philip Marlowe.
Mosely and Franklin give him a simple charm and the sly smarts to make
him a character worth seeing again.  Not so welcome is Rawlin's
sidekick Mouse, played by Don Cheadle.  Mouse is a loose cannon with a
looser gun and has all the appeal of green mold on a stick of butter.

Title
Review for Mimic (1997)
     Guillermo del Toro was an unknown new director in 1994 when his
CRONOS played the arthouse circuit.  It turned out to be a fresh and
arresting take on the vampire film.  Mexican horror film to that point
had a reputation for shoddy production values.  Del Toro brought a
fascinating no-holds-barred morbidity to his work that made the film
rich and memorable.  He is back with his second film and he proves to
be just about the only filmmaker in the world who could have pulled off
a giant insects in the subway plot and turn it into a film worth
watching.
     Three years ago a deadly disease carried by cockroaches was
killing and crippling children.  The approach to kill all the
cockroaches was to create a sterile cross between a praying mantis, a
termite, and a cockroach that would kill off cockroaches and then die
off itself.  Dr. Susan Kyle (Mira Sorvino) was the entomologist who
created the new insect.  The approach seemed to work perfectly, but now
Kyle is seeing signs of a new insect in the subway tunnels that could
be more dangerous than the original disease.  But there is something
else going on.  Strangers seem to be running around the city furthering
the ends of the insects. They are shady characters who seem to inhabit
the dark corners of the city.  And they have a special interest in
Dr. Kyle.
     This is an odd role for Academy Award winning Sorvino.  At base
this is an overly familiar story.  Science has created a monster and
now a few people have to fight it.  Sorvino could certainly have chosen
a film with a more original and less cable-fare-like plot had she
wanted.  But in this second film del Toro shows us exactly what his
strengths and weaknesses as a filmmaker will be.  He does not have
really original plot ideas.  Here he takes a short story by classic
science fiction writer Donald A. Wollheim, but still turns it into a
familiar plot.  But the only film with a comparable style is his
CRONOS.  He has a marvelous way of keeping secret that this will be a
story that has been done before.  His telling is atmospheric and not
quite linear.  He creates perhaps too many characters, certainly at the
beginning, but the major characters are fairly unique.  Most
interesting is a small boy who may be a genius and who may be retarded,
but we are never sure which.  Del Toro has carefully distorted color to
heighten the ominous atmosphere.  He plays with light and darkness
preferring the latter.  If the obvious is inevitable, at least del Toro
keeps it at bay for a good long time.
     If del Toro's work is to be compared to any other filmmaker, I
would choose film producer Val Lewton.  He makes terrific atmospheric
B-pictures that are better than most of the A-pictures around.  Both
take the familiar and imbue it with a sense of real dread.  I would
give this second effort a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     The who premise behind the title sounds like one that would come
from Donald A. Wollheim, but it is faulty.  It is true that insects and
other creatures with a short generation time mimic their predators.
But this is only with frequent contact with the predators.  It is not a
mystical process, but natural selection, a form of evolution.  We would
have had to been killing off a lot of six-foot insects in the subways
before by chance some would look like humans and that would render them
some protection.  There is a lake in Japan where the crabs have backs
that look like masks of humans.  After a great battle was fought on the
lake fishermen who pulled crabs from the lake would throw back the ones
whose back look vaguely like human faces, thinking them to contain the
souls of those killed in the battle.  Over hundreds of years the only
crabs that were safe were those that had really good renderings of
masks.  A species whose predator did not constantly select for
resembling itself would not come to resemble its predator.

Title
Review for Shirley Valentine (1989)
          Capsule review:  A promising and well-written start
     leads to a rather bland romantic comedy in an exotic setting.
     While Shirley is unhappy, she is clever and endearing and
     funny.  Unfortunately, her wish to visit Greece comes true
     and the story founders.  Rating: +1.
     SHIRLEY VALENTINE is a film about a woman who started out to be
remarkable, lost her way, and became very ordinary, only to find herself and
become remarkable again.  The film itself starts remarkable, becomes
ordinary, but fails to become remarkable again.  The play upon which the
film was based had just one woman on stage talking about her experiences but
the film decides to be more cinematic and actually dramatizes the incidents.
     At 42, Shirley is a mousy little housewife taken for granted by her
working-class husband and her two grown-up but less than totally mature
children.  We see her in her daily life of drudgery in which any deviance
from her normal routine is seen by her family as rebellion.  She reminisces
about her slightly wild youth and wonders how that adventuresome schoolgirl
got buried in the routine of drudgery.  Deep inside she longs to go to
Greece and sit by the sea sipping wine.  These early parts of the film, set
in England, have a warm humor and good writing.  Finally Shirley gets her
chance to go to Greece and the writing goes flat.  We have a tepid and
predictable romantic comedy of her Greek fling.  There are still a few nice
humorous scenes, but not enough to compensate for the staleness of the
material.
     Pauline Collins is likable in the title role, repeating the part she
created on the London stage.  (Ellen Burstyn played the same role in New
York, perhaps with not so thick an accent.)  The play was by Willy Russell,
who wrote the film EDUCATING RITA.  That film's director, Lewis Gilbert,
also directs this film.  Somehow EDUCATING RITA's paean to culture seemed
like something that had to be said.  In spite of some clever writing, in
SHIRLEY VALENTINE Russell seems to be saying nothing less banal than "You
cannot please everyone so you have to please yourself."  For those who need
that homily reinforced this film may seem profound.  My rating is a
disappointing +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Dead Man Walking (1995)
     I like a film that gives me questions rather than answers.  I like
a film that can show conflict without making one side the villain.  I
like a film that fairly shows two or more sides of an issue without
telling me which side I should choose.  There were two films like that
this year, curiously both about dedicated but independent-minded
members of the Catholic clergy who come into conflict with their
communities.  The earlier one was Antonia Bird's PRIEST and now comes a
film that is in some ways similar, Tim Robbins's DEAD MAN WALKING.  The
newer film is based on Sister Helen Prejean's 1993 book of the same
title, an account of her relationship with a Death Row inmate.
     Sister Helen (played by Susan Sarandon) is a nun who lives among
the poor of the St. Thomas Housing Project of New Orleans doing her
view of good.  Her order does not wear the habit in spite of occasional
disapproval and pressure from other members of the Catholic clergy.
Sister Helen receives a request from death row inmate Matthew Poncelet
(Sean Penn) to help him submit an appeal of his death sentence.
Poncelet was convicted of the murders of a dating couple committed
while he was under the influence of drugs and alcohol.  While taking a
dislike to the man's bigoted views, Sister Helen offers him help.  When
his execution date is actually scheduled, she agrees to be his
spiritual advisor and becomes the first woman ever to take on that role
in the prison.  But her support of Poncelet brings her into conflict
with the parents of the victims of the crime.  Sister Helen determines
to visit them, to try to offer them solace, and to try to understand
their point of view.  Only then does she get an understanding for the
degree of the damage that the crime has done.
     Sister Helen finds herself embroiled in more controversy.  To the
Catholic chaplain of the prison, her mission is to convince Poncelet to
take the holy sacraments.  She is startled to realize that this is what
the chaplain means when he talks about saving Poncelet and that her
definition of saving him is quite different.  The film has Sister Helen
follow the proceedings until they are resolved.  Her efforts to help
the racist are detested by the victims' parents and by the community.
     Tim Robbins, who scripted as well as directed, has captured many
different viewpoints in the film, an approach much more common in
documentaries than in narrative films.  He shows the effect the planned
execution has on the family of the of the inmate and the effect of the
crime on the families of the victims.  He shows the Church's
perspective and that of the community.  Occasionally there are little
digs at one point of view or another, but they are far more mild than
one would expect from the creator of the film BOB ROBERTS.  In the end
perhaps the strongest opinion he expresses is that capital punishment
does little to help the people who have been most hurt by the crime.
     Susan Sarandon is a good actor though not one of what I would
consider to be our first rank of powerful actors.  She does, however,
choose her roles carefully and wisely and then contributes a lot to the
films in which she is cast.  She has Orson Welles's ability to lend
respectability to a film just by being in it.  This role was not a real
stretch for her or for Sean Penn, but both play their roles with
genuine authenticity.  The real surprise is Raymond J. Barry as the
murdered boy's father who gives the most moving performance of the
film.  R. Lee Ermey, as the woman victim's father, can add one more
insensitive, angry male to his portfolio.  It is a part that he plays
well, but too often.  You may remember him yelling his way through the
first sequence of FULL METAL JACKET.  He played almost the same role in
the TV series "Space: Above and Beyond," as well as voicing the leader
of the little green soldiers in TOY STORY.  A few other cameos are
present, including Clancy Brown as a traffic cop who seems in the film
only to deliver one joke.
     DEAD MAN WALKING is a provocative, well-made film on a
surprisingly intelligent level.  Rate it high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Sweet Hereafter, The (1997)
     Atom Egoyan makes complex that often fit together like puzzles.
His EXOTICA was a complex story that was never complete until the final
scene made sense of things.  THE SWEET HEREAFTER is not so tightly
wound, but it is very tightly bound emotionally and still a puzzle.
With this film Egoyan takes a close hard look at a cold British
Columbia town in mourning after almost an entire generation of its
children was wiped out in a tragic school bus accident.  As the
community tries to heal itself and carry on after the loss it is
visited by a smooth and vaguely sinister lawyer.  Mitchell Stephens
(played by Ian Holm) implants in the minds of the townspeople that what
is called for is not peace but a vengeful class action lawsuit.  He
convinces the locals that their should be no forgiveness for the guilty
and that whenever there is an accident of this sort, there is always
somebody who is guilty.  There is always somebody who should be made to
pay. He is the lawyer that they want to get them that payment and he
will keep only a third for himself.
     In the hands of a lesser director Mitchell could easily be reduced
to being a one-dimensional devil.  The script, written as well as
directed by Egoyan, based on the novel by Russell Banks, dissects that
character of Stephens.  Stephens has a daughter on drugs and willing to
do any self-destructive action to spite her father. For this daughter
Stephens feels an icy helplessness and a sort of frozen rage.  Icy and
calculated are all of his reactions in an Oscar-worthy performance.  In
the course of the film we learn a great deal about him and where and
how he lost his emotions.  A major theme explored in this film, and
there are several, is things that are out of people's control and
feelings of utter helplessness.  There is some fascination with the
understated way that Stephens does his job.  He searches for the
parents who can best make a winning case for him and are the most
susceptible to being won over.  He also carefully checks them out for
weaknesses that could harm his case.
     Egoyan has some nice stylistic moves.  The bleak Canadian winter
seems to pervade the entire film and reflect the coldness of the people
in the town who have isolated themselves from their emotions.  The icy
weather acts upon people and performs its own mischief including the
central tragedy of the film. Conversations in the film are anything but
volatile.  People seem to think out their next response with notable
pauses in the conversion.  Then the film returns again and again to the
theme of the Pied Piper.  On one level the town has lost its children,
disappearing not into a hole in a mountain that closes up but into a
hole in the ground that also closes.  On another level the grief of the
parents has made them vulnerable to the outsider who wishes to lead
them to where they might not otherwise not want to go.  Egoyan holds
off on showing the viewer the actual accident until late in the film.
He shows it with a frightening simplicity. No dramatic music.  The
school bus just skids over the curb on a hill and out of sight slips
down a hill onto a frozen pond where it slowly sinks.  But it has a
greater emotional impact than some of the fiery crashes we have seen
elsewhere this year.
     This is a film I expect to see on several best of the year lists,
including my own.  I suspect that it will not be remembered at Oscar
time, being a modest Canadian film, but it certainly is one of the best
of the year and will be on my top then list.  I rate it a +8 on the 0
to 10 scale and a high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Score, The (2001)
    CAPSULE: This is a 1950s or 1960s style heist film, set in the 
    present.  Robert DeNiro stars as a risk-adverse safecracker 
    who wants to retire form crime but takes one last job at the 
    request of a personal friend (played by Marlon Brando).  Edward 
    Norton plays a hotshot young sharpster who is also in on the 
    crime.  The plot is mostly straightforward suspense with little 
    nonsense.  Rating: 7 (0 to 10), +2 (-4 to +4)
I am sure I must have seen almost the identical plot before.  This 
is a heist film made for an adult audience who probably wanted a 
crime film like they had seen in theaters when they were teens.  
There are no superhuman acrobats taking nosedives off of buildings 
like in ENTRAPMENT.  There is no rock score.  There are no ballet-
like martial arts.  This is just a basic heist film with a decent 
and distinctly credible and un-flashy script.
Nick (played by Robert DeNiro) is a safecracker who has managed to 
be successful by never taking risks.  If a job is not a safe bet 
(pun intended), he backs out.  Sometimes even the safe bets turn 
out not to be so safe.  When one job very nearly goes wrong Nick 
is unnerved enough to decide that it is Nature telling him that it 
is time to get out of the game.  He returns to his home in 
Montreal where he owns a jazz club, and decides to manage it full 
time.  He proposes to his girl friend Diane (Angela Bassett).  She 
has one condition.  He must stay retired from crime.  But before 
the deal can be cemented, Max, a Montreal kingpin and personal 
friend, has one last supposedly easy job for Nick.  Nick wants no 
part particularly because the heist will be right in his hometown 
of Montreal.  More and more details seem to complicate the job.  
Nick's partner in the crime is to be a smart, but uncontrollable 
young crook, Jack (Edward Norton).  Jack treats a locked front 
door like a welcome mat, even at his associates' homes.  The young 
crook is a know-it-all who seems good at everything he does but at 
avoiding rubbing people the wrong way.  Together they plan to 
steal a priceless historic artifact from the Montreal Customs 
House.
The script by Kario Salem, Lem Dobbs, and Scott Marshall Smith 
works like an episode of the old "Mission Impossible" television 
series.  We see pieces of the heist being put together, last 
minute changes, and things that go wrong, much like a good episode 
of "Mission Impossible."  This team might not be bad choices to 
write scripts for the Tom Cruise "Mission Impossible" films.  The 
complications are, however no more and no fewer than are needed to 
make the story believable.  The telling is cold and noirish, which 
is just what it is supposed to be.  Director Frank Oz, the voices 
of Yoda and Miss Piggy proves surprisingly good at directing a 
serious crime film.
THE SCORE has a more than adequate cast with little flashy or 
scene-stealing acting.  Edward Norton probably has the flashiest 
role and even that is low-key by today's standards.  He plays what 
is nearly a double role.  Jack pretends to be a brain damage 
victim to be hired for a job in the Customs House.  One nice (?) 
character I have not mentioned is Stephen (Jamie Harrold).  
Stephen is a master hacker who lives in his mother's basement in a 
house with a lot of screaming in both directions.  He seems like 
the last person the risk adverse Nick would want to depend upon.
The film itself remains low-key up until the time of the climactic 
heist.  Then the pace really picks up.  Before that the plot even 
stops twice for jazz interludes.  Though Oz never lets the music 
steal time from the story the way Woody Allen does in SWEET AND 
LOWDOWN.  On the subject of music, the score of THE SCORE is by 
Howard Shore.  It adds tension to the suspense scenes, but never 
seems to have much of a melody.
Angela Bassett is the one misused celebrity in a totally minor 
role that should have been played by a less famous actress who 
needed a break.  She has nothing to do in the film but demand that 
Nick give up crime and to look like an attractive reward if he 
does.  Speaking of being attractive THE SCORE seems to be 
attracting an older audience who learned to appreciate much the 
same sort of film in the 1950s and 1960s.  It does the job.  I 
rate it a 7 on the 0 to 10 scale and a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.  

Title
Review for Devil's Advocate, The (1997)
     Kevin Lomax is one terrific lawyer.  He has an uncanny way of
sizing up prospective jury members and knowing who will be sympathetic.
Sixty-four cases in Florida and he has not lost a case.  It does not
matter if the defendant is guilty or innocent, good guy or scumbag--if
Kevin prosecutes the defendant is found guilty; if he defends, the
verdict is innocent.  People start to notice.  Someone who has noticed
is John Milton, the head of a prestigious and extremely powerful New
York law firm.  Milton is a slick and charismatic lawyer.  He is in bed
figuratively with the rich and powerful.  He is in bed literally with
sleek and the sexy.  And his gifts to those he likes are nearly
everything that are really worth having.  Impressed with Lomax and his
wife Mary Ann (Charlize Theron), Milton is anxious to bring Kevin into
the firm, to use his genius, to pay him in money, with a palatial
apartment, to see Kevin's every sexual fantasy fulfilled. Mary Ann is
at first overjoyed at the success her husband is having and is willing
to give up some of his time and his intimacy for the success that is
everything she could not get back in Gainesville.  But a bit at a time
she discovers that her husband is making too many sacrifices of what
she shared with him and giving it to the firm.  Kevin never worried
about being a scrupulous lawyer in the past, but this job is taking too
much of a toll on his soul.  As he gets pulled deeper and deeper into
defending the guilty, Mary Ann is slowly disintegrating and Kevin is
powerless to stop it.  THE DEVIL'S ADVOCATE is a good old- fashioned,
well-plotted horror film in the style of the horror films of the 60s
and 70s.  No geysers of blood or crazed stalkers.  The first half hour
could be from a John Grisham novel.  Then weird things start happening.
The law firm seems to have its hands in evil, not just figuratively,
but also literally.
     In the past I have not been fond of Keanu Reeves's acting which I
generally find wooden.  Here perhaps that quality works to his
advantage, both to contrast to Al Pacino and to present the feeling
that there is something mysterious going on in his mind that we cannot
quite fathom.  And if there is not quite enough going on the screen
with Reeves's performance, there is more than enough supplied by
Pacino.  Pacino is far more expressive in part because his character
can afford to be.  He gives a high-energy performance that would steal
a scene from a puppy.  There are, however, two scenes in the film when
he turns the performance up too high and he goes into overload mode.
One is a pivotal scene involving the character played by Jeffrey Jones;
the other time is an extended scene very near the end of the film.
Both times his performance gets to be just a bit overripe.  Charlize
Theron is rather nice as the incredible dissolving wife. Also nice to
see is an uncredited part by the always watchable Delroy Lindo.  The
acting is all brought together by Taylor Hackford, who previously did
the under-rated THE IDOLMAKER, as well as AN OFFICER AND A GENTLEMAN
and DOLORES CLAIBORNE.  The set design by Roberta J. Holinko is very
nice with some really memorable artwork.  Other effects by Rick Baker
are perhaps not up to some of his finest, but are still very worth
seeing.
     This may not be the most intelligent film of the autumn season,
but it stands among the best horror films we have seen on the screen in
the last few years.  I rate it a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Dark City (1998)
     It was a dark and ominous night.  The city was a dangerous place
that had no pity for the weak.  An alien race "older than time" but now
on the brink of dying out had came to the city to observe humans hoping
to learn something that would enable them to save themselves.  John
Murdoch awoke in a bathtub to find he had no memories and there was a
murdered woman nearby with mystical symbols carved into her body.
Somewhere a clock was striking midnight.
     The images and the ideas come and go almost that fast in DARK
CITY.  This is a film that owes its style not so much to other films
but to European New Wave comic books.  A new idea or a piece of visual
excitement flashes by the viewer at a rate of about two a minute.  This
is certainly an impressive style of film-making but it does carry with
it a risk.  In a story in which anything can happen at any time it is
hard to care what is happening at any moment.  DARK CITY will never be
remembered as a thumping good story, but the film has other rewards.
Stylistically the film is a lot like CITY OF LOST CHILDREN or BRAZIL,
but without the sympathetic characters of those films.  So the dynamic
of the film is not to make the viewer feel much empathy for the
characters but just to wonder what will happen next, what will it mean,
and what will it look like.  In fact, the city itself is the most
engaging and certainly the most dynamic character of the film.  The
city looks like something out of the 30s and it is invested with
aliens, human-looking but pale and hairless dressed in black bowlers
and black fur-collared coats like the aristocratic gangsters in Fritz
Lang's M.
     Alex Proyas wrote the story, co-wrote the screenplay, and directs.
His CROW was a nimble translation of comic book style to the wide
screen.  DARK CITY goes much further in his stylistic experiments.  In
rapid flashes his story piles idea on idea without stopping longer than
a quick muse to think about the implication. The viewer and the
characters is doused in a shower of plot complications and new ideas
with little time to consider them.  As one complains "I have a jigsaw
puzzle in front of me and each time I rearrange the pieces it still
doesn't make any sense."  But as with THE BIG SLEEP, what is most
important is not the understanding of the plot but in the going along
for the ride.  This is a study in mood and texture and a very different
sort of science fiction film from STARSHIP TROOPERS.
     But visually the film is often stunning.  The city has a film
noir-ish feel that fully reflects the title.  Rufus Sewell of COLD
COMFORT FARM and DANGEROUS BEAUTY does not get much chance to register
much emotion besides bewilderment.  He becomes a sort of place-holder
and a cipher in more ways than one.  Keifer Sutherland is a terrific
half-mad scientist who might have been at home in DR. X.  Jennifer
Connelly is terrific in the scenes as a torch singer, but registers the
same lack of depth as Sewell otherwise. William Hurt is a Bogart-like
police inspector with nearly the same style.  Rounding out the cast are
the always enjoyable Richard O'Brien and Ian Richardson as white-faced
aliens.
     This is a film with the texture of nightmare.  It does not pay off
in ways that most films do so it will appeal only to a narrow audience.
But for what it is it is very nicely realized.  It certainly is one of
the most enjoyable surprises of the new year.  I rate it a 7 on the 0
to 10 scale and a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     I wonder if I am the only viewer to see strong parallels between
this film and Harlan Ellison's OUTER LIMITS episode "The Demon with a
Glass Hand."  (I rather suspect that Ellison will.  But then he managed
to convince a jury that TERMINATOR borrowed from his "Soldier from
Tomorrow" story rather than the more obvious choice of the science
fiction film CYBORG 2087.)

Title
Review for Of Mice and Men (1992)
     My introduction to John Steinbeck's OF MICE AND MEN was a terrific
television production with Nicol Williamson as Lennie and George Segal as
George.  Envy me.  At least as far as I am concerned no other production has
been as moving.  Steinbeck's very short novel is one of the greatest tragic
stories of world literature, ranking (in my opinion) almost up to Hugo's LES
MISERABLES.  And it is probably shorter than Hugo's chapter on the Paris
sewers.  Actually, on my last reading--about a year ago--it occurred to me
that what I was reading was not a novel at all, but a play in paragraph
form.  There is only minimal description in the novel, enough to set the
scene, and the rest if dialogue.  As I have heard subsequently, it was
originally a play by Steinbeck and he later rewrote it in paragraph form.
This 1992 adaptation is at least the fourth non-live version I have seen.
Supposedly the classic version, but one I have not cared much for, is the
1940 film with Burgess Meredith and Lon Chaney, Jr.  Nor was I fond of the
1981 television movie version with Robert Blake and Randy Quaid.  Having
seen three versions already that are close to the book and having read the
book who knows how many times, I find it hard to rate the film as if it is a
new story.
     Now I am not going to tell you the plot of OF MICE  AND MEN.  If you do
not already know, your assignment is either to read the book--it will take
you only an hour or so--or to see the movie.  Suffice it to say that Lennie
Small (played by John Malkovich) is anything BUT small in stature, though he
does have the mind of a child.  He travels with George Milton (played by
Gary Sinese), a reasonably sharp thinker who for reasons not immediately
apparent chooses to partner with Lennie.  What really drives the
relationship is part of what this story is about and told sparsely and with
eloquence by John Steinbeck.
     Sinese, who also directed the film, does a fine job as George, a part
that could easily be overshadowed by that of Lennie.  Sinese has starred in
stage versions of both OF MICE AND MEN and THE GRAPES OF WRATH.  Somehow
Malkovich manages to look like a giant playing Lennie and at the same time
gives the part more personality than it has had in the past.  Neither Ray
Walston as Candy nor John Terry as Slim manage to look as grizzled as their
characters call for, though Walston still carries off his role.  Terry is
just too handsome and young to be slim, in my opinion.  But a lot of this
film really is just too pretty for the film's own good.  It seems too
pleasant to "buck" barley in these golden surroundings.  One violent scene
is just too bloody really to make sense.  Horton Foote's screenplay leaves
most of the book intact but like the 1981 version adds sequences to the
story.  Any variation from the novel seems out of place, since the novel is
so near to being a script.
     By most measures this is a very good adaptation of a great book.  It is
a wonderful story that is an essay on loneliness and pain.  It is the only
film that literally brought tears to my eyes this year.  As an adaptation of
an often-dramatized novel, I give it a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.  But if
you do not know the story, *rush* to see this film.   Then read the book.

Title
Review for Abyss, The (1989)
          Capsule review:  A science fiction and adventure film
     that just misses a +4 rating.  Alistair-MacLean-type action
     combines with 2001-type vision to make a whale of a film that
     blows BATMAN right out of the water.  Rating:  high +3.  If
     only it had more interesting science fiction ideas.
     [Note:  THE ABYSS is a fairly long film at 140 minutes.  Enough happens
that it would be impossible to say much about the film without revealing a
surprise or two.  I will try to keep my comments general enough to avoid
marring the enjoyment, at least for some one who has seen other reviews--
still, I wouldn't want to read what follows before seeing the film.]
     THE ABYSS has two kinds of scenes: exciting scenes where suspense is
building and exciting scenes where there is slam-bang action.  And they must
have about equal screen time.  As such, it may well out-Lucas the "Star
Wars" films.  In style most of the film resembles less fantasy films than
films in the Alistair MacLean tradition.  In fact, embedded in this long
film is really a normal-length MacLeanesque adventure that would not even be
science fiction.  Not that MacLean adventures are not somewhat far-fetched
themselves.  And like a MacLean film THE ABYSS is not above throwing in the
occasional far-fetched coincidence to keep the story going.  But the pacing
and adventure-plotting are reminiscent of a film such as THE GUNS OF
NAVARONE or ICE STATION ZEBRA.  The action is not even delayed for opening
credits; the film starts under a single opening title and we cut directly to
the action.  The U. S. S. Montana, a nuclear submarine, has picked up
something unusual on sonar: a very fast-moving craft.  They see it
accelerate to over 130 knots before the sub is physically grasped by
something.  They are freed, but not in time to avoid piling into the edge of
the Cayman Trench.  A team of civilian divers from a nearby oil driller is
brought in by the Navy to try to rescue any survivors.  The chief diver is
Bud Brigman (played by Ed Harris), a strong-willed commander in the process
of divorcing the designer of the drilling facility, Lindsey Brigman (played
by Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio).  The antagonistic couple, a team of four
Navy SEALS, and the divers go to the site of the downed sub.  But there is
something else there, an apparent intelligence--perhaps alien, perhaps
indigenous--that is watching the mission with marked curiosity.
     The script of THE ABYSS shows definite James Cameron touches.
Cameron's films usually feature strong, intelligent, self-reliant women and
never more so than in THE ABYSS with its character of Lindsey Brigman.  The
dialog is crisp, but also very humanizing.  As usual, Cameron's heroes are
common, blue-collar types.
     One of the virtues of a good science fiction film can be to make
technology comprehensible.  THE ABYSS uses state-of-the-art technology--such
as recently developed breathable fluid that will allow exploration of
greater depths.  It also required new technology to be developed simply to
allow the film to be made.  In this category are diving masks designed to
let the camera see who is behind the mask, but which coincidentally also
allow a much wider field of vision for the divers than previously available.
     Like BATMAN, this film also had a large budget and was kept very much
under wraps until its release.  BATMAN turned out to be a film that was
visually fascinating, but which short-changed the story elements.  THE ABYSS
is rumored to have a pricetag of $43 million and, unlike in BATMAN, there
are no big-name stars to soak up large pieces of the budget--or rather there
is one, but it is the Atlantic Ocean, and shooting underwater made the film
much more complex to produce.
     As with any major film that has been kept under wraps, THE ABYSS has
generated a certain amount of rumor.  One rumor on the positive side is that
Hugo-winning science fiction author Orson Scott Card participated strongly
in the scripting.  He supposedly was on the set to ask the actors, "Ignoring
the script, what would you do in this plot situation?"  The next morning the
revised script would have the character doing just what the actor wanted.
And Card would add his own science fiction influence so that it is at least
claimed that THE ABYSS ranks with THINGS TO COME and 2001 for the degree of
participation of a science fiction author in determining plot.  A second and
more negative rumor is that the life form was much better explained in the
pre-release (and in Card's novelization) but that the film was cut by 25
minutes, down to 140, to make it more marketable.  In the cut the real logic
of what is happening was considered to be the dispensable portion.  (This is
strongly rumored to be what happened to the film HIGHLANDER, also from
Twentieth Century Fox.)  Cameron denies that any logic was cut from the film
and says instead that where Card's book varies, it is purely Card's
invention.
     But even as it stands, THE ABYSS is one of the best science fiction
film ever made.  This remains true in spite of a rather superficial
treatment of the some of the science fiction elements.  It is very much a
2001 with all the slowish parts replaced by a good fast-paced adventure
film.  It is entertaining, educational, and exciting, and has compelling
(albeit manipulative at times) drama.  All it lacks is a sufficiently
engaging concept.  Perhaps that was left on the cutting room floor, perhaps
not.  I would give it a high +3 on the -4 to +4 scale.  It could not do much
better than that.

Title
Review for Horse Whisperer, The (1998)
     At one point in THE HORSE WHISPERER magazine editor Annie MacLean
(played by Kristin Scott Thomas) looks at a proposed cover and says
something like "The photo is perfect, the cropping is perfect, and the
layout is perfect.  It's dull.  Do it over."  Don't get me wrong.  THE
HORSE WHISPERER is a good film and not dull, but that quote comes
pretty close to pointing to the film's biggest weakness.  The story is
just a bit straightforward and obvious.  There are no surprises to
anyone who sees the trailer and makes all the obvious extrapolations.
Richard LaGravenese who wrote the screenplay for THE BRIDGES OF MADISON
COUNTY co-wrote the screenplay here also and it shows.  Robert Redford
co-produced and directed as well as taking the top-billed role of Tom
Booker.
     Annie MacLean is an editor on a high-profile magazine.  She has
what she thinks is a happy marriage to lawyer Robert MacLean (Sam
Neill) and a daughter, Grace (Scarlett Johansson) just 13.  And Grace
has a horse, Pilgrim.  One icy day Grace is riding with a friend and
their horses slip on a slippery hill.  In a nightmarish scene they role
and slide right into the path of an oncoming truck.  The friend and her
horse are killed outright.  Pilgrim is injured about as badly as a
horse can be without it being fatal.  Grace loses a leg. Distraught
over her daughter in the hospital, Annie refuses to that the
irreversible step of letting the veterinarian put down the suffering
Pilgrim.  Weeks later the result is a daughter and a horse, both of
whom have lost the will to live.  The maimed horse is wild and the
daughter just simpers and resents her mother's cool detachment.  Grace
retreats into the surrogate life of television watching.  The pressure
of bottling up her emotions makes Annie even more pushy and intolerant.
     Annie decides that what is needed is to have acknowledged horse
expert Tom Booker bring her daughter and Pilgrim back together.  When
Booker refuses to come to New York to look a the horse, over Grace's
and Robert's objection Annie buys a trailer and drives across country
to Montana with Grace and Pilgrim with the goal of getting Booker to
reunite Grace and Pilgrim.  It is a long siege and Annie gets to know
Booker's family and the people of the sparse Montana range.  Naturally
Redford's character is a real man with a natural no-nonsense view of
life that spreads oil on all troubled waters.  Tom is a man who always
knows the right thing to say and makes it look easy.  Annie had hoped
for a dual healing experience of curing Grace and Pilgrim, but she
herself changes as much as either of them and becomes a fuller person.
     In the wrong hands Nicholas Evans's novel could be a maudlin and
over-romantic opus, but Redford is, in fact, more talented as a
director than he is as an actor.  If anything the film is too polished.
THE HORSE WHISPERER may be a little heavy on the perfect landscape
shots.  This is as good a place as any to note that coming from
Touchstone/Disney the photography will probably also show to its best
advantage.  More than any other studio, Disney tries to release prints
on high-quality film stock.  A print may collect scratches after it is
out of Disney's hands, but there will be very few blotches flashed on
the screen because Disney Studios did not cut corners on quality.  The
score by Thomas Newman uses instruments appropriate to the Montana
setting.
     The casting is as polished as the photography with some very
respectable names.  Perhaps Redford himself may be getting a little old
to be playing romantic leads at 61 and his age is starting to show in
his face. Kristin Scott Thomas, best known for THE ENGLISH PATIENT, is
an attractive and intelligent actress. Sam Neill is another good actor
who in this film has too small a role.  Rounding out the cast are Diane
Wiest and Chris Cooper.  Overall this film does not do much that is not
predictable from the earliest parts of the film, but it tells its
romantic story well.  I rate it a 7 on the 0 to 10 scale and a +2 on
the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Paper, The (1994)

Title
Review for Rajio no jikan (1997)
     CAPSULE: Very funny TV-like situation comedy of people trying to
put on a live radio play and having to change the plot many times mid-
broadcast.  The territory it covers is very, very much like the
American cable TV show "Remember WENN."  Somehow the plot seems a
little thin for a feature film, but still a lot of fun.  Rating: 6 (0
to 10), 1 (-4 to +4)
   - Written and directed by Koki Mitani.
   - Staff of radio station is putting on an amateur play that won a
     contest.  Turns out that this was really the only entrant in the
     contest.
   - The play is not screened by all parties involved and the initial
     changes are to correct the redundancy of "lift up."  A prima donna
     actor insists on a name change.  This is the first spark of a
     firestorm of plot changes.
   - Story within story gets more and more contrived and absurd.
   - Story could have been done on American Movie Channel's "Remember
     WENN."  In fact something very similar probably was done.
   - Some of the contrivances of getting around restrictions on the
     script are fairly humorous.
   - Fairly believable set of script changes.  Director said that all
     had happened at one time or another to him when working at a
     station.  A good reason why radio drama is taped.

Title
Review for Fight Club (1999)
     On the heels of AMERICAN BEAUTY, one dark satire of American
suburban life, comes a far grimmer satire of lower class society and
anger.  Chuck Palahniuk's premier novel is brought to the screen as a
howl of rage by David Fincher, director of ALIEN 3, SE7EN, THE GAME,
and the upcoming RENDEZVOUS WITH RAMA. FIGHT CLUB is about a subculture
of men who have turned their backs on soft supportive philosophies and
meaningless consumerism and have replaced it with hard knuckles and
covert terrorism.
     As the film opens, the narrator of the film (Edward Norton) has
someone unseen holding a gun in his mouth.  He begins to think back
over the previous six months to how he came to this pass.  In flashback
he has been a man suffering from insomnia, living in a constant
netherworld between awake and asleep.  He complains of the malady to
his doctor.  His doctor belittles him and suggests that if he wants to
see what real pain is he should visit a testicular cancer support
group.  Under an assumed name, the narrator pretends to be a fellow
sufferer and soon finds he really enjoys going to and giving support to
the patients.  He begins going every night a week to a different
disease encounter group.  Then he notices Marla Singer (Helena Bonham
Carter) who shares this voyeuristic hobby.  They begin to barter which
support groups each may cover. In a different setting, he meets Tyler
Durden (Brad Pitt) a soap salesman and film projectionist who is
fighting his own war guerilla against society.
     When a mysterious explosion destroys the narrator's apartment, he
arranges an invitation to stay with Durden who asks for one thing in
return.  He wants to fight the narrator.  The narrator surprises
himself by enjoying the experience. This becomes a frequent habit
replacing encounter groups.  As other men come to watch the two fight,
they want to fight also, forming a common bond.  Durden and the main
character found a secret society that stages fist fights.  Eschewing
the old life of soft self-sacrificing support of others, membership in
the macho fighting society starts changing all of the narrator's
perspectives.  All that is real is the world where men fight
emasculation and prove their strength by the friendly beating of each
other.  They then wear their injuries as proof they are manly.
Eventually this underground counterculture will add to its agenda the
sowing of chaos and anarchy.
     Jim Uhls's script is frequently bitterly funny, but fails to
connect the various themes together.  The catalog-buying consumer
culture seems so little to touch the lifestyle of Tyler Durden that his
rage against it seems unmotivated and almost could have been added by
the writers as an afterthought.  Even if Durden is to use it as a
symbol of what he is fighting the film needs to tell us why that symbol
of superficiality rather than, say, architecture or vacation homes. The
text chillingly examines the bestial impulses in man and suggests that
we are a long way from breeding them out of the species.  The main
character is saddled with opposite impulses "to comfort the afflicted
and to afflict the comfortable."  In theme and even somewhat in plot
this film could be compared to, of all things, THE STRANGE CASE OF DR.
JEKYLL AND MR. HYDE.
     Jeff Cronenweth's photography features an agile and dizzying
camera flying the viewer around and through holes where Orson Wells
would fear to go.  Virtually every scene in the movie is underlit to
reflect the theme and create a repressive tone.
     This film seems a not entirely directed howl of anger.  It is
technically flawed, but coming in the wake of rage crimes like
Littleton it could not be more timely.  I rate it a 7 on the 0 to 10
scale and a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Raising Cain (1992)
          Capsule review:  Bizarre Gratia Bizarre.  Brian De Palma
     directs his own not-ready-for-primetime script.  He sew
     together big swaths from PEEPING TOM, PSYCHO, and others,
     then does not have the plot thread to hold them together in a
     decent story.  Very much a lesser effort of a decent
     filmmaker.  Rating: low 0 (-4 to +4).  (Warning: some
     spoilers occur in this review.)
     At one point Brian De Palma was a clever and innovative filmmaker.
PHANTOM OF THE PARADISE is a terrific tour de force.  Arguably it was De
Palma who put Stephen King on the map with his excellent adaptation of
CARRIE.  De Palma also proved he could do Hitchcock thrillers as well as
Hitchcock himself.  In fact, when De Palma's OBSESSION played concurrently
with Hitchcock's FAMILY PLOT, I claimed it was OBSESSION that Hitchcock
should have been prouder of.  I also think that in spite of some of the
obvious faults, SCARFACE is probably the most exciting gangster film of the
last ten years.  But De Palma borrowed too often from Hitchcock, and his
films like BODY DOUBLE became too predictable.  Also he was the wrong
director for BONFIRE OF THE VANITIES.  You have to be very careful giving an
escapist director a film of social comment.  Now he is back with a non-
Hitchcockian thriller that he wrote himself., but he is making a mess of
things.  (It may be overstating things to call it his script; De Palma
heavily plunders other films such as SYBIL and PEEPING TOM.)
     Carter Nix (played by John Lithgow) is a child psychologist who so
loves his baby daughter that he has taken two years off of his practice just
to study her.  In fact, he constantly has cameras on her so that she never
has a private moment.  (Yes, a directed steal from Michael Powell's PEEPING
TOM.)  But we find out very quickly that Carter is stealing babies for a
psychological experiment.  His wife Jenny (played by Lolita Davidovich)
knows nothing of this and is carrying on her own secret life (with the
accent on "carrying on").  The first mild absurdity happens in the first
sixty seconds of the film, when a friend (played by Teri Austin) offers
Carter and daughter a ride and just happens to have a spare baby seat in the
car.  This is only a tiny absurdity and De Palma could have explained it,
but chose not to in order to condition the viewer to accept larger and
larger absurdities without explanation.  The climax of the film is a
flabbergasting lulu requiring precise split-second timing to convince the
audience that no events as shown could ever occur on planet Earth.
     De Palma's script makes clear that he did not have enough story to fill
a film.  While the RAISING CAIN length of 97 minutes is not actually
outlandishly short, the film is only that long due to a lengthy sequence
that is nothing but a throwaway adding zilch to the story but a gratuitous
car accident.  At some point this film was probably written to be a tour de
force for John Lithgow playing multiple roles, but in fact he just gives
weak impressions of James Spader and Max Von Sydow (with exaggerated Swedish
accent while playing a Norwegian).  This new film makes De Palma appear to
be no so much raising cain as just being less able.  I rate it a low 0 on
the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Belle époque (1992)

Title
Review for My Dog Skip (2000)
     Roger Ebert talks about going into MY DOG SKIP expecting it to be
just another animal film and being won over by it.  It reminded him of
his dog when he was growing up.  I have to say my experience was just
the opposite.  I admit I happen to like a good sentimental animal story
and particularly a dog story.  Growing up I also had a dog, Sam, whom I
loved very much.  And before, during, and after my experience of
growing up with Sam I thoroughly enjoyed dog films.  Not just the big
famous ones like OLD YELLER, but I still get misty over GOODBYE MY LADY
and the 1959 A DOG OF FLANDERS.  More recently I enjoyed SHILOH.  And
it was in this vein that I went into MY DOG SKIP actually expecting to
like it, even if other people would think me silly.
     Quite to my surprise, in spite of expectation and good reviews, it
is not a good dog story.  And for one very important reason.  For a dog
film to work, the dog has to be believable.  I consider a dog to be a
very intelligent animal, but not like Skip.  Skip does things that I
cannot believe any dog would do.  In one scene, Skip's master Willie is
supposed to be playing football, but freezes up when the ball falls at
his feet.  Sizing up the situation, Skip the wonder dog runs forward,
picks of the football in his teeth and jumps into Willie's arms.  Also,
several times in the film Skip plays matchmaker, getting his young
master together with a cute little girl.  A dog is an intelligent
animal, but it is too hard to believe he is that intelligent.  Too
often when we should be drawn into the story we feel the presence of
Skip's trainer just out of camera reach.
     Growing up in Yazoo, Mississippi, in 1942 is not easy for Willie
Morris (Frankie Muniz).  Willis is something of a loner anyway, picked
on by the local bullies.  Willie does not make friends easily.  His
closest friend was his next doors neighbor, Dink Jenkins (Luke Wilson)
a local sports hero.  But Luke went off to war and Willie is lonely and
virtually friendless.  Willie cannot think of a single friend his own
age to invite to his birthday party.  And Willie desperately needs
friends.  Willie's father Jack (Kevin Bacon) seems to have lost any
human warmth he had along with a leg in the Spanish Civil War.
Willie's loving mother Ellen (Diane Lane) sees her son's loneliness and
wants to get the boy a dog.  But Jack absolutely refuses.
     Of course, we know that eventually Willie will get his dog, but
what is unexpected is how having Skip changes Willie's life so
completely.  Through the dog's ministrations Willie proves himself and
befriends the local bully who formerly preyed on him.  Skip also
arranges to have the prettiest girl in school spread a fondness from
Skip to Willie.
     The film chronicles Willie's adventures with Skip.  Seeing a
newsreel about the Canine Corps, Willie becomes obsessed with giving
his best friend away to the military effort.  (Somehow this seems
unlikely but possible.)  In another subplot, Dink returns from the war
somewhat less a hero than he had been in local sports.  Skip will in
his way also help Dink.  The film frequently repeats an anti-violence
message as warfare and hunting are shown to have as ugly a side as is
possible to show in a family film.
     Frankie Muniz as Willie Morris has to hold the film together as
much or more than Haley Joel Osment did in THE SIXTH SENSE.  He has an
expressive face without the exaggeration that a Macaulay Culkin.  Diane
Lane is a little idealized as a mother, but less so than the dog.
Kevin Bacon seems a little young for fatherly roles.  William Ross's
score is sentimental and pleasant, though in one action scene seems a
little too close to John Williams's style.
     Perhaps some leeway is acceptable for sentimentality, but this
film was a little too hard to believe at face value.  This is an
acceptable dog story but not one of the best.  I rate it 6 on the 0 to
10 scale and a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Silent Partner (2001)
SILENT PARTNER is a two-person play adapted to the screen with 
virtually no dialog from anyone but John and Bill (played David 
Field and Syd Brisbane).  They are two lowlifes with dreams who 
live mostly on borrowed money and spend it on beer and the 
occasional bet at the dog track.  Through thick accents and 
drunken talk we follow them as they have a shot at the big time.  
A shady kingpin, Alex Silver, sees them at the racetrack and 
decides to use them in a scheme involving dog racing.  Silver 
wants John and Bill to buy a greyhound, care for her, and race her 
locally.  He will give them the money to tend the dog in return 
for 70% of the dog's winnings.  The drunken pair name the dog 
"Silent Partner" after Silver's role in the deal.  Bill develops a 
genuine affection for the dog.  Bill's outings training the dog 
are some of the few scenes where we see him sober and we see John 
sober in even fewer, yet Bill lets John run the show and allows 
himself to become almost a silent partner.  John never doubts he 
has what it takes to swim with the sharks.  Through the alcohol 
haze John thinks he is smart and worldly, though frequently his 
skill seems limited to knowing whom he can hit up for one of the 
ever decreasing loans.  The two have little social life without 
each other and it rarely is at anyplace but bars, the track, the 
squalid filthy house, and the occasional peep show.  People like 
John and Bill are unusual subjects for film, thank goodness. 
The timing of the dialog is a little too perfect to be believed as 
the two talk with nearly perfect timing.  The Daniel Keene's 
dialog, based on his own play, is unnaturally perfect, much as 
David Mamet might craft it.  Mamet might also approve of the 
underbelly society and grimy settings.  Director Alkinos 
Tsilimidos filmed SILENT PARTNER almost linearly to create more 
natural emotions from his actors, but he kept crew ignorant of the 
script to aid in spontaneity.  The film was shot for an amazing 
$7000 US. 
Technically, the film is probably a comedy but it is not the kind 
of comedy that generates laughter.  More frequently it is just an 
exercise in bitter irony.  The songs by Paul Kelly are, like the 
dialog, a little too perfect.  In some cases the songs give away 
plot that is coming.  Americans will likely have some problems 
picking up the entire dialog.  That can be a problem since 
Silver's plan is never clearly explained. 
SILENT PARTNER is a bitter black comedy delivered in a thick 
inebriated Australian accent.  I rate it a 6 on the 0 to 10 scale 
and a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale. 

Title
Review for Benny & Joon (1993)
     There is a sort of film that works really well for a very narrow
audience and will leave almost everybody else wondering, "What was that all
about?"  It is a film with a narrow band of powerful appeal.  One of the
films that I thought really spoke to me was HAROLD AND MAUDE (1972).  Other
were JOHNNY GOT HIS GUN (1971) and KNIGHTRIDERS (1981).  One that missed me
entirely was BIRDY (1984).  I think I can see what others like about BIRDY,
but the film does not work very well for me.  Another film that just does
not do it for me is BENNY & JOON.
     Benny (played by Aidan Quinn) has no time for a life of his own.
Benny's life is split between his auto repair business and taking care of
his sister Joon (played by Mary Stuart Masterson).  Joon is ... well, Joon
is somewhat different.  Perhaps writer Barry Berman intended Joon to be
schizophrenic, though it is never actually said that is the case.  Whatever
her problem is, she spends her table passionately painting, setting things
on fire, placing emergency calls to Benny to pick up peanut butter,
directing traffic with ping-pong paddles and snorkel--that sort of thing.
     Then Joon loses a poker game and for Benny to pay off, he has to take
in a second person whose mental processes are different from the norm, Sam,
the cousin of a friend.  Sam (played by Johnny Depp) is barely literate but
has patterned himself on Buster Keaton and Charlie Chaplin.  He dresses like
Keaton and can even mimic Keaton's inventive style of seeing unconventional
uses for everyday objects.  The tension of the story comes from Joon's
doctor wanting to institutionalize Joon, Benny wanting to keep Joon around,
Joon wanting to keep Sam around, and Benny wanting to be rid of Sam.
     Where the story does not work for me is on the contrivance and in the
view of mental illness.  With the exception of short bouts of panic, Joon
appears to be on a perpetual high.  Sam's illness appears to make him a
comic genius--though most, and for all I know, all, of his routines are
borrowed from silent films.  Sam's illness increases his creativity and the
film arranges for the right props to be at the right place and time to be
used.  The film says that mental illness has its positive side and that like
in MANHUNTER and THE SILENCE OF THE LAMBS, only the mentally ill can
understand the mentally ill.  The film is an interesting attempt but I rate
it only a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.
[Viewed at the Hazlet Multiplex Cinemas, Hazlet, NJ.]

Title
Review for Family Business (1989)
     Sidney Lumet is one of the best of American directors.  His record
includes films such as TWELVE ANGRY MEN, FAIL-SAFE, DOG DAY AFTERNOON, and
NETWORK.  It would be hard to match for intensity films such as EQUUS or
what may be his most powerful film, THE PAWNBROKER.  But somehow something
went very wrong with FAMILY BUSINESS, a crazy-quilt patchwork that falls
apart at the seams.
     The first and most unlikely matching is of Sean Connery, Dustin
Hoffman, and Matthew Broderick as three generations of the same family.  At
least one review tells me the novel that the film was based on has everyone
being Irish-American.  If that is true, and even if not, it represents an
appalling sacrifice of credibility for box-office appeal.  The whole story
lies under the cloud of this initial foolishness.  Grandfather Jessie is
Irish, his son Vito is Sicilian, and his grandson Adam is Jewish.  It was
left ambiguous but Jessie's mother may have been Cherokee.  Jessie is a
career criminal who led his son Vito into crime.  Vito, however, eventually
broke with his father, married a Jewish woman, ran a meat provision company
that he not so secretly hated, and raised a Westinghouse scholar, Adam.
Adam, however, is rebelling from his father and wants to follow his
grandfather into crime, starting with the unusual robbery of a biological
research facility.
     While the film is marketed as having substantial comedy, nobody seems
to have told director Lumet.  FAMILT BUSINESS is a crime drama without very
much comedy.  Even then the actors are mismatched since neither Broderick
nor Connery is equipped or prepared to match the intensity of a Dustin
Hoffman performance.
     Somewhere Lumet seems to have lost control of the theme of the film.
The film becomes a defense of crime.  It is full of likable criminals who
hawk stolen goods at Irish wakes.  The nasty people in this film are people
who deal in real estate and lawyers, and big corporations, each of whom is
made to look worse than the others.  Lumet seems to be saying that Adam
should go into likable crime because legal professions are all immoral.
     In spite of Hoffman's performance--the only aspect that prevents this
film from getting a much lower rating--I would give this film a 0 on the -4
to +4 scale.  FAMILY BUSINESS is bad business.

Title
Review for Barton Fink (1991)
          Capsule review:  Very strange but supremely well-crafted
     film from Joel and Ethan Coen.  The Coen Brothers have the
     best batting average in Hollywood.  They have made four films
     and each of the four is highly recommended.  During a bout of
     writer's block (which they obviously got over) writing
     MILLER'S CROSSING they wrote this strange film about a young
     playwright facing writer's block in Hollywood.  Great
     performances, great photography, strange film.  Rating: +3
     (-4 to +4).  (Spoiler follows the main body of this review.)
     Joel and Ethan Coen have managed to do what no other American film
makers have been able to do.  Even Woody Allen turns out the occasional
misfire.  Allen is extremely creative and the really creative take chances.
Sometimes they win, sometimes they lose.  The Coen Brothers have made four
films: BLOOD SIMPLE, RAISING ARIZONA, MILLER'S CROSSING, and now BARTON
FINK.  Each has been a totally original film and each has been spell-
binding.  They have made four winners out of four.  If they made TEXAS
CHAINSAW MASSACRE 6, every tuxedoed film critic in the country would be
waiting in hushed excitement to see TEXAS CHAINSAW MASSACRE 6.  Well, the
concept of a chainsaw film at least sounds like it might have some action.
But the idea of a comedy-drama about writer's block sounds like it is asking
too much of even the Coen Brothers.  What could be less cinematic than
writer's block?  It is something that is internal and creates no visual
sparks for the viewer.  Well, believe it or not, the Coen Brothers have made
a fascinating and entertaining film about writer's block.
     In the early 1940s, a great new social playwright, Barton Fink (played
by John Turturro) has had his first play produced.  It is a moving story
about the sort of fishmongers he saw around his home on Fulton Street in New
York.  For a moment he has fame and that is just what he does not need.  A
Hollywood studio chief who has never seen his play wants the status of
having Fink writing his pictures.  With the force of big money he plucks
Fink out of New York and lays him down in Hollywood.  Fink has a tremendous
fire in his belly to help humanity ("What do you do for a living?"  "I try
to make a difference.").  But instead of a social drama he is given the task
of writing a wrestling film for Wallace Beery, much like Clifford Odets
wrote GOLDEN BOY.
     Fink looks at Hollywood like a baby looking through the bars of a crib,
with a combination of amazement and a lack of comprehension.  It was as if
he had suddenly been transported to another world.  So that he will not lose
touch with the common man he decides not to stay in glitzy Hollywood hotels,
but at the economical and just slightly sleezy Hotel Earle.  The Earle is
just beginning to fall apart and boasts a staff that looks like the living
dead.  There in his room Fink sits trying to write a great film to make a
difference for the common man--which will also be a wrestling picture for
Wallace Beery.
     One paragraph comes out of his typewriter and then nothing.  His
overwhelming drive to write is blocked by a symphony of minutiae.  His room
seems to become a living breathing creature.  Some law of conservation
maintains always exactly one mosquito in the room. The walls digest the glue
that holds on the wallpaper.  Then there is Charlie Meadows.  John Goodman
plays Charlie Meadows, who starts as a distraction, a noisy neighbor, and
becomes Barton's only friend and confidante.  Barton writes about the common
man, but we get the feeling he has never really known one, in spite of his
Fulton Street origins.  Barton's play was literary and eloquent, but not
very realistic.  Charlie *is* the common man.  The two make a stark
contrast.  Barton pulls everything he has inward in a tighter and tighter
ball--even his hair seems tense.  In contrast, Charlie lets everything out.
He is outspoken; he oozes sweat and occasionally pus.  His belly bulges and
casually rolls out and over the top of his pants.  And Barton is fascinated
by the casual, unashamed animalness of his new friend.  The scene shifts
from his hours in the hotel trying to write and talking to Charlie to the
weird alien world of the Hollywood studio.  The studio life is back-stabbing
politics (it is Barton's bad luck that the studio boss likes him, we are
told and later come to believe).  At the studio we meet weird people with
whom Barton hilariously fails to connect.  And Barton meets W. P. Mayhew,
one of America's great writers, who has in recent years been sucked dry by
Hollywood like a fly in a spider web.  He meets and is attracted to Audrey
Taylor, Mayhew's highly personal secretary.  And thereby hangs a tale.
     Many of the faces in BARTON FINK will be familiar to most viewers.
Turturro is here in his second Coen Brothers film.  His role as Bernie in
their MILLER'S CROSSING will probably be the one for which he will be best
remembered in years to come, though this performance probably equals that
one.  Another respected film maker, Spike Lee, has featured Turturro in no
less than three films.  John Goodman is also a repeat Coen Brothers actor,
having played Gale Snopes in RAISING ARIZONA.  He is, of course, well known
for theater, film, and television work.  Michael Lerner and John Polito (the
latter of MILLER'S CROSSING) are incredibly boorish and weird as the studio
chief and his favorite yes-man.  Judy Davis of MY BRILLIANT CAREER, A
PASSAGE TO INDIA, and the recent IMPROMPTU plays Audrey Taylor.
     Coen Brothers' films are strong on good dialogue, but they also have a
marvelous visual style that perfectly creates an atmosphere.  As with
MILLER'S CROSSING, their period feel in BARTON FINK is almost too rich to be
believed.  Here they bring us a  sepia-toned 1940s worlds.  The credits are
shown over brown 1940s wallpaper that prepares us for the claustrophobic
story to come.  When we see the hotel room itself, it is decorated with
perfectly placed slabs of light--sunlight reflected off dust in the air.  It
is a pleasure to watch a film as carefully crafted as this one.  Peculiarly,
there is one very bad continuity error and one it is hard to imagine was
missed in the editing.  Toward the end of the film we see a man in a
military uniform.  The ribbons on his chest seem securely in place and
falling off in alternate shots.  That one surprising fluff aside, this film
is a visual marvel.  Academy Awards are really deserved here.
     My first reaction after seeing Barton Fink was that watching this film
was like watching an expert gymnast on a trampoline who jumped just
perfectly but came down wrong.  When this story seems to be slowing down
late in the film, it is only to allow it to make an acute left turn, one
shockingly unexpected.  On consideration, I think that is a sort of self-
referential touch.  The most common and banal of genres in Hollywood today
is the psychotic killer film.  BARTON FINK is a psycho-killer film as it
would have been written by Barton Fink.  Fink knew he was writing a
wrestling film all along but kept the wrestling to a minimum and even then
wanted to do a different take on wrestling.  That is just what the Coen
Brothers do with the psycho-killer plot.  Alfred Hitchcock showed a psycho-
killer film could become a genuine classic.  It took the Coen Brothers to
make one good enough to win the Golden Palm at Cannes.

Title
Review for Waterworld (1995)
     In 1989, when there seemed to be no end of films about psychotics
terrorizing people, one such film was made that really stood out.
Phillip Noyce made DEAD CALM which set the same basic plot on water.  A
seaman and his wife are menaced when they rescue a stranger from a
sinking yacht.  The seaman finds himself having to salvage the sinking
boat and use it to pursue his own boat to save his wife.  DEAD CALM was
interesting on an intellectual level as well as being a nail-biter
because the seamanship aspect added a whole new dimension.  Done right
a tired plot can be given new life by setting it on water and by having
it be about more than just a cliched situation.  DEAD CALM did it
right.  WATERWORLD did it wrong.  For a long time after the success of
MAD MAX 2 (a.k.a. THE ROAD WARRIOR) there were no end of films--mostly
on cable--about lawless post-holocaust worlds where good people have to
fight against roving bands of nasties against a backdrop of
deteriorating conditions.  WATERWORLD takes that tired, overused plot
and moves it to the water where it becomes a tired, over-used plot on
water.  There is not very much about seamanship in the new Kevin
Costner film.  It is there as a backdrop, but it never really becomes
part of the story.  All that is really in the plot are ROAD WARRIOR
situations set on the ocean, under the false assumption that to make a
scene interesting all that is needed is to add water.  If you get
excited by aerial shots of a line of thirty racing jet skis, this is
the film for you.
     The change of setting for this post-holocaust film raises it above
its cable and video peers, but not nearly enough to justify the
expense, logistics, and technical difficulties of shooting this
probable fiasco.  Even in a summer that has had only one or two decent
films, this one does not make itself memorable.  (Unless, perhaps it
will displace HEAVEN'S GATE as the American film industry's most
notorious mistake.)
     WATERWORLD is set some unspecified time in the future after global
warming has melted the ice caps and the resulting rise in water level
has flooded apparently all of the world.  Humanity has put to sea long
ago and has only mythic memories of the place called "Dryland."
(Sorry, there just is not THAT much water in the ice caps.)  People
have fallen prey to bands of nomadic pirates and it is a constant fight
for survival against them and the sea.  How this world evolved, how
people manage to find proper food, and how they get what is needed to
keep the old wrecks afloat are just some of the details that could have
added interest to the film.  But the most interesting aspects of this
world are nearly or completely ignored.  That the film concentrates
instead on how people fight and kill each other is more a
disappointment than a surprise.
     WATERWORLD is not without its moments of wry humor.  The pirates
are called "smokers" in part because they burn fossil fuels while the
"good guys" use more ecologically sound sails, but also because they
are rarely seen without cigarettes.  It wasn't long ago that it was the
heroes of the film who smoked.  Are we being told that the smokers of
our day, already somewhat social outcasts, are to become the pirates of
tomorrow?  Just a side comment: one wonders how good these cigarettes
would taste in a world where the land needed to grow tobacco is lost in
a forgotten past.  The leader of the smokers is the wise-cracking
Deacon.  Dennis Hopper plays this as the occasionally funny whacked-out
character that is pretty much his trademark.  Some of his lines are
funny and others just bizarre.  He is not great but he steals what show
there is from the ever-mild Kevin Costner playing the unnamed lead, a
mariner consistently upstaged by his own spring-loaded trimaran.  There
is not much more personality from female lead Jeanne Tripplehorn of
BASIC INSTINCT and THE FIRM.
     There are much better stories to make films with a budget of
$1,300,000 per minute of screen time of, and there are much cheaper
ways to make a comic book of a film that rates only a high 0 on the -4
to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Dante's Peak (1997)
     When I see a historical film I ask myself whether it is a good
story and whether it is accurate to history.  Similarly when I see a
disaster film, particularly one in which the menace is caused by
something scientific, I ask myself is it a good story and is it
scientifically accurate.  I tend to weigh the latter as important much
more than most people since for me a good deal of the value of the film
is to show me something that could happen to me.  I can escape into a
film much better if I think that what I am seeing is reasonably
possible.  Well, DANTE'S PEAK deserves only very lukewarm interest for
its story, which is in large respects a very off-the-shelf disaster
film plot.  For me, however, a big plus is that most of the time it was
not really very far from scientific accuracy.  There are a few
unrealistic scenes (most I recognized from having read the FAQ included
below), but for the most part the film was fairly believable.
     DANTE'S PEAK opens with a scene in a volcanic eruption.  The force
of the eruption has nature reversed in some fundamental ways.  The sky
is blotted out and flaming rocks are falling, seemingly from the
clouds.  Volcanologist Harry Dalton (Pierce Brosnan) has allowed
himself to get to close to the eruption he was studying and it paying
the price.  This is four years before the action of the story, but it
effectively conveys the Biblical doomsday feel that is associated with
being caught too near a volcanic eruption.  A few years later he still
works for the U.S. Geological Survey when he is asked to take a look at
some seismic activity in a place called Dante's Peak, Washington.  Even
he points out that it is a cornball name for a volcanic mountain.  This
place was just voted to be the second best small town in the country.
Shortly after he arrives Dalton decides that small town number three is
due for a promotion and this region which has not seen an active
volcano since some time about 5000 BC may be ready to go active again.
     It will come as no surprise to the viewer that Dalton's suspicions
are well-founded and the volcano does indeed erupt.  The plot follows
the familiar disaster film formulae of disagreement over whether there
real is a threat to the small town, with Dalton's supervisor (Charles
Hallahan) unwilling to commit to believing an eruption is coming.
Having been involved with the politics of having called a false alarm
in the past, he wants to avoid at all costs a false alarm here.  But
the cost turns out to be high with many people caught in the town at
the time of the disaster.  Once the eruption comes there are familiar
sequences of people getting into danger and of rescue.  But at least
the threats are relatively realistic for the eruption as are the
numbers of people killed.
     There are some nice touches in the script.  There are financial
reasons for the citizens of Dante's Peak to want to ignore the
warnings.  However the townspeople, led by town mayor Rachel Wando
(Linda Hamilton of TERMINATOR), are smarter than townspeople usually
are in disaster films.  If the U.S.  Geological Survey says it is time
to go, they seem ready enough.  The film is much more about the USGS
team's wrangling to decide if they feel the mountain is really going to
go.  That seems fully believable.  Much of what we see seems realistic,
even at the expense of some visual excitement.  The sky is darkened and
ash is falling so it looks a lot like a dismal snowy day.  One scene
that does seem to be driven by the effects rather than logic shows
elevated highway just outside this tiny isolated town.  The special
effects work is very convincing particularly in a flood scene near the
end.  There is a somewhat contrived setting near the end of the film.
I might almost believe it would be there, but that the ELF would work
from there seems unlikely.
     The makers of other recent disaster films could take a lesson from
DANTE'S PEAK.  Unlike VOLCANO or JURASSIC PARK characters you get to
know and get to like do not survive.  There is some risk in killing off
a good character, but it maintains the dramatic tension of the film and
keeps the story realistic.  The team sent from the U.S. Geological
Survey actually look like a team of people that the USGS might send,
not a bunch of attractive young actors.  Other nice touches in the
script include the fact there is no human villain.  You would think
that a film with a volcano does not need a human villain, but the
makers of a major film like OUTBREAK, for example, felt necessary to
put in a human to defeat as well as the title threat.
     While the story values are weaker than they might be, DANTE'S PEAK
is a good cinematic recreation of what it must be like to experience an
erupting volcano.  It is certainly the better of the two volcano films
being released this spring.  Not a great film but worth a high +1 on
the -4 to +4 scale.
     Spoiler... Spoiler... Spoiler... Spoiler... Spoiler... Spoiler...
Spoiler... Spoiler...
     The following is an excerpt from the U.S. Geological Survey web
site at http://vulcan.wr.usgs.gov/News/ DantesPeak/dantes_peak.html.  I
am very pleased that the U.S. Geological Survey created this
information page, as I think it much enhances the enjoyment of the film
and also sets the record straight where the film strayed from accuracy.
There are references to the film throughout the site, thought this
section most directly discusses the science of DANTE'S PEAK.
DANTE'S PEAK FAQ'S (frequently asked questions)
U.S. Geological Survey Volcano Hazards Program February 10, 1997
Q: Is the eruption depicted in Dante's Peak realistic?
A: In many but not all respects, the movie's depiction of eruptive
hazards hits close to the mark, especially as regards the enormous
power unleashed during an eruption. Stratovolcanoes in the Cascade
Range and Alaska erupt explosively and produce pyroclastic flows,
clouds of volcanic ash, and debris flows (lahars) that behave much as
shown in the movie. Lava flows at these volcanoes, though, are usually
thick and slow moving, unlike the fluid flows in the movie.  Fast-
flowing flows of basalt lava are common in Hawaii, though. Real
eruptions may be considerably larger or smaller, and affect larger or
smaller areas, than those shown in the film.
Q: Can eruptions really threaten helicopters, as in the movie, and
other aircraft?
A: Yes. Encounters between aircraft and clouds of volcanic ash are a
serious concern. Jet engines and other aircraft components are
vulnerable to damage by fine, abrasive volcanic ash, which can drift in
dangerous concentrations hundreds of miles downwind from an erupting
volcano.
During the past 15 years, at least 80 aircraft have accidentally
encountered volcanic ash clouds, and in 6 cases jet engines temporarily
lost power. An international consortium of government agencies,
including the U.S. Geological Survey, Federal Aviation Administration,
and National Weather Service, is now monitoring ash-producing volcanoes
and tracking volcanic ash clouds to reduce the likelihood of future
encounters.
Q: Can the temperature of hot springs near a restless volcano change
quickly enough to injure bathers?
A: Temperature changes can and do occur, but usually more slowly than
shown in the movie. In fact, the temperature of hot springs may
increase, decrease, or stay the same during volcanic unrest. Increases
in water temperature, when they do occur, usually take days or weeks to
develop, rather than a few seconds as shown in the movie.
In rare cases, earthquakes can suddenly disrupt a volcano's hot
groundwater system, changing its temperature. And earthquakes have been
known to temporarily increase the flow of water from hot springs,
sometimes causing geyser-like activity that could threaten bathers.
Q: Do earthquakes large enough to collapse buildings and roads
accompany volcanic eruptions?
A: Not usually. Earthquakes associated with eruptions rarely exceed
magnitude 5, and these moderate earthquakes are not big enough to
destroy the kinds of buildings, houses, and roads that were demolished
in the movie. The largest earthquakes at Mount St. Helens in 1980 were
magnitude 5, large enough to sway trees and damage buildings, but not
destroy them. During the huge eruption of Mount Pinatubo in the
Philippines in 1991, dozens of light to moderate earthquakes (magnitude
3 to 5) were felt by several hundred thousand people. Many houses
collapsed, but not primarily because of the shaking. Heavy, wet ash
from the eruption and a hurricane accumulated on roofs and crushed
them.
Stronger earthquakes sometimes DO occur near volcanoes as a result of
tectonic faulting. For example, four magnitude 6 earthquakes struck
Long Valley caldera, California, in 1980, and a magnitude 7.2
earthquake struck Kilauea Volcano, Hawaii, in 1975. Both volcanoes were
quiet at the time. The Hawaii earthquake triggered a small eruption at
the summit of Kilauea. No eruption has yet occurred at Long Valley, but
the area has been restless since the 1980 earthquakes.
Q: Can a town's water supply become contaminated when a volcano is
restless?
A: Yes, but probably not as quickly as shown in the movie. If a town's
water supply originates directly from a volcano's groundwater system or
from a stream that has been covered with volcanic ash, the water could
become contaminated with foul-smelling gases or fine ash and other
sediment. Some volcanic gases such as sulfur dioxide dissolve in
groundwater, making the water acidic. Sulfurous odors, however, are
caused by hydrogen sulfide gas, which smells like rotten eggs.
Q: Do scientists drive across moving lava flows?
A: No. Any attempt to drive across an active lava flow, even one that
has partly solidified to form a thin crust, is likely to lead to
disaster. With a temperature of 1,700 degrees Fahrenheit or higher,
fresh lava will quickly melt rubber tires and ignite gas tanks. And if
a vehicle gets stuck in moving lava, well, you know the rest of the
story.
Q: Can carbon dioxide gas from volcanoes kill trees and wildlife?
A: Yes. At several volcanoes around the world, carbon dioxide gas
released from magma has accumulated in the soil in sufficient
concentrations to kill vegetation or has collected in low areas and
suffocated animals. At Mammoth Mountain in California, carbon dioxide
has killed about 100 acres of trees since 1989, and visitors to this
area have occasionally suffered symptoms of asphyxiation when entering
cabins or below- ground excavations. USGS scientists have concluded
that the gas is escaping from a magma body beneath Mammoth Mountain.
The magma itself is not currently moving toward the surface, but the
USGS is monitoring the situation carefully.
Q: Can volcanoes suddenly become restless and erupt within one week of
the first signs of activity?
A: Yes. The first steam eruption at Mount St. Helens on March 27, 1980,
was preceded by only 7 days of intense earthquake activity. The
climactic eruption, on May 18, followed seven weeks later. An eruption
of Redoubt Volcano in Alaska on December 13, 1989, was preceded by only
24 hours of intense earthquake activity. But other volcanoes have been
restless for months or years before an eruption occurred, and sometimes
a period of unrest doesn't produce an eruption at all.
Q: Are robots used by the USGS to monitor volcanoes?
A: No. We rely on observations and measurements made by experienced
scientists and on critical data sent by radio or satellite relay from
monitoring instruments installed around a volcano. These instruments
include seismometers, tiltmeters, Global Positioning System (GPS)
receivers, gas sensors, mudflow (lahar or debris flow) sensors, and
temperature probes.
NASA has tested a robot named Dante at Mount Erebus volcano in
Antarctica and Mount Spurr volcano in Alaska. The USGS believes that,
on Earth, experienced volcanologists are a better and more cost-
effective alternative for monitoring dangerous volcanoes.
Q: Can volcanoes produce large explosive eruptions and rivers of fluid
lava at the same time?
A: Not usually. During a single eruption, a volcano CAN produce both
lava flows and ash, sometimes simultaneously. The red, glowing lava
fountains and lava flows in Dante's Peak (including the active flow
across which Harry Dalton drives) are characteristic of a fluid magma,
called basalt. In contrast, explosive gray ash columns and pyroclastic
flows shown in other scenes are characteristic of more viscous magmas,
called andesite, dacite, or rhyolite. It's uncommon for a volcano to
erupt magmas of widely different composition at the same time.
Q: Can lakes near volcanoes become acidic enough to be dangerous to
people?
A: Yes. Crater lakes atop volcanoes are typically the most acid, with
pH values as low as 0.1 (very strong acid). Normal lake waters, in
contrast, have relatively neutral pH values near 7.0. The crater lake
at El Chichon volcano in Mexico had a pH of 0.5 in 1983 and Mount
Pinatubo's crater lake had a pH of 1.9 in 1992. The acid waters of
these lakes are capable of causing burns to human skin but are unlikely
to dissolve metal quickly. Gases from magma that dissolve in lake water
to form such acidic brews include carbon dioxide, sulfur dioxide,
hydrogen sulfide, hydrogen chloride, and hydrogen fluoride.  However,
the movie's rapidly formed acidic lake capable of dissolving an
aluminum boat in a matter of minutes is unrealistic.

Title
Review for Robin Hood: Prince of Thieves (1991)
     I saw the coming attraction for ROBIN HOOD, PRINCE OF THIEVES several
months ago and decided then that I wanted to see it.  After all, it did not
have police and was not set in L.A.  How many films come out that even are
set before the 20th Century?  Filmmakers don't seem to want to gamble on
ever-diminishing public knowledge of history.  I had hope this could be a
good film.  Then I read the article in the June 1991 CINEFANTASTIQUE which
said:
     "The new film's approach to the legend can be [the
     producer/screenwriter's] description of the Merrie Men as
     medieval Hell's Angels.  Add to that [director Keith]
     Reynolds's observation that '[Christian] Slater [as Will
     Scarlet] plays a 12th Century James Dean' (complete with
     Rocker quiff), the overall opinion that Maid Marian is a 12th
     Century feminist, and the fact that this film's humor is of a
     very contemporary nature....  [The Sheriff is] evil
     personified.  With King Richard absent England has reverted
     to paganism and human sacrifice.  The God/Christianity
     vs. Evil/Darkside is even more potent."  [according to co-
     producer/co-screenwriter John Watson].
This was not at all encouraging.  This is no place near what a telling of
Robin Hood should be.  I wrote an article at the time complaining about
filmmakers who do not have respect for the material.  It sounded as if the
film was being made with no respect for the characters or the period.  They
had let Christianity versus paganism become the conflict rather than the
Anglo-Saxon populace against the Normans who had conquered the country in
the previous century and had set themselves up as the ruling nobility.  That
is why Robin, though technically from a noble family, had no real political
power.  He was of Anglo-Saxon nobility and was considered by the Anglo-
Saxons to be rightfully of the ruling class.  But it was the Normans who
ruled.
     Then Fox Television did their own version of Robin Hood, one not great
but creditable.  I wondered if it might not be better than the film it was
trying to imitate.  And I got into at least one argument with someone who
thought I was not being fair to ROBIN HOOD, PRINCE OF THIEVES.  Then I went
on vacation.  I came back to find ROBIN HOOD, PRINCE OF THIEVES opened to
calamitous reviews.  Now I have seen it and I would say that while
everything bad I predicted about the film turned out to be quite true, I
think that the film was not as bad as most of the critics seem to think.  So
part of my job now is to defend the film that I formerly criticized.
     There is little wrong with ROBIN HOOD, PRINCE OF THIEVES that could not
have been fixed by just not making this film about Robin Hood.  The Robin
Hood of legend was outlawed as a young teenager.  It was his youth that made
him an outlaw since after being taunted about his youth he shot a king's
deer to prove he had the prowess of a man.  The film's concept that Robin
had been to the Crusades and had picked up a Moorish sidekick was inventive
but also purely invention.  That the Moor would bring with him the knowledge
of gunpowder is unlikely and the telescope--not invented until the
Renaissance--is absurd.  In a lighter film, such as THE CRIMSON PIRATE, such
anachronisms might be a little more acceptable, but with the exception of
the performance of the Sheriff of Nottingham (played by Alan Rickman, who
has more fun with his role than the audience does), this film is just not
that light.  Speaking of Rickman's Sheriff, while I would probably have
liked to see the film less tongue-in-cheek, Rickman's screwball wedding
scene has to rank as a guilty pleasure.  (The real Sheriff was married and
had a daughter who eventually succeeded at the feat her father botched:
killing Robin Hood, albeit and old and ill Robin Hood.)
     One of the major problems was that the script was just not very
professionally written.  Pieces that have already been used in far too many
films show up here.  [Minor spoiler alert: The reader who has not seen the
film may want to skip to the next paragraph.]  In searching for Marian,
Robin must fight a hooded guardian who nearly bests him.  Can you guess who
this warrior is?  Yup!  In two or three scenes characters bragging about
their expertise are cut short because they were not watching what they were
doing and did something like riding right into a tree branch.  They even
manage a horror film jump scene.  This is very inadequate script-writing.
And when the Sheriff tells Robin his father died "squealing like a pig,"
this was an allusion to a similar line also spoken to Costner in THE
UNTOUCHABLES.
     Dialogue is particularly anachronistic, with characters using lines
like "full of piss and wind" and saying Robin has "balls of stone."  The
Sheriff tells someone, "Shut up, you twit."  This is the kind of script-
writing where whenever someone falls there is always a fortuitous haystack
to break the fall.  When swords strike each other or a wall there are always
sparks.
     But having promised to defend the film, I will.  The main criticism
that has been leveled at the film is that Costner is much too laid back to
play Robin.  This strikes me as nonsense.  He does not have the umph of an
Errol Flynn swinging through the trees and calling, "Welcome to Sherwood,
milady!"  Costner's performance is at worst non-traditional, but with the
exception of some accent problems it is still a valid interpretation of the
character.  The film has been criticized for having too many scenes that are
too dark.  It seems to me that the lighting is perfectly reasonable to
create a period feel.  The night was a lot darker in the late 12th Century.
As for the darkness of tone in what some will interpret as children's film,
good!  We are talking about some nasty people.  Let's not sugar-coat them.
     As the film ended I decided it deserved some breed of a zero rating.
The gratuitous rock music song over the end credits convinced me it was a
low 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     What shows up the pandering and silliness of Kevin Reynolds's ROBIN
HOOD, PRINCE OF THIEVES even more is the other version of Robin Hood made
for Fox Television and directed by John Irvin.  This is not a flashy ROBIN
HOOD and it certainly is not the original story, but it is certainly the
more intelligent retelling of the story.  I think that was pretty much to be
expected.  Director John Irvin is probably most respected for his BBC
television adaptation of John LeCarre's TINKER, TAILOR, SOLDIER, SPY.  He
has gotten into wider-appeal films since, things, like GHOST STORY and
HAMBURGER HILL and even RAW DEAL, but clearly this is a man who can do
intelligence on the screen.  Rather than side-stepping the politics of the
time as Reynolds did, Irvin's version, written by Sam Resnick and John
McGrath, is steeped in the politics of the time.  Robert Hode (played by
Patrick Bergin) is a Saxon noble who has been a lifelong friend of the
Norman Baron Daguerre (played by Jeroem Krabbe).  Robert wants what is best
for the Saxons; Daguerre wants England to become strong under Norman rule.
Both are "good guys."  The "bad guy" is another Norman noble, Miles
Falconier (played by Jurgen Prochnow), whose selfishness turns Norman
against Saxon and shows the two friends where their differences lie.
     Falconier, incidentally, is cruel to Norman and Saxon alike.  The
reason for his presence in the land is to force himself on the Norman Lady
Marian (pronounced Mar-ee-AHN) in an arranged marriage.  Marian (played by
Uma Thurman), of course, has taken a liking to the Saxon who has been
outlawed and who has changed the spelling of his last name to "Hood."  It is
with pride that she tells Falconier that she has already given herself to
another "with the greatest of pleasure."  Incidentally, I caught only one
reference to the Sheriff of Nottingham and it was unclear if it referred to
any character we had seen.  It might have been a title for Daguerre.
     While Reynolds's version insists on making the good guys Christian and
the bad guys into believers in witchcraft, the Irvin version, probably with
more historical accuracy, makes the Normans the Christians and the Saxons
still drenched in the so-called "pagan" religion of their ancestors.  While
the Reynolds version gives the edge to the Saxons because a Moor brings them
scientific knowledge anachronistic to the period, the Irvin version gives
the edge to the Saxons because the Normans still accept some of the pagan
customs.  (Which of course they still do, as witnessed by the presence of
the spring fertility symbols of the rabbit and the egg at Easter and the
winter solstice holiday's association with mistletoe, holly Yule logs, and
the bringing of trees indoors, all inherited by Christmas.  It is as much of
the compromise worked between Norman and Saxon as anything else is.)
     So Irvin's is the second version of ROBIN HOOD which also plays very
fast and loose with the  original story, but at least it replaces fidelity
to the story with some intelligence and some historical accuracy, and in
that it is the better film.  My rating for Irvin's ROBIN HOOD would be a
high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for In the Line of Fire (1993)
     In a suspense film, higher stakes do not make for more suspense.  That
was the mistake that the James Bond series made up through MOONRAKER.  They
started with villains trying to sabotage one missile or just to embarrass
the British Secret Service, and at the same time get a decoded.  As the
series progressed, you eventually got to villains trying to precipitate
nuclear war or to destroy all life on Earth.  But the best stories had the
least flamboyant villains and concentrated on credibility.  I mention this
because while IN THE LINE OF FIRE, with its psychotic trying to kill the
President, does not have an absurdly exaggerated villain, it is starting to
get up there.  This is essentially a Dirty Harry film with the stakes upped
a little.  This is also an anti-violence film like UNFORGIVEN, but it is an
Eastwood sort of anti-violence film.  That means that the good guys who
survive feel angst over the violence afterward.
     Frank Horrigan (played by Clint Eastwood) is an agent for the Secret
Service.  His independence and his insubordinate attitude get him in trouble
with the people for whom he works. And he is just a bit sexist, but for the
rare woman who can see beyond the attitude problem he is really a diamond in
the rough.  In other words, he is just like a Dirty Harry of the Secret
Service.  The one difference is that Horrigan was the Secret Service agent
protecting--or at least trying to protect--Kennedy in Dallas.  Twenty-nine
(or thirty-three?) years later, he is still in the Secret Service trying to
protect the President.  But now there is a new assassin who wants to kill
the current President.  He has nothing special against the Chief Executive,
but he really likes the idea of killing a President.
     First the bad news.  In spite of good advance critical comment, this is
a very familiar, if not out-and-out hackneyed, script.  The conscienceless
killer feels impelled to call the policeman (or Secret service agent) and
unburden his neuroses on the man looking for him.  It adds to the thrill of
the hunt, but it has been done many times since NO WAY TO TREAT A LADY or
even the real-life Jack the Ripper murders.  And, yes, there is an
attractive woman, Lilly Raines (played by Rene Russo, who looks a lot like
Blair Brown) in the Secret Service, and she goes from disliking the
obnoxious Eastwood character to feeling sorry for him to bedding him.  The
plot also has some real stretches of credibility.  And it has more than its
share of violence, including two scenes that could be disturbing to those
who are particularly susceptible being disturbed by movies.
     So Clint's Oscars have not earned him better scripts, but at least he
gets one heck of a good actor as the assassin.  John Malkovich, who usually
plays people either icy or irritating, gives a flesh-crawling performance as
an assassin who is both.  This is a polished and suspenseful action film,
perhaps a little more so than Eastwood's pre-UNFORGIVEN films.  Now I
recognize that I am assuming that Eastwood was not just an actor on this
film but actually had much of the artistic control.  That may be a false
assumption, but given his recent Oscars, I suspect it is not.
     The film is directed by Wolfgang Petersen, who directed the exceptional
war film DAS BOOT and the unexceptional science fiction film ENEMY MINE.
The score is by Ennio Morricone, who built his reputation on Eastwood's "Man
with No Name" films.  It's worth seeing as a reasonably crafted suspense
film, but a month from now I will barely remember it, while Eastwood's
OUTLAW JOSEY WALES and UNFORGIVEN will still be standing out in my memory.
I give this one a very flat +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Night Train (1998)
     CAPSULE: A released ex-convict on the run from criminals rents a
flat and slowly falls in love with his middle-aged landlady.  This
brings on the ire of the landlady's autocratic mother.  Rating: 7 (0 to
10), low +2 (-4 to +4)
   - Directed by John Lynch.
   - Michael Poole (John Hurt) is released from prison and immediately
     has people chasing him wanting to get back money he embezzled from
     a local crime figure.  Deciding very quickly he cannot live at his
     flat, he rents another flat from an elderly woman living with her
     daughter Alice.  Alice's mother keeps Alice around and manipulates
     her by claiming to be infirm and needing her daughter.
   - Poole brings with him his hobby, a model train set.  Alice's
     mother immediately attributes many of her pains and stiffness to
     Poole's trains.  When Alice expresses some interest in the new
     tenant, Alice's mother determines to break up the relationship.
   - This is the first feature film of John Lynch, who previously made
     films for Irish television.
   - Alice's mother is terrified of the trains but they are
     photographed to we are captured by the charm.
   - Poole's day job is in an abattoir.  It is shown in disturbing
     detail.  Violent crime by the gangsters is also shown in equally
     disturbing detail.
   - Poole has empty life, but Alice's mother has hold on her daughter.
   - People have to make difficult choices.
   - In an odd parallel Poole removes offal from cattle, the gangster
     removes similar looking balloons of drugs from Teddy Bears.
   - Poole does not feel he can be honest with Alice.

Title
Review for Diggstown (1992)
          Capsule review:  DIGGSTOWN is a fast, smart film about a
     con job worthy of the "Mission Impossible" team.
     Unfortunately, it leaves holes and unanswered questions and
     has an ending that is just not completely satisfying.  It is,
     however, a good film to get the juices flowing.  Rating: +1
     (-4 to +4).  (Following the review will be a spoiler section
     presenting script problems.)
     Gabriel Caine (played by James Woods) is a con man about to be paroled
and he is not waiting to be released to get into mischief.  He has a scam in
mind that could leave him owning a sizable piece of a redneck town.
Diggstown is a town that lives and dies for boxing.  It is named for a local
boxing legend who once took on five men in one day.  Now the town is
covertly owned by John Gillon (played by Bruce Dern) who runs the town like
a king.  Caine, with a little help from some friends like card sharp and
hustler Fitz (played by Oliver Platt) and a boxer, "Honey" Roy Palmer
(played by Louis Gossett, Jr.) is going to put the squeeze on John Gillon
in an absurd bet that Palmer can take on any ten locals.  Once these two men
set up an honorable bet, each is going to cheat in any way possible to win.
     Steven McKay's screenplay based on Leonard Wise's novel THE DIGGSTOWN
RANGERS races and forces the viewer to work hard to keep up with everything
that is happening in DIGGSTOWN's 97 minutes.  This dialogue is fast and
funny, though the film's best line (starting "Just remember") is reportedly
an ad lib by Woods clever enough that the trailer is built around it.
DIGGSTOWN is directed by Michael Ritchie, who at some time decided to
concentrate on sports films like SEMI-TOUGH, DOWNHILL RACER, THE BAD NEWS
BEARS, and WILDCATS.  That may be a pity, since his one really superb film,
SMILE is about a beauty pageant rather than sports.  Ritchie's DIGGSTOWN is
not as good as SMILE, but it is diverting.  I give it a +1 on the -4 to +4
scale.
     There are problems with the screenplay.  One is that Caine is entirely
too brilliant at knowing what his opponent will do.  He is prepared for
eventualities that he would have no reason to suspect would happen.  Also,
for him to choose the right set of the ten boxers to involve in his plan
requires knowledge that he is unlikely to have had.  Finally, the punishment
at the end seems surprisingly mild when one considers what has happened
before.

Title
Review for Last Seduction, The (1994) (TV)
     Last year RED ROCK WEST, directed by John Dahl, went directly to
video, then got a small theatrical release based on very good word of
mouth.  It fact, it was a nice little thriller that deserved much
better treatment.  That was unfortunate.  But when Dahl's THE LAST
SEDUCTION got the same treatment this year it was nearly criminal.  I
am sorry I missed it on HBO, but it was worth paying to see in a
theater.  This steamy crime thriller with tight and fascinating script
by Steve Barancik is far better than the average run of theatrical
films.
     Bridget Gregory (played by Linda Fiorentino) is as cold and
calculating a woman as has ever has been shown on the screen.  She is
as quick-thinking and amoral as a computer.  Gregory instantly sizes up
situations and subtly manipulates people and events to her own
advantage.  She works for insurance companies as a "lead generator,"
someone who is able to find potential customers for her company.  And
she must be good at her job based on the sampling we see.  Just as a
demonstration of her abilities she takes a credit history database and
in a chillingly logical manner generates a list of women who would be
anxious to have their husbands murdered.  The method makes sufficient
sense that one almost worries that some viewer will copy the method in
real life.  This is a female Hannibal Lecter whose fixation is making
money rather than on cannibalism and mutilation,  And because her
desires are so normal, she is much harder to catch.
     As the film opens Bridget does her thing for a New York City
insurance company while her physician husband, Clay (Bill Pullman)
pulls off a dangerous but lucrative drug deal that Bridget has master-
minded.  Hubby comes home with lots of cash, only to have his loving
wife take the money and run.  She is headed to Chicago, but to avoid
thugs hired by her husband, she lays low in Beston, a suburb of
Buffalo.  She picks up one of the locals, Mike Swale (Peter Berg) as a
bedmate to use with approximately the same consideration she would give
a vibrator.  Under Dahl's direction the sex scenes are often explicit
and erotic.  Some of the violence scenes are also fairly graphic.
     Fiorentino plays Bridget like a breed of spider.  She is purely
cold and calculating, the epitome of sang froid.  Peter Berg seems
sufficiently young and naive to fall into her web.  And Bill Pullman,
who was pushed around by the woman in his life in RUTHLESS PEOPLE, here
plays someone a lot smarter but still totally out-classed.
J. T. Walsh, who has becoming a very familiar screen heavy, plays a
crooked lawyer who can only look on with envy at what Bridget can do.
     Fiorentino makes this film as exciting a thriller as we have seen
this year.  This is film noir with a vengeance with a femme fatale who
could give lessons to Stanwick in DOUBLE INDEMNITY and Turner in BODY
HEAT.  Watch for it.  I give this film a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Sleepless in Seattle (1993)
     Not long ago A STRANGER AMONG US introduced audiences to the word
"bashert."  It is the concept that a man and a woman are fated to meet and
fall in love, a pairing made in heaven.  People in SLEEPLESS IN SEATTLE
discuss whether there is anything to this concept and are inclusive, but it
is clear that screenwriter Nora Ephron wants us to believe it is true.
SLEEPLESS IN SEATTLE has the strangest case of bashert since SOMEWHERE IN
TIME.  Ephron, who previously wrote WHEN HARRY MET SALLY..., has written and
this time directs this story about when Sam met Annie.
     Sam is Sam Baldwin (played by Tom Hanks).  Sam lost his wife Maggie and
decides to leave Chicago and its memories and to move to Seattle.  There,
eighteen months later, he is still a wreck and an insomniac to boot.  He
lives in a houseboat with his son Jonah (talk about tempting fate!).  Jonah
(played by Ross Malinger) calls a radio psychologist to ask what his dad
should do.  When Sam is called to the phone, he opens up to the psychologist
and shows such sensitivity that hundreds of women listerers across the
country are moved, including the absolutely right woman for Sam.  She is
Annie Reed (played by Meg Ryan).  Unfortunately, she lives a continent away
in Baltimore and is already engaged to be married.  But Fate is not to be
cheated, and we follow two story lines--the lives of Sam and Annie--knowing
full well that they will eventually come together.
     Ephron's plotting is not really her strong point.  The film is
extremely sentimental from the opening credits on.  Under the credits we
hear Jimmy Durante singing "As Time Goes By" and are shown a map of the
United States on a section of a globe.  As each actor's name is credited, a
star is added in the sky over the map.  Then in the film as a running gag
everybody has seen the sad film AN AFFAIR TO REMEMBER.  All the women love
it; none of the men care for it.  Eventually that film will be pivotal in
bringing Sam and Annie together.
     While the plot is sentimental and a little sticky, the dialogue is a
lot of fun and often very witty and insightful.  Annie's confidante is her
friend Becky (played by Rosie O'Donnell) who, like Annie, is unmarried and
is clearly getting frustrated.  Her cynical comments are some of the best
lines in the film.  On the other hand, Sam's conversations with his friend
Jay (played by Rob Reiner) are totally unlikely and inane.  As before,
Ephron's female characters are better written than her male characters.
Still, it is unusual these days to see an unabashedly--not to say overly--
romantic film.  SLEEPLESS IN SEATTLE is diverting and even nostalgic with
its resurrection of old songs that act as commentary on the story.  Nothing
great, but a solid +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Aria (1987)
     Book publishing has the concept of the "original anthology."  Several
well-known authors are given a theme to write on and each does a short story
bringing an original approach to that theme.  Occasionally a similar
approach is tried in anthology films, having a different director for each
segment, but usually what is done seems to be to give the director a script
and let him direct it.  Films like QUARTET, TRIO, ENCORE (all based on
collections of W. Somerset Maugham stories), O. HENRY'S FULL HOUSE, and DEAD
OF NIGHT were probably done this way.  ARIA appears to be a film that gave
its directors even more autonomy.  In this anthology film, the only thing
that the segments have in common is that each is an interpretation of an
operatic aria.  As long as the aria is played through the film, it seems to
fulfill the requirements.
     It would be misleading to try to rate such a mixed bag of short films
as a single piece.  Instead I will consider each segment.  Even there I want
to give each piece two ratings, one on how it stands on its own as a film
and a second rating on how well it used the music it was interpreting.
(Ratings are on the -4 to +4 scale.)
Opera: UN BALLO IN MASCHERA (A MASKED BALL) by Giuseppe Verdi
Director: Nicholas Roeg
     The opening piece (but for a framing piece that will be described
later) involves an assassination attempt on King Zog of Albania.  The
attractive and versatile Teresa Russell (BLACK WIDOW) has finally been given
a role that she is totally unconvincing in.  Sporting a handlebar mustache
and wearing a tight military tunic, she plays King Zog.  Only afterwards did
I find out that it was she in the role, but it was obviously an actress
rather than an actor.  Nor did the punchline of the story work.  Story: 0.
Appropriateness: +1.
Opera: LA FORZA DEL DESTINO (THE FORCE OF DESTINY) by Giuseppe Verdi
Director: Charles Sturridge
     I did not care for this segment on first brush, but on discussing it
later I see more quality in it.  Sturridge shows us troubled children
leading a pointless existence of TV-watching and getting into trouble.  The
original aria is a plea to the Virgin Mary which may well be appropriate.
Story: +1.  Appropriateness: +1.
     Two attractive female attendants in a gym for body-builders first
desire the powerful masculine bodies around them, then try to seduce them,
only to be frustrated and ignored by the dehumanized athletes around them.
The section is amusing and perhaps even erotic.  Story: +1.
Appropriateness: -1.
     Seemingly out of place we have one Blake-Edwards-style sex farce.  A
husband and wife cheating on each other both go with their lovers to the
same garish motel.  The common tension builds as husband and wife nearly run
into each other time and again.  Will they run into each other?  Do we
really care?  Mindless but amusing.  Story: +1.  Appropriateness: 0.
Opera: DIE TOTE STADT (THE DEAD CITY) by Erick Korngold
Director: Bruce Beresford
     Because I read the program I know what the director of BREAKER MORANT
and CRIMES OF THE HEART was trying to say with this film, but it does not
come from the film.  According to the program, it has a man falling "in love
with what he believes to be the spirit of his dead wife."  It appears to be
just two lovers and scenes of an atmospheric (and apparently empty) old
European city.  Story: 0.  Appropriateness: +1.
     One would expect a good segment from a director as distinguished as
Robert Altman.  Surprise!  This is the biggest loser in the lot.  It is
dull, but worse than that, it is borrowed from a much better film,
MARAT/SADE.  Both films deal with the historical fact that in post-
Revolutionary France it was though chic to involve the inmates of insane
asylums in theatrical productions.  In MARAT/SADE the insane put on a play
and rich patrons come to see it; in Altman's the insane come to see an
opera.  In both the mad are uncontrollable, which is one reason the rich
want to watch them.  But in MARAT/SADE the monkeyshines are only a tiny
piece of all that is going on on the screen.  They are all that happens in
Altman's section of ARIA.  Story: -1.  Appropriateness: -1.
     I was not fond of Roddam's films THE BRIDE and QUADROPHENIA, but I have
to give him the prize for ARIA.  This had to be what the people who thought
of the film had in mind.  This is a very sensual adaptation of Wagner's
"Liebestod" that in some ways fits the music as well or better than Wagner
did originally.  Story: +1.  Appropriateness: +3.
     I lucked out on this one--I did not read the program.  There is a nice
surprise in this segment, but the program ruins it by telling too much.  The
story is of a princess of some sort being decorated by having diamonds and
rubies inlaid directly into her flesh.  But even as we watch it, more is
going on than we realize.  Don't read the program.  Story: +1.
Appropriateness: +1.
     An old woman dressed incongruously in the clothes of a much younger
person remembers days gone by.  This one squeaks by, passable but no great
shakes.  Story: 0.  Appropriateness: 0.
     If Bryden was trying to say something with his framing sequence of John
Hurt preparing for and singing PAGLIACCI, it went right past me.  Not very
unusual.  This was not up to most of the segments it framed.  Story: -1.
Appropriateness: +1.

Title
Review for Focus (2001/I)
    CAPSULE: In the late years of World War II a man sees 
    anti-Semitic influences moving into his neighborhood but 
    wants to remain neutral.  As neutrality become more and 
    more difficult he struggles with his conscience.  Neil 
    Slavin directs this adaptation of a novel by Arthur Miller.  
    Rating: 7 (0 to 10), +2 (-4 to +4)
FOCUS is a story of an anti-Semitic movement during the years of 
World War II, but it does not take place in Europe, but in the US.  
Kendrew Lascelles wrote the film based on Arthur Miller's 1945 
novel FOCUS.  It is the story of Fascism creeping into a middle-
class neighborhood.
Lawrence Newman (played by William H. Macy) lives with his mother.  
He works in a prosperous Manhattan company interviewing new 
applicants.  He interviews people applying for jobs and generally 
makes sure the company hires only the "right type," good gentiles.  
One of the people he turns down is non-Jewish Gertrude Hart (Laura 
Dern) who nonetheless looks too Jewish to be put in a visible 
position.
Lawrence happens to witnesses a tough-guy neighbor beat up a 
woman.  But he does not want to make trouble in the neighborhood 
by going to the police.  Another neighbor Fred (the intimidating 
Meat Loaf Aday) seems to be on a personal campaign to chase out of 
the neighborhood the corner news dealer, a Jew (David Paymer), to 
move out of the neighborhood.  When Lawrence gets new glasses, 
glasses that accidentally make him look Jewish; suddenly he gets a 
new view of his street and especially neighbor Fred who is 
inviting "Americanist" organizers into the neighborhood.  Lawrence 
tries desperately to hold onto his neutrality in the Jew-baiting 
in spite of the dictates of his conscience.
For his first feature film commercial producer Neal Slavin has 
chosen a particularly timely theme, that of a slow but insidious 
spreading prejudice and fascism.  The targeting of ethnic groups 
for particular hatreds is especially timely.  Particularly 
chilling is that Fred so anxious to introduce the same fascism 
that was currently engulfing Europe.
Slavin symbolizes the cycle of evil with the image of merry-go-
round accompanied by ominous music.  The film's one less than 
subtle touch is the big billboard at the end of the infiltrated 
street proclaiming "There's no way like the American way."
It is interesting that two of Arthur Miller's novels were adapted 
at the same time.  Like FOCUS, Amos Gitai's EDEN also was shown at 
the Toronto International Film Festival.  Both are about people 
caught up in evil circumstances and having to take a stand.  
However, FOCUS is by far the better of the two.  I rate it a 7 on 
the 0 to 10 scale and a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Jackie Brown (1997)
     Tarantino has become a cult item after the success of RESERVOIR
DOGS and the award-winning PULP FICTION.  He is the director that
everybody caught early in his career and on his way up and from whom
everybody expects great things.  That put a lot of pressure on him to
make his third film be really something special.  His public may be
disappointed to discover that they now have to invest two hours and
thirty-five minutes in his new film and in return they will get a
plain, old-fashioned, unspectacular crime drama.  This is just a good,
hard-boiled crime film, perhaps with a somewhat convoluted plot.  Most
directors could be proud of JACKIE BROWN as only a third effort, but I
suspect that it will fall well short of the expectations for the over-
hyped Tarantino.
     Ordell Robbie (played by Samuel L. Jackson) is an ambitious and
vicious gun dealer working out of his Hermosa Beach pad owned by his
girlfriend Melanie (Bridget Fonda).  To Melanie life is eating,
sleeping, getting stoned, getting it on, and watching TV.  To most
other people dealing with Robbie, life is short, or at least it is once
they become inconvenient to Ordell.  But Ordell wants to get out of the
gun business and in general out of the business business.  He thinks it
is time to retire to Mexico with Melanie and his low- life, lower-IQ
partner Lou (a role that wastes Robert DeNiro's talents).  But before
Ordell can retire he wants to get half a million dollars in payments up
from Mexico.  His courier is Jackie Brown (Pam Grier, still around
after a quarter of a century of black exploitation films).  Jackie is a
stewardess for a cheap Mexican airline and supplements her meager
income by running payments for Ordell.  But this time it gets her into
trouble.  Jackie is arrested by ATF agent Ray Nicholette (Michael
Keaton) and policeman Mark Dargus.  That makes her inconvenient for
Ordell, both she and Ordell know it.  Her one edge is that Ordell does
not know that she knows it.  She strikes up a shaky partnership with
the honest-seeming bail bondsman Max Cherry (Robert Forster) whom
Ordell uses professionally.  Together they have to outsmart Ordell to
stay alive.
     It is difficult to believe that this Samuel L. Jackson is the same
one who was in EVE'S BAYOU.  Jackson is a powerful and versatile actor
who has been getting a lot of work, but deserves the attention he gets.
One actor who does not get the attention is Robert Forster, who is
something of a poor man's James Garner.  He has Garner's ease and grace
in a role, but just does not have Garner's following.  For a treat
sometime see his HOLLYWOOD HARRY--not a great plot, but a fun
performance by Forster.  Moving down the list we get to Robert DeNiro,
Michael Keaton, and Bridget Fonda.  And what are they doing in this
film?  It is nice to see a familiar face in a role, but these are parts
that should have gone to some deserving second-stringers who could have
brought just as much to the film as the people cast.  I suppose they
may have wanted to work with Quentin Tarantino.  But still, folks,
let's move aside and give some other actors a chance to be seen.
     The film is by far Tarantino's least violent film, as some of his
fans will be happy to know.  Violence is neither a plus nor a minus
with me, but I do know of people who refused to see PULP FICTION
because of its violence.  Overall, Tarantino has made an acceptable
film, even if it is over two and a half hours long.  If it has less
magic than his previous work, it certainly has competence.  I rate it a
7 on the 0 to 10 scale and a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     Spoiler.... Spoiler.... Spoiler.... Spoiler.... Spoiler....
Spoiler.... Spoiler....
     Are you kidding?  In a dressing room?  Presumably some have
discreet anti-shoplifting surveillance.  I doubt that anyone who knew
what they were doing would ever assume that a dressing room is
completely private.
     There is a humorous bit at the beginning that involved a cameo by
Demi Moore.  I wonder how realistic that was?  I also wonder if the
noise from Keaton's leather jacket was intended as a subtle joke.

Title
Review for Shawshank Redemption, The (1994)
     I never read Stephen King's 1982 novella "Rita Hayworth and the
Shawshank Redemption," part of his collection DIFFERENT SEASONS.  But
it is difficult to believe that THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION could be very
accurate to this non-horror King story.  As much as I like King, it is
difficult to believe he wrote a story as good as this film adaptation.
The theme is the strength of humanity over brutality--much the same
theme as SCHINDLER'S LIST--and Frank Darabont has crafted a film,
writing and directing, that compares favorably with ONE FLEW OVER THE
CUCKOO'S NEST.  There is a lot going on in THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION,
and parts will remind viewers of such diverse films as BILLY BUDD, OF
MICE AND ME, and even DEAD POETS SOCIETY.  The film is another parable,
following on the heels of FORREST GUMP.  But where GUMP was content to
create a period feel and present a message of "Just be simple and let
everything happen to you," SHAWSHANK is a much better piece of
storytelling and has just the opposite message, "Stand up and take
control of your life.  Get busy living or get busy dying."  Forrest
Gump would last about one week in Shawshank Prison.  Andy Dufresne, the
focus of this story, is a survivor.  And he is more.
     As the film opens Andy Dufresne (played by Tim Robbins) is about
to murder his wife and her lover.  On the witness stand he denies that
he ever completed the crime.  But if he didn't, somebody else did, and
all the evidence points to Andy.  The sentence is two consecutive life
terms in Shawshank Penitentiary--not much of a life for a banker.  The
film follows Andy's life in prison.  The first two years are just the
hell that everyone expects prison to be.  Worse.  But a chance comment
by the most brutal of the guards, Captain Hadley (Clancy Brown), gives
Andy an idea of how with one stroke he can get on the good side of
guards and prisoners alike.  And among the prisoners he particularly
want to be friends with Red, the prison scrounge.  Red is useful to
have as a friend, not only because he is a man of character whom the
other prisoners respect, not only because he can get Andy what he needs
to make his life a little easier, but also because he is the story
narrator and it is never a bad idea in a film to be on the good side of
the narrator.  In the book Red was Irish, but here he is played with
tremendous dignity by Morgan Freeman.
     In the years that pass in Shawshank--and they do pass quickly even
if the film has a leisurely pace--Andy finds ways to make himself
indispensable to the sadistic, Bible-thumping Warden Norton (Bob
Gunton) and the guards, always winning more concessions to make life
better for the inmates.  Through Red's and Andy's eyes we see the
ironies of prison life.  But there is much more to the story than that
of a goody-goody in prison, and the plot has interesting complications.
A surprisingly long segment of the film is devoted to one of the minor
prisoners released to the outside world only to find adjustment a
difficult proposition.  But the investment of screen time for this
subplot pays off later in the film.
     This is a film with excellent production values almost without
exception.  Prison movies are an entire genre, I suppose, and in the
hands of a less skilled photographer Shawshank could have come off as
just dismal as any other prison film without any particular visual
interest.  But the director of photography was Roger Deakins whose
films include MOUNTAINS OF THE MOON, HOMICIDE, BARTON FINK, and THE
HUDSUCKER PROXY.  He is a man with a very good eye for the visual in
period pieces and from the first scene of guards on the walls of
Shawshank his photography has excellent composition and detail.
Production design is by Oscar-winner Terence Morgan, who did design for
such diverse films as DR. ZHIVAGO, THE HUNT FOR RED OCTOBER, and CLEAR
AND PRESENT DANGER.  Between the two we see a prison that visually
captures our interest.  This is no small feat for a prison picture.  To
some extent, Shawshank is so well photographed, it gives the film
almost a poetic feel rather than one of realism, but for a longish film
that is the way to go.  The one serious problem visually with the
production is in makeup.  The film covers 19 years from 1947 to 1966
under conditions that should age people quickly.  A little greying in
the hair of the main characters seems the only concession made to the
aging process.  More of the period feel is added by having the film
narrated.  That is more in the style of filmmaking of the 40s and 50s.

Title
Review for Patriot, The (2000)
     The story begins in 1776.  While certain of the American
colonists are engaged in declaring their independence from Britain,
the British are finding it almost impossible to engage the
colonists' army on the battlefield.  The Americans know almost
nothing about fighting and if it could be brought to a European
style battle, the British are almost certain they could bring the
rebellion to a quick end.  (As one of the British in the film puts
it, "These rustics are so inept it nearly takes the honor out of
winning.")  The British have to try a new approach.  Their ace in
the hole is the unpopularity of the rebellion in the southern
colonies like the Carolinas.  If they can sweep from the south, pick
up southern support and sweep north with it, they can probably
capture the Continental Army.  To do this they take Charleston and,
reinforced by locals, are ready for the northward sweep.  Locally
the operation is led by General Cornwallis.
     Benjamin Martin (played by Mel Gibson) is a South Carolina
farmer.  He fought Indians and French in the Indian wars and came
out a war hero, but at the same time he is a man hating what the
wars had done to him.  Now he is a widower with seven children who
wants no part of war.  He watches in fear as the British and the
Americans fight.  He refuses to give his support to the rebellion
even though his eldest child Gabriel (Australian Heath Ledger) is
anxious to fight the British.  Colonel Harry Burwell (Chris Cooper),
a war buddy of Benjamin's, leads the locals.  Finally Benjamin lets
Gabriel join up.  As the months pass the war gets closer and closer
to the Martin Farm.  But it takes Gabriel's return, wounded and with
army dispatches, to bring his father into the war.  The merciless
Col. William Tavington (Jason Isaacs) finds Gabriel at the farm and
against the rules of war sentences him to hang.  In a feeble attempt
to resist, a brother is killed and Tavington orders the house razed
to the ground.  Benjamin knows less feeble ways to resist and is at
long last drawn into the seemingly impossible conflict. Soon he is a
rebel leader hiding in the swamps and known by the nickname "the
Ghost" and putting some of the honor back into the winning.
     If all this sounds like the beginnings of a children's movie,
perhaps a reframing of adventures of Robin Hood, the facts will
certainly bear that interpretation.  There are many good things
about THE PATRIOT, but the core of the plot is not one of them.
There are episodes in this film one would expect from a children's
TV show.  While there are some nice battlefield scenes, when
Benjamin fights the British hand-to-hand, they are far too easy to
beat.  One shot and they are dead.  It is almost like knocking down
nine-pins.  People are a lot harder to kill than that.  Benjamin
Martin is in part based on Francis Marion, nicknamed "the Swamp
Fox."  A part of preparation I did to see this film was to watch
Walt Disney's THE SWAMP FOX, starring Leslie Nielson.  This is by
far the nicer production but at heart I would put the two stories on
a par with each other.  The film is directed by Roland Emmerich and
produced by him and Dean Devlin.  This is the team responsible for
STARGATE, INDEPENDENCE DAY, and GODZILLA.  They consciously aim
films at a level of young teenagers, and THE PATRIOT is no
exception, though the historical recreation, the costumes, the look
of the film, all should make this a film of interest to a wider
audience than the basic plot would alone.
     While the plot is on a childish level, the script as a whole is
somewhat better.  Written by Robert Rodat, author of SAVING PRIVATE
RYAN, the film contains some rather noteworthy discussions of the
ethics of war.  Tavington, the blood enemy of Martin, sort of this
films Sheriff of Nottingham, is totally ruthless with his enemy and
is happy to slaughter any of the enemy who get in his way.
Cornwallis (played by Tom Wilkinson) and several others of the
British do not buy into his concept of total war and are shocked at
his brutality.  This sympathy to particular British, even while
making the British the enemy may seem like a small thing, but notice
that in films like GANDHI there are almost no sympathetic British
characters.  It is nice to see someone saying that as a colonial
power Britain had some scruples.
     With the exception of its treatment of the British colonialists
the script tries a little hard to be politically correct.  Most of
the Americans we meet are against slavery and live in friendly
neighborliness with a colony of blacks.  There have been some
protests that Benjamin Martin is based on Francis Marion and Marion
is currently interpreted as being what we would call a racist.  In
fact he seems to be based only in part on parts of him.  Martin
should probably be considered a wholly fictional character.  While I
am on the subject of discussions of the philosophy of war, there is
a marvelous exchange between Cornwallis and Martin in which
Cornwallis complains that it is wrong for Martin to target British
officers.  If you kill off the officers and leave just the men you
will have chaos on the battlefield, he complains.  In one sentence
he douses us with culture shock and sums up the differences of 18th
century warfare and the more modern brand that was coming.  That may
well be the best written line in any film I have seen this year.
     Culture shock is just why one wants to see historical films.
How many Americans have had an opportunity to look out their front
window and see two armies fighting?  How many have seen the battle
wash like a wave over their homes?  Luckily almost nobody since the
Civil War.  It is rare that we see any film about the Revolutionary
War and far rarer that we see that war from the eyes of the southern
colonies.  Still some of what we see is a little hard to believe.
Several of the scenes created for this film seem to have been
digitally enhanced so they seem less like real photographic scenes
and more like nicely composed paintings.  But nicely created is what
we see of the day-to-day life in the southern colonies.  This part
was overseen by experts from the Smithsonian Institute and what we
see does have an air of authenticity.  Some of the battle scenes are
also authentic in a brutal sort of way.  The destruction done by
swords and cannonballs and even musket balls obviously could be
fairly brutal compared to the relatively clean wounds made by
bullets.  If anything this film underplays how much gore there
really was in a battle, though seeing Gibson go at someone with an
Indian hatchet (mercifully behind foliage) and seeing pieces of
person flying is something that parent should be warned against
before bringing young children.  The costume work with this film is
excellent.  Some of the scenes with Mel Gibson riding with the
banner of the American flag are a bit over-ripe in the same way as
scene that people complained about in THE POSTMAN.  John Williams
has written a decent score, though at times it is reminiscent of
Hans Zimmer.
     Mel Gibson is a good actor, probably better than most with his
popularity, but some of what was needed for this role he just did
not have.  He does not express sadness well.  When Clint Eastwood
loses his home and family in THE OUTLAW JOSEY WALES you do feel his
loss.  Gibson does not convey the same sort of loss well.  Chris
Cooper has been an actor I have looked for since MATEWAN.  He is
becoming a lot easier to find.  AMERICAN BEAUTY seems to have made
his name, but recently I have seen him in OCTOBER SKY, and two days
before THE PATRIOT he was in ME, MYSELF & IRENE.  Other notables in
this film include Rene Auberjonois, Tcheky Karyo, and Tom Wilkinson.
     On a plot level THE PATRIOT is a disappointment, but most
everything else is done well.  That earns the film a 7 on the 0 to
10 scale and a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Secret Garden, The (1993)
          Capsule review:  THE SECRET GARDEN is an artistically
     perfect rendering of a horribly cloying Edwardian children's
     story.  The Transcendentalist view of the perfection of
     nature sops right through and saturates this story.  It tells
     how one little girl is able to redeem three people's lives
     through the magic of a wonderful garden full of bunnies and
     lambs and foxes all playing together.  The film is supremely
     crafted but for someone else's taste.  Rating: low +1 (-4 to
     +4).  An artistic +2; an entertainment -1.
     When it comes to film, I have no guilty pleasures.  A common game among
film fans is to say what films are bad, but that they enjoy anyway.  I just
do not accept the concept that a film is bad but I like it in spite of its
obvious faults.  If I like a film, it really is a good film, to my mind.  I
may be one of the few people who enjoys a film such as LIFEFORCE or EXORCIST
II, but to me that is just because others simply do not appreciate that
these really are films with positive qualities.  On the other hand, I do
accept that there are good films I just cannot appreciate.  I recognize
quality but I still cannot bring myself to like this wonderful piece of art.
Ingmar Bergman is probably a really good filmmaker and I admit it, but THE
SEVENTH SEAL is his only film that I find enjoyable, and then only if I am
in the right mood.  CHARIOTS OF FIRE is very well made, but it does nothing
at all for me.  THE SECRET GARDEN is a beautiful and near-flawless
adaptation of a gawd-awful Edwardian children's story that would have done
better to remain in a dusty box in the attic.
     Kate Maberly plays Mary Lennox, a ten-year-old born in India around the
turn of the century.  She hates India and she hates her parents.  When an
earthquake kills her parents she is sent back to England to find more things
to hate.  She goes to live in her uncle's mansion which seems larger than
Yankee Stadium and somehow feels dead wherever you go.  Of her uncle there
is little sign.  He mourns for the death of his wife, a twin to Mary's
mother.  The mansion is ruled over my Mrs. Medlock (played by Maggie Smith),
who has no use for little Mary.  Mary is more or less expected to sit around
all day and ignore the sobbing coming from someone about whom nobody will
tell her.  But our adolescent Jane Eyre discovers on the grounds of the
mansion a garden that was kept by her aunt and has since been locked up.  In
this garden there are bright colors, nature seems to be alive, and it's the
only truly alive place on the whole grounds.  Mary discovers the garden and
discovers her sick, apparently dying cousin.  Through her love of nature and
the garden and with the help of two wonderful servants, little Mary saves
her cousin's life, makes her own life worth living, and pulls her uncle out
of his miasma of self-pity.  But none of that is remotely surprising when
you see the magic of nature in the hidden garden.  Here robins understand
and love children.  Sweet little bunnies play with chubby little foxes and
get along perfectly well.  Little new-born lambs test their wobbly legs for
the first time.  It is a place where there can be no doubts that God is an
Englishman and this is his own personal petting zoo.
     THE SECRET GARDEN is a project of American Zoetrope, who in 1979
produced THE BLACK STALLION, the first half of which is a truly wonderful
piece of filmmaking.  And some of THE SECRET GARDEN captures some of the
same feel.  It was directed by Agnieszka Holland, who previously directed
EUROPA, EUROPA and OLIVIER, OLIVIER.  (I wonder if she wanted to rename this
one GARDEN, GARDEN.)  The photography (by Roger Deakins) is wonderful, even
if what is in front of the camera is exaggerated and unctuous.  When the
house should looks dismal, it looks really dismal.  The grounds are gray and
depressing.  Inside the garden all of a sudden every detail jumps out at the
viewer--every corny bunny and lamb.  Holland just perfectly captures a mood
so dismally ugly or so cloyingly sweet that I, for one, felt like gagging.
I admit what she did, she did well.  Artistically this is a +2 film; for my
experience it is a -1.  Let me split the difference and give this film a low
+1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Fargo (1996)
     Joel and Ethan Coen have gone slightly eccentric in their last two
films.  With the exception of some work with Sam Raimi, they initially
came to the public's attention with BLOOD SIMPLE in 1984.  Since then
they made RAISING ARIZONA, MILLER'S CROSSING, BARTON FINK, and THE
HUDSUCKER PROXY.  One after another was both a popular and critical
success.  But THE HUDSUCKER PROXY was just a little too weird, like a
surreal, cartoonish imitation of Frank Capra films, and it was their
first critical failure.  To prove that they still have what it takes
they have returned with a film similar in style to BLOOD SIMPLE with
the same realistic approach but with more style.  FARGO is likely to be
a real winner for the Coen Brothers.
     Our story takes place in Minnesota and North Dakota.  Jerry
Lundegaard (played by William H. Macy) is an unsavory wheeler-dealer
who cheats on every human transaction he can manage, sometimes a
little, sometimes a lot.  As the film opens he is arranging to have his
wife Jean (Kristin Rudrud) kidnapped so his wealthy father-in-law will
pay the ransom.  Lundegaard expects to split the ransom with the
kidnappers and have the money for a land deal.  Hired for the job are
two thugs, the irascible Carl Showalter (Steve Buscemi) and the quiet
but violent Gaear Grimsrud (Peter Stormare).  Once the kidnapping has
taken place things get out of hand.  Police chief Marge Gunderson
(Francis McDormand) gets involved investigating.
     In a film of interesting characterizations, McDormand's Gunderson
stands out.  It is strange to see a pregnant woman as a police chief.
It is even stranger to find a police chief with cloying over-
enthusiastic mannerisms as if she is teaching Ding-Dong School.  She is
the sort of woman who answers a simple how- are-you? with "I'm doing
REALLY SUPER!"  But put her at the scene of a crime and that is just
what she does, super.  In moments she has a sophisticated forensic
analysis.  Her straight-arrow approach is in stark contrast to the
habitually scamming character played by William H. Macy, everybody's
worst nightmare of a car salesman.  Somewhat more familiar is Buscemi's
irascible and nasty smalltime hood getting a shot at bigger things.
But the Coen Brothers have a talent for creating memorable characters
even from people in small walk-on parts.  A cashier with an odd smile
and a rubber-faced prostitute each make unexpectedly interesting camera
studies.
     And not just the characters are interesting.  Even a lunch pulled
from a buffet adds texture to the film.  Joel Coen gambles he can make
interesting some unconventional subjects of shots and more often than
not he is right.  The Coen Brothers seem to have wanted to make a real
document of life in a deep, cold Minnesota winter.  It is as if the two
Texas-born filmmakers wanted to get it all on film once so they would
never have to return.  It is hard to blame them.  The cold of the snowy
environment pervades the whole film.  People are walking through snow,
constantly tripping, trying to get to their cars and scrape
windshields.  People talk to each other from inside cave-like fur
hoods.
     Carter Burwell's score works, but seems strangely unconventional.
The main theme sounds more appropriate for some sort of historical
epic, though perhaps it could also fit the epic struggle of against the
elements in the cold Northern winter.  This is a film with some heavy
violence and some good humor.  (One of the best laughs is in the
closing credits.  Be warned, early risers.)  Also notice that there
seems to be a little study of how different people use and react to
profanity.  This is an audience-pleaser that rates a high +2 on the -4
to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Sirens (1994)

Title
Review for Wag the Dog (1997)
     Somewhere lost in WAG THE DOG's 97 minutes is a bright, funny,
pointed, and even frightening 20- minute film.  The film makes some
good points about the state of political images, about technology, and
about the American public.  But the film says it all concisely fairly
quickly, then says it again, then for good measure says it again.
Eventually the movie which from the outside would seem short out-stays
its welcome.  It is surprising that Barry Levinson thought that he
could get by with one-dimensional characters in so repetitious a story
however engaging and important the central idea was.  Levinson knows
the value of good characters.  He built his reputation with DINER and
he directed AVALON.  Both are films with very real, very believable
characters.  This instead is an idea film, but it gives us the same
idea over and over. The script is by Harry Henkin and David Mamet based
on the novel AMERICAN HERO by Larry Beinhart. It tells us that what we
remember from the wars of our past are images and ceremonies.  For
example, from World War II we remember the raising of the flag at Iwo
Jima and a sailor kissing a girl in New York City when the war is
over--the visual images of that war that had power.  From Vietnam we
remember a young girl running screaming in a street after a napalm
attack; then there is the illegal pistol execution in another street.
These images could always have been orchestrated and many probably
were.  And as time has passed the creation of these images has only
become easier and less expensive with techniques like digital image
processing.  The government feeds us images rather than facts, or at
least such is the implication of WAG THE DOG.
     It is less than two weeks to the national election and the
President is in big trouble.  It seems he is accused of sexually
abusing a Firefly Girl, part of a troop visiting the Capital Building.
(I know that our current President is unpopular in some quarters, but
even so this seems like a somewhat exaggerated premise.)  An image
expert, Conrad Brean (Robert DeNiro), is called in protect the
President from the accusation and after some deliberation he determines
that the best strategy is to give the President a military victory in
the few days before the election.  A war has to appear to start up and
the President has to appear to win the war in just the short period of
time before the election.  Brean determines that the winning approach
is to fabricate a war with Albania.  To bring off such a war he needs
the help of a top Hollywood producer.  His choice is the handsome,
graying Stanley Motss (Dustin Hoffman).
     From there the film goes into a series of repetitious cycles.
First there is the brainstorming session where Brean and Motss talk in
understated tone about what sort of an image they need to impress the
public.  Not surprisingly, this sounds almost like they are planning
for the production of a film.  They hit on some idea upon which they
can agree.  The suggestion is actually produced and we see a few of the
steps that go into the production to make it seem possible.  Finally we
see the final implementation as the public would see it and it is some
variation on some image that inspired the public in some previous war.
A song will sound very much like a song we remember, or some monument
to the war heroes will look like some famous monument, aut cetera.
Binding these cycles together is a bit of a plot, but not much of one.
     The film offers two good actors in the lead roles, Dustin Hoffman
and Robert DeNiro.  But there is little in this film to give much of a
clue to who these people really are beyond what their jobs are.
However, DeNiro plays his role a bit suppressed and Hoffman takes
advantage of this to appear a much more outgoing person amused by the
political machinations and his new-found power.  The two are
accompanied by Anne Heche, who seems to have been added to this film as
an after-thought.  She has little to do but tag along.
     People who are nearer to either the film industry or the political
process may find that there is much in this film that is on-target, but
for many viewers this film will be an argument that there is still a
place for the short film and perhaps it should be used more often.  I
rate this film a 5 on the 0 to 10 scale and a low +1 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Coming to America (1988)
     Let me not mince words.  I have liked some of John Landis's films, but
too many have seemed like extended comedy sketches.  He is generally weak on
characters and weaker on storyline.  Eddie Murphy is a standup comic who can
be funny but whose films have had little of quality beyond his jokes.  His
acting range is dwarfed even by John Wayne's.  Both Landis and Murphy are
symbolic of what is going wrong with screen comedy.  The only current comedy
I wanted to see less than John Landis's Eddie Murphy comedy COMING TO
AMERICA was ARTHUR 2 ON THE ROCKS.  Then I heard that COMING TO AMERICA was
supposed to be a departure for Landis and Murphy.  It got good reviews on
television.  So I tried it.  COMING TO AMERICA is to date the high-water
mark for Landis's directorial career and it is the best film Eddie Murphy
has ever been in.  Even more than BULL DURHAM, it is a throwback to earlier
comedies.  Watching it, I was reminded of comedies by Lubitsch and Capra,
and of stories by O.~Henry.  The storyline is simple and predictable like an
O.~Henry story, but it is told with warmth.
     Prince Akeem of Zamunda--played by Murphy without a lot of smirky
highjinks, but with dignity and sincerity--objects to the wife his father
(regally played by the great James Earl Jones) has chosen for him.  Instead
he decides to go to America and find someone he wants.  He wants someone
with a mind and a will of her own who wants him for himself.  This ploy is a
familiar one: he will pretend to be a poor man and find a wife like
commoners do.  With him he takes his faithful servant Semmi.  Arsenio Hall
plays Semmi so well one wishes the two roles had been reversed.
     Landis has assembled a very good cast for this story with Hall, Jones,
Shari Headley (very appealing as the woman Murphy wants to marry), and John
Amos as her father, who runs an imitation McDonald's restaurant so close
that the McDonald's corporation is going to sue him any day.  In addition,
there are a raft of minor characters who add depth and texture to the film.
The liberal sprinkling of minor characters is a characteristic of the good
classic comedies but in recent years we see less of it because they take
good writing and they take away screen time from the major stars.  In COMING
TO AMERICA they do away with that problem by having Murphy and Hall play
many of the minor characters in Rick Baker's heavy makeup.
     Just to show I was not totally bowled over by this film, I will say
that there were problems with the scenes in Zamunda.  It should be a never-
never land, but Zamunda seems more never-never than most.  Perhaps my
geography is bad, but for a heavily forested African kingdom, the vegetation
seemed all wrong.  It is a very wealthy kingdom in which baby elephants have
the big ears of African elephants, but the adult elephants have the small
ears of Indian elephants.  On top of all this, the matte work to show the
African palace is abominable.
     These are definitely quibbles, but they are noticeable and still I give
COMING TO AMERICA a strong +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.  Landis and Murphy, how
about more of the same.  (Oh, and you will have no problem finding the
reference to SEE YOU NEXT WEDNESDAY.)

Title
Review for Exotica (1994)
     There is a party game called "A Stick Falls, a Man Dies."  The
person running the game gives players a very high-level description of
an invented incident and players try to figure out what really
happened, asking only yes-or-no questions.  By doing this players geta
fragment of the story here, one there, soon there are whole parts of
the story they understand.  Finally the right piece falls into place
and they understand  the whole story.  Films, of necessity, make the
viewer play a similar game.  In the first scene of a film the audience
see characters they don't yet know in a situation they don't yet
understand.  Most filmmakers try to bring viewers up to speed as
quickly as possible, giving all the necessary clues as quickly as
possible.  Generally it is the mark of a bad filmmaker to leave the
viewer confused.  But it is very possible to tell a story much like as
in the game where the pieces are revealed in no particular order.  A
bit at a time, the way the pieces fit together is uncovered to the
viewer until the viewer has a whole story.  PULP FICTION did that to
some extent, telling its interlocking stories out of chronological
order on purpose to make the audience work to piece together the
overall story.  MARATHON MAN intentionally shows the audience a very
diverse set of scenes with odd characters before it starts knitting
them together into a single story.  Canadian filmmaker Atom Egoyan goes
much further in that direction in his cinematic jigsaw puzzle EXOTICA.
The characters and situations are intentionally confusing to challenge
the viewer initially to put them together to make a story.  And with
Egoyan's mischievous wit, the story is not just told as a jigsaw
puzzle, it is told to mislead on purpose.  The gaps that the viewer
attempts to fill in for himself, he is probably wrong about.  And the
story that gets shown to the viewer a bit at a time is perfectly suited
to this style of telling.  It is about the secrets in people's lives
that they do not reveal to others, and perhaps not even to themselves.
     The one problem in all this is that when you hear the solution in
the party game, the story may make a nifty puzzle solution, but it is
just not that good a story all by itself.  EXOTICA has the same
problem.  When the last secrets are disclosed in the final scene, what
you have is a story that needs the convoluted telling because it just
is not compelling on its own.  The plot that connects the three major
characters--the smuggler, the tax auditor, and the strip club host--
seems overly contrived and frankly, just not all that interesting.  One
comes away saying, "Oh.  Is that all?"  The story is curiously
unmoving.
     Egoyan both wrote and directed this piece which is bound to appeal
to some audiences for the intellectual appeal of what is slowly
revealed in its central puzzle.  And it may appeal to quite a different
audience for what is more quickly and easily revealed in its explicit
sex club scenes.
     This is a film with more than its share of surprises that expertly
catches the viewer off-balance more often than not.  Unfortunately,
Egoyan is more interested in his game of secrets about his characters
than in actually giving us insights.  I give EXOTICA a +1 on the -4 to
+4 scale.

Title
Review for League of Their Own, A (1992)
          Capsule review:  Move over, Rosie the Riveter: this film
     celebrates Betty the Baseball Player.  Penny Marshall tells
     the story of the women's baseball league founded during World
     War II.  The script is a little cliched and predictable, but
     Marshall, as usual, tells an engrossing story.  Rating: +1
     (-4 to +4).
     At one point in A LEAGUE OF THEIR OWN, Dottie Hinson (played by Geena
Davis) observes that playing baseball is hard.  Veteran ballplayer Jimmy
Dugan (played by Tom Hanks) tells her sagely, "If it wasn't hard, everyone
would do it.  The hard makes it great."  I think that must play better to
baseball fans than it does to me.  Having as I do virtually zero interest in
the game itself, I would not play no matter how easy it was for me.  Nor do
I believe that the game is great or that its hardness makes it great.  The
presence of baseball will not make a film very good in itself.  For a
baseball film actually to be good it has to rely not on good baseball
content or the belief that playing baseball is somehow a noble profession.
That is why I like THE NATURAL and FIELD OF DREAMS, but THE PRIDE OF THE
YANKEES leaves me cold.  I think that A LEAGUE OF THEIR OWN really requires
of the viewer a belief that there was something noble in women playing
baseball and keeping the sport alive while most of the men players were
fighting in World War II.  For me that is a difficult leap of faith to make
and you can weight this review accordingly.
     A LEAGUE OF THEIR OWN is, I suspect, almost pure fiction vaguely
inspired by real events as was director Penny Marshall's previous film,
AWAKENINGS.  Undoubtedly some of the background detail is accurate, but most
of the drama is probably made up of the whole cloth.  The story tells how
Hinson and her sister Kit Keller (played by Lori Petty) are recruited by a
hilariously rude and obnoxious scout (played by Jon Lovitz).  Sixty-four
women are chosen to field the four teams of the All-American Girls
Professional Baseball League.  Kit is more anxious to play than is her older
sister, but Dottie is a natural.  Not that anyone seems to care.  Their
alcoholic team manager, Dugan, introduces himself to his team by shuffling
drunkenly to the locker room urinal, using it, and shuffling back out.
During the games, he shows his commitment to the team by sleeping,
scratching his crotch, or practicing what appears to be a regimen of losing
ten pounds a week by spitting.  Hanks takes to this role as if his view of
baseball players mirrors my own.  League President Ira Lowenstein (played by
David Strathairn) at first is anxious only to be certain that the skirts on
the uniforms are short enough to attract audience interest.  The news media
seems even less interested, editorializing against the "masculinization of
women" and then making amused and patronizing newsreels about the women's
league.
     The script is by Lowell Ganz and Babaloo Mandel and is something of a
comedown for the team, who wrote PARENTHOOD and CITY SLICKERS.  Much in the
plot is incredibly predictable and overly cliched.  A word that is overused
to describe a film of this sort is "manipulative."  Actually, a film should
be manipulative, and Ganz and Mandel have done it well in the past.  Here it
is often done well, but other times done too obviously.  The last ten
minutes of the film are maudlin and drag.  They could and should have been
cut to two minutes.  The script comes perilously close to making fun of the
awkward, plain, and shy Marla (played by Megan Cavanaugh).  While some of
the male characters redeem themselves later in the film, they almost
universally are insensitive jerks when we first meet them.
     That brings me to the issue of hypocrisy in this superficially feminist
film.  The order of billing is Hanks, Davis, Madonna (as a stereotypical
loose woman), and Petty.  Based on contribution, the order should have been
Davis, Petty, Hanks, and Madonna.  Top billing for Hanks is absurd; he just
did not do more than Davis or Petty.  The locker room scenes are G-ratable
in the first half of the film, then suddenly turn "peek-a-boo" in the second
half of the film.
     The score by Hans Zimmer deserves some credit, occasionally having some
of the mythic feel of Randy Newman's score for THE NATURAL.  However, it
mixes in rock, which seems out of place in a film mostly about the 1940s.  I
would like to call some attention to David Strathairn as Lowenstein.  He
plays quiet and usually likable characters of integrity.  He played a
policeman sympathetic to the strikers in MATEWAN and a commander very
worried for the safety of his men in MEMPHIS BELLE.  He reminds me a lot of
a latter-day Henry Fonda.  I have never seen him in a bad film, which
indicates either that he is intelligent enough to select only better scripts
or that his acting has qualities that appeal only to better filmmakers.
     One final nice touch: the script calls for us to see most of the main
characters as they look almost fifty years later.  Normally this would be
done with a makeup effect. These makeup effects are rarely done believably
and the results are almost always at least suspect.  Marshall went to the
effort of finding look-alike actors of approximately correct ages, then had
the younger actors dub the voices.  The effect is reasonably convincing.
     Considerable money and effort was lavished on this production, but
problems in the script diminish the effort to a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Ed Wood (1994)
     Tim Burton has made just about the only biography that could have
been made of the film-making career of Ed Wood Jr. since there are so
many legends of filmmaker.  He has probably correctly assumed people
who come to see the film are less interested in delving into the
character of the man and more in having and extension of the experience
they have laughing at the ineptitude of the films Wood made.  Burton
has created a stylish film to poke fun at Wood.
     When the film opens Wood (played by Johnny Depp) is a handyman at
Universal Studios who produces silly, pretentious plays with the Ed
Wood touch of ineptitude.  But Wood idolizes Orson Welles, who was
writing, directing, and acting in his own film at 26.  Wood is already
30 and feels the need to be an auteur filmmaker, right now.  The
problem is that with the exception of producing some really terrible
plays he has no experience relevant to making films.  However, he has
the confidence that he knows everything that he needs to know.  A
chance meeting with Bela Lugosi give him the edge he needs to get his
first film made as well as beginning a friendship that would last the
rest of Lugosi's years.
     Wood's one flaw time and time again is in assuming he has talent
and is creating great art.  Of course the films he really does create
are notorious for their ineptitude.  On a small scale he is not unlike
Roger Corman--he will give anyone an opportunity to be in his films
without discrimination on the basis of talent.  This gets earns him a
sort of the following of a coterie of talentless actors who find easy
employment with Wood.  The list centers on the fading Bela Lugosi but
includes Swedish wrestler Tor Johnson, fake psychic Criswell, and
horror show host Vampira.  Unfortunately, with the exception of one
marquee reference, the film never mentions Lyle Talbot.  Talbot had
been in major productions before and after the Wood films he was in as
well as being a regular on the TV show "Ozzie and Harriet."  It would
have been interesting to know more about why he was willing to accept
minuscule wages to appear in Wood's productions.
     The style of the film is to weave together many of the anecdotes
that have appeared elsewhere for years.  Many are probably true, others
apocryphal.  Wood was certainly a transvestite, as shown in ED WOODFR
WOOD, and much of what was coherent about GLEN OR GLENDA? was an
autobiographical study of a transvestite.  Whether or not he would let
being a transvestite affect his directing in later films as shown could
well be just legend.  Wood's friendship and attention did help Lugosi
through the aging actor's final years, but whether his relationship was
really as close as shown probably depends on to who is telling the
story.  And certainly the ending of the film is a fantasy in Ed's mind
and one wonders how much else is a fantasy in this film.  There are
obvious anachronisms in the film.  The producer of GLEN OR GLENDA? has
a stack of film cans behind his desk including one labeled "One-Eyed
Samurai."  I find this very unlikely for an American film producer in
1952.
     Johnny Depp puts a little too much energy into Wood.  At least on
screen Wood's body language seems to indicate a man a bit more placid
and laid back than Depp plays him.  Landau's ailing Bela Lugosi really
looks very good, a combination of Rick Baker's excellent makeup and
Landau's own study of Lugosi's facial expression.  Burton is banking on
not too many people being able to recall Wood's looks and demeanor, but
Lugosi's is too familiar a face too familiar for Burton to take similar
liberties.
     Story accuracy beyond that point is open to some interpretation.
Though the film is based on Rudolph Grey's NIGHTMARE OF ECSTASY: THE
LIFE AND ART OF EDWARD D. WOOD, JR.," I doubt if it or any other
existing piece of research is a serious study of Ed Wood, and perhaps
Wood does not deserve a serious study.  If the film adaptation is any
indication, the book is not always well researched.  Lugosi is shown to
be lonely and alone, a drug addict for twenty years and not having made
a film in the last four.  It is true this was a particularly rocky
period in Lugosi's life.  After DRACULA Lugosi was always the victim of
his own poor discretion in the roles he chose and of the narrowness of
his acting repertoire.  He really as an actor better suited to silent
film than sound.  There are only so many roles that require his forte,
which was looking mysterious.  He ended up playing too many red herring
butlers in too many cheap horror mysteries.  After he played Dracula
for the last time on screen in ABBOTT AND COSTELLO MEET FRANKENSTEIN he
was also the victim of Universal Studio's ingratitude for his previous
contributions.
     But Lugosi's state was looking up as a look at Lugosi's
filmography indicates. And there was a revival in his career--of sorts-
--from 1952 to his death in 1956.  GLEN OR GLENDA? was actually the
second of three films he made in 1952 after OLD MOTHER RILEY MEETS A
VAMPIRE and before BELA LUGOSI MEETS A BROOKLYN GORILLA.  After his
drug rehabilitation Lugosi also married his fifth wife, a fan as a wife
who remained loving and loyal to him until his death.  In 1956 he made
THE BLACK SLEEP and took some part in the publicity campaigns.  It was
not even a speaking role but presumably between that and TV appearances
he could at least squeak by.
     This film opens trying to give the feel of an Ed Wood film but the
haunted house we see in the beginning has more the feel of Burton's
films with miniatures much like we have seen in Burton fantasy films
since "Frankenweenie."  On the other hand Burton does a fairly good job
of recreating scenes that look much like they did in the original Wood
films.  Actors do not always look quite like their original
counterparts, especially Bill Murray as Bunny Breckenridge, but some
scenes do bear an uncanny resemblance to their original film versions.
One need look no further than Universal's MAN OF A THOUSAND FACES to
realize how much worse the recreations could have been.
     If one is really interested in the real behind-the-cameras dirt of
popular 1950s entertainment, the current QUIZ SHOW is far better done
and more credible.  But for a diverting couple of hours, ED WOOD is
enjoyable entertainment.  I rate it a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Dances with Wolves (1990)
          Capsule review:  Epic portrait of a Sioux tribal life as
     seen through the eyes of a Civil War officer.  American
     Indians have rarely or never been portrayed so believably and
     sympathetically.  Its biggest flaw is that the White Man does
     not seem as realistically portrayed.  The films resembles
     WHITE DAWN and FAREWELL TO THE KING in plot and spirit.
     Rating: high +2 (-4 to +4).
     I suspect that of all the films of 1989, the one that will be best
remembered will be GLORY.  It may not be the best film of 1989, but it has a
sort of timeless quality that will hold up for many years.  That was 1989.
This year I think we have an even better film that has that same timeless
quality.  There have been films in the past that have tried to give
sympathetic views of the American Indian.  It is not hard to be more
sympathetic than films like FORT APACHE.  LITTLE BIG MAN, unaccountably
popular, attempted to be sympathetic but gave the impression that the
writers knew nothing about American Indians.  (I do not know if the novel
was as bad or not.)  Other films such as CHEYENNE AUTUMN tried to speak of
injustices done to the Indians, but they too never got into the minds of
native Americans.  Perhaps DANCES WITH WOLVES, based on the novel by Michael
Blake, is no more authentic than is LITTLE BIG MAN, but it certainly feels
like the most authentic film ever made about American Indian culture.
     Kevin Costner directs and stars as John Dunbar, who is to have his leg
amputated due to wounds in a Civil War battle.  Not having the courage to
face his future, he attempts suicide and in doing so accidentally makes
himself a hero.  This not only wins him medical care sufficient to save his
leg, he is also given his choice of posting.  Wishing to see the Western
frontier before it is overrun by the white man, he requests a posting to an
isolated and deserted fort far out on the frontier.  His thoughts about
facing hostile animals and more hostile Sioux are overcome by his curiosity
and his willingness to accept and appreciate that which is alien to him.
The film picks up his enthusiasm to meet, understand, and befriend the very
alien culture of the neighboring Sioux.  He must first overcome their
distrust.  There the storyteller somewhat unrealistically contrives
circumstances in Dunbar's favor.  This is a long film and each stage of his
acceptance by the Sioux is shown and not overly glossed over.  In
particular, language problems are quite believably difficult and eventually
overcome by another contrivance.  Eventually Dunbar is accepted into the
Sioux society and Costner can show us how Sioux lived and thought.
     If the film has a major weakness it is that it exaggerates the
stupidity and strangeness (even if not the cruelty) of the hordes of
invading white men.  The positive view of the Sioux would be more believable
if the view of the White Man had more credibility.  There is a love story of
Dunbar with a white woman who has been Sioux since she was captured as a
child.  This subplot could have been a distraction from showing us the Sioux
lifestyle, but if so it was only a minor one.  Mary McDonnell, familiar from
MATEWAN, plays Dunbar's lover interest, Stands with a Fist.
     DANCES WITH WOLVES is told with a grace and humor that keeps the viewer
constantly entertained through its nearly three-hour length.  Costner is to
be congratulated for creating such an unorthodox film (about a quarter us in
Lakota, the Sioux language, and subtitled), and at the same time so
enjoyable a film his first time directing.  I give it a high +2 on the -4 to
+4 scale.

Title
Review for Hilary and Jackie (1998)
     From those who would make great music the gods extract a heavy
toll.  How many times have we seen this in film?  We have seen this in
films from A SONG TO REMEMBER to AMADEUS, SHINE, and this season's
HILARY AND JACKIE.  But the latter actually may be closer to a RICH AND
FAMOUS or a BEACHES in plotting.  It give us the lives of two women,
lifelong friends (in this case sisters) and follows one through fame
and fortune and the other through the simple life, concluding at the
end that celebrity is not worth its price.  And it tells this story, as
SULLIVAN'S TRAVELS would say, "with a little bit of sex." If this was
the first film we had ever seen on these themes it would get full
marks.  But there have been surprisingly many similar stories.  The
film is supposed to be the true story of Hilary and cello master
Jacqueline Du Pre, but a heavy set of disclaimers in the closing
credits suggest that it may not be even that.
     The film opens with the two as children with a mother (Celia
Imrie) who endows both with love and a sense of wonder for music.  We
see her transcribing and leaving them by their beds overnight new
melodies for them to discover and excitedly play in the morning.
Hilary is older and more accomplished on the flute. Jacqueline can
barely get a decent melody out of her cello.  Hilary gets attention for
her flute skills, little Jackie feels left out and determines to catch
up with her sister.  So her abilities have to develop at a faster rate
and they continue to do so.  Soon the two are recognized as award-
winning musical prodigies, though now it is Hilary who is jealous of
the attention paid to Jacqueline.  Both girls learned from their mother
the supposed bad habit of putting too much body expression into their
playing.  To them playing is almost a little bit of dance.  Jacqueline
gets a good teacher who is tolerant of the body language.  Hilary's
teacher is an ogre who is intolerant of her having so much fun with her
playing.  The teacher ruins the joy of her playing.  The film splits in
two paths.  First it tells the story of Hilary, the quiet young woman
with a famous sister.  While Jacqueline travels the world with apparent
disdain for her family, Hilary wistfully follows her sister's career.
She meets a man, falls in love, and then has her sister re-enters her
life, a different and disturbed person.  The film then returns to the
splitting and tells the story of Jacqueline Du Pre and why she is so
unhappy with her fame and remains envious of Hilary.
     It has been suggested that this film puts the Du Pre parents and
Jacqueline's husband, Daniel Barenboim, in a bad light.  It is true
that there is something unfavorable about each of them at some point in
the film.  The Du Pre parents are not shown to be perfect, but then
what parents are?  Certainly Mrs. Du Pre is the source of the genius of
her daughters.  Her husband is a bit obtuse at times, but not
destructively.  A little more of the film's criticism is reserved for
Barenboim as Jacqueline's husband, but on balance he seems to be a more
devoted and more reasonable spouse than Jacqueline was.  There is
little that Daniel does to Jacqueline that Jacqueline has not done to
Daniel first.
     Jacqueline Du Pre is played by Emily Watson of BREAKING THE WAVES,
whose two big films have been about sexually disturbed women.  Both
films have allowed her to play women who are confused and a little
opaque.  It is hard to say if this is really good acting or not since
the women she plays are so unusual. There are far more ways to be
something out of the ordinary than to be commonplace.  Rachel Griffiths
as Hilary may have had the more difficult role, having to seem normal
but playing off her strange sister.
     HILARY AND JACKIE is more melodrama than serious drama.  It is not
exactly what would have been expected from the positive reaction this
film has been getting.  But even melodrama can be done well and as such
films go, this is one of the better ones.  Some of the music is
superlative.  I rate it a 6 on the 0 to 10 scale and a high +1 on the
-4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Earth Girls Are Easy (1989)
          Capsule review:  Helium-weight comedy has a typical
     Valley Girl (played by Geena Davis) meeting a bright blue
     furry alien (played by Jeff Goldblum looking like a flea-
     market bathmat).  EARTH GIRLS is based on the Julie Brown
     song of the same title.  Director Julien Temple also directed
     ABSOLUTE BEGINNERS and it was much better.  Rating: high 0.
     It all started when witty and moderately attractive Julie Brown nearly
made it to being chosen homecoming queen.  As she tells it, rather than just
being disappointed she struck back by writing songs making fun of all the
institutions her friends enjoyed.  Her songs--now a popular staple of the
Dr. Demento show--include "Everybody Run, the Homecoming Queen's Got a Gun,"
"'Cause I'm a Blond," and "Earth Girls Are Easy."  The last was done in a
Valley Girl accent as an air-head describes a close encounter of a fourth
kind with non-humanoid aliens.  When the song was sold to be made as a film,
Brown rephrased it to delete the non-humanoid references.  She also co-wrote
the script and plays a prominent role in the film.
     EARTH GIRLS ARE EASY hides the fact that it is really a British
production, directed by Julian Temple.  Temple directed the kinetically
stunning ABSOLUTE BEGINNERS, which unfortunately never found its market and
which died at the boxoffice.  EARTH GIRLS is a much less ambitious film, but
it probably is light and mindless enough to make the profit the other film
missed.
     EARTH GIRLS ARE EASY opens with a sort of pop-art spaceship in a pop-
art space scene.  Inside are three shaggy aliens, each one of the primary
colors (red, yellow, and blue), and each looking for female companionship.
Loneliest of all is Mac (played by Jeff Goldblum), who is not just merely
blue, he's really most sincerely blue.  But our three aliens strike it
lucky: they pick up a television broadcast from Earth and discover that this
planet has girls!
     Meanwhile, one such girl is Valerie (played by Geena Davis--a mere
decade too old for the role).  Valerie, the Valley Girl air-head of the
song, is engaged to Ted (played by--can you believe it?--Charles Rocket!), a
doctor who cannot resist *playing* doctor whenever he is given the
opportunity.  Julie catches Ted about to play "Dr. Love" with a nurse and
she throws him out of his own house.
     [Sorry--this next part has to be done in Valley Girl accent.]  Well,
like she's feeling all bummed out the next day, ya know, and like sitting
next to Ted's pool soaking up sun when--like wow!--this totally tubular
spaceship falls out of the sky and like, ya know, splashes down right there
in the pool.  Awesome!  She should know she can't make it with Mac because
he's like blue, ya know, and all covered with hair.  And, like they're from
two different worlds.  But then, hey, this is science fiction.  [Okay,
that's enough of that.]
     Temple's view of Americans is not very perceptive.  His production
numbers look like they are borrowed from GREASE and from 1960s beach blanket
movies.  He does have one very nice dream sequence, an homage to the props
of better-known science fiction films, but that is as close as EARTH GIRLS
ARE EASY ever gets to art.  If there is an idea to this sci-fi (in the worst
sense) film Temple has made clear that it is an unwelcome guest and has
sentenced it to solitary confinement.  I rate this cotton candy film a 0 on
the -4 to +4 scale.  Like wow.

Title
Review for English Patient, The (1996)
     A biplane flies over the North African desert, the pilot alert,
the passenger, a beautiful woman draped sensuously over the side of the
cockpit.  The plane flies too close to a German position below and they
fire at invader overhead.  The plane bursts into flames.  The pilot
tries to pull out the woman in front of him but ends up being badly
burned himself as the plane crashes.  Some passing Arabs rescue the
badly-burned man and take him to a hospital.  The man cannot tell the
medics what his name is or how he came to be flying over the desert.
The story advances in two lines, one of the disfigured patient (played
by Ralph Fiennes) and his relationship with Hana (Juliette Binoche), a
Canadian nurse who more or less adopts the dying man. Hana is a little
shell-shocked herself as anybody that she grows to care about dies or
is killed soon after. Feeling almost cursed she forms a close
attachment to the scarred patient who is apparently dying anyway. Hana
transports the patient to an abandoned farmhouse near Leghorn/Livorno
and begins tending him full- time.  Soon they are joined a the
farmhouse by Caravaggio (Willem Dafoe) who takes a strange interest in
the scarred man and at times seems to know something of the patient's
past.  They are joined by two more residents, bomb disposal experts.
     The flashback story starts in 1938 before the war and leads up to
the plane crash.  The man who will be the patient is Count Laszlo
Almasy, a handsome young man in the employ of the British government.
Based in Cairo, Almasy is taking part in a project to map the uncharted
regions of the North African desert.  He makes friends with Geoffrey
and Katherine Clifton (Colin Firth and Kristin Scott Thomas).  Together
they discover in the desert a cave with paintings of great
archeological significance.  This throws Laszlo and Katherine together
frequently and though they try hard to ignore each other, but there is
a sexual tension between them and they will inevitably be drawn
together.  The film is based on the novel by Michael Ondaatje, who was
born in Sri Lanka and educated in England, but lives in Canada.
Anthony Minghella wrote and directed this adaptation.
     Ralph Fiennes gives a cool and controlled performance as he always
seems to do.  As in his other films he cuts a dashing figure but
underplays rather than overplaying.  Even in scenes that should call
for deep emotion, his performances are muted and controlled.  He lets
the viewer read emotion into his actions and but for the exception of a
few scenes, that is true for most of the cast of THE ENGLISH PATIENT.
Kristen Scott Thomas is radiant in the desert but uninvolving, more an
icon and an image than a fully developed character.  She seems more
willing to bare her body than her emotions.  Though she has more screen
time than Binoche, I suspect, she never exhibits a personality that
goes much beyond bland.  Binoche is sort of the ideal nurse, but we see
little of what makes her fixate on this one patient.  Still we are able
to react with her in ways we cannot with the other three leads.
     John Seale photographs the story, using pleasant aerial
photography and sprawling views of the desert. There is an effective
scene of a sandstorm.  Minghella takes the image of the Swimming Man,
from the cave found in the desert, and uses it as an image repeatedly
as if it has for him specific meaning.  In fact he opens the film with
the image of the Swimming Man.  He must be seeing Almasy as being in
some way the Swimming Man.  It is a mysterious visual image to make as
important as it is in the visuals.  Its meaning remains a matter of
conjecture for the audience.  For the most part Minghella places
emotional barriers between the characters and the audience, all but
Binoche.  For the most part these figures remain as untouchable and
unemotional as the swimming figures on the cave wall.  Then
surprisingly toward the end of the film Minghella does give us one very
tense, almost melodramatic, scene.  It seem almost a throwaway and out
of place.
     THE ENGLISH PATIENT is a truly adult love story, generally well-
crafted if a little uninvolving.  I rate it a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Reversal of Fortune (1990)
          Capsule review:  Famous lawyer Alan Dershowitz defends
     Claus von Bulow in this adaptation of Dershowitz's book.
     While none of the characters is anyone you would really want
     to know or even deal with, some of the re-assessment of what
     appears initially to be an "open and shut" case is
     reminiscent of TWELVE ANGRY MEN.  Rating: high +1 (-4 to +4).
     There is an old exchange where one person says, "The rich are different
from us."  And the other person responds, "Yes, they have more money."
REVERSAL OF FORTUNE gives us glimpses into quite a few things but one is the
lifestyles of the very rich.  What we see is less than totally inviting.  In
REVERSAL OF FORTUNE our first impressions of Claus von Bulow play off all
our prejudices against the European aristocracy.  He is cultured, cold,
emotionless, and calculating.  He seems a marble statue that has been
granted the power of speech.  In a sense he is the damsel-in-distress of
this piece.  As the film begins he has already been found guilty of the
attempted murder of his wife Sunny.  To avoid going to prison he gets trial
lawyer and professor of law Alan Dershowitz to defend him.  Of course, as a
matter of record Dershowitz did successfully appeal the conviction and in a
retrial had von Bulow acquitted of the charges.  REVERSAL OF FORTUNE, based
on Dershowitz's own book, is the story of how Alan Dershowitz defended the
impassive Claus von Bulow.
     The film also gives us a view into Dershowitz's unorthodox defense
procedures.  He turns his house into a workshop with teams in each room
researching the legal ramifications of a different piece of evidence against
von Bulow.  The teams even have sweatshirts labeled with the piece of
evidence they are working on.  Dershowitz may be bragging about the
completeness of his approach but, in fact, one may wonder at the fairness of
expending this magnitude of resource in a legal action.  Dershowitz
moralizes why he should take the case even if von Bulow is so likely guilty,
but the audience never works up the respect for him and his methods that it
has for the dramatized Clarence Darrow in INHERIT THE WIND or the dramatized
Louis Nizer in A CASE OF LIBEL.  His causes are not so noble and his fees
are higher.  As unflattering as this film was to Claus, whose only moments
of humanity seem to be when he is having fun with his own ghoulish image in
the press, REVERSAL OF FORTUNE is far less flattering to Sunny.  This
daughter of the idle rich is shown to have been mostly dead already by his
own actions.  She is totally idle and self-indulgent.  Her hours out of bed,
which number only six a day, are a constant struggle to pass through he
system every drug she can lay her shaking hands on.  Regardless of anything
Claus did, we are led to believe that death or near-death was the expected
and logical result of an incredibly self-destructive lifestyle.  If she was
really as portrayed, one wonders how she survived as long as she did.
     In addition to Dershowitz's moralizing, there is one more piece of
moralizing that is irritating in the film.  The film pokes fun at von
Bulow's patronizing, if well-intentioned, attitude toward Dershowitz being
Jewish.  Yet several times the camera takes opportunities to remind us that
Dershowitz is not just a lawyer, he is a JEWISH lawyer.  Camera angles are
chosen to show a painting on a Jewish theme in Dershowitz's office or to
show a menorah in his home.  The camera is just as hung up on religion as is
von Bulow.
     Of the three stars, Glenn Close as Sunny von Bulow has top billing and
got the least screen time.  She does, however, narrate the story in spite of
the fact that it makes little sense to have a narrator who is speaking from
a coma and who was less than a clear thinker even before her coma.  Some
attention has been paid to Jeremy Irons's performance as Claus, though I
have always thought it is easier to be convincingly weird than to be
convincingly normal.
     On the whole, REVERSAL OF FORTUNE panders a bit too much to the fans of
crime "docudramas."  But it is told with wit and subtlety.  I would give it
a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Beaches (1988)
     BEACHES is the latest (presumably) of a number of somewhat similar
films about pairs of women who share each other's lives and develop
together.  They share each other's good times and bad.  They share joys and
tragedies.  Usually there are scenes where they turn bitchy to each other
and break up their friendship in hatred only to come back to each other.
Usually there is emphasis on the women's sex lives.  This sort of film is
always, deep down, a tribute to friendship and platonic love.  Example
include OLD ACQUAINTANCE, ENTRE NOUS, TERMS OF ENDEARMENT, RICH AND FAMOUS,
and perhaps THE TURNING POINT.  Gary Marshall has directed a new film along
these lines, BEACHES (is that title a pun perhaps?).  BEACHES is similar in
a lot of ways to George Cukor's RICH AND FAMOUS, right down to a score by
George Delerue.  (Though not as good a score--I do not like RICH AND FAMOUS,
but I confess I find the title theme a stunningly beautiful piece of music
and very probably the best piece of music in Delerue's distinguished
career.)
     BEACHES is the story of two women and, of course, their long
friendship.  C. C. Bloom is a brash singer/actress who has lived her whole
life in show business.  Hilary Whitney is a very upperclass Anglo-Saxon
Protestant from the "right kind" of family.  This is a most unlikely
friendship that begins when the two are each eleven.  C.C. is played by
Mayin Bialik as a child and by Bette Midler as an adult.  In fact, of the
two Bialik is the more memorable.  Midler plays Bette Midler and does an
okay job, but Bialik playing Bette Midler is a wonder to behold.  It is hard
to believe that Bialik herself is not going to grow up to be Bette Midler,
so perfectly does she personify Midler's looks and mannerisms.  On the other
hand, Marcie Leeds as the young Hilary does not really resemble Barbara
Hershey.  But then even as an adult, Hilary looks only like Barbara Hershey
with bad taste in lipstick.
     Through most of the film Midler upstages Hershey and director Gary
Marshall (who works for co-producer Midler) lets her do it.  The result is
that while Hershey is less noticeable than Midler, she also does a better
job of acting.  Midler is much more of a caricature.  It is Midler who sings
"You've got to give a little, take a little," the film's theme song and
moral.  BEACHES is a decent weepy film for those who like to cry in movies,
but it is less than ideal as a piece of sincere filmmaking.  Rate it a high
0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Kaďro (2001)
    CAPSULE: The director of CURE brings a weird and very complex 
    concept to the screen.  One viewing will not be enough to 
    understand fully the premise of PULSE.  The idea is something 
    about ghosts and the Internet.  The film has an amazing 
    apocalyptic style.  Rating: 7 (0 to 10), +2 (-4 to +4) 
Perhaps the most disturbing (and disturbed?) filmmaker in the 
world is Kiyoshi Kurosawa.  His films all seem to have one style, 
bleak.  The worlds he creates are terrifying and cold.  Little 
known in the US to date, his films deliver the kind of horror that 
so many of our filmmakers promise and are unable to deliver.  Most 
of his ideas are fresh and at the same time morbid.  His 1998 film 
CURE, with one of his niftiest ideas, is just now getting a sadly 
limited release in the US and hopefully enough people will see it 
that his name will soon be one to conjure with.  CURE is probably 
his classic.  Last year he released SEANCE, a remake of SEANCE ON 
A WET AFTERNOON.  That was perhaps a miscalculation inserting 
supernatural elements into a non-supernatural story.  PULSE is 
Kurosawa back on form. 
Taguchi, a young computer expert, is late with his delivery of 
some important software.  Two co-workers go to his apartment and 
find it a dismal dark affair in spite of his computer equipment.  
Taguchi, acting very strangely, lets his friends look for the 
missing software.  Meanwhile he slips behind a plastic curtain.  
When he fails to respond to calls his friends follow him behind 
the curtain and discover he has hanged himself.  If that was not 
horror enough the body seems to disappear leaving just a strange 
dark mildew-like spot on the wall.  Taguchi's computer seems to 
have been infected with some kind of computer virus.  People whose 
computer gets the virus seem superficially to die via suicide.  
But they are not entirely dead.  Their spirits seem to remain 
present somehow in the real world and on the Internet.  People who 
get the computer virus are asked if they want to see a ghost.  If 
they say yes, they seem to be able to see real time images of the 
spirits still nearby somehow.  The computer shows them impossible 
images of ghosts in their own rooms as seen from cameras that do 
not exist.  This is all somehow connected to heaven and hell 
somehow filling up and overflowing "like a computer disk."  
Instead the dead seem to be staying on earth and inhabiting 
computer viruses.  There is some sort of passage between worlds 
having something to do with doors marked with red tape and strange 
electronic disturbances on computers.  Leave it to Kurosawa to 
find a new kind of death. 
This is a film that has more weird ideas piled together than 
LIFEFORCE and somehow Kurosawa makes the film all work.  It may 
not totally convey his message of isolation and its parallels to 
death, but whatever it does convey is nightmarish.  Kurosawa, who 
directs his own screenplay, ties his story into the real world 
with some familiar and accurate computer discussion.  Frequently 
the plot is advanced with character hunches being assumed to be 
fact.  His plotting is frequently hard to follow and always very 
strange. 
Junichiro Hayashi, the cinematographer who recently has been doing 
all of Kurosawa's films, creates a dark, cold, and gloomy tone.  
Images are obscured by semi-lighting or are behind plastic 
curtain.  Scenes are not milked for their horror the way American 
exploitation films might.  People are shot with guns but there is 
little if any blood in evidence.  Seeing black silhouettes on 
computer screens is not immediately scary.  Kurosawa is not going 
for and easy visual shock, but a deeper metaphysical dread. 
Of any horror filmmaker in the world, Kiyoshi Kurosawa is the one 
to watch.  I rate this metaphysical look at isolation a 7 on the 0 
to 10 scale and a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale. 

Title
Review for Face/Off (1997)
     When I grew up noodle soup was a lot of broth and only a little
bit of noodles.  Then on the market from East Asia came ramen which was
mostly noodles.  The marketers of this product acknowledged that many
people bought noodle soup for the noodles so they made that most of the
soup.  When I grew up an action film was something like THE GUNS OF
NAVARONE.  It had a good story and some action sequences.  Unhappily
much of the audience really was watching the film for the action
sequences and the plot just bound them together, but at least it was
there for those who wanted it.  The Hong Kong action film formula
delivers action the way ramen delivers noodles.  It gives you more
action than plot.  Part of the formula is to turn the drama to
melodrama.  Melodrama allows for more dramatic moments in a shorter
space of time, leaving more time to devote to action sequences.  Then
the action sequences go off like a strings of firecrackers on Chinese
New Year.  Turning the story to melodrama and increasing the pace of
the fireworks destroys much of the credibility of a film, but it gives
the audience what it wants.  That is the Hong Kong action film formula
and one of its leading proponents is John Woo.  But Woo has been lured
to Hollywood and he has had to compromise his style a bit.  He has
toned down the melodrama making for a longer story to tell.  He has cut
down the proportion of action scenes while lengthening the film.
FACE/OFF is a long film at 138 minutes, it spends less time with action
sequences than his earlier films, but he uses the extra time to tell a
more dramatically satisfying story with a more engaging premise.
     In action films we have had more than our share of films of law
agents stalking psychopathic killers.  And a few seasons back we also
had in a short time a lot of films with people switching bodies and
having to live as the other person.  Combining the two ideas does not
sound like a promising idea, but it makes for a much more interesting
piece dramatically than most of Woo's films.  Castor and Pollux Troy
(played respectively by Nicholas Cage and Alessandro Nivola) are
brother sociopaths who have little in common with their namesakes, the
Dioscuri who accompanied Jason on his quest for the Golden Fleece.
Castor is a super- extrovert (and obnoxious) criminal genius.  Six
years earlier he nearly killed FBI agent Sean Archer (John Travolta)
and did kill Archer's young son.  The ruthless and narcissistic killer
has been pitted against stiff and introverted FBI agent for several
years, and finally Archer manages to kill Castor Troy.  However, the
government knows that Castor and Pollux have set a bomb to destroy Los
Angeles and Pollux refuses to talk.  Then Archer finds out that Castor
is still alive, albeit comatose, and that a new process can transform
Archer to look like Castor.  It is suggested that Archer become Castor
and perhaps trick information from Pollux Troy.  Of course Castor wakes
from his coma, finds out what has happened and forces the doctors to
transform him to look like Archer.  The logic (or lack of logic) in
this scene is one of the low-points of the film.  But to fool people
Castor and Archer each has to take on the other's mannerisms.  The
introvert must force himself to be an extrovert, the extrovert ... well
that would be telling.  Each must get involved with the family or
friends of the other, and gets a better understanding of the enemy.
Loyalties become confused.  Many things are happening at different
levels in this film and Woo manages to keep things together.
     John Woo's anything goes Hong Kong style just does not really work
all the time.  There is a somewhat questionable sequence in with a
child's home is shot up and a child is very nearly killed all done to
the tune of "Somewhere Over the Rainbow."  The scene may well have been
inspired by the brilliant "Danny Boy" sequence in MILLER'S CROSSING,
but here it is too easy to construe it as making light of child
endangerment.  It indicates that Woo, like some of his characters, is
not always in full control of his talents.  And in this scene, like
most of Woo's action scenes, the violence is turned up to a degree far
beyond any realism and all subtlety is lost.  When Woo is finished with
a set for one of his action scenes it is pretty well shredded.  Other
places he has more control such as well-choreographed sequence in which
FBI agents try to stop a plane from taking off.  The opening sequence
is a nightmarish flashback showing a good deal of atmosphere.
     Woo goes neither for drama nor his usual melodrama, but something
somewhere in between.  He has good actors in Travolta and Cage and more
than his other films he needs them as each goes through layers of the
others personality.  Nancy Allen plays Archer's wife, for once an
intelligently drawn character.  Allen is a two-time Oscar nominee for
her roles in THE CRUCIBLE and as Pat Nixon in NIXON.  In a role that
other filmmakers might have minimized, she holds her own.  Gina Gershon
also plays well in a sympathetic role as a close friend of Castor.
     John Woo is showing signs of maturing as a filmmaker.  While he
still is a fan a large scale destruction scenes, he has shown he can
make a film with a little more to it.  I rate this film a +2 on the -4
to +4 scale.

Title
Review for L5: First City in Space (1996)
     Back in the 1950s and 60s the film industry wanted to give the
public something they could not get on TV.  They invented a wide-screen
process using three strips of film and a screen that wrapped around the
audience.  The process was called "Cinerama."  And the films made in
this process were mostly just demonstration films to show what could be
done.  The films had names like THIS IS CINERAMA, CINERAMA HOLIDAY,
WINDJAMMER, and THE SEVEN WONDERS OF THE WORLD.  Eventually the public
got bored with just picturesque documentaries and the filmmakers had to
start putting plots into the films, but they kept them simple and
episodic with big action sequences.  After all audiences did not need
Cinerama for MACBETH.  They wanted exciting action sequences.  So they
made films like HOW THE WEST WAS WON which was really more a set of
short stories which featured thrill scenes like runaway stage coaches.
THE WONDERFUL WORLD OF THE BROTHERS GRIMM actually had a story that
went the length of the film, but it also had sequences of fairy tales.
The films were intentionally kept big and kind of stupid to make the
best use of the process.  The final film I remember being made in the
process was supposed to take the viewer on a scenic ride into space.
I suspect it was originally intended to be that and to have only the
faintest whisper of a plot.  It was given a kind of vacuous name to
imply that it was a sort of WINDJAMMER in space.  It was to be called
2001: A SPACE ODYSSEY.  By the time this film was finally made some of
the people behind it had sort of meddled with the concept a little.
For one thing it was not really an odyssey any more, but it was still a
sort of futuristic, science-fictional demonstration of the new medium.
And it proved to be the most popular of the Cinerama films.
     For the new IMAX 3-D process they did not wait so long to try
science fiction.  One of their first films is a voyage into space.  And
not to mix my analogies, but just as the film THE CONQUEST OF SPACE was
heavily based on a speculative non-fiction book, THE CONQUEST OF SPACE
by Willy Ley, L5: FIRST CITY IN SPACE is based heavily based on Gerard
K. O'Neill's THE HIGH FRONTIER, in which the author describes in detail
a mammoth space station that will be placed at the L5 point.  L5 is a
point first described by the mathematician and astronomer Comte Joseph
Louis Lagrange which will hold onto matter in a stable equilibrium.  As
soon as the matter starts to move away from the point gravitational
forces from the Earth and the Moon will pull it back.  A space colony
placed at the L5 point will need to expend no energy to remain at the
that point.  O'Neill described a sort of perfect world, nearly self-
sufficient, hanging in space at the L5 point.  L5: FIRST CITY IN SPACE
is a story set in this future world.
     Director Toni Myers seems to share Stanley Kubrick's belief that
in space the furniture will not be wooden but all the people will be.
The story seems to be performed by catatonics.  There is not a lot to
the story here, since the entire film is only 34 minutes long (and
sports a hefty ticket price of $9).  The film starts with a sort of
tour of the interior of the L5 station, much as it was described in THE
HIGH FRONTIER.  Interiors are short live-action but the exteriors are
done in 3-D animation, but using art very much the style of O'Neill's
illustrations.  We meet Chieko, a little girl living in the L5 colony
with freshets of water feeding long rows of perfect palm trees,
hydroponically grown to produce perfect fruit of exotic types.  But her
parents and grandfather are worried (note the worried expressions on
their faces).  The L5 colony has a problem, just about the most prosaic
problem imaginable.  It is not the same problem that plagued the
runaway forest in SILENT RUNNING, but it is just as basic and it is
just as amazing that it takes the characters by surprise.  But it is a
serious problem, enough so that the actors can look worried.  Fixing
the problem involves travel to a comet that happens to be hurtling by.
But the story is told with little dramatic tension in explaining threat
so there is not much excitement.  There is just quiet worry that is
eventually alleviated.
     Among the things that bothered me about the film was that in the
exteriors the stars seemed to be in 3-D with some appearing closer than
others.  In a word we got parallax on stars.  This is a total absurdity
added to use the 3-D effect.  The film shares the book's optimism that
everything on the L5 colony would be just about ideal.  The fruit grown
from hydroponics is just perfect looking.  And even the view of Earth
from the colony is perfect and beautiful.  On the dark side the cities
show up as perfect little jewels of bright light.  I could believe some
pinpoints, but not as big as the film shows them to be.  The final
unlikely element is the presence of a Holodeck sequence--I know of
nothing else to call it--whose technology is unexplained.
     Some comments should be made about the IMAX 3-D process itself.
First the screen in New York seems smaller than other IMAX screens I
have seen, at least as I remember them.  Even sitting close to the
screen, due to arriving late, I could see both edges at the same time.
The fact that we are seeing a 3-D process makes the screen look even
smaller.  I do not know exactly why that is, but 3-D processes I have
seen seem to make the screen look smaller than it looks without the
goggles or glasses.  This 3-D process is actually quite primitive, in
spite of the supposedly advanced presentation.  The goggles use simple
polarized lenses and if one tips ones head only the slightest, a ghost
image comes into view.  The ghost image often would show up even
without tipping.  The 3-D process, in short, presented little
technology that was not present for DIAL M FOR MURDER in 1954.
     It is not clear that you can rate a little demonstration film like
it was a feature film in a more standard theater, but this one
satisfied like a film that would have gotten a low 0 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Broken Arrow (1996)
     The plot is simple enough, with more than a few plot elements
borrowed from THUNDERBALL.  Vic Deakins (played by John Travolta) and
Riley Hale (Christian Slater) are Air Force pilots who fly the sleek,
fully digitized B-3 stealth bomber with live nuclear bombs.  Deakins
has also taken a fatherly interest in Hale, giving him lessons on the
philosophy of winning while brutally beating him in the boxing ring.
Of course he does not expect Hale to make much use of these lessons.
Just a few hours later tries to kill Hale as part of his plan to steal
two nuclear bombs.  Hale, together and self-drafted National Park
Ranger Terry Carmichael (Samantha Mathis) have race to recover the
bombs before Deakins can get his intended use from the nuclear devices.
     Christian Slater should be almost as angry as his character in
this since Woo seems to have not so much let Travolta steal the film as
having goaded him into it.  Travolta is given an arsenal of cinematic
mannerisms, comments on the action, and even a few slow-motion
entrances all intended to make the actor look oh-so-cool.  Slater's
dialogue and acting are by comparison much more restrained and why only
Travolta got the Sergio Leone treatment is not clear.  Samantha Mathis
is an also-ran, as well as an also- jumped, and an also-fired-guns.
She just does not seem to show up very well on the screen and Woo did
not polish her the way he did with Travolta.  About all we learn about
her is that she lives alone with her dog and for this script that seems
to be enough.  Woo seems to think that the National Park Service trains
their rangers like Navy SEALS and gets their uniforms shipped in by
rocket from the Planet Krypton.  Delroy Lindo, who played so well off
Travolta in GET SHORTY, gets less opportunity to do it here as an Air
Force colonel pulled into the action.
     The pacing of BROKEN ARROW is fast and you are never very far from
the next action scene.  This is a style pioneered by the Bond series
taken to extremes that make those films slow by comparison.  But even
the Bond films spend more time building the characters.  Graham Yost,
who wrote SPEED, gave this film much or more of the same pacing.  The
action of BROKEN ARROW takes place over a period of about eighteen
hours and the more serious events (if it is not a misuse of that word)
are treated as just an extension of the boxing ring lesson at the
beginning of the film, as if Slater is giving a rebuttal.
     Of course BROKEN ARROW has lots of flashy visual effects:
digitized flying scenes, a nuclear detonation, Travolta's performance,
helicopter crashes, etc.  Flying a helicopter in this film is a lot
like wearing a red shirt in the first "Star Trek" series: it is really
tough to do it and stay alive.  Most of the effects are quite good
though the computer digitized flying sequences are far too easy to pick
out.
     Driving BROKEN ARROW are its action sequences and they are well
done.  The plot is told competently, though in the spoiler section
below I will mention some holes.  But the script never fleshes out it
characters.  It would have been worth it to have two fewer fights and a
little character development instead.  I give it a +1 on the -4 to +4
scale.
     SPOILER...SPOILER...SPOILER...SPOILER...SPOILER...SPOILER...
     Three scenes particularly bothered me about the script.  Somehow
before the action of the film Travolta's character seems to have
tampered with the electronics of the bombs to change the arming
sequence.  As he put it "I used uncoded circuit panels."  Since when do
the pilots have anything to do with building the electronics into
nuclear bombs?  And just what are "uncoded circuit panels?"  It sounds
like it is just double talk to explain an impossible plot twist.
     In one scene Travolta's opens a door panel on the train and there
is Slater's character, waiting for him to open the door.  How do you
sneak up on a train with a helicopter and how did Slater not only know
that a door was going to open, but just what door it would be?
     The physics of Travolta's final scene is absurd.  Why is only the
bomb torn loose, why does it have so much momentum, why isn't
Travolta's character crushed against the wall before the bomb ever gets
to him?  The bomb almost seems to turn into a rocket.

Title
Review for Gojira ni-sen mireniamu (1999)
     What can I say?  For the sort of viewer who enjoys seeing two
men in rubber monster suits battle over a city that looks like
cardboard boxes, this might be the film for you.  I liked it.
Godzilla got to me at an early age and I am too old to become
objective about Godzilla films now.  As I said in the capsule, there
is not a lot done really well in this film, but it is a lot of fun
for people who like Godzilla films.  There is a certain thrill of
anticipation in seeing the Toho Films banner at the beginning.  Even
the best are crudely made and often a little incoherent, but they
are also a good time.  Non-fans can be assured that they will not be
much impressed by GODZILLA 2000 and can tune out of this review at
this point.
     Plot?  Well, truth be known, there is not a whole lot of plot.
Scientist Yuji Shinoda left the employ of the Japanese government
and formed the minuscule Godzilla Prediction Network, a startup that
predicts where and when Godzilla will show up and strike next.  Yuji
does the science and Yuji's ten-year-old daughter does the financial
work.  They are joined on a Godzilla hunt by Yuki Ichinose, a
photojournalist looking for a story.  Together they discover that
finding Godzilla can be a big mistake.
     At the same time some scientists have found an odd rock, 600
feet across, in the ocean of Japan.  Because it shows some
intriguing abnormalities they decide to bring the rock to the
surface where it can be studied, lifting it with floats.  Oddly the
rock seems more enthusiastic about reaching the surface than can be
explained as it rises up past the floats.  It then hangs over the
water and waits for sunshine to activate it.  It seems under the
stone shell is an alien craft that has been waiting 60 million years
to come back to life so it can complete its mission.  It would be
telling to say what its mission is, except that logical or not,
there will of course be another monster for Godzilla to fight.  (And
of course it will be just roughly Godzilla's height.  Godzilla never
has any fifty-foot monsters to fight.)
     Word on the street has been that the new film is intended to
come right after the original Godzilla film in its own new series.
That was true of the film we call GODZILLA '85, which did spawn its
own separate series of Godzilla films in the 1980s and 1990s.  (To
save confusion I will use American titles.)  That second series
repeated many of the same mistakes that the first series did, but it
was aimed at a higher level.  The rumor has been that like GODZILLA
'85 (and of course the film we call GIGANTIS, THE FIRE MONSTER),
GODZILLA 2000 is a direct successor to the original GODZILLA, KING
OF THE MONSTERS.  However, a cursory look at the film tells us this
is simply not true.  Godzilla died in the first film and all other
films are supposed to feature a second very similar Godzilla beast.
Yet in GODZILLA 2000, attacks by Godzilla are taken to be a periodic
phenomenon.  There is even a Godzilla Prediction Network.  At the
end of the film there is a comment about all of Godzilla's attacks
in the past have taught lessons.  None of this would make sense if
only the events of the first film and this one had taken place.  The
second series apparently ended with the death of the second Godzilla
and his replacement by his son, just reaching maturity.  Logically
it would make sense to say that the new Godzilla is really the son
from the second series.  But so much logic is probably more than the
series can reasonably be expected to bear.
     Godzilla is like James Bond.  His looks change but the
character himself is timeless.  His face had a very lumpy appearance
and buck teeth in the earliest film and then became more dinosaur-
like for KING KONG VRS. GODZILLA.  As the series became more
childish and aimed at younger children his features became rounder
and less frightening.  In the second series he looked a lot better
and consistent from to film, but just a bit rubbery.  His looks
never changed.  For GODZILLA 2000 again his looks have been modified
to please the younger set.  This time, however, it is a younger set
brought up on NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREET and FRIDAY THE 13TH.  The new
Godzilla has sharper teeth with four canines regularly spaced on
each side.  His back fins are more jagged, sharp, and vicious-
looking.  It looks like they crossed the traditional Godzilla with a
punk rocker.
     Toho Studios from the beginning did excellent work with labor-
intensive special effects.  But not every effects problem could be
solved with inexpensive labor.  Visually their films were always
very nice, but their special effects were not always very
convincing.  As time went by their visual effects got better.  This
film really represents a big jump in the quality of their effects.
There are many very nice images.  And what attracts people to a
Godzilla film has got to be the visuals.  It certainly is not the
writing.  Toho films can usually be counted on for nicely composed
scenes with good use of color.  Where possible in the new film
Godzilla is shown from a low angle to accentuate the height.  A low
angle camera was used in the first film and then abandoned for most
of the first series.  It was used sparingly in the second series.
Here again the camera creates an illusion of great size by shooting
upward, in fact he looks larger than he ever has before.  Several
new compositions of shots give this film a look that is unique for
the series.  For those who like to just stare in awe of the size the
mega-saurian, this is the film.
     The writing however, is not the best of the series and has some
strange touches.  There are some half-hearted attempts at humor that
seem thrown in as an after-thought.  There is one short sequence of
slapstick comedy, in this case almost literally slapstick, and it
seems like it belonged in another movie.  There are some allusions
to JURASSIC PARK, DR. STRANGELOVE, and perhaps a few other films.
(By the way, the film scene someone is watching on TV when we can
hear only the dialog is Morris Ankrum being interrogated by aliens
in EARTH VS. THE FLYING SAUCERS.  I wonder what film was used in the
Japanese-language version.)  I have never been quite able to make
out if the writing in these films is out of kilter or if it just
works better in Japanese.  But the final scene, like the writing in
several of the situations, just does not work.  It almost seems to
be rooting for Godzilla as he destroys Tokyo.
     The musical score by Takayuki Hattori is a little too polished
and Western for a Godzilla film.  Godzilla films usually have
Japanese military marches and brash brassy music.  Much of that feel
is missing here.  The film is released by Tristar who hopefully have
learned to leave Godzilla films to the experts after their own
attempt to make a Godzilla film ended up with something of a
monstrosity.  (Though rumor has it that their own attempt to make a
Godzilla film failed in large part because of constraints placed on
them by Toho executives.)
     Even for Godzilla fans, this could have been a better film.  It
is only mid-range in the quality of films in the second series.
Still as he approaches fifty years old, it is good to know the big
guy still looks good on the silver screen and in some ways better
than ever before.  I rate this GODZILLA 2000 a 6 on the 0 to 10
scale and a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.  It will be interesting
to see if its sequels will get an American theatrical release.

Title
Review for Shigatsu kaidan (1988)
     The ghost story is a staple of Japanese cinema.  Such films as
KWAIDAN and THE GHOST OF YOTSUYA are popular examples.  But almost all
of the ghost stories we see coming out of Japan are first period pieces
and ghost stories only second.  Whether there are many contemporary
ghost stories made in Japan that we do not see in the United States I
do not know.  THE GHOST OF APRIL is a film I saw at the Japan
Foundation Kyoto Office and it is radically different from the Japanese
ghost stories that have come to my country.  Many of these are morality
tales of wronged people coming back for revenge.  This 1988 film is
about a contemporary teenager and seems to be aimed at teens in Japan.
The plot is at once reminiscent of IT'S A WONDERFUL LIFE, HERE COMES
MR. JORDAN, and A CHRISTMAS CAROL.
     As the film opens Hatsuko (played by Nakajima Tomoko) seems to be
in a mysterious state of half life and half death.  She walks barefoot
through misty landscapes and floats in clouds.  She does not know how
she has gotten in this state until a guardian comes along to explain to
her.  Gennojo (Yanagiba Toshiro) tells her he is like her.  He is dead
but is not yet ready to pass on to the next world where all memories of
the past life are erased.  Gennojo has been in this state since early
this century when he was killed by a balloon of his own devising.
Hatsuko is shown her last day when she rebuffed the school geek
Natsuyama (Tsunoda Eisuke) who claims to be able to see ghosts.  She
also was spoken to by her heartthrob Tsudanuma.  Then on her way home
she followed the whimper of a puppy into an abandoned factory where she
was killed by a falling girder.  But there is a complication.  She is
in this half-state because she accepted death even as the girder was
falling.  The girder missed her and she was hit by only a bento
lunchbox.  That would not have been fatal, but for her acceptance of
death.  This means Hatsuko has the choice of life and death.  But she
prefers death with Gennojo to her unhappy life.
     This is a film of uneven production quality.  Konaka Kazuya who
directs and co-wrote the screenplay with Seki Kenji has some nice
images, but he let some sloppiness sneak into the production.  In one
scene the puppy who fits into the plot seems to be staring at the
camera rather than at anything in the scene.  The plot loses some
credibility when one of the characters invents a ghost detector.  The
viewer suspends some disbelief just to accept that ghosts exist.
Asking the acceptance of a second far-fetched premise is a mistake.
The last few minutes of the film also seem to weaken the story with
familiar cliche.  On the other hand there is a very effective scene
involving the souls of dead birds and the climax is nicely done.
     It is not easy to judge acting in a language you do not
understand.  Mis-delivered lines may go completely unnoticed.  Still
the actors do a reasonable job.  Yanagiba is most notable as the
otherworldly balloonist.  This is not a film about or engendering deep
emotions, but it is a reasonable film for a young audience.
     THE GHOST OF APRIL (April is the month, not a character) is a
different sort of Japanese ghost story aimed at teen but watchable for
adults.  I give it a +1  on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Six Degrees of Separation (1993)
     BACKGROUND:  Humanity is like a group of people walking around in a
fog.  Nobody is very far from anyone else, but you can see only the people
nearest to you.  And they can see only the people immediately around them.
So everybody sees just a small part of the crowd.  People drift closer in
the fog and you see them for a while, then they move further away and cannot
be traced.  That, I think, is a big piece of what this film is about,
thought I admit a certain fog between me and SIX DEGREES OF SEPARATION.
That is not a lot for a film to be about, but an odd and convoluted mode of
storytelling makes this film entertaining and at the same time enigmatic.
Whatever else the film is about is really in the eye of the beholder.
     Our story is told in large part through flashbacks as several groups of
friends, families, and acquaintances tell each other about a mysterious
young black man Paul (played by Will Smith) who has insinuated himself into
their lives and then has gone back out of it.  Primarily we see the stories
through the eyes of Ouisa and Flan Kittredge (Stockard Channing and Donald
Sutherland).  They are wealthy pseudo-intellectual members of the upper
crust.  Flan makes his money through dubious trading in fine art.  On a
night that they are having an important dinner with a friend who might
finance their next big deal, Paul shows up on their doorstep claiming to be
the a friend of the Kittredge children and the son of Sidney Portier.  The
refined Paul makes an immediate hit and helps Flan to swing his deal.  They
invite Paul to stay the night only to have him hire a male hustler and bring
him to the house.  They throw Paul out.  Almost immediately they start
hearing that others of their friends have had run-ins with the same person.
Soon they decide that they have to learn more about this young man who seems
to know so much more about them than they know about him.
     The people in this film are much like adult versions of the young
people in METROPOLITAN.  The have superficial conversations on profound
subjects.  While what they are saying seems erudite, it is only banality
phrased well.  What Paul says to keep up his end of the conversation
occasionally does border on profundity, which makes him all the more
enigmatic to the people he visits.  Conversation and how things are
expressed is very important to this film since so much of it is carried on
by social conversations, often recounting other conversations.  This slows
down the plot development, but eventually this 111-minute film tells a
nearly complete story that could have been told in twenty or thirty minutes.
In the final analysis film is a light fantasy.  The story is contrived and
very unlikely to occur in the way it was told.  I think that credibility is
not the point here.  Even the title is never clearly explained; it seems to
refer to some idea that there are at most six intermediate people between
anybody and anybody else in the world.  Considering how isolated some tribes
are to this day in the Amazon and other parts of the world, it seems very
unlikely.  Also it is not clear what counts as a direct adjacency.
     This is a film with a terrific cast and a lack of characters.  Will
Smith is actually fairly charismatic as Paul, but the characters played by
Channing, Sutherland, Ian McKellan, Mary Beth Hurt, Bruce Davison, Richard
Masur, and Anthony Michael Hall are all quickly forgettable as indeed John
Guare's screenplay based on his Broadway play would have them be.  Perhaps
like "Cats," this is just a play that cannot be done on the screen."
     The film is a departure for director Fred Schepisi, but will not be one
of his more memorable accomplishments.  I give it a low +1 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for You've Got Mail (1998)
     I suppose if a filmmaker is going to remake a classic film, this
is the right way to do it.  Ernst Lubitsch's SHOP AROUND THE CORNER is
a decent film, but I have never heard of anyone loving it so much that
they could not stand to see other actors in similar roles.  And it was,
in fact, remade as a musical in 1949, IN THE GOOD OLD SUMMERTIME.
Neither film really developed the idea much beyond being a simple
ironic situation.  Two shop clerks in the same store hate each other
and each loves a pen pal that he/she has never met.  Of course it turns
out they are writing to each other, and somehow it is assumed that the
inner person is represented by the writing and not the actual person.
YOU'VE GOT MAIL takes the same situation and expands on it, using the
anonymity of electronic communications on the Internet.  The film also
looks at the issue of big superstore bookstores chasing out smaller
independent bookstores.  In particular the plot may have inspired by
the incident when a new Barnes and Noble superstore in Manhattan drove
a much-loved children's bookstore, Eeyore Books, out of business.
     Kathleen Kelly (played by Meg Ryan) is the second-generation owner
of The Shop Around the Corner, a children's bookstore in Manhattan that
has become something of a neighborhood institution.  Parents who used
to come to the bookstore as children now bring their children to
discover the world of reading.  But the bookshop is in trouble.  Fox, a
chain of bookstores, is putting a superstore just around the corner
from The Shop Around the Corner.  The competition may well drive the
little bookstore out of business.  But even while her professional life
is in trouble Kathleen is developing an e-mail-based relationship with
a pen pal over the Internet.  The man she knows only as "NY152" is a
decent and witty person.  Little does Kathleen realize that NY152 is
really Tom Fox (Tom Hanks) the third generation owner of the Fox
bookstore chain. In the flesh Tom Fox represents to Kathleen everything
that is going wrong with the book industry.  Small caring bookstores
are being replaced by Goliaths with know-nothing clerks, big comfy
chairs, and cappuccino bars.  Though Kathleen is living with writer
Frank Navasky (Greg Kinnear) and Tom is living with editor Patricia
Eden (Parker Posey), they carry on a secret electronic relationship.
The artificial excitement of the AOL voice saying, "You've got mail!"
becomes almost a metaphor for the loveless by-the-numbers
relationships into which each has fallen.  It is counterpoint to what
they feel writing to each other, flirting with the idea of meeting, but
afraid to dispel the magic.  In fact, much of the best writing of the
film is in the little essays that each sends the other.  At times the
discussions are reminiscent of those in 84 CHARING CROSS ROAD.
     This is the third screen teaming of Tom Hanks and Meg Ryan.  The
first time they were together was in JOE VERSUS THE VOLCANO, a film so
offbeat that it never found an audience.  (By the way, if you get a
chance, rent this film.  The writing is occasionally lame but more
frequently wonderful.)  Their second romantic teaming was, of course,
SLEEPLESS IN SEATTLE, a film not up to its reputation, but still a gem.
There certainly is chemistry between Hanks and Ryan as strong as
Gable's and Lombard's.  YOU'VE GOT MAIL is a light and tasty little
romantic recipe for the holidays.  Still, it is the most thoughtful of
the three film versions of this particular story.  I rate it a 7 on the
0 to 10 scale and a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Dog Park (1998)
     CAPSULE: Yet another comedy about the singles scene, dating, who
is going to have sex with whom, and what relationships are going to
last.  This one is also about dog owners and a dog psychologist and
obedience trainer.  Nothing in this film is heavier than a cocker
spaniel.  Rating:  6 (0 to 10), 1 (-4 to +4)
   - Bruce McCulloch wrote and directed as well as having a role.
   - Luke Wilson plays Andy, a man who has just broken up with his
     girlfriend and is again looking for someone to share his life.  In
     a singles bar he meets Lorna (Natasha Henstridge) whose job is
     being Miss Bookworm on children's television.  He is interested in
     her, but in part because of a friend's philosophizing she is not
     interested in him.  "People should provide you with romantic
     resumes."   From the start we know they are perfect for each
     other.  Ta-da, ta-da, ta-da.
   - There is also some titillation in liberal doses of sex scenes.
     This too is part of the formula.
   - Being about singles and dogs, of course, it has Janeane Garofalo.
   - Janeane Garofalo plays a friend of Andy, part of a "perfect
     couple."
   - These people don't know what they want and end up being stupid and
     hurting each other.
   - Some of the best humor is from the absurdity of the dog
     psychologist played by "Kids in the Hall" alumni Mark McKinney.
   - When the story gets slow they bring a dog on-stage.  Dogs are
     natural entertainers.  That's why they were domesticated in the
     first place.

Title
Review for Fly, The (1986)
     THE FLY has been considered one of the great science fiction horror
films for many years.  Perhaps millions of children have frightened younger
brothers and sisters with falsetto cries of "Help me!  Please!  Help me!"
It was a natural for a remake and in 1984 Brooksfilm bought a screen
adaptation by Charles Edward Pogue (who also scripted PSYCHO III) and Walon
green.  David Cronenberg was given the screenplay to film; he kept some,
rewrote a lot more, and filmed the result.  On a visit to a cinema shop in
Manhattan I discovered that copies of the Pogue-Green screenplay were
available.  As a fan of the original film with screenplay by James Clavell
(who went on to script films like TO SIR WITH LOVE and THE SATAN BUG and
then to write novels like SHOGUN and TAI-PAN), and to a lesser extent as a
fan of the remake with screenplay credited to Pogue and Cronenberg, the
temptation was too great to pass up.
     Geoffrey Powell is a research scientist just below Nobel Prize caliber.
he works for a high-tech research and development company--Loften
Industries, headquartered in new York City.  Loften, however, has grown
tired of waiting for Geoffrey's researches into "particle transmission" to
bear some sort of useful fruit.  He is ready to replace Geoffrey if the
young researcher does not produce.  Geoff is able to transmit objects,
sometimes successfully ("like STAR TREK," as a friend observes), but often
not so successfully.  He usually transmits souvenir Statues of Liberty.  A
poor touch here is that one appears to be successfully transmitted until
Geoff's wife Katie notices the wording has been reversed.  If the wording
were reversed, the whole statue should have been noticeably reversed.  Under
pressure from Loften, Geoff transmits himself, but the audience knows that a
fly transmitted at the same time has disappeared.
     Now the story is similar to Cronenberg's film.  Geoff at first seems
much improved by the transmission, finding himself a much faster jogger and
able to lift greater weights.  He starts transforming soon, growing new hair
on his body, losing his fingernails.  He does not, however, climb the walls
(at least literally) the way Cronenberg has him do.  But then neither does
he philosophize about his condition either and we can credit Cronenberg for
the strange thought processes that were the high points of the film.
     There is no discussion of how a matter transmitter turned in a gene
splicer--a rather absurd concept from the film.  Instead, the two organisms
were fused into one and we are told, "A fly is a very primitive form of
life.  That's why it's so successful.  Its cells are stronger, they are able
to multiply more rapidly than [Geoff's] own...in mutation the more primitive
structure is always the victor."
     In the end and out of control, Geoff murders a neighbor and his
villainous boss using vomit drops full of burning enzymes (much as in the
film).  An attempt at suicide in his matter transmitter turns him into a
six-foot fly, and finally he is killed by a laser gone wild.  Apparently
Pogue thinks that a laser will flail around like a fire-hose if not bolted
down.  The final scene has his wife Katie giving birth to a giant maggot
only to realize it was a momentary hallucination--or was it?
     If you can turn a blind eye to some of the scientific blunders, Pogue's
script is often more credible than is Cronenberg's rewrite.  The funding for
Brundle research never made any sense in the film and Pogue has a much
better feel for how research gets gone in the R&D community--and under what
kind of pressures it is done.  Neither script will win any prizes for
scientific accuracy.  Neither script is clearly better.  Overall I would say
that the Cronenberg script, while less believable, is the better for having
shown us a little more of the mental processes of a creature part man and
part fly.  I would still contend that of the three stories, the original
film was the best and at the same time the most accurate to George
Langlaan's story.

Title
Review for Flight of the Intruder (1990)
          Capsule review:  Pretty pictures, stupid story.  The
     air-war of a previous conflict is occasionally entertaining
     to watch but the plot is cliched as are most of the
     characters.  This film's only chance is to follow the current
     wave of interest in military equipment.  Rating: low 0.
     Had I not actually seen a copy of the book FLIGHT OF THE INTRUDER by
Stephen Coonts, I would have had a hard time telling if this was a very weak
story given classy military equipment photography and quality special
effects treatment or if this was just a collection of classy military
equipment photography and quality special effects tied together by a very
weak excuse for a story.  During World War II a lot of B war movies carried
stories just as good to the bottom half of double bills.  We are talking
HELLCATS OF THE NAVY-level plotting here.  In 1972 Vietnam we have an
aircraft carrier ruled over by a cigar-chewing, mean-as-a-junkyard-dog-but-
heart-of-gold sort of commander.  Danny Glover plays the Black commander
with the unlikely name Frank Camparelli.  One of his bright young pilots,
Jake Grafton (played by the uninteresting Brad Johnson) agonizes over the
loss of his bombardier.  The companion is lost in a raid that accomplishes
nothing besides adding visual interest to the opening credits.  Grafton
wants to go on a super-special raid of his own devising.  But this raid is
directly contrary to orders.  His top-gun replacement bombardier Virgil Cole
(played by Willem Dafoe) says absolutely not.  Does Jake get to make his
super-special raid on North Vietnam?  And if he does, what is the Navy's
reaction?
     The weak story is, however, punctuated by pretty pictures of planes,
helicopters, and aircraft carriers to keep the audience watching.  If this
film stands any chance with audiences it is in the fortuitous timing of this
film coincident with a sudden upsurge of interest in technical weaponry.
Indeed many people may find events in the Middle East resonating with
attitudes in this film.  On the other hand, maybe some people would prefer
to stay home and watch technical weaponry on television.
     FLIGHT OF THE INTRUDER is directed by John Milius, who is specializing
in gutsy films like APOCALYPSE NOW (which he wrote), CONAN THE BARBARIAN,
and RED DAWN.  The score is by Basil Poledouris, the gifted composer of the
scores for the "Conan" films, who seems repeatedly associated with films
with right-wing themes.  Poledouris scored RED DAWN, AMERIKA, and THE HUNT
FOR RED OCTOBER.
     FLIGHT OF THE INTRUDER is linked in advertising with THE HUNT FOR RED
OCTOBER, but it falls well short of that film's interest value and quality.
My rating is a low 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Stargate (1994)
     Back in the last century and the early parts of this one there
were still many unexplored regions on earth.  A kind of fantasy
flourished then that has since nearly died out.  This was the "lost
race" story, in which in some unexplored place, some last outpost of
the ancient civilization still thrives unaware that they are an
anachronism.  It may be Egyptian or Roman, or perhaps it still has the
civilization of the ancient Incas or Atlantis, and is being discovered
by modern explorers.  The greatest practitioner of these stories was H.
Rider Haggard, author of SHE.  But other names that come to mind are
Edgar Rice Burroughs, A. Merritt, and Ian Cameron, who wrote THE LOST
ONES (a.k.a THE ISLAND AT THE TOP OF THE WORLD) as late as 1961.  But
in the 1990s the real estate that could host such a lost civilization
is now almost non-existent and so is the genre.  Roland Emerich, who
last directed the terrible UNIVERSAL SOLDIER, has resurrected the lost
race story with a bit of sci-fi (as opposed to science fiction) hand-
waving.  Instead of a potsherd pointing the way to a civilization
somewhere beyond the Mountains of the Moon in Africa, it is a twenty-
foot ring that provides a gateway across the known universe.  The ring
was a passageway for aliens at the time Ancient Egypt was building
pyramids.  When they were done with it the Egyptians just sort of
packed it away much like the U.S. Government did with the Ark of the
Covenant.
     As our story opens, it is 1928 and the Stargate is found by one
bunch of understandably very confused archaeologists.  Sixty-six years
later government archaeologists are still trying to figure out what to
do with this mysterious object (so they can move on to the Ark of the
Covenant, I suppose).  Invited to join the team is Dr. Daniel Jackson
(played by James Spader), a renegade Egyptologist who wants to prove
that Egyptians could not have built the Great Pyramid.  He is laughed
at as Great Men of Truth have always been laughed at, going back to the
Frederic March DR. JEKYLL AND MR. HYDE.  His chance to prove his
theories comes from Catherine (Viveca Lindfors--and it is great to see
her still acting), a government scientist working on decoding the 1928
artifact.  Meanwhile, the project has been given over to the military
and is now headed by Col. Jack O'Neal (Kurt Russell).  Jackson decodes
the last pieces of the puzzle and that is all that is needed to
activate a passageway.  On the other side is a lot of desert and a lost
civilization of Egyptians, slaves to the living god Ra (played by Jaye
Davidson of THE CRYING GAME).
     STARGATE is yet another beautiful but rather empty film.
Production designer Holger Gross and art director Peter Murton have
gone a long way to recreate the grandeur of Ancient Egypt.  The brassy
score by David Arnold is exciting.  But the adventure itself is on a
juvenile level and certainly not of the caliber of an H. Rider Haggard
adventure.  Some of what we see seems very poorly thought out.  A
shaggy desert animal (actually a Clydesdale horse in a fake fur coat)
seems altogether unsuited for the desert climate.  There is a ludicrous
product placement with a chocolate-covered candy bar.  Who would want
to eat a candy bar that can take riding around in somebody's pocket for
hours in a hot desert and still shows no sign of melting?  And one
wonders if some desert slave who has never seen chocolate--or candy at
all--would be so anxious to put in his mouth something that looks so
much like a bar of excrement.  The recreation of a desert civilization
in some ways is very detailed and almost overcomes the atmosphere-
breaking sci-fi opening while giving some of the feel of an H. Rider
Haggard story.  Unfortunately, things build to a special effects
extravaganza of a battle and it is just what this film did not need.
The innocent feel of the old-fashioned adventures is lost when spears
turn out to be missile launchers.
     Some of the ideas of this film are really specious.  The idea that
the Egyptians had to be introduced to the concept of the pyramid at the
time of the Great Pyramid does not account for the fact that there were
older pyramids in Egypt.  The pyramid was invented by Im-ho-tep
somewhere around 2650 B.C. in the Third Dynasty.  He stacked mastabas
of diminishing size for the King Zoser.  That step pyramid still stands
at Saqqara.  Im-ho-tep was one of history's great geniuses,
incidentally, a physician and a statesman as well as an architect.  The
Great Pyramid of Khufu was built at Giza in the Fourth Dynasty,
probably more than a hundred years later and many hundreds of years
after the mastabas were invented.  While pinning down dates is in large
part a matter of guesswork, there were pyramids at least a hundred
years before Khufu's Great Pyramid and perhaps considerably more.
     And as for this idea that it takes six points to pinpoint a
location in space, that's another load of duck tires.  How many points
does it take to determine a location in space?  You need only one.  Now
if you are talking instead about coordinates, it takes three.  But then
you need three real numbers.  Sectors on a wheel won't give you enough.
The geometry made no sense.
     Somewhere deep inside this techno-SHE is a good adventure film.
The problem is that they are not sure if they really want to be a
high-tech science fiction film or a more traditional lost civilization
film.  I would vote for the latter.  I rate it a +1 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Being John Malkovich (1999)
     BEING JOHN MALKOVICH is an audacious new comedy that starts
strange, keeps getting stranger, then hits an idea so weird that it
takes the rest of the film to explore only some of the many
ramifications.  "Nobody's looking for a puppeteer in today's wintry
economic climate," complains Craig Schwartz (played John Cusak) an
out-of-work puppeteer to his wife Lotte (Cameron Diaz).  Craig has been
reduced to street performances of Heloise and Abelard for change, and
even that does not work for him.  Lotte looks and dresses and generally
lives like a hippie.  She works in a pet store and has turned the
Schwartz's modest apartment into a menagerie of distressed animals.  In
his desperate efforts to find work Craig takes a job as a filing clerk
on the seven and a half floor of an office building.  The floor only
about five feet high was created to provide equal access for midgets.
Craig reluctantly settles into his job and starts having designs on the
office beauty, a leggy clerk named Maxine (Catherine Keener).  When
Maxine finds out Craig is a puppeteer his attentions are only a little
less welcome than the strep throat.
     Then Craig discovers that there is a little doorway hidden behind
an office file cabinet.  Behind it lies a dark, damp, gratuitously
Freudian tunnel that drops the trespasser into the mind and body of
John Malkovich (played by John Malkovich).  For fifteen minutes the
visitor sees what Malkovich sees, hears what Malkovich hears, and feels
what Malkovich feels.  Then the visitor is gently dropped from thin air
to the ground next to the New Jersey Turnpike.  For Craig the strange
phenomenon is his inroad to win the attentions of Maxine.  Maxine sees
the Malkovich tunnel as a giant moneymaking opportunity.  When Lotte
tries the tunnel she discovers that she likes to be Malkovich to ...
well that would be telling.
     Charlie Kaufman's script never slows down and never leaves a scene
with the expected.  And only toward the end is the plot so convoluted
that it stops making sense.  Not all the story possibilities are used,
but Kaufman does carry the premise and its ramifications to some
strange extremes.  Different people get different benefits from the
Malkovich ride.  Some visitors want to try just being in another body;
some want a taste of the Malkovich life style.  Malkovich's finely
appointed, but sterile and lifeless apartment is a stark contrast to
Craig's cluttered low-rent apartment teeming with animals and life.
Other people want to share the actor's sex life.
     John Cusak seems to have a taste for intelligent humor and takes
to his role with gusto.  For some reason he looks as seedy as he has
ever looked on the screen.  Cameron Diaz, who has been alluring in most
of her other films here is almost unrecognizably frumpy in a mop of
flyaway hair.  They are both made as unglamorous as possible to define
their rank in society and to contrast with Catherine Keener, one of the
beautiful people who can have a lover like Malkovich for the asking.
And the old doctor with a voice like Orson Bean really is played by
Orson Bean.
     At last something new and original in a movie.  This is a film as
fresh and entertaining as was the story ALICE IN WONDERLAND when it was
new.  It would be nice if following the lead of BEING JOHN MALKOVICH
filmmakers would realize that you could start with some really crazy
premise, possibly fantasy, and just follow it to wherever it leads.  I
rate BEING JOHN MALKOVICH a 9 on the 0 to 10 scale and a +3 on the -4
to +4 scale.
     Maybe someone who knows more about the state of marionette
techniques than I do.  Can a good puppeteer really make a marionette do
a somersault and not get the strings tangled up.  Questions unanswered:
Is there a separate in-house documentary about the seventh floor?
After all we know from the outside of the building that the floors
started out all the same height, so they must have divided the seventh
floor.  I was willing to suspend my disbelief for that; I was even
willing to suspend my disbelief on the major premises of the film.  But
one thing is minor premise goes a little too far.  I find it very
difficult to believe that without benefit of a magical tunnel anybody
could get from an office building in Manhattan to the New Jersey
Turnpike in only fifteen minutes.
     When Malkovich enters the tunnel the result is a really bizarre
scene borrowed from a "Twilight Zone" episode, but it is totally
unsatisfying as what would be seen.  I was expecting to see an ever-
diminishing tunnel or repetitions, not unlike the mirror scene in
CITIZEN KANE.  But my question is what did the Japanese tourist who was
in the tunnel with him see.  I assume from the script that Malkovich
really has never played a jewel thief.  However the reference to him
playing someone mentally retarded was probably to his performance as
Lenny in John Steinbeck's OF MICE AND MEN (1992).

Title
Review for Tráfico (1998)
     CAPSULE: A series of story lines told at the same time, not all of
which are connected.  Each is vaguely whimsical but nothing
overwhelmingly funny.  If there is a common theme it is class and
wealth.  Not very entertaining and my showing had many people walking
out.  Rating: 4 (0 to 10), low 0 (-4 to +4)
   - Written and directed by Joao Botelho.
   - Multiple stories, some connected, some not.
   - Music from many different style and countries.
   - Priests decide to close church and sell off the statues.  Very
     funny auction of the John the Baptist.  Giving details of John's
     life and John's virtues as selling points.
   - Women with dayglow wigs status symbol.
   - Woman is really unpleasant to her husband than goes back to
     listening to the song she says she loves, "Stand By Your Man."
   - Many lascivious middle-aged men and women.
   - Extended excerpt of all-female production of Shakespeare's "Julius
     Caesar."  Piece about intrigue.  One couple gets rich from son
     playing on the beach and discovering packs of money.
   - Contrasts of people with old money and the newly rich.
   - Sequence of junkmen reading children's stories from books found in
     a landfill.
   - Priests are obnoxious and thrown out of car while hitchhiking.
   - Long sequence of wealthy people eating sardines.  They use white
     gloves and pick up sardines in hands.
   - It is never clear what the film is trying to say and much possible
     whimsy may have been lost in translation.  It is strange.

Title
Review for Passed Away (1992)
     One of the film industry's more common tactics is the warmedy-bait-
and-switch.  Well, that's what I call it anyway.  The idea is that you take
a comedy "with heart" (as they say in THE PLAYER) and promote it as if it
were a wild screwball comedy.  Warm human values just do not hack it at the
box office.  And with at least two cast members in common with last year's
hilarious OSCAR, the advertising could well have been intended to give the
impression that PASSED AWAY was cut from the same cloth.  It wasn't, but it
is quite a pleasant film on its own.  In spirit, PASSED AWAY is much more
like ONCE AROUND.
     The basic plot is simple enough.  Jack Warden plays Jack Scanlon, the
patriarch of a large Irish family.  His four children are grown and leading
entangled lives of their own.  As the film opens, Jack has just recovered
from a heart attack and is helping his oldest son Johnny (played by Bob
Hoskins) through a mid-life crisis.  Then Jack dies suddenly and Johnny
finds himself the new head of a rather eccentric household and at the same
time is responsible for arranging for his father's wake and funeral.  Johnny
has a house full of family ranging from very human to just this side of
totally wacky.  And one more mourner shows up: Cassie Slocombe (played by
Nancy Travis, who looks a lot like Julia Roberts).  Jack always had a
wandering eye and often other parts wandered as well.  Johnny himself is
attracted to Cassie and suddenly Johnny knows what he wants to do with his
mid-life crisis.
     Charlie Peters, previously a screenwriter with such dubious credits as
PATERNITY and THREE MEN AND A LITTLE LADY, this time directs his own
screenplay and gets a killer cast, including Hoskins, Warden, Blair Brown,
William Petersen, Tim Curry, Peter Riegert, and Maureen Stapleton.  All he
really needed for this film about the dignity of being a regular person in
America was a score by Georges Delerue.  Richard Gibbs's music just does not
quite hit the right spot.  I give PASSED AWAY a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for City Hall (1996)
     CITY HALL brings to mind hard-edged 1950s urban expose's like ON
THE WATERFRONT and THE EDGE OF THE CITY.  And Jerry Goldsmith has
underscored the similarities by giving the film a big, brash, jazzy
score in the style of Leonard Bernstein.  That score may be the best
thing about the CITY HALL and sets the tone for everything that is to
come.  At heart CITY HALL is a mystery, but the mystery is not what
makes the film work.  It is the glue that holds the film together, but
this is really a picture of modern politics in New York City or any
multi-ethnic metropolis.  Certainly the mystery keeps the story moving
forward--sometimes not as fast as would be wished, but it does keep it
moving.  But the active ingredient is the setting of the story, giving
us an inside look at a political machine, how it maintains power, how
it relates to a multitude of different ethnic groups, and how politics
influences the decisions made.  And this is a film that is not dumbed
down for the audience.  The dialogue may at times be a little hard to
follow, but it has a ring of realism and keeps the audience on its
toes.
     New York City Mayor John Pappas (played by Al Pacino) has his
hands full with the fallout from a street shoot-out.  A policeman and
the nephew of a notorious crime lord killed each other and took with
them an innocent six-year-old black boy.  The Mayor sends his
assistant, Kevin Calhoun (John Cusack) to keep a lid on things and also
to investigate just what happened and why.  Young-looking but
perceptive, Calhoun traces the causes of the incident to organized
crime, to a local political boss, and to a mysterious judge.  The
investigation goes deep and, not surprisingly, turns up more than what
the mayor's office wants found.
     It is not a good sign when there are four names on the screenplay,
but it may not be so bad if they are four good writers.  In this case
included are Nicholas Pileggi of GOODFELLAS and CASINO.  We also have
among the four dark stylist Paul Schrader.  The cast is similarly
power-house, but perhaps not such a good investment.  An over-rated Al
Pacino gets the top billing that John Cusack deserved and plays the
same feisty character he always plays, overpowering too many lines.
His delivery damages the effect of the film's centerpiece, a sermon
from the mayor on the death of a young boy.  Cusack still seems a
little young for his role, but it may be just that people are getting
into politics earlier.  Bridget Fonda brings her quirky smile to an
under-written role that seems like an afterthought.  To no surprise the
most memorable and natural acting is from Danny Aiello as a cagey and
adept neighborhood councilman who positions himself as everybody's
friend.
     Harold Becker, director of police films like THE ONION FIELD, THE
BLACK MARBLE, and SEA OF LOVE, gives the CITY HALL a nice texture and
feel of immediacy.  Rate this one a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Grand Canyon (1991)
     You made a mistake.  Because of your mistake you are about to die.
Your loved ones will have to get along without you because they have seen
you alive for the last time.  You have just lost what would have been the
rest of your life.  Then a perfect stranger reaches out a hand and saves
your life.  It is just a tiny action, but it means you are back again in the
world of the living.  You are going to have that rest-of-your-life after
all.  Do you see the world any differently now?  Darn right you do!  Every
good thing that happens to you--and every bad thing--is a gift of the
stranger.  Now the whole world looks surreal.  You are much more aware of
the happy and unhappy events that make up the life you almost lost.  You
suddenly have a sense of wonder about incidents you might never have thought
about the day before.  That is at least one way to look at Lawrence Kasdan's
enigmatic GRAND CANYON.  My wife sat on my right and claimed to have seen a
film making a philosophical point about what comes of good intentions.  A
friend who sat on my left (even slopping over into my seat) saw a film
intended to make a strong but not overly familiar political point that our
cities are deteriorating beyond the point of repair.  These are remarkably
different interpretations of a single film.  Perhaps the greatest virtue of
GRAND CANYON is its strange ambiguity.
     Mack (played by Kevin Kline) is on his way home from a basketball game
in urban Los Angeles when his car breaks down in just the wrong
neighborhood.  He calls for a tow truck but has the feeling he may not see
it come.  Sure enough, five youths with obviously bad intentions are about
to attack him when the tow truck driver, Simon (played by Danny Glover),
arrives and diplomatically defuses the situation.  Mack is so grateful to
Simon he feels he wants to help improve Simon's life.  Then an unrelated
"miraculous" event happens to Mack's wife Claire (played by Mary McDonnell
of DANCES WITH WOLVES and MATEWAN).  Soon events are intertwining the lives
of these three people, Mack's secretary Dee (played by Mary-Louise Parker of
LONGTIME COMPANION and FRIED GREEN TOMATOES), Dee's friend Jane (played by
Alfre Woodard, who played Winnie Mandela to Glover's Nelson Mandela in--what
else?--MANDELA), and Mack's best friend Davis (played by Steve Martin).
     Lawrence Kasdan co-produced, directed, and co-authored the screenplay
with his wife.  Together, the Kasdans create a story of rapture and
disaster.  It is a story of mysticism and self-reliance.  It is about good
luck and bad luck, yet it never becomes soap opera.  It is always
captivating, yet it is never clear where it is coming from.  When the film
ends, you sit watching the credits asking, "Well, what was that about?"  I
give it a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.  (P.S.  Checking the VARIETY
review, I find out that *they* think it is a film about survival strategies
in L.A.)

Title
Review for Star Trek: First Contact (1996)
[Note that followups are directed to rec.arts.movies.current-films and
rec.arts.movies.startrek.current only, not to rec.arts.sf.movies.  -Moderator]
          Capsule: The newest "Star Trek" adventure is an
     okay science fiction piece lacking in some of the
     absurdities from which the "Star Trek" films have
     occasionally suffered.  The first of the series without
     William Shatner finds Patrick Stewart a more than
     adequate replacement on the screen.  The script needed a
     little tightening, but the Borg turn out to be a good,
     if familiar-seeming screen foe.  Rating: high +1 (-4 to
     +4)
     To this point the "Star Trek" films have either had reasonable
action but scripts that have shown far too little thought to the
concepts (numbers 2-4, 6 and STAR TREK: GENERATIONS).  Or have had
intriguing ideas wasted on poor execution (1 and 5).  STAR TREK: FIRST
CONTACT falls into the first category, but is blessedly free of ill-
conceived ideas like the Genesis Device or the Nexus.  The Borg at one
time added desperately-needed tension to the "Star Trek" suite of
series by introducing an enemy that was at once orders of magnitude
more powerful than the Federation ships and as implacable as a nest of
ants.  The Borg underscored that space exploration was still dangerous
and that whatever the current Enterprise was, it still had limitations.
However, whatever value that property represented has long since been
mortgaged in episodes that showed in a fair fight the Universe has
nothing--not even the Borg--that can stand up to the Enterprise, and
individual Borgs can be won over by niceness.  Some dim bulbs in the
"Star Trek" factory have safely established that we never need to worry
about "Star Trek" characters again. Vulcans return from the dead and
new Enterprises come in convenient six-packs, so we can safely ignore
the series and give our primary attention to "Babylon 5."  With the
concept of the Borg already compromised, they seem fair game to use in
a film.  In large part they are reduced here to NIGHT OF THE LIVING
DEAD style zombies with electronic enhancements they do not seem to
use, but then the concept has already been compromised.
     In the new film the Borg have an unusual strategy for assimilating
Earth.  They go back in time to just before that momentous day in the
21st Century--and who can forget it?--April 5, 2063 when both Zephram
Cochran (James Cromwell of BABE) took the first warp jump and as a
result Earth also makes its first contact with an alien race.  It is
amazing that both happened in one day and even more that nobody in any
of the series or films has ever mentioned that fact till now.  If the
Borg can manage to abort the first warp trip and the first alien
contact, apparently everything else will be okay for them.  And their
arrival has to be just within hours of the flight and not two weeks
earlier because ... uh ...  well, maybe the Borg are not quite so smart
after all.  To the rescue in their time-travel wake comes the
Enterprise commanded by Jean-Luc Picard (Patrick Stewart, of I,
CLAUDIUS and JEFFREY).  He is here against the express orders of the
Federation in a move that would be more characteristic of James Kirk
than of Picard.
     In the new "Star Trek" tradition of giving the directorial reins
to an aspiring "Star Trek" actor, the task went to Jonathan Frakes, who
is perhaps one of the least noticeable actors in this film.  He is in
some major scenes but is only noticeable when he seems to be grinning
at the joke of him directing himself. But Frakes has always been a
little redundant in the Next Generation stories.  He was thrown into
the cast because the creators knew that there could be no romantic
interest in a bald middle-aged captain.  Then Stewart demonstrated far
more appeal than anyone expected.  Speaking of whom I am not sure if it
is meaningful to talk about whether Patrick Stewart is a good Captain
Picard, but he is.  Stewart is the best actor who was ever a regular in
the "Star Trek" stories and his is the most interesting character.
There are a few other familiar actors sprinkled in (besides the regular
cast), but none to very good advantage. James Cromwell plays a sort of
working class physics genius in a role that never really gels.  He is
never believable as the inventor of warp drive, which is perhaps the
point of the joke, but it just adds to the question of how with so
little resource, physical as well as mental, could this particular
person putter together warp drive.  Alfre Woodard is totally wasted in
a throwaway role.  Alice Krige, best remembered for GHOST STORY has
only slightly less thankless a role as the one-dimensional punk-looking
queen bee of the Borg.
     This episode is not just darker in tone than many of the chapters,
it is literally darker in lighting.  In the entire film there are just
two scenes that come to mind that are filmed in daylight.  This,
combined with the somewhat repulsive Borg and their queen who, as a
possible homage to INVADERS FROM MARS, is little more than a head gives
the film a decidedly colder and more dour feel.  This could be a
positive touch, but it really undermines the attempted humor scenes.
It is hard to imagine Marina Sirtis doing a drunk act being funny even
under the best of conditions, here it does not stand a chance.   Visual
effects are generally fairly good with the exception of some zero-G
floating that would have been unconvincing even before the release of
APOLLO 13.  Jerry Goldsmith has written a nice score incorporating
themes from other "Star Trek" series and films but also including some
new themes.
     This is a "Star Trek" episode with its share of faults, but few
that come to mind while watching it.  It has the melodrama of other
episodes of the films but fewer absurdities this time around.  Oh, and
it is entertaining.  I rate it a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     Minor spoiler...Minor spoiler...Minor spoiler...Minor spoiler...
     Some complaints about the script.  I have avoided reading
discussions on the net so some of there may have already been brought
up there without my knowledge.
     1. Even a few minutes of warp should have taken a ship a lot
further from Earth than it was.  Presumably warp speed is faster than
light if not out and out discontinuous jumping.
     2. The claim in made that in the 25th century they no longer use
money.  This is patently inconsistent with STAR TREK: DEEP SPACE 9.
People are spending and gambling something in Quark's Bar. Gold-pressed
latinum is also frequently mentioned and used as money.
     3. Data turning off his emotion chip by twisting his head is a
nice piece of mime, but it makes little sense.
     4. It really reduces the Borg to a very unintelligent level to say
they do not even notice intruders in their midst.  Even ants are
smarter than that with far smaller brains.
     5. There are two strategies to use against the Borg and Picard
chooses one because he has an unreasoning hatred of the Borg.  Someone
who really had an unreasoning hatred of the Borg would have chosen the
other strategy.
     6. Admittedly complaining about holodeck sequences is like
tripping a dachshund, but this one seems especially stupid.  The
holodeck in principle creates only visual effects.  It would take a lot
of double-talk to make it sound possible that anyone could actually be
shot by a visual illusion and bleed real blood.
     7. The Universal Translator already sounds like magic assuming
that it needs a lot of input about a new race.  It goes considerably
further to say that it knows the new language instantly with virtually
no sampling.

Title
Review for Brothers McMullen, The (1995)
     Filmmaking can be a big international industry and it can be a
small cottage industry.  THE BROTHERS MCMULLEN is one of the films
produced in informal manner.  It was made over eight months of weekends
in Edward Burns's house with Burns's mother cooking for the cast and
crew.  Burns wrote, co-produced, directed, and acted in the film.  The
other producer, incidentally, was Dick Fisher who also filmed the movie
and edited.  The film was shot on 16-millimeter and blown up to 35-
,millimeter giving it a grainy look and making even the bright scenes
seem dim.
     The senior McMullen was an abusive, alcoholic, wife-beater.  He
died five years earlier, totally unlamented.  His wife returned to
Ireland to marry the man she really loved when McMullen made her
pregnant.  That leaves three sons, ages 22 to 33, living in the same
house.  Each is at a different stage of relationships with the opposite
sex.  Youngest son Patrick (Mike McGlone) has a Jewish girlfriend who
is making plans for future with Patrick working for her father. Barry
(Edward Burns) wants to remain a bachelor all his life. and Jack (Jack
Mulcahy) appears happily married but is not sure he wants to take the
next step and have a child.  This is a family that talks and can freely
criticize each other's behavior toward women.  Much of the film is
filled with the brothers asking each other and other people
philosophical questions like "Are you better off alone than with
someone who is not your soulmate?"  Each seems to represent a different
aspect of a group personality.  Patrick, for example, is the conscience
of the family.  He takes his Catholicism very seriously and sees his
brothers' behavior in stern, moralistic terms.  But the most serious
problem with the plot is in the spoiler comment at the end of the
review.
     Considering that this film was made the way it was, it is not
surprising that there are no familiar faces in the cast, nor are any
really needed.  The acting is uniformly very good, indicating that
Burns is already a better director than many with more experience.  The
continuity of the performances is all the more impressive when one
considers that this is a film shot mostly in weekends and in spare
time.  There is not a bad performance and the presence of some actors
who don't look like actors is a definite plus.  There are none of the
bad performances one often finds in informal productions like this one.
Occasionally there is some uneven camerawork including a few
disorienting extreme closeups in the middle of a scene.  There are also
some continuity problems.
     But overall Burns has his story to tell and his characters to
create and he does it in fine form.  My major complaint with his script
takes the form of a spoiler and so follows the review.  I give this
film a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     SPOILER SPOILER SPOILER SPOILER SPOILER
     The real problem with the script of THE BROTHERS MCMULLEN is the
sheer predictability of the subplots.  There are three stories and each
story telegraphed what was going to happen.  In each case it was the
simplest and most obvious conclusion to the story.  Burns has to learn
how to put a little bit of spin on the ball.  Humorous dialogue and
some characterization are nice in telling a story, but there needs to
be a story to tell.

Title
Review for Memphis Belle: A Story of a Flying Fortress, The (1944)
     This year's MEMPHIS BELLE directed by Michael Caton-Jones is a popular
film describing the last mission of the first B-17 to complete its assigned
twenty-five missions.  What has not been mentioned anywhere is that MEMPHIS
BELLE is a partial remake of a previous film called THE MEMPHIS BELLE.  The
original was directed by one of Hollywood's great directors, William Wyler,
who directed such films as MRS. MINIVER, THE BEST YEARS OF OUR LIVES, THE
DESPERATE HOURS, THE BIG COUNTRY, BEN HUR, and FUNNY GIRL.  After he
completed MRS. MINIVER, Wyler enlisted in the Army Air Corps only to be
assigned to make documentaries about the day-to-day business of the Army Air
Corps.  He made two; one was THUNDERBOLT and one was THE MEMPHIS BELLE.  The
latter was bout the B-17 crews stationed in England who bombed Germany and
used as a focal point the last mission of the Memphis Belle.  The Discovery
Channel on cable just happens to be running Wyler's MEMPHIS BELLE this
month.
     [The following paragraph will include some spoilers about the 1990
movie.]
     Wyler apparently went on several bombing missions to create the
documentary, though he has what is at best only a minute or so of footage
from the Belle's final flight, and that is from the landing and taken from
the ground.  The 1990 films seems to have much exaggerated the danger of the
final mission.  The following are apparently inaccuracies of the later film:
     - In the original most of the planes are not named for or
       illustrated with pictures of sexy women.  More common are names
       like "Old Bill."  The nose paintings usually show cartoons of
       nasty things happening to a frightened- looking Hitler.
     The Wyler documentary is worth seeing and makes a worthwhile supplement
to the movie.  After the documentary there are interviews with crew members
who flew the B-17s.  The contention is made that this is one of the best-
designed planes ever built.  Every architectural element has a backup so if
it were shot away the backup takes over.  The planes could be horribly shot
up and still be in good flying condition, as both versions of the film
showed.  A German flier is quoted as saying that attacking a B-17 was "like
making love to a porcupine ... on fire."

Title
Review for Unforgiven (1992)
     I understand that the Marlboro Man died recently.  For years he
represented the spirit of the Old West with a tattooed hand holding a pack
of Marlboros while he sat around the campfire or rode a magnificent horse
through snowy prairies.  The cause of his death, in wonderful irony if not
total coincidence, was lung cancer.  He spent the last part of his life
doing public service messages to warn people against smoking.  The myth of
the macho smoker and the reality were, in his case, very different.  He
lived off the myth, but at some point he realized the myth was dangerous and
wanted people to know the reality.
     I picture Clint Eastwood as having gone through a similar moral crisis.
He was the Man with No Name who could kill men by reflex.  He was Dirty
Harry, who made his day by gunning down punks. Eastwood made his living by
that image.  Perhaps there are even kids in urban high schools and even
junior highs who have patterned their own gun skills on Eastwood's.  Perhaps
that was a  concern of Eastwood's; perhaps not.  But he certainly has made a
film about the myth and reality of gun fighting.  Saul Rubinek plays a small
but very central role as W. W. Beauchamp, who follows around the great
gunfighters and writes dime novels that glamorize the life of the gun.  He
turns the dirty, disgusting, demeaning profession of killing into exciting
and completely inaccurate accounts for avid readers.  UNFORGIVEN is a story
of gunfighting as it really was--and it was a little less romantic than
killing chickens for a living.  Eastwood produced and directed a powerful
and nightmarish Western.
     It is 1880 in the flyspeck town of Big Whiskey, Wyoming.  Two cowpokes
are in town taking advantage of the local whorehouse.  One of the whores
makes an ungenerous comment and her client goes after her with a Bowie
knife.  In the dark, his partner may have tried to restrain him, but the end
result is a woman cut up very badly.  Sheriff Little Bill Daggett (played by
gene Hackman) wades in to bring peace.  In his judgement, it is the owner of
the whorehouse who has been wronged and must be paid off in valuable ponies.
Whores, being whores, do not need to be paid back.  This is not a decision
which goes over well with the women.  They decide to pool their money and
offer $1000 to anyone who will kill the two men, whether it is one or both
who are guilty.
     A young gunslinger, anxious to make a name for himself (played by Jaimz
Woolvett), decides he can collect if he teams up with the legendary
gunfighter Bill Munny (played by Clint Eastwood).  Marriage has made a very
different man of Munny and now he is a widower with two children to raise, a
failing pig farm, and nightmares of the men he has killed.  In spite of
being incredibly out of practice, he decides to go along, but only if his
old partner Ned Logan (played by Morgan Freeman) will join them.
     UNFORGIVEN is a dark Western.  It is dark in tone and often dark in
photography.  It is a murky film about murky moral decisions.  Nobody is
totally good; nobody is totally bad.  While there is not a lot to redeem to
cowpoke who sets the whole fiasco in motion, there is at least a modicum of
understanding of why he did what he did and the feeling that his intended
punishment may outweigh his crime.  I could be wrong, but it seems to me his
partner was only well-intentioned and he too is pulled far too deeply into
the mess that ensues.  If the timing had been different, Hackman's character
as a sadistic sheriff could have been inspired by Daryl Gates.  He combines
a laudable desire to defend justice with a dangerous desire to define it.
     This film shows a surprising bitterness about the myths of the Old
West.  Yet where they are debunked, the film rings true.  Sleeping out under
the stars may be nice, but with storm clouds it is a different matter.  the
great gunfights of the West are about as romantic as the great gunfights of
Vietnam.  An obvious "happy ending" is foreshadowed and then avoided.  And
one nice touch of bitter irony it would be a pity to miss: the saloon and
whorehouse that is the core of the hellhole town of Big Whiskey, Wyoming, is
called "Greeley's."
     UNFORGIVEN ranks up with THE OUTLAW JOSEY WALES as one of Eastwood's
two best films.  I give it a high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Near Dark (1987)
     What is the nicest thing I can think of to say about NEAR DARK?  Well,
they didn't bend too much the traditional rules for vampires and within
those rules they showed something of how dangerous a gang of really mean-
spirited (bloody-minded?) vampires might be.  Beyond that, NEAR DARK is over
three hours in a film so bad, every minute of watching it counts as two
minutes off your sentence.
     A guy picks up a girl who turns out to be a vampire.  She bites him
after what seems like and interminable period of time.  This opening
sequence turns out to be the high point of the film.  Our friend is forced
to join the gang of vampires to learn the trade of vampirism.  Mostly he
sees how the vampires bully and terrorize humans with their powers.  The
scenes of the bullying are long and violent and bloody and boring.  There
are a couple of ideas borrowed from Anne Rice's INTERVIEW WITH A VAMPIRE.

Title
Review for Sommersby (1993)
     The day I am writing this review Siskel and Ebert had an episode in
which they reviewed five films of which four--SOMMERSBY, THE VANISHING,
HOMEWARD BOUND, and GUN CRAZY--are remakes.  There are hard choices to make
when you remake somebody else's film.  Do you just reproduce the original or
do you vary things?  When you vary the telling, can you really improve on
the original?  Does your film have something to offer people who have seen
the original?  SOMMERSBY is a rather remarkable remake of the 1982 film THE
RETURN OF MARTIN GUERRE.  SOMMERSBY is Nicholas Meyer and Anthony Shaffer's
retelling of the MARTIN GUERRE story with some very ironic complexities
added.  And there is enough complexity in this film that, in fact, it may be
a better film the first time through if you have some idea what twists are
coming.  Meyer and Shaffer have balanced their story so it is equally
rewarding if you have or have not seen the original.
     The Civil War has been over for two years in Vine Hill, Tennessee, and
Laurel Sommersby (played by Jodie Foster) is about ready to declare herself
a widow and remarry.  If the truth be known, Jack Sommersby was always
better at being a "good old boy" than he was at being a husband.  But then
Jack (played by Richard Gere) returns from a Union prison camp determined to
improve Vine Hill in general and his marriage in specific.  His six-year
absence has made a new man of Jack, so much so that people start to question
if perhaps this new man might really not be Jack.  Jack sets about trying to
fix up the war-ravaged valley and to give a boost to the economy.  Or is he
just trying a confidence scheme?  What Jack is doing and why he is doing it
make this a very different film from the original.  One negative touch is
that the film's attitudes towards race relations seem a bit anachronistic,
but they are not quite as pat as they first seem.
     Kudos goes to Meyer and Shaffer's story which was adapted by Meyer and
Sarah Kernochen into a screenplay.  Director John Amiel, who also directed
television's "Singing Detective," gives us a complex story beautifully
photographed to give a strong post-Civil War feel.  While the score has a
much more traditional tone than most of Danny Elfman's scores, it is a very
likable, melodic score.  SOMMERSBY is at least satisfying and often is
poignant.  I give it a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Governess, The (1998)
     One wants to feel when watching a film that at least somewhere in
the film there are some new ideas somewhere in the film and something
that the viewer has not seen before.  Of late, however, we have been
getting films that really are little more than recombinations of other
films.  No part of the film felt like it belonged to that film alone.
Rarely does one see such a film on the art house circuit.  That is one
advantage to art house films.  But occasionally even there a film comes
through that feel more assembled from parts than written.  Watching THE
GOVERNESS I was reminded of pieces of JANE EYRE, of THE INNOCENTS, of
Jane Austin films, even of THE COLOR PURPLE.  It reminded me of all
these films, but I cannot imagine that any other film will ever remind
me primarily of THE GOVERNESS.
     Minnie Driver plays Rosina, a precocious young Jewish woman from
London some time around the 1820s.  When her father is killed Rosina
does not know what is to become of her.  Her mother wants to marry her
to an old fish merchant for whom she thinks she will never feel love.
Didn't I see this with a butcher in FIDDLER ON THE ROOF?  Rosina has a
better idea.  She will take the ultra-Christian name Mary Blackchurch
and will apply for a job as a governess.  She does and accepts a
position for the Cavendish Family on the Isle of Skye.  Rosina has the
most romantic of impression what the isle will be like but it turns out
to be foggy and dismal and the house big and mysterious in the best
traditions of the Brontes.  Mrs. Cavendish (Harriet Walter) seems to be
dramatically wasting away of ennui.  Young Clementina Cavendish, a
small monster, does not like her new governess and immediately tries to
get the upper hand.  And there is no appearance from the mysterious Mr.
Cavendish (who would be played by Tom Wilkenson if he were around).  It
seems that Cavendish is performing strange scientific experiments that
some rumor to verge on the supernatural.  However as time passes nearly
all things improve in various predictable ways as Rosina's spunk, wit,
education, and intelligence proves to be just what the Cavendish house
needs, and the house is just what Rosina needs.  Sandra Goldbacher
wrote and directed the film as her first major effort and perhaps that
is part of the problem with the plotting.
     Minnie Driver is a good actress in a role that by turns expects
her to be plain as a bug and then later to be glamorous.  She manages
to cover the range and does for the story all she could be expected to
do.  Tom Wilkenson as Cavendish must go in the reverse direction and
manages quite well.  Wilkenson may be remembered as the imperious
bosses from THE GHOST AND THE DARKNESS and especially from THE FULL
MONTY.  Ashley Rowe's photography is certainly moody if unsubtle.
There is a heavy use of filters so that most scenes do not appear in
natural light.  Scenes are frequently awash in blue or brown.  And Rowe
manages to make the fog outside even appear to enter the house.
     It is easy to imagine Goldbacher turning out good films in the
future, but her first effort points to a need for a little more
imagination in her storytelling.  I give her first effort a 5 on the 0
to 10 scale and a high 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     The contrivance and cliche seems to continue throughout the film
in ways that could not be described above.  Rosina's photography
suggestions all make perfect sense from the present when we know that a
darkroom is a pretty good idea and that photography can artistic.  But
they seem unlikely coming from a woman or even a man of the 1820s.
Even for a woman from a culture that stresses education the extent of
her general knowledge seems anachronistic.  In the final analysis THE
GOVERNESS is a sort of bodice-ripper variant on COLD COMFORT FARM, then
twists when Rosina learns the hard feminist lesson not to trust men.
Every inch of the way in the plot we are on well-trodden ground.  I
will point out the one laughable irony is that so soon after
photography is invented comes the advent of the dirty picture.

Title
Review for Mission to Mars (2000)
     In 1950 ROCKETSHIP XM went to Mars and brought back to Earth a
secret that might determine the future of the human race.  It was the
first major film of the 1950s science fiction cycle.  ROCKETSHIP XM was
early in a sub-genre of space exploration that included FRAU IM MOND,
DESTINATION MOON, PROJECT MOONBASE, THE CONQUEST OF SPACE, 12 TO THE
MOON, COUNTDOWN, 2001: A SPACE ODYSSEY, and possibly CONTACT.  These
are films that have piqued our sense of wonder.  Sadly, we have not
seen many of them of late.  Science fiction films have gone in other
directions with monster films, psychotic killers in space, martial
arts, and chases.  While MISSION TO MARS makes a few false moves in the
final reel, in particular some errors in science, it is a great ride
and it brings back the sense of wonder of some of the 1950s space
explorations films, back when the sky and the future were limitless.
     This film begins in the year 2020 with the first mission to Mars.
Four people are sent to the planet Mars.  The expedition seems to be
going well until an unusual formation is noted on a nearby hill.  Going
to investigate, things go mysteriously and spectacularly wrong.  Now
there is at most one Mars astronaut alive, Luke Graham (played by Don
Cheadle).  A second mission is sent to rescue Luke and continue the
mission.  On this expedition are Jim McConnell (Gary Sinise) and Woody
Blake (Tim Robbins wearing the most uncomfortable-looking piece of
jewelry I have seen in a long time).  Along the way they face some of
the problems and dangers we have seen dramatized previously in films,
but have not seen since visual effects in films have become so agile.
Some of the effects work, particularly motorized vehicles on Mars, do
not look well rendered, but elsewhere some of the effects work is quite
good.  The destruction of the first mission is deliciously eerie.
Another novel scene involves an explosion that could only happen in the
conditions of space and the special effects to portray the scene are
fascinating.  What we get is a film with a sort of nostalgic feel but
which also has a timely sense as consideration is given to staging a
manned mission to Mars.
     This is Brian De Palma's first science fiction film and he has a
healthy respect for the older films.  This is a science fiction film
without guns and chases.  (It is a pity it did not leave out the
product placements also.)  Gary Sinise is a good actor, but his
performance seems a little stilted here.  He is playing a man who keeps
his emotions bottled up, as does Robbins so we have to infer emotions
from the situations.  Sinise deserves good roles, but we see little of
his talent here.  Robbins we do not expect an evocative performance; we
expect his style of under-acting.  Also present are Don Cheadle and
Jerry O'Connell of "Sliders," and both are fine.  There is a fair-sized
role that goes to a mysteriously uncredited Armin Mueller-Stahl.
     The critics are not being very kind to MISSION TO MARS, but I
strongly suspect there will be a contingent of older science fiction
fans who were brought up on 1950s space exploration films and who will
enjoy this film as much as I did.  I rate it a 7 on the 1 to 10 scale
and a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     Spoiler...Spoiler...Spoiler...Spoiler...
     I do not know if sending married couples into space has been
considered.  But it would be a questionable NASA policy for precisely
the reasons that this film makes clear.
     Some readers will know why I was a little disappointed that when
they found Luke he did not ask his rescuers for a piece of cheese.
     Evolutionary biologist Stephen J. Gould would have a fit if he saw
this film.  The implication of what is learned in the final reel is
that the human stands at the top of the evolutionary tree and that all
evolution is aimed at creating a humanoid creature with our DNA and
even our facial expressions.  That is not the way it works.  We were
formed by our environment in a random walk of adapting to the natural
world.  Plant the same protozoa DNA on two different planets with
different conditions and the resulting species would rapidly diverge.
It is highly unlikely that the most intelligent species on each of two
planets would so resemble each other.  And even if there was a guiding
force they would not end up so different looking.  The error in this
film is closely related to that in THE BOYS FROM BRAZIL, but the
probabilities are far lower here.
     A much better thought out film on Martian survival strategies is
Nigel Kneale's QUATERMASS AND THE PIT (FIVE MILLION YEARS TO EARTH),
which I have long considered the best science fiction film I have ever
seen.  Previously hard to find, it currently seems to run monthly on
the American Movie Classics cable channel.
     It seems unlikely that with two missions to Cydonia there would be
no mention of the famous Cydonia Face on Mars, and in fact they seem
unaware of it.  It is like being in Roswell, New Mexico, and not
knowing about the supposed crashed flying saucer.

Title
Review for Batman (1989)
          Capsule review:  A triumph of visual imagery over story
     for the music video generation.  Ironically, Keaton is better
     as Batman than Nicholson is as the Joker.  The art design is
     superior but just about everything else is pedestrian.
     Better than the television series or the serials, not as good
     as the comic.  Rating: 0.
     Excuse the pretentiousness of starting a review with an 82-year-old
quote, but Adams might very well be talking about BATMAN, whose images,
often contradictory or of clashing styles, far overpower the flyweight story
that binds them together.  BATMAN is a triumph of visual imagery over story.
While Jack Nicholson is the top-billed star, his character is paper-thin and
just as flat.  We are down here to the level of villains whose biggest
crimes can be explained only by nastiness.  Nicholson apparently was chosen
not because he had a single responsive chord for the man behind the famous
face, but because both are known for their smirking.  Nicholson does not
even look the part.  His face is not thin and angular enough and his non-
angular body is better suited to playing the Penguin.  Of course, it is a
pity that the original model for the Joker is well past the point where he
could have played the part.  Conrad Veidt, best known for playing Col.
Strasser in CASABLANCA and Cesar in CABINET OF DR. CALIGARI, played the
title role in THE MAN WHO LAUGHS, a poor wretch whose face is twisted into a
perpetual rictus grin.  His nightmarish look was reportedly the real
inspiration for the Joker so he looked the role.  Nicholson can be a decent
actor but he lacks range and in spite of all the fuss and expectation,
Michael Keaton is much better cast as Batman than Nicholson is as the Joker.
Keaton, first of all, looks the part of Batman.  That is not all that
surprising if you realize what you are seeing is two eyes, a perpetual
frown, and a chin.  Everything else is plastic shell.  Any actor with a chin
and reasonable musculature could have looked good in the Batman suit.
Keaton's role was a little more demanding when he played the man behind the
mask--he is not a character out of Dostoevsky, understand, but his role did
require a little acting and while he was neither superior nor memorable, he
was at least equal to the role.  Surprisingly, Michael Gough played against
type as a sympathetic Alfred the butler (sort of a Batman's batman!).  At
one point he does severely overstep what the original Alfred would have
done, but that is a script fault, not Gough's failing.
     The story, what there is of it, gives us an origin for the Joker, a
touch of one for Batman, and one fiendish though not very coherent scheme by
the Joker which is, f course, foiled by Batman.  I will not say much about
the Joker's scheme, but it involves chemical contamination.  The Joker makes
the part about chemical contamination quite public, but apparently Batman is
the only person to do a chemical analysis of the contaminated products.  (To
judge how likely that is, the Berkeley ellness Letter reports, "The smoke
from a single cigarette contains about 100 times more cyanide than did the
two grapes from Chile that were impounded by government officials in March."
Any idea how many chemical labs got involved in analysis after that tiny
level of contamination was found?  How likely do you find it that only
Batman would do a complete chemical analysis of the Joker's product?)  The
plot also concerns what must be the world's tallest cathedral.  At a minimum
it looks to be at least fifty stories tall.  That does not make for a
believable story, but it is there for visual style more than credibility.
     In the quote above, Adams talks about contradictory images, and that is
precisely what BATMAN offers.  There are wide mood swings from somber, dark,
and brooding, to just exactly the sort of tongue-in-cheek campiness that the
producers have long promised would *not* be in this film.  Scenes of the Joker
dancing Mardi Gras fashion to songs by Prince in front of cheering crowds
are not classic Batman style by any means.  And when Batman laments, "This
is not exactly a normal world," this is not exactly a Batman sentiment.
Also, one wonders how many worlds Batman has seen.  Again and again the
story stops--literally stops--in a time-out for a visual image.  One of the
most ridiculous of these has the Batplane break off a confrontation with the
Joker so it can fly above the clouds and be seen outlined against the moon,
looking like an aerial bat-symbol.  If the script gives no explanation, the
cheer of the audience does.  Logic is less important than the visual image.
     BATMAN is an art designer's film all the way.  Gotham City is a highly
stylized New York City with the art deco of the 1930s and the futuristic
feel of Fritz Lang's (not Superman's) Metropolis.  It is a collection of
dark somber streets seen only at night or under overcast skies.  This is a
film without sunshine.  To tie Gotham to the present, the mayor of the city
was cast not for any acting ability, but because he looks like Ed Koch.  In
spite of the beautiful visual design for the city, the eye still rebels
because of the matte paintings and building models that are just not
convincing as being anything but mattes and models.  That is not a serious
fault in a film with a strong story, but when a film's strongest suit is its
art design, it becomes very important to execute those designs flawlessly.
     Finally, a word about the music.  Danny Elfman has written a decent
score, but choosing Prince to write the songs, apparently for the nihilism
of his previous work, was as big a blunder as choosing Nicholson for his
smirk.  Director Tim Burton claims to be a fan of Batman comic books, but it
seems to me they were better than his film.  I have to give the film a
neutral 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.  I guess I did not expect better, but I had
hoped for it nonetheless.

Title
Review for Navigator: A Mediaeval Odyssey, The (1988)
          Capsule review:  For the beauty of its photography and
     the originality of its concept this fantasy from Australia
     and New Zealand is the best that has been seen in America for
     several years.  Yet it loses points because of a muddled
     narrative that leaves the viewer wondering what the story was
     really all about.  Rating: +2.
     It is March 1348 in Cumbria.  In a small mining village there is the
certain knowledge that the Plague is coming.  Connor has been gone from the
village for three months, much longer than expected, just finding out what
is happening in the world.  Perhaps the Plague has claimed him.  His young
brother Griffin waits for his return.  And Griffin suffers from enigmatic
dreams, perhaps visions, of another world and a mission of faith, perhaps an
act of faith so great that God will intercede and protect the village from
the onslaught of the Plague.  God wants the villagers to dig through the
flat disk that is our world and come out on the other side, the Celestial
City.  There they are to forge a cross and place it on top of the mighty
cathedral that commands the Celestial City.  When Connor returns with news
of just how close the Plague really is, the urgency of the mission becomes
obvious.  They dig through the disk and find the Celestial City, a city of
great wonder, though to our eyes it is just your standard 1988 New Zealand
city.  Things we have come to live with are to the pilgrims' eyes great
sights and great dangers.  And so begins their adventure.
     Stylistically filmed in black and white and in color, THE NAVIGATOR
beautifully re-creates the life in a 14th Century village and a comparable
view of life in the 20th Century, though the color photography is much less
interesting.  It is a story told on many levels, not all of which are
comprehensible.  The style of story-telling is usually well told with the
sort of duality of vision that THE GODS MUST BE CRAZY has.  We see the
familiar, but we also see it through the eyes of a strange culture.  Only at
one point does this duality break down into slapstick worthy of a Terry
Gilliam.
     THE NAVIGATOR is an odd and murky fantasy that seems to be pointing to
some deeper meaning that is somewhere beyond view.  As a fantasy it edges
out even this year's FIELD OF DREAMS for originality of idea.  But in the
final analysis the film narrative is muddled and the point of this exercise
remains unclear.  I give it a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Liar Liar (1997)
     LIAR LIAR is basically a retread of a 1961 episode of THE TWILIGHT
ZONE.  In that story Jack Carson played a lying used car dealer Harvey
Hunnicut who bought a car that came equipped with a curse.  Whoever
owned the car could speak only the truth.  Carson made a few contorted
faces as he tried to force himself to lie to customers but eventually
had to give in to the acceptance that the curse really worked on him.
Eventually he was able to become a double winner not just because he
sold the car to someone else:  the person he sold it to was Nikita
Krushchev, Premier of the Soviet Union.  A similar concept was used in
THE WHOLE TRUTH, in which Bob Hope agrees to tell the truth for a whole
day.  LIAR LIAR is, however, much closer to the TWILIGHT ZONE story,
with the lying profession changed from used car salesman to an
unscrupulous lying lawyer.  The sorrowful or bewildered facial gestures
Carson gave his Hunnicut character.  But the facial gestures are
exaggerated by Jim Carrey into, well, what we would expect from Jim
Carrey.
     Carrey plays Fletcher Reede, not just a lawyer but the paragon of
lying lawyers.  Fletcher makes his living by subverting the truth.  And
what he does in his professional life he does in his private life.
With cheating and lies he destroyed his marriage to his former wife
Audrey (Maura Tierney) and is in the process of alienating their son
Max (Justin Cooper).  Fletcher has promised to be at Max's fifth
birthday party and is instead in bed with his boss (Amanda Donohoe of
LAIR OF THE WHITE WORM) trying to screw his way to the top.  The
disappointed Max makes a wish that his father cannot lie for a whole
day.  And the wish comes true, on a day when Fletcher needs to be a
skillful professional liar Fletcher discovers that only the truth can
issue from him mouth.
     LIAR LIAR could have had a deeper resonance if its positive
statements were not always undermined by what is just too much
slapstick.  The film was directed by Tom Shadyac of ACE VENTURA and THE
NUTTY PROFESSOR where it really needed someone of the caliber of Billy
Wilder.  In addition, it builds to an action-packed finale that goes
too far beyond what is really needed for this sort of material.  Again
the subtlety of Wilder could have worked wonders.  But for me the real
problem with LIAR LIAR is that the scriptwriters, Paul Guay and Stephen
Mazur, are never sure of the ground rules of the premise and so the
audience is never sure either.  What exactly is the wish all about?
Supposedly it was that Fletcher cannot tell a lie for twenty-four
hours, but what does that mean?  Does it mean that he can or cannot
evade the truth?  Sometimes the answer is yes, sometimes no.  Can he
remain silent or does he have to always be candid?  Is a promise made
in good faith and then later broken intentionally the same thing as a
lie?  For that matter is a promise made in good faith and broken due to
uncontrollable circumstances the same thing as a lie?  Do the same
forces that compel truth from Fletcher bend fate so that what he has
promised will come inevitably true?  These are all questions that
should have been answered before the first word of the script was
typed.  There were moments in this story when a truthful answer of "I
really would not want to answer that question right at this moment"
would have been the logical way out of Fletcher's current problem when
he instead seems compelled to give an overly candid response.
     In addition something not required by the premise are the over-
the-top rubber-faced expressions from Carrey who breaks through to
telling the truth like he is smashing through a physical barrier.  It
would not be a Jim Carrey film without some of this, but as he usually
does he carries a good thing too far.  Carrey is amusing, but his
antics get in the way of the viewer getting any real feeling out of his
part.  Implied, but never fully developed, is that the most important
effect of the curse on his character is that he can no longer lie to
himself.  By just being honest with himself he achieves a new level of
self-understanding that allows him to put his life in order.  The
script makes another ironic point.  While the film shows how much
damage Fletcher has done with his lies, some of his lies have had
positive effects.  His uncontrollable candor hurts people who relied on
some of his little fibs to bolster their egos.  Telling the truth to
everybody is almost as destructive as lying was.
     With a little more concentration on the script and a little more
subdued Carrey, this could have been a much better film.  As it is, it
gets a high 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Mississippi Masala (1991)
          Capsule review:  What could have been prosaic Romeo-
     and-Juliet material has more interest when the communities
     are Indian and black and the woman's father is an Indian
     exile from Uganda who dreams of returning.  Rating: +2 (-4 to
     +4).
The advance publicity made MISSISSIPPI MASALA look like another Romeo and
Juliet story told on the backdrop of a  cultural clash.  In a way that us
what it is, but it also rises above that to tell the more interesting story
of a man who has lost his country because of the color of his skin and how
he must decide whether he is willing to pay the price to get it back.  It is
a story of Indian-black racial tensions on two continents in the 1970s and
the 1990s.
     In 1972 Idi Amin's reign of terror is reaching out to all non-black
residents of Uganda.  Jay (played by Roshan Seth) is a liberal Indian lawyer
practicing in Uganda.  After having given too frank an interview to the BBC,
Jay is thrown in jail.  A friend bribes Jay's way out of prison but, like
all non-blacks, Jay is thrown out of Uganda together with his wife and his
young daughter Mina.  He flees first to England, but finally settles down
with an Indian community in Mississippi.  There he does little but dream of
getting the new Ugandan government to restore his lands.  His wife supports
the family by running a liquor store in a black neighborhood.  Mina (played
by Sarita Choudhury), now grown up, becomes romantically involved with a
black man, Demetrius (played by Denzel Washington), who runs a  carpet
cleaning company.  There are the predictable repercussions in the two
communities.
     There are several nice ironies in the resulting conflict.  Demetrius
believes that the Indians behave too much like the whites.  Yet what we see
of Demetriius's family shows them living very much the standard white
American lifestyle.  They look a lot like the All-American family.  Joe
Seneca, incidentally, gives a stand-out performance as Demetrius's father.
It is Mina's family that lives int he squalid Motel Monte Cristo and
maintains their traditional customs.  It is the Indian Jay who wants to go
back to Africa to live, not the blacks.  One black does toy with the idea,
but it is clear the black family has roots too deeply set in the United
States.  There are some nice character portraits and vignettes of the Indian
community.  In one amusing scene we see a motel clerk practicing his bicycle
riding and his phone answering at the same time.
     Director Mira Nair previously did SALAAM BOMBAY which was popular with
the critics, but this is the more entertaining film.  I rate it a +2 on the
-4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Babylon 5: The Gathering (1993) (TV)

made-for-TV movie seems to be in that group.  It's probably worth noting
that the Moderator believes that made-for-TV movies are movies, and
their review is suitable for a movie review group, which is why this is
included here.  -Moderator]
     So far this year we have seen the premieres of SPACE RANGERS, STAR
TREK: DEEP SPACE 9, and TIME TRAX.  For each I have written a somewhat
tongue-in-cheek review of some of the sillier aspects of it.  Unfortunately,
there is a distinct shortage of silliness in BABYLON 5.  In spite of the
fact that the pacing is a little lethargic, this is the most intelligent of
the new series.  I am afraid that without the STAR TREK organization behind
BABYLON 5, it probably will not succeed.  Yet this is certainly the more
engaging series.  Where DEEP SPACE 9's idea of an intriguing mystery is
where the shape-changer Odo came from, BABYLON 5 is built around a far more
interesting mystery.  It seems that humans in BABYLON 5 are just coming back
on the rebound.  Ten years earlier an unstoppable alien race, the Nivari,
had totally massacred the humans.  All that remained was the final coup de
grace and the universe would have been less one species of ape descendents.
Then suddenly the Nivari unaccountably declared they had lost the war and
surrendered to the humans.  A decade later still nobody understands the
sudden reversal.
     So here is BABYLON 5, the meeting place of hundreds of species.  Like
James White's hospital ship, it has provisions for a wide variety of alien
species requiring different atmospheres at different pressures.  The ship
functions as a sort of United Nations and interplanetary hotel in space.
There are five major powers as well as many minor cultures interacting.
     The look of the future is perhaps the best thing about the series.
There are no silly or gimmicky wipes between scenes.  The space effects,
created with computer ("Video Toaster") graphics, ar genuinely exciting.
They take their inspiration from the characteristic art on British science
fiction paperback covers.  The effects in the "Star Trek" series seem
three-dimensional and have a sort of realism not present here.  The space
effects here are closer to artists' conceptions and are much more
intriguing.  Ships open and spread wondrous wings like huge moths would or
grip other ships like beetles do.  The effects have a real sense of wonder,
all this reportedly at one-quarter the cost of "Star Trek"'s effects.
     The first story told in BABYLON 5 is a rather prosaic whodunit which is
even a little less suspenseful since we are told the villain at the very
beginning.  The characters are not really interesting yet, but clearly will
become more three-dimensional with future episodes.
     BABYLON 5 deserves a chance to prove itself.  This is adult science
fiction with a hard edge.  I will continue to watch STAR TREK: DEEP SPACE 9,
but I will actually look forward to the next episode of BABYLON 5.  For that
matter, I will trade you two episodes of STAR TREK: DEEP SPACE 9 for every
episode of BABYLON 5 I can get.

Title
Review for Qiji (1989)
     Jackie Chan is a Hong Kong martial artist with a sense of humor.
His films are already quite popular in the US.  This film (also known
as THE CHINESE GODFATHER) is reportedly his favorite of all his films
and it is also a genuine cinematic curiosity.  While there are some
martial arts sequences, for the most part it is a remake of an old
Frank Capra film that Capra himself remade.  The films from Capra are
LADY FOR A DAY and A POCKET FULL OF MIRACLES.  This is so unlikely a
story for Chan to want to remake as a martial arts film it had to be
seen.  Chan plays a sort of country bumpkin from Canton whose martial
arts temporarily save the life of a crime lord.  In spite of Chan's
efforts however the crime lord dies of a natural death.  As he is dying
he names Chan as his successor.  Chan attributes his success to having
just bought a rose from an elderly street vendor.  Chan decides to go
ahead and take the role as gang boss put pushes the new gang into
legitimate enterprises including opening a new night club.  Whenever he
needs luck he buys a rose from the same street vendor. From here the
story is a very much LADY FOR A DAY.  Most scenes are directly borrowed
from the Capra.  The rose vendor has convinced her daughter that the
family is affluent.  The daughter has a wealthy fiance whose family
wants to meet the bride-to-be's mother.  They would never consent to
the marriage if they knew the mother-in-law was a lowly street vendor.
Chan learns of the rose vendor's problem and determines to carry out an
elaborate ruse to make his friend appear to be the society woman she
has pretended to be.  Before he is done he has traditional enemies
cooperating in his good deed.  The alternate title THE CHINESE
GODFATHER is an allusion not to the crime elements but to the young
couple saying they want Chan to be the godfather of their first child.
     Chan takes the opportunity to make this film even more different
from his usual fare.  Included is an extended tracking shot that took
three days to film. While it does not stand up to the tracking shots of
THE PLAYER and TOUCH OF EVIL, it is remarkable that it is present. Also
for the night club scenes he has a lavish singing production number.
It took tremendous chutzpah to pass off this sentimental comedy to
audiences who had come for an action film, but the result could be
Chan's most unusual film and it certainly seems to be unique in the
martial arts genre.   The one complaint is that this is territory that
has so frequently been visited.  Capra, of course, did the story twice.
But also with a few substitutions the plot was reused for LA CAGE AUX
FOLLES and THE BIRDCAGE.  I rate this film a +6 on the 0 to 10 scale
and a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Trainspotting (1996)
     It has all been done before.  This is a superficially non-
judgmental look at four friends who are heroin addicts.  A fifth
friend, Begbie (Robert Carlyle) is clean--at least of heroin--but is
just on the near side of psychopathic.  However, you have only to step
back half an inch to see that this really is a morality tale about just
how bad life can be when heroin becomes your closest friend.  Much of
this film is strongly reminiscent of THE LOST WEEKEND.  Recently we saw
much the same approach in BASKETBALL DIARIES.  In TRAINSPOTTING the
addicts' lives are seen through the eyes of Mark Renton (Ewan
McGregor), marginally the least hooked of the group of addicts.  Also
in his group are the rather sodden Spud (Ewen Bremner), a Bond film
enthusiast trying to be suave, Sick Boy (Jonny Lee Miller), and the
retiring Tommy (Kevin McKidd).
     For the first three quarters of the film there really is not much
plot.  The viewer does get a grand tour of places the viewer does not
want to be.  This includes a side tour outside and inside "the worst
toilet in Scotland," dunking for drugs.  This particular treat is a
sterling example of the kind of in-your-face (sometimes nearly
literally) humor that packs this film.  Some really is funny, but much
is more a successful attempt to churn the viewer's stomach.  It is
humor that is more depressing than funny.  As the film opens Mark, an
Edinburgh junkie maybe in his early 20s, has determined to get off
drugs.  From there basically all that really happens is that he gets
off, he gets back on, he gets in trouble with the law and he gets off
again.  At some point Mark decides that he wants to get away from drugs
and junkies, only to be pulled back as surely as Al Pacino is in the
"Godfather" films.  Along the line he gets himself the first serious
girlfriend he has had time for in a while.  Toward the end of the film
a little more does happen, but not a lot.  Plot is not TRAINSPOTTING's
strong suit.  Texture and background is really what it is all about.
It takes the viewer inside the life of a junkie and that it does very
well--perhaps just a spot too well.  These are people you do not want
to invite into your home and the film gives good reasons why not.  But
much of the wacky behavior and even some of the dating jokes have
little to do with the main premise of the film unless to show that in
some ways the main characters are not a whole lot different than they
would be off of drugs.  The humor is never quite as wild or as hip as
intended.  These are people who are disaffected from being Scots--as
they describe it, the colony of a bunch of wankers--and find escape in
hypodermic needles.
     American viewers may have a problem making out some (perhaps much)
of the dialogue.  TRAINSPOTTING uses Scottish slang and the dialogue is
spoken with a heavy Scottish accent.  Generally I was able to make out
about 80% of what was said.  My average was a little less with the
character Spud, but toward the end of the film it become clear that
even people in the film are not always sure what Spud is saying.
Irvine Welsh's novel TRAINSPOTTING--the title is a hobby that never
actually gets mentioned in the film--was a bestseller in Europe and the
American publishers had to push up the date of its publication here.
It seems they had planned an edition to coincide with the release of
the film, but so many copies of were being brought in from Europe that
the publication had to be moved forward to compete.  The book was
adapted to the screen--leaving a bit too much out some say--by John
Hodge.  Danny Boyle directed and Andrew Macdonald produced, as they did
for the film SHALLOW GRAVE.
     TRAINSPOTTING has its creative moments and sometimes it can be
funny, but the viewer should be prepared for a downbeat experience and
should expect to find himself some places he would never go of his own
accord.  As with the film CRUMB, there is a happy ending in which
viewer escapes the theater and the people with whom he has just spent
an hour or so of his life.  I expected a film more original than this
one was, but I give it a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Kolya (1996)
     Frantisek Louka (played by Zdenek Sverak) is a fifty-five-year-old
Bohemian--both figuratively and literally.  He plays the cello for the
Czech Philharmonic when he can, plays for funerals when he must to make
ends meet, and supplements his meager income by performing cosmetic
maintenance on gravestones.  He still retains some of his good looks so
that he can still womanize.  His only responsibility in life is
occasionally taking care of his mother.  But times are hard in 1988
Prague and he has to look for money where he can.  That was how he
learned of Nadezda (Irena Livanova) an attractive Russian woman looking
for a technical husband so that she can establish Czech citizenship.
She is willing to pay well and reluctantly Frantisek agrees to marry
her for one night.  Even then she disappears into the night, escaping
to West Germany and leaving her son Kolya (Andrej Chalimon) with his
grandmother.  Frantisek is pleased that the incident is over when
suddenly the grandmother suffers a stroke and Kolya has to go to live
with his new stepfather, Frantisek
     This year's nominee for Best Foreign Language film from the Czech
Republic is a nice amiable movie that has been done many times before
in several different languages.  A bachelor finds he has inherited a
five- year-old.  At first the child is a monumental inconvenience and
the man wants to see the boy gone.  But of course they learn to love
each other and then have to struggle to stay together. .  The old man
and the boy go through much the sort of relationship that has been
shown so often before.  We have the scenes of the father's sex life
being interrupted by the presence of the child.  There is the requisite
sequence of the child getting sick and the father worrying over him.
It would be nice to accept this film as a creative entry from Eastern
Europe, but so much of the film is predictable and taken up with
sequences that have become hackneyed that one has to start faulting the
film for this lack of originality.  KOLYA is too much like THREE MEN
AND A CRADLE/BABY, KRAMER VS. KRAMER, BABY BOOM or LITTLE MISS MARKER-
-with minor variations in each case.  The plot has an irresponsible
adult reluctantly forced into a parental role discovering what he (or
she) has been missing all these years.  It is at heart an affirmation
of parenthood that pretty much cannot fail to win the favor of the
audience.
     Where this film gets much of its novelty is in the political
climate of Czechoslovakia in 1988.  Nearly everyone in Eastern Europe
had an intense hatred of anything Russian.  Frantisek has to hide the
fact that Kolya is Russian.  Even Frantisek's mother does not want the
boy in her house when she discovers that he is Russian.  Frantisek in
talking to the boy compares his inability to get rid of the boy with
his country's inability to rid itself of the Russian occupiers.  We get
some idea of why the Russians are so hated by seeing the Soviet Police
and their interrogation of Frantisek when they believe he has married
Nadezda to get around the law.  Our last scene with the two policemen
makes the single most striking irony of the film.
     KOLYA was directed and co-produced by thirty-one-year-old Jan
Sverak.  He is the son of Zdenek Sverak, who plays Frantisek.  Zdenek
co-authored the screenplay.  He is well-cast as Frantisek, still having
much of the verve of his youth but matching it with distinguished good
looks.  One could believe that at fifty-five this man could still
fascinate a string of lovers. Andrej Chalimon is, of course, an
adorable child with a round face and big eyes.  He perhaps cries a
little, understandably, but he never seems to have the sort of bad-
behavior days that real children seem to have.  He is just a bit too
perfect.  Such children do exist, of course, but after what this child
has been through it seems unlikely that Kolya would still be one.
There are a number of attractive paramours for Frantisek, but the sex
is never explicit.  In general this film is a bit too likable and neat.
This is good entertainment rather than good art.  Overall I would rate
it a high +1 on the - 4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Scandal (1989)
          Capsule review:  Fine, engrossing docu-drama about the
     Profumo affair that toppled the British government in 1963.
     Many fine ironies in the script.  Is it redundant to say that
     John Hurt turns in a good performance?  Rating: +2.
     Dr. Stephen Ward is the son of a vicar and a successful osteopath.  His
hobby is hobnobbing with the real newsmakers in the upper circles of the
British (and some foreign) governments.  One way he does this is that he
finds young women who have natural beauty and develops them like a one-man
finishing school, giving them some class and making them the kind of women
men in government like to be around.  Just having these women around makes
Ward popular with his inner circle.  When a friend in MI5--the British
equivalent of our FBI--gets interested in Ward's activities along these
lines it begins a chain of events that will eventually topple the British
Conservative government.
     SCANDAL is the engrossing story of Stephen Ward and the entire Profumo
affair.  The story tells how Ward (beautifully and slightly seedily played
by John Hurt) finds Christine Keeler (played by Joanne Whalley-Kilmer) as a
somewhat cheap-looking in a girlie show.  Like Pygmalion, or perhaps
Svengali, he shows her a bit of the rich life and begins tutoring her and
friend Mandy Rice-Davies on how to get it ("you have to be very clever or
very beautiful").  As the film portrays him, Ward has a passion for beauty
and wants to be intimately but totally platonically involved in the lives of
the women he has transformed.  His interest is not sex, but helping his
"babies" get what they want and at the same time Ward wants the feeling
that, like James Bond, he is a man with power.  This power, like the
gratitude of the women he has transformed, he firmly refuses to exploit for
any tangible advantage.  His biggest payoff is the irony that the woman he
trained has managed to have simultaneous affairs with the British Secretary
of State for War John Profumo and Soviet military attache Eugene Ivanov.
But just as Ward is seduced by a feeling of importance, Christine is also
when the newspapers learn of the scandal two years later.  And only when the
government desperately needs a scapegoat does Ward realize how vulnerable he
has left himself.
     SCANDAL seems very much the British equivalent of the American STAR
'80. While that film's Paul Snider does not have Dr. Ward's unselfish goals,
both men are puppet masters who instinctively know how to make women
attractive and how to make them stars.  Both films depend very heavily on
erotic photography independent of their narrative values.  Both films tell
of Svengali destroyed by overreaching himself.
     The film is sprinkled with familiar actors.  Joanne Whalley-Kilmer was
previously the nurse in THE SINGING DETECTIVE.  Ian McKellan plays the
nervous Profumo with appropriate style considering he has the strangest-
looking hairdo of the pre-punk era.  We see little of Deborah Grant as Mrs.
Profumo, but a side note of interest is that the real Mrs. Profumo was
Valerie Hobson, who played the title role in BRIDE OF FRANKENSTEIN.  (Think
about it before you try to correct me.)
     SCANDAL punctuates its story--as so many films about the recent past
do--with a broad choice of music of the period.  But no piece of music is
better used than "[Listen,] Do You Want to Know a Secret" superimposed over
a montage of scandal-laden newspaper headlines.  This is one more entry in a
run of good recent films.  I rate it a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for J'aimerais pas crever un dimanche (1998)
     CAPSULE: Liebes meets Tod.  This was a film about sex and death.
A morgue attendant accidentally revives a dead woman through
necrophilia and brings her into his world which is heavy on orgies.
This film says something obscure about the relationship of sex and
death, but imparts no insights.  To make matter worse this print was
poorly subtitled into English from French. Rating: 4 (0 to 10) 0 (-4 to
+4)
   - An attractive 18-year-old dies on a disco floor and gets sent to a
     morgue.  One of the attendants, Ben (Jean-Marc Barr) is so
     attracted by her that he attempts necrophilia.  We see him
     crawling away after a shock.  In the middle of sex the dead teen
     has come back to life.
   - The morgue attendant was just adding a new form of sex to his
     collection of kinks.  He was already part of a group that gets
     together for S/M sex.  The revived teen, Teresa (Elodie Bouchez)
     joins them.
   - Moral dilemma of Teresa's father.  Ben has abused his daughter's
     body, but in doing so has saved her life.
   - Part of this opaque allegory is a man saved from suicide who joins
     in the sexual hijinx.  Also involved is a man in the final stages
     of dying of AIDS, a close friend of the morgue attendant.  He does
     not get involved in the orgies.
   - The subtitles of our print were white, often on a white background
     making them often hard to read, but I don't think there was a
     whole lot of meaning there that was lost.
   - The title means "Don't let me die on a Sunday."

Title
Review for Fifth Element, The (1997)
     I wonder if this is a postmodern science fiction movie?  If so I
am willing to go back to the Modern and start over from there.  THE
FIFTH ELEMENT is what you would get if you combined a plot from HEAVY
METAL comic magazine, the pacing of a Japanese anime film, and Terry
Gilliam visualizations.  It is a film that will probably have a cult
following while others will find it, as my wife put it, appallingly
bad.  France is known for modest art films, and director Luc Besson is
French, but he is a renegade with a style generally out of empty
Hollywood action films.  His previous films include LA FEMME NIKITA and
LEON (U.S.  title: THE PROFESSIONAL).  Here he has made a film with
perhaps the best art direction since BLADERUNNER and uses it to tell a
dim-witted pop-sci-fi story.  Besson, who also co-authored the
screenplay, realized that a good plot might be hard to follow for some.
He simulates the same effect by having a bad plot that just has a lot
of stupid things happening very, very fast.
     The Ultimate Evil comes visiting our solar system every 5000 years
in the form of a huge glowing sphere that for some unexplained reason
is trying to destroy the Earth.  I guess that is just what huge glowing
spheres do.  With the help of some strange aliens and with four mystic
stones we Earth people have been able to fend off the evil in the past.
In 1914 the friendly aliens took the stones away for safekeeping.
Previously they had been guarded by a long line of priests.  The
priests still know what do to about the coming evil, but no longer have
the stones they need.  Our main story is set early in the 23rd Century.
The Evil is returning.  There are forces of Good trying to stop the end
of the world and forces of Evil trying to steal the stones.  The leader
of the evil forces is an industrialist named Zorg, played by Gary
Oldman.  Just what Zorg hopes to gain by letting his planet be
destroyed, if it is his planet, is left as a loose end.  I guess
stealing mystic symbols is just what evil industrialists do.  One of
the good aliens is killed and cloned, but in cloned form seems to be a
beautiful woman, Milla Jovovich as Le-Eluu.  She is terrified of the
humans who have cloned her and she takes a swan dive off a skyscraper
(all buildings seem to be skyscrapers in the 23rd Century) and lands in
the floating taxicab of Korben (Bruce Willis).  This pulls Korben into
the action and starts him on the quest for the four elemental stones.
     Bruce Willis is in the lead and--as he seems to have wanted to
show people with IN COUNTRY--he can act.  He just chooses not to push
himself much beyond the limited roles he has been playing.  Of somewhat
more interest is Milla Jovovich.  Though much of the film she must
speak a nonsense language--actually it sounds a lot like Italian--and
makes it sound very natural.  This is not generally considered an
important acting skill, but here it was what was what was required and
she does a very credible job.  Gary Oldman at one time seemed to be the
Robert Duvall of his generation.  He would do well to stay away from
Luc Besson films since this is the second film in which Besson has been
able to coax from Oldman his very worst and most exaggerated
performances.  His performance here is at best just not notable, and
that is really unusual for an otherwise very good actor.  Ian Holm
plays a priest of the line entrusted with alien secrets.  Like Oldman,
he has done better acting jobs and perhaps their efforts are
exaggerated intentionally by Besson so nobody misses the point that
this film is not intended to be taken entirely seriously.
     This film had the budget, the art direction, the special effects,
and the cast to make a much better film.  One has the feeling that
Besson is really talking down to his audiences and laughing up his
sleeve.  There are moments in this film that show what it could have
been, but unfortunately it was no more than it was.  This is a film
that might be better to watch with the sound off.  I rate it a low 0 on
the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Arrival, The (1996)
     Start with a standard conspiracy and cover-up story.  However,
instead of making the villain be the government or the Mafia or enemy
agents, this time make it be aliens.  That gives you a little latitude
for a few nice special effects and allows you to exploit the publicity
for INDEPENDENCE DAY.  That seems to be what happened with THE ARRIVAL.
The plot is pretty much a standard loner-on-the-run not knowing whom he
can trust that has been around since THE 39 STEPS and probably longer.
David Twohy proves that it does not take a whole lot of effort to make
this tried-and-true suspense formula into a science fiction film.  Two
previously wrote and directed DISASTER IN TIME, and there he did a
reasonable job.  That adaptation of C. L. Moore's "Vintage Season"
added adventure elements to a classic story and arguably actually
improved on the original.  However he also co-authored the script for
WATERWORLD, which depended too much on all-too-familiar action film
devices.  With THE ARRIVAL he is back to re-framing the all-too-
familiar, once again writing and directing.
     Zane Zaminski (played by Charlie Sheen) is a radio astronomer
working for NASA on the Search for Extra- terrestrial Intelligence
project when he receives a signal from space that seems to be a message
from something intelligent.  Bringing it to his supervisor, Gordian
(Ron Silver), he finds that some people, and especially Gordian, seem
more anxious to hush up the discovery than to act on the tremendous
implications of the signal.  Zaminski finds himself fired and the tape
of the intercepted signal is destroyed.  He determines that he can
search for the signal again by hijacking all the television satellite
dishes in the neighborhood, re-rigging them so that he can direct them
at will, and using them to try to again find his signal. The
information he gets is sufficient to tip him off that there is
something odd that has to be investigated in Mexico and the chase
begins in earnest.
     Twohy's script really needed to use its science fiction premise
more effectively in the plot.  Too often the premise of the aliens is
relegated to McGuffin.  If a character is hanging onto something for
dear life, does it really make this a science fiction film if the thing
held onto is a radio telescope rather than the Statue of Liberty?  Does
it make the story any more exciting?  And for an action plot, THE
ARRIVAL's is rather flaccid with only one scene of any real tension,
and that involving poisonous insects and not aliens.  Charlie Sheen
could have used a winning performance to his credit, but his radio
astronomer is neither winning nor believable.  Lindsay Crouse, whose
wooden performance was the only major problem with HOUSE OF GAMES,
gives an only slightly better performance here.  Tony T. Johnson is the
little boy next door, to whom Sheen can explain what would not
otherwise be obvious to the audience.  Teri Polo, the Christine Daae of
the 1990 TV version of THE PHANTOM OF THE OPERA, is along as the female
companion of Zaminski, but neither the character nor the actress is
very much help.
     I somehow think that David Twohy wanted to have made a science
fiction film, but did not have his heart in writing science fiction.
This chase/action film gets a high 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.
SPOILER... SPOILER... SPOILER... SPOILER... SPOILER... SPOILER...
     The idea that Zaminski could build his own radio telescope to find
the signal again is ludicrous since it would take more money than he
could put into the project and putting all the television satellite
antennas out of commission would give him away before he could use the
scheme.  My guess is that this handful of small dishes would not
accomplish his purpose in any case.  Radio telescopes have to be really
large because they generally use very large wave lengths, though
admittedly the script says that Zaminski was looking in the FM band.
The Very Large Array near Socorro, New Mexico has 21 antennas, each 81
feet high and 422 feet in diameter.  They are on a Y-shaped rail track
22 miles across.  They can be brought in to the center in a tight
configuration or spread out over the whole track, having the equivalent
effect of looking with a wide-angle lens or with a telephoto lens.
However, this array is very often used in conjunction with other radio
telescopes in other parts of the world so the huge array that so
astounded Zaminski at one point in the plot should not have been even a
novel idea to a real radio astronomer.  Another problem that is
conveniently overlooked is the length of time it takes the aliens to
communicate with "something that moves like a star" and not a
satellite, so presumably it is a star.  There is also a plot problem
involving the note that Kiki left for his grandmother.

Title
Review for Unbearable Lightness of Being, The (1988)
          Capsule review:  THE UNBEARABLE LIGHTNESS OF BEING is
     not a light film, but it is by no means unbearable either.
     Philip Kaufman, who makes very entertaining films, makes one
     that only sounds like an exception.  171 minutes of solid
     entertainment with a title you can use to impress your
     friends.  Rating: +3.
     It certainly sounded like it was going to be a drag: THE UNBEARABLE
LIGHTNESS OF BEING.  You can expect a bad time from a film whose title is
sort of verbal fruit cocktail.  It sounds like an obscure contemplate-your-
navel sort of film.  But on the other hand, it is directed by Philip
Kaufman.  He put together THE OUTLAW JOSEY WALES, though Clint Eastwood took
over direction from him.  He did direct THE RIGHT STUFF.  He directed the
remake of INVASION OF THE BODY SNATCHERS and co-wrote RAIDERS OF THE LOST
ARK.  These are NOT contemplate-your-navel films.  These are really
entertaining pieces.  On the other hand, more than one good director has
gone bad trying to produce his or her personal vision of what is art.
Reluctantly, I went to our local art theater and saw the best film I have
seen yet this year.
     THE UNBEARABLE LIGHTNESS OF BEING bears no small resemblance to DOCTOR
ZHIVAGO.  Tomas is a young successful doctor who gets a wife and a mistress,
finds his life upset by political events, and eventually finds a new
equilibrium in spite of the political events.  Where it differs is that the
political event is the Soviet invasion of Czechoslovakia instead of the
Russian Revolution and that in some ways the women are equally attracted to
each other, so that the triangle really is a triangle rather than a "V".
Attractive Czech surgeon Tomas (played by Daniel Day-Lewis) seems to collect
lovers like stamps.  His favorite phrase in both business and pleasure is
"take off your clothes" and with remarkable regularity business turns into
pleasure.  In a trip to a nearby spa town, he tries to seduce a barmaid
(Tereza, played by Juliette Binoche) only to find that she follows him back
to his apartment in Prague.  She enjoys sex with Tomas but is jealous of his
other lovers, including an artist Sabina (attractive Lena Olin).  There are
hints throughout the film that Tereza may be a repressed lesbian who finds
herself attracted to Sabina.  On the other hand, Lena is a bisexual who does
not repress anything but the will to make some sort of commitment.  This
triangle could have made for very high-level soap opera, but the Soviet
invasion casts a new light on everything and forces each of the three to
come to a better understanding of themselves, and also tests their
character.
     The eroticism of the film--if that is really what was intended--is
little more than amusing.  But you know that when you feel yourself actually
missing a character whom you haven't seen on the screen for a while, you are
watching a well-made film.  And once again Kaufman has made a long film (171
minutes) that seems much shorter.  Rate this film a +3 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Midnight Movie Massacre (1988)
     Wade Williams is a well-known fan of 1950s science fiction movies and
television.  Of late, when you see 1950s science fiction television shows
turning up in video stores or on television, they almost invariably show a
recent copyright by Wade Williams.  Why he has bought up these copyrights I
am not sure but rumor had it that he had rereleased the 1950 ROCKETSHIP X-M
with new color footage he added and was planning to do the same with HIDEOUS
SUN DEMON.  The 1988 World Science Fiction Convention featured the world
premiere of MIDNIGHT MOVIE MASSACRE, a film produced by Williams.
     To understand why this film is so bad you need to know a little of how
it came to be made.  Wade Milliams tried to make a sendup of the old
television show SPACE PATROL.  When the film was half made, the product was
clearly so incompetent that the film would never have been released.  Under
any circumstances.  Never.  So here Williams was with only half a film that
had two expensive stars and if he finished it, it would be thrown out.  The
stars?  Well, he got Ann Robinson from WAR OF THE WORLDS and Robert Clarke,
who finished up a good career by being in a number of cheap, bad science
fiction films (though perhaps none so cheap and bad as the first half of
SPACE PATROL).  It was Williams' bright idea to take his film and dress it
up as an *imitation* dead teenager film.  Dead teenager films make money.
There are millions of teenagers willing to shell out big bucks to see
fantasies of others in their age group being carved up like so much poultry.
(Think about that if you're waiting for the next generation to come to power
and improve things.) How do you make half of SPACE PATROL into a dead
teenager film?  Well, it is a movie that a bunch of teenagers are watching
when an alien comes along and starts knocking them off.  So Williams can go
back and forth between storylines as he shows a movie within a movie, or
more accurately, a stupid waste of time within a stupid waste of time.
     The outer film is a satire on 1950s science fiction films, the only
films Williams seems to really know well, as well as being a dead teenager
film.  So the whole outer story is set in 1956.  This improves the film
within since it suddenly becomes very prophetic as well as pathetic.  It
predicts 1980s hairstyles for women.  When it shows the earth from space, it
shows light wispy clouds that were never shown in science fiction films
until years later.  Then there is the fact that in the Midwest in 1956 (read
that virtually none) had midnight shows.
     Now, don't get me wrong.  I do not mean to imply that the dead teenager
portion of the film has much in the way of dead teenagers.  Instead, it is
taken up mostly by showing everything happening in the audience.  I won't
tell all, but while SPACE PATROL is stupid and dull, the rest of the film
can be better described as stupid, dull, and *extremely* tasteless.

Title
Review for Prelude to a Kiss (1992)
          Capsule review:  Romance, comedy, fantasy, and even a
     little softcore horror combine in an intelligent and
     thoroughly enjoyable film.  PRELUDE handles an old idea, but
     at the same time says a lot about life and human
     relationships.  Even the acting by minor characters is good.
     (This is one of those films whose actual premise comes as a
     surprise well into the film.  I will be very vague below
     rather than spoil the plot.)  Rating: high +2.
     Peter Hoskins (played by Alec Baldwin) and Rita Boyle (played by Meg
Ryan) are made for each other.  They are both bright, lively people.  Peter
is quiet, sedate, and thoughtful.  Rita on the other hand
 is all over the map.  She clearly playfully loves life in the daylight but
at night has terrors that something terrible will happen to her world.  She
does not know how right she is.  Something will happen to her on her wedding
day.  It is something that is weird, right out of the Twilight Zone with
touches of Kafka.  At the same time Peter is going to be pulled into a
strange struggle to prove his love.
     Take an idea that has been done many times in films.  Make it one that
everybody thought could not be done one more time.  Give this idea to a good
enough writer and you occasionally can find fresh new approaches.  In this
case the writer is Craig Lucas who proves that an old fantasy mechanism can
be given a new spin and can reveal insights into human nature and the aging
process that nobody has seen in it before.   Lucas wrote his story first as
a Broadway play.  Now he adapted his story into a screenplay.  PRELUDE TO A
KISS was his fifth play and second produced screenplay.  His previous film
was the excellent LONGTIME COMPANION.  Lucas's play MISSING PERSONS, his
film LONGTIME COMPANION, and now his film PRELUDE TO A KISS were all
directed by Norman Rene'.  Rene' who must be a great director, since just
about every speaking performance in his films seems to be very good.  I
think many people will be enthralled by Richard Riehle's performance as an
elderly man who crashes the wedding.  I found myself fascinated with a small
but magnetic performance by Stanley Tucci playing Peter's best friend,
Taylor.  It is just a small role, but Rene' invests the character with a lot
of personality.  Also notable is Ned Beatty as Rita's father, but most
people expect Beatty to turn in a good performance.  It is some of the
lesser known actors who give this film its texture.
     PRELUDE TO A KISS is a light fantasy with some heavy ideas that
audiences can think about or choose to ignore.  Operating on multiple
levels, it is a surprisingly satisfying film to be coming out in the summer
fluff season.  I rate it a high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Cell, The (2000)
     THE CELL is one more story of the FBI trying to catch a serial
killer and free his captives.  But when it seemed that there was not
much more that could be done with that tired plot, this film has
some refreshing new ideas.  It is the premise that some unspecified
technological advance allows psychotic and psychologist to enter the
other's dreams and walk around in that surreal landscape.  Similar
ideas have been tried before in films.  In SPELLBOUND, Alfred
Hitchcock took us through the mind of a neurotic's nightmare in a
symbolic surreal world designed by Salvador Dali.  The concepts of
actually visiting inside another person's mind or dreams were
explored in DREAMSCAPE and BRAINSTORM.  The latter film even
suggested that there was a particular danger being inside a
psychotic's mind.  NATURAL BORN KILLERS suggests a natural disorder
to a psychotic's mind, though it explores that disorder without use
of science fictional devices.  All these ideas come together in an
otherwise simplistic violent serial killer plot.
     Catherine Deane (played by Jennifer Lopez) is a psychologist
trying to get into the mind of her young patient, Edward.  A new
device allows her to do it in a much more direct fashion than what
we see used today.  The invention lets her visualize his mind and
dreams and actually become a character inside of them.  It is a
tremendous leap toward understanding her patient.  And the vistas
within his mind are strange even if the boy has a rather standard
normal mind.  Then Deane is given an opportunity to enter a most
unusual mind.  The FBI has captured a serial killer, Carl Stargher
(Vincent D'Onofrio), and has him under sedation.  But his most
recent target is still alive in a death trap somewhere.
     FBI agent Peter Novak (Vince Vaughn) would like Deane to go
into Stargher's twisted, violent mind and retrieve a clue as to
where he is hiding and torturing his current victim.  That said,
there is not much more plot to the film.  The serial killer plot is
abbreviated and for the most part predictable.  The real story goes
on inside the heads of Deane and Stargher and we see it as fantasy
worlds.
     The success of THE CELL becomes very much the property of
production designer Tom Foden (of cable TV's "The Hunger") and art
directors Guy Dyas and Michael Manson.  Dyas is debuting as an art
director, but he has been a production illustrator on several major
films including MEN IN BLACK, MIMIC, ARMAGEDDON, and GALAXY QUEST.
The worlds this team created in Stargher's mind are dank and
forbidding, twisted, dark and bloody.  Religion is an important
aspect of both Deane's and Stargher's mindscapes but it has very
different roles in each of those worlds.  Each uses religion in a
different way.  There are many other tantalizing ideas floating
around.  There is a strong hint that two different people seeing the
same subconscious world will see it quite differently yet each will
find the others actions consistent with the world they see.
     First-time film director Tarsem Singh directs a script by
first-time writer Mark Protosevich.  Singh intentionally mutes the
colors of the film to heighten the oppressive effect.  So much of
the film is taken up with the fantasy world action, the real world
story is somewhat shorted.  How Stargher was able to build his
ornate torture device leaves many unanswered questions.  Other
writing problems are obvious.  The film had a nearly perfect ending
very shortly after the action ends.  Unfortunately the film keeps
going to tie things up more pleasantly and warmly and out of keeping
with the cold style of the best of what had preceded it.
     The viewing public hardly needed another serial killer film.
But if another must be made, at least this is the way to do it.
Combine it with something fresh and creative with ideas.  I rate THE
CELL a 7 on the 0 to 10 scale and a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for House of Games (1987)
     David Mamet is becoming a name to conjure with.  I first noticed him
about a decade ago when he had a play on Broadway called THE WATER ENGINE.
That play, set in 1939, wove together chain letters, the World's Fair, and
the great American paranoia myth that the auto companies have an engine that
runs on water, but they've hushed it up.  Much more recently Mamet wrote THE
UNTOUCHABLES, an enjoyable screenplay unencumbered by concern for historical
accuracy.  HOUSE OF GAMES has a Mamet screenplay and Mamet also debuts as
director.
     Lindsay Crouse plays Margaret Ford, a successful psychiatrist.  Dr.
Ford has doubts that she really can help any of her patients.  Against the
cautious rules of psychiatry she gets involved in the personal life of one
of her patients and, in doing so, meets Mike (played by Joe Mantegna).  That
is not saying much about the plot and my personal recommendation is to stay
away from any reviewer who is going to tell you any more about the plot than
that.  If you really want to know more about the plot to know if you will
like the film, take my word for it, you will probably like HOUSE OF GAMES.
It has humor, it has suspense, and it had the audience spellbound.
     My biggest complaint with HOUSE OF GAMES is that even when the final
credits roll, the audience is still waiting for the other shoe to fall.  No
matter how many shoes fall in a film like this, you still expect that there
will be another one and another one.  And what further creates that feeling
is that HOUSE OF GAMES is so entertaining, it seems like a much shorter film
than it really is.  Perhaps a plot twist or two predictable.  Lindsay
Crouse's acting is a little wooden.  But Joe Mantegna is mesmerizing on the
screen.  His is apiece of nearly perfect casting.  Siskel and Ebert both
admitted to talking to the screen when they saw this film.  I'm glad I
didn't see it with them, but I do remember grinning at the screen a few
times.  I rate HOUSE OF GAMES a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Nightflyers (1987)
          Capsule review:  An incompetent adaptation of a mediocre
     novella add up to a must-miss science fiction film.  Besides
     seeing how someone managed to turn an obviously inadequate
     special effects budget into an impressive set of effects,
     this film has little going for it--certainly not the
     characters.  Rating: -1.
     I was recently discussing the new "Star Trek" series with some fans who
were unhappy with it.  The series is certainly weak in ideas and my friends'
solution was to solicit stories from established science fiction writers.  I
was somewhat doubtful that a good story in incompetent hands would stay good
for very long; I remember the disappointment of seeing DUNE.  I think
another case in point of at least a fair story that did not fare well in the
transition to screen is "Nightflyers."  George R. R. Martin (who is a pretty
good writer) wrote the novella on which the film was based.  Admittedly, it
is not his best work but it deserved a better shake than it got in this weak
and boring adaptation.
     The story deals with an expedition to a celestial phenomenon which may
or may not be connected with a hypothetical alien race called the Volcryn.
The Nightflyer, the craft for the expedition, is piloted by a crew of one, a
mysterious young captain seen to the other members of the expedition only as
a life-sized hologram that can appear whenever and wherever he (it?) wants.
Then mysterious things start happening and people start getting killed and
the travelers suddenly have more to think about than an alien race.
     Well, that doesn't sound too bad.  That is all taken from Martin's
novella and this adaptation is at least Hollywood's idea of "faithful to the
original story," which is to say, yeah, much of the plot is there and the
plot of the film is more like the source story than it is like any other
story or film that comes to mind.  (Any better than that and you start
calling it a "literal adaptation.")
     So the story is recognizably Martin's "Nightflyers" and I will say one
more good thing for it: it has cheap special effects done really well.
Someone very intelligently knows how to get 4/5 the quality of effect at 1/5
the cost.  For that and other reasons I was reminded more than once of DARK
STAR.  But there is where my charitable feelings toward NIGHTFLYERS end
abruptly.
     I have rarely seen a bunch of characters I cared less about.  I started
counting the number left alive the way I used to count the days left till
summer vacation.  With the exception of the expedition cook, the characters
are developed pretty much by how they argue with each other.  The direction
is nearly humorless and you watch through the whole film without them ever
showing any personality at all.  The hero should be something like Ripley in
ALIEN, but instead she looks like a lawyer's wife who has just stepped out
of the beauty parlor, with her high heels, her frosted lipstick, and her big
earrings.  The captain looks like a 1980s rock star, complete with earring.
Much of the wardrobe and all of the hairstyles are from the late 1980s in
spite of the 21st Century setting.  The science was laughable (if they let
the air out of the ship it would implode; noisy, smoking explosions in a
vacuum--that sort of thing).  The continuity was confusing and error-ridden.
I know I would not want to fly a spaceship that uses burning torches and
candles for lighting.  The film even picks up a major fault of the story:
the audience can figure out what is going on much faster than the people on
the ship.  This is an amateur film which makes a lot of amateur mistakes.
Rate it a -1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Hamlet (1990)
          Capsule review:  Unexceptional is really the word for
     the new HAMLET from Franco Zeffirelli.  Gibson is okay as
     Hamlet but is nothing startling.  Glenn Close is the only
     actor experimenting with her role.  The scenery is nice but
     this much-trimmed re-telling is nothing Shakespeare would
     feel bad for missing.  Rating: +1 (-4 to +4).
     Generally in reviewing a film, first consideration is given to how good
the story is.  It is a little tougher to review a Shakespeare film because,
whatever the good qualities of the story itself or even the dialogue, it is
pointless to praise the gentleman who contributed them.  HAMLET is a film
that gets no points, positive or negative, for story.  The question is not
whether HAMLET is a good story, but rather whether this is a good HAMLET.
     First of all, this is not so much HAMLET as HAMLETTE.  Every line
that's there is Shakespeare's, but not every line that is Shakespeare's is
there.  Franco Zeffirelli tells the story slowly, taking time to bathe the
viewer in the impressive scenery, then cutting much of the play--half, I am
told--to make it fit into two and a quarter hours.  As one expects from a
Zeffirelli film, it is lushly filmed, though perhaps not so much as some of
his other films, particularly the ones set in Italy.  This film has less of
the soft focus of, say, ROMEO AND JULIET.  The scenery is mostly in stoney
castles shot with a much harder focus.  Some of the exteriors look much like
the real Elsinore, but the Scottish castles used for the interiors has far
too much Celtic-looking decoration. Ennio Morricone's score is not only much
less intrusive than usual, it seems nearly non-existent.  Surprisingly few
scenes have any score at all.
     The important question is whether a popular actor like Mel Gibson can
play a good Hamlet.  In many ways Hamlet is very much a character of the
1990s.  He has horrible family problems, he screws up his love life, and he
has absolutely atrocious audience manners.  Gibson's Hamlet, however, is
surprisingly uninteresting and not particularly relevant to either Hamlet's
time or our own.  Gibson's performance makes no statement about the Dane
that was not on the printed page.  By contrast Glenn Close's Gertrude takes
the incest a step further than Shakespeare's did by apparently being
attracted to her own son.  Alan Bates plays new King Claudius not very
notably and even the great Paul Scofield seems unable to do much with his
role.  Helena Bonham-Carter of A ROOM WITH A VIEW and LADY JANE needs a new
character to play.
     This film has too many problems to become the definitive HAMLET the way
Zeffirelli's is the best known version of ROMEO AND JULIET.  It is simply an
okay retelling of the classic story.  Rent HENRY V instead.  I give it a +1
on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Nuts (1987)
          Capsule review:  Courtroom drama asks the searching
     question: should a downtrodden and wronged woman have to face
     the inevitable consequences of acting like a complete jerk?
     Martin Ritt has made cogent films for great causes but if
     there is a great cause here somewhere, someone will have to
     point it out to me.  Rating: 0.
     Claudia Draper (played by Barbra Streisand) is fighting for her chance
to be tried for manslaughter.  She believes herself to be competent to stand
trial but two court-appointed psychiatrists disagree.  They think that she
is mentally unbalanced and when she breaks her attorney's nose in the court
of law, the judge is inclined to agree with the psychiatrists.  The court
appoints Aaron Levinsky (played by Richard Dreyfuss) to defend Draper when
her first attorney--the one with the broken nose--chooses for some reason to
withdraw from the case.  Levinsky also finds that it is tough to deal with a
woman who carries on her shoulder a chip the size of the Grand Cooley Dam.
Levinsky must prove at the pre-trial hearing that this ravening, enraged
animal who is as likely to break his jaw as confer with him is actually a
rational and mentally competent human.
     NUTS was produced by Streisand herself.  She packed the film with more
familiar stars than the film really needed.  Besides herself and Dreyfuss,
the film also features Maureen Stapleton, Karl Malden, Eli Wallach, Robert
Webber, James Whitmore, and Leslie Neilsen.  Ritt does his best to give each
a chance to act, but the film is too short to do that effectively.  But if
Streisand's character has appeal in NUTS it is because we remember Streisand
from other roles.  Though at the end of NUTS we may have some idea, albeit
trite, of what went wrong in Claudia Draper's life, we still don't know if
she is crazy or stupid--it has to be one or the other.
     What is disappointing about NUTS is that after almost two hours of film
I am not sure what this film was trying to say.  Director Martin Ritt's
previous films have been really clear and cogent arguments.  His films
include EDGE OF THE CITY, HUD, THE SPY WHO CAME IN FROM THE COLD, THE GREAT
WHITE HOPE, SOUNDER, CONRACK, THE FRONT, and NORMA RAE.  Most of those films
have had something to say and they said it.  NUTS seems to be trying to say
something, but I have no idea what it is.  I cannot associate Claudia Draper
with any cause I can put a name to other than the right to act stupidly and
then escape the consequences.  On the other hand, Eli Wallach plays one of
the villains of the piece.  The audience certainly seemed to think he was a
villain.  I can think of nothing he did wrong but oppose the sympathetic
lead.  Other Ritt films have been manipulative, but at least they have been
so in good cause.  NUTS is manipulative (and no place so obviously as in the
postscript to this fiction film), but not for any cause.  Rate it a 0 on the
-4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Salaire de la peur, Le (1953)
     In Central America four men carry nitroglycerine over bumpy roads and
pray that nothing  sets their cargo off.  THE WAGES OF FEAR (1953) is one of
those film I had wanted to see for years but I really did not expect to like
it a lot.  First of all, I had seen Clouzot's DIABOLIQUE and was not greatly
impressed even though it is considered a sort of semi-classic.  I'd seen too
many similar films, mostly from Hammer Films.  Now, I had seen SORCEROR,
William Friedkin's remake of THE WAGES OF FEAR and thought it was an okay
exercise in suspense.  In some ways it was a better approach, telling more
of the history of the four drivers, though it suffered from an overblown
budget that got used on things like car chases unnecessary to the plot.  I
had also seen a similar film--I've forgotten the title--about trucking
rocket fuel.  So I knew that seeing the original, robbed of its novelty,
could be a disappointment.  Au contraire.  THE WAGES OF FEAR is a white-
knuckle sort of suspense film.
     Somewhere in Central America there is a town, probably one of many,
that is a slow death trap.  To leave takes money--a lot of money.  But no
job in town pays well enough to earn that kind of money, at least no job
left.  Those who cannot get jobs with the big American oil company are
doomed by poverty to stay in the little town until they work themselves to
death.  But suddenly there is work.  Four truck drivers are needed to haul
nitroglycerine to a burning oil well and the oil company will pay $2000 for
a day's work for anyone crazy enough to go on what might be a suicide
mission.  Carrying nitro, every twist in the road, every pothole, every
unforeseen bump, every mudhole becomes a death trap.  This is film noir with
a vengeance; every yard of unpaved road becomes an enemy trying to find one
unwary moment to go for the kill.  (If that sounds over-dramatic, see the
film.)  Each man reacts differently to the pressures: one is coldly
efficient; one is sloppy and foolhardy, taking foolish risks; one is heroic;
and one crumbles under the weight of fear.
     Ad,ittedly, there are some problems with THE WAGES OF FEAR.  It takes a
little too long for the plot to get underway.  The final moments of the film
are hackneyed.  There are scenes so absurd as to be humorous.  For example,
an oil company foreman demonstrates the power of nitro by throwing some on
the floor of his office.  But it is a film that works, and works well enough
to get audible gasps from the audience.  THE WAGES OF FEAR is a classic that
deserves to be.  Rate it a +3 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Dead Pool, The (1988)
          Capsule review:  There is a slightly lighter touch to
     the new "Dirty Harry" film, but otherwise it is the strict
     "Dirty Harry" formula, including lots of action and
     impossible escapes.  Eastwood takes potshots at the bad guys,
     TV news, and horror movies.  Rating: +1.
     Dirty Harry is back in THE DEAD POOL.  I don't have to tell you what
kind of film it is.  There just isn't a whole lot of variation from one
"Dirty Harry" film to the next.  There are car chases, there are explosions,
there is a violent murderer, there are machine gunnings.  (Hey, an aside
here.  At one point thugs go after Harry with machine guns.  When the
machine guns hit a car door they make a nice regular perforation; when they
hit a windshield they make holes in a random pattern as if from single-shot
guns, and even with a machine gun, the thugs can't seem to hit Harry.  They
swiss-cheese his car and Harry steps out without a scratch.  I guess that
too is a hallmark of a "Dirty Harry" film.)  In fact, the only thing really
new is the jokes.  And one of the best of these is borrowed from from
GARDENS OF STONE.
     This time around the plot involves a convicted Mafioso who has it in
for Harry, an attractive TV news reporter, and the murder of a rock star on
the set of the new ripoff film of a cult horror film director (uh, he calls
it an "homage"), Before it is over the film will take pot shots at the
invulnerability of Mafiosi and the standards of TV news reporting, but it
will save its biggest salvo for how nasty and violent horror films are.  (I
am sure that Mr. Eastwood, sensitive soul that he is, would never allow
violence to creep into one of his films.)  We also see three people blown up
in explosions, two people carved with knives, and one extremely hypocritical
actor playing the lead.
     It is good to see Evan C. Kim getting a major role as Harry's new
partner.  Kim did a hilarious imitation of Bruce Lee in KENTUCKY FRIED MOVIE
and in the interim I remember him only in HOLLYWOOD VICE SQUAD.  Beyond that
there is some creativity in THE DEAD POOL, including the only car chase I
have really enjoyed since FOUL PLAY (in spite of the fact that it makes
little sense), some wildly improbable escapes for Harry and a new "mean
line" to replace "Make my day."  All in all, it is a "new 'Dirty Harry'
film," even if that is an oxymoron.  Rate it a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Chase, The (1994)
     Adam Rifkin is back in the driver seat for his third film.  Rifkin
directed the film NEVER ON TUESDAY (which I'm sorry I haven't seen) and the
surrealist comedy THE DARK BACKWARD (which I'm sorry I did see).  He is back
with THE CHASE.  Rifkin's talent is improving at high speed--faster, in
fact, then the chase in THE CHASE.  His latest does not have an incredibly
greasy-looking Judd Nelson with a third arm growing out of his back and does
not leave the audience with something akin to flu symptoms.  So Rifkin is
showing real signs of improvement.  Just not enough.
     The plot of THE CHASE is little more than the title might suggest.
Charlie Sheen plays Jack Hammond, a man running from the police but spotted
by them at a convenience store.  To escape he takes as hostage Natalie Voss
(played by Kristy Swanson) and flees only to be chased by the law and
several live-tv-news teams all the way to the Mexican border.  Along the way
he gets to know his hostage who turns out to be the daughter of the
"Californian Donald Trump," Dalton Voss (Ray Wise).  Some of the film's
satirical edge, in fact most of what works, is aimed at the news team and
the absurd risks they take for ratings, chasing along with--and often ahead
of--the police anxious to beat the competition to a story.
     This film is appears to want to be a madcap satire of a particular type
of film, much as AIRPLANE was for a different sub-genre, but in this case
neither the humor nor the action carries film.  The humor is all on a fairly
lukewarm level that is sometimes helped but more often hindered by Sheen's
deadpan serious delivery.  There are chuckles, but they are often miles
apart.  The action scenes are often mechanical and punctuated with overly
familiar-looking stunt crashes.  The premise seems to be that we are
watching a high-speed chase, but we never get much of a sense of speed.  We
see the two leads talking with the rear-projection showing the police cars
following them, but you rarely have the feel that the speed gets over the
speed limit.  Sheen is just not attentive enough to the road and the scenery
does not seem to go by all that fast.  That may seem like a picayune point,
but it gets in the way of the storytelling.  We do see some of the requisite
explosions and carnage--both fairly mechanical--but it doesn't seem clear
exactly why for the speeds shown.
     Sheen's acting is flat and dry throughout in a film in which there was
little real acting required.  Kristy Swanson, who played the title roles in
DEADLY FRIEND and BUFFY THE VAMPIRE SLAYER competes with Sheen to see who
can more underplay a role.  Trying his hand at acting is rock musician Henry
Rollins as one of the pursuing policemen who seems more interested in
impressing an interviewer riding along with him than in actually capturing
Hammond.
     This is a comedy whose engine seems unwilling to turn over and which
never manages to get all its sparkplugs to fire.  I give it a low 0 on the
-4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Cyrano de Bergerac (1990)
     Over the past twelve months or so we have seen releases of film
versions of three classic stage plays: Brannagh's HENRY V, Zeffirilli's
HAMLET, and Jean-Paul Rappeneau's CYRANO DE BERGERAC.  For production
quality and for entertainment value I find it very easy to pick HAMLET for
third place.  Choosing between first and second place is somewhat harder,
but for both production quality and pure entertainment value I give the edge
to CYRANO.  This is likely to remain the best adaptation of the story to
film we will see in our lifetimes and very likely the most entertaining,
even if we include Steve Martin's popular modern reframing ROXANNE.
     CYRANO DE BERGERAC is, of course, an adaptation of Edmond Rostand's
popular play, first presented in 1897.  (Rostand took some poetic liberty,
incidentally, but Cyrano was a genuine historic figure who was soldier,
expert swordsman, poet, playwright, philosopher, and even a science fiction
writer.  His best-known literary work today is A VOYAGE TO THE MOON, which
is why Rostand put so many references to moon travel in the play.  Cyrano
suggested several means of extra-terrestrial propulsion, mostly absurd, but
on one he got lucky.  Cyrano de Bergerac was the man who first suggested
that space travel might be possible using rocket propulsion.)  The story is
of the noble swordsman who would like to woo his beautiful cousin but is
stigmatized by his own prodigious nose.  When it turns out that an
inarticulate but handsome soldier under Cyrano's command also loves her,
Cyrano agrees to help the soldier.  The soldier will provide the good looks
and Cyrano will provide the words.  The story packs into a surprisingly
small space comedy, tragedy, drama, action, and adventure.
     This production cost seventeen million dollars and, taking into account
modern production costs, that was something of a bargain, considering the
number of detailed sets, costumes, and even battle scenes.  Presumably
shooting in Hungary kept prices down.  Director Jean-Paul Rappeneau co-
authored the script with Jean-Claude Carriere, editing down the Rostand and
occasionally adding some of their own lines.  The film is in French with
English subtitles by novelist Anthony Burgess, who had previously translated
the play.  The producers decided that for each foreign language in which the
film would be subtitled, they would get where possible the best-known
translator of the play into that language to do the subtitles for the film.
Gerard Depardieu has a very natural style as Cyrano that Jose Ferrer lacked
in the previously best-known film version.  His nose also looks surprisingly
real, thanks to the contributions of Michele Burke, who receives on-screen
credit for creating the nose.  Special notice should be given to a fine
score by Jean-Claude Petit, who produced many very good themes.  For action
scenes his score sounds not unlike Danny Elfman's score for BATMAN, but
Petit also has some very melodic themes for other emotions.  CYRANO DE
BERGERAC is a top-flight production.  I give it a +3 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Due occhi diabolici (1990)
     Poor Edgar Allan Poe.  For the longest time he has been the
acknowledged master of the horror story.  How often have films claimed to be
his stories.  Yet I can honestly say that I cannot think of a single film
that was a faithful adaptation of a Poe story.  Roger Corman came a little
closer than usual in a 1961 quickie called TALES OF TERROR in which Richard
Matheson adapted three stories: "Morella," "The Black Cat," and "Facts in
the Case of M. Valdemar."  "The Black Cat" had "The Cask of Amontillado"
mixed in but it was clear that Matheson had at least read the Poe.  Now two
of these stories have been re-done in TWO EVIL EYES.
     TWO EVIL EYES is not so much an anthology film as two one-hour films,
each possibly made for cable, stitched together to make a feature film.  In
each case the films borrow from Poe--or from other Poe films--but these can
hardly be said to be adaptations.  Both are updated to the present, since as
long as the writers are inventing they might as well save money doing it.
George Romero wrote and directed "Facts in the Case of M. Valdemar"; Dario
Argento wrote and directed "The Black Cat."
     In "Valdemar" Poe told the story of a man who dies while under hypnotic
trance and, though the body is dead, the trance remains, so the body has
become a sort of obedient zombie.  This telling throws in an unfaithful wife
(played by Adrienne Barbeau, of course) impatient for her husband to die.
In her scheme to inherit hubby's fortune she has a doctor hypnotize her
husband.  When the husband dies she pops him in the deep freeze, not knowing
that while the body is dead, the mind is alive and still in a trance.  The
story gets muddled with doorways to other worlds and omnipresent gore, both
of which would have surprised and shocked Poe.
     Dario Argento's "Black Cat" is a long, complicated, uninvolving bore.
But then rare is the Argento film that is not a long, complicated,
uninvolving bore.  Harvey Keitel plays an art photographer who likes to get
scenes of urban violence.  As comes as no surprise to anyone, this guy is
also pretty much a twisted cookie.  He drinks too much and abuses his live-
in girlfriend, an irritating violinist.  The friend adopts a stray black cat
who runs around the house making more like a puma than a house cat.  The
piece drags incredibly and, while the story is not entirely predictable, the
twists do not seem to be to any valuable purpose.  There is a lot of blood
spilt, but other than that there isn't much to laugh at at all.

Title
Review for Batman Forever (1995)
     You can tell that a series is transforming to a product when the
original creative people start having less and less to do with the new
chapters.  You get substitute directors and maybe there are substitute
actors trying to look like the originals.  For BATMAN FOREVER Tim
Burton still produces but Joel Schumacher (FLATLINERS) directs and
Michael Keaton is replaced by Val Kilmer in the title role.  Now don't
get me wrong.  I am not going to hold up the previous "Batman" films as
being anything admirable.  The second film did achieve a Fellini-esque
bizarreness at times, but neither is really good cinema in any sense.
BATMAN FOREVER has a new director and a new star and a new, even
thinner feel.  The new MTV-generation priorities say that the image on
the screen is everything.  Intelligence behind that image is as useless
as the new rubber nipples on the Batman suit.
     As long as something looks good on the screen it doesn't matter
any more how much sense it makes or in this case doesn't make.  We have
two totally nonsensical villains.  The slightly better-motivated
villain is The Riddler (played by Jim Carrey).  His grudge against
Bruce Wayne/Batman seems to be that Wayne Industries was not
sufficiently interested in his new broadcast entertainment system.  I
suppose he doesn't like the idea of getting rich all by himself.
Harvey Dent (played by Tommy Lee Jones) turned into the villain Two-
Face because a baddie threw acid in his face.  Batman tried to save him
but his bat-reflexes were just instants too slow to protect Dent.  The
grudge against Batman makes absolutely no sense in either case, but the
writers are apparently afraid that better motivation would slow the
action.  Another new character is Dr. Chase Meridian (Nicole Kidman),
supposedly a respected psychologist.  Do real psychologists actually
call people "wacko?"   Do they really psychoanalyze people on the basis
of two or three sentences?  I doubt it, somehow.  As if these three
people aren't enough to complicate Batman's life, Bruce Wayne also gets
a ward, Dick Grayson (Chris O'Donnell) soon to be Robin, he whom he
comics call the "boy wonder."  Now Robin may be a wonder of sorts, but
he is a bit beyond the "boy" stage.  He rides a motorcycle and
occasionally needs a shave.  Just why someone his age needs a court-
appointed guardian is not clear, particularly because the guardian
looks to be only about five years his senior.  Robin, as comic readers
expect, becomes Batman's partner, hiding his identity by choosing a
costume that is almost exactly like the one that thousands of people
saw him wear as Dick Grayson, circus acrobat.  However Robin seems a
perfect match in some ways and instantly knows how to operate all the
Bat-gear.
     The problem with the script is that there is so much that happens
with little explanation.  This is a film that seems to have been shot
from the first draft of a script.  Meridian makes a date with Batman,
then has second thoughts about dating him and on the date tells him
that she is does not want to date him.  The message would have been
less confusing if she had not waited for Batman in bed and had not met
Batman wearing only a sheet.  Meeting a man dressed in only a sheet
sends signals that are likely to be misinterpreted.  While the police
and Batman are combing the city for Harvey Dent, the Riddler decides to
team up with him and instantly finds him.  How?  Don't ask questions
like "how."  One plot situation after another happens with no logic.
Even the old 1940s Batman serials had more thought about the logic of
their scenes.
     Val Kilmer as Bruce Wayne and the Batman seems younger than
Michael Keaton.  He seems too young for the role, in fact.  And he is
not the most effective actor one could wish in the role.  Admitted
neither was Keaton and Kilmer at least has a prominent jawline.  Jim
Carrey is his usual weird self which makes him much more convincing
once he dons the Riddler suit than he was as a mere mortal.  His
Riddler is a reasonable facsimile of the comic book villain, but his
E. Nygma is a bit too much of a Jim Carrey comedy act.  Tommy Lee Jones
does adequately by Two-Face, but never manages to bring the additional
flamboyance to his role that would be needed to stand out from all the
noise and the weirdness that is going on.
     Visually the style has taken over the film.  There just isn't
enough cathedral here for all the gargoyles.  The skyline of Gotham
City, which had an interesting baroque look in BATMAN now has just too
many statues and building decorations to be credible--art nouveau ad
nauseum.  But the worst mistake is to have too many spectacular but
incoherent action scenes.  Burton's fight scenes have been accused of
being unexciting, but at least the viewer knows what Burton is trying
to say.  Too often you are seeing big objects crashing into other huge
thingamabobs and falling into big holes without enough of an idea of
why or what is supposed to be happening.  Think about it too long and
you miss the next big crash.  Scenes are choreographed for things to
work out too perfectly too much of the time.  Objects swing from cables
that are just exactly the right length for something else to happen.
Even an incredible story needs credible underpinnings and there are
just not enough.  The real super-villain is The Director who breaks
more laws of physics than The Riddler can break laws of Gotham.
Visually the effects are generally more believable than the action,
though there are some exceptions.  The new Batplane looks like a toy,
but overall the effects are quite good.
     There are certainly times during the endless sequences of
senseless action that the film does achieve the feel of the title.  Or
maybe it is more like BATMAN INTERMINABLE.  But I think for me that a
better title would be BATMAN NEVER AGAIN.  This film gets a -1 on the
-4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Planes, Trains & Automobiles (1987)
          Capsule review:  Pleasant compilation of all the holiday
     travel horror stories that fit into a short 93 minutes.  Two
     very opposite travelers, played by Steve Martin and John
     Candy, are repeatedly thrown together by fate and finally by
     choice.  John Hughes can handle comedy about adults almost as
     well as comedy about teens.  Rating: +1.
     Mention John Hughes's name and most people think of films about
teenagers. Most are light comedies that hide perceptive character studies.
SIXTEEN CANDLES and THE BREAKFAST CLUB are among his better efforts.  FERRIS
BUELLER'S DAY OFF was fair and WEIRD SCIENCE...well, even Frank Capra made
occasional duds.  PLANES, TRAINS, & AUTOMOBILES is about people who are at
least technically adults.  But for that fact it bears all the hallmarks of
Hughes's earlier work.
     Neal Page (played by a somewhat subdued Steve Martin) wants to do
something very simple.  he wants to go from New York City to Chicago.  He is
leaving the Tuesday before Thanksgiving and he expects in hours to be with
his family in Chicago.  It will be hours (and hours and hours).  Page is
about to discover everything that can possibly go wrong when you travel and
a few things that probably can't.  One of the things that goes wrong is that
he gets as a traveling partner Del Griffith (played by John Candy), who may
well be the personification of every personality trait that Page does not
want in someone to whom he will be in close proximity.  Griffith is a
boisterous, obnoxious shower-curtain-ring salesman.  Page is prim,
fastidious, intolerant, and uptight.  Fate and coincidence have bound the
two of them together on a circuitous and frustrating route to Chicago.
Their trip is just one Murphy's Law incident after another, with just about
anything going wrong that Hughes's sadistic mind can arrange.  The basic
plot if fairly predictable--the two will find every possible pitfall of
traveling by air, rail, or road.
     Martin has some funny bits on his own, but he is repeatedly upstaged by
Candy, who plays his part far more broadly but at the same time winningly.
Neither seems the kind of companion anyone would really want to go across
the country with, though eventually we find ourselves inexplicably liking
each.  PLANES, TRAINS, & AUTOMOBILES is pleasant holiday fare and worth a
viewing.  Rate it a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Tarzan (1999)
     Disney Studios seems to love the concept of feral children.  They
have made three films from Rudyard Kipling's THE JUNGLE BOOK.  Now they
are starting in on Tarzan, Edgar Rice Burroughs's even more popular
character originally inspired by the Mowgli tales.  And with luck,
starting is all they will do.  Tarzan would be a good choice for Disney
studios since Disney never feels particularly obligated to be faithful
to the source material.  After all, why bother?  Their version will be
the canonical one after it is released anyway, right?  But Burroughs
fans are used to disappointment.  With all the many theatrical film
versions of Tarzan almost none have been accurate to the Burroughs
conception. Until the Disney version the original 1918 film version of
TARZAN OF THE APES and the first half of GREYSTOKE: THE LEGEND OF
TARZAN, LORD OF THE APES are the only films that even look at where
Tarzan came from and how he got to be Tarzan. The rest just assumed
there was this man in the jungle.
     In the new Disney animated version we begin with a mother, father,
and baby escaping from a burning ship and trying to survive ashore in
equatorial Africa. (In the book they were Alice and John Clayton, but
the name Clayton is used in this film for the villain.)  At about the
same time the she-gorilla Kala (voiced by Glenn Close) lost her own
baby to Sabor the fierce leopard who holds Kala's tribe in fear.  The
grieving Kala hears the cry of a human baby and finds a tree house
destroyed by Sabor, and in it a dead man and woman, and their still-
living baby.  Over the objection of her mate Kerchak (Lance Henrickson)
and the disapproval of the other apes Kala adopts the baby, naming him
Tarzan.  Tarzan (Alex D. Linz as a boy and Tony Goldwyn as a man) grows
up an outsider with an androgynous friend Terk (Rosie O'Donnell who
brings entirely too much Rosie O'Donnell humor to the film).  Tarzan
struggles to win the approval of Kerchak, but Kerchak is a bigot who is
not ready to accept a human into his family. (Yes, there are many
politically-correct lessons in the course of the film.) Eventually
Tarzan meets humans who come in an expedition to find gorillas.  The
expedition is made up of Professor Porter (Nigel Hawthorne), his
daughter Jane (Minnie Driver), and guide Clayton (Brian Blessed).  Of
course, the expected love story is told one more time.
     I cannot think what Disney's studios could have done to so
alienate Hans Zimmer that he would leave them in the lurch when they so
desperately needed him. Zimmer, who scored films like THE LION KING,
has a feel for the sound of African music.  He could have done a
beautiful score for TARZAN.  Instead we have a collection of totally
obnoxious songs by Phil Collins.  Mark Mancina's music harmlessly fills
in the spaces.  On the other hand, the animation is little short of
wonderful with odd stylistic touches that mix flat animation with some
impressive three-dimensional animation.  In Disney's new tradition, a
different team animates each of the major characters.  One advantage of
this, I suppose is a lot more people can be working in parallel on a
single scene, yet a single character is consistently animated through
the entire film.  Some parts of the screen may look like traditional
flat animation; others will seem to be almost filmed as live-action.
It could be bothersome having more than one animation techniques in a
single scene, but it really is not.  The one animation problem is that
the words do not really fit the characters' lips well.
     Several problems with the script and its visualization show how
this film talks down to its audience.  We see Tarzan skid over tree-
limbs with obvious skate-boarding motions.  And the tree limbs would
have to be thirty feet long or more for the time he spends on each
limb.  And where in the world are there so many major waterfalls in
such close proximity?  We know immediately that Clayton is a villain
because he is so ugly.  Just once it would be nice to have an
attractive villain and an ugly hero.  (Lookism apparently continues to
be exempt from the Disney agenda.)  How likely is it that the
expedition has brought a magic lantern and a praxinoscope and hence is
prepared to teach Tarzan about civilization.  This seems like in the
worst traditions of "Gilligan's Island."
     There are no African people in this version.  That is not
surprising since however they are portrayed there would be someone
unhappy with the representation.  Though Africans are present in the
original novel, Disney decision-makers probably thought it was best
side-stepping the issues of including them in their adaptation.  There
have been some people taking issue with the fact they have been
eliminated, but it is relatively few.  It is ironic that the filmmakers
may be afraid to put in native Africans since they have Tarzan himself
ask the question, "why are you afraid of anything different from you?"
Apparently the filmmakers felt they themselves had something to fear.
But it is doubly ironic because Tarzan himself is a symbol of the power
of diversity.  After all he is presumably the lord of the animals
because he is actually human, and he is an invincible hero among humans
because he was raised by animals.
     Disney studios had the potential to make a very good adaptation of
the Edgar Rice Burroughs classic fantasy TARZAN OF THE APES.  Instead
they have set their sights considerably lower and made a film that will
have little appeal beyond grade-school level audiences.  I rate it a 4
on the 0 to 10 scale and a low 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Sum of Us, The (1994)
     David Stevens is probably most notable in this country for co-
authoring BREAKER MORANT together with Bruce Beresford and Jonathan
Hardy.  That was a very political film.  His SUM OF US, based on his
own stage play, is a very different sort of story.  At the center of
this story are Harry Mitchell and his son Jeff (Jack Thompson of the
excellent TURTLE BEACH and Russell Crowe of ROMPER STOMPER).  We see
them doing some very normal things like having dinner together.  Jeff,
as we quickly learn, is gay.  Harry accepts his son's sexual
orientation with a sort of stoicism.  Most of the time he presents a
face of complete toleration, but find him in the right mood and he will
admit that he wishes his son would know the joy of "planting his seed
and seeing it grow," as he puts it.  And if you catch Harry drunk and
with his defenses down, you can tell that his natural instincts are
anti-gay.  Still, he is a man of wit and intelligence who greatly loves
his son and who, while in control, will make every effort to be
supportive.  Harry's determination to be not just tolerant but chummy
with Jeff's boyfriend Greg (John Polson) ironically is more of a
hindrance than a help in that relationship.  But if Harry is disrupting
Jeff's relationship, Jeff's being gay may impact Harry's romance with
an attractive divorcee he has met through a dating service.
     Jack Thompson is a familiar face in Australian cinema and has been
in such films as MAD DOG MORGAN, BREAKER MORANT, and THE EARTHLING.
Here he gives a likable and nicely understated performance.  This
really is his film and even in moments of minimalist repartee with his
son, a natural charm and wit shine through.  Crowe is fully credible as
the son but somehow is not able to command the same audience empathy
that Thompson does.
     Stevens creates a real study in the degrees of tolerance among the
families shown in this film.  In Jeff's family the dominant emotion is
love; in Greg's it is anger.  Greg's father seems to have little use
for his son, not even knowing that his son is gay.  The one really
unconventional touch in the style of this film is to have Harry and
Jeff talk directly to the camera frequently.  This technique is often
used in films, but rarely to this degree.  Curiously, this is not at
all bothersome when it is first used, but toward the end of the film
there are cases where it is awkwardly inappropriate.
     This is a film with some comedy and some sadness that warmly
explores an unusual father-son relationship.  There are no thrills and
no special effects, just a simple story.  I wish this country would
make more of this sort of film.  It gets a laid-back +1 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Wolf (1994)
     The Frankenstein monster and the vampire each owe their popularity to a
single novel that captured the public's imagination.  Werewolves are much
more a product of the cinema, however.  The closest there comes to being a
classic werewolf novel that impacted cinema is Guy Endore's WEREWOLF OF
PARIS of 1933.  The first well-remembered werewolf film was 1935's WEREWOLF
OF LONDON.  That and THE WOLFMAN (1941) really were what captured the
public's interest in human-animal shape-shifters.  Since that time there
have probably been only four films that did anything really interesting with
the concept.  Those would be (the flawed but original) WOLFEN (1981),THE
HOWLING (1981), the under-rated CAT PEOPLE (1982), and THE COMPANY OF WOLVES
(1984)--odd that they should all be in the space of four years.  Most other
shape-shifter films followed the same rules with minor variations and said
little new about the condition of being a shape-shifter.  Generally you find
someone bitten by a werewolf, usually someone who is unable to express his
rage, who gets an outlet by turning into an animal and letting rage be
channeled in brutal ways.  Unlike vampires, werewolves usually detest their
condition, but they are powerless to control it.  The condition easily
applies itself to a metaphor for severe mental problems much as vampirism is
often a metaphor for drug addiction.
     Right down this centerline of interpretation with almost no spin on the
ball is WOLF.  Jack Nicholson plays Will Randall, an editor for a leading
publisher who looks for literary merit rather than books that will make a
fast buck.  When his publishing house is taken over by a corporate magnate,
Raymond Alden (played by Christopher Plummer), Randall finds himself being
replaced and given the choice of a bad job or none at all.  The old Will was
a softie who would have stood by and taken it.  However, after being bitten
by a wolf on a back Vermont road, Will feel unexplainedly invigorated and
ready to put up a fight.  What follows is an almost by-the-numbers
amalgamation of elements of WEREWOLF OF LONDON and THE WOLFMAN.  This could
almost be titled THE WOLFMAN OF MANHATTAN.
     This is one film that really could have benefited by being done in
black and white.  Director Mike Nichols occasionally manages an atmospheric
scene, but he is no Paul Schrader and Nichols probably would not have had
the clout to insist on black and white or highly muted colors even if he
wanted to use them.  (Perhaps he could have used a werewolf bite himself!)
He also makes the irritating mistake of showing Wolfman Will's superhuman
leaps in slow motion where they look totally unbelievable.  (With Nichols
directing, listen for a voice cameo by his wife, Elaine May.)
     WOLF features sound in THX, the screen's new abbreviation for "too darn
loud."  The werewolf makeup was the creation the talented Rick Baker, though
here the effect is a bit understated.  Wolf-Nicholson looks like a
Dickensian thug with an underbite.  Nichols probably could have chosen more
elaborate special effects but for once a director did not feel the need to
have elaborate special effects up-staging the actors.  However, perhaps
better effects were needed for animatronic wolves, which do not look
realistic.
     Nicholson is a rather obvious choice for a werewolf since he always
seems to be barely keeping his animal side in check.  Nevertheless as the
book editor with a heart who is always looking out for the interest of his
staff, he is less than totally convincing.  Michelle Pfeiffer is on-hand as
an heiress and a woman who runs (around) with the wolves.  James Spader,
Kate Nelligan, and Christopher Plummer co-star and each give a reasonable
performance.

Title
Review for La Bamba (1987)
     "Meteoric" is the word for the career of Ritchie Valens, who signed a
recording contract, became successful, had three top-ten singles, and died,
all in a span of eight months.  He died in a plane crash at age 17, having
only months before been a Mexican-American farmworker named Ricardo
Valenzuela.  LA BAMBA is the story of that last year of his life.
     Biographical films about singers give a brutally realistic picture of
their subjects' worlds, present a fawning tribute, or lie somewhere in
between.  LA BAMBA does a little of both.  Valens is a pure-hearted good guy
with a vision of what kind of music he wants to create, a white knight of
Rock and Roll.  Contrasting with him is his brother Bob (played by Esai
Morales), who played the bully villain of BAD BOYS).  BOB IS A SELF-CENTERED
FAILURE.  HE DEALS DRUGS, DRINKS TOO MUCH, MISTREATS THE WOMAN HE STOLE FROM
RITCHIE, AND GENERALLY TURNS HIS OWN FRUSTRATIONS INTO PAIN AND TROUBLE FOR
THOSE AROUND HIM.  HIS BASENESS SOMEHOW IS A LITTLE EASIER TO BELIEVE THAN
RITCHIE'S LOFTINESS, BUT TOGETHER THEY JUST ABOUT MAKE ONE WHOLE PERSON.  IN
FACT, BOB IS THE MORE INTERESTING OF THE TWO CHARACTERS.  RITCHIE'S STORY IS
OF THE IDEALIST WHO MAKES GOOD, A SORT OF LATTER-DAY HORATIO ALGER STORY.
BUT THROUGH BOB'S CHARACTER WE LEARN SOMETHING ABOUT MEXICAN-AMERICAN
FARMWORKERS AND THEIR COMMUNITY, WHICH IS MUCH MORE VALUABLE THAN JUST
ANOTHER STORY OF A SINGER'S SUCCESS.
     WHERE LA BAMBA's story is the most questionable is in its little
brushes with the occult.  We are told that Ritchie had repeated nightmares
and premonitions about plane crashes.  As a result, he has a terrible fear
of flying which he must reluctantly push aside to fulfill the demands of
stardom.  We are also told that he has lost every coin-toss of his life
except the one which put him on the flight which killed him.  He apparently
wins that toss, but the audience knows better.  If the premonitions indeed
pointed to the way he would die, they should be better documented than just
being thrown into a film.  If they did not really occur, then the
screenwriter should not claim they did in what is otherwise supposed to be a
factual story.
     But LA BAMBA is good entertainment even if before the film, like me,
you couldn't reliably name a single one of Valens's hits.  I still got
caught up in the excitement of the creation of a new kind of music, even if
it is not the kind of music I generally enjoy.  Rate it a low +2 on the -4
to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Jerry & Tom (1998)
     CAPSULE: Two used car salesmen are also contract killers for the
organized crime syndicate.  We see them over the course of years as the
Mentor loses his edge and the younger learns the skills of the older
man but does not inherit his scruples.  Humor and drama intermingle.
Joe Montegna leads a cast of familiar actors.  Rating: 7 (0 to 10), 2
(-4 to +4)
   - Directed by Saul Rubinek.  Screenplay by Rick Cleveland based on
     his own one-act play.
   - Older killer Tom (Joe Mantegna) teaches Jerry (Sam Rockwell) the
     nuts and bolts of the killing profession.  Including how to make
     things like a chainsaw work.  Jerry is a dim bulb.
   - Paternal Tom eventually becomes bothered by the ruthlessness of
     his partner Jerry.
   - Many familiar actors in small roles.  Peter Riegert, Ted Danson,
     William Macy, Saul Rubinek (who also directed), Charles Durning,
     Maury Chaykin.
   - Initially a comedy, but the serious elements take over.  They
     could not remain flippant about murder for long.
   - Amazing scene transitions that look like one continuous cut; yet
     there are no special effects in the film.  All transitions done by
     building a recreation of the previous set next to the following
     set.
   - Humorous allusions to real events. (E.g. Kennedys, Jimmy Hoffa).

Title
Review for Sweet and Lowdown (1999)
     Woody Allen seems to be as popular as ever with the public and
with the critics, but I have to say that these days he and I seem to be
on very different wavelengths.  His last few films seem to me to be
superficially written without any real characters.  His humor is
contrived and weak, and his ideas lack ginger.  Allen could have phoned
in the script for SWEET AND LOWDOWN.  It is little more than an excuse
to tie together the musical interludes.  In a film already short at 95
minutes, he puts several musical sequences.  Then he takes what could
have been one of his patented silly situations and works it out three
different ways, not one of them amusing.  After he wastes that much
time he has less plot and character development than a typical hour of
television.  And what is his theme?  If you are not a nice person you
might end up cheating yourself.  Where is the filmmaker who made LOVE
AND DEATH and the intelligent CRIMES AND MISDEMEANORS?
     Emmet Ray (Sean Penn), as the film opens, is a pimp and a totally
selfish personality.  Favorite hobbies are watching trains and shooting
rats.  He happens to be the second best jazz guitarist in the world,
second to the great Django Reinhardt.  His fictional story is told, in
the style REDS, by a combination of dramatizations and by witness
interviews by experts on jazz, one of whom is Allen himself.
     As if having been given a monstrous talent was not enough Ray is
given a perfect girlfriend, Hattie (Samantha Morton).  She just sort of
falls into his lap as he meets her on the Atlantic City boardwalk.
Hattie is a mute laundress and she is beautiful.  Hattie is utterly in
love with him and transformed by his music.  Ray is too selfish and
stupid to bring himself to treat her at all well, cheating on her when
the opportunity arises and worse insulting her to her face.  After
living with her about a year he walks out on her in what should be a
key scene, but one that Allen seemingly did not bother to film.
Instead we learn about it from the witnesses.  He has left her for
Blanche (Uma Thurman), a writer with a majestic look and an affected
mode of speaking.  But eventually there is a reckoning.
     Allen has cameos for a number of celebrities, some as jazz experts
playing themselves, or as with the case of John Waters, just as a
character.  Penn seems to do Emmet Ray as effortlessly as Ray does jazz
guitar.  His guitar picking somehow looks right, though he is not
credited with any of the music.  Much more notable is Samantha Morton
as Blanche.  Her acting keeps ones eyes focussed on the screen.  Screen
actors convey most of the plot through their voices.  In the vast
majority of films, audiences get most of the plot listening to the
soundtrack.  If one is given the choice of hearing but not seeing or
seeing but not hearing a familiar film, one quickly finds that for most
films, the former is the more satisfying experience.  Silent acting has
a different sort of dynamic and really grabs the audience's attention.
The result is that Hattie is by orders of magnitude the most compelling
character in the film.  Morton brings to the role virtues that might
have been mundane in the silent era, but which seem memorable in a
sound film.
     As Allen gets older he seems more and more to be writing about
flawed people who have really ruined their personal lives.  It would be
easy to interpret his characters as any given time as being a
commentary on his own behavior.  Clint Eastwood does the same sort of
thing, but at least his film plots seem to be better developed.  SWEET
AND LOWDOWN is a superficial morality play that needed considerably
more work.  I rate it a 4 on the 0 to 10 scale and a low 0 on the -4 to
+4 scale.

Title
Review for Lost World: Jurassic Park, The (1997)
     Steven Spielberg has fashioned a sequel to his supremely
successful JURASSIC PARK that in many ways does what a sequel should
do: it continues the story rather than remaking it.  The film features
the same terrific dinosaur effects, but this time around Spielberg
changes the tone to make a darker and more somber exercise.  At the
same time has removed much of the anti-science sentiment of the
previous film.  But perhaps the most interesting touch is that since it
is based on Michael Crichton's novel which borrows the title of Arthur
Conan Doyle's classic novel, Spielberg has played up the similarities
in plot to the Doyle novel and its 1925 film adaptation.  THE LOST
WORLD: JURASSIC PARK also borrows from KING KONG and GORGO.  On the
negative side the character it builds the story around is Dr. Ian
Malcolm (played again by Jeff Goldblum).  This was not a very good
decision since while Goldblum had some good lines in the first film,
his character was never very well developed and does not have the
appeal to carry the sequel.
     It is four years after the incidents of JURASSIC PARK.  The entire
experiment has been hushed up.  Ian Malcolm has tried to tell his story
to the world and has been made to look like a sensationalist kook.
Meanwhile there has been a power struggle at John Hammond's company
Ingen.  Each faction wants control of an island that was a laboratory
and breeding ground for the ill-fated park and where, unbeknownst to
the world dinosaurs still live and breed.  John Hammond has sent a team
of four scientists to the laboratory island to document what is there.
Ingen, now led by Hammond's nephew Peter Ludlow (Arliss Howard) has
sent a team to secure the island.  The team leader is hunter and
mercenary, Roland Tembo (Pete Postlethwaite).  Tembo's team is composed
of what are supposed to be crack mercenaries, but Tembo knows them to
be unprepared for the situation they will be facing.  The hunter cares
little that his team is incompetent so long as they can provide him
with an opportunity to kill a T. rex.  As with the earlier film David
Koepp has adapted the Crichton novel.  His film is mostly dark and
somber until the last half-hour when finally the film cuts loose for
some fun.
     To make Goldblum's Ian Malcolm the tie to the previous film seems
almost an act of desperation.  Alan Grant or Ellie Sattler's characters
had more appealing personalities.  Malcolm was slickly obnoxious and
remains so in this film.  The worst fault of the script is its failure
to create a character that that audience really cares about.  In this
film Pete Postlethwaite's villain is almost as appealing as the hero.
Of course with dangerous dinosaurs on the loose, it is not clear the
story really needed a human villain to start with.
     In contrast to JURASSIC PARK, Spielberg has chosen to visualize
this story in muted colors, often with light sources blurred.  There is
intentionally no natural scene that looks as beautiful as the
helicopter landing in the last film.  The new island is not to be
confused with a paradise.  The film has more time on the screen of
dinosaur effects, but in many it is harder to make out details.  Also
curiously some of the effects sequences are cut short, as if they were
not completed to save time.  There will be a stegosaurus attack and the
camera will flash to Goldblum who says something like "they're
leaving," rather than showing them leave.  Spielberg does have some
feel for suspense, and this film includes one suspenseful sequence
involving a glass window that is almost sure to be borrowed by other
films in the future.  John Williams has scored the film, but this is
sure to be considered one of his lesser scores with some standard
suspense music and no really memorable new themes.
     The most impressive touch in THE LOST WORLD: JURASSIC PARK is how
successfully it pulled together the plots of both Crichton and Doyle.
It delivers a few thrills, some nice dinosaur effects, and packed
theaters.  I rate it a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Passion Fish (1992)
     May-Alice Culhane (played by Mary McDonnell) was once the queen of the
soaps.  Then a reckless taxi driver turned her into an unemployed
paraplegic.  She wakes in a hospital with no memory of the accident and with
a vicious attitude toward life.  She determines to return to her family home
in Louisiana's Cajun country to drink, watch television, and generally pity
herself.  In this state she goes through several nurses.  Either she could
not stand them or they could not stand her.
     Finally, Chantelle (played by Alfre Woodard) is sent by the agency.
Chantelle wants the job, but has little experience and a bad background.
Surprisingly, she is a natural at dealing with May-Alice.  Each battles the
other and has enough need to put up with the other's bullying.  Chantelle
starts seeing a man from town while May-Alice strikes up a friendship with
an old potential beau, Rennie (played by David Strathairn).  Rennie is
already married with five children and May-Alice's condition makes sex
impossible, but there clearly is some interest.
     John Sayles both wrote and directed PASSION FISH, taking his time to do
it right.  In showing us some of May-Alice's old friends, Sayles is able to
have some fun at the expense of the soap opera industry and at overly demure
Southern womanhood.  The film is longish at 134 minutes, but it does not
drag.  Some of the Louisiana scenery is very well photographed.  I give
PASSION FISH a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.
[Seen at the Montgomery Theater in Rocky Hill, NJ.]

Title
Review for Living Daylights, The (1987)
     Pretty close to a quarter of a century ago the first James Bond film
blazed (at times literally) across the screen.  It presented  a lithe young
Bond played, of course, by Sean Connery.  It was popular, so a second one
was made to give the audiences more.  As each successive film was a smash
the producers kept trying to give the audiences the same, only more: the
same actors, bigger, more powerful, and more fanciful villains with bigger
plans, and more bizarre henchmen.  There were, however, problems with this
approach.  The actors eventually got too old for their roles.  Lois Maxwell
as Moneypenny went from being sexy to matronly.
     Audiences did not seem to like George Lazenby, so when Connery finally
left the series they replaced him with an already-popular Roger Moore, two
years older than Connery.  Moore started out almost too old to play Bond and
the succeeding years made matters worse.  On top of that, Moore was never
right to play Bond.  Ian Flemings's superspy is a thug who, when the
occasion called for it, had nice manners.  Moore was a fop who, when the
occasion called for it could dirty his hands.  He simply did not work in the
part.  It was clear that the series was in trouble when he took the role in
LIVE AND LET DIE.  It had one of the weakest Bond plots.  Also, perhaps in
retaliation for a nasty comment Bond makes about the Beatles in GOLDFINGER,
Paul McCartney wrote one of the worst of the Bond title songs.  (It had the
dubious distinction of having duplicate redundant words in one of its lines:
"IN this ever-changing world IN which we live IN.")
     Meanwhile, the ever-escalating villains started going in for total
world destruction with henchmen that became impossible to kill.  By
MOONRAKER, the series had become a silly comic book that was turning
audiences off.  Something had to be done.  It was.  FOR YOUR EYES ONLY
started as silly as any Bond film, but after the first third it straightened
out and had a very plausible villain.  OCTOPUSSY, too, had a reasonable Cold
War plot.  The last Moore film, A VIEW TO A KILL, tried to capture some of
the spirit of the more successful Bond films, apparently reframing the plot
of GOLDFINGER>  (The number of parallels are too great to be coincidence.)
The film was not the complete mess it is usually considered to be by Bond
fans, but it was well below average for the series.
     The series has long been in need of an overhaul, and with the choice of
a new Bond we also got a new M, a new Moneypenny, and a new feel with a
younger and more vital Bond.  Through an unrecognized stroke of luck for the
producers, Pierce Brosnan, the first choice for Bond, was unavailable.
Brosnan would have been another Bond in the Moore tradition, too handsome
and insufficiently thug-like.  Dalton has a hard, flinty look rather than
being pretty.  As such, he looks the part of Bond the most of any Bond in
the series.
     Other characters of interest include John Rhys-Davies as a perenniel
friendly-foe Pushkin.  Pushkin is played with some fun by Rhys-Davies--
veteran of SHOGUN, RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARK, and VICTOR/VICTORIA.  Until now
the foe has been General Gogol, who shows up for only one quick shot at the
end of this outing, but his background has been given to Pushkin and Rhys-
Davies will probably be the continuing character from this point on.  Bond's
new girl is Kara Milovy (played by Maryam d'Abo, who looks like a stretched
version of Rosanna Arquette).  She is a little less ditzy than most of the
Bond women, though well below the standard set by Carole Bouquet as Melina
in FOR YOUR EYES ONLY.  One wonders how the  public would react if there
wasn't a love interest ready to drop into bed with Bond in just one of the
films.
     The plot of THE LIVING DAYLIGHTS is more complex than previous Bond
films.  The long-dead organization that Fleming used to call SMERSH has
apparently been revived and in the midst of attempts to bring detente
between the British and the Soviets, suddenly SMERSH is murdering double-O
agents.  Why?  It has something to do with a defecting Soviet dignitary, an
American arms dealer, and obscure goings-on in Czechoslovakia, Tangiers, and
Afghanistan.
     Oh, there are some of those irritating plugs for products, including a
winery and an electronics firm to whom I will not give more publicity by
naming here.  And the producers have not entirely abandoned the silliness of
the Moore Bond films.  There are a few silly weapons, one more to use in a
car chase, and one silly ski chase using a non-standard toboggan.  but for
the most part they have been able to keep their tongues out of their cheeks.
Which is a quaint way of saying that this is the Bond film the fans have
been waiting for a very long time.  THE LIVING DAYLIGHTS may be the best
Bond film since FROM RUSSIA WITH LOVE.  Rate it a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     My ranking of the Broccoli-produced films, best to worst (and subject
to some change) is:

Title
Review for Crucible, The (1996)
     THE CRUCIBLE is the story of the Salem witch trials, but it is a
lot more than that.  It is an examination of a society that through
fear gives unquestioned authority and power to a select few supposed
defenders.  The result is an exercise in power far worse than the
threat it was intended to curb.  The House Un-American Activities
Committee hearings, chaired by Senator Joseph McCarthy were the
inspiration for Arthur Miller's original play, but the parallels he
draws can be applied to any situation where the public allows itself to
be ruled by fear rather than reason.  It is a ready-made and fully-
formed analogy that some can apply to the "political correctness"
argument, others to the firearms debate or political issues with
religious implications. The term "witch hunt" has come into common
usage as any campaign against dissension, perhaps in large part because
of this play.
     The setting is Salem, Massachusetts in 1692.  This is a community
committed to an extreme devotion to its religion and what it sees as
service to God.  And if the Bible says that such things as witches
exist, then witchcraft must be a very real and very present threat to
the community.  Several adolescent girls, led by Abigail Williams
(played by Winona Ryder), are caught in the act playing the voodoo-like
game of "conjuring boys."  Williams has taken things a step further and
has tried to use the magic to kill a woman she considers her enemy.  At
first she denies that the game had anything to do with witchcraft, but
quickly discovers that she has happened onto what seems to her a good
thing.  The first suggestion that any of the people of Salem have
engaged in witchcraft seems to bring down the wrath of the whole
community.  And the people of Salem, many already involved in minor
conflicts with their neighbors, seem all too ready to accept and
exploit witchcraft accusations against their enemies.  Soon there area
dozen or so girls making accusations and basking in the celebrity their
accusations bring them.
     Drawn into the situation are John Proctor (Daniel Day-Lewis) and
his wife Elizabeth (Joan Allen).  John had had a short dalliance with
Abigail, but now wants to remain faithful to Elizabeth.  It is a
situation that Abigail, with her new-found power, discovers she can
change.  To investigate the accusations come first the Reverend Hale
(Rob Campbell) and then the esteemed Judge Danforth (Paul Scofield),
Deputy Governor of Massachusetts.  Hale is a moderate man as likely to
find an accused witch innocent as guilty.  Judge Danforth, on the other
hand, is a religious zealot who couches his actions in legalisms.  At
heart, however, he is deeply afraid of witchcraft himself and can no
longer accept any possibility of innocence.  He sees the girls'
accusations as God giving him the tools to root out the Devil in Salem.
Eventually the witch hunt will take on a life of its own and will get
beyond even his control.  Caught in all of this is John Proctor who
still has some affection for Abigail but sees first hand the evil that
Abigail is wielding.
     Daniel Day-Lewis and Winona Ryder each seem acceptable by
themselves, but somehow do not seems to have much dramatic chemistry
together on the screen.  Day-Lewis is made up with considerably more
realism than is Ryder.  He, like many of the people of the story, show
the sign of a hard life with scars and with rotted teeth.  Even making
allowances for Ryder's youth, a similar hard life seems to have done
little more than ruffle her hair.  Ryder appears out of place and too
well cared-for considering the look of most of the other people in the
film.  Joan Allen, who previously played Pat Nixon in NIXON gives a
subtle uprightness to the role of Elizabeth Proctor.  Paul Scofield
playing another judge will surely bring memories of A MAN FOR ALL
SEASONS.  He brings a lot of the same magnetism to this role as he had
in that, perhaps presenting another side of the same character.
Familiar faces in less pivotal roles include Bruce Davison, Jeffrey
Jones, and George Gaynes.
     In some senses this production is a little too polished to feel
accurate.  The opening sequence shows a voodoo-like ceremony in the
woods complete with mystic chalk symbols drawn on ground, and Tituba
chanting a perfectly recorded version of the Yanvalou Chant.  It was
very theatrical but not very realistic. Some may find the film a little
hard to follow, particularly in the first half hour.  The viewer is
introduced to a large number of characters speaking in the manner of
17th Century English.  A word should be said about the accuracy of this
film to the historical fact.  It is not much beyond the names of some
of the people. Abigail Williams was an eleven-year-old and John Proctor
was sixty, so much of the Miller's tale of sexual revenge does not work
as history.  However I am willing to give Arthur Miller more latitude
to play with the facts in this film than I give Gibson for BRAVEHEART.
Robert Bolt in A MAN FOR ALL SEASONS or William Shakespeare with JULIUS
CAESAR is doing a lot more than just telling an adventure tale.  Miller
is a writer who can tell a story of complexity with some profundity.
If THE CRUCIBLE is not historically accurate, it transcends that.  I
personally hold BRAVEHEART more accountable for historical accuracy
than I do THE CRUCIBLE.
     THE CRUCIBLE is a powerful play on stage, but it has been made
available to mass audiences only twice before, once as the 1957 French
film LES SORCIERES DE SALEM and then again in 1967 as a play performed
on CBS.  With the exception of the latter, no non-live version has ever
been available to American audience until now.  It is something of a
service that it is available now.  I give it a +3 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Mrs. Parker and the Vicious Circle (1994)
     The Algonquin Round Table was a unique literary circle.  Through
the 1920s a group of the brightest, wittiest, and elitist of the
Manhattan's artistic types met every day in the Rose Room of the
Algonquin Hotel on 44th Street.  There they ate lunch, traded barbs,
and gossiped.  Woe betide the unprepared newcomer who tried to join the
prestigious group.  He became an immediate target for the rapier-
sarcasm of some of the cleverest literary minds this country ever
produced.  The Round Table circled around its two brightest stars,
Alexander Woollcott and Dorothy Parker.  Both were merciless critics as
well as authors.  Other notable members were Robert Benchley, Marc
Connelly, Edna Ferber, George S. Kaufman, Robert Sherwood, and many
others.  MRS. PARKER AND THE VICIOUS CIRCLE is the story of Parker's
life, particularly during the years of the Round Table.
     Our story begins in Hollywood of 1945 with Parker (played by
Jennifer Jason Leigh) married to Alan Campbell (Peter Gallagher) and
writing films for which she has no respect.  She begins thinking about
the old days and the film flashes from monochrome to color.  As her
rumination opens Parker is not yet the angry literary critic she was to
become.  She was just the very cross theater critic for Vanity Fair,
though she already displayed a cynical and biting wit.  She is fired
for writing reviews that were too negative.  Her husband (Andrew
McCarthy) has returned from the war.  In his weakened state as a drunk
and a morphine addict he is no match to trade insults with his
distinguished.  Dorothy has lost her taste for him as she would lose it
for just about everything else in life, everything but her close circle
of friends.
     These friends meet for lunch daily in the Algonquin and soon form
the tight literary clique that would become the Round Table.  The put-
downs would come fast and furious.  One might pat another's bald head
and say something like "It feels just like my wife's behind."  The bald
man would feel his own head and say "Why, so it does."  We follow
Parker through a torrid love affair--as passionate as Parker would ever
feel about anything--with newspaperman Charles MacArthur (Matthew
Broderick).  But the great love of Parker's life is critic and comedian
Robert Benchley (Campbell Scott), who carefully remains only a platonic
friend.  In fact, he probably deserves awards for remaining that close
to a woman who seems to have a double entendre for a personality.
Parker seems to have a real affection for dogs and none whatsoever for
people.  Even so, she always seemed to have a current man and a current
dog.  Eventually there would be just the dog.
     Leigh studied what few recordings there are of Parker's voice to
imitate exactly the irritating, affected elocution that Parker herself
used--a near relative of the speaking style Leigh used in THE HUDSUCKER
PROXY.  The acting is quite good, but it is less then pleasant to share
a room with this person for over two hours.  Campbell Scott is a little
more pleasant to watch as Robert Benchley though he is a too thin to
look like Benchley in the old comedy shorts.
     The script by director Alan Rudolph and Randy Sue Coburn jumps
around in time with a latterday Parker offering bleak little humorous
poems as commentary on the action--or lack thereof--of the film.  The
film works as a detailed portrait of someone whom you would not want to
meet in real life.  This is sort of a literary SID AND NANCY which
tells you more than you want to know about a person about whom there is
less than meets the eye.  The other members of the Round Table are of
more interest, of course.  I would rate it a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Titanic (1997)
     There are really two approaches to making a film about the sinking
of the Titanic, and both were tried in the 1950s.  The 1953 film
TITANIC had passenger Clifton Webb reacting to discovering that his son
was illegitimate.  Impending death as the ship sinks changes his
attitude for the better.  On the other hand, the 1958 film A NIGHT TO
REMEMBER is a dramatization of passengers' accounts of the sinking of
the great ship.  They had some false ideas about the sinking, but for
the most part they were trying to accurately portray events that
happened that night.  The 1953 TITANIC is a pleasant old film and fun
to watch; A NIGHT TO REMEMBER is a cinema classic.  As one might
imagine, there were a large number of very dramatic stories going on at
the same time when the Titanic sank.  It just is not necessary to
invent a fictional story to take place at the same time, and it is an
irritating distraction from what most of the audience considers the
real story they paid to see.  The 1997 TITANIC, written and directed by
James Cameron, is about a very one-sided love triangle set on the
Titanic.  At 194 minutes, the film also has time for some detail about
the sinking including some that has never been filmed before.  But
overall it has less historic detail than the much shorter and lower-
budgeted A NIGHT TO REMEMBER.  That is in part because James Cameron
takes almost two hours of screen time to get the Titanic to the iceberg
and even after it does hit, he still cannot bring himself to believe
that the audience is more interested in the sinking ship than in his
banal love story.
     Visually, the 1997 TITANIC is by far the best version, but for
historical detail, I think the real enthusiasts about the sinking will
probably prefer the 1958 telling.  Cameron seems to accept this by
borrowing many scenes almost intact.  Some of these may be from
historic accounts, but the similarities go beyond the content of the
borrowed scenes.  The incidents are simply re-filmed using the same
style.
     The film begins with some intrepid young explorers, led by Brock
Lovett (played by Bill Paxton dragging along memories of his too
similar role in TWISTER), exploring the recently found sunken hull of
the RMS Titanic and in particular looking for a (fictional) diamond
that supposedly went down with the great ship. They do not find the
diamond itself, but they do find a drawing of a nude woman wearing the
diamond. When the drawing is shown on television, a woman calls the
team to say that not only can she identify the picture, she is the
woman.  (Hey, would you believe the elderly woman is Gloria Stuart, who
played opposite Melvyn Douglas and Boris Karloff in OLD DARK HOUSE and
opposite Claude Rains in THE INVISIBLE MAN?)
     As the old woman tells the explorers her story, we drift back to
the sailing of the Titanic.  Rose DeWitt Buketer (Kate Winslet) is from
a family of old money and new debt.  Her mother has arranged a marriage
between her and Cal Hockley (Billy Zane, played as quite possibly the
most obnoxious American man then alive).  This part is extremely over-
written, with Hockley making judgments that Pablo Picasso will never
amount to anything in the art world and that lifeboats are a waste of
space on the unsinkable Titanic. Having to watch him on the screen for
a few hours is painful; a lifetime with him would have to be worse than
death.  At least that is what Rose decides and is ready to cast herself
into the cold ocean when Jack Dawson (Leonardo DiCaprio), a young
artist from the lower classes and the lower decks, steps forward and
convinces her to live.  Of course he is everything that Cal is not,
including poor, unfortunately.  But of course the two fall madly in
love.  And of course the angry and spoiled Cal plots revenge.  Even
after the Titanic strikes an iceberg--sorry, was that supposed to have
a spoiler warning?--the film still concerns itself too much with this
love triangle and not enough with the sinking ship.  Earlier we have
seen parts of the ship behaving perfectly.  We should revisit the
engine room and its machinery with grasshopper-like legs kicking fly-
wheels and see what flooding is doing to it.  One wants to return to
the radio room and see what is happening there as the operator
desperately tries to find help.  Instead we follow a fictional Cal
hatching nefarious plots at Jack's expense.  It is class warfare at its
most obvious.  This is one time when truth would be a lot more
interesting than fiction.
     Frightfully underutilized is Kathy Bates as the unsinkable and
likably straightforward Molly Brown.  Also misused is David Warner as
Cal's one-dimensional thug and bodyguard.  And why bother casting Eric
Braeden/Hans Gudegast as John Jacob Astor if you do not intend to use
him?
     What we do see of the ship's problems, and in so long a film that
is still quite a bit, is enough to make this the most visually
impressive rendition of the sinking, at least in other ways.  We might
expect that from a film produced by both Paramount and Fox, costing
$200,000,000--making it the most expensive American film ever, perhaps
beaten only by the Russian version of WAR AND PEACE.  (The original
ship itself cost about $7,500,000, incidentally.)  Camera shots flying
us the length of the ship are jaw-droppers even if they do have the
feel of digital images.  Seeing dramatized the contortions of the ship
as it breaks up is new to cinema and pretty scary.
     TITANIC does make the mistake that every version of the sinking
makes, something that could be called "angular continuity."  Until it
breaks up at the very end, the Titanic was a rigid ship.  This means
that if one stateroom is tipped at a 27-degree angle, at the same
instant of time every room, every deck, every walkway is also tipped at
a 27-degree angle.  During the sinking every scene should show a room
tipped at just a bit more of an angle than the previous scene.  No film
version has ever paid close enough attention to angular continuity.  It
means, for one thing, that before shooting one has to know exactly the
order of the shots and that order cannot be rearranged in the editing
(well, perhaps only minimally).  The angle of tipping varies wildly
from scene to scene.  A room will be shown tipped at a high angle, but
in the next scene dishes will fall off shelves that should have fallen
considerably earlier.
     TITANIC is a lot of movie for the same priced ticket as anything
else at the multiplex.  This is a big film with a lot to like as well
as a lot to not.  For this budget and with digital technology the story
could have been told with supreme accuracy and been a much more
compelling film at the same time.  Overall I give it a 6 on the 0 to 10
scale and a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for My Left Foot (1989)
          Capsule review:  Upbeat but not saccharine tale of
     Christy Brown.  Paralyzed with cerebral palsy so that he has
     control only over one foot, he becomes  an artist and an
     author.  The film perhaps over-emphasizes his romantic life
     over other aspects that could be more interesting, but it is
     a superb performance.  Rating: +2.
     Christy Brown was born with cerebral palsy to a poor Dublin family.
Paralyzed so that he has control only over one foot, he used that foot to
write and paint, distinguishing himself in both until his death in 1981.
This is his story from birth to his late thirties, told as a series of
flashbacks as he thinks about his life one afternoon.  This is not just his
biography, but also a portrait of living conditions for the poor in Dublin
in the 1930s and 1940s.  We see not just his life but also his times.  His
father was a heavy drinker and a bully.  Some of the early scenes of Brown
as a child trapped in this household and in a body he cannot operate have a
nightmarish quality most fictional horror films cannot approach.  We cower
with a terrified Christy when his father goes on drunken rampages.  People
call him an idiot to his face and he has no way to respond or prove them
wrong.  We struggle with Christy the first time he tries to communicate,
scratching on the floor with a piece of chalk between his toes, answering an
arithmetic problem that his father had missed a few minutes before.  Like
many people with communications disabilities, he is assumed to be profoundly
retarded when in fact he has a very quick mind.
     This sort of film could easily have become sentimental inspirational
muck.  In fact, it has more of the feel of Daniel Keyes's FLOWERS FOR
ALGERNON.  As Christy raises himself, his world perspective changes.  At
times he is not very likable and often he is manipulative.  Where the story
falls short of FLOWERS FOR ALGERNON is that it lacks the drama of the fall
or that book's awe at intellectual achievement.  And like the aborted stage
version of FLOWERS FOR ALGERNON, the peak of Christy Brown's achievement is
that he "gets the girl," nothing more profound.  In spite of the film's
apparent emphasis on the importance of Christy's love life, it is one of the
better portraits of the life of the handicapped on film.
     Daniel Day Lewis is good as the adult Christy, as has been noted by
other reviewers.  I have seen little credit given, however, to what I
consider even better performances by Ray McAnally as Christy's swaggering,
ruffian father and especially by Hugh O'Conor as the young Christy.  At age
13, O'Conor turns in the best performance in a well-acted film.  The
screenplay was written by Shane Cunningham and the director, Jim Sheridan.
My rating is a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for True Believer (1989)
          Capsule review:  James Woods is great at playing
     characters who are just a little slimy and self-serving.  As
     a not-very-choosy civil liberties lawyer he finds for once he
     wants to believe his client is innocent.  James Woods' usual
     realistic performance matched with a plot as complex as an
     Agatha Christie make TRUE BELIEVER one of Woods' better
     films.  Rating: low +2.
     James Woods is one of those actors like Harry Dean Stanton and Richard
Farnsworth who have been around for a long time as character actors and who
have built up a small following.  He will probably never see his name in big
letters over Times Square, but when he shows up in a coming attraction, a
lot of people, myself included, make a careful mental note of the film's
title.  Woods, with a pock-marked face and a voice that is just this side of
being actually gravelly, generally plays slimeballs very effectively.  For
me the films that come to mind when I think of Woods are VIDEODROME,
SALVADORE, and ONCE UPON A TIME IN AMERICA.  It is not that he is in such
good films: TRUE BELIEVER is in third crime film in a row, the other being
BEST SELLER and COP, neither bad but neither very good either.  By a wide
margin TRUE BELIEVER is the best of the three and may well have the best
script of any of his films.
     Eddie Dodd (played by Woods with a ponytail) made a reputation for
himself in the 1960s as a great civil liberties lawyer.  He tells himself he
is in the same civil liberties fight today, but his clients are almost
exclusively drug dealers entrapped by the police and deep down it bothers
him that while fighting for a constitutional principle he is also freeing a
lot of guilty clients.  Then he is shaken from this routine by a new
assistant (played by Robert Downey, Jr.) and a case defending a Korean who
was convicted eight years earlier of a Chinatown gang killing and is now
accused of a second killing in prison.  Dodd decides to see if he can
overturn the original conviction.  In spite of Shu Kai Kim's lack of
cooperation, Woods wants desperately to believe Kim was innocent of the
original killing.  So begins a complicated investigation involving neo-
Nazis, drug dealers, and possible police corruption.
     TRUE BELIEVER has a puzzle of a plot with clues slipped to the viewer
at unexpected moments.  But like an Agatha Christie, everything makes sense
by the end of the film.  The byplay between Dodd and his new assistant is
often witty and often angry, but unlike so many other crime films, it never
seems artificial or set up.  Director Joseph Ruben, who previously directed
DREAMSCAPE and THE STEPFATHER, needs good actors and a good script.  Woods
is a good actor but he also needs a good script.  Wesley Strick gave them a
good script and they made a good, solid crime mystery.  I rate it a low +2
on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Cookie's Fortune (1999)
     The South is frequently represented negatively in film and
television, particularly since the civil rights movement of the 1960s.
While few even from the South would claim that reputation is entirely
unearned, like anywhere else there is good and bad in that part of the
country.  Most frequently, "Mayberry, RFD" notwithstanding, the views
of the southeastern part of the country have been the unpleasant images
one sees in NORMA RAE and IN THE HEAT OF THE NIGHT. Some of the
negative stereotypes met and were defeated by a more positive and even
sentimental view in MY COUSIN VINNEY.  MIDNIGHT IN THE GARDEN OF GOOD
AND EVIL took things a step further and actually portrayed the fancy
section of Savannah as having dignity, charm, and appealing people.
COOKIE'S FORTUNE goes even another step to spread the charm to the
middle and lower middle class.  Holly Spring, Mississippi, the setting
of Robert Altman's new film, seems to have only one unpleasant person.
These people are just a pleasure to watch.  In fact, Altman has finally
mastered a problem that he has had with his films for years.  Altman
makes films in which a lot of individual strands come together in the
final reel.  Too frequently there seems to be no obvious reason for the
audience to follow a strand other than faith that it will become
relevant eventually.  In COOKIE'S FORTUNE his characters are eccentric
and interesting enough, that they would worth watching even if the
strands did not tie together.  This is an amiable film to watch, one
with rich characters and one with frequent chuckles.  We would not feel
cheated even if the various plotlines did not come together.  For that
reason it may be Altman's film best coordinated with his style.  Even
without the important messages of NASHVILLE or THE PLAYER, it may be
Altman's most successful piece of art.
     Holly Spring, Mississippi is one of those sleepy towns where the
sun takes three days to come up and five to go down.  The only thing
that is complex about Holly Spring is the leading family's family tree.
The leading citizen is Cookie, legally known as Jewel Mae Orcutt (hey,
Patricia Neal is still acting).  Cookie has a modest fortune, but her
close companion Willis Richland (a show-stealing Charles Dutton) is
afraid that she might be getting a little *too* eccentric.  One of the
most touching things about this film is the platonic, cross-racial love
that these two have for each other. Then there are Camille Orcutt
(Glenn Close) and her pet human Cora Duvall (Julianne Moore)--sisters,
and nieces to Cookie.  Camille absolutely dominates the dim Cora,
though Cora was married once (hence the different surname) and had one
child, the town's scandal, Emma Duvall (Liv Tyler).  Emma has had a
checkered past and is also the town's leading criminal--flagrantly
disregarding parking laws as she delivers fresh catfish to local
restaurants.  This makes things difficult for her current boyfriend and
lover Jason Brown (Chris O'Donnell), the only young policeman in town.
All the rest of the police seem old enough to be his grandfather.  When
Cookie decides it is time to move on and commits suicide, Camille sees
this as her chance to get her fair share of Cookie's fortune.  She also
wants to avoid the stigma of having a suicide in the family, so tampers
with the crime scene to make the suicide look like a burglary and
murder.
     In the end, the plot of COOKIE'S FORTUNE seems a little contrived.
But at the same time it is beguiling.  In what are generally considered
to be Altman's best films he nevertheless talks down to his audience.
There are frequently laughs in an Altman film, but in THE PLAYER the
laughs are cynical and cold.  Here they are richer and not at all
mean-spirited.  It is the old distinction between laughing with someone
and laughing at him.  For once Altman's message is simply "kick off
your shoes and enjoy people."  That might make this the best and
ironically the most important film he has ever made.  I give it an 8 on
the 0 to 10 scale and a high +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Music Box (1990)
          Capsule review:  One of 1989's better films concerns a
     successful and occasionally unscrupulous lawyer defending her
     own father against a charge that he collaborated with Nazis
     and committed war crimes in the Hungarian police during World
     War II.  What made the film powerful was not the question of
     guilt or innocence but the family relationships under stress.
     Rating: high +2.
     It looks as if most of the distinguished films of 1989 waited until
year end to be released.  In the case of MUSIC BOX it seems to have been
a miscalculation, because the latest from political filmmaker Costa-Gavras
is getting a very lukewarm reception from critics.  And that is
understandable, since the story is predictable.  Nonetheless, I found myself
liking the film.  In spite of the fact that I knew what was going to happen,
I was anxious to see how it was going to happen and how the main characters
would react when it did.
     Jessica Lange plays successful lawyer Ann Talbot.  She is brought up
short, however, when extradition proceedings are brought against her father
for Holocaust atrocities and he insists on having his own daughter defend
him at the hearing.  Her job is made all the more difficult by the opposing
counsel's apparent over-anxiousness to make an effective case against her
father.  But what is most disturbing is that as she learns more and more of
the sadistic war crimes committed by the man her father is accused of being,
she is better able to visualize her father as being the man described.  She
notices circumstantial similarities.  She eventually has to decide if she
really wants to fight to save her father.
     Costa-Gavras, of course, always has a political message in his films,
usually at least a bit left of center.  In this case, much of the political
message centers around Talbot's father-in-law, who helped find sanctuary for
Nazis after the war in an attempt to use them against Communist governments.
     The music was provided by Philippe Sarde and, being made up mostly of
Hungarian violin music, adds a touch of Eastern European atmosphere to the
film.  This will not be considered one of the best Costa-Gavras films but I
have to say I found it worthwhile.  I give it a high +2 on the -4 to +4
scale.
     [The next paragraph will contain spoilers.]
     I find what I liked about the film was not the suspense of whether
Talbot's father was guilty.  There was never any doubt in my mind that he
was guilty.  (Well, not much anyway.)  I knew that eventually Talbot was
going to have to see her father for what he was.  When she did she was going
to have to make a choice between decency and family loyalty.  It was that
conflict that I was looking for and I wanted to see how Talbot would react.
Lange plays that conflict very well.  In a sense, this story is an expansion
of the relationship of Adam Kelno and his son in QB VII.

Title
Review for Billy Bathgate (1991)
     "Organized" crime was not so organized in the 1920s and early 1930s.
Individual gangs built on bootlegging, prostitution, gambling, or other
rackets fought each other for turf.  Meyer Lansky forged a single government
over the major gangs to organize them and to minimize inter-gang warfare.
The birth of this syndicate was the death of the last wild gangster.  And it
was not the FBI or the police who killed him; it is generally assumed to
have been fellow gangsters terrified because this loose cannon had just
effectively declared war on the United States government.  In his fiery
temper, Dutch Schultz had announced that he was going to kill government
prosecutor Thomas E. Dewey.  The new syndicate was trying to bring order.
The last thing it wanted was a war with the United States government
packaged and delivered by the likes of Dutch Schultz.  So Schultz died and
true organized crime was born.  E. L. Doctorow's novel BILLY BATHGATE tells
the story of a  young Irish-American rising in Schultz's organization at the
same time Schultz's star started descending.  Tom Stoppard wrote the
screenplay for a film adaptation directed by Robert Benton.
     The structure of BILLY BATHGATE's plot parallels that of GOODFELLAS.
The story begins with one horrendous crime, flashes back to how things got
to this state, and then continues from there into the future.  Billy (played
by Loren Dean) is on hand to see Schultz (played by Dustin Hoffman)
murdering Bo Weinberg (played by Bruce Willis).  It is a long ritual
involving a tugboat, a tub of cement, and Drew Preston (play by Nicole
Kidman), who is Bo's unreliable girlfriend.  From there we return to how a
teenage Billy, awestruck at Schultz's power and wealth, first accidentally
impresses Schultz, then intentionally does it, then connives his way into
Schultz's organization.  Bathgate begins as mascot and errand boy to the
Schultz organization and uses his new-found wealth to impress his girlfriend
and his mother, the latter drained from a sweatshop job that pays in a week
what Billy spends on one lunch.
     There are problems with the script that might also be virtues.  This is
not a rock 'em, sock 'em, UNTOUCHABLES sort of film.  There are scenes with
action, but there are not many.  There is little to race your pulse.  There
is not even much dramatic tension.  The film is more concerned with
questions such as whether Schultz really is exceptional or whether he is
just an ordinary man.  There is a little bit of inter-gang rivalry, a bit of
Billy's risking his life from or for his boss.  But Billy's scams are small
and short.  Like RAGTIME, this is not an adventure film; it is an
opportunity to put the viewer in a well-realized historical setting so that
the viewer can appreciate the situation.  In some cases advancing Billy's
story frustratingly takes us away from Schultz's story.  There is also a
little sex in Billy's story, giving us some visual candy to appease us that
we are not seeing Schultz's story.
     One problem with the dramatic tension is that Hoffman does not do angry
and psychotic very well.  Sometimes putting someone mild in a vicious role
works extremely well.  A case in point might be Alan Arkin in WAIT UNTIL
DARK.  However, the decision to have the driving power of a film to be the
force of Dustin Hoffman's anger is questionable.
     "Sorry, Mr. Hoffman, we're looking for someone meaner."
     "We're looking for someone angrier."
     Hoffman kicks the casting director in the bedoobees.
     Henry Fonda also was convincing in nice-guy roles but had problems with
heavies.  Hoffman is not terrible in the role, but he is only okay and much
more could have been hope for.
     Next we come to the question of historical accuracy.  Here, too, the
film is flawed, but not terribly.  There were some points that were indeed
quite accurate.  Arthur Flegenheimer did indeed borrow the name Dutch
Schultz from another hood.  And he was indeed very even-tempered until it
came to the question of money.  If Schultz thought you were cheating him out
of even small money, your life was not worth much.  "Legs" Diamond and
Vincent "Mad Dog" Coll each died from Schultz's rages over money and they
were by no means alone.  But the film did not go far enough.  It showed
Dutch Schultz as a fancy dresser.  Schultz was too much of a skinflint ever
to dress nicely.  Lucky Luciano said, "Dutch was the cheapest guy I ever
knew.  The guy had a couple of million bucks and he dressed like a pig."
The film shows Bo Weinberg being an independent hood murdered before the
upstate New York trial.  In actual fact, Weinberg worked for Schultz.  He
had little faith that Schultz would win the upstate New York trial and let
Luciano move in on Schultz's rackets while Schultz was pretending to be a
good citizen for the trial.  Another inaccuracy is in the spoiler section
following this review.
     As a minor aside, incidentally, we see a little of Stephen Hill playing
Otto Berman--known as Abbadabba Berman.  He was a mathematician who worked
out a method to increase the numbers racket take by 10%.  He would find out
what numbers had been least played.  From there he figured how much he had
to bet in racetrack pari-mutuel machines to make the low-played numbers come
up winners.  That part was perfectly legal.  The pari-mutuel machine bets
would lose, but the right numbers would come up and Schultz would pay out
less.  The "Abbadabba" nickname was a magic word (corrupted from
"Abracadabra"?) indicating that Berman was the magician of the numbers
racket.
     Overall this is not a perfect portrait of Dutch Schultz and the people
around him, and it could use a bit more action, but it is watchable and
enjoyable.  My rating is a low +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.
    *****SPOILER**********SPOILER**********SPOILER**********SPOILER*****
     The attack on the Palace Chop House could have been better researched.
Charlie "The Bug" Workman (I'm not making this up!) did the hit.  To make
sure he was not surprised by someone coming out of the restroom, he went
there first and shot the heavy-set man washing his hands.  He then burst out
of the john with a .38 in each hand and gunned down the three men at
Schultz's table.  Bug then realized the man in the john was Schultz and went
back in to rifle Schultz's pockets.  This is quite different from the scene
in the film.  Also, Schultz appears dead in the film.  Actually, Schultz
raved for about two days before dying.  I occasionally get mail from people
whose response to having inaccuracies pointed out is "What does it matter?"
That is never an easy question to answer.  In truth, historical accuracy is
its own reward.  It only matters if it matters.  To me it matters.

Title
Review for Thunderheart (1992)
          Capsule review:  Awful cliche-ridden script about a
     murder case on the Oglala Sioux Indian Reservation.  Well-
     intentioned film has a good performance by Graham Greene (of
     DANCES WITH WOLVES), but don't trust the film's portrayal of
     Native American culture and don't expect to see a new plot.
     Rating: -1 (-4 to +4).
     Okay, now we all know the rules; let's go over them one more time.  On
one side we've got good guys, on the other we've got bad guys.  All the cute
people with personality on are the good guys' side.  Bad guys get to be
backed by the United States government.  Good guys get all the women and
children.  Bad guys get all the fancy guns.  Good guys get to fight for
their land, their homes, and principle.  Bad guys are fighting for money and
always get to strike first.  Nice looking woman.  Yeah, she's a good guy all
right.  Heck, bad guys are all men anyway.  She's lived here all her life.
No, wait.  She went away to school but she came back to help her people.
Yeah.  She's a doctor or a teacher or something that's got the right tone.
And she's *very politically committed*.  After all, this is the 1990s.  The
old woman who looks like a Cabbage Patch doll?  She's the doctor's mother.
Now you need someone for the audience to identify with.  He's the star, and
he's an American.  So naturally he comes in sort of on the bad guys' side.
But when he sees how nasty the bad guys are and how cute and good the good
guys are, he slowly changes sides.  He's attracted to the teacher.  Or did
we decide she was a doctor?  Anyway, through learning about the good guys by
being around them and through the magic of sexual tension, our hero slowly
figures out who the good guys are and who the bad guys are.  Now who are the
good guys going to be?  Indians?  No, we did them with BROKEN ARROW.
Vietnamese?  THE UGLY AMERICAN!  Chinese?  THE SAND PEBBLES!  Salvadorans?
UNDER FIRE.  We've done Arabs AND Jews and blacks.  It's been done with the
Irish, but then it was the British government supplying the bullets.  Maybe
it's time for Indians again.
     Oh, heck, I know director Michael Apted's heart was in the right place,
but John Fusco's script was just awful.  Twenty-five years ago this would
have been a good script but it has been used, with variations, just too
often.  And the Indians who have been handed so many injustices deserve a
better story.  The motive for the murder that brings FBI man Ray Lavo
(played by Val Kilmer) to the Oglala Sioux reservation is also one that has
been used too many times.  And for one more cheap shot, the film leaves
ambiguous if Indian magic might be working.  I thought that went out with
BILLY JACK.  Native Americans don't have any magic any more than anyone else
does.  I wish they did.  Maybe if they did, they could use it to get some
justice.  But Apted uses trick photography and staged scenes to imply you
really can see ghost dancers who disappear in a flash or to imply that a man
might have turned himself into a deer.  Indians are not great magical people
who live half in a spirit world.  They are just a group of ethnic peoples
who have been cheated and exploited and who desperately need a little bit of
justice.  Throwing them a bone by implying that their magic really breaks
the laws of physics is just not what they need.  If enough people confuse
compassion for American Indians with liking this film, Tri-Star Pictures
could make a bundle of money, almost none of which will go to help the
Indians.
     Some note should be made of Graham Greene's performance as a
reservation policeman.  His laconic performance is the most likable thing on
the screen.  And seeing his special Indian detection skills were certainly
of some interest.  Unfortunately, there is not enough of Greene to keep the
film afloat.  And for those who care, yes, there is a car chase to liven
things up.  I think that it is typical of Americans that after this whole
plot is so thoroughly worn out, they give it to the Indians.  I give
THUNDERHEART a -1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Carrington (1995)
     This is the true story of a woman who made all her own choices.
She chose to love a man who (in addition to being much older and a bit
repulsive) was gay and could not give her a sexual relationship.  She
chose her lovers, ruining their lives.  Yet she still ended unhappy
because a gay man could not love her back the way she wanted.  It seems
to be the point of view of the film that we should feel very sorry for
Dora Carrington.  But you know, life is tough.  In spite of the best
efforts of the filmmaker to make Carrington a sympathetic character
there is roughly 98% of humanity more deserving of sympathy.  And the
tears that some audience members shed for her could have been much
better spent.
     Dora Carrington (played by Emma Thompson) is a young but very
promising art student when she first meets Lytton Strachey (Jonathan
Pryce).  Strachey is a most disagreeable and self-centered man.  For
reasons never really shown in the film Carrington falls in love with
him.  Their relationship is mostly platonic since Strachey is gay and
not interested in sex with her.  However at this point in life
Carrington is not interested in sex at all, so his orientation is nota
problem.  That will change.  It is to be presumed that their
relationship is on a higher and more intellectual plane, though
writer/director Christopher Hampton does painfully little to us show
this.  Later when Carrington decides that she does like sex after all,
she takes a husband to whom both she and Strachey are attracted and
apparently tries to make up for lost time.  Even more fascinated by sex
as she gets older, Carrington takes multiple lovers including her
husband's best friend.  She apparently has the looks to attract men and
is little fettered by contemporary (1930s) morality or even decency.
     In all this time we see little of Carrington's supposed intellect.
Hampton shows us far more of her body than we see of her mind.  Her
talent for painting seems to be channeled mostly into home decoration.
Her attraction to Strachey is never explained since he seems to have
the sex appeal of an old book consumed by mildew.  His conversations
are more cutting than clever.  Through the middle of the film nearly
every scene seems to concern in some way the sex lives of the
characters.
     Much of CARRINGTON seem well photographed, though at times there
are disturbing and obvious shifts in filters giving some scenes a
disagreeable yellow tint.  The directing and acting are quite up to
what you would expect for the prestige production this was intended to
be.  Jonathan Pryce gives an appealing portrait of a most unappealing
character.  Emma Thompson never gives a bad performance, but did not
noticeably show us anything new in her acting besides a willingness to
take her clothes off.  She shows us too much of the flesh of Dora
Carrington and not enough of the person.
     I saw this film at the Edinburgh Film Festival.  It had already
won a Special Jury Prize and a Best Actor Award to Pryce at Cannes.  I
had high expectations and I certainly expected better than what was
basically a Harold Robbins sort of sex story, only set in the first
third of the century and made with high production values.  I cannot
rate this higher than a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Runestone, The (1990)
     By this point there is little original that can be done with the stale
plot that some myth about a fabled monster has a basis of truth and the
beastie is loose in a modern city.  And, of course, nobody believes that the
myth can be true.  It was even a weekly television series, KOLCHAK: THE
NIGHT STALKER.  THE RUNESTONE does just about the best that can be done.
First, it uses a genuine myth and, at the same time, not a myth that has
been over-used.  In Norse mythology the world end sin a battle between Aesir
and the powers of Hel, led by Loki.  One of Loki's children was the monster
wolf Fenrir.  It was really Fenrir and his wolf-cub children who bring about
Ragnarok, the great icy apocalypse of the world--icy because one of the
wolf-children stole the sun.  It is Fenrir who killed and devoured Odin.
Previously Tyr once allowed the gods to capture Fenrir, but at the cost of
his right hand--bitten off by the great wold.  Just what all this has to do
with modern-day New York is rather neatly set up in the plot of THE
RUNESTONE.
     Willard Carroll directed and wrote the screenplay based on a novella by
Mark E. Rogers.  The writing is actually very crisp and witty without
lowering itself to self-satire or camp.  These are several throwaway jokes,
some actually quite funny., but the main plotline is still taken seriously.
Because the script is so well-executed, the producers were able to attract a
surprisingly good cast.  Top-billed, though not quite the main character, is
Peter Riegert of OSCAR and CROSSING DELANCEY, playing Gregory Fanducci, a
likable sarcastic Italian policeman with a taste for Pez candy.  William
Hickey, who played the aging godfather in PRIZZI'S HONOR, has a decent-sized
role as an eccentric expert in Norse mythology who tries to straddle the old
gods' world and the modern world.  Alexander Godunov plays a clockmaker with
mystical ties to the old world.  And at the center of all the activity is
Joan Severance, playing young artist Marla Stewart.
     I do not know if this film has had a theatrical release.  After seeing
a positive review I rented it on tape.  Like last year's WARLOCK, this is
not a great film, but it is certainly a fun film.  Great for a Friday night
watch after a hard week.  I give it a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Nosferatu: Phantom der Nacht (1979)
[This review originally appeared in 1979.  It is included here as counterpoint
to Thomas Billings's review. -Moderator]
     To paraphrase JACOBOVSKY AND THE COLONEL, Werner Herzog's new film,
NOSFERATU, is one of the truly great films of the silent era.  While the
film is a color film--just barely--and a sound film--just barely--it comes
off as if Herzog had contritely decided to subject himself to the
limitations and constraints of the pre-sound classics.  The entire film is
shot through a heavy blue filter, leaving the photography with a bloodless,
lifeless feel.  It also makes minimal use of dialogue, seemingly so as not
to take unfair advantage over the original silent NOSFERATU.  It does,
however, repeat many of the same scenes with camera angle and acting style
intact.
     The dialogue--and there is not much more of it than one would find in a
silent film--is mostly delivered in a monotone and often seems
inappropriately pseudo-metaphysical.  A prematurely bloodless Lucy is prone
to spontaneously give forth lines like, "Dr. Van Helsing, is it possible we
are all insane and one day we will awake in strait-jackets?" or, "I fear an
inner, nameless, deadly dear."  Dracula, too, has his share of quotable bon
mots such as, "Time is an abyss, profound as a thousand nights."  The
photography is much in the style of the silent film, with fifteen-second
shots of characters devoid of motion or emotion.  These shots do provide
considerable time to contemplate Klaus Kinski's vampire make-up, which looks
like something between the original Schreck vampire and Milton Berle.  The
only acting that involves the audience in any way but cerebrally is that of
the constantly chuckling Renfield and that of a reluctant city official
official who has a curious scene toward the end of the film reminiscent of
MONTY PYTHON AND THE HOLY GRAIL.
     Even though this film is indirectly based on DRACULA and has some
excellent photography, combining some of the style of German Expressionism
and some of THE SEVENTH SEAL, I cannot see the film having a wide general
appeal in the United States.  It will go down well with the art film crowd
and the rest of the viewing public will probably avoid it.

Title
Review for Quick Change (1990)
          Capsule review:  The clever heist story fades into a
     Murphy's Law sort of getaway.  Three thieves find out just
     how unfriendly New York City can be.  There are several
     well-defined characters created, but unfortunately the three
     main characters are not them.  Rating: +1.
     There are really two stories to QUICK CHANGE.  The first story is about
twenty minutes long and is the story of "The Bank Robbery."  The second
story is the story of "The Getaway."  The idea behind the robbery is clever.
It is done in a way that has not been done in heist films before it.  I
figured the gimmick out in advance, but I am told that puts me in a
minority.  Word-of-mouth indicates that many viewers are taken by surprise
by the gimmick of the robbery.  The Getaway is also well done but in a very
different vein.  All the clockwork planning falls apart as three partners in
crime try to get from a New York bank to JFK airport.  Here no new ground is
broken.  Several films have been made about what a hostile and frustrating
place New York City is.  Notable examples are THE OUT-OF-TOWNERS and AFTER
HOURS.  QUICK CHANGE is slightly lower key and more believable than those
films, but it too is a compendium of the irritating frustrations and rude
people in New York City, woven together by a connecting story.  The attempts
to get to the airport become more frantic as more and more obstacles fall
into the intrepid gang's way.
     Bill Murray co-produced, co-directed, and co-starred.  Howard Franklin
co-directed as well as wrote the screenplay based on a book by Jay Cronley.
Murray plays the absurdly laid-back Grimm.  Murray sacrifices much of the
absurd gamut of frustrations by maintaining an even keel throughout.  As a
counterpoint, Randy Quaid plays Loomis, who constantly walks the narrow line
between panic and hysteria.  Of the three thieves, the only character who
has any depth is Geena Davis's Phyllis, who is re-evaluating her future
while they fights their way to the airport, pursued by the slightly too
intuitive Chief Rotzinger (played by Jason Robards, Jr.).
     QUICK CHANGE does have a few belly laughs, but it is not trying
constantly to be uproarious as so many current comedies are.  More often it
contents itself with being whimsical and sly.  This approach would normally
require a much better definition of the three main characters than  Franklin
was able to provide, but ironically it is not the main characters he
develops.  Instead he develops the minor characters and then lets them
upstage the stars, We better understand a bank guard (played by Bob Elliot
of the Bob and Ray team) than we do either if the two male leads.  The
audience has less sympathy and interest invested in them than in a cabbie
who speaks and understands no recognizable language.  An officious bus
driver (played by Philip Bosco) is as well developed as Randy Quaid's
character with far less screen time.  By blurring the foreground characters
and focusing on the background, New York City becomes the real main
character of the film until the script falters near the end and Murray once
again reclaims the audience's attention.  I rate the film a +1 on the -4 to
+4 scale.

Title
Review for Big Night (1996)
     Every once in a while a particular performance grabs my attention
and I begin to watch for the actor gave it. Perhaps the best thing
about PRELUDE TO A KISS was the comic acting of Stanley Tucci.  I saw
him several times after that and always liked his performances.  But he
always seemed to have small parts; generally he plays thugs and
henchmen, at least in the films I have seen.  Apparently to actually
star in a film he had to co-write the script, co-produce the film, and
then co-direct it.  But it is worth it to see much more of his acting.
     Tucci plays Secondo, an immigrant from Italy trying to run the
aptly-named Paradise, an Italian restaurant somewhere on the New Jersey
shore in the late 1950s.  Secondo manages the tiny restaurant while his
older brother Primo (Tony Shalhoub) does the cooking.  And what cooking
he does!  Primo is an artist who believes that "to eat good food is to
be close to God."  Eventually we see some of what Primo can do.  Like
BABETTE'S FEAST and  LIKE WATER FOR CHOCOLATE, this is definitely not a
film to see when you are hungry.  Among other things this film is a
paean to great Italian cooking.  The problem is that the customers are
expecting spaghetti and meatballs.  Every dish must have a spaghetti
side dish and most must be buried under cheese.  New Jersey is just not
ready for great authentic Italian cooking in the late 1950s. The
customers just don't get it.  Making things even harder is just down
the street is the fabulously successful Pascal's Italian Grotto.
Pascal (Ian Holm) makes an art of living, not of cooking.  His
philosophies are "bite life in the ass" and "give the people what they
want, then later you can give them what you want."  That "later" may
never come, but in the meantime he is making a fortune selling steaks
and spaghetti with meatballs.  To help the failing brothers he arranges
that the famous singer Louie Prima (playing himself) will come to the
restaurant to eat and thereby endorse the establishment.  The brothers
have one night to demonstrate the best in Italian cuisine for Prima and
some invited friends.  Secondo has to balance the preparations for
dinner with his diffident relationship with his woman friend Phyllis
(Minnie Driver) and his mistress (Isabella Rossellini).
     This is probably Stanley Tucci's favorite role, since he did,
after all, write it for himself.  However his acting is just a little
more reserved than is some other films. Complete with Italian accent he
is certainly believable in the role, but I still prefer some of his
humorous touches in PRELUDE TO A KISS. He is looking for more
authenticity in this part than in some of his others, apparently.  He
seems a little too unflappable as Secondo and the film foregoes some
comic possibilities as a result.  On the other hand Tony Shalhoub is
just a bit over-the-top as Primo boisterously rebuking a boorish
customer or accusing Pascal of "culinary rape."  Even more exaggerated
is Ian Holm's wild and crazy Pascal, literally biting people on the ass
as part of his life-loving routine.  Tucci co-directs with Campbell
Scott (of LONGTIME COMPANION, DEAD AGAIN, and MRS. PARKER AND THE
VICIOUS CIRCLE).
     A well-made period piece is always a pleasure to watch, though
Tucci does not flood us with late-50s detail. Occasionally we notice a
price has been changed, a car has fins, or a pair of glasses has the
same distinctive fin-styling.  The feast itself is complete with titles
for each of the courses and includes some authentic Italian dishes that
are unfamiliar even today.  The photography of food preparation and of
the final product is at times gorgeous, but not all the film is as
well-paced as it might be.  At times the plot just stops dead while the
camera watches somebody prepare food.  In the end there are still many
loose ends intentionally not tied up.  But then not everything in life
is tied up at the end of a day.  BIG NIGHT will leave some audience
members feeling that there should be more to the story, while others
will be happy it is over so that they can proceed to dinner.  I give
BIG NIGHT a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Hai shang hua (1998)
  FLOWERS OF SHANGHAI (Taiwan/Japanese, in Chinese with subtitles)
         A review by Mark R. Leeper in bullet-list form
           from the Toronto Internation Film Festival
     CAPSULE: Static and dull story set in Shanghai brothels of the
1880s.  The camerawork of this film is minimal and we basically have a
stage play in which almost all of the action is offstage.  Nice
historic recreations of room decor cannot make this film interesting to
audiences.  Rating:  3 (0 to 10) -1  (-4 to +4)
   - Directed by Hou Hsiao-Hsien.
   - 124 minutes, but seems a lot longer.
   - Film constructed of long sequences set in beautifully appointed
     rooms.  Long pauses between dialog.  Camera just shifts to the
     character speaking so whole scene appears shot in one take.
   - 1880s Shanghai brothels.  Character names like Crimson and Jade.
     To Western eyes may be hard to tell major characters apart.
   - Music sounds like done on one-string instrument.  Very downbeat.
   - Early scenes in heavy sepia tone though later ones seem to use
     more natural colors.
   - Characters seem to be forever eating, drinking tea, smoking, and
     gossiping.
   - Every scene ends in slow fade to black.
   - Only two scenes have any action beyond talk.
   - Very much like a stage play.
   - Some sort of numbers game repeatedly played over banquets, but not
     clear what the rules are.  It looks something like our Evens and
     Odds.
   - Women seem to be involved with little but jealousy, hatred, and
     greed.
   - Style reminiscent of Fassbinder's EFFIE BRIEST.
   - Shown in a large theater, but many people walking out.
   - Better knowledge of Chinese culture might have helped.

Title
Review for Cronos (1993)

Title
Review for Hollywood Shuffle (1987)
          Capsule review:  TV situation comedy punctuated with
     hilarious skits.  Robert Townsend produced, directed, and
     starred in this comedy about the lack of roles for black
     actors in Hollywood.  The story could have been better but
     the humor of the skits was right on target.
     What should I tell you about HOLLYWOOD SHUFFLE?  I saw it with an
audience that loved it.  Three people I was with were darn insulting to me
because I did not love it too.  Should I say positive things to tell you
what was good about it or say negative things to tell you why it wasn't
great?  Some of both, I suspect.
     Bobby Taylor (played by Robert Townsend, who also produced and
directed) is a talented black actor doing what a lot of talented black
actors do.  He's working at a fast-food restaurant and desperately trying to
find an acting job.  There are few actings jobs for blacks at all and they
are all as street pimps, muggers, servants, or slaves.  Not that Bobby
wouldn't love to get one of these roles, but deep down he wants to play
great dramatic roles, like starring in ripoffs of RAMBO and INDIANA JONES.
As Bobby goes through the frustrating life of an aspiring black actor, he
imagines skits relevant to his situation.
     The film is structured perhaps not so much as a story but as a set of
skits with a connecting story.  The skits, while not always entirely
original, are funny.  They are very funny.  One is as ad for the "Black
Actors School" that is great.  And another, a take-off of review programs,
is magnificent.  The problems with the film are all with the connecting
story.  I am not saying it is actively bad.  It just is not particularly
good.  yes, it makes a serious point--that there are few good Hollywood
roles for black actors--and further, it suggests that black actors should
refuse to take the stereotyped roles that have traditionally been given to
blacks.  But the story is just not done on a very high level.  There is too
little time left after the skits to do a story of any more depth than an
episode of THE JEFFERSONS.  What's left is manipulative and sentimental.
Talk about stereotypes: there is Bobby's sweet but cantankerous grandmother
and his adorable little brother.  Without the skits the story might be good
enough to play on TV, on ABC, maybe.  With the skits, the film is quite
worth seeing.  Rate it a +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Mona Lisa (1986)
[This review was written last year.  MONA LISA was recently released on
videocassette, and since it had only a limited theatrical release, I thought
it might be worth pointing out.  People are encouraged to send me more reviews
of lesser-known films when they come out on videocassette.  -ecl]
     It has been observed that there are many foreign language films that could
do much better at the boxoffice if they were done in English.  I think a prime
example must be MONA LISA.  The film MONA LISA is done in British Cockney
without benefit of dubbing or subtitles.  Now I don't speak any Cockney but
many words are cognates and I can understand enough that I can usually pick up
the gist of what is being said.  With this linguistic skill, I found MONA LISA
to be one of the best films of the summer [of 1986] (second only to A GREAT
WALL).
     To start with, I am a Bob Hoskins fan from THE LONG GOOD FRIDAY and PBS's
showing of the British FLILCKERS series, and to a lesser extent from THE COTTON
CLUB.  MONA LISA has the feisty Cockney actor at his best as a small-time hood,
recently released from prison, who gets a part-time job chauffeuring a
prostitute, Simone.  She enlists his help to find another prostitute who is
missing.  the hood, who thought of himself as a bad man before, gets a quick
education in the world of prostitution and for once finds himself morally
outraged.  The plot that ensues is worthy of a Dashiell Hammett novel.  People
play dirty and rough.  And the background has an air of authenticity that
Hammett often lacked.
     Neil Jordan, who co-wrote the script as well as directed the film, has a
good feel for the characters he has created.  Hoskins's character is very real,
yet funny enough in ways the character intends and does not intend, that he is
a real joy to watch.  Cathy Tyson, as Simone, really has the mystery that the
title implies.  This a A GREAT WALL are the must-see films of the summer [of
1986].  Give it a +3 on the -4 to +4 scale.  And if you need an interpreter
for the Cockney, maybe I'm available.  I wouldn't mind seeing the film again.

Title
Review for Go Fish (1994)
          Capsule review:  This halting and spotty first
     production for director Rose Troche is the story of two
     very dissimilar lesbians who finally fall in love after
     much effort by friends.  The portrait of a lesbian
     subculture is not always flattering and often not even
     very interesting, but there are moments of clever wit.
     Rating: 0 (-4 to +4).
     GO FISH is the long, slow story of the meeting, slow romance, and
eventually getting together of two lesbians.  One is the attractive and
energetic Max (played by Guinevere Turner); the other is the more
introspective and almost masculine Ely (V. S. Brodie).  They seem
mismatched in looks, in tastes, and in temperaments.  But their friends
are determined to bring them together.
     Along the way we get a look at their lives and the lives of their
circle of friends in the lesbian sub-culture.  Superficially the women
in this small circle are witty and affable, in some ways like the menin
LONGTIME COMPANION.  But as time wears on they appear to have less and
less in their lives beyond tracking who in their group is sleeping with
whom.  The lesbians are shown to be aimless and self-absorbed and
fixated on the sex-lives of themselves and their friends.  Just
occasionally there is an on-target piece of sly if self-deprecating wit,
like a minutes-long conversation on what is just the perfect anatomical
euphemism to replace "honey-pot."  This neuron-numbing conversation is
both exasperating and funny, much like some of the writing in THIS IS
SPINAL TAP or FEAR OF A BLACK HAT.  Another pointed sequence shows the
women who daily had been the objects of bigotry bringing the same
bigotry to bear on one of their numbers who had experimented with
bisexuality.  With similar intolerance, Max's first reaction to Ely is
insulting rejection simply because Ely is unattractive.
     Perhaps part of the inspiration for this film was SHE'S GOTTA HAVE
IT, though Rose Troche simply does not move the plot along and does not
engage the viewer nearly as well as Spike Lee does.  This is a first
film for director Troche who co-produced, co-authored with actress
Turner.  In many ways the unevenness of the production betrays Troche's
inexperience.  The cinematography is crude and in black and white to
save costs.  Acting is very often at the high-school play level.  The
film is salted with odd visual images, apparently symbolic but usually
obscure or perhaps meaningless.  A device that is perhaps over-used to
give us the thought of the characters is to have them lie on the floor
head-to-head and discuss their innermost thoughts.  It is a crude
device, albeit occasionally useful to the script.  In Spike Lee's first
film he had characters talking directly to the camera as if being
interviewed and he used it for much the same purpose.
     Early in the film, one of the characters complains about "touchy-
feely, soft-focus, sisters-of-the-woodlands" sort of lesbian films and
this is clearly intended to be an alternative.  Whether it is intended
to be as self-critical of the urban lesbian subculture is questionable.
But even at its short length much of this film drags and is in need of a
tuning.  I rate this on a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Christopher Columbus: The Discovery (1992)
     One never quite knows what to expect from the Salkind brothers.  Early
films one associates with the Salkind name include a ponderous adaptation of
Kakfa's TRIAL and a not very engaging adventure, THE LIGHT AT THE END OF THE
WORLD.  The brothers hit pay dirt and made a name for themselves with a
terrific double film adaptation of THE THREE MUSKETEERS.  SUPERMAN was
extremely uneven in style and quality, but it had its moments and was an
audience pleaser.  Its sequels and spin-offs went rapidly downhill and their
image became one of flesh without substance.  Their announcement of a film
about Santa Claus more than enhanced that opinion.  Substance and Santa
Claus just do not go together.  And then they announced CHRISTOPHER COLUMBUS
and it sounded only marginally better.  A film about Captain Cook might be
interesting.  the Burton and Speke expedition had real dramatic
possibilities and the film Bob Rafelson made did realize some of them.  But
Columbus seems like an elementary school hero and too corny to make into a
real hero.  This was a film that everybody knew would not be good and then
on top of that there were no screenings for critics.  This is a sure sign
that the Salkinds expected a poor reception from the critics.  They were
wrong.  This is certainly the best film the Salkinds have done since THE
THREE MUSKETEERS and, while flawed, is getting a generally positive critical
reception.
     While the film rarely rises to the point of excitement (odd, because it
is directed by James Bond director John Glen), the film does offer
historical spectacle and some adventure.  In the late 1480's Colon (yes,
they get his name right in the film even if not in the title) is trying to
convince the Portuguese court that the great Ocean Sea can be crossed by a
mariner, particularly one who knows a secret.  The Portuguese have sent
explorers who do not know Colon's "secret" and they returned in failure.
The theme of the secret is very nicely handled, incidentally.  It is a
little hard for the audience to realize for itself what Colon's secret could
be.  When the secret is actually revealed, it turns out to be something
non-obvious, something that perhaps a few mariners of Colon's day might have
known, and something that certainly could have made the difference between
success and failure.  Of course, Colon (played by George Corraface of THE
MAHABARATA) goes to Spain and in spite of his original inclinations asks a
laid-back Ferdinand (played by Tom Selleck in a bizarre piece of casting)
and pretty perky Isabella (played by Rachel Ward), looking a decade or two
under her 41 years.  (Is this really the same woman who refused to change
her petticoat until her husband drove the Moors from Spain?)
     While much of the story is familiar there is a fascination in seeing
Spain in its most momentous--albeit regrettable--year.  There is some
reference made to the expulsion of Jews, including a moving scene of Jews
leaving Spain at the same time Colon is, though there is little reference to
how much of Colon's crew was Jewish or to the belief at the Spanish court
that Colon was himself a Jew.  Colon is called before Torquemada (played by
Marlon Brando in this film) not on a question of his religion, but rather
Colon's contradiction of the teachings of St. Augustine, who said there are
no lands before the great Ocean Sea and for whom a city was named in
Florida.  Colon proves himself to be a man who knows his audience and what
sort  of argument will work.  When he argues his case to the Church he uses
scripture; when arguing to tough businessmen he uses clever analogies and
the visual aid of a watermelon and a sharp blade.
     Eventually Colon does get to sea in what by rights should have been the
most exciting chapter but which is, in fact, the least original segment.
Ships at sea looking for land, having to avoid sabotage, mutiny, trying to
find wind--all are fairly familiar plot elements of sea films.  There is
even a sequence involving a bet that seems very unlikely to have had any
basis in fact.  Eventually landfall is made--I hope this is not a spoiler.
Then comes a most interesting dilemma in filmmaking:  should the film
portray Colon as a hero or be politically correct and make him a tyrant?
The solution is to make Colon a man of his time--a time that called for
gold, glory, gospel, and slaves as the indicators of success.  Colon's
ambitions are those of a man from the 15th instead of the 20th Century.
     This is a film of great earnestness with humor only in its ironies,
including a very interesting comment by Torquemada toward the end of the
film.  It does generate interest in a very daring expedition that most of us
take for granted.  In spite of some distortion of history, it does give the
viewer some unconventional insights into the great historical event.  Not
great but easily a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Man in the Moon, The (1991)
     It is 1957 in rural Louisiana.  Fourteen-year-old Dani Trant (played by
Reese Witherspoon) is just at the awkward age when she is approaching
womanhood and thinks she has neither looks nor intelligence.  She envies her
older sister Maureen (played by Emily Warfield), who is attractive and gets
good grades.  Then her father's old girlfriend, now a widow, moves in next
door, bringing her own family including a seventeen-year-old son, Court
Foster (played by Jason London).  Court and Dani become good friends.  Their
friendship begins platonically, but Dani gets a crush on Court and is
anxious to push things just a bit further.  All by itself this relationship
causes problems between Dani and her father Matthew (played by Sam
Waterston).  However, more family strains start to show when Court discovers
Maureen, a Trant daughter his own age.
     Robert Mulligan directs this story with all the sensitivity he can
muster.  And sensitivity is certainly what the plot needs, since it is
perilously close to being a trashy Southern passions sort of melodrama.  In
different hands this story could have been  another GOD'S LITTLE ACRE.
However, this is avoided, thanks to good acting on the parts of Reese
Witherspoon and especially Sam Waterston.  As Matthew, Waterston seems
uneasy with the responsibility of fatherhood.  By turns he is authoritarian
or compassionate, but neither with real conviction.
     The most unfortunate aspect of the film is a melodramatic turn toward
the end of the film.  the two sisters are headed for conflict in one way
when the all too obvious hand of the scriptwriter distorts things.  It
leaves the conflict but warps it into a different one, and one that may be
more quickly resolved.  The last twenty minutes of the film are the least
satisfying.
     Photography is by the excellent Freddie Francis, whose credits as
cinematographer include THE INNOCENTS, THE FRENCH LIEUTENANT'S WOMAN, and
GLORY.  Overall the good moments of the film do not quite overcome its
weaknesses.  I give it a low +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Music of Chance, The (1993)
     The rise of feudalism, power of money, and considerably more are the
subject of an odd, allegorical film of two people caught up in a very weird
vortex of circumstance.  This little film has a "Twilight Zone" surrealism,
but definitely keeps the viewer on edge as to what is going to happen next.
THE MUSIC OF CHANCE is a strange film about about two men who virtually
become serfs in modern day Pennsylvania.  Jim Nashe (played by Mandy
Patinkin) picks up on a road a stranger who calls himself Jack Pozzi (played
by James Spader) and is pulled into Pozzi's scheme to win large sums of
money playing poker with two old multi-millionaires named Stone and Flower
(played by Joel Gray and Charles Durning).  Stone and Flower have an immense
fortune built on top of a lottery win and have used it to insulate
themselves from the real world and replace it with a perfectly functioning
model world.  They even have a little dollhouse model of their ideal world
and are recreating it in real life.  Pozzi has played poker with the two old
men before and thinks that they will be easy marks if he takes them up on
their invitation and play them again.  Nashe stakes him to the money he will
need, but things go wrong and Nashe and Pozzi find themselves owing the old
men.  To pay off he debt they must build a wall on the vast estate of Flower
and Stone.  This task is placed under the supervision of a particularly
insensitive functionary played by M. Emmet Walsh.
     There is a lot that is strange but compelling about this story. There
is a hypnotic quality to Flower telling with absolute lack of self-doubt how
they built their fortune and authoritatively philosophizing about the world.
There is almost a supernatural quality about how the two men--dressed
entirely in white--control the world around them, much of it modeled in
miniature in their scale model.  They are reminiscent of the gods on Olympus
in JASON AND THE ARGONAUTS who control the lives of humans, manipulating
them with little models.
     This is a story that has a very literary feel.  It is based on a novel
by Paul Auster and clearly has a very literary sensibility.  In some ways it
is a sort of fantasy akin to the writings of Franz Kafka. Ambiguity and
uncertainty as to what is actually molding the fate of Nashe and Pozzi
abound.  Does the model world affect what is happening to our characters?
Once they are limited to receiving their information from their overseer,
how much of what he tells them can be believed?  Perhaps the only false move
in this compelling story is the very last scene which is a little cliched.
However, THE MUSIC OF CHANCE is a compelling allegory and a genuine pleasure
in its originality.  My rating would be a +2 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Honey, I Shrunk the Kids (1989)
     Of course, one of the staples of the fantasy film has always been
monsters.  Big creatures lumbering around have a certain fascination.  And
one variant on the monster concept is to shrink the main character so it is
the whole world that is monstrous.  DEVIL DOLL was probably not the first
film about shrinking humans, but it is the earliest so well-known.  For the
most part, it did not show us the world from the small human's point of
view.  It was, however, followed by more notable films which used the horror
of being small:  DR. CYCLOPS, THE INCREDIBLE SHRINKING MAN, ATTACK OF THE
PUPPET PEOPLE, the television show "World of Giants" (not to be confused
with "Land of the Giants," which was more in the Gulliver tradition than
really being about shrunken people), FANTASTIC VOYAGE (which introduced
micro-miniaturization), THE INCREDIBLE SHRINKING WOMAN, INNERSPACE, and this
year's entry, HONEY, I SHRUNK THE KIDS.
     Like THE INCREDIBLE SHRINKING WOMAN and INNERSPACE, HONEY is basically
a comedy, though perhaps better because it was not so ambitious.  Rick
Moranis plays Wayne Szalinski, who works in a research lab in his attic for
a major corporation.  He is working on making a laser beam squeeze most of
the space out of atoms so that matter shrinks down.  Through carelessness
and accident the beam is accidentally turned on his two children and the two
children of his neighbor Russ Thompson (played by Matt Frewer, formerly Max
Headroom).  They are swept up with the trash and put down on the far end of
the backyard.  From there the story proceeds on two levels: what is
happening in the parents' world and the adventures of the four victims as
they try to return home.  Director Joe Johnston's story is much better told
and ironically is even more believable when it is about the miniaturization
victims.  On one hand you have a slapstick goofball comedy of the parents
looking for their children; on the other, you have a nice little adventure
film of four people trying to survive and make their way through the grass
jungle of a backyard.
     What is particularly nice about the film is the detail of the giant
backyard.  The scale is roughly 1:240 and by gosh, everything seems very
accurate to that scale.  Stop-motion insects were animated by a team
including David Allen, a disciple of Ray Harryhausen, and they look very
good.  A great deal of attention to detail was used in the big sets.  What
is needed to do the sets correctly is a great deal of craft labor, so
filming in Mexico City's Churubusco Studios were labor is plentiful was a
very intelligent decision.  The sets are surprisingly moody and artistically
done.  In some  scenes the presence of water betrayed the actual size of the
sets, but generally this film's miniature world seemed as believable or more
so than in just about any other miniaturization film.  As a result, HONEY, I
SHRUNK THE KIDS is much better than it seems it has a right to be.  I would
give it a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     I suppose something should be said about "Tummy Trouble," the Roger
Rabbit cartoon accompanying HONEY.  The most common complaint I hear is that
it may well frighten children. Perhaps, and perhaps not.  The simple fact is
that the cartoon is not very well constructed.  One thing rarely noted about
a Bugs Bunny cartoon, but nonetheless true, is that it tells its story well.
Even if the story is just a rack on which to hang jokes, it should be a
well-constructed rack.  "Tummy Trouble" is kind of a cheesy cartoon with a
lot of forced humor and a basic story that does not make a lot of sense.
Bugs had a well-defined, likeable character; Roger is basically just
obnoxious.  Sure, people laughed at it, but it is a lower form of humor than
the classic Warner Brothers' cartoons, just as the Three Stooges were funny
but not of the quality of Laurel and Hardy.

Title
Review for Adventures of Baron Munchausen, The (1988)
          Capsule review:  Once again the ever-so-slightly
     exaggerated adventures of the great Baron are told.  Terry
     Gilliam brings many of the great images of the Munchausen
     stories to the screen but the story that ties them together
     has problems.  Rating: high +1.
     THE ADVENTURES OF BARON MUNCHAUSEN is purported to be the final
installment of a "trilogy" of films directed by Terry Gilliam, the animator
for the "Monty Python" television series.  And while the first two, TIME
BANDITS and BRAZIL, were based on original screenplays, BARON MUNCHAUSEN is
an adaptation of the famous adventures which are for Europe sort of what the
Oz stories are for the United States.  The earliest Munchausen stories were
first published in 1785.  Since then the tall tales have taken many forms.
Many Americans first became aware of the Baron through NBC's 1933 radio
program THE JACK PEARL SHOW, in which Pearl played the Baron.  There have
been at least two previous film versions, one from Germany in 1943 with Hans
Albers as the Baron and one from Czechoslovakia in 1961 with Milos Kopecky.
The latter used to show up on New York television and did some very
imaginative combining of live actors and animation.  Terry Gilliam's version
is the latest version, and like the 1961 and probably the 1943 versions,
visually it owes very much to one of the great book illustrators of all
time, Gustave Dore.
     The story of Gilliam's film is not taken from the book but rather is a
tying together of the more imaginative scenes that Dore illustrated but in
what is at times a more rapid-fire pace.  And only "at times," because the
pacing of BARON MUNCHAUSEN is extremely uneven.  As in TIME BANDITS, Gilliam
has little idea of which of his sequences are really entertaining and which
are simply dull.  More than once the viewer feels like telling Gilliam that
he has made his point, is wasting precious screen time on an idea that has
no more to offer and should get on with things.  Then as often as not the
next scene is a gem.
     The story has a small theatre company putting on their production of
"The Adventures of Baron Munchausen" in a city besieged by the Ottoman
Turks.  As the pallid play proceeds who should arrive but the Baron himself
to give his own account of his adventures.  The story is difficult to relate
from there, not just because it is hard to tell what is fantasy and what is
reality, but because the script actually contradicts itself as to what is
its actual story line versus story-within-story.  Hence the story line does
not bear close examination.  Somewhere in all this is the Baron's bet with a
sultan and a trip to the moon with Robin Williams playing a very strange
moon man.  There is a visit to Vulcan's forge, and another to the belly of a
huge fish.  Finally there is a stupendous battle between the Ottoman Turks
and the Baron's friends, who amount to virtual super-heroes.
     Like the 1961 version, this film is a treat more for the eye than for
the mind.  Scenes of the city under siege are done with tremendous
historical realism.  Some scenes of fantasy are done with great imagination.
Then just when the proper mood is established, Gilliam will throw in an
anachronistic reference and get a chuckle from the audience at the expense
of the mood.  THE ADVENTURES OF BARON MUNCHAUSEN is a film that when it is
good is very, very good, and when it is bad, it can be quite bad.  It is a
tough film to rate overall, but probably deserves a high +1 on the -4 to +4
scale--better than TIME BANDITS, not as good as BRAZIL.

Title
Review for Summer of Sam (1999)
     Spike Lee co-produces and co-directs this story of a group of
people living in Bedford Stuyvesant section of New York.  The film is
not really about the Son of Sam murders themselves but about the
atmosphere of dread created by the killings.  Central to the story is
Vinny the hairdresser (played by John Leguizamo), his wife Dionna (Mira
Sorvino), and Vinny's boyhood friend Ritchie (Adrien Brody).  Vinny is
flashy and flamboyant, a local favorite in the club disco scene.  Vinny
is living the life of easy sex, illegal drugs, loud music, and too much
drinking.  His wife dotes on him but admits to herself that she somehow
failing to satisfy him and is disappointing him.  Ritchie has affected
a British punk hairstyle and a phony British accent.  Most people in
the neighborhood cannot understand what Ritchie is doing but Vinny
defends his friend.
     Meanwhile the paranoia over the killings is getting to the
neighborhood.  There is a general assumption that the Son of Sam is
someone from the neighborhood and someone they all know.  With the
tacit approval of the police vigilante groups form to try to track down
whoever is doing the killing.  In a witch hunt atmosphere anyone who
seems out of the ordinary, even ball-player Reggie Jackson, can be
suspect.  All the while we see little bits of the Son of Sam himself
living in torment from his personal demons then striking like some
Angel of Death.  He is just tangential to the story but hangs over all
that goes on.
     Spike Lee has structured the film a lot like his DO THE RIGHT
THING.  There is a violent incident toward the end of the film and
virtually every scene is buildup to this moment of violence.  In DO THE
RIGHT THING; however, it was a mystery where the story was going.  In
SUMMER OF SAM it is very obvious what is going to happen and the viewer
is left to wonder only how long it will take and how will it happen.
The answer the second question is "longer than you think."  Until then
you will be putting in a lot of time with some generally unpleasant
people. Lee orchestrates all this with the music of the summer of 1997.
He uses the time-tested but hardly original technique of creating
period feel by just finding out what the popular songs stations were
playing and salting them all over the soundtrack.  Sex in the film is
kept frequent, explicit, but using camera angles so that little
explicit is shown to the audience.
     What is disturbing is that Spike Lee's view of the Italian
Americans in this part of New York is not very deep.  If it is beyond
stereotype, it is not by much.  His portrayal is certainly not very
pleasant or understanding.  Lee has, in the past, accused other
filmmakers of using stereotypes.  But it may well instead be a result
of just the same sort of rushed and poorly observed writing that is
starting to appear in his own work.  In fact there have always been
unflattering portraits of non-blacks that he has not written well and
which do not fall far beyond the stereotypical.  During the film he
complains about a double standards toward blacks, but he himself would
complain if another film had black characters so poorly characterized.
     The paranoiac aspects of the film and a good and sympathetic
performance by Mira Sorvino make this otherwise wandering and
pointlessly over-long film considerably more watchable than it would be
otherwise.  And as with DO THE RIGHT THING we do see a good, credible
build of events that make an unthinkable incident believable.  I give
SUMMER OF SAM a 5 on the 0 to 10 scale and a high 0 on the -4 to +4
scale.  Gee, a film about the summer of 1977 and not one mention of
STAR WARS.

Title
Review for River Runs Through It, A (1992)
     As an actor Robert Redford is just not my cup of tea.  He generally
plays someone handsome and callow and perhaps less than a deep thinker.
When a film calls for someone to be handsome and callow and less than a
great thinker, he can be good in a role.  I certainly cannot fault him for
his contributions to films such as THE CANDIDATE and THE NATURAL.  But
Robert Redford the director is another animal entirely.  His ORDINARY PEOPLE
was neither ordinary nor empty, but a quiet and powerful study of a family
that was no longer functioning as a family.  THE MILAGRO BEANFIELD WAR was
another film of keenly observed personalities.  But this time he had a
whimsical feel and a spell of magical realism.  In his third film the
craftsmanship is greater than ever but the people are much more reserved and
the film lacks impact.  It is hard to feel much for a family that believes
so strongly that the best thing in life is fly fishing.
     In Missoula, Montana, of the 1920s the Reverend Maclean is a dry, stern
Presbyterian minister of Scottish descent.  He leaves it to be assumed that
behind his formal crustiness he may even have strong feelings for his
children.  He expresses emotion for only dry fly fishing and believes there
is no clean line between religion and fly fishing.  His two sons grow up
loving each other and in subtle competition.  The older, Norman (played by
Joseph Gordon-Levitt and later Craig Sheffer), is bookish and tentative,
while the younger, Paul (played by Van Gravage and later Brad Pitt). is
handsome, self-assured, and adventuresome.  As they grow older, Norman is
reserved and religious, while Paul is more inclined to walking on the wild
side.  Most of the story is set in one summer when Norman returns to Montana
after graduating college.  The story is generally episodic, relating the
relationship of the boys over that summer.
     Redford's direction and Philippe Rousselot's camera capture the beauty
of Montana but then fails to make the people upstage the scenery.  At least
this is the all-too-familiar story of the righteous son and the son tempted
by women and strong drink.  The message is too much like what is real and
good and true in life is getting out into nature and killing fish.  When it
was all over, the characters I was rooting for all had gills.  In spite of
the polish, I give this film only a 0 on the -4 to +4 scale, but that may be
only that I did not connect with the characters.

Title
Review for Waking Ned Devine (1998)
     In the little coastal village of Tullymore, Ireland there is a
local preoccupation with the National lottery and nobody is more
involved is the old rascal Jackie O'Shea (played by veteran actor Ian
Bannen).  Then one day the newspaper says there is one lottery winner
and he is from the local county.  Tullymore is the only village in the
county so someone local must have won.  Jackie waits for the scream of
excitement, but it does not come.  Somebody has won the lottery but is
not telling or perhaps does not even know it yet. Jackie forms a team
with his wife Annie (Fionnula Flanagan) and old pal Michael O'Sullivan
(David Kelly) to search the village for the winner.  But nobody seems
to have won the lottery.  Then Jackie realizes just one man is left who
could be the winner, Ned Devine.
     In his bed they find the old man, Ned Devine.  Ned had the good
luck to win the lottery and the bad luck to die of the excitement.  But
now there is no Ned Devine to collect the winnings.  But with no Ned
Devine there will be no winnings.  This has Jackie in a dither.  Well,
why not have Michael be Ned Devine just long enough to collect the
money.  Michael is not sure it is going to be so easy.  Michael is dead
right.  The man from the lottery wants reasonable proof that he is not
giving the prize money to the wrong man.  But reasonable proof is just
what is not possible to give.  Eventually the whole village will have
to be pulled into the fraudulent scheme if it going to work.  One
subplot that could have used a little polishing is that of the village
"witch," a most disagreeable woman who threatens to blackmail the
entire town for a larger share of the proceeds.  The subplot is crudely
resolved without the sort of finesse that is characteristic of most of
the rest of the script.  Similarly the entire plot is only partially
tied off at the end.  One wonders in what the state of the village will
be in another year.  The way is wide open for a sequel.
     Top billing goes to veteran actor Ian Bannen as an infectious
schemer, and yet totally likable.  But at least as much credit should
go to David Kelly as Michael O'Sullivan.  Kelly, with the huge duckbill
nose and the scrawny body of a plucked duck hanging in the shop is a
positive treasure.  In spite of Bannen's grace in front of the camera
and his infectious smile, most of the heavy laughs are earned by Kelly.
Still, together the massive Bannen and the wiry Kelly make a great
team, each being the foil for the other.  The story, by director Kirk
Jones, is a simple and pure situation comedy.  This is Kelly's first
feature film, having previously made commercials.
     Henry Braham's photography certainly demonstrates that the scenery
of Tullymore is beautiful, though he avoids showing it in its full
glory.  A lot of his photography catches the scenery when it is gray
and raining or at night or when the sun washes out the shot.
     WAKING NED DEVINE is the kind of comedy we do not see frequently
enough any more coming from the United Kingdom and Ireland.  This film
is reminiscent of WHISKEY GALORE and LOCAL HERO. Similar American films
are usually done with too heavy a hand.  WAKING NED DEVINE is a
pleasure.  I give it a 7 on the 0 to 10 scale and a +2 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Title
Review for Henry & June (1990)
     Take these comments with a grain of salt.  Films about people's sex and
love lives somehow just do not appeal to me, even from excellent filmmakers
such as Woody Allen or Philip Kaufman.  I rate them much lower than other
people seem to.  Not that sex itself cannot be interesting, but even a Woody
Allen agonizing over why he cannot bed Diane Keaton is for me the formula
for a total yawner.  Philip Kaufman's last film, THE UNBEARABLE LIGHTNESS OF
BEING, while much in this genre, did have enough substance besides the
sexual maneuvering that it held my interest.  His current HENRY AND JUNE is
a long film, but not nearly as long as it seems.  In spite of the title, the
film is mostly about Anais Nin and her early 1930s affair with Henry Miller.
The film is based on the account in her memoir of the same title.  She makes
herself out to be small and in some ways strong, but in most ways she is
fragile.  She is not entirely satisfied by her banker husband Hugo and is
attracted to virile American writer Henry Miller.  Awakened by his presence,
she proceeds in her frail, sensitive way to have sex with everyone in reach
but the housemaid and perhaps the dog (though the dog wasn't talking).  She
also has a stimulating intellectual relationship with Miller, who is
straight-laced enough to limit his sexual partners to only the members of
the opposite sex within reach.  When one of them is not making love, he or
she is agonizing, writing books, or riding bicycles.
     Most of the story is told in Nin's voice, which is an acquired taste
like candied violets.  The camera adopts a soft focus to mirror her writing
style.  One set, apparently near the house where much of the action happens,
is a long walkway next to a wall in night and fog.  It looks very much like
an impressionist painting.  I was hoping we would see it in the daytime or
at least without fog, but we never do.  I remember no other fog in the film
and it is there apparently mostly for effect.
     Kaufman underscores that most of what we are seeing is from Nin's point
of view by having one sequence be a flashback narrated by Miller.  The soft
focus is banished and the prose changes to a hard-boiled Raymond Chandler
style.  Even in Nin's style Fred War may be trying to affect Miller's
character but it comes out like Humphrey Bogart.  Maria de Medeiros' Nin is
a dictionary illustration for "demure" and often also for "naked."  Kaufman
has created a tremendous number of nude positions for couples in which the
parts that would be most busy are out of sight, perhaps trying for an R
rating, or perhaps affecting Anais Nin's point of view.  (Of course, the
film got first an X rating and then inaugurated the NC-17 rating.)  "June"
refers, incidentally, to Miller's wife, played by Uma Thurman, who usually
is not around.
     The film is constantly melodramatic, with deep people feeling deep
emotions which we are told about cheaply and superficially.  You know you're
in trouble when characters start voicing lines like, "Does she think she can
love anything in you I haven't loved?"  Even if these are real people, these
people aren't real.  My rating: -1 on the -4 to +4 scale.  It might have
been lower but for the peculiar background created of Paris in the 1930s.

Title
Review for Cradle Will Rock (1999)
     In the 1930S during the Great Depression massive numbers of
Americans were out of work.  In 1934 the number was 11 million.  To cut
unemployment and get people working again the Works Progress
Administration was established.  It eventually employed 8.5 million
people to improve the infrastructure and culture of the country.
Laborers built roads, bridges, parks, buildings, and airports.  Artists
were employed by the Federal Arts Project, The Federal Writers Project,
and the Federal Theater Project.  The Federal Theater Project (FTP)
lasted from 1935 to 1939 when it was shut down by the House Committee
on Un-American Activities for its left-leaning plays.
     CRADLE WILL ROCK combines the stories of two incidents of the
1930s.  In 1933 Nelson Rockefeller objected to the mural that Diego
Rivera was creating for Rockefeller Center which depicted Lenin as a
liberator.  In 1937 Marc Blitzstein's play "The Cradle Will Rock" was
to be produced under the aegis of the FTP staged by Orson Welles and
John Houseman, but the government withdrew support with dramatic
consequences.
     The film begins with a homeless woman Olive Stanton (Emily Watson)
catching some sleep behind the screen of a movie theater.  The theater
is showing a newsreel about the spread of Fascism in Europe, but how
things are better and more optimistic in the US.  Stanton clearly knows
more about conditions in the US than the patrons of the theater.
Chased from this shelter she looks for a job with the Federal Theater
Project.
     The FTP is an explosion of creative chaos presided over by the
tireless Hallie Flanagan (Cherry Jones).  She reads new plays, makes
production assignments, and does a wealth of other jobs.  We are soon
introduced to Orson Welles (Angus Macfadyen), John Houseman (Cary
Elwes) putting on a creatively-staged production of Marlowe's DOCTOR
FAUSTUS.  They are also preparing a polemical play, "The Cradle Will
Rock," for the FTP.
     The wealthy also mix in with a strong interest in the arts.  We
meet Nelson Rockefeller (John Cusack), an oil magnate more interested
in art and Latin America than he is in petroleum.  He has commissioned
the admired Diego Rivera (Ruben Blades) to paint a mural for
Rockefeller Center, the theme of which is to be "Man's Intelligence
Controlling Nature."
     But not everybody is happy with this flowering of creativity.  Icy
Hazel Huffman (Joan Cusack) and a frustrated vaudeville ventriloquist
Tommy Crickshaw (Bill Murray) do not like the leftist message of many
of the plays present.  They are organizing to fight what they think is
becoming a liberal establishment.  The film chronicles their collision
with the artists and playwrights they oppose.
     The casting is quite good.  Especially notable is the Angus
Macfadyen impression of Orson Welles.  Welles has now been portrayed by
a number of different actors on the screen but never by someone who
with so close a physical resemblance or who got the facial expressions
down so well.  Less familiar is John Houseman but Cary Elwes at least
sounds a good deal like Houseman.  Cherry Jones just sparkles as Hallie
Flanagan.
     The characters of CRADLE WILL ROCK are in a kettle with a seething
stew of politics and art.  Tim Robbins who wrote and directed, sees the
events of this film to be the beginnings of the 1950s Congressional
witch hunts for communists.  It also provides much of the reason that
even today there are few plays on Broadway with any real political
meat.  Art today is about colors and textures and not political ideas
for the most part.  Few works in art museums have strong political
comment and much of Broadway is given over to fluffy plays with little
political bite.  Ironically Robbins makes a very clear statement that
only some censorship is bad.  Aldo Silvano (John Turturro) does not
want to see "The Cradle Will Rock" be censored for its unpopular
political message.  Yet he is outraged when he hears his children
singing a song that is sung by the Brown Shirts in Italy.  In this case
he is censoring his own children's singing of a Fascist song.  That
seems right, but where is the line to be drawn?  Plays of this time
could appeal to any political persuasion instead of having to appeal to
people of every political persuasion as they do today.  The wealthy and
powerful do not want art to have messages that threaten their
interests. The rich who have been the patrons of the arts do not what
to have to choose between what is good for art and their own welfare.
     The film is good entertainment.  Is it accurate history?  There is
some distortion, certainly.  Just having two art and political
censorship events occurring at the same time instead of years apart
leads one to believe that such clashes were more frequent than they
really were.  Robbins portrays the people who agree with his political
viewpoint being likable, intelligent, artistically fulfilled people.
Those who oppose artistic freedom are maladjusted neurotics if not
out-and-out wackos.  By leaving no doubt as to whom the viewer should
credit as being in the right, Robbins talks down to his audience and
demonstrates that he does not trust them to choose the correct side of
the debate.  One could ask if Lenin was the great liberator that Rivera
wanted to portray, where are all the people who genuinely believe that
he liberated them? History seems to have sided with Rockefeller.
     While CRADLE WILL ROCK plays a little fast and loose with history,
it still is an enjoyable watch and one of the best films of the year.
I rate it a 9 on the 0 to 10 scale and a +3 on the -4 to +4 scale.

Title
Review for Star Wars (1977)
     This year marks the tenth anniversary of George Lucas's STAR WARS.  I
think it is fairly safe to say that for the fantasy film genre and for the
film industry as a whole, the decade has been very different than might have
been expected when Fox was telling theaters that if they wanted to show THE
OTHER SIDE OF MIDNIGHT they would also have to book this science fiction
film, STAR WARS.  There is little doubt--at least to my mind--that STAR WARS
is one of the three most influential films ever made.  In fact, the only
film that obviously was more influential was Edward Muybridge's sequence of
snapshots of a running racehorse that was, in essence, the first motion
picture.
     But "influential" and "good" are two different things.  Recently, when
I listed films that I gave my highest rating to, I included STAR WARS.  One
comment I got from a reader was that it was a good list but should not
include STAR WARS.  The belief that STAR WARS is actually good as a film is
actually not very common.  I have heard it claimed that it is the weakest of
the three currently released "Star Wars" films or that the whole series is a
piece of fluff without much cinematic merit.  It is my contention that the
original STAR WARS is, on its own, a good film and the best of its series.
Though it is not in the scope of this short article to examine an entire
decade of fantasy films.  I would contend that no better science fiction,
horror, or fantasy film has been made in the interim.
     Before we can determine if STAR WARS really is a great film, in the
sense that CITIZEN KANE is a great film, we have to determine some
characteristics of film greatness.  What is it that makes a film great?  One
characteristic would be originality.  A film should be experimental and
should break new ground.  But many film experiments fail and leave audiences
confused.  The new ground that a film breaks must be accepted by audiences
so that a film leaves its mark.  To this extent, being good is connected
with being influential.  Still, it is clear that an exploitation film may be
the first of its kind and have imitators without being very good.  The
ground that a film breaks must be valuable.  It should advance the art of
filmmaking.  If a film does what it does well, breaks new ground in the art
of filmmaking making valuable contributions, and those contributions are
accepted by audiences and become part of the palette for future filmmakers,
no more is required for a film to achieve greatness.  If you come down to
it, that is really what makes CITIZEN KANE a great film.  But is STAR WARS
great in the same sense?  I think that while CITIZEN KANE undeniably has
some virtues that STAR WARS lacks (and vice versa), STAR WARS is great in
the same sense.
     STAR WARS WAS A GROUND-BREAKING FILM.  It was the first marrying of
cinema and the new video and computer technologies for creating images on
film.  The effects people had to invent much of the technology as they went
along.  The last jump in visual technology of the same magnitude had been
with Willis O'Brien's stop-motion effects for KING KONG.  As late as the
'60s the most visually imaginative films--films like JASON AND THE
ARGONAUTS--still relied most heavily on variations on, and enhancements of,
O'Brien's techniques.  Between JASON AND THE ARGONAUTS and STAR WARS there
were some impressive pieces of visual fantasy, notably 2001: A SPACE ODYSSEY
and LOGAN'S RUN, but they relied mostly on just extensive use of model work
and other long-existing technologies.  For STAR WARS a battery of new
technologies was employed and for the first time since KING KONG special
effects made a real quantum leap toward the goal of being able to create on
the screen any scene that the mind's eye can create.
     STAR WARS was obviously a ground-breaking film from the first moments
of the film.  Just showing a field of stars, STAR WARS did something that no
other film had ever done.  It panned the camera upward.  That does not sound
like much, but consider that not even 2001 had ever done it before.  Space
scenes had always been done with a fixed camera, and for a very good reason.
It was more economical not to create a background of stars large enough to
pan through.  So scenes in space had always been done with a static camera,
just like all scenes were done in the early days of film.  I had never even
realized that in all science fiction films I had seen, the space shots were
done with a static camera until the instant I saw Lucas's 90-degree pan.
Not a single model had shown on the screen and certainly not a single set or
character and already the film was a one-of-a-kind!
     When we do finally meet characters the first two we meet are robots
with personalities that are a cliche now, but the closest I remember seeing
before was the robot in LOST IN SPACE, who occasionally would lose his cool
and yell, "Warning! Warning!  Danger!  Danger!" while gesticulating wildly.
We have seen characters for all of two seconds on the screen before we again
see that STAR WARS was unprecedented.
     And the impact of STAR WARS continues right through the film.  Scene
after scene is done with an originality and sense of wonder totally
unprecedented in the science fiction film.  The audience reaction was
nothing short of astounding.  In Detroit, where the film played there was a
difficult left turn to get to the theater parking lot.  VARIETY reported
that making that left turn had become the new summer sport in Detroit.  The
lines that queued up to see the film were legendary because in so many
different ways the film delivered more than it had to.  There was more bang
per dollar of admission then perhaps any other film made to that point.
     One thing the film delivered was a sparkling score by John Williams.
Williams used a leit-motif approach, but composed many themes, each of which
was attractive and which blended together into a very fine score that was
reproduced--for the first time--with the process of Dolby sound.  It gave a
live-orchestral clarity to the score as well as allowing far more use of
subliminal sound effects surrounding the audience.  Many were barely
perceptible to the ear but certainly helped to make the experience seem more
believable.
     This reality was further enhanced by the detail Lucas embued the film
with.  Small details--throwaways--that few filmmakers bother with were
painstakingly added.  In one scene after the visit to the cantina, we are
watching the main characters in the background and the silhouettes of two
spindly legs walk by in the foreground.  Because that is not where the
viewer's attention is at the time, many in the audience never even noticed
the legs.  To throw in unnecessary details and then purposely call the
viewer's attention away so the details may well go unnoticed is a mark of a
good craftsman.
     A little more noticeable, though again unnecessary to the plot, is the
skeleton shown in the background in a desert scene.  Nobody in the script
mentions the skeleton of some gargantuan desert creature, as if it is a
perfectly normal sight.  Similarly the speeder, which could have been easily
made a wheeled vehicle, instead floats.  No mention is made of the floating
vehicle; again, the matter of fact acceptance of this wonder is what helps
to make the film work.
     More noticeable but equally unrequired to the plot are some
breathtaking planetscapes, again of a scale that never had been used in
science fiction films to that point.  Films like THIS ISLAND EARTH or FIRST
SPACESHIP ON VENUS had shown planetary landscapes but they used unconvincing
models or matte paintings.  ILM has since become known for very impressive
backgrounds and spacescapes.  STAR WARS was their debut.
     A few more touches, perhaps not as original, but which were unexpected,
should be mentioned.  One is the use of two distinguished actors in major
roles.  Getting Sir Alec Guinness to appear in any science fiction film is
something of a wonder.  His first response on seeing the script was
reportedly, "Oh crumbs, this isn't for me." He enjoyed the script
sufficiently, however, that he changed his mind.  More so than even actors
like Olivier or Gielgud, Guinness has been selective of his parts and his
presence in this film puts STAR WARS in fine company.  Peter Cushing was
then, as he is now, perhaps the most accomplished and beloved of actors
specializing in fantasy roles.
     Another unusual touch is the pacing.  The audience comes in with the
story already in progress.  The viewer has to catch up by reading the screen
explanation rolling by, then is immediately tossed into the action.  This
requires more from the audience, but that is far better than boring the
audience with slow introductions.  This style, borrowed from internal
chapters of serials, might not work well outside of the fantasy genre, but
captures audiences very effectively here.
     It seems then that STAR WARS was an innovative film, every bit as much
as was CITIZEN KANE.  Had this much innovation been lavished on a mainstream
film it would be considered an artistic triumph.  As it was, it was a box-
office champion, an accolade that perhaps meant even more, at least to its
backers.
     I would like to conclude this discussion with a comparison of the "Star
Wars" films which purport to be a continuation of the same story but which I
consider to be stylistically inferior to the first film.  I will continue to
call it STAR WARS, incidentally, in spite of the retitling to STAR WARS: A
NEW HOPE.
     When George Lucas made STAR WARS he had little expectation that it
would become one of the most popular films ever made.  In some ways that
contributed to the artistic achievement.  In the later films he knew what
had worked well in the first film and could consciously repeat and
effectively milk it.  In the first film the line "I've got a bad feeling
about this" was used and got a positive audience reaction.  It even appeared
on humorous buttons people wore at science fiction conventions.  It was a
good line, but its popularity prompted it to be used twice in THE EMPIRE
STRIKES BACK.
     Each of the STAR WARS treats aliens in a different manner, but the
first film is by far the most satisfying treatment.  In that film robots,
intelligent non-humans (INH), and humans all interact in roughly the way
people of different origins interact in New York City.  STAR WARS takes
place in a sort of melting-pot universe.  We are introduced to many species
of INH in STAR WARS.  The only new one to be added in THE EMPIRE STRIKES
BACK was Yoda.  For that matter, Chewbacca is the only other INH in THE
EMPIRE STRIKES BACK.  Gone is the melting-pot universe.  It was, however,
back with a vengeance in RETURN OF THE JEDI.
     In a documentary made by Lucasfilm, it was claimed that George Lucas
was never happy with the aliens in STAR WARS and he was finally able to
create the effect he wanted for RETURN OF THE JEDI.  True, there were more
aliens in RETURN OF THE JEDI, but they were stupid ideas for aliens.  While
the aliens in STAR WARS were misshapen creatures designed by Ralph
McQuarrie, Ron Cobb, and Rick Baker, RETURN OF THE JEDI featured aliens like
Sly Snoodles, a singing elephant with lips on the end of her nose.  Also,
there is Salacious Crumb, a rather obvious muppet who looks like he would be
more at home on FRAGGLE ROCK than in a major motion picture.  And who can
forget the dancing fat woman?  Of somewhat higher quality are the pig
guards, but they are reminiscent of Earth creatures and look like something
out of a fairy tale.  Only Jabba the Hut seems sufficiently alien and he
resembles a caterpillar.  The aliens are cute and not crisply done like the
creatures in STAR WARS.
     And speaking of cute, Lucas at one point said the third film would take
place in large part on the Wookie planet.  But Wookies would not have made
very good toys and certainly not new toys, so Lucas reversed the syllables
in Wookie and got Ewok, a lovable, merchandisable teddy bear.  Most fans
over the age of ten get a little sick at the thought of Ewoks.
     There is also a question of realism.  In the first film we see a
guerilla attack on the Death Star; the second has the Empire crushing a
rebel base; the third has the killing of Jabba and his crew and the Empire
fighting the teddy bear Ewoks.  So in which of the three films do we see the
greatest number of allies of the rebellion killed?  By far, the answer is
the first film.  Not even counting Lars and Beru, who were innocent
bystanders, more allies were killed in the attack on the Death Star, which
was done reasonably realistically, than in all the battles in the later
films.  In RETURN OF THE JEDI one Ewok is apparently killed, I think, and
one is knocked out by his own bolo.  Very few "good-guys" are killed in THE
EMPIRE STRIKES BACK, in spite of the apparent darker tone of the second
film.
     Because of all the points mentioned above and because so much more of
Lucas's creativity went into the first film, for which a universe was
created--the other two films just used, and only in minor ways amplified on,
this universe--I still contend it was the best of the three films and will
remain the "Star Wars" film most people will remember.  In 2077, it will be
the best-remembered "Star Wars" film.
